BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that it
is the policy of the state of Washington to encourage safe use of the
roads by all citizens. In furtherance of this policy and in order to
reduce problematic encounters and interactions between motorists and
emergency medical responders and law enforcement personnel, the
legislature further finds and declares that the department of licensing
shall initiate a voluntary program in which interested individuals may
obtain from the department a yellow dot window decal for placement on
their motor vehicle and a yellow dot folder for placement in the glove
compartment of the motor vehicle.
The purpose of the yellow dot program is to assist owners and
lessees of motor vehicles who participate in the program and their
passengers, emergency medical responders, and law enforcement personnel
in the event of a motor vehicle accident, a medical emergency, or any
other interaction involving emergency medical responders or law
enforcement personnel.
A participant should affix the yellow dot window decal on the
operator's side of the motor vehicle's rear window in the lower corner.
The purpose of the decal is to alert emergency medical responders or
law enforcement personnel and notify them to search the glove
compartment of the motor vehicle for the corresponding yellow dot
folder. The folder, which is intended to be stored in the glove
compartment of the motor vehicle, should contain an information form
with the participant's name, a photo of the participant, emergency
contact information, the participant's medical conditions, recent
surgeries, allergies, medications being used, and relevant information
about the participant's personal physician. The folder should be
updated when necessary to ensure that current information is provided,
and the date of the last update should be clearly indicated on the
folder.
The purposes of the information in the folder are to assist
emergency medical responders and law enforcement personnel: In the
event of an accident involving the motor vehicle, a medical emergency,
or any other interaction involving emergency medical responders or law
enforcement personnel; in positively identifying the participant,
communicating with the participant's family or emergency contacts, and
ensuring that the participant's current medications and preexisting
medical conditions are considered when treatment is administered for
any injury the participant suffers in a motor vehicle accident; when
treatment is administered for any other medical emergency; or when any
other interaction involving emergency medical responders or law
enforcement personnel occurs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall implement a yellow dot program to provide a
yellow dot window decal, which meets the requirements of the yellow dot
program, and a yellow dot folder to any person who applies.
(2) A fee must be charged for the issuance of the yellow dot window
decal and yellow dot folder. The fee must be sufficient to cover the
costs associated with the program and is in addition to the regular
vehicle license fee and any other fees and taxes required to be paid
upon registration of the motor vehicle.
(3) Participation in the yellow dot program does not create any new
or distinct obligation for emergency medical responders or law
enforcement personnel to determine if there is a yellow dot folder in
the motor vehicle or use the information contained in the yellow dot
folder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---