BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
Any individual who applies for a license or temporary practice
permit or holds a license or temporary practice permit and has a final
finding issued by the department of social and health services of abuse
or neglect of a minor or abuse, abandonment, neglect, or financial
exploitation of a vulnerable adult is prohibited from practicing a
health care profession in this state until proceedings of the
appropriate disciplining authority have been completed under RCW
18.130.050.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.130.050 and 2008 c 134 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 18.130.062, the disciplining authority
has the following authority:
(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind such rules as are deemed necessary
to carry out this chapter;
(2) To investigate all complaints or reports of unprofessional
conduct as defined in this chapter;
(3) To hold hearings as provided in this chapter;
(4) To issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any
investigation, consideration of an application for license, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;
(5) To take or cause depositions to be taken and use other
discovery procedures as needed in any investigation, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;
(6) To compel attendance of witnesses at hearings;
(7) In the course of investigating a complaint or report of
unprofessional conduct, to conduct practice reviews and to issue
citations and assess fines for failure to produce documents, records,
or other items in accordance with RCW 18.130.230;
(8) To take emergency action ordering summary suspension of a
license, or restriction or limitation of the license holder's practice
pending proceedings by the disciplining authority. Within fourteen
days of a request by the affected license holder, the disciplining
authority must provide a show cause hearing in accordance with the
requirements of RCW 18.130.135. In addition to the authority in this
subsection, a disciplining authority shall:
(a) Consistent with RCW 18.130.370, ((a disciplining authority
shall)) issue a summary suspension of the license or temporary practice
permit of a license holder prohibited from practicing a health care
profession in another state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction because
of an act of unprofessional conduct that is substantially equivalent to
an act of unprofessional conduct prohibited by this chapter or any of
the chapters specified in RCW 18.130.040. The summary suspension
remains in effect until proceedings by the Washington disciplining
authority have been completed;
(b) Consistent with section 1 of this act, issue a summary
suspension of the license or temporary practice permit if, under RCW
74.39A.051, the license holder is prohibited from employment in the
care of vulnerable adults based upon a department of social and health
services' final finding of abuse or neglect of a minor or abuse,
abandonment, neglect, or financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult.
The summary suspension remains in effect until proceedings by the
disciplining authority have been completed;
(9) To conduct show cause hearings in accordance with RCW
18.130.062 or 18.130.135 to review an action taken by the disciplining
authority to suspend a license or restrict or limit a license holder's
practice pending proceedings by the disciplining authority;
(10) To use a presiding officer as authorized in RCW 18.130.095(3)
or the office of administrative hearings as authorized in chapter 34.12
RCW to conduct hearings. The disciplining authority shall make the
final decision regarding disposition of the license unless the
disciplining authority elects to delegate in writing the final decision
to the presiding officer. Disciplining authorities identified in RCW
18.130.040(2)(b) may not delegate the final decision regarding
disposition of the license or imposition of sanctions to a presiding
officer in any case pertaining to standards of practice or where
clinical expertise is necessary;
(11) To use individual members of the boards to direct
investigations and to authorize the issuance of a citation under
subsection (7) of this section. However, the member of the board shall
not subsequently participate in the hearing of the case;
(12) To enter into contracts for professional services determined
to be necessary for adequate enforcement of this chapter;
(13) To contract with license holders or other persons or
organizations to provide services necessary for the monitoring and
supervision of license holders who are placed on probation, whose
professional activities are restricted, or who are for any authorized
purpose subject to monitoring by the disciplining authority;
(14) To adopt standards of professional conduct or practice;
(15) To grant or deny license applications, and in the event of a
finding of unprofessional conduct by an applicant or license holder, to
impose any sanction against a license applicant or license holder
provided by this chapter. After January 1, 2009, all sanctions must be
issued in accordance with RCW 18.130.390;
(16) To restrict or place conditions on the practice of new
licensees in order to protect the public and promote the safety of and
confidence in the health care system;
(17) To designate individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and
statements of charges;
(18) To establish panels consisting of three or more members of the
board to perform any duty or authority within the board's jurisdiction
under this chapter;
(19) To review and audit the records of licensed health facilities'
or services' quality assurance committee decisions in which a license
holder's practice privilege or employment is terminated or restricted.
Each health facility or service shall produce and make accessible to
the disciplining authority the appropriate records and otherwise
facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall not be
subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action
pursuant to RCW 70.41.200(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---