BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the public is
entitled to complete disclosure regarding the influence of money in
politics. Therefore, the legislature intends to increase disclosure by
requiring electronic filing by lobbyists.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.17A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All agencies required to report under RCW 42.17A.635 must file
all reports required by this chapter electronically over the internet
as provided by the commission under RCW 42.17A.055.
(2) No later than January 1, 2016, all lobbyists and lobbyists'
employers required to file reports under RCW 42.17A.600, 42.17A.615,
42.17A.625, or 42.17A.630 must file all reports required by this
chapter electronically over the internet as provided by the commission
under RCW 42.17A.055.
(3) The commission shall design, develop, implement, and maintain
computer hardware and software or other applications to accommodate
electronic filing of the reports required by this section and a
database and query system compatible with current architecture,
technology, and operating systems that result in readily available data
to the public for review and analysis. The commission is encouraged to
engage stakeholders in the design and development of the system.

--- END ---