BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.655 and 2005 c 431 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No vehicle shall be driven or moved on any public highway
unless such vehicle is so constructed or loaded as to prevent any of
its load from dropping, sifting, leaking, or otherwise escaping
therefrom, except that sand may be dropped for the purpose of securing
traction.
(2) No person may operate on any public highway any vehicle with
any load unless the load and such covering as required thereon by
subsection (3) of this section is securely fastened to prevent the
covering or load from becoming loose, detached, or in any manner a
hazard to other users of the highway.
(3)(a) From August 1, 2013, through June 30, 2015: Any vehicle
operating on a paved public highway with a load of dirt, sand, rocks,
or gravel susceptible to being dropped, spilled, leaked, or otherwise
escaping ((therefrom shall)) from the vehicle must be covered so as to
prevent spillage((.)); and the covering of such loads is not required
if six inches of freeboard is maintained within the bed, but if a
vehicle hauling such loads is equipped with a cover the cover must be
used.
(b) After June 30, 2015: Any vehicle over eighty-five hundred
pounds gross vehicle weight operating on a paved public highway with a
load of dirt, sand, rocks, or gravel susceptible to being dropped,
spilled, leaked, or otherwise escaping from the vehicle must be covered
so as to prevent spillage.
(c)(i) The department of transportation, counties, and cities are
exempt from the requirements in (a) and (b) of this subsection if the
vehicle is:
(A) Applying sand or deicers for snow and ice control;
(B) Performing maintenance operations in response to emergency
events; or
(C) Performing maintenance operations within work zones where roads
or sections of roads are closed to the public.
(ii) The department of transportation, counties, and cities must
continue to maintain the requirement of six inches of freeboard on the
types of loads described in (c)(i) of this subsection.
(d) The Washington state patrol must conduct random emphasis
patrols to enforce the covering of loads requirements under this
section.
(e) (a) and (b) of this subsection do not apply to farm vehicles
carrying farm commodities.
(f) (a) and (b) of this subsection do not apply to vehicles
traveling on gravel roads.
(g) For purposes of this subsection (3), "cover" means a tarp,
other informal covering device, or a manufactured cover to fit a
vehicle, which is securely fastened to the vehicle to cover the load
that the vehicle is hauling.
(h) For the purposes of this subsection (3), "susceptible to being
dropped, spilled, leaked, or otherwise escaping" means that the load,
or particles, portions, or pieces of the load, is of such a low density
that the load, or particles, portions, or pieces of the load, can be
influenced by wind, other atmospheric and weather conditions, or road
conditions.
(4)(a) Any person operating a vehicle from which any glass or
objects have fallen or escaped, which would constitute an obstruction
or injure a vehicle or otherwise endanger travel upon such public
highway shall immediately cause the public highway to be cleaned of all
such glass or objects and shall pay any costs therefor.
(b) Any vehicle with deposits of mud, rocks, or other debris on the
vehicle's body, fenders, frame, undercarriage, wheels, or tires shall
be cleaned of such material before the operation of the vehicle on a
paved public highway.
(5) The state patrol may make necessary rules to carry into effect
the provisions of this section, applying such provisions to specific
conditions and loads and prescribing means, methods, and practices to
effectuate such provisions.
(6) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit a public
maintenance vehicle from dropping sand on a highway to enhance
traction, or sprinkling water or other substances to clean or maintain
a highway.
(7)(a)(i) A person is guilty of failure to secure a load in the
first degree if he or she, with criminal negligence, fails to secure a
load or part of a load to his or her vehicle in compliance with
subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section and causes substantial
bodily harm to another.
(ii) Failure to secure a load in the first degree is a gross
misdemeanor.
(b)(i) A person is guilty of failure to secure a load in the second
degree if he or she, with criminal negligence, fails to secure a load
or part of a load to his or her vehicle in compliance with subsection
(1) or (2) of this section and causes damage to property of another.
(ii) Failure to secure a load in the second degree is a
misdemeanor.
(c) A person who fails to secure a load or part of a load to his or
her vehicle in compliance with subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this
section is guilty of an infraction if such failure does not amount to
a violation of (a) or (b) of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---