BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Licensees holding either a license that permits or a license
with an endorsement that permits the sale of beer to a purchaser in a
container supplied by the licensee or a sanitary container brought to
the premises by the purchaser and filled at the tap at the time of sale
may similarly sell cider to a purchaser in such a container.
(2) For purposes of this section, "cider" has the same meaning as
in RCW 66.24.210(6).

--- END ---