BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
Retailers may sell liquor as defined in RCW 66.04.010(25) through
self-checkout registers if that register is programmed to halt that
transaction during the purchase of liquor until an employee of the
retailer intervenes and verifies the age of the purchaser by reviewing
established forms of acceptable identification. Once age is
successfully verified, the employee can release the transaction for
payment. If the purchaser cannot provide acceptable forms of
identification to verify age, the employee must refuse the purchase and
void the transaction.

--- END ---