BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.94.544 and 2008 c 68 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The requirements of this section and RCW 19.94.540 and 19.94.542
shall not apply to: (1) The sale of a motor vehicle that contains
engine coolant or antifreeze ((or to wholesale containers of fifty-five
gallons or more of engine coolant or antifreeze)); or (2) spent engine
coolant or spent antifreeze being stored or transported for disposal in
accordance with chapter 70.105 RCW.

--- END ---