BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.260.020 and 2009 c 565 s 18 and 2009 c 501 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Automatic commercial ice cube machine" means a factory-made
assembly, not necessarily shipped in one package, consisting of a
condensing unit and ice-making section operating as an integrated unit
with means for making and harvesting ice cubes. It may also include
integrated components for storing or dispensing ice, or both.
(2) "Bottle-type water dispenser" means a water dispenser that uses
a bottle or reservoir as the source of potable water.
(3) "Commercial hot food holding cabinet" means a heated, fully
enclosed compartment, with one or more solid or partial glass doors,
that is designed to maintain the temperature of hot food that has been
cooked in a separate appliance. "Commercial hot food holding cabinet"
does not include heated glass merchandising cabinets, drawer warmers,
or cook and hold appliances.
(4)(a) "Commercial refrigerators and freezers" means refrigerators,
freezers, or refrigerator-freezers designed for use by commercial or
institutional facilities for the purpose of storing or merchandising
food products, beverages, or ice at specified temperatures that: (i)
Incorporate most components involved in the vapor-compression cycle and
the refrigerated compartment in a single cabinet; and (ii) may be
configured with either solid or transparent doors as a reach-in
cabinet, pass-through cabinet, roll-in cabinet, or roll-through
cabinet.
(b) "Commercial refrigerators and freezers" does not include: (i)
Products with 85 cubic feet or more of internal volume; (ii) walk-in
refrigerators or freezers; (iii) consumer products that are federally
regulated pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6291 et seq.; (iv) products
without doors; or (v) freezers specifically designed for ice cream.
(5) "Compensation" means money or any other valuable thing,
regardless of form, received or to be received by a person for services
rendered.
(6) "Cook and hold appliance" means a multiple mode appliance
intended for cooking food that may be used to hold the temperature of
the food that has been cooked in the same appliance.
(7) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(8) "Drawer warmer" means an appliance that consists of one or more
heated drawers and that is designed to hold hot food that has been
cooked in a separate appliance at a specified temperature.
(9) "Heated glass merchandising cabinet" means an appliance with a
heated cabinet constructed of glass or clear plastic doors which, with
seventy percent or more clear area, is designed to display and maintain
the temperature of hot food that has been cooked in a separate
appliance.
(10) "Hot water dispenser" means a small electric water heater that
has a measured storage volume of no greater than one gallon.
(11) "Mini-tank electric water heater" means a small electric water
heater that has a measured storage volume of more than one gallon and
a rated storage volume of less than twenty gallons.
(12) "Pass-through cabinet" means a commercial refrigerator or
freezer with hinged or sliding doors on both the front and rear of the
unit.
(13) "Point-of-use water dispenser" means a water dispenser that
uses a pressurized water utility connection as the source of potable
water.
(14) "Pool heater" means an appliance designed for heating
nonpotable water contained at atmospheric pressure for swimming pools,
spas, hot tubs, and similar applications.
(15) "Portable electric spa" means a factory-built electric spa or
hot tub, supplied with equipment for heating and circulating water.
(16) "Reach-in cabinet" means a commercial refrigerator or freezer
with hinged or sliding doors or lids, but does not include roll-in or
roll-through cabinets or pass-through cabinets.
(17) "Residential pool pump" means a pump used to circulate and
filter pool water in order to maintain clarity and sanitation.
(18)(a) "Roll-in cabinet" means a commercial refrigerator or
freezer with hinged or sliding doors that allow wheeled racks of
product to be rolled into the unit.
(b) "Roll-through cabinet" means a commercial refrigerator or
freezer with hinged or sliding doors on two sides of the cabinet that
allow wheeled racks of product to be rolled through the unit.
(19) "Showerhead" means a device through which water is discharged
for a shower bath.
(20) "Showerhead tub spout diverter combination" means a group of
plumbing fittings sold as a matched set and consisting of a control
valve, a tub spout diverter, and a showerhead.
(21) "State-regulated incandescent reflector lamp" means a lamp
that is not colored or designed for rough or vibration service
applications, has an inner reflective coating on the outer bulb to
direct the light, an E26 medium screw base, a rated voltage or voltage
range that lies at least partially within 115 to 130 volts, and falls
into one of the following categories:
(a) A bulged reflector or elliptical reflector bulb shape and which
has a diameter which equals or exceeds 2.25 inches; or
(b) A reflector, parabolic aluminized reflector, or similar bulb
shape and which has a diameter of 2.25 to 2.75 inches.
(22) "Tub spout diverter" means a device designed to stop the flow
of water into a bathtub and to divert it so that the water discharges
through a showerhead.
(23) "Wine chillers designed and sold for use by an individual"
means refrigerators designed and sold for the cooling and storage of
wine by an individual.
(24) "Battery charger systems" means a battery charger coupled with
its batteries or battery chargers coupled with their batteries, which
together are referred to as battery charger systems. This term covers
all rechargeable batteries or devices incorporating a rechargeable
battery and the chargers used with them. The charging circuitry of
battery charger systems may or may not be located within the housing of
the end-use device itself. In many cases, the battery may be charged
with a dedicated external charger and power supply combination that is
separate from the device that runs on power from the battery. Battery
charger systems include, but are not limited to:
(a) Electronic devices with a battery that are normally charged
with AC line voltage or DC input voltage through an internal or
external power supply and a dedicated battery charger;
(b) The battery and battery charger components of devices that are
designed to run on battery power during part or all of their
operations;
(c) Dedicated battery systems primarily designed for electrical or
emergency backup; and
(d) Devices whose primary function is to charge batteries, along
with the batteries they are designed to charge. These units include
chargers for power tool batteries and chargers for automotive, AA, AAA,
C, D, or 9 V rechargeable batteries, as well as chargers for batteries
used in larger industrial motive equipment and a la carte chargers.
(25) "À la carte charger" means a battery charger that is
individually packaged without batteries. "À la carte charger" includes
those with multivoltage or multiport capabilities.
(26) "Battery analyzer" means a device:
(a) Used to analyze and report a battery's performance and overall
condition;
(b) Capable of being programmed and performing service functions to
restore capability in deficient batteries; and
(c) Not intended or marketed to be used on a daily basis for the
purpose of charging batteries.
(27) "Illuminated exit sign" means:
(a) A sign that is designed to be permanently fixed in place to
identify an exit; and
(b) A sign that: (i) Consists of an electrically powered integral
light source that illuminates the legend "EXIT" and any directional
indicators; and (ii) provides contrast between the legend, any
directional indicators, and the background.
(28) "Large battery charger system" means a battery charger system,
other than a battery charger system for golf carts, with a rated input
power of more than two kilowatts.
(29) "Small battery charger system" means a battery charger system
with a rated input power of two kilowatts or less, and includes golf
cart battery charger systems regardless of the output power.
(30) "High light output double-ended quartz halogen lamp" means a
lamp that:
(a) Is designed for general outdoor lighting purposes;
(b) Contains a tungsten filament;
(c) Has a rated initial lumen value of greater than 6,000 and less
than 40,000 lumens;
(d) Has at each end a recessed single contact, R7s base;
(e) Has a maximum overall length between four and eleven inches;
(f) Has a nominal diameter less than 3/4 inch;
(g) Is designed to be operated at a voltage not less than 110 volts
and not greater than 200 volts or is designed to be operated at a
voltage between 235 volts and 300 volts;
(h) Is not a tubular quartz infrared heat lamp; and
(i) Is not a lamp marked and marketed as a stage and studio lamp
with a rated life of 500 hours or less.
(31) "Consumer product" means any article, other than an
automobile, as defined in 49 U.S.C. Sec. 32901(a)(3):
(a) Of a type which in operation consumes, or is designed to
consume, energy or, with respect to showerheads, faucets, water
closets, and urinals, water; and which, to any significant extent, is
distributed in commerce for personal use or consumption by individuals;
(b) Without regard to whether such an article of such type is in
fact distributed in commerce for personal use or consumption by an
individual, except that the term includes fluorescent lamp ballasts,
general service fluorescent lamps, incandescent reflector lamps,
showerheads, faucets, water closets, and urinals distributed in
commerce for personal or commercial use or consumption.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.260.030 and 2009 c 501 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter applies to the following types of new products
sold, offered for sale, or installed in the state:
(a) Automatic commercial ice cube machines;
(b) Commercial refrigerators and freezers;
(c) State-regulated incandescent reflector lamps;
(d) Wine chillers designed and sold for use by an individual;
(e) Hot water dispensers and mini-tank electric water heaters;
(f) Bottle-type water dispensers and point-of-use water dispensers;
(g) Pool heaters, residential pool pumps, and portable electric
spas;
(h) Tub spout diverters; ((and))
(i) Commercial hot food holding cabinets;
(j) High light output double-ended quartz halogen lamps; and
(k) Battery charger systems, except those:
(i) Used to charge a motor vehicle that is powered by an electric
motor drawing current from rechargeable storage batteries, fuel cells,
or other portable sources of electrical current, and which may include
a nonelectrical source of power designed to charge batteries and
components thereof. This exception does not apply to autoettes or
electric personal assistive mobility devices, golf carts, and low-speed
vehicles, as those vehicles are defined in division 1 of the California
vehicle code in effect as of the effective date of this section;
(ii) That are classified as class II or class III devices for human
use under the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act as of the effective
date of this section and require United States food and drug
administration listing and approval as a medical device;
(iii) Used to charge a battery or batteries in an illuminated exit
sign;
(iv) With input that is three phase of line-to-line three hundred
volts root mean square or more and is designed for a stationary power
application;
(v) That are battery analyzers;
(vi) That are voltage independent or voltage and frequency
independent uninterruptible power supplies as defined by the
international electrotechnical commission 62040-3 ed.2.0 as of the
effective date of this section; or
(vii) Used to charge larger industrial motive equipment such as
fork lifts, burden carriers, or person carriers.
(2) This chapter applies equally to products whether they are sold,
offered for sale, or installed as stand-alone products or as components
of other products.
(3) This chapter does not apply to:
(a) New products manufactured in the state and sold outside the
state;
(b) New products manufactured outside the state and sold at
wholesale inside the state for final retail sale and installation
outside the state;
(c) Products installed in mobile manufactured homes at the time of
construction; or
(d) Products designed expressly for installation and use in
recreational vehicles.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.260.040 and 2009 c 501 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The minimum efficiency standards specified in this section apply to
the types of new products set forth in RCW 19.260.030.
(1)(a) Automatic commercial ice cube machines must have daily
energy use and daily water use no greater than the applicable values in
the following table:

Equipment type Type of cooling Harvest rate
(lbs. ice/24 hrs.) Maximum
energy use
(kWh/100 lbs.) Maximum condenser
water use
(gallons/100 lbs. ice)

Ice-making head water <500 7.80 - .0055H 200 - .022H

>500<1436 5.58 - .0011H 200 - .022H

>1436 4.0 200 - .022H

Ice-making head air 450 10.26 - .0086H Not applicable

>450 6.89 - .0011H Not applicable

Remote condensing but
not remote compressor air <1000 8.85 - .0038 Not applicable

>1000 5.10 Not applicable

Remote condensing and
remote compressor air <934 8.85 - .0038H Not applicable

>934 5.3 Not applicable

Self-contained models water <200 11.40 - .0190H 191 - .0315H

>200 7.60 191 - .0315H

Self-contained models air <175 18.0 - .0469H Not applicable

>175 9.80 Not applicable

Where H harvest rate in pounds per twenty-four hours which must be reported within 5% of the tested value.
"Maximum water use" applies only to water used for the condenser.

(b) For purposes of this section, automatic commercial ice cube
machines shall be tested in accordance with the ARI 810-2003 test
method as published by the air-conditioning and refrigeration
institute. Ice- making heads include all automatic commercial ice cube
machines that are not split system ice makers or self-contained models
as defined in ARI 810-2003.
(2)(a) Commercial refrigerators and freezers must meet the
applicable requirements listed in the following table:

Equipment Type Doors Maximum Daily Energy Consumption (kWh)

Reach-in cabinets, pass-through cabinets,
and roll-in or roll-through cabinets that are
refrigerators Solid 0.10V+ 2.04

Transparent 0.12V+ 3.34

Reach-in cabinets, pass-through cabinets,
and roll-in or roll-through cabinets that are
"pulldown" refrigerators Transparent .126V+ 3.51

Reach-in cabinets, pass-through cabinets,
and roll-in or roll-through cabinets that are
freezers Solid 0.40V+ 1.38

Transparent 0.75V+ 4.10

Reach-in cabinets that are refrigerator-freezers
with an AV of 5.19 or higher
Solid
0.27AV - 0.71

kWh kilowatt-hours
V total volume (ft3)
AV adjusted volume [1.63 x freezer volume (ft3)]+ refrigerator volume (ft3)

(b) For purposes of this section, "pulldown" designates products
designed to take a fully stocked refrigerator with beverages at 90
degrees Fahrenheit and cool those beverages to a stable temperature of
38 degrees Fahrenheit within 12 hours or less. Daily energy
consumption shall be measured in accordance with the American national
standards institute/American society of heating, refrigerating and air-conditioning engineers test method 117-2002, except that the back-loading doors of pass-through and roll-through refrigerators and
freezers must remain closed throughout the test, and except that the
controls of all appliances must be adjusted to obtain the following
product temperatures.

Product or compartment type Integrated average product temperature in degrees Fahrenheit

Refrigerator 38+ 2

Freezer 0+ 2

(3)(a) The lamp electrical power input of state-regulated
incandescent reflector lamps shall meet the minimum average lamp
efficacy requirements for federally regulated incandescent reflector
lamps specified in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6295(i)(l)(A)-(B).
(b) The following types of incandescent lamps are exempt from these
requirements:
(i) Lamps rated at fifty watts or less of the following types: BR
30, ER 30, BR 40, and ER 40;
(ii) Lamps rated at sixty-five watts of the following types: BR
30, BR 40, and ER 40; and
(iii) R 20 lamps of forty-five watts or less.
(4)(a) Wine chillers designed and sold for use by an individual
must meet requirements specified in the California Code of Regulations,
Title 20, section 1605.3 in effect as of July 26, 2009.
(b) Wine chillers designed and sold for use by an individual shall
be tested in accordance with the method specified in the California
Code of Regulations, Title 20, section 1604 in effect as of July 26,
2009.
(5)(a) The standby energy consumption of bottle-type water
dispensers, and point-of-use water dispensers, dispensing both hot and
cold water, manufactured on or after January 1, 2010, shall not exceed
1.2 kWh/day.
(b) The test method for water dispensers shall be the environmental
protection agency energy star program requirements for bottled water
coolers version 1.1.
(6)(a) The standby energy consumption of hot water dispensers and
mini-tank electric water heaters manufactured on or after January 1,
2010, shall be not greater than 35 watts.
(b) This subsection does not apply to any water heater:
(i) That is within the scope of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6292(a)(4) or
6311(1);
(ii) That has a rated storage volume of less than 20 gallons; and
(iii) For which there is no federal test method applicable to that
type of water heater.
(c) Hot water dispensers shall be tested in accordance with the
method specified in the California Code of Regulations, Title 20,
section 1604 in effect as of July 26, 2009.
(d) Mini-tank electric water heaters shall be tested in accordance
with the method specified in the California Code of Regulations, Title
20, section 1604 in effect as of July 26, 2009.
(7) The following standards are established for pool heaters,
residential pool pumps, and portable electric spas:
(a) Natural gas pool heaters shall not be equipped with constant
burning pilots.
(b) Residential pool pump motors manufactured on or after January
1, 2010, must meet requirements specified in the California Code of
Regulations, Title 20, section 1605.3 in effect as of July 26, 2009.
(c) Portable electric spas manufactured on or after January 1,
2010, must meet requirements specified in the California Code of
Regulations, Title 20, section 1605.3 in effect as of July 26, 2009.
(d) Portable electric spas must be tested in accordance with the
method specified in the California Code of Regulations, Title 20,
section 1604 in effect as of July 26, 2009.
(8)(a) The leakage rate of tub spout diverters shall be no greater
than the applicable requirements shown in the following table:

Maximum Leakage Rate

Appliance Testing Conditions Effective January 1, 2009

When new 0.01 gpm

Tub spout diverters After 15,000 cycles of diverting 0.05 gpm

(b) Showerhead tub spout diverter combinations shall meet both the
federal standard for showerheads established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec.
6291 et seq. and the standard for tub spout diverters specified in this
section.
(9)(a) The idle energy rate of commercial hot food holding cabinets
manufactured on or after January 1, 2010, shall be no greater than 40
watts per cubic foot of measured interior volume.
(b) The idle energy rate of commercial hot food holding cabinets
shall be determined using ANSI/ASTM F2140-01 standard test method for
the performance of hot food holding cabinets (test for idle energy rate
dry test). Commercial hot food holding cabinet interior volume shall
be calculated using straight line segments following the gross interior
dimensions of the appliance and using the following equation: Interior
height x interior width x interior depth. Interior volume shall not
account for racks, air plenums, or other interior parts.
(10) The following standards are established for battery charger
systems:
(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, large
battery charger systems and small battery charger systems manufactured
on or after January 1, 2015, must meet requirements specified in the
California Code of Regulations, Title 20, section 1605 in effect as of
the effective date of this section.
(b) Small battery charger systems that are not consumer products
manufactured on or after January 1, 2017, must meet requirements
specified in the California Code of Regulations, Title 20, section 1605
in effect as of the effective date of this section.
(c) Battery backup and uninterruptible power supplies that are not
consumer products manufactured on or after January 1, 2017, must meet
requirements specified in the California Code of Regulations, Title 20,
section 1605 in effect as of the effective date of this section.
(d) Large battery charger systems and small battery charger systems
must be tested in accordance with the method specified in the
California Code of Regulations, Title 20, section 1604 in effect as of
the effective date of this section.
(11) A high light output double-ended quartz halogen lamp must meet
minimum efficiency standards of:
(a) 27 lumens per watt for lamps with a minimum rated initial lumen
value greater than 6,000 and a maximum initial lumen value of 15,000;
and
(b) 34 lumens per watt for lamps with a rated initial lumen value
greater than 15,000 and less than 40,000.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.260.050 and 2009 c 501 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No new commercial refrigerator or freezer or state-regulated
incandescent reflector lamp manufactured on or after January 1, 2007,
may be sold or offered for sale in the state unless the efficiency of
the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in
RCW 19.260.040. No new automatic commercial ice cube machine
manufactured on or after January 1, 2008, may be sold or offered for
sale in the state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or
exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040.
(2) On or after January 1, 2008, no new commercial refrigerator or
freezer or state-regulated incandescent reflector lamp manufactured on
or after January 1, 2007, may be installed for compensation in the
state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the
efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040. On or after January
1, 2009, no new automatic commercial ice cube machine manufactured on
or after January 1, 2008, may be installed for compensation in the
state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the
efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040.
(3) Standards for state-regulated incandescent reflector lamps are
effective on the dates specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section.
(4) The following products, if manufactured on or after January 1,
2010, may not be sold or offered in the state unless the efficiency of
the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in
RCW 19.260.040:
(a) Wine chillers designed and sold for use by an individual;
(b) Hot water dispensers and mini-tank electric water heaters;
(c) Bottle-type water dispensers and point-of-use water dispensers;
(d) Pool heaters, residential pool pumps, and portable electric
spas;
(e) Tub spout diverters; and
(f) Commercial hot food holding cabinets.
(5) The following products, if manufactured on or after January 1,
2010, may not be installed for compensation in the state on or after
January 1, 2011, unless the efficiency of the new product meets or
exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040:
(a) Wine chillers designed and sold for use by an individual;
(b) Hot water dispensers and mini-tank electric water heaters;
(c) Bottle-type water dispensers and point-of-use water dispensers;
(d) Pool heaters, residential pool pumps, and portable electric
spas;
(e) Tub spout diverters; and
(f) Commercial hot food holding cabinets.
(6)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, large
and small battery charger systems, if manufactured on or after January
1, 2015, may not be sold or offered for sale in the state unless the
efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards
set forth in RCW 19.260.040.
(b) Small battery charger systems that are not consumer products,
if manufactured on or after January 1, 2017, may not be sold or offered
for sale in the state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or
exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040.
(c) Battery backup and uninterruptible power supplies that are not
consumer products, if manufactured on or after January 1, 2017, may not
be sold or offered for sale in the state unless the efficiency of the
new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW
19.260.040.
(7)(a) Large and small battery charger systems, if manufactured on
or after January 1, 2015, may not be installed for compensation in the
state on or after January 1, 2016, unless the efficiency of the new
product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW
19.260.040.
(b) Small battery charger systems that are not consumer products,
if manufactured on or after January 1, 2017, may not be installed for
compensation in the state on or after January 1, 2018, unless the
efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards
set forth in RCW 19.260.040.
(8) A high light output double-ended quartz halogen lamp, if
manufactured on or after January 1, 2015, may not be sold or offered
for sale in the state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or
exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040.
(9) A high light output double-ended quartz halogen lamp, if
manufactured on or after January 1, 2015, may not be installed for
compensation in the state on or after January 1, 2016, unless the
efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards
set forth in RCW 19.260.040.

--- END ---