BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The public records act, chapter 42.56 RCW,
includes provisions whereby an agency is given the opportunity to
notify individuals of pending disclosure of records if they may be
impacted by the disclosure. RCW 42.56.565 provides the opportunity for
an agency to prevent disclosure of records to incarcerated individuals
who have the intent to threaten the safety and security of others.
Agencies have difficulty complying with these provisions if a person
requesting records may conceal his or her identity.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.080 and 2005 c 483 s 1 and 2005 c 274 s 285 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Public records shall be available for inspection and copying, and
agencies shall, upon request for identifiable public records, make them
promptly available to any identified person including, if applicable,
on a partial or installment basis as records that are part of a larger
set of requested records are assembled or made ready for inspection or
disclosure. Agencies shall not deny a request for identifiable public
records solely on the basis that the request is overbroad. Agencies
shall not distinguish among persons requesting records, and such
persons shall not be required to provide information as to the purpose
for the request except to establish whether inspection and copying
would violate RCW 42.56.070(9) or other statute which exempts or
prohibits disclosure of specific information or records to certain
persons. Agencies may require persons making requests to identify
themselves and require that an agent or representative of a person
disclose the identity of the person on whose behalf the request is
being made. Agency facilities shall be made available to any person
for the copying of public records except when and to the extent that
this would unreasonably disrupt the operations of the agency. Agencies
shall honor requests received by mail for identifiable public records
unless exempted by provisions of this chapter.

--- END ---