BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that rules adopted by
the liquor control board restrict sampling in a manner not envisioned
by the legislature when it created this section of the statute. All
licensees were to be able to provide sampling for the purposes of sales
promotion without needing to qualify to do so. The legislature intends
to nullify rules that limit sampling to only businesses whose gross
sales of beer and wine exceed fifty percent or are done in conjunction
with cooking classes.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.371 and 2011 c 195 s 4 and 2011 c 119 s 204 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a beer and/or wine retailer's license to be
designated as a beer and/or wine specialty shop license to sell beer,
strong beer, and/or wine at retail in bottles, cans, and original
containers, not to be consumed upon the premises where sold, at any
store other than the state liquor stores. Licensees obtaining a
written endorsement from the board may also sell malt liquor in kegs or
other containers capable of holding four gallons or more of liquid.
The annual fee for the beer and/or wine specialty shop license is one
hundred dollars for each store. The sale of any container holding four
gallons or more must comply with RCW 66.28.200 and 66.28.220.
(2) All licensees under this section without prior board
qualification may provide, free or for a charge, single-serving samples
of two ounces or less to customers for the purpose of sales promotion.
Sampling activities of licensees under this section are subject to RCW
66.28.305 and 66.28.040 and the cost of sampling under this section may
not be borne, directly or indirectly, by any manufacturer, importer, or
distributor of liquor.
(3) Upon approval by the board, the beer and/or wine specialty shop
licensee that exceeds fifty percent beer and/or wine sales may also
receive an endorsement to permit the sale of beer to a purchaser in a
sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser, or
provided by the licensee or manufacturer, and fill at the tap by the
licensee at the time of sale. If the beer and/or wine specialty shop
licensee does not exceed fifty percent beer and/or wine sales, the
board may waive the fifty percent beer and/or wine sale criteria if the
beer and/or wine specialty shop maintains alcohol inventory that
exceeds fifteen thousand dollars.
(4) The board shall issue a restricted beer and/or wine specialty
shop license, authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table
wine, if the board finds upon issuance or renewal of the license that
the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public
interest. In determining the public interest, the board shall consider
at least the following factors:
(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or
fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;
(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's
establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or
fortified wine at the establishment; and
(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be
detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded
alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.
If the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of
strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest, it
shall issue or renew the license without restriction, as applicable.
The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or fortified
wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on those
persons objecting.
(5) Licensees holding a beer and/or wine specialty shop license
must maintain a minimum three thousand dollar wholesale inventory of
beer, strong beer, and/or wine.
(6) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.28.040 and 2012 c 2 s 116 (Initiative Measure No.
1183) are each amended to read as follows:
Except as permitted by the board under RCW 66.20.010, no domestic
brewery, microbrewery, distributor, distiller, domestic winery,
importer, rectifier, certificate of approval holder, or other
manufacturer of liquor may, within the state of Washington, give to any
person any liquor; but nothing in this section nor in RCW 66.28.305
prevents a domestic brewery, microbrewery, distributor, domestic
winery, distiller, certificate of approval holder, or importer from
furnishing samples of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to authorized
licensees for the purpose of negotiating a sale((, in accordance with
regulations adopted by the liquor control board)), provided that the
samples are subject to taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
nothing in this section prevents a domestic brewery, microbrewery,
domestic winery, distillery, certificate of approval holder, or
distributor from furnishing beer, wine, or spirituous liquor for
instructional purposes under RCW 66.28.150; nothing in this section
prevents a domestic winery, certificate of approval holder, or
distributor from furnishing wine without charge, subject to the taxes
imposed by RCW 66.24.210, to a not-for-profit group organized and
operated solely for the purpose of enology or the study of viticulture
which has been in existence for at least six months and that uses wine
so furnished solely for such educational purposes or a domestic winery,
or an out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from furnishing wine
without charge or a domestic brewery, or an out-of-state certificate of
approval holder, from furnishing beer without charge, subject to the
taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, or a domestic distiller
licensed under RCW 66.24.140 or an accredited representative of a
distiller, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor
licensed under RCW 66.24.310, from furnishing spirits without charge,
to a nonprofit charitable corporation or association exempt from
taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or (6) of the internal revenue
code of 1986 for use consistent with the purpose or purposes entitling
it to such exemption; nothing in this section prevents a domestic
brewery or microbrewery from serving beer without charge, on the
brewery premises; nothing in this section prevents donations of wine
for the purposes of RCW 66.12.180; nothing in this section prevents a
domestic winery from serving wine without charge, on the winery
premises; and nothing in this section prevents a craft distillery from
serving spirits without charge, on the distillery premises subject to
RCW 66.24.145.

--- END ---