BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.04.310 and 2007 c 437 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
RCW 39.04.300 and 39.04.320 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Apprentice" means an apprentice enrolled in a state-approved
apprenticeship training program.
(2) "Apprentice utilization requirement" means the requirement that
the appropriate percentage of labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(3) "Labor hours" means the total hours of workers receiving an
hourly wage who are directly employed on the site of the public works
project. "Labor hours" includes hours performed by workers employed by
the contractor and all subcontractors working on the project. "Labor
hours" does not include hours worked by foremen, superintendents,
owners, and workers who are not subject to prevailing wage
requirements.
(4) "School district" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.315.025.
(5) "State-approved apprenticeship training program" means an
apprenticeship training program approved by the Washington state
apprenticeship council.
(6)(a) "Subsidized public work" means all work, construction,
alterations, repairs, or improvements other than ordinary maintenance
where:
(i) One or more parties to the contract for the project received or
will receive a tax preference for the project under chapter 82.60,
82.63, 82.75, or 82.82 RCW, or RCW 82.08.820, 82.08.900, 82.08.955,
82.12.900, or 82.12.955; or
(ii) One or more parties to the contract for the project received
or will receive a loan for the project from the state or any county,
municipality, or political subdivision.
(b) "Subsidized public work" does not include:
(i) Work financed by a loan provided by a housing authority created
under chapter 35.82 RCW; or
(ii) Affordable housing projects that receive financing from the
Washington state housing finance commission and are not subject to
federal prevailing wage requirements.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.04.320 and 2009 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) through (d) of this subsection,
from January 1, 2005, and thereafter, for all public works estimated to
cost one million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that
no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by
apprentices.
(b)(i) This section does not apply to contracts advertised for bid
before July 1, 2007, for any public works by the department of
transportation.
(ii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2007, and
before July 1, 2008, for all public works by the department of
transportation estimated to cost five million dollars or more, all
specifications shall require that no less than ten percent of the labor
hours be performed by apprentices.
(iii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2008,
and before July 1, 2009, for all public works by the department of
transportation estimated to cost three million dollars or more, all
specifications shall require that no less than twelve percent of the
labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(iv) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2009, for
all public works by the department of transportation estimated to cost
two million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no
less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by
apprentices.
(c)(i) This section does not apply to contracts advertised for bid
before January 1, 2008, for any public works by a school district, or
to any project funded in whole or in part by bond issues approved
before July 1, 2007.
(ii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2008,
for all public works by a school district estimated to cost three
million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less
than ten percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(iii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2009,
for all public works by a school district estimated to cost two million
dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than
twelve percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(iv) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2010,
for all public works by a school district estimated to cost one million
dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than
fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(d)(i) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1,
2010, for all public works by a four-year institution of higher
education estimated to cost three million dollars or more, all
specifications must require that no less than ten percent of the labor
hours be performed by apprentices.
(ii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2011,
for all public works by a four-year institution of higher education
estimated to cost two million dollars or more, all specifications must
require that no less than twelve percent of the labor hours be
performed by apprentices.
(iii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2012,
for all public works by a four-year institution of higher education
estimated to cost one million dollars or more, all specifications must
require that no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be
performed by apprentices.
(2) For all subsidized public works projects estimated to cost five
million dollars or more, all specifications must require that no less
than fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(3) Awarding entities may adjust the requirements of this section
for a specific project for the following reasons:
(a) The demonstrated lack of availability of apprentices in
specific geographic areas;
(b) A disproportionately high ratio of material costs to labor
hours, which does not make feasible the required minimum levels of
apprentice participation;
(c) Participating contractors have demonstrated a good faith effort
to comply with the requirements of RCW 39.04.300 and 39.04.310 and this
section; or
(d) Other criteria the awarding entity deems appropriate, which are
subject to review by the office of the governor.
(((3))) (4) The secretary of the department of transportation shall
adjust the requirements of this section for a specific project for the
following reasons:
(a) The demonstrated lack of availability of apprentices in
specific geographic areas; or
(b) A disproportionately high ratio of material costs to labor
hours, which does not make feasible the required minimum levels of
apprentice participation.
(((4))) (5) This section applies to public works contracts awarded
by the state, to public works contracts awarded by school districts,
and to public works contracts awarded by state four-year institutions
of higher education. However, this section does not apply to contracts
awarded by state agencies headed by a separately elected public
official.
(((5))) (6)(a) The department of ((general administration))
enterprise services must provide information and technical assistance
to affected agencies and collect the following data from affected
agencies for each project covered by this section:
(i) The name of each apprentice and apprentice registration number;
(ii) The name of each project;
(iii) The dollar value of each project;
(iv) The date of the contractor's notice to proceed;
(v) The number of apprentices and labor hours worked by them,
categorized by trade or craft;
(vi) The number of journey level workers and labor hours worked by
them, categorized by trade or craft; and
(vii) The number, type, and rationale for the exceptions granted
under subsection (((2))) (3) of this section.
(b) The department of labor and industries shall assist the
department of ((general administration)) enterprise services in
providing information and technical assistance.
(((6))) (7) The secretary of transportation shall establish an
apprenticeship utilization advisory committee, which shall include
statewide geographic representation and consist of equal numbers of
representatives of contractors and labor. The committee must include
at least one member representing contractor businesses with less than
thirty-five employees. The advisory committee shall meet regularly
with the secretary of transportation to discuss implementation of this
section by the department of transportation, including development of
the process to be used to adjust the requirements of this section for
a specific project. The committee shall provide a report to the
legislature by January 1, 2008, on the effects of the apprentice labor
requirement on transportation projects and on the availability of
apprentice labor and programs statewide.
(((7))) (8) At the request of the senate labor, commerce, research
and development committee, the house of representatives commerce and
labor committee, or their successor committees, and the governor, the
department of ((general administration)) enterprise services and the
department of labor and industries shall compile and summarize the
agency data and provide a joint report to both committees. The report
shall include recommendations on modifications or improvements to the
apprentice utilization program and information on skill shortages in
each trade or craft.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon request from a party to a contract for subsidized public work,
as defined in RCW 39.04.310(6)(a)(i), the apprenticeship council must
provide written certification of the party's compliance with RCW
39.04.320.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.60.025 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 16 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for a
deferral unless:
(1) The lessor or owner complies with the requirements of RCW
39.04.320; and
(2) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(((2))) (3)(a) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the
economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(b) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.60.070; and
(c) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no
less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by
written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.63.010 and 2009 c 268 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Advanced computing" means technologies used in the designing
and developing of computing hardware and software, including
innovations in designing the full spectrum of hardware from hand-held
calculators to super computers, and peripheral equipment.
(2) "Advanced materials" means materials with engineered properties
created through the development of specialized processing and synthesis
technology, including ceramics, high value-added metals, electronic
materials, composites, polymers, and biomaterials.
(3) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(4) "Biotechnology" means the application of technologies, such as
recombinant DNA techniques, biochemistry, molecular and cellular
biology, genetics and genetic engineering, cell fusion techniques, and
new bioprocesses, using living organisms, or parts of organisms, to
produce or modify products, to improve plants or animals, to develop
microorganisms for specific uses, to identify targets for small
molecule pharmaceutical development, or to transform biological systems
into useful processes and products or to develop microorganisms for
specific uses.
(5) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(6) "Electronic device technology" means technologies involving
microelectronics; semiconductors; electronic equipment and
instrumentation; radio frequency, microwave, and millimeter
electronics; optical and optic-electrical devices; and data and digital
communications and imaging devices.
(7) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project which
either initiates a new operation, or expands or diversifies a current
operation by expanding, renovating, or equipping an existing facility.
The lessor or owner of the qualified building is not eligible for a
deferral unless:
(a) The lessor or owner complies with the requirements of RCW
39.04.320; and
(b) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(((b))) (c)(i) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the
economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(ii) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.63.020(2); and
(iii) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is
no less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced
by written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(8) "Environmental technology" means assessment and prevention of
threats or damage to human health or the environment, environmental
cleanup, and the development of alternative energy sources.
(9)(a) "Initiation of construction" means the date that a building
permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031
for:
(i) Construction of the qualified building, if the underlying
ownership of the building vests exclusively with the person receiving
the economic benefit of the deferral;
(ii) Construction of the qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (7) of this section; or
(iii) Tenant improvements for a qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (7) of this section.
(b) "Initiation of construction" does not include soil testing,
site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related
activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit
for the construction of the foundation of the building.
(c) If the investment project is a phased project, "initiation of
construction" shall apply separately to each phase.
(10) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified
buildings or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and
services rendered in the planning, installation, and construction or
improvement of the project.
(11) "Multiple qualified buildings" means qualified buildings
leased to the same person when such structures: (a) Are located within
a five-mile radius; and (b) the initiation of construction of each
building begins within a sixty-month period.
(12) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030 and includes
state universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(13) "Pilot scale manufacturing" means design, construction, and
testing of preproduction prototypes and models in the fields of
biotechnology, advanced computing, electronic device technology,
advanced materials, and environmental technology other than for
commercial sale. As used in this subsection, "commercial sale"
excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total
gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or process do
not exceed one million dollars.
(14) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures,
and expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of
increasing floor space or production capacity used for pilot scale
manufacturing or qualified research and development, including plant
offices and other facilities that are an essential or an integral part
of a structure used for pilot scale manufacturing or qualified research
and development. If a building or buildings are used partly for pilot
scale manufacturing or qualified research and development, and partly
for other purposes, the applicable tax deferral shall be determined by
apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the
department. Such rules may include provisions for determining the
amount of the deferral based on apportionment of costs of construction
of an investment project consisting of a building or multiple
buildings, where qualified research and development or pilot scale
manufacturing activities are shifted within a building or from one
building to another building.
(15) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means fixtures, equipment,
and support facilities that are an integral and necessary part of a
pilot scale manufacturing or qualified research and development
operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes: Computers;
software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment,
instrumentation, and other devices used in a process of experimentation
to develop a new or improved pilot model, plant process, product,
formula, invention, or similar property; manufacturing components such
as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies;
vats, tanks, and fermenters; operating structures; and all other
equipment used to control, monitor, or operate the machinery. For
purposes of this chapter, qualified machinery and equipment must be
either new to the taxing jurisdiction of the state or new to the
certificate holder, except that used machinery and equipment may be
treated as qualified machinery and equipment if the certificate holder
either brings the machinery and equipment into Washington or makes a
retail purchase of the machinery and equipment in Washington or
elsewhere.
(16) "Qualified research and development" means research and
development performed within this state in the fields of advanced
computing, advanced materials, biotechnology, electronic device
technology, and environmental technology.
(17) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.
(18) "Research and development" means activities performed to
discover technological information, and technical and nonroutine
activities concerned with translating technological information into
new or improved products, processes, techniques, formulas, inventions,
or software. The term includes exploration of a new use for an
existing drug, device, or biological product if the new use requires
separate licensing by the federal food and drug administration under
chapter 21, C.F.R., as amended. The term does not include adaptation
or duplication of existing products where the products are not
substantially improved by application of the technology, nor does the
term include surveys and studies, social science and humanities
research, market research or testing, quality control, sale promotion
and service, computer software developed for internal use, and research
in areas such as improved style, taste, and seasonal design.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.75.010 and 2010 c 114 s 145 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Biotechnology" means a technology based on the science of
biology, microbiology, molecular biology, cellular biology,
biochemistry, or biophysics, or any combination of these, and includes,
but is not limited to, recombinant DNA techniques, genetics and genetic
engineering, cell fusion techniques, and new bioprocesses, using living
organisms, or parts of organisms.
(3) "Biotechnology product" means any virus, therapeutic serum,
antibody, protein, toxin, antitoxin, vaccine, blood, blood component or
derivative, allergenic product, or analogous product produced through
the application of biotechnology that is used in the prevention,
treatment, or cure of diseases or injuries to humans.
(4) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(5)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment in
qualified buildings or qualified machinery and equipment, including
labor and services rendered in the planning, installation, and
construction of the project.
(b) The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for
a deferral unless:
(i) The lessor or owner complies with the requirements of RCW
39.04.320; and
(ii) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(((ii))) (iii)(A) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the
economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(B) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.75.070; and
(C) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no
less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by
written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(6)(a) "Initiation of construction" means the date that a building
permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031
for:
(i) Construction of the qualified building, if the underlying
ownership of the building vests exclusively with the person receiving
the economic benefit of the deferral;
(ii) Construction of the qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (5)(b)(((ii))) (iii)(A) of this section; or
(iii) Tenant improvements for a qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (5)(b)(((ii))) (iii)(A) of this section.
(b) "Initiation of construction" does not include soil testing,
site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related
activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit
for the construction of the foundation of the building.
(c) If the investment project is a phased project, "initiation of
construction" applies separately to each phase.
(7) "Manufacturing" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.120.
(8) "Medical device" means an instrument, apparatus, implement,
machine, contrivance, implant, in vitro reagent, or other similar or
related article, including any component, part, or accessory, that is
designed or developed and:
(a) Recognized in the national formulary, or the United States
pharmacopeia, or any supplement to them;
(b) Intended for use in the diagnosis of disease, or in the cure,
mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease or other conditions in
human beings or other animals; or
(c) Intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of
human beings or other animals, and which does not achieve any of its
primary intended purposes through chemical action within or on the body
of human beings or other animals and which is not dependent upon being
metabolized for the achievement of any of its principal intended
purposes.
(9) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(10) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures,
and expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of
increasing floor space or production capacity used for biotechnology
product manufacturing or medical device manufacturing activities,
including plant offices, commercial laboratories for process
development, quality assurance and quality control, and warehouses or
other facilities for the storage of raw material or finished goods if
the facilities are an essential or an integral part of a factory,
plant, or laboratory used for biotechnology product manufacturing or
medical device manufacturing. If a building is used partly for
biotechnology product manufacturing or medical device manufacturing and
partly for other purposes, the applicable tax deferral must be
determined by apportionment of the costs of construction under rules
adopted by the department.
(11) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial
and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an
integral and necessary part of a biotechnology product manufacturing or
medical device manufacturing operation. "Qualified machinery and
equipment" includes: Computers; software; data processing equipment;
laboratory equipment; manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys,
shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures;
and all equipment used to control or operate the machinery.
(12) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.82.010 and 2008 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Corporate headquarters" means a facility or facilities where
corporate staff employees are physically employed, and where the
majority of the company's management services are handled either on a
regional or a national basis. Company management services may include:
Accounts receivable and payable, accounting, data processing,
distribution management, employee benefit plan, financial and
securities accounting, information technology, insurance, legal,
merchandising, payroll, personnel, purchasing procurement, planning,
reporting and compliance, research and development, tax, treasury, or
other headquarters-related services. "Corporate headquarters" does not
include a facility or facilities used for manufacturing, wholesaling,
or warehousing.
(3) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(4) "Eligible area" means a designated community empowerment zone
approved under RCW 43.31C.020.
(5)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project in
a qualified building or buildings in an eligible area, as defined in
subsection (4) of this section, which will have employment at the
qualified building or buildings of at least three hundred employees in
qualified employment positions, each of whom must earn for the year
reported at least the average annual wage for the state for that year
as determined by the employment security department.
(b) The lessor or owner of a qualified building or buildings is not
eligible for a deferral unless:
(i) The lessor or owner complies with the requirements of RCW
39.04.320; and
(ii) The underlying ownership of the building or buildings vests
exclusively in the same person; or
(((ii))) (iii)(A) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the
economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(B) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.82.020; and
(C) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no
less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by
written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(6) "Investment project" means a capital investment of at least
thirty million dollars in a qualified building or buildings including
tangible personal property and fixtures that will be incorporated as an
ingredient or component of such buildings during the course of their
construction, and including labor and services rendered in the
planning, installation, and construction of the project.
(7) "Manufacture" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.04.120.
(8) "Operationally complete" means a date no later than one year
from the date the project is issued an occupancy permit by the local
permit issuing authority.
(9) "Person" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(10) "Qualified building or buildings" means construction of a new
structure or structures or expansion of an existing structure or
structures to be used for corporate headquarters. If a building is
used partly for corporate headquarters and partly for other purposes,
the applicable tax deferral is determined by apportionment of the costs
of construction under rules adopted by the department.
(11) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee employed in the eligible investment project during the entire
tax year. The term "entire tax year" means a full-time position that
is filled for a period of twelve consecutive months. The term "full-time" means at least thirty-five hours a week, four hundred fifty-five
hours a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred twenty hours a year.
(12) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.
(13) "Warehouse" means a building or structure, or any part
thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are received for storage
for compensation.
(14) "Wholesale sale" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.04.060.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.08.820 and 2011 c 174 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
on:
(a) Material-handling and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment; or
(b) Construction of a warehouse or grain elevator, including
materials, and including service and labor costs,
are eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance. The amount
of the remittance is computed under subsection (3) of this section and
is based on the state share of sales tax.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.820:
(a) "Agricultural products" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.213;
(b) "Construction" means the actual construction of a warehouse or
grain elevator that did not exist before the construction began.
"Construction" includes expansion if the expansion adds at least two
hundred thousand square feet of additional space to an existing
warehouse or additional storage capacity of at least one million
bushels to an existing grain elevator. "Construction" does not include
renovation, remodeling, or repair;
(c) "Department" means the department of revenue;
(d) "Distribution center" means a warehouse that is used
exclusively by a retailer solely for the storage and distribution of
finished goods to retail outlets of the retailer. "Distribution
center" does not include a warehouse at which retail sales occur;
(e) "Finished goods" means tangible personal property intended for
sale by a retailer or wholesaler. "Finished goods" does not include
agricultural products stored by wholesalers, third-party warehouses, or
retailers if the storage takes place on the land of the person who
produced the agricultural product. "Finished goods" does not include
logs, minerals, petroleum, gas, or other extracted products stored as
raw materials or in bulk;
(f) "Grain elevator" means a structure used for storage and
handling of grain in bulk;
(g) "Material-handling equipment and racking equipment" means
equipment in a warehouse or grain elevator that is primarily used to
handle, store, organize, convey, package, or repackage finished goods.
The term includes tangible personal property with a useful life of one
year or more that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment,
including repair and replacement parts. The term does not include
equipment in offices, lunchrooms, restrooms, and other like space,
within a warehouse or grain elevator, or equipment used for
nonwarehousing purposes. "Material-handling equipment" includes but is
not limited to: Conveyers, carousels, lifts, positioners, pick-up-and-place units, cranes, hoists, mechanical arms, and robots; mechanized
systems, including containers that are an integral part of the system,
whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal property; and
automated handling, storage, and retrieval systems, including computers
that control them, whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal
property; and forklifts and other off-the-road vehicles that are used
to lift or move tangible personal property and that cannot be operated
legally on roads and streets. "Racking equipment" includes, but is not
limited to, conveying systems, chutes, shelves, racks, bins, drawers,
pallets, and other containers and storage devices that form a necessary
part of the storage system;
(h) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030;
(i) "Retailer" means a person who makes "sales at retail" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property;
(j) "Square footage" means the product of the two horizontal
dimensions of each floor of a specific warehouse. The entire footprint
of the warehouse shall be measured in calculating the square footage,
including space that juts out from the building profile such as loading
docks. "Square footage" does not mean the aggregate of the square
footage of more than one warehouse at a location or the aggregate of
the square footage of warehouses at more than one location;
(k) "Third-party warehouser" means a person taxable under RCW
82.04.280(1)(d);
(l) "Warehouse" means an enclosed building or structure in which
finished goods are stored. A warehouse building or structure may have
more than one storage room and more than one floor. Office space,
lunchrooms, restrooms, and other space within the warehouse and
necessary for the operation of the warehouse are considered part of the
warehouse as are loading docks and other such space attached to the
building and used for handling of finished goods. Landscaping and
parking lots are not considered part of the warehouse. A storage yard
is not a warehouse, nor is a building in which manufacturing takes
place; and
(m) "Wholesaler" means a person who makes "sales at wholesale" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property, but
"wholesaler" does not include a person who makes sales exempt under RCW
82.04.330.
(3)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.08.020. The buyer may then apply to the department for remittance
of all or part of the tax paid under RCW 82.08.020. For grain
elevators with bushel capacity of one million but less than two
million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred thousand or
more and for grain elevators with bushel capacity of two million or
more, the remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of
tax paid for qualifying construction, materials, service, and labor,
and fifty percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment.
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment;
location and size of warehouses and grain elevators; and construction
invoices and documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted
amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications during the
previous quarter.
(4) Warehouses, grain elevators, and material-handling equipment
and racking equipment for which an exemption, credit, or deferral has
been or is being received under chapter 82.60, 82.62, or 82.63 RCW or
RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are not eligible for any remittance
under this section. Warehouses and grain elevators upon which
construction was initiated before May 20, 1997, are not eligible for a
remittance under this section.
(5) The lessor or owner of a warehouse or grain elevator is not
eligible for a remittance under this section unless:
(a) The lessor or owner complies with the requirements of RCW
39.04.320; and
(b) The underlying ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and
the material-handling equipment and racking equipment vests exclusively
in the same person((,)); or ((unless))
(c) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the remittance to the lessee in the form of reduced rent
payments.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.08.900 and 2006 c 151 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to an
eligible person establishing or operating an anaerobic digester or to
services rendered in respect to installing, constructing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving an anaerobic digester, or to sales of
tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of
the anaerobic digester. The anaerobic digester must be used primarily
to treat livestock manure.
(2)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The
application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the department
and must contain information regarding the location of the facility and
other information as the department may require.
(b) A person claiming an exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
RCW 82.12.900 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Anaerobic digester" means a facility that processes manure
from livestock into biogas and dried manure using microorganisms in a
decomposition process within a closed, oxygen-free container.
(b) "Eligible person" means any person establishing or operating an
anaerobic digester to treat primarily livestock manure who complies
with the requirements of RCW 39.04.320.
(c) "Primarily" means more than fifty percent measured by volume or
weight.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.08.955 and 2007 c 309 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment, or to services rendered in respect to
constructing structures, installing, constructing, repairing, cleaning,
decorating, altering, or improving of structures or machinery and
equipment, or to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of structures or machinery and equipment, if
the machinery, equipment, or structure is used directly for the retail
sale of a biodiesel blend or E85 motor fuel. Structures and machinery
and equipment that are used for the retail sale of a biodiesel blend or
E85 motor fuel and for other purposes are exempt only on the portion
used directly for the retail sale of a biodiesel blend or E85 motor
fuel.
(2) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of fuel
delivery vehicles or to sales of or charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the vehicles including repair parts and replacement parts if
at least seventy-five percent of the fuel distributed by the vehicles
is a biodiesel blend or E85 motor fuel.
(3) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section and comply with the requirements of RCW 39.04.320. The
exemption is available only when the buyer provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in RCW
82.04.4334 and this subsection apply.
(a) "Biodiesel blend" means fuel that contains at least twenty
percent biodiesel fuel by volume.
(b) "E85 motor fuel" means an alternative fuel that is a blend of
ethanol and hydrocarbon of which the ethanol portion is nominally
seventy-five to eighty-five percent denatured fuel ethanol by volume
that complies with the most recent version of American society of
testing and materials specification D 5798.
(c) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities and tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component thereof, including repair parts and replacement
parts that are integral and necessary for the delivery of biodiesel
blends or E85 motor fuel into the fuel tank of a motor vehicle.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2015.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.12.955 and 2007 c 309 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of machinery and equipment, or to services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of eligible
machinery and equipment, or tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of machinery and equipment used directly for
the retail sale of a biodiesel or E85 motor fuel.
(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of fuel delivery vehicles including repair parts and replacement
parts and to services rendered in respect to installing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving the vehicles if at least seventy-five
percent of the fuel distributed by the vehicles is a biodiesel or E85
motor fuel.
(3) A person taking the exemption under this section must comply
with the requirements of RCW 39.04.320.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in RCW
82.04.4334 and 82.08.955 apply.
(((4))) (5) This section expires July 1, 2015.

--- END ---