BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that uncertainty
exists as to whether attorneys who collect claims are subject to the
requirements of the collection agency act, with some court cases
holding that attorneys are subject to the act and others holding that
they are not. The legislature further finds that a business practice,
that did not exist when the act was enacted, now exists whereby some
attorneys as their primary business activity, perform collection
services beyond traditional legal services, such as collecting large
volumes of assigned claims on a contingency fee. It is the intent of
the legislature to amend the act, and the exemption for attorneys from
the act, to now require that attorneys whose primary activities are
devoted to the collection of claims through means other than
traditional legal services be subject to the requirements of the act,
and to retain the exception from the act for attorneys whose primary
activities are devoted to matters unrelated to collecting or attempting
to collect claims and for attorneys performing traditional legal
services related to collecting claims. Traditional legal services
include litigation and prelitigation services, including postjudgment
actions such as garnishments and executions on judgments, nonjudicial
and judicial real property foreclosure services, and eviction services.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.16.100 and 2003 c 203 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the
following words and phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter shall
have the following meanings:
(1) "Person" includes individual, firm, partnership, trust, joint
venture, association, or corporation.
(2) "Collection agency" means and includes:
(a) Any person directly or indirectly engaged in soliciting claims
for collection, or collecting or attempting to collect claims owed or
due or asserted to be owed or due another person;
(b) Any person who directly or indirectly furnishes or attempts to
furnish, sells, or offers to sell forms represented to be a collection
system or scheme intended or calculated to be used to collect claims
even though the forms direct the debtor to make payment to the creditor
and even though the forms may be or are actually used by the creditor
himself or herself in his or her own name;
(c) Any person who in attempting to collect or in collecting his or
her own claim uses a fictitious name or any name other than his or her
own which would indicate to the debtor that a third person is
collecting or attempting to collect such claim.
(3) "Collection agency" does not mean and does not include:
(a) Any individual engaged in soliciting claims for collection, or
collecting or attempting to collect claims on behalf of a licensee
under this chapter, if said individual is an employee of the licensee;
(b) Any individual collecting or attempting to collect claims for
not more than one employer, if all the collection efforts are carried
on in the name of the employer and if the individual is an employee of
the employer;
(c) Any person whose collection activities are carried on in his,
her, or its true name and are confined and are directly related to the
operation of a business other than that of a collection agency, such as
but not limited to: Trust companies; savings and loan associations;
building and loan associations; abstract companies doing an escrow
business; real estate brokers; property management companies collecting
assessments, charges, or fines on behalf of condominium unit owners
associations, associations of apartment owners, or homeowners'
associations; public officers acting in their official capacities;
persons acting under court order; lawyers; insurance companies; credit
unions; loan or finance companies; mortgage banks; and banks;
(d) Attorneys while engaged in activities related to litigation, or
nonjudicial or judicial foreclosures and evictions concerning claims,
or to matters preparatory or incidental thereto, and attorneys whose
primary professional activities are devoted to matters unrelated to
collecting or attempting to collect claims;
(e) Any person who on behalf of another person prepares or mails
monthly or periodic statements of accounts due if all payments are made
to that other person and no other collection efforts are made by the
person preparing the statements of account;
(((e))) (f) An "out-of-state collection agency" as defined in this
chapter; or
(((f))) (g) Any person while acting as a debt collector for another
person, both of whom are related by common ownership or affiliated by
corporate control, if the person acting as a debt collector does so
only for persons to whom it is so related or affiliated and if the
principal business of the person is not the collection of debts.
(4) "Out-of-state collection agency" means a person whose
activities within this state are limited to collecting debts from
debtors located in this state by means of interstate communications,
including telephone, mail, or facsimile transmission, from the person's
location in another state on behalf of clients located outside of this
state, but does not include any person who is excluded from the
definition of the term "debt collector" under the federal fair debt
collection practices act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1692a(6)).
(5) "Claim" means any obligation for the payment of money or thing
of value arising out of any agreement or contract, express or implied.
(6) "Statement of account" means a report setting forth only
amounts billed, invoices, credits allowed, or aged balance due.
(7) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(8) "Client" or "customer" means any person authorizing or
employing a collection agency to collect a claim.
(9) "Licensee" means any person licensed under this chapter.
(10) "Board" means the Washington state collection agency board.
(11) "Debtor" means any person owing or alleged to owe a claim.
(12) "Commercial claim" means any obligation for payment of money
or thing of value arising out of any agreement or contract, express or
implied, where the transaction which is the subject of the agreement or
contract is not primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.16.250 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 29 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
No licensee or employee of a licensee shall:
(1) Directly or indirectly aid or abet any unlicensed person to
engage in business as a collection agency in this state or receive
compensation from such unlicensed person: PROVIDED, That nothing in
this chapter shall prevent a licensee from accepting, as forwardee,
claims for collection from a collection agency or attorney whose place
of business is outside the state.
(2) Collect or attempt to collect a claim by the use of any means
contrary to the postal laws and regulations of the United States postal
department.
(3) Publish or post or cause to be published or posted, any list of
debtors commonly known as "bad debt lists" or threaten to do so. For
purposes of this chapter, a "bad debt list" means any list of natural
persons alleged to fail to honor their lawful debts. However, nothing
herein shall be construed to prohibit a licensee from communicating to
its customers or clients by means of a coded list, the existence of a
check dishonored because of insufficient funds, not sufficient funds or
closed account by the financial institution servicing the debtor's
checking account: PROVIDED, That the debtor's identity is not readily
apparent: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the licensee complies with the
requirements of subsection (10)(e) of this section.
(4) Have in his or her possession or make use of any badge, use a
uniform of any law enforcement agency or any simulation thereof, or
make any statements which might be construed as indicating an official
connection with any federal, state, county, or city law enforcement
agency, or any other governmental agency, while engaged in collection
agency business.
(5) Perform any act or acts, either directly or indirectly,
constituting the unauthorized practice of law.
(6) Advertise for sale or threaten to advertise for sale any claim
as a means of endeavoring to enforce payment thereof or agreeing to do
so for the purpose of soliciting claims, except where the licensee has
acquired claims as an assignee for the benefit of creditors or where
the licensee is acting under court order.
(7) Use any name while engaged in the making of a demand for any
claim other than the name set forth on his or her or its current
license issued hereunder.
(8) Give or send to any debtor or cause to be given or sent to any
debtor, any notice, letter, message, or form, other than through proper
legal action, process, or proceedings, which represents or implies that
a claim exists unless it shall indicate in clear and legible type:
(a) The name of the licensee and the city, street, and number at
which he or she is licensed to do business;
(b) The name of the original creditor to whom the debtor owed the
claim if such name is known to the licensee or employee: PROVIDED,
That upon written request of the debtor, the licensee shall provide
this name to the debtor or cease efforts to collect on the debt until
this information is provided;
(c) If the notice, letter, message, or form is the first notice to
the debtor or if the licensee is attempting to collect a different
amount than indicated in his or her or its first notice to the debtor,
an itemization of the claim asserted must be made including:
(i) Amount owing on the original obligation at the time it was
received by the licensee for collection or by assignment;
(ii) Interest or service charge, collection costs, or late payment
charges, if any, added to the original obligation by the original
creditor, customer or assignor before it was received by the licensee
for collection, if such information is known by the licensee or
employee: PROVIDED, That upon written request of the debtor, the
licensee shall make a reasonable effort to obtain information on such
items and provide this information to the debtor;
(iii) Interest or service charge, if any, added by the licensee or
customer or assignor after the obligation was received by the licensee
for collection;
(iv) Collection costs, if any, that the licensee is attempting to
collect;
(v) Attorneys' fees, if any, that the licensee is attempting to
collect on his or her or its behalf or on the behalf of a customer or
assignor; and
(vi) Any other charge or fee that the licensee is attempting to
collect on his or her or its own behalf or on the behalf of a customer
or assignor;
(d) If the notice, letter, message, or form concerns a judgment
obtained against the debtor, no itemization of the amounts contained in
the judgment is required, except postjudgment interest, if claimed, and
the current account balance;
(e) If the notice, letter, message, or form is the first notice to
the debtor, an itemization of the claim asserted must be made including
the following information:
(i) The original account number or redacted original account number
assigned to the debt, if known to the licensee or employee: PROVIDED,
That upon written request of the debtor, the licensee must make a
reasonable effort to obtain this information or cease efforts to
collect on the debt until this information is provided; and
(ii) The date of the last payment to the creditor on the subject
debt by the debtor, if known to the licensee or employee: PROVIDED,
That upon written request of the debtor, the licensee must make a
reasonable effort to obtain this information or cease efforts to
collect on the debt until this information is provided.
(9) Communicate in writing with a debtor concerning a claim through
a proper legal action, process, or proceeding, where such communication
is the first written communication with the debtor, without providing
the information set forth in subsection (8)(c) of this section in the
written communication.
(10) Communicate or threaten to communicate, the existence of a
claim to a person other than one who might be reasonably expected to be
liable on the claim in any manner other than through proper legal
action, process, or proceedings except under the following conditions:
(a) A licensee or employee of a licensee may inform a credit
reporting bureau of the existence of a claim. If the licensee or
employee of a licensee reports a claim to a credit reporting bureau,
the licensee shall, upon receipt of written notice from the debtor that
any part of the claim is disputed, notify the credit reporting bureau
of the dispute by written or electronic means and create a record of
the fact of the notification and when the notification was provided;
(b) A licensee or employee in collecting or attempting to collect
a claim may communicate the existence of a claim to a debtor's employer
if the claim has been reduced to a judgment;
(c) A licensee or employee in collecting or attempting to collect
a claim that has not been reduced to judgment, may communicate the
existence of a claim to a debtor's employer if:
(i) The licensee or employee has notified or attempted to notify
the debtor in writing at his or her last known address or place of
employment concerning the claim and the debtor after a reasonable time
has failed to pay the claim or has failed to agree to make payments on
the claim in a manner acceptable to the licensee, and
(ii) The debtor has not in writing to the licensee disputed any
part of the claim: PROVIDED, That the licensee or employee may only
communicate the existence of a claim which has not been reduced to
judgment to the debtor's employer once unless the debtor's employer has
agreed to additional communications.
(d) A licensee may for the purpose of locating the debtor or
locating assets of the debtor communicate the existence of a claim to
any person who might reasonably be expected to have knowledge of the
whereabouts of a debtor or the location of assets of the debtor if the
claim is reduced to judgment, or if not reduced to judgment, when:
(i) The licensee or employee has notified or attempted to notify
the debtor in writing at his or her last known address or last known
place of employment concerning the claim and the debtor after a
reasonable time has failed to pay the claim or has failed to agree to
make payments on the claim in a manner acceptable to the licensee, and
(ii) The debtor has not in writing disputed any part of the claim.
(e) A licensee may communicate the existence of a claim to its
customers or clients if the claim is reduced to judgment, or if not
reduced to judgment, when:
(i) The licensee has notified or attempted to notify the debtor in
writing at his or her last known address or last known place of
employment concerning the claim and the debtor after a reasonable time
has failed to pay the claim or has failed to agree to make payments on
the claim in a manner acceptable to the licensee, and
(ii) The debtor has not in writing disputed any part of the claim.
(11) Threaten the debtor with impairment of his or her credit
rating if a claim is not paid: PROVIDED, That advising a debtor that
the licensee has reported or intends to report a claim to a credit
reporting agency is not considered a threat if the licensee actually
has reported or intends to report the claim to a credit reporting
agency.
(12) Communicate with the debtor after notification in writing from
an attorney representing such debtor that all further communications
relative to a claim should be addressed to the attorney: PROVIDED,
That if a licensee requests in writing information from an attorney
regarding such claim and the attorney does not respond within a
reasonable time, the licensee may communicate directly with the debtor
until he or she or it again receives notification in writing that an
attorney is representing the debtor.
(13) Communicate with a debtor or anyone else in such a manner as
to harass, intimidate, threaten, or embarrass a debtor, including but
not limited to communication at an unreasonable hour, with unreasonable
frequency, by threats of force or violence, by threats of criminal
prosecution, and by use of offensive language. A communication shall
be presumed to have been made for the purposes of harassment if:
(a) It is made with a debtor or spouse in any form, manner, or
place, more than three times in a single week, unless the licensee is
responding to a communication from the debtor or spouse;
(b) It is made with a debtor at his or her place of employment more
than one time in a single week, unless the licensee is responding to a
communication from the debtor;
(c) It is made with the debtor or spouse at his or her place of
residence between the hours of 9:00 p.m. and 7:30 a.m. A call to a
telephone is presumed to be received in the local time zone to which
the area code of the number called is assigned for landline numbers,
unless the licensee reasonably believes the telephone is located in a
different time zone. If the area code is not assigned to landlines in
any specific geographic area, such as with toll-free telephone numbers,
a call to a telephone is presumed to be received in the local time zone
of the debtor's last known place of residence, unless the licensee
reasonably believes the telephone is located in a different time zone.
(14) Communicate with the debtor through use of forms or
instruments that simulate the form or appearance of judicial process,
the form or appearance of government documents, or the simulation of a
form or appearance of a telegraphic or emergency message.
(15) Communicate with the debtor and represent or imply that the
existing obligation of the debtor may be or has been increased by the
addition of attorney fees, investigation fees, service fees, or any
other fees or charges when in fact such fees or charges may not legally
be added to the existing obligation of such debtor.
(16) Threaten to take any action against the debtor which the
licensee cannot legally take at the time the threat is made.
(17) Send any telegram or make any telephone calls to a debtor or
concerning a debt or for the purpose of demanding payment of a claim or
seeking information about a debtor, for which the charges are payable
by the addressee or by the person to whom the call is made: PROVIDED,
That:
(a) This subsection does not prohibit a licensee from attempting to
communicate by way of a cellular telephone or other wireless device:
PROVIDED, That a licensee cannot cause charges to be incurred to the
recipient of the attempted communication more than three times in any
calendar week when the licensee knows or reasonably should know that
the number belongs to a cellular telephone or other wireless device,
unless the licensee is responding to a communication from the debtor or
the person to whom the call is made.
(b) The licensee is not in violation of (a) of this subsection if
the licensee at least monthly updates its records with information
provided by a commercial provider of cellular telephone lists that the
licensee in good faith believes provides reasonably current and
comprehensive data identifying cellular telephone numbers, calls a
number not appearing in the most recent list provided by the commercial
provider, and does not otherwise know or reasonably should know that
the number belongs to a cellular telephone.
(c) This subsection may not be construed to increase the number of
communications permitted pursuant to subsection (13)(a) of this
section.
(18) Call, or send a text message or other electronic communication
to, a cellular telephone or other wireless device more than twice in
any day when the licensee knows or reasonably should know that the
number belongs to a cellular telephone or other wireless device, unless
the licensee is responding to a communication from the debtor or the
person to whom the call, text message, or other electronic
communication is made. The licensee is not in violation of this
subsection if the licensee at least monthly updates its records with
information provided by a commercial provider of cellular telephone
lists that the licensee in good faith believes provides reasonably
current and comprehensive data identifying cellular telephone numbers,
calls a number not appearing in the most recent list provided by the
commercial provider, and does not otherwise know or reasonably should
know that the number belongs to a cellular telephone. Nothing in this
subsection may be construed to increase the number of communications
permitted pursuant to subsection (13)(a) of this section.
(19) Intentionally block its telephone number from displaying on a
debtor's telephone.
(20) In any manner convey the impression that the licensee is
vouched for, bonded to or by, or is an instrumentality of the state of
Washington or any agency or department thereof.
(21) Collect or attempt to collect in addition to the principal
amount of a claim any sum other than allowable interest, collection
costs or handling fees expressly authorized by statute, and, in the
case of suit, attorney's fees and taxable court costs. A licensee may
collect or attempt to collect collection costs and fees, including
contingent collection fees, as authorized by a written agreement or
contract, between the licensee's client and the debtor, in the
collection of a commercial claim. The amount charged to the debtor for
collection services shall not exceed thirty-five percent of the
commercial claim.
(22) Procure from a debtor or collect or attempt to collect on any
written note, contract, stipulation, promise or acknowledgment under
which a debtor may be required to pay any sum other than principal,
allowable interest, except as noted in subsection (21) of this section,
and, in the case of suit, attorney's fees and taxable court costs.
(23) Bring an action or initiate an arbitration proceeding on a
claim when the licensee knows, or reasonably should know, that such
suit or arbitration is barred by the applicable statute of limitations.
(24) Upon notification by a debtor that the debtor disputes all
debts arising from a series of dishonored checks, automated
clearinghouse transactions on a demand deposit account, or other
preprinted written instruments, initiate oral contact with a debtor
more than one time in an attempt to collect from the debtor debts
arising from the identified series of dishonored checks, automated
clearinghouse transactions on a demand deposit account, or other
preprinted written instruments when: (a) Within the previous one
hundred eighty days, in response to the licensee's attempt to collect
the initial debt assigned to the licensee and arising from the
identified series of dishonored checks, automated clearinghouse
transactions on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written
instruments, the debtor in writing notified the licensee that the
debtor's checkbook or other series of preprinted written instruments
was stolen or fraudulently created; (b) the licensee has received from
the debtor a certified copy of a police report referencing the theft or
fraudulent creation of the checkbook, automated clearinghouse
transactions on a demand deposit account, or series of preprinted
written instruments; (c) in the written notification to the licensee or
in the police report, the debtor identified the financial institution
where the account was maintained, the account number, the magnetic ink
character recognition number, the full bank routing and transit number,
and the check numbers of the stolen checks, automated clearinghouse
transactions on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written
instruments, which check numbers included the number of the check that
is the subject of the licensee's collection efforts; (d) the debtor
provides, or within the previous one hundred eighty days provided, to
the licensee a legible copy of a government-issued photo
identification, which contains the debtor's signature and which was
issued prior to the date of the theft or fraud identified in the police
report; and (e) the debtor advised the licensee that the subject debt
is disputed because the identified check, automated clearinghouse
transaction on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written
instrument underlying the debt is a stolen or fraudulently created
check or instrument.
The licensee is not in violation of this subsection if the licensee
initiates oral contact with the debtor more than one time in an attempt
to collect debts arising from the identified series of dishonored
checks, automated clearinghouse transactions on a demand deposit
account, or other preprinted written instruments when: (i) The
licensee acted in good faith and relied on their established practices
and procedures for batching, recording, or packeting debtor accounts,
and the licensee inadvertently initiates oral contact with the debtor
in an attempt to collect debts in the identified series subsequent to
the initial debt assigned to the licensee; (ii) the licensee is
following up on collection of a debt assigned to the licensee, and the
debtor has previously requested more information from the licensee
regarding the subject debt; (iii) the debtor has notified the licensee
that the debtor disputes only some, but not all the debts arising from
the identified series of dishonored checks, automated clearinghouse
transactions on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written
instruments, in which case the licensee shall be allowed to initiate
oral contact with the debtor one time for each debt arising from the
series of identified checks, automated clearinghouse transactions on a
demand deposit account, or written instruments and initiate additional
oral contact for those debts that the debtor acknowledges do not arise
from stolen or fraudulently created checks or written instruments; (iv)
the oral contact is in the context of a judicial, administrative,
arbitration, mediation, or similar proceeding; or (v) the oral contact
is made for the purpose of investigating, confirming, or authenticating
the information received from the debtor, to provide additional
information to the debtor, or to request additional information from
the debtor needed by the licensee to accurately record the debtor's
information in the licensee's records.
(25) Submit an affidavit or other request pursuant to chapter 6.32
RCW asking a superior or district court to transfer a bond posted by a
debtor subject to a money judgment to the licensee, when the debtor has
appeared as required.

--- END ---