BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.18.103 and 2006 c 8 s 215 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to assist the purchasers of
commercial property casualty insurance by allowing policies to be
issued more expeditiously and provide a more competitive market for
forms.
(2) Commercial property casualty policies may be issued prior to
filing the forms.
(3) All commercial property casualty forms must be filed with the
commissioner within thirty days after an insurer issues any policy
using them. This subsection does not apply to:
(a) Types or classes of forms that the commissioner exempts from
filing by rule; and
(b) Manuscript policies, riders, or endorsements of unique
character designed for and used with relation to insurance upon a
particular subject.
(4) If, within thirty days after a commercial property casualty
form has been filed, the commissioner finds that the form does not meet
the requirements of this chapter, the commissioner shall disapprove the
form and give notice to the insurer or rating organization that made
the filing, specifying how the form fails to meet the requirements and
stating when, within a reasonable period thereafter, the form shall be
deemed no longer effective. The commissioner may extend the time for
review an additional fifteen days by giving notice to the insurer prior
to the expiration of the original thirty-day period.
(5) Upon a final determination of a disapproval of a policy form
under subsection (4) of this section, the insurer must amend any
previously issued disapproved form by endorsement to comply with the
commissioner's disapproval.
(6) For purposes of this section, "commercial property casualty"
means insurance pertaining to a business, profession, occupation,
nonprofit organization, or public entity for the lines of property and
casualty insurance defined in RCW 48.11.040, 48.11.050, 48.11.060, or
48.11.070, but does not mean medical malpractice insurance or portable
electronics insurance as defined in RCW 48.120.005.
(7) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the
disapproval shall not affect any contract made or issued prior to the
expiration of the period set forth in the notice of disapproval.
(8) Every member or subscriber to a rating organization must adhere
to the form filings made on its behalf by the organization. An insurer
may deviate from forms filed on its behalf by an organization only if
the insurer files the forms with the commissioner in accordance with
this chapter.
(9) In the event a hearing is held on the actions of the
commissioner under subsection (4) of this section, the burden of proof
shall be on the commissioner.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.19.040 and 2012 c 222 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every insurer or rating organization shall, before using, file
with the commissioner every classifications manual, manual of rules and
rates, rating plan, rating schedule, minimum rate, class rate, and
rating rule, and every modification of any of the foregoing which it
proposes. The insurer need not so file any rate on individually rated
risks as described in subdivision (1) of RCW 48.19.030; except that any
such specific rate made by a rating organization shall be filed.
(2) Every such filing shall indicate the type and extent of the
coverage contemplated and must be accompanied by sufficient information
to permit the commissioner to determine whether it meets the
requirements of this chapter. An insurer or rating organization shall
offer in support of any filing:
(a) The experience or judgment of the insurer or rating
organization making the filing;
(b) An exhibit detailing the major elements of operating expense
for the types of insurance affected by the filing;
(c) An explanation of how investment income has been taken into
account in the proposed rates; and
(d) Any other information which the insurer or rating organization
deems relevant.
(3) If an insurer has insufficient loss experience to support its
proposed rates, it may submit:
(a) Loss experience for similar exposures of other insurers or of
a rating organization; or
(b) A complete and logical explanation of how it has developed its
proposed rates, including the insurer's analysis of any relevant
information and showing why the proposed rates should be considered to
meet the requirements of RCW 48.19.020.
(4) Every such filing shall state its proposed effective date.
(5)(a) A filing made pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from
the provisions of RCW 48.02.120(3). However, the filing and all
supporting information accompanying it shall be open to public
inspection only after the filing becomes effective, except as provided
in (b) of this subsection.
(b) For the purpose of this section, "usage-based insurance" means
private passenger automobile coverage that uses data gathered from any
recording device as defined in RCW 46.35.010, or a system, or business
method that records and preserves data arising from the actual usage of
a motor vehicle to determine rates or premiums. Information in a
filing of usage-based insurance about the usage-based component of the
rate is confidential and must be withheld from public inspection.
(6) Where a filing is required no insurer shall make or issue an
insurance contract or policy except in accordance with its filing then
in effect, except as is provided by RCW 48.19.090.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.19.043 and 2006 c 8 s 216 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to assist the purchasers of
commercial property casualty insurance by allowing policies to be
issued more expeditiously and provide a more competitive market for
rates.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 48.19.040(1), commercial
property casualty policies may be issued prior to filing the rates.
All commercial property casualty rates shall be filed with the
commissioner within thirty days after an insurer issues any policy
using them.
(3) If, within thirty days after a commercial property casualty
rate has been filed, the commissioner finds that the rate does not meet
the requirements of this chapter, the commissioner shall disapprove the
filing and give notice to the insurer or rating organization that made
the filing, specifying how the filing fails to meet the requirements
and stating when, within a reasonable period thereafter, the filing
shall be deemed no longer effective. The commissioner may extend the
time for review another fifteen days by giving notice to the insurer
prior to the expiration of the original thirty-day period.
(4) Upon a final determination of a disapproval of a rate filing
under subsection (3) of this section, the insurer shall issue an
endorsement changing the rate to comply with the commissioner's
disapproval from the date the rate is no longer effective.
(5) For purposes of this section, "commercial property casualty"
means insurance pertaining to a business, profession, occupation,
nonprofit organization, or public entity for the lines of property and
casualty insurance defined in RCW 48.11.040, 48.11.050, 48.11.060, or
48.11.070, but does not mean medical malpractice insurance or portable
electronics insurance as defined in RCW 48.120.005.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the
disapproval shall not affect any contract made or issued prior to the
expiration of the period set forth in the notice of disapproval.
(7) In the event a hearing is held on the actions of the
commissioner under subsection (3) of this section, the burden of proof
is on the commissioner.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.120.015 and 2012 c 154 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A specialty producer license authorizes a vendor and its
employees and authorized representatives to offer and sell to, enroll
in, and bill and collect premiums from customers for insurance covering
portable electronics on a master, corporate, group commercial inland
marine policy, or on an individual policy basis on a month-to-month or
other periodic basis at each location at which the vendor engages in
portable electronics transactions. However:
(a) The supervising person must maintain a list of a vendor's
locations that are authorized to sell or solicit portable electronics
insurance coverage; and
(b) The list under (a) of this subsection must be provided to the
commissioner within ten days of a request by the commissioner.
(2) An employee or authorized representative of a vendor may sell
or offer portable electronics insurance to the vendor's customers
without being individually licensed as an insurance producer if the
vendor is licensed under this chapter and is acting in compliance with
this chapter and any rules adopted by the commissioner.
(3) A vendor billing and collecting premiums from customers for
portable electronics insurance coverage is not required to maintain
these funds in a segregated account if the vendor:
(a) Is authorized by the insurer to hold the funds in an
alternative manner; and
(b) Remits the funds to the supervising person within sixty days of
receipt.
(4) All funds received by a vendor from an enrolled customer for
the sale of portable electronics insurance are considered funds held in
trust by the vendor in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of the
insurer.
(5) Any charge to the enrolled customer for coverage that is not
included in the cost associated with the purchase or lease of portable
electronics or related services must be separately itemized on the
enrolled customer's bill.
(6) If portable electronics insurance coverage is included with the
purchase or lease of portable electronics or related services, the
vendor must clearly and conspicuously disclose to the enrolled customer
that the portable electronics insurance coverage is included with the
portable electronics or related services.
(7) Vendors may receive compensation for billing and collection
services.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.120.020 and 2012 c 154 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A vendor issued a specialty producer license may not issue
insurance under RCW 48.120.015 unless:
(a) At every location where customers are enrolled in portable
electronics insurance programs, written material regarding the program
is made available to prospective customers that:
(i) Discloses that portable electronics insurance may provide a
duplication of coverage already provided by a customer's homeowner's
insurance policy, renter's insurance policy, or other source of
coverage;
(ii) States that the enrollment by the customer in a portable
electronics insurance program is not required in order to purchase or
lease portable electronics or services;
(iii) Summarizes the material terms of the insurance coverage,
including the identity of the insurer, the identity of the supervising
person, the amount of any applicable deductible and how it is to be
paid, benefits of the coverage, and key terms and conditions of
coverage, such as whether portable electronics may be replaced with a
similar make and model or reconditioned make and model or repaired with
nonoriginal manufacturer parts or equipment;
(iv) Summarizes the process for filing a claim, including a
description of how to return portable electronics and the maximum fee
applicable in the event the customer fails to comply with any equipment
return requirements; and
(v) States that an enrolled customer may cancel enrollment for
coverage under a portable electronics insurance policy at any time and
the person paying the premium will receive a refund or credit of any
applicable unearned premium; ((and))
(b)(i) The written materials required by (a) of this subsection
disclose with specificity under what circumstances and subject to what
limitations an insurer may cancel, terminate, modify, or otherwise
change the terms and conditions of a policy of portable electronics
insurance; or
(ii) Within a reasonable time from the date of purchase, materials
are delivered to an enrolled customer that state with specificity under
what circumstances and subject to what limitations an insurer may
cancel, terminate, modify, or otherwise change the terms and conditions
of a policy of portable electronics insurance; and
(c) The portable electronics insurance program is operated with the
participation of a supervising person who, with authorization and
approval from the appointing insurer, supervises a training program for
employees of the licensed vendor. The training must comply with the
following:
(i) The training must be delivered to employees and authorized
representatives of vendors who are directly engaged in the activity of
selling or offering portable electronics insurance;
(ii) The training may be provided in electronic form. However, if
conducted in an electronic form, the supervising person must implement
a supplemental education program regarding the portable electronics
insurance product that is conducted and overseen by licensed employees
of the supervising person; and
(iii) Each employee and authorized representative must receive
basic instruction about the portable electronics insurance offered to
customers and the disclosures required under this section.
(2) No employee or authorized representative of a vendor of
portable electronics may advertise, represent, or otherwise hold
himself or herself out as a nonlimited lines licensed insurance
producer.
(3) Employees and authorized representatives of a vendor issued a
specialty producer license may only act on behalf of the vendor in the
offer, sale, solicitation, or enrollment of customers in a portable
electronics insurance program. The conduct of these employees and
authorized representatives within the scope of their employment or
agency is the same as conduct of the vendor for purposes of this title.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.120.020 and 2012 c 154 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A vendor issued a specialty producer license may not issue
insurance under RCW 48.120.015 unless:
(a) At every location where customers are enrolled in portable
electronics insurance programs, written material regarding the program
is made available to prospective customers that:
(i) Discloses that portable electronics insurance may provide a
duplication of coverage already provided by a customer's homeowner's
insurance policy, renter's insurance policy, or other source of
coverage;
(ii) States that the enrollment by the customer in a portable
electronics insurance program is not required in order to purchase or
lease portable electronics or services;
(iii) Summarizes the material terms of the insurance coverage,
including the identity of the insurer, the identity of the supervising
person, the amount of any applicable deductible and how it is to be
paid, benefits of the coverage, and key terms and conditions of
coverage, such as whether portable electronics may be replaced with a
similar make and model or reconditioned make and model or repaired with
nonoriginal manufacturer parts or equipment;
(iv) Summarizes the process for filing a claim, including a
description of how to return portable electronics and the maximum fee
applicable in the event the customer fails to comply with any equipment
return requirements; ((and))
(v) States that an enrolled customer may cancel enrollment for
coverage under a portable electronics insurance policy at any time and
the person paying the premium will receive a refund or credit of any
applicable unearned premium; and
(vi) Discloses with specificity under what circumstances and
subject to what limitations an insurer may cancel, terminate, modify,
or otherwise change the terms and conditions of a policy of portable
electronics insurance; and
(b) The portable electronics insurance program is operated with the
participation of a supervising person who, with authorization and
approval from the appointing insurer, supervises a training program for
employees of the licensed vendor. The training must comply with the
following:
(i) The training must be delivered to employees and authorized
representatives of vendors who are directly engaged in the activity of
selling or offering portable electronics insurance;
(ii) The training may be provided in electronic form. However, if
conducted in an electronic form, the supervising person must implement
a supplemental education program regarding the portable electronics
insurance product that is conducted and overseen by licensed employees
of the supervising person; and
(iii) Each employee and authorized representative must receive
basic instruction about the portable electronics insurance offered to
customers and the disclosures required under this section.
(2) No employee or authorized representative of a vendor of
portable electronics may advertise, represent, or otherwise hold
himself or herself out as a nonlimited lines licensed insurance
producer.
(3) Employees and authorized representatives of a vendor issued a
specialty producer license may only act on behalf of the vendor in the
offer, sale, solicitation, or enrollment of customers in a portable
electronics insurance program. The conduct of these employees and
authorized representatives within the scope of their employment or
agency is the same as conduct of the vendor for purposes of this title.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.120.025 and 2002 c 357 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A vendor issued a specialty producer license under this chapter
is subject to RCW ((48.17.540)) 48.17.530 through 48.17.560.
(2) The commissioner may adopt rules necessary for the
implementation of this chapter, including, but not limited to, rules
governing:
(a) The specialty producer license application process, including
any forms required to be used;
(b) The standards for approval and the required content of written
materials required under RCW 48.120.020(1)(a);
(c) The approval and required content of training materials
required under RCW 48.120.020(1)(((b)));
(d) Establishing license fees to defray the cost of administering
the specialty producer licensure program;
(e) Establishing requirements for the remittance of premium funds
to the supervising agent under authority from the program insurer; and
(f) Determining the applicability or nonapplicability of other
provisions of this title to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The cancellation provisions in RCW 48.18.290 and the nonrenewal
provisions in RCW 48.18.2901 apply to portable electronics insurance
policies issued under chapter 48.120 RCW, unless inconsistent with this
section in which case this section controls.
(2) An insurer may cancel, nonrenew, modify, or otherwise change
the terms and conditions of a policy of portable electronics only:
(a) Upon providing the policyholder and enrolled customers with at
least thirty days' notice; or
(b) As provided in subsections (5) through (7) of this section.
(3) An insurer may not increase premiums or deductions or otherwise
restrict benefits more than once in any six-month period.
(4) If an insurer changes the terms and conditions, then the
insurer must provide:
(a) The vendor policyholder with a revised policy endorsement; and
(b) Each enrolled customer with:
(i) A revised certificate or endorsement and a summary of material
changes; or
(ii) If the change is limited to a change in premium, a revised
certificate, endorsement, updated brochure, or other evidence
indicating a change in premium.
(5) An insurer may terminate an enrolled customer's enrollment
under a portable electronics insurance policy upon fifteen days' notice
for discovery of fraud or material misrepresentation in obtaining
coverage or in the presentation of a claim.
(6) An insurer may terminate an enrolled customer's enrollment
under a portable electronics insurance policy upon ten days' notice for
nonpayment of premium.
(7) An insurer may immediately terminate an enrolled customer's
enrollment under a portable electronics insurance policy:
(a) Without notice, if the enrolled customer ceases to have an
active service with the vendor of portable electronics; or
(b) Without prior notice if an enrolled customer exhausts the
aggregate limit of liability, if any, under the terms of the portable
electronics insurance policy and the insurer sends notice of
termination to the enrolled customer within thirty calendar days after
exhaustion of the limit. However, if notice is not timely sent,
coverage continues notwithstanding the aggregate limit of liability
until the insurer sends notice of termination to the enrolled customer.
(8) If a policy of portable electronics insurance is being
cancelled or terminated by the insurer, the notice must include the
insurer's actual reason for cancellation or termination.
(9) When a portable electronics insurance policy is terminated by
a policyholder, the insurer must mail or deliver written notice to each
enrolled customer advising the enrolled customer of the termination of
the policy and the effective date of termination. The written notice
must be mailed or delivered to the enrolled customer at least thirty
days prior to the termination. The written notice must include the
actual reason for the termination. However, if the policyholder is a
vendor licensed as a specialty producer pursuant to RCW 48.120.010, the
notice required by this subsection must be mailed or delivered by the
vendor.
(10) Any notice or correspondence with respect to a policy of
portable electronics insurance required under this section or otherwise
required by law must be in writing. Notice or correspondence may be
sent either by mail or by electronic means. If the notice or
correspondence is mailed, it must be sent to the vendor of portable
electronics at the vendor's mailing address specified for that purpose
and to its affected enrolled customers' last known mailing addresses on
file with the insurer.
The insurer or vendor of portable electronics must maintain proof
of mailing in a form authorized or accepted by the United States postal
service or other commercial mail delivery service. If a notice or
correspondence is sent by electronic means, it must be sent to the
vendor of portable electronics at the vendor's electronic mail address
specified for that purpose and to its affected enrolled customers' last
known electronic mail address as provided by each enrolled customer to
the insurer or vendor of portable electronics, as the case may be.
For purposes of this subsection, an enrolled customer's provision
of an electronic mail address to the insurer, supervising person, or
vendor of portable electronics means that the enrolled customer
consents to receive notices and correspondence by electronic mail as
long as a disclosure to that effect is provided to the consumer at the
time the consumer provides an electronic mail address. The insurer or
vendor of portable electronics, as the case may be, must maintain proof
that the notice or correspondence was sent.
(11) Notice or correspondence required by this section or otherwise
required by law may be sent by the supervising person appointed by the
insurer on behalf of an insurer or a vendor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 5 of this act expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 6 of this act takes effect July 1,
2015.

--- END ---