BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.44.011 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 45 are each
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Committee" means the escrow advisory committee of the state of
Washington created by RCW 18.44.500.
(2) "Controlling person" is any person who owns or controls ten
percent or more of the beneficial ownership of any escrow agent,
regardless of the form of business organization employed and regardless
of whether such interest stands in such person's true name or in the
name of a nominee.
(3) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(4) "Designated escrow officer" means any licensed escrow officer
designated by a licensed escrow agent and approved by the director as
the licensed escrow officer responsible for supervising that agent's
handling of escrow transactions, management of the agent's trust
account, and supervision of all other licensed escrow officers employed
by the agent.
(5) "Director" means the director of financial institutions, or his
or her duly authorized representative.
(6) "Director of licensing" means the director of the department of
licensing, or his or her duly authorized representative.
(7) "Escrow" means any transaction, except the acts of a qualified
intermediary in facilitating an exchange under section 1031 of the
internal revenue code, wherein any person or persons, for the purpose
of effecting and closing the sale, purchase, exchange, transfer,
encumbrance, or lease of real or personal property to another person or
persons, delivers any written instrument, money, evidence of title to
real or personal property, or other thing of value to a third person to
be held by such third person until the happening of a specified event
or the performance of a prescribed condition or conditions, when it is
then to be delivered by such third person, in compliance with
instructions under which he or she is to act, to a grantee, grantor,
promisee, promisor, obligee, obligor, lessee, lessor, bailee, bailor,
or any agent or employee thereof. "Escrow" includes the collection and
processing of payments and the performance of related services by a
third party on seller-financed loans secured by a lien on real or
personal property but excludes vessel transfers.
(8) "Escrow agent" means any person engaged in the business of
performing for compensation the duties of the third person referred to
in subsection (7) of this section.
(9) "Licensed escrow agent" means any sole proprietorship, firm,
association, partnership, or corporation holding a license as an escrow
agent under the provisions of this chapter.
(10) "Licensed escrow officer" means any natural person handling
escrow transactions and licensed as such by the director.
(11) "Person" means a natural person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or the plural
thereof, whether resident, nonresident, citizen, or not.
(12) "Split escrow" means a transaction in which two or more escrow
agents act to effect and close an escrow transaction.

Sec. 2 RCW 31.04.025 and 2012 c 17 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each loan made to a resident of this state by a licensee, or
persons subject to this chapter, is subject to the authority and
restrictions of this chapter, unless such loan is made under the
authority of chapter 63.14 RCW.
(2) This chapter does not apply to the following:
(a) Any person doing business under, and as permitted by, any law
of this state or of the United States relating to banks, savings banks,
trust companies, savings and loan or building and loan associations, or
credit unions;
(b) Entities making loans under chapter 19.60 RCW (pawnbroking);
(c) Entities conducting transactions under chapter 63.14 RCW
(retail installment sales of goods and services), unless the goods
being sold in a retail installment sale consist of open loop prepaid
access (prepaid access as defined in 31 C.F.R. Part 1010.100(ww) and
not closed loop prepaid access as defined in 31 C.F.R. Part
1010.100(kkk));
(d) Entities making loans under chapter 31.45 RCW (check cashers
and sellers);
(e) Any person making a loan primarily for business, commercial, or
agricultural purposes unless the loan is secured by a lien on the
borrower's primary residence;
(f) Any person making loans made to government or government
agencies or instrumentalities or making loans to organizations as
defined in the federal truth in lending act;
(g) Entities making loans under chapter 43.185 RCW (housing trust
fund);
(h) Entities making loans under programs of the United States
department of agriculture, department of housing and urban development,
or other federal government program that provides funding or access to
funding for single-family housing developments or grants to low-income
individuals for the purchase or repair of single-family housing;
(i) Nonprofit housing organizations making loans, or loans made,
under housing programs that are funded in whole or in part by federal
or state programs if the primary purpose of the programs is to assist
low-income borrowers with purchasing or repairing housing or the
development of housing for low-income Washington state residents;
((and))
(j) Entities making loans which are not residential mortgage loans
under a credit card plan; ((and))
(k) Individuals employed by a licensed residential loan servicing
company, unless so required by federal law or regulation; and
(l) Entities licensed under chapter 18.44 RCW that process payments
on seller-financed loans secured by liens on real or personal property.
(3) The director may, at his or her discretion, waive applicability
of the consumer loan company licensing provisions of this chapter to
other persons, not including individuals subject to the S.A.F.E. act,
making or servicing loans when the director determines it necessary to
facilitate commerce and protect consumers. The director may adopt
rules interpreting this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.44.457 and 2010 c 34 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) During the time that the director retains possession of the
property and business of a licensee, the director has the power and
authority to conduct the licensee's business and take any action on
behalf of the licensee ((that the licensee could lawfully take on its
own behalf)) to protect consumers, including but not limited to
discontinuing any violations and unsafe or injurious practices, making
good any deficiencies, and making claims against the licensee's
fidelity bond, errors and omissions bond, or surety bond on behalf of
the company.
(2) The director, the department, and its employees are not subject
to liability for actions under this section and RCW 18.44.455 and no
moneys from the department's fund may be required to be expended on
behalf of the licensee or the licensee's clients, creditors, employees,
shareholders, members, investors, or any other party or entity.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.44.201 and 2010 c 34 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time of filing an application for an escrow agent
license, or any renewal or reinstatement of an escrow agent license,
the applicant shall provide satisfactory evidence to the director of
having obtained the following as evidence of financial responsibility:
(a) A fidelity bond providing coverage in the aggregate amount of
((two hundred thousand)) one million dollars with a deductible no
greater than ten thousand dollars covering each corporate officer,
partner, escrow officer, and employee of the applicant engaged in
escrow transactions;
(b) An errors and omissions policy issued to the escrow agent
providing coverage in the minimum aggregate amount of fifty thousand
dollars or, alternatively, cash or securities in the principal amount
of fifty thousand dollars deposited in an approved depository on
condition that they be available for payment of any claim payable under
an equivalent errors and omissions policy in that amount and pursuant
to rules and regulations adopted by the department for that purpose;
and
(c) A surety bond in the amount of ten thousand dollars executed by
the applicant as obligor and by a surety company authorized to do a
surety business in this state as surety, unless the fidelity bond
obtained by the licensee to satisfy the requirement in (a) of this
subsection does not have a deductible. The bond shall run to the state
of Washington as obligee, and shall run to the benefit of the state and
any person or persons who suffer loss by reason of the applicant's or
its employee's violation of this chapter. The bond shall be
conditioned that the obligor as licensee will faithfully conform to and
abide by this chapter and all rules adopted under this chapter, and
shall reimburse all persons who suffer loss by reason of a violation of
this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. The bond shall be
continuous and may be canceled by the surety upon the surety giving
written notice to the director of its intent to cancel the bond. The
cancellation shall be effective thirty days after the notice is
received by the director. Whether or not the bond is renewed,
continued, reinstated, reissued, or otherwise extended, replaced, or
modified, including increases or decreases in the penal sum, it shall
be considered one continuous obligation, and the surety upon the bond
shall not be liable in an aggregate amount exceeding the penal sum set
forth on the face of the bond. In no event shall the penal sum, or any
portion thereof, at two or more points in time be added together in
determining the surety's liability. The bond shall not be liable for
any penalties imposed on the licensee, including but not limited to,
any increased damages or attorneys' fees, or both, awarded under RCW
19.86.090.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a "fidelity bond" shall mean
a primary commercial blanket bond or its equivalent satisfactory to the
director and written by an insurer authorized to transact this line of
business in the state of Washington. Such bond shall provide fidelity
coverage for any fraudulent or dishonest acts committed by any one or
more of the corporate officers, partners, sole practitioners, escrow
officers, and employees of the applicant engaged in escrow transactions
acting alone or in collusion with others. This bond shall be for the
sole benefit of the escrow agent and under no circumstances whatsoever
shall the bonding company be liable under the bond to any other party
unless the corporate officer, partner, or sole practitioner commits a
fraudulent or dishonest act, in which case, the bond shall be for the
benefit of the harmed consumer. The bond shall name the escrow agent
as obligee and shall protect the obligee against the loss of money or
other real or personal property belonging to the obligee, or in which
the obligee has a pecuniary interest, or for which the obligee is
legally liable or held by the obligee in any capacity, whether the
obligee is legally liable therefor or not. An escrow agent's bond must
be maintained until all accounts have been reconciled and the escrow
trust account balance is zero. The bond may be canceled by the insurer
upon delivery of thirty days' written notice to the director and to the
escrow agent. In the event that the fidelity bond required under this
subsection is not reasonably available, the director may adopt rules to
implement a surety bond requirement.
(3) For the purposes of this section, an "errors and omissions
policy" shall mean a group or individual insurance policy satisfactory
to the director and issued by an insurer authorized to transact
insurance business in the state of Washington. Such policy shall
provide coverage for unintentional errors and omissions of the escrow
agent and its employees, and may be canceled by the insurer upon
delivery of thirty days' written notice to the director and to the
escrow agent.
(4) Except as provided in RCW 18.44.221, the fidelity bond, surety
bond, and the errors and omissions policy required by this section
shall be kept in full force and effect as a condition precedent to the
escrow agent's authority to transact escrow business in this state, and
the escrow agent shall supply the director with satisfactory evidence
thereof upon request.

--- END ---