BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that public agencies
must remain capable of adequately informing the public of their
activities through timely disclosure of public records. However,
public agencies are increasingly burdened by broad record requests from
commercial entities, including data miners, whose purpose is to sell or
resell the public records for a profit. Public agencies expend
taxpayer dollars to locate, assemble, redact, review, and provide the
requested public records. Under existing law, except for copying and
mailing costs, public agencies may not recover the true costs of
providing this service. As a result, the taxpayers of this state
effectively subsidize commercial requestors. Accordingly, the purpose
of this act is to protect the public interest and prevent diversion of
scarce agency resources by authorizing public agencies to recover their
costs through charging a reasonable fee when records are requested for
the purpose of sale or resale.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.080 and 2005 c 483 s 1 and 2005 c 274 s 285 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Public records shall be available for inspection and copying,
and agencies shall, upon request for identifiable public records, make
them promptly available to any person ((including,)). If applicable,
based on the agency's determination, public records shall be made
available on a partial or installment basis as records that are part of
a larger set of requested records are assembled or made ready for
inspection or disclosure.
(2) Agencies shall not deny a request for identifiable public
records solely on the basis that the request is overbroad.
(3) Agencies shall not distinguish among persons requesting
records, and such persons shall not be required to provide information
as to the purpose for the request, except to establish whether:
(a) Inspection and copying would violate RCW 42.56.070(9) or other
statute which exempts or prohibits disclosure of specific information
or records to certain persons; or
(b) The purpose of the request is the sale or resale of all or part
of the record, including the sale or resale of a document or database
containing all or part of the record.
(4) Agency facilities shall be made available to any person for the
copying of public records except when and to the extent that this would
unreasonably disrupt the operations of the agency. Agencies shall
honor requests received by mail for identifiable public records unless
exempted by provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.56.120 and 2005 c 483 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no fee
shall be charged for the inspection of public records((. No fee shall
be charged)), for locating public documents ((and)), or for making them
available for copying. A reasonable charge may be imposed for
providing copies of public records and for the use by any person of
agency equipment or equipment of the office of the secretary of the
senate or the office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives
to copy public records, which charges shall not exceed the amount
necessary to reimburse the agency, the office of the secretary of the
senate, or the office of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives for its actual costs directly incident to such copying.
Agency charges for photocopies shall be imposed in accordance with the
actual per page cost or other costs established and published by the
agency. In no event may an agency charge a per page cost greater than
the actual per page cost as established and published by the agency.
To the extent the agency has not determined the actual per page cost
for photocopies of public records, the agency may not charge in excess
of fifteen cents per page. An agency may require a deposit in an
amount not to exceed ten percent of the estimated cost of providing
copies for a request. If an agency makes a request available on a
partial or installment basis, the agency may charge for each part of
the request as it is provided. If an installment of a records request
is not claimed or reviewed, the agency is not obligated to fulfill the
balance of the request.
(2) When a request for records is made for the purpose of sale or
resale of all or part of the record, unless an exemption as provided in
subsection (7) of this section is applicable, an agency may charge a
fee to recover its actual costs in responding to the request. The fee
may be a flat fee, fee per record, or other type of fee, but the fee
shall not exceed a reasonable estimate of the actual cost to provide
the records. The actual cost may include, but is not limited to, the
cost of locating, assembling, reviewing, redacting, copying, and
providing the record to the requestor.
(3) Where, as authorized in RCW 42.56.080(3)(b), an agency has
required a person to provide information about whether the purpose of
a request is the sale or resale of the requested records and the person
has denied such a purpose, no cost recovery fee may ordinarily be
assessed under subsection (2) of this section. However, if the agency
has reason to believe that the purpose of the request has been
misrepresented and the request is made for the purpose of sale or
resale, the agency may require the requestor to sign a statement under
penalty of perjury, attesting that the purpose of the record request is
not sale or resale of all or part of the record.
(4) Before charging the fee authorized in subsection (2) of this
section, an agency must develop and adopt, with notice and public
hearing, a fee schedule. The agency shall publish the fee schedule
along with the methodology by which the fees were established.
(5) The agency must also establish an appeals process by which a
requestor may appeal the amount of a fee. This process may be
established by contracting or entering into an interlocal agreement
with another agency. When a fee is charged pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section, the agency must provide the requestor with notice of
the appeals process.
(6) When an agency charges a cost recovery fee pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section, it may require a requestor to post a
deposit in an amount not to exceed ten percent of the estimated actual
cost of providing the records. If an agency makes the request
available on a partial or installment basis, the agency may require a
deposit in an amount not to exceed ten percent of the estimated actual
cost of providing the installment.
(7) The fee authorized in subsection (2) of this section may not be
assessed when:
(a) The requestor is entitled to obtain the requested records
pursuant to a contract, memorandum of understanding, or other binding
agreement with the agency;
(b) The requestor is entitled to obtain the records under authority
of law other than this chapter;
(c) The requestor is a representative of the news media affiliated
with an organization that publishes or disseminates information, and
where the request is made as part of news gathering and not for a
different commercial use;
(d) The requestor is a representative of a religious, charitable,
educational, or other nonprofit organization exempt from taxation under
Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of
1986, as amended, and the request is made in furtherance of the
organization's nonprofit purpose and not for a different commercial
purpose;
(e) The requestor is a representative of an educational institution
organized under the law of Washington or another state, and the purpose
of the request is in furtherance of the educational institution's
mission and not for a different commercial purpose;
(f) The requestor can demonstrate that the requested records will
be used to comply with governmental permitting requirements or other
regulations;
(g) The requestor is a title insurer licensed by the insurance
commissioner, an agent of such a title insurer, or an entity that
collects and provides data to such a title insurer or agent, as
reasonably required to insure titles, to act as an escrow closing agent
or, as allowed by the office of the insurance commissioner by rule, to
provide related customer services; or
(h) The requestor is a person licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW, a
prospective developer of real property, or a person seeking information
about real property or buildings owned by that person, and the request
is for the purpose of evaluating the viability of developing a specific
parcel of real property for a particular use, and not for a different
commercial purpose.
(8) A person or other legal entity that avoids paying the fee
authorized in subsection (2) of this section, by intentionally
misrepresenting the purpose for which the request is made or the
requestor's eligibility for an exemption under subsection (7) of this
section, or by intentionally inducing another person to knowingly or
unknowingly make such a misrepresentation, is liable for a civil
penalty at least equivalent to what the agency would have charged for
the records. The civil penalty under this section is in addition to
any other civil or criminal penalties and remedies available under any
other law of this state.
(9) Nothing in this section or RCW 42.56.080 may be construed to
create an obligation or authorization for an agency to create or
provide access to lists of individuals requested for commercial
purposes.

--- END ---