BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 86.15.055 and 2005 c 127 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a zone with supervisors elected pursuant to RCW 86.15.050,
the supervisors may, as adjusted in accordance with subsection (4) of
this section, each receive up to ((seventy dollars for attendance at
official meetings of the supervisors and for each day or major part
thereof for all necessary services actually performed in connection
with their duties as a supervisor)) one hundred four dollars per day or
portion of a day spent in actual attendance at official meetings of the
governing body or in performance of other official services or duties
on behalf of the district. The compensation for supervisors in office
on January 1, 2013, is fixed at one hundred four dollars per day. The
board of county commissioners shall fix any such compensation to be
paid to the initial supervisors during their initial terms of office.
The supervisors shall fix the compensation to be paid to the
supervisors thereafter. Compensation for the supervisors shall not
exceed ((six thousand seven hundred twenty)) nine thousand nine hundred
eighty-four dollars in one calendar year.
(2) A supervisor is entitled to reimbursement for reasonable
expenses actually incurred in connection with performance of the duties
of a supervisor, including subsistence and lodging, while away from the
supervisor's place of residence, and mileage for use of a privately
owned vehicle in accordance with chapter 42.24 RCW.
(3) Any supervisor may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
supervisors as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the member's election and prior to the
date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.
(4) The dollar thresholds established in this section must be
adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five
years, beginning July 1, 2013, based upon changes in the consumer price
index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state and including all items,
shall be used for the adjustments of inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.

--- END ---