BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.40.045 and 2013 c 235 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The assessor must give notice of any change in the true and
fair value of real property for the tract or lot of land and any
improvements thereon no later than thirty days after appraisal.
However, no such notice may be mailed during the period from January
15th to February 15th of each year. Furthermore, no notice need be
sent with respect to changes in valuation of publicly owned property
exempt from taxation under provisions of RCW 84.36.010 or of forest
land made pursuant to chapter 84.33 RCW.
(2) The notice must contain a statement of both the prior and the
new true and fair value((, stating)). For tracts or lots of land that
include residential condominiums, the notice may state separately land
and improvement values. For all other properties, the notice must
state separately land and improvement values((, and)). The notice must
also contain a brief statement of the procedure for appeal to the board
of equalization and the time, date, and place of the meetings of the
board.
(3) The notice must be mailed by the assessor to the taxpayer.
(4) If any taxpayer, as shown by the tax rolls, holds solely a
security interest in the real property which is the subject of the
notice, pursuant to a mortgage, contract of sale, or deed of trust,
such taxpayer must, upon written request of the assessor, supply,
within thirty days of receipt of such request, to the assessor the name
and address of the person making payments pursuant to the mortgage,
contract of sale, or deed of trust, and thereafter such person must
also receive a copy of the notice provided for in this section.
Willful failure to comply with such request within the time limitation
provided for in this section makes such taxpayer subject to a maximum
civil penalty of five thousand dollars. The penalties provided for in
this section are recoverable in an action by the county prosecutor, and
when recovered must be deposited in the county current expense fund.
The assessor must make the request provided for by this section during
the month of January.
(5) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Residential condominiums" means real property for which the
standard two-digit land use code of 14 is applied by the county; and
(b) "Standard two-digit land use code" means the code adopted by
the department of revenue in WAC 458-53-030, as it exists on January 1,
2014, to identify the actual use of the applicable land.

--- END ---