BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 86.09.175 and 1937 c 72 s 59 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Contracts entered into by districts for construction ((or
for)), services ((or)), materials, or maintenance may provide that
payments ((shall)) will be made in such monthly proportion of the
contract price, as the board shall determine thereon, as the work
progresses, or as the services ((or)), materials, or maintenance are
furnished, on monthly estimates of the value thereof((, approved by the
state director. Before the district shall enter into any contract, the
plans, specifications and form of contract therefor shall be approved
by the state director)).
(2) The district must withhold five percent of all payments made
under subsection (1) of this section until the contract is complete, as
evidenced by releases issued by the district. This subsection (2) does
not apply to contracts for materials.

Sec. 2 RCW 86.09.178 and 1965 c 26 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Contracts for construction, or for labor or materials entering
into the construction of any improvement authorized by the district
shall be awarded at public bidding except as herein otherwise provided.
A notice calling for sealed proposals shall be published in such
newspaper or newspapers of general circulation as the board shall
designate for a period of not less than two weeks (three weekly issues)
prior to the day of the opening of the bids. Such proposals shall be
accompanied by a certified check for such amount as the board shall
decide upon, to guarantee a compliance with the bid and shall be opened
in public at the time and place designated in the notice. The contract
shall be awarded to the lowest and best responsible bidder: PROVIDED,
That the board shall have authority to reject any or all bids, in which
event they shall readvertise for bids and, when no satisfactory bid is
then received and with the written approval of the director, may
proceed to construct the works by force account.)) (1) Except for any
contract with a total cost of less than five thousand dollars and as
otherwise provided in this section, contracts for construction or
maintenance, or for labor or materials used in the construction or
maintenance of any improvement authorized by the district, may only be
awarded through a public bidding process that complies with the
following:
(a) Notices calling for sealed bid proposals must be published in
at least one newspaper of general circulation in the district. The
notices must be published at least once fourteen or more days before
the deadline for submitting proposals;
(b) Bid proposals must be in writing, must be filed at the location
specified in the notice, and must be opened and read in public by the
board or its designee at a time and location also specified in the
notice. Proposals must be filed in the official records of the
district and available for public inspection. Proposals also must be
accompanied by a bid proposal deposit, in the form of cash, a certified
check, a cashier's check, or a surety bond, equaling five percent of
the total cost of the project; and
(c) No fewer than three bid proposals are required for contracts
awarded through the public bidding process set out in this section,
unless three bidders are not available.
(2) If the successful bidder fails to enter into a contract and
fails to furnish a satisfactory performance bond within the time
specifications established by the district, the bid proposal deposit
must be forfeited to the district.
(3) The contract must be awarded to the lowest and best responsible
bidder, except that the board may reject any and all bids. If the
board rejects one or more bids, the board must submit a new notice
calling for sealed bid proposals that complies with subsection (1)(a)
of this section.
(4) If a satisfactory bid is not received under this section, the
district may complete the project by an agreed price or force account.
(5) In the letting of any contract under this section with a total
cost of less than fifty thousand dollars, advertisement and competitive
bidding may be dispensed with by order of the board.
(6) This section does not restrict a district from: (a) Using
volunteer labor and equipment on improvements and providing
reimbursement for actual expenses; or (b) entering into an interlocal
agreement for district construction, maintenance, or other work with a
county, city, or other governmental entity.

Sec. 3 RCW 86.09.181 and 1965 c 26 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person((, except the state of Washington and the United
States,)) acting under the provisions of this chapter, to whom ((or to
which)) a contract ((may have)) of at least five thousand dollars has
been awarded by the district for construction ((purposes)),
maintenance, or ((for)) labor ((or materials entering therein when the
total amount to be paid therefor exceeds one thousand dollars)), shall
enter into a bond to the ((state of Washington)) district, with good
and sufficient sureties((, to be approved and filed with the state
director,)) for one hundred percent of the contract price, conditioned
for the faithful performance of said contract and with ((such)) further
conditions as may be required by law.
(2) This section does not apply to district contracts awarded to
the United States, the state of Washington, or counties and cities
within the state of Washington.

Sec. 4 RCW 86.09.259 and 1985 c 396 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
A flood control district shall be managed by a board of directors
consisting of three members. The initial directors shall be appointed,
and the elected directors elected, as provided in chapter 85.38 RCW.
The directors shall elect a ((chairman)) chair and vice chair from
their number ((and shall either)). The directors may elect ((one of))
a secretary from their number((, or appoint a voter of the district, as
secretary)) to hold office at ((its)) the board's pleasure and who
shall keep a record of its proceedings. In accordance with RCW
86.09.268, the directors may also appoint and employ a secretary.

Sec. 5 RCW 86.09.268 and 1937 c 72 s 90 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall ((have the power and it shall be its duty to adopt
a seal of the district, to)):
(1) Manage and conduct the business affairs of the district, ((to))
including holding regular meetings at least once each year;
(2) Employ and appoint ((such)) agents, engineers, attorneys,
officers, and employees as may be necessary, and prescribe their
duties((, to));
(3) Establish reasonable ((bylaws,)) rules and regulations for the
government and management of affairs of the district((, and));
(4) Hold open meetings in accordance with chapter 42.30 RCW; and
(5) Generally to perform any and all acts necessary to carry out
the purpose of the district organization.

Sec. 6 RCW 86.09.271 and 1985 c 396 s 59 are each amended to read
as follows:
The office of the directors and principal place of business of the
district shall be located, if possible, at some place within the
district to be designated by the board. If a place convenient and
suitable for conducting district business and public hearings required
by this chapter cannot be found within the district, the office may be
located in the county within which the major portion of district lands
is situated. ((The office and place of business cannot thereafter be
changed, except with the previous written consent of the county
legislative authority of the county within which the major portion of
the district is situated, and without passing a resolution to that
effect at a previous regular meeting of the board, entered in the
minutes thereof and without posting a notice of the change in a
conspicuous public place at or near the place of business which is to
be changed at least ten days prior thereto and by the previous posting
of a copy of the notice for the same length of time at or near the new
location of the office.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 86.09.274 (Board of directors -- Meetings -- Change of date)
and 1985 c 396 s 60 & 1937 c 72 s 92;
(2) RCW 86.09.277 (Board of directors -- Special meetings -- When
notice required -- Authorized business) and 1937 c 72 s 93; and
(3) RCW 86.09.280 (Board of directors -- Meetings and records
public -- Printing of bylaws and rules) and 1937 c 72 s 94.

--- END ---