BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that in the past
government has allowed taxpayer resources to be invested in
public-private partnerships to build large stadiums where the private
entity contracted for the right to name the facility. The legislature
intends to provide additional opportunities for individuals to purchase
naming rights for facilities as a mechanism to alleviate the burden of
ongoing cost escalation on taxpayers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act shall be known and cited as the
facilities naming act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" includes all state and local entities funded directly
by taxpayer dollars including, but not limited to:
(a) Any state board, bureau, commission, committee, court,
department, division, educational institution, office, or other state
agency and its subdivisions that were created by or pursuant to
statute; and
(b) Any county, city, library, municipal corporation,
quasi-municipal corporation, school district, special purpose district,
town, or political subdivision of the state of Washington or its
subdivisions.
(2) "Facility" means any agency-owned real or personal property,
including but not limited to rooms, buildings, structures,
infrastructure, bridges, docks, parks, transportation corridors, or
portions thereof.
(3) "Naming right" means the contractual right provided to a person
to designate what name a facility will be known as, and provides the
ability to place appropriate signage of the name on or near the
facility. Each naming right must be time-limited.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Each agency is authorized to create
rules, regulations, or ordinances using its normal public process to
name or rename facilities, or portions thereof, that are under the
control of the agency unless there is a conflicting provision within
the Revised Code of Washington. In situations where there is a
conflicting section of the Revised Code of Washington naming a
facility, the provisions of this chapter are secondary or supplanted.
The agency adopted rules, regulations, or ordinances and all agency-issued contracts authorizing the naming of facilities must contain
provisions to prevent use of names that may be offensive, indecent,
discriminatory, illegal, or result in censure or subject the agency to
shame or reproach.
(2) An agency may sell the naming right of a facility or portions
thereof if the agency's rules, ordinances, or regulations establish how
the fee or charge for the naming right will be established and includes
a sales process that is public and competitive.
(a) Any fee or charge for the naming right established pursuant to
this section must be established to minimally recover the costs to
provide the naming right. The amount may also include a market rate or
be sold at auction to optimize the amount of money the agency recovers
for the naming right.
(b) Any naming right that is paid for must be for a time duration
established in a written contract with an initial period not longer
than five years. The initial contract period may be renewed for
additional years, but not for time periods longer than five years.
(c) Purchasers of the naming right are responsible for paying for
all expenses necessary to implement the name change, including physical
signage. The agency must approve all physical sign changes before
installment of signs on the facility.
(3) Any revenue generated from the sale of a naming right must be
used to pay for debt, improvements, operations, or maintenance for the
named facility. It is the obligation of the agency to document and
apply the revenue in accordance with this section and the state
administrative and accounting manual.
(4) An agency should not offer to sell naming rights of a facility
if such rights would create a legal conflict with tenants or lessees of
the facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The office of the governor may create a
single set of rules authorizing the sale of naming rights by all
executive branch agencies. Such rules may not be created using the
negotiated rule-making process in RCW 34.05.310, the emergency rule-making process in RCW 34.05.350, or the expedited rule-making process
in RCW 34.05.353.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.34.090 and 2002 c 164 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in chapter 42.-- RCW (the new chapter
created in section 7 of this act), the legislature shall approve names
for new or existing buildings on the state capitol grounds based upon
recommendations from the state capitol committee and the director of
the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services, with
the advice of the capitol campus design advisory committee, subject to
the following limitations:
(a) An existing building may be renamed only after a substantial
renovation or a change in the predominant tenant agency headquartered
in the building.
(b) A new or existing building may be named or renamed after:
(i) An individual who has played a significant role in Washington
history;
(ii) The purpose of the building;
(iii) The single or predominant tenant agency headquartered in the
building;
(iv) A significant place name or natural place in Washington;
(v) A Native American tribe located in Washington;
(vi) A group of people or type of person;
(vii) Any other appropriate person consistent with this section as
recommended by the director of the department of ((general
administration)) enterprise services.
(c) The names on the facades of the state capitol group shall not
be removed.
(2) The legislature shall approve names for new or existing public
rooms or spaces on the west capitol campus based upon recommendations
from the state capitol committee and the director of the department of
((general administration)) enterprise services, with the advice of the
capitol campus design advisory committee, subject to the following
limitations:
(a) An existing room or space may be renamed only after a
substantial renovation;
(b) A new or existing room or space may be named or renamed only
after:
(i) An individual who has played a significant role in Washington
history;
(ii) The purpose of the room or space;
(iii) A significant place name or natural place in Washington;
(iv) A Native American tribe located in Washington;
(v) A group of people or type of person;
(vi) Any other appropriate person consistent with this section as
recommended by the director of the department of ((general
administration)) enterprise services.
(3) When naming or renaming buildings, rooms, and spaces under this
section, consideration must be given to: (a) Any disparity that exists
with respect to the gender of persons after whom buildings, rooms, and
spaces are named on the state capitol grounds; (b) the diversity of
human achievement; and (c) the diversity of the state's citizenry and
history.
(4) This section does not apply if an agency as defined in section
3 of this act chooses to sell a naming right in accordance with section
4 of this act.
(5) For purposes of this section, "state capitol grounds" means
buildings and land owned by the state and otherwise designated as state
capitol grounds, including the west capitol campus, the east capitol
campus, the north capitol campus, the Tumwater campus, the Lacey
campus, Sylvester Park, Centennial Park, the Old Capitol Building, and
Capitol Lake.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 42 RCW.

--- END ---