BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A budget is hereby adopted and, subject
to the provisions set forth in the following sections, the several
amounts specified in parts I through IX of this act, or so much thereof
as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are
hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for salaries, wages,
and other expenses of the agencies and offices of the state and for
other specified purposes for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1,
2013, and ending June 30, 2015, except as otherwise provided, out of
the several funds of the state hereinafter named.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2014" or "FY 2014" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2014.
(b) "Fiscal year 2015" or "FY 2015" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2015.
(c) "FTE" means full time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in
this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified
purpose which is not expended subject to the specified conditions and
limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,797,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,192,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,765,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,754,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $8,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $7,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for member
reimbursement, staff support, or other expenses associated with the
work of the joint legislative executive committee on planning for aging
and disability issues that is established in section 130 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE SENATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,158,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,489,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,514,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,161,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $8,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $7,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for member
reimbursement, staff support, or other expenses associated with the
work of the joint legislative executive committee on planning for aging
and disability issues that is established in section 130 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW
COMMITTEE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $119,000
Performance Audits of Government Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,641,000
Medical Aid Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $332,000
Accident Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $332,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,486,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the joint
legislative audit and review committee may adjust the due dates for
projects included on the committee's 2013-15 work plan as necessary to
efficiently manage workload.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct
an audit of Washington's state research universities. The purpose of
the audit is to identify cost and profit centers within, and in
partnership with, the research universities. The audit must focus on
public funds; student fees, in particular tuition; and auxiliary
enterprises, which for the purposes of the audit at the University of
Washington includes University of Washington medical center, the
internal lending program, the W fund, and the center for
commercialization. The audit at each university much achieve the
following:
(a) Assess the university's policies and practices for tracking
per-student expenditures for instruction and identify the average
amount per student that the university has spent on instruction for
undergraduate students in each of the past five fiscal years;
(b) Obtain the university's definition of auxiliary enterprises and
determine the number of auxiliary enterprises, including the University
of Washington medical center, the University of Washington internal
lending program, the W fund, and the center for commercialization, that
exist in the university system, the methods the university uses to
track revenue and expenditures of auxiliary enterprises, and the
policies and practices the university has in place to ensure that state
funding is not used to supplement or guarantee projects or programs
authorized by auxiliary enterprises;
(c) Identify how much money is being spent on undergraduate
education and to what extent undergraduate education is subsidizing
graduate education; and
(d) Determine how tuition funds are being used and to what extent
they are being used to fund the University of Washington medical
center, the University of Washington internal lending program, the W
fund, and the center for commercialization and to back bonds authorized
by the university.
(3) $332,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation and
$332,000 of the accident account--state appropriation are provided for
the purposes of chapter 37, Laws of 2011 (workers' compensation).
(4) $323,000 of the performance audits of government account--state
appropriation is provided for consultant and staff costs related to the
economic analysis of tax preferences as directed by chapter 43.136 RCW.
(5) The committee shall analyze the incidence and level of taxation
and business incentives available to the financial services industry in
Washington State, and identify the relative differences in taxes and
business incentives compared to California. A report shall be provided
to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2014.
(6) By June 30, 2014, the committee shall conduct a study of the
electricity cost impacts for each qualifying utility to meet the 2016
and 2020 renewable resource and conservation targets under chapter
19.285 RCW. The study must also include an analysis of the impacts on
each utility's commercial, industrial, and residential customers,
including an additional analysis of the impacts on low-income
residential customers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,653,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,814,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,467,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS
COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,004,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,988,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,992,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,534,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,895,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,116,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,011,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 FOR THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT
SERVICES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,686,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,695,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,381,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES
In order to achieve operating efficiencies within the financial
resources available to the legislative branch, the executive rules
committee of the house of representatives and the facilities and
operations committee of the senate by joint action may transfer funds
among the house of representatives, senate, joint legislative audit and
review committee, legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee, joint transportation committee, office of the state actuary,
joint legislative systems committee, statute law committee, and office
of legislative support services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,911,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,857,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,768,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,481,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,471,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,952,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,068,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $996,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,064,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,795,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,732,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,527,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,770,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,562,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,125,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $658,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,737,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,691,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,543,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,500,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for development and implementation of
the information network hub project.
(2) $2,138,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for replacement of computer equipment,
including servers, routers, and storage system upgrades.
(3) The administrative office of the courts, in conjunction with
the office of the chief information officer, shall analyze the
feasibility and associated costs of moving the judicial branch servers
and data center equipment to the state data center. Amounts provided
in subsections (1) and (2) of this section may not be expended until
the office of the chief information officer approves the expenditures.
(4) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions
from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to
section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs
for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW
43.135.060.
(5) $1,199,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for replacing computer equipment at
state courts and state judicial agencies.
(6) $108,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $108,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1159 (superior court judges Whatcom county). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse. The funds provided in this subsection shall be expended
only if the fourth superior court judge position in Whatcom county is
appointed and serving on the bench.
(7) $108,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $108,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1175 (superior court judges Benton/Franklin counties). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse. The funds provided in this subsection shall be
expended only if the seventh superior court judge position in Benton
and Franklin counties jointly is appointed and serving on the bench.
(8) $11,300,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for continued implementation of the
superior court case management system project. The administrative
office of the courts, in consultation with the judicial information
systems committee, the superior court case management system project
steering committee, and the office of the chief information officer
shall develop a revised charter to implement the next phases of the
superior court case management system. The revised charter shall
insure that the superior court case management system project steering
committee continues to provide contract oversight, in collaboration
with the judicial information system committee, through the
implementation period and various phases of the project. Oversight
responsibilities throughout the various phases of the project must
include, but are not limited to, vendor management, contract and
deliverable management, and assuring satisfaction of the business and
technical needs at the local level. The superior court case management
system project steering committee may solicit input from user groups as
deemed appropriate. The revised charter shall be approved by the
judicial information systems committee.
(9) $1,399,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,399,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for school districts for petitions
to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030
and 28A.225.035. The administrator for the courts shall develop an
interagency agreement with the superintendent of public instruction to
allocate the funding provided in this subsection. Allocation of this
money to school districts shall be based on the number of petitions
filed. This funding includes amounts school districts may expend on
the cost of serving petitions filed under RCW 28A.225.030 by certified
mail or by personal service or for the performance of service of
process for any hearing associated with RCW 28A.225.030.
(10)(a) $7,313,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $7,313,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for distribution
to county juvenile court administrators to fund the costs of processing
truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions.
The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile
court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution
formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher than
average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties
with lower than average per-petition processing costs.
(b) Each fiscal year during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives and senate fiscal committees no later than
60 days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are deemed
informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing
funds.
(11) $274,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $274,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the office of public
guardianship to continue guardianship services for those low-income
incapacitated persons who were receiving services on June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,460,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,774,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,648,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,034,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The amounts provided include funding for expert and
investigative services in death penalty personal restraint petitions.
(2) $3,378,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely to expand the parents representation
program into Asotin, Columbia, Garfield, King, Whatcom, and Whitman
counties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,862,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,870,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,454,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,186,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and an amount
not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 may be used to provide telephonic legal advice and
assistance to otherwise eligible persons who are sixty years of age or
older on matters authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k)
regardless of household income or asset level.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,690,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,232,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,922,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,000,000 of the economic development strategic reserve
account appropriation is provided solely for efforts to assist with
currently active industrial recruitment efforts that will bring new
jobs to the state or will retain headquarter locations of major
companies currently housed in the state.
(2) $684,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $684,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the office of the education
ombudsman.
(3) $239,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5802 (greenhouse gas emissions). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $654,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $660,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,404,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,082,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,022,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,104,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,585,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,804,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,425,000
Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and Access
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,369,000
Charitable Organization Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $364,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,475,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,018,000
Washington State Heritage Center Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,860,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,900,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,301,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2)(a) $1,847,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $1,926,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. The
funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the
amount provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall
be required to raise contributions or commitments to make
contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent
of the state contribution. The office of the secretary of state may
make full or partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have
been satisfactorily documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(3) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and
Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to
the funding for the library as a whole.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121 FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $253,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $249,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $502,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office shall assist the department of
enterprise services on providing the government-to-government training
sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees.
The training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal
issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the
training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the
participants of each session. The department of enterprise services
shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the
training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the
training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC
AMERICAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $213,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $421,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123 FOR THE STATE TREASURER
State Treasurer's Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,702,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $150,000 of the state treasurer's service
account--state appropriation is provided solely for legal fees related
to additional legal assistance due to changes in federal financial
regulations and an increase in complex and high profile litigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124 FOR THE STATE AUDITOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $728,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $733,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,589,000
Performance Audit of Government Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,108,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Audits of school districts by the division of municipal
corporations shall include findings regarding the accuracy of: (a)
Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience and education of the
district's certified instructional staff, as reported to the
superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.
(2) $728,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $733,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for staff and related costs to
verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for
state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state
funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state
funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is
not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits;
and to assist the state special education safety net committee when
requested.
(3) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the state
auditor shall continue to complete the annual audit of the state's
comprehensive annual financial report and the annual federal single
audit consistent with the auditing standards generally accepted in the
United States and the standards applicable to financial audits
contained in government auditing standards, issued by the comptroller
general of the United States, and OMB circular A-133, audits of states,
local governments, and nonprofit organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 125 FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES
FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $141,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $172,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $313,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 126 FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,456,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,172,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,114,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $999,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $191,670,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $271,000
Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,279,000
Public Services Revolving Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,093,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,054,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the
legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management,
the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing
the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown
by division of division administration expenses.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations.
(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements
and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the
nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for
the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed
electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The
report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.
(4) The executive ethics board shall: (a) Develop a statewide
plan, with performance measures, to provide overall direction and
accountability in all executive branch agencies and statewide elected
offices; (b) coordinate and work with the commission on judicial
conduct and the legislative ethics board; (c) assess and evaluate each
agency's ethical culture through employee and stakeholder surveys,
review Washington state quality award feedback reports, and publish an
annual report on the results to the public; and (d) solicit outside
evaluations, studies, and recommendations for improvements from
academics, nonprofit organizations, the public disclosure commission,
or other entities with expertise in ethics, integrity, and the public
sector.
(5) $424,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for replacement of a portion of the
computers. The amount provided in this subsection is conditioned on
the department satisfying the requirements of the project management
oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief
information officer and the provisions of section 945 of this act,
personal computer acquisition and replacement.
(6) $609,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for upgrades to software programs.
The amount provided in this subsection is conditioned on the department
satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight
standards and policies established by the office of the chief
information officer.
(7) $131,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5405 (extended foster care). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(8) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1341 (wrongful imprisonment). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(9) $189,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1420 (transportation improvement projects). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(10) $2,093,000 of the public service revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the work of the public counsel
section of the office of the attorney general.
(11) $353,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $353,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a grant to the Washington
coalition of crime victim advocates to provide training, certification,
and technical assistance for crime victim service center advocates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 127 FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,260,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,233,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,493,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 128 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,831,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,094,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $265,034,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,646,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,242,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $445,000
Lead Paint Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Home Security Fund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,456,000
Affordable Housing for All Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,916,000
Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes Investigation
and Prosecution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $969,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,882,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,303,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,599,000
Prostitution Prevention and Intervention Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $985,000
Washington Community Technology Opportunity Account--
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Liquor Revolving Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,605,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $486,275,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance
program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall
be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account
balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans,
and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed
under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the
terms included in the original loan agreements.
(2) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a grant to resolution
Washington to building statewide capacity for alternative dispute
resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that
citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to
litigation.
(3) $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior
volunteer program.
(4) The department shall administer its growth management act
technical assistance so that smaller cities receive proportionately
more assistance than larger cities or counties.
(5) $1,800,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided for transitional housing assistance or partial payments for
rental assistance under the independent youth housing program.
(6) $5,000,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
for the operation, repair, and staffing of shelters in the homeless
family shelter program.
(7) $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington new Americans
program.
(8) $2,949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $2,949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for associate development
organizations.
(9) $234,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $233,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington asset building
coalitions.
(10) $32,027,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $32,027,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the
essential needs and housing support program created in chapter 36, 2011
1st sp. sess. The department of commerce shall contract for these
services with counties or community-based organizations involved in
providing essential needs and housing supports to low-income persons
who meet eligibility pursuant to chapter 36, 2011 1st sp. sess. The
department shall limit the funding used for administration of the
program to no more than five percent. Counties and community
providers shall limit the funding used for administration of the
program to no more than seven percent.
(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $5,000,000 is
provided solely for essential needs to clients who meet the eligibility
established in chapter 36, 2011 1st sp. sess. Counties and
community-based organizations shall distribute basic essential products
in a manner that prevents abuse. To the greatest extent possible, the
counties or community-based organizations shall leverage local or
private funds, and volunteer support to acquire and distribute the
basic essential products.
(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $59,000,000 is
provided solely for housing support services to individuals who are
homeless or who may become homeless, and are eligible for services
under this program pursuant to chapter 36, 2011 1st sp. sess.
(11) $5,605,000 of the liquor revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with
the municipal research and services center of Washington.
(12) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the purposes of purchasing
contracted services to expand and promote the tourism industry in the
state of Washington.
(a) The department must contract with the Washington tourism
alliance. Expenditure of state moneys is contingent upon the
contractor providing a dollar for dollar cash or in-kind match.
Funding must be provided for the following services:
(i) Serving as a central point of contact through developing and
maintaining a web portal for Washington tourism, operating a call
center, and mailing travel guides;
(ii) Promoting Washington as a tourism destination to national and
international markets, with emphasis on markets in Europe and Asia;
(iii) Providing information to businesses and local communities on
tourism opportunities that could expand local revenues; and
(iv) Conducting tourism-related research, including market research
and measuring the return on investment of funded activities.
(b) The department may not use more than 4 percent of the funds to
administer, monitor, and report the outcomes of the services. The
department must electronically submit performance metrics by January 1,
2014, and report the outcomes of the services by January 1, 2015, to
the economic development committees of the legislature.
(c) The department has the authority to designate one or more
alternative contractors if necessary due to performance or other
significant issues. Such change must only be made after consultation
with the Washington tourism alliance, the governor's office, and the
chairs and ranking members of the economic development committees of
the legislature.
(13) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the purposes of expanding
foreign trade offices and providing sector-based export assistance to
businesses. The department must engage Oregon, Idaho, Montana, Alaska,
Hawaii, British Columbia, Alberta, Saskatchewan, and Yukon as well as
associate development organizations, the small business development
centers export readiness centers, the export finance assistance center
of Washington, chambers of commerce, international trade organizations,
and ports to leverage the funds provided and maximize the investment in
foreign outreach. For each dollar expended the department must receive
a one hundred percent match. The match may be provided by the
department through nongeneral fund sources, or any partnering
governments or organizations. The department must develop performance
metrics and measure at a minimum, business hand-offs between partners
for the provision of additional services, the number of assisted
businesses, the number of assisted businesses that export, and the
amount of assisted export sales. The measurements must also include an
analysis of the sectors served and results.
(14) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for facilitating technology
transfer and commercialization activities, and supporting business
growth in technology sectors.
(a) The department must contract with the innovate Washington
foundation. Expenditure of state moneys must be provided for following
services:
(i) Supporting businesses in securing federal and private funds to
support product research and commercialization, developing and
integrating technology in new or enhanced products and services, and
launching those products and services in sustainable businesses in the
state;
(ii) Establishing public-private partnerships and programmatic
activities that increase the competitiveness of state industries;
(iii) Working with utilities, district energy providers, the
utilities and transportation commission, and the state energy office to
improve the alignment of investments in clean energy technologies with
existing state policies;
(iv) Administering technology and innovation grant and loan
programs including bridge funding programs for the state's technology
sector;
(v) Working with impact Washington to ensure that customers have
ready access to each other's services; and
(vi) Reaching out to firms operating in the state's innovation
partnership zones.
(b) The department may not use more than 4 percent of the funds to
administer, monitor, and report the outcomes of the services provided.
The department must electronically submit performance metrics by
January 1, 2014, and report the outcomes of the services by January 1,
2015, to the economic development committees of the legislature.
(15) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to the northwest agriculture
business center. Expenditure of state moneys is contingent upon the
northwest agriculture business center providing a fifty percent cash
match for each state dollar.
(16) $72,000 of the prostitution prevention and intervention
account is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1291 (sex trade victims). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $49,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $49,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill
No. 1818 (business and government streamlining). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(18) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the department to conduct an economic
cluster analysis of the policies impacting the financial services
sector with the objective of building and strengthening the industry's
presence in Washington. The department shall examine regulatory,
workforce, tax and infrastructure issues and determine strategies to
encourage the industry, including private equity, wealth management,
and hedge firms and related entities from other states and
internationally to locate in Washington. The department shall report
to the legislature by December 1, 2013, with recommendations for
legislative action.
(19) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the department to develop an
economic cluster strategy to leverage the state's unique maritime
assets, geography, history, and infrastructure. Goals include growing
employment, targeted economic activity, environmental considerations,
tax revenue to state and local governments, and quality of life
associated with the maritime sector by working with the industry to
understand workforce needs, parity considerations with Oregon and
British Columbia, and tax structure and regulatory barriers. The
department will report its findings to the appropriate committees of
the legislature no later than December 1, 2014.
(20) $2,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department of commerce for
services to homeless families through the Washington families fund.
(21) $5,000,000 of the home security account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the department of commerce to provide emergency
assistance to homeless families in the temporary assistance for needy
families program.
(22) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the department to convene a workgroup
consisting of the former members of the Washington economic development
commission. The workgroup shall meet a minimum of two times to provide
advice and input to the director, governor, and legislature on the
economic development strategy for the state. The workgroup may also
recommend methods to provide future input on economic development
strategies and initiatives for the state within available department
resources.
(23) $4,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for purposes of creating and
operating a community health care and education and innovation center
at the Pacific Medical Center in Seattle. Amounts provided in this
subsection must be used for lease, maintenance, operations, and other
required related expenses for Seattle community colleges allied health
programs and other related uses identified by the department of
commerce. The department is authorized to enter into a thirty-year
lease for the Pacific Medical Center property.
(24) Within the appropriations in this section, the department
shall, by December 1, 2013, develop a comprehensive start-up Washington
strategy to facilitate the growth of start-ups and enhance the state's
competitiveness in recruiting and retaining businesses that start up in
Washington. This shall include but is not limited to: B&O tax relief,
capital investment, regulatory burdens, workforce and infrastructure
needs and support. Start-up businesses interactions with state
government and other public entities as a customer shall also be
considered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 129 FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST
COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $764,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $803,000
Lottery Administrative Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,617,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 130 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,258,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,749,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,341,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $370,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $289,000
Personnel Service Fund--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,670,000
Data Processing Revolving Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,023,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,497,000
Performance Audits of Government Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,197,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The office of financial management shall prepare a report
outlining alternative methods of procuring health benefits for home
care workers, including individual providers and agency providers. In
preparing the report, the office of financial management shall consult
with the department of social and health services, representatives of
individual home care providers, and agency home care providers.
Along with a summary of the current method of providing benefits,
the report must include an analysis of the policy and fiscal
implications of accessing health benefits through the Washington health
benefits exchange. The report must also provide an analysis of a
medicaid section 1115 waiver with the federal centers for medicare and
medicaid services that would provide additional medicaid matching funds
for individual provider home care workers who are provided with health
care benefits through a collective bargaining agreement negotiated with
the state under chapter 74.39A RCW, but would otherwise be eligible for
medicaid under the federal expanded eligibility provisions that take
effect January 1, 2014.
The report must be submitted to the appropriate fiscal committees
of the legislature by January 6, 2014.
(2) $39,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $7,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for member reimbursement, staff
support, or other expenses associated with the work of the joint
legislative executive committee on planning for aging and disability
issues that is established by this subsection.
(a) A joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability
is established, with members as provided in this subsection.
(i) Four members of the senate, with the leaders of the two largest
caucuses each appointing two members. Four members of the house of
representatives, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each
appointing two members;
(ii) A member from the office of the governor, appointed by the
governor;
(iii) The secretary of the department of social and health services
or his or her designee;
(iv) The director of the health care authority or his or her
designee; and
(v) The director of the department of retirement systems or his or
her designee.
(b) The committee must convene by September 1, 2013. At the first
meeting, the committee will select cochairs from among its members who
are legislators. All meetings of the committee are open to the public.
(c) The purpose of the committee is to identify key strategic
actions to prepare for the aging of the population in Washington,
including state budget and policy options, by conducting at least, but
not limited to, the following tasks:
(i) Establish a profile of Washington's current population of older
people and people with disabilities and a projection of population
growth through 2030;
(ii) Establish an inventory of services and supports currently
available to older people and people with disabilities from the health
care and long-term services and support systems and other community
resources such as housing, transportation, income support, and
protection for vulnerable adults;
(iii) Identify state budget and policy options to more effectively
use state, federal and private resources to, over time, reduce the
growth rate in state expenditures that would otherwise occur by
continuing current policy in light of significant population growth;
(iv) Identify strategies to better serve the health care needs of
an aging population and people with disabilities, and promote healthy
living;
(v) Identify policy options to create financing mechanisms for
long-term services and supports that will promote additional private
responsibility for individuals and families to meet their needs for
service;
(vi) Identify policies to promote financial security in retirement,
support people who wish to stay in the workplace longer, and expand the
availability of workplace retirement savings plans; and
(vii) Identify policy options to help communities adapt to the
aging demographic in planning for housing, land use and transportation.
(d) The committee shall consult with the office of the insurance
commissioner, the caseload forecast council, and other appropriate
entities with specialized knowledge of the needs and growth trends of
the aging population and people with disabilities.
(e) Staff support for the committee shall be provided by the office
of program research, senate committee services, the office of financial
management, and the department of social and health services. The
committee members may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized
under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter 44.04 RCW as
appropriate.
(f) The committee shall issue an interim report to the legislature
by December 10, 2013, and issue final recommendations to the governor
and relevant standing committees of the legislature by December 10,
2014.
(3) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5802 (greenhouse gas emissions). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $536,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for a study of the state's medical and
public assistance eligibility systems and infrastructure with the goal
of simplifying procedures, improving customer service, and reducing
state expenditures. The study must also examine which state entities
play various roles in the eligibility and data verification processes
in order to determine if eligibility processes can be further
streamlined in light of changes related to the federal affordable care
act. The study must identify how costs will be allocated between state
and federal funding sources and options for maximizing federal
participation. The office of financial management shall provide a
report on its findings and recommendations to the relevant policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature by January 1, 2014.
(5)(a) The legislature finds that the state's nationally recognized
student achievement initiative has led to significant improvements at
two-year institutions of higher education. With the goal of creating
such efficiencies within the four-year institutions of higher
education, the office of financial management shall convene, in
coordination with the joint committee on higher education and the
student achievement council, a technical incentive funding model task
force to propose an incentive funding model for the four-year
institutions of higher education. The model will provide new incentive
funding to four-year institutions of higher education that demonstrate
improvement on existing performance measures and control resident
undergraduate tuition growth. Participation in the program is
voluntary; however, funding appropriated for this program shall only be
available to those institutions that have chosen to participate in the
program.
(b) The task force must include the following members:
(i) One representative from the student achievement council;
(ii) One representative from the education data center created in
RCW 43.41.400; and
(iii) One representative from each of the four-year institutions of
higher education.
(c) The program shall include, but shall not be limited to:
(i) A system for allocating new incentive funding to participating
institutions based on an institution's:
(A) Performance in specific metrics;
(B) Control and reduction where possible of resident undergraduate
and graduate tuition; and
(C) Efficient utilization of classrooms laboratories, online and
other high technology instructional methods.
(ii) A methodology for allocating funding for performance as
specified in (c)(i)(A) of this subsection that is based on performance
metrics reported in the accountability monitoring and reporting system
established in RCW 28B.77.090 and that recognizes each institution's
unique mission by measuring each institution's performance in these
metrics against their past performance.
(iii) A methodology for investing any unallocated incentive funds
to the state need grant program created in chapter 28B.92 RCW to expand
access to low-income and underserved student populations; and
(iv) A methodology for establishing a baseline level of state
funding that:
(A) Fully supports the state's need for an increasing portion of
its citizens to gain post-secondary education and qualifications;
(B) Recognizes the acute need of the state's high-technology
economy for a sufficient number of graduates in high employer demand
programs of study;
(C) Achieves a more equitable share of support between the state
and students and their families; and
(D) Provides for funding enhancements based on demonstrated
improvements in institutional performance within the educational
achievement and tuition reduction incentive program.
(d) The workgroup shall submit a final report containing an
incentive funding model to the governor and higher education and fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 31, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 131 FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,826,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,826,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $151,000 of the administrative hearings
revolving account--state appropriation is provided solely for
replacement of computer equipment, including servers, routers, and
storage system upgrades. The amount provided in this subsection is
conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the
project management oversight standards and policies established by the
office of the chief information officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 132 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY
Lottery Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,745,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $596,000 of the lottery administrative account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of the lottery's
gaming systems vendor contract.
(2) No portion of this appropriation may be used for acquisition of
gaming system capabilities that violates state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 133 FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $238,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $236,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $474,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 134 FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $233,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $458,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 135 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,877,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $72,000 of the department of retirement
systems expense account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
administrative costs associated with implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2018 (regarding additional contribution rates for employers of
the Washington state retirement systems). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 136 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,228,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,688,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,111,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $132,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,000
Master License Fund--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,145,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $244,397,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of revenue is authorized to increase the master
application fee to nineteen dollars and the renewal fee to eleven
dollars consistent with RCW 19.02.075.
(2) $604,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $6,147,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $4,853,000 of the master license fund--state
appropriation are provided solely for the replacement of the
department's legacy business systems. The amounts provided in this
subsection are conditioned on the department satisfying the
requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies
established by the office of the chief information officer.
(3) Within the amounts appropriated within this section, the
department shall ensure agents of sellers collect and remit the taxes
imposed on retail sales under Title 82 RCW, regardless of whether or
not the agent has actual or constructive possession or control of the
property, product, or services sold.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 137 FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,217,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,182,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,399,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 138 FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S
BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
OMWBE Enterprises Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,083,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $200,000 of the minority and women's
business enterprises account--state appropriation is provided for
implementation of a certification program for small business
enterprises. The agency will collaborate with the department of
transportation to certify small businesses as small business
enterprises. Funding for this work is provided through interagency
agreement with the state department of transportation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 139 FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,497,000
Health Benefit Exchange Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $676,000
Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,631,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,104,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $676,000 of the health benefit exchange
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1947 (Washington health benefit exchange).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 140 FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD
State Investment Board Expense Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,063,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 141 FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,269,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $945,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,239,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,494,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the liquor control board to implement Initiative
Measure No. 502.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section from the liquor
revolving account--state appropriation, the liquor control board must
work with the department of revenue, the department of health, and
affected stakeholders to develop proposed legislation regarding the
integration of a regulated medical marijuana market with the
recreational marijuana market.
At minimum, the proposed legislation should address the following:
(a) Agency requirements to regulate medical marijuana and health
care providers and administer and collect taxes;
(b) Licensing and regulation provisions for medical marijuana
producers, processors, and retailers;
(c) Regulations regarding the oversight of health care
professionals that authorize the use of medical marijuana for their
patients;
(d) Rules regarding collective gardens, possession amounts, and age
limits; and
(e) Implementation of a tax structure for the medical marijuana
market.
The board shall submit the proposed legislation to the legislature by
December 15, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 142 FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,231,000
Public Service Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,080,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,413,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,940,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,814,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The commission shall work with the Idaho
public utilities commission and the public utility commission of Oregon
to identify common regulatory functions that can be performed jointly,
with the goal of formalizing an agreement that protects essential
services while increasing regulatory effectiveness and efficiencies
through economies of scale. The commission is authorized to enter into
an agreement with such other state public utility commissions to work
jointly in administering specified respective regulatory functions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,880,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,887,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,187,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,518,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,539,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,253,000
Military Department Rent and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $615,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,995,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $274,874,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $14,539,000 of the disaster response account -- state
appropriation and $53,253,000 of the disaster response account--federal
appropriation may be spent only on disasters declared by the governor
and with the approval of the office of financial management. The
military department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees on October 1st and
February 1st of each year detailing information on the disaster
response account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into
the account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting
date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2014-2015
biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.
(2) $75,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee; and
(b) The department shall submit an annual report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; and incremental changes from the
previous estimate.
(3) $200,000 of worker and community right-to-know--state
appropriation is provided solely to establish one FTE to initiate and
coordinate a statewide continuity of operations program for state
government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 144 FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,977,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,042,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $521,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,305,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,845,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.145 FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
Certified Public Accountants' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,702,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 146 FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL
Death Investigations Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $498,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $250,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is
provided solely for providing financial assistance to local
jurisdictions in multiple death investigations. The forensic
investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding these funds
for multiple death investigations involving an unanticipated,
extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving multiple
jurisdictions.
(2) $210,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is
provided solely for providing financial assistance to local
jurisdictions in identifying human remains.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 147 FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION
Horse Racing Commission Operating Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,558,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the commission
is authorized to increase licensing fees by up to five percent in
fiscal year 2014 and up to five percent in fiscal year 2015; and
background check fees by up to one dollar in fiscal year 2014, and up
to one dollar in fiscal year 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 148 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,654,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,635,000
Building Code Council Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,576,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,865,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $3,286,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the payment of facilities and
services charges, utilities and contracts charges, public and historic
facilities charges, and capital projects surcharges allocable to the
senate, house of representatives, statute law committee, and joint
legislative systems committee. The department shall allocate charges
attributable to these agencies among the affected revolving funds. The
department shall maintain an interagency agreement with these agencies
to establish performance standards, prioritization of preservation and
capital improvement projects, and quality assurance provisions for the
delivery of services under this subsection. The legislative agencies
named in this subsection shall continue to enjoy all of the same rights
of occupancy and space use on the capitol campus as historically
established.
(2) In accordance with RCW 46.08.172 and 43.135.055, the department
is authorized to increase parking fees in fiscal years 2014 and 2015 as
necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business.
(3)(a) The building code council account appropriation is provided
solely for the operation of the state building code council as required
by statute and modified by the standards established by executive order
10-06. The council shall not consider any proposed code amendment or
take any other action not authorized by statute or in compliance with
the standards established in executive order 10-06. No member of the
council may receive compensation, per diem, or reimbursement for
activities other than physical attendance at those meetings of the
state building code council or the council's designated committees, at
which the opportunity for public comment is provided generally and on
all agenda items upon which the council proposes to take action.
(b) Pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 1618 (concerning the
building code council account) there is imposed a fee of five dollars
and fifty cents on each building permit issued by a county or a city,
plus an additional surcharge of two dollars for each residential unit,
but not including the first unit, on each building containing more than
one residential unit, and a fee of eight dollars for each
nonresidential permit issued. $348,000 of the building code council
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the increase in
fees, pursuant to House Bill No. 1618. If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) The department of enterprise services shall purchase flags
needed for ceremonial occasions on the capitol campus in order to fully
represent the countries that have an international consulate in
Washington state.
(5) Before any agency may purchase a passenger motor vehicle as
defined in RCW 43.19.560, the agency must have written approval from
the director of the department of enterprise services.
(6) The department shall adjust billings for self-insurance
premiums to transportation agencies to reflect rate reductions assumed
in this act.
(7) $2,400,000 of the data processing revolving account
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of a pilot
program to implement a strategy and action plan to modernize the
state's enterprise financial and administrative systems. The
department, the office of financial management, and the office of the
chief information officer, will lead the planning effort and establish
advisory committees composed of key stakeholders. The plan will
include an assessment of the readiness of state government to conduct
a business transformation and system replacement project of this scale.
The plan shall incorporate the objectives of lean management and should
include recommendations on: Project scope, phasing and timeline,
expected outcomes and measures of success, product strategy, budget and
financing strategy options, risk mitigation, staffing and organization,
and strategies to close readiness gaps. The department shall submit
the implementation plan to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
December 15, 2013.
The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the
department satisfying the requirements of the project management
oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief
information officer.
(8) $8,013,000 of the data processing revolving account
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of a pilot
program to implement a time, leave, and attendance enterprise system.
The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the
department satisfying the requirements of the project management
oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief
information officer.
(9) From the fee charged to master contract vendors, the department
shall transfer to the office of minority and women's business
enterprises in equal monthly installments of $2,058,000 in fiscal year
2014 and $2,025,000 in fiscal year 2015.
(10) The legislature intends to review for purchase and to conduct
a boundary survey and appraisal of parcel number one and surrounding
property on McNeil Island related to maintaining the secure sex
offender facility, real estate transactional work for the deeds between
the state and federal government involving McNeil Island, and
transition planning to move toward decision-making to realign
conveyances for state ownership of McNeil Island. The department of
enterprise services is authorized to bill appropriate state agencies
for this parcel review and appraisal and the department shall provide
an estimate to the legislative fiscal committees by October 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 149 FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS
Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'
Administrative Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,045,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 150 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,343,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,246,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,951,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,554,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $50,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely to study the role
of cultural resources assessment as part of the state and local
governmental environmental review, planning, and permitting process.
The agency will create a public outreach process with affected
governmental entities, businesses, and stakeholders. The agency will
review state laws from around the country on cultural resources. The
agency will deliver its report with legislative recommendations to the
legislature by November 30, 2013.

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the
department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as
expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications
permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be
used for other than that purpose.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3)(a) The health care authority and the department are authorized
to develop an integrated health care program designed to slow the
progression of illness and disability and better manage medicaid
expenditures for the aged and disabled population. Under the
Washington medicaid integration partnership (WMIP) and the medicare
integrated care project (MICP), the health care authority and the
department may combine and transfer such medicaid funds appropriated
under sections 204, 206, 208, and 213 of this act as may be necessary
to finance a unified health care plan for the WMIP and the MICP program
enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not exceed a daily
enrollment of 6,000 persons, nor expand beyond one county during the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium. The amount of funding assigned from each
program may not exceed the average per capita cost assumed in this act
for individuals covered by that program, actuarially adjusted for the
health condition of persons enrolled, times the number of clients
enrolled. In implementing the WMIP and the MICP, the health care
authority and the department may: (i) Withhold from calculations of
"available resources" as set forth in RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the
capitated rate for enrolled individuals; and (ii) employ capitation
financing and risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration with health
care service contractors licensed by the office of the insurance
commissioner and qualified to participate in both the medicaid and
medicare programs.
(b) If Washington has been selected to participate in phase two of
the federal demonstration project for persons dually-eligible for both
medicare and medicaid, the department and the authority may initiate
the MICP. Participation in the project shall be limited to persons who
are eligible for both medicare and medicaid and to counties in which
the county legislative authority has agreed to the terms and conditions
under which it will operate. The purpose of the project shall be to
demonstrate and evaluate ways to improve care while reducing state
expenditures for persons enrolled both in medicare and medicaid. To
that end, prior to initiating the project, the department and the
authority shall assure that state expenditures shall be no greater on
either a per person or total basis than the state would otherwise
incur. Individuals who are solely eligible for medicaid may also
participate if their participation is agreed to by the health care
authority, the department, and the county legislative authority.
(4) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as
calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this
act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by
efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality
services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care
and services are available to the extent that such care and services
are available to the general population in the geographic area. The
legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal
government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input
constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.
(5) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the
same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for
social services appointments as the one established for medical
appointments in section 213 of this act. When contracting directly
with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the
department shall only contract with language access providers who are
working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or
state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available,
the department may use a language access provider who meets other
certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including
interpreters in other states.
(6) The department shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid
expansion for clients applying for or receiving state funded services
from the department and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the
department shall coordinate with the health care authority to provide
referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that
will be ineligible for the medicaid expansion but are enrolled in
coverage that will be eliminated in the transition to the medicaid
expansion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $297,361,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $297,530,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $489,867,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,354,000
Home Security Fund Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,741,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,240,000
Child and Family Reinvestment Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,672,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,105,765,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures.
(2) $668,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $668,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to contract for the operation of
one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide
residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The center shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive,
or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of
consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children
from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and
adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department
shall not require case management as a condition of the contract.
(3) $538,500 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $539,500 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, $656,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation,
and $253,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for children's administration to contract with an educational
advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach.
The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted
education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12
and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during
the transition to performance based contracts. Funding shall be
prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth and/or
regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested
educational outreach services exist. The department shall utilize
private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.
(4) $10,741,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract for services pursuant to
RCW 13.32A.030 and 74.15.220. The department shall contract and
collaborate with service providers in a manner that maintains the
availability and geographic representation of secure and semi-secure
crisis residential centers and HOPE centers. To achieve efficiencies
and increase utilization, the department shall allow the co-location of
these centers, except that a youth may not be placed in a secure
facility or the secure portion of a co-located facility except as
specifically authorized by chapter 13.32A RCW. The reductions to
appropriations in this subsection related to semi-secure crisis
residential centers reflect a reduction to the number of beds for semi-secure crisis residential centers and not a reduction in rates. Any
secure crisis residential center or semi-secure crisis residential
center bed reduction shall not be based solely upon bed utilization.
The department is to exercise its discretion in reducing the number of
beds but to do so in a manner that maintains availability and
geographic representation of semi-secure and secure crisis residential
centers.
(5) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a community-based organization
that has innovated, developed, and replicated a foster care delivery
model that includes a licensed hub home. The community-based
organization will provide training and technical assistance to the
children's administration to develop five hub home models in region 2
that will improve child outcomes, support foster parents, and encourage
the least restrictive community placements for children.
(6) $73,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $31,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No.
1566 (youth in out-of-home care). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $88,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $2,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $28,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 1774 (child welfare system). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $1,698,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $2,788,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $1,894,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5405 (extended foster care). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(9) $579,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $579,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $109,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for a receiving care center east of the Cascade
mountains.
(10)(a) $446,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $446,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a contract with a
nongovernmental entity or entities to establish one demonstration site
in a school district or group of school districts in western
Washington.
(b) The children's administration and the nongovernmental entity or
entities shall collaboratively select the demonstration site. The
demonstration site should be a school district or group of school
districts with a significant number of students who are dependent
pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW.
(c) The demonstration site established under this subsection must
be selected by September 1, 2013.
(d) The purpose of the demonstration site is to improve the
educational outcomes of students who are dependent pursuant to chapter
13.34 RCW by providing individualized education services and monitoring
and supporting dependent youths' completion of educational milestones,
remediation needs, and special education needs.
(e) The demonstration site established under this subsection must
facilitate the educational progress and graduation of dependent youth.
The contract must be performance-based with a stated goal of improving
the graduation rates of foster youth by two percent per year over five
school year periods, starting with the 2014-15 school year and ending
with the 2019-20 school year. The demonstration site must develop and
provide services aimed at improving the educational outcomes of foster
youth. These services must include:
(i) Direct advocacy for foster youth to eliminate barriers to
educational access and success;
(ii) Consultation with department of social and health services
case workers to develop educational plans for and with participating
youth;
(iii) Monitoring education progress of participating youth;
(iv) Providing participating youth with school and local resources
that may assist in educational access and success; and
(v) Coaching youth, caregivers, and social workers to advocate for
dependent youth in the educational system.
(f) The contracted nongovernmental entity or entities must report
demonstration site outcomes to the department of social and health
services and the office of public instruction by June 30, 2014, for the
2013-14 school year, and by June 30, 2015, for the 2014-15 school year.
(g) The children's administration must proactively refer all
students fifteen years or older, within the demonstration site area, to
the selected nongovernmental entity for educational services.
(h) The children's administration must report quarterly to the
legislature on the number of eligible youth and number of youth
referred for services beginning at the close of the second quarter of
fiscal year 2014 and through the final quarter of fiscal year 2015.
(i) The contracted nongovernmental entity or entities shall report
to the legislature by June 30, 2015, on the effectiveness of the
demonstration site in increasing graduation rates for dependent youth.
(11) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $256,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5315 (Powell fatality team). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) $670,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $670,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for services provided through
children's advocacy centers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,791,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,462,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,464,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,982,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,000
Reinvesting in Youth--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $383,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,801,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $189,079,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $331,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $331,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal
justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $2,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $2,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in
this subsection are intended to provide funding for county impacts
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and
shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $3,482,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $3,482,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to implement community juvenile
accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile
code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection may be used solely
for community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the
grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants.
(4) $1,130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to implement alcohol and substance
abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a competitive
basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of
plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist
counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) $3,123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $3,123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile
courts for the following programs identified by the Washington state
institute for public policy (institute) in its October 2006 report:
"Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison
Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Functional
family therapy, multi-systemic therapy, aggression replacement training
and interagency coordination programs, or other programs with a
positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. County
juvenile courts shall apply to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration for funding for program-specific participation and the
administration shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the
per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.
(6) $1,537,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,537,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for expansion of the following
treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation administration
programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy
in its October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to
Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime
Rates": Multidimensional treatment foster care, family integrated
transitions, and aggression replacement training, or other programs
with a positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. The
administration may concentrate delivery of these treatments and
therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in
a cost-effective manner.
(7)(a) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall administer
a block grant, rather than categorical funding, of consolidated
juvenile service funds, community juvenile accountability act grants,
the chemical dependency disposition alternative funds, the mental
health disposition alternative, and the sentencing disposition
alternative for the purpose of serving youth adjudicated in the
juvenile justice system. In making the block grant, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall follow the following formula and
will prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives
and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in
conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (i) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years
old; (ii) fifteen percent for moderate and high-risk youth; (iii)
twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (iv)
seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (v) three
percent for the chemical dependency disposition alternative; and (vi)
two percent for the mental health and sentencing dispositional
alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition
alternative (SSODA) shall not be included in the block grant, but
allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding
for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the
block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when
approved by the juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile
courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee,
based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state
institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.
(b) The juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile
courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight
committee with equal representation from the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee
is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding
formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current
available information. The committee will be cochaired by the juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts, who will also
have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to
achieve its purpose. Initial members will include one juvenile court
representative from the finance committee, the community juvenile
accountability act committee, the risk assessment quality assurance
committee, the executive board of the Washington association of
juvenile court administrators, the Washington state center for court
research, and a representative of the superior court judges
association; two representatives from the juvenile rehabilitation
administration headquarters program oversight staff, two
representatives of the juvenile rehabilitation administration regional
office staff, one representative of the juvenile rehabilitation
administration fiscal staff and a juvenile rehabilitation
administration division director. The committee may make changes to
the formula categories other than the evidence-based program and
disposition alternative categories if it is determined the changes will
increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based
program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost benefit
savings to the state. Long-term cost benefit must be considered.
Percentage changes may occur in the evidence-based program or
disposition alternative categories of the formula should it be
determined the changes will increase evidence-based program or
disposition alternative delivery and increase the cost benefit to the
state. These outcomes will also be considered in determining when
evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition
alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left
separate.
(c) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts
shall be responsible for collecting and distributing information and
providing access to the data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the Washington state institute for public policy
related to program and outcome data. The juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the juvenile courts will work collaboratively to
develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost benefit to
the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and
disposition alternatives.
(8) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts
shall collect and distribute information related to program outcome and
provide access to these data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and Washington state institute for public policy.
Consistent with chapter 13.50 RCW, all confidentiality agreements
necessary to implement this information-sharing shall be approved
within 30 days of the effective date of this section. The agreements
between administrative office of the courts, the juvenile courts, and
the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall be executed to ensure
that the juvenile rehabilitation administration receives the data that
the juvenile rehabilitation administration identifies as needed to
comply with this subsection. This includes, but is not limited to,
information by program at the statewide aggregate level, individual
court level, and individual client level for the purpose of the
juvenile rehabilitation administration providing quality assurance and
oversight for the locally committed youth block grant and associated
funds and at times as specified by the juvenile rehabilitation
administration as necessary to carry out these functions. The data
shall be provided in a manner that reflects the collaborative work the
juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile courts have
developed regarding program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost
benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices
and disposition alternatives.
(9) $445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild
project.
(10) $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the juvenile detention
alternatives initiative.
(11) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a grant program focused on
criminal street gang prevention and intervention. The Washington state
partnership council on juvenile justice may award grants under this
subsection. The council shall give priority to applicants who have
demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal street gangs.
Applicants composed of, at a minimum, one or more local governmental
entities and one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations that
have a documented history of creating and administering effective
criminal street gang prevention and intervention programs may apply for
funding under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $327,678,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $312,256,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $558,901,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,864,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,216,699,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $105,265,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $85,895,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for persons and
services not covered by the medicaid program. To the extent possible,
levels of regional support network spending shall be maintained in the
following priority order: Crisis and commitment services; community
inpatient services; and residential care services, including personal
care and emergency housing assistance. This is a reduction in flexible
nonmedicaid funding of $4,077,000 for fiscal year 2014 and $23,446,000
for fiscal year 2015. This reduction reflects offsets in state funding
related to services that will now be funded with federal dollars
through the affordable care act medicaid expansion. This reduction
shall be distributed as follows:
(i) The $4,077,000 reduction in fiscal year 2014 and $11,723,000 of
the reduction in fiscal year 2015 must be distributed among regional
support networks based on a formula that equally weights each regional
support networks proportion of individuals who become newly eligible
and enroll in medicaid under the expansion provisions of the affordable
care act in fiscal year 2014 and each regional support network's
spending of flexible nonmedicaid funding on services that would be
reimbursable for federal medicaid matching funds if provided to
medicaid enrollees in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium.
(ii) The remaining $11,723,000 reduction in fiscal year 2015 must
be distributed among regional support networks based on each regional
support network's proportion of individuals who become newly eligible
and enroll in medicaid under the expansion provisions of the affordable
care act through fiscal year 2015.
(b) $6,590,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $6,590,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $7,620,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the department and regional
support networks to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In
determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided
to regional support networks with PACT teams, the department shall
consider the differences between regional support networks in the
percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that
are not reimbursable under medicaid. The department may allow regional
support networks which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are
higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section
to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under
section 204(1)(a) of this act. The department and regional support
networks shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the
PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this
section.
(c) $5,850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $5,850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $1,300,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the western Washington regional
support networks to provide either community- or hospital campus-based
services for persons who require the level of care previously provided
by the program for adaptive living skills (PALS) at western state
hospital.
(d) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The
number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support
networks at western state hospital shall be 557 per day.
(e) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(f) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly,
rather than through contracts with regional support networks, for
children's long-term inpatient facility services.
(g) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to continue performance-based
incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support services
for individuals with severe mental illness who were discharged from the
state hospitals as part of the expanding community services initiative.
These funds will be used to enhance community residential and support
services provided by regional support networks through other state and
federal funding.
(h) $1,125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Spokane regional support
network to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at
eastern state hospital. Such services shall include:
(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high
utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;
(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the
community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient
care or jail services;
(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to
individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating
those individuals; and
(iv) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.
At least annually, the Spokane regional support network shall
assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at
eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally
effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.
(i) $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane
counties for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the
state psychiatric hospitals.
(j) Regional support networks may use local funds to earn
additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate
does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate
range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide
medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients.
Additionally, regional support networks may use a portion of the state
funds allocated in accordance with (a) of this subsection to earn
additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application
of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of
crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and
outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for
medicaid.
(k) $3,436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $2,291,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for mental health services for
mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for
facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon
release from confinement.
(l) $523,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $775,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $854,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of sections 3 through 5 of chapter
289, Laws of 2013 (E2SHB 1114). Regional support networks must use
this funding for the development of intensive community programs that
allow individuals to be diverted or transitioned from the state
hospitals in accordance with plans approved by the department. If
chapter 289, Laws of 2013 (E2SHB 1114) is not enacted by June 30, 2013,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(m) $5,986,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $11,592,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $10,160,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 335,
Laws of 2013 (ESSB 5480). Regional support networks must use this
funding for the development of intensive community programs that allow
individuals to be diverted or transitioned from the state hospitals in
accordance with plans approved by the department.
(n) Due to recent approval of federal medicaid matching funds for
the disability lifeline and the alcohol and drug abuse treatment
support act programs, the department shall charge regional support
networks for only the state share rather than the total cost of
community psychiatric hospitalization for persons enrolled in those
programs.
(o) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely to maintain financial viability for the
Chelan-Douglas regional support network. In order to qualify for this
funding, the Chelan-Douglas regional support network must submit by
August 1, 2013, for approval by the department, either proof of a
formal agreement to merge with another regional support network or a
plan that demonstrates how the Chelan-Douglas regional support network
will maintain financial viability and stability.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,592,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,116,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $149,867,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,097,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $477,672,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in
this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a community partnership
between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support
community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding
western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (2)(b)
are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time
community service officer at the city of Lakewood.
(c) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for payment to the city of
Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state
hospital and adjacent areas.
(d) $20,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $20,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to maintain staffed capacity to
serve an average daily census in forensic wards at western state
hospital of 270 patients per day.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,163,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,164,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,108,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,435,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,161,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $1,161,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for
children's evidence-based mental health services.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,287,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,791,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,719,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $502,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,299,000

(a) The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the
following conditions and limitations: In accordance with RCW
43.20B.110, 43.135.055, and 71.24.035, the department is authorized to
adopt license and certification fees in fiscal years 2014 and 2015 to
support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee
schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of
accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to
have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department,
including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of
health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of
rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To
reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited
programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of
accreditation must reflect the lower costs of licensing for these
programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.
(b) $74,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $74,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $78,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of chapter 335, Laws of 2013 (ESSB
5480).
(c) $160,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 284,
Laws of 2013 (ESSB 5551).
(d) In developing the new medicaid managed care rates under which
the public mental health managed care system will operate, the
department must seek to estimate the reasonable and necessary cost of
efficiently and effectively providing a comparable set of medically
necessary mental health benefits to persons of different acuity levels
regardless of where in the state they live. The department must report
to the office of financial management and to the relevant fiscal and
policy committees of the legislature on its proposed new mental health
managed care rate-setting approach by August 1, 2013, and again at
least sixty days prior to implementation of new capitation rates.
(e) $349,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $212,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $302,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement chapter 320, Laws of 2013 (ESHB 1519) and
chapter 338, Laws of 2013 (2SSB 5732).
(f) The department shall work cooperatively with the health care
authority to explore the feasibility of incentivizing small, rural
hospitals to convert, in part or fully, some of their beds to
psychiatric treatment beds. No later than December 31, 2014, the
department shall report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature on the feasibility of such conversion. The report shall
consider rate enhancements and the ability to claim federal medicaid
matching funds on converted beds.
(g) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $21,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided for implementation of section 9, chapter 197, Laws of 2013
(ESHB 1336). The department must utilize these funds for mental health
first aid training targeted at teachers and educational staff in
accordance with the training model developed by the department of
psychology in Melbourne, Australia.
(h) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
provided for the department to continue to develop the child adolescent
needs and strengths assessment tool and build workforce capacity to
provide evidence based wraparound services for children, consistent
with the anticipated settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and
Porter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $442,565,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $461,713,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $826,039,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,730,398,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and
43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility,
assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to
fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection,
and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the
department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall
include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the
license fee attributed to medicaid clients.
(i) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes
shall be increased to $241 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2014 and
$242 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2015. A processing fee of $2,750
shall be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially
licensed. This fee is nonrefundable.
(ii) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living
facilities shall be increased to $113 per bed beginning in fiscal year
2014 and $114 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2015.
(iii) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities
shall be increased to $389 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2014 and
$403 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2015.
(c) $13,301,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $20,607,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $33,910,000 of the general fund federal
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the
agreement reached between the governor and the service employees
international union healthcare 775nw through an interest arbitration
decision under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium.
(d) $6,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $6,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the individual and family
services program. In order to maximize the number of clients served by
the program, the department must utilize past experience about award
utilization to guide the number of authorized awards, and must change
the maximum annual dollar amount awarded to each service priority
level. Changes to the award levels must be designed to limit the
average annual award for clients in the program during the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium to 60 percent of the average annual cost for clients in
the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium. Clients who are not receiving paid
services from the department, who are on the wait list for individual
and family services, and who are ineligible for medicaid personal care
may be added to the individual and family services program during the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium, provided the projected expenditures for the
ensuing biennium do not exceed $13,000,000 of general fund--state. The
department must ensure that award levels are consistent for clients in
the individual and family services program and clients receiving a
state supplementary payment in lieu of individual and family services.
The department shall adopt rules to implement the terms of this
subsection. The department must electronically report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature within 45 days following each
fiscal year quarter, the number of persons served by the program, the
average cost of persons served by the program, the services received by
persons in the program, and the number of clients who had not
previously received paid services who have been added to the program.
(e) No later than December 31, 2013, the department shall report to
the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature with a strategy to
reduce the rate disparity between urban and suburban residential
service providers. The report shall include a proposal for a rate
component that recognizes differences in costs as they relate to the
geographical location of the provider; however, the proposed component
shall use a geographical variable that is more granular than the
provider's county.
(f) $1,547,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $4,790,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for a payment system that satisfies medicaid
requirements regarding time reporting for W-2 providers. The amounts
provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department
satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight
standards and policies established by the office of the chief
information officer.
(g) $1,707,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $2,670,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $4,376,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity
impacts of the service employees international union healthcare 775nw
arbitration award.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,347,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,390,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,629,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,041,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $354,407,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Individuals receiving services as
supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments shall
not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due
solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.
(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,943,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,999,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,960,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,902,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $875,867,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $932,091,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,948,189,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,308,000
Traumatic Brain Injury Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,393,000
Skilled Nursing Facility Safety Net Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,879,848,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $171.35 for
fiscal year 2014 and shall not exceed $171.58 for fiscal year 2015,
including the rate add-ons described in (a) and (b) of this subsection.
However, if the waiver requested from the federal centers for medicare
and medicaid services in relation to the safety net assessment is for
any reason disapproved, the weighted average nursing facility payment
rate shall not exceed $162.43 for fiscal year 2014 and shall not exceed
$163.58 for fiscal year 2015. There will be no adjustments for
economic trends and conditions in fiscal years 2014 and 2015. The
economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in the
biennial appropriations act shall not be compounded with the economic
trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any other biennial
appropriations acts before applying it to the component rate
allocations established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW. When no
economic trends and conditions factor for either fiscal year is defined
in a biennial appropriations act, no economic trends and conditions
factor or factors defined in any earlier biennial appropriations act
shall be applied solely or compounded to the component rate allocations
established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW.
(a) Within the funds provided, the department shall continue to
provide an add-on per medicaid resident day per facility not to exceed
$1.57. The add-on shall be used to increase wages, benefits, and/or
staffing levels for certified nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or
benefits for dietary aides, housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other
category of worker whose statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was
less than $15 in calendar year 2008, according to cost report data.
The add-on may also be used to address resulting wage compression for
related job classes immediately affected by wage increases to low-wage
workers. The department shall continue reporting requirements and a
settlement process to ensure that the funds are spent according to this
subsection.
(b) The department shall do a comparative analysis of the facility-based payment rates calculated on July 1, 2013, using the payment
methodology defined in chapter 74.46 RCW and as funded in the omnibus
appropriations act, excluding the comparative add-on, acuity add-on,
and safety net reimbursement, to the facility-based payment rates in
effect June 30, 2010. If the facility-based payment rate calculated on
July 1, 2013, is smaller than the facility-based payment rate on June
30, 2010, then the difference shall be provided to the individual
nursing facilities as an add-on payment per medicaid resident day.
(c) During the comparative analysis performed in subsection (b) of
this section, if it is found that the direct care rate for any facility
calculated using the payment methodology defined in chapter 74.46 RCW
and as funded in the omnibus appropriations act, excluding the
comparative add-on, acuity add-on, and safety net reimbursement, is
greater than the direct care rate in effect on June 30, 2010, then the
facility shall receive a ten percent direct care rate add-on to
compensate that facility for taking on more acute clients than they
have in the past.
(d) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to
reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net
assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety
net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual
statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.
(e) The rate add-on provided in (c) of this subsection is subject
to the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW
74.46.022(6).
(f) If the waiver requested from the federal centers for medicare
and medicaid services in relation to the safety net assessment is for
any reason disapproved, (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection do not
apply.
(2) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue no additional certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2014 and no new certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2015 and shall grant no rate add-ons to payment rates for capital
improvements not requiring a certificate of need and a certificate of
capital authorization for fiscal years 2014 and 2015.
(3) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and
43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility,
assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to
fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection,
and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the
department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall
include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the
license fee attributed to medicaid clients.
(a) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes
shall be increased to $241 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2014 and
$242 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2015. A processing fee of $2,750
shall be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially
licensed. This fee is nonrefundable.
(b) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living
facilities shall be increased to $113 per bed beginning in fiscal year
2014 and $114 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2015.
(c) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities
shall be increased to $389 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2014 and
$403 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2015.
(4) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients
residing in nursing homes and paid for with state only funds into less
restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the
client's care needs.
(5) $30,640,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $48,633,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $79,273,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the
agreement reached between the governor and the service employees
international union healthcare 775nw through an interest arbitration
decision under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium.
(6) $1,840,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
services program. Funding shall be prioritized towards serving
populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include
senior citizens and persons with disabilities.
(7) $4,894,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $15,150,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for a payment system that satisfies medicaid
requirements regarding time reporting for W-2 providers. The amounts
provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department
satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight
standards and policies established by the office of the chief
information officer.
(8) The department is authorized to establish limited exemption
criteria in rule to address RCW 74.39A.325 when a landline phone is not
available to the employee.
(9) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, in a report to
the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature that must be
submitted by December 1, 2013, the department of social and health
services must describe the process for establishing medicaid rates for
assisted living and adult family homes. The report must include
information about licensing and physical plant standards, contracting
provisions, and per capita and biennial expenditures for assisted
living and adult family homes.
(10) $10,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014, $17,768,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015, and $28,567,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity
impacts of the service employees international union healthcare 775nw
arbitration award.
(11) $36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $17,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $45,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for member reimbursement, staff support, or other
expenses associated with the work of the joint legislative executive
committee on planning for aging and disability issues that is
established in section 130 of this act.
(12) $240,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $1,342,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $1,468,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 320, Laws of
2013 (ESHB 1519) and chapter 338, Laws of 2013 (2SSB 5732).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $413,184,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $418,321,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,208,882,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,594,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,070,981,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) $196,090,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014, $193,441,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015, and $730,098,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst
program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the
department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families
eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. The department
must create a WorkFirst budget structure that allows for transparent
tracking of budget units and subunits of expenditures where these units
and subunits are mutually exclusive from other department budget units.
The budget structure must include budget units for the following: Cash
assistance, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the
program. Within these budget units, the department must develop
program index codes for specific activities and develop allotments and
track expenditures using these codes. The department shall report to
the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature prior to adopting the new structure. The
secretary of the department of social and health services, working with
WorkFirst partner agencies and in collaboration with the WorkFirst
oversight task force, shall develop a plan for maximizing the following
outcomes and shall report back to the legislature by November 1, 2013.
The outcomes to be measured are: (i) Increased employment; (ii)
completion of education or post-secondary training; (iii) completion of
barrier removal activity including drug and alcohol or mental health
treatment; (iv) housing stability; (v) child care or education
stability for the children of temporary assistance for needy families
recipients; (vi) reduced rate of return after exit from the WorkFirst
program; and (vii) work participation requirements.
(b) $442,888,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are
provided solely for assistance to clients, including grants, diversion
cash assistance, and additional diversion emergency assistance
including but not limited to assistance authorized under RCW
74.08A.210. The department may use state funds to provide support to
working families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy
families but otherwise not receiving cash assistance.
(c) $173,019,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are
provided solely for WorkFirst job search, education and training
activities, barrier removal services, limited English proficiency
services, and tribal assistance under RCW 74.08A.040. The department
must allocate this funding based on client outcomes and cost
effectiveness measures.
(d) $362,111,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection are
provided solely for the working connections child care program under
RCW 43.215.135.
(e) The amounts in (b) through (d) of this subsection shall be
expended for the programs and in the amounts specified. However, the
department may transfer up to 10 percent of funding between (b) through
(d) of this subsection, but only if the funding is available or
necessary to transfer solely due to utilization, caseload changes, or
underperformance in terms of client outcomes. The department shall
provide notification prior to any transfer to the office of financial
management and to the appropriate legislative committees and the
legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight task force. The approval of
the director of financial management is required prior to any transfer
under this subsection.
(2) $1,657,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,657,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for naturalization services.
(3) $2,366,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and
immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department
to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance
organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services; and
$2,366,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2015 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and
immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department
to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance
organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.
(4) On December 1, 2011, and annually thereafter, the department
must report to the legislature on all sources of funding available for
both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during
the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service
type and funding source. The report must also include the number of
clients served and outcome data for the clients.
(5) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds
appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit
under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to
be fifty percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance
program benefit amount.
(6) $18,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of section 1, chapter
337, Laws of 2013 (2SSB 5595).
(7) $4,729,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $4,729,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1971 (communication services). Of these funds, $500,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and
$500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015
are provided solely for operational support of the Washington
information network 211 organization. If Substitute House Bill No.
1971 (communication services) is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) The department shall review clients receiving services through
the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether
they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens,
and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income
benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization
funding through the department.
(9) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with
the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral
of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement
must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in
selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties
to facilitate applications for veterans' services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,591,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,360,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $277,410,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,559,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,568,000
Problem Gambling Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $441,938,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
may contract with the University of Washington and community-based
providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program or
other specialized chemical dependency case management providers for
pregnant, post-partum, and parenting women. For all contractors: (a)
Service and other outcome data must be provided to the department by
request; (b) program modifications needed to maximize access to federal
medicaid matching funds will be phased in over the course of the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium; and (c) indirect charges for administering the
program shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall continue to provide for chemical dependency treatment services
for adult medicaid eligible, pregnant and parenting women, disability
lifeline, and alcoholism and drug addiction treatment and support act,
and medical care services clients.
(3) In accordance with RCW 70.96A.090 and 43.135.055, the
department is authorized to adopt fees for the review and approval of
treatment programs in fiscal years 2014 and 2015 as necessary to
support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee
schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of
accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to
have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department,
including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of
health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of
rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To
reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited
programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of
accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these
programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.
(4) $3,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation (from the
substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant) is
provided solely for the continued funding of existing county drug and
alcohol use prevention programs.
(5) $2,600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the department to transition 128 beds
from settings that are considered institutions for mental diseases to
facilities with no more than 16 beds that are able to claim federal
match for services provided to medicaid clients or individuals covered
under the department's section 1115 medicaid waiver. The department
may conduct a request for proposal process to fulfill this requirement
and adopt rates that are comparable to the pilot projects implemented
in the 2011-13 fiscal biennium. The department may use these funds to
assist with the costs of providers in setting up or converting to 16-bed facilities. This funding may also be used for providers that are
developing new capacity for clients who will become eligible for
services under the affordable care act medicaid expansion. The number
of beds available for pregnant and parenting women must not be reduced.
(6) $283,000 of the criminal justice treatment account
appropriation is provided solely for transitional funding for the
family drug court in Pierce county.
(7) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall contract with the Washington state institute for public policy
for a long-term efficacy study of the chemical dependency treatment
programs funded by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The
study shall focus on how many program participants successfully
complete dependency programs and how long they abstain from use of
drugs and alcohol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,478,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,568,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,413,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $132,459,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $5,006,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $5,094,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for
services and support to individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing, or
deaf-blind.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,706,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,140,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,846,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall transfer the stewardship of McNeil Island
to the department of corrections industries program. The transferred
responsibilities shall include marine operations, waste water
treatment, water treatment, road maintenance, and any other general
island maintenance that is not site specific to the operations of the
special commitment center or the Pierce county secure community
transition facility. Facility maintenance within the perimeter of the
special commitment center shall remain the responsibility of the
department of social and health services.
(2) $3,120,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $3,120,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for operational costs specific to
island operations of the special commitment center and the Pierce
county secure community transition facility. The department shall
establish an accounting structure that enables it to track and report
on costs specific to island operations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,127,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,521,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,176,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $654,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $97,478,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $395,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $228,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $335,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1519
(service coordination organizations) or Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5732 (adult behavioral health). If neither of the bills is enacted
by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington state mentors
program to continue its public-private partnerships to provide
technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve
at-risk youth.
(3) $82,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $28,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to develop a report on state efforts to prevent and
control diabetes. The department, the health care authority, and the
department of health shall submit a coordinated report to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2014,
on the following:
(a) The financial impacts and reach that diabetes of all types and
undiagnosed gestational diabetes are having on the programs
administered by each agency and individuals, including children with
mothers with undiagnosed gestational diabetes, enrolled in those
programs. Items in this assessment must include: (i) The number of
lives with diabetes and undiagnosed gestational diabetes impacted or
covered by the programs administered by each agency; (ii) the number of
lives with diabetes, or at risk for diabetes, and family members
impacted by prevention and diabetes control programs implemented by
each agency; (iii) the financial toll or impact diabetes and its
complications, and undiagnosed gestational diabetes and the
complications experienced during labor to children of mothers with
gestational diabetes places on these programs in comparison to other
chronic diseases and conditions; and (iv) the financial toll or impact
diabetes and its complications, and diagnosed gestational diabetes and
the complications experienced during labor to children of mothers with
gestational diabetes places on these programs;
(b) An assessment of the benefits of implemented and existing
programs and activities aimed at controlling all types of diabetes and
preventing the disease. This assessment must also document the amount
and source for any funding directed to each agency for the programs and
activities aimed at reaching those with diabetes of all types;
(c) A description of the level of coordination existing between the
agencies on activities, programmatic activities, and messaging on
managing, treating, or preventing all types of diabetes and its
complications;
(d) The development or revision of detailed policy-related action
plans and budget recommendations for battling diabetes and undiagnosed
gestational diabetes that includes a range of actionable items for
consideration by the legislature. The plans and budget recommendations
must identify proposed action steps to reduce the impact of diabetes,
prediabetes, related diabetes complications, and undiagnosed
gestational diabetes. The plans and budget recommendations must also
identify expected outcomes of the action steps proposed in the
following biennium while also establishing benchmarks for controlling
and preventing all types of diabetes; and
(e) An estimate of savings, efficiencies, costs, and budgetary
savings and resources required to implement the plans and budget
recommendations identified in (d) of this subsection (5).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,470,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,511,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,264,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $176,245,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,137,710,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,135,241,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,213,604,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,808,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,082,000
Hospital Safety Net Assessment Fund--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $668,967,000
Health Benefit Exchange Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,668,000
State Health Care Authority Administration Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,846,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $528,000
Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,206,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,395,660,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority
shall implement the medicaid expansion defined in the social security
act, section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII).
(2) The requirements of this subsection apply to the basic health
plan. This subsection is null and void and has no further effect upon
implementation of the medicaid expansion under subsection (1) of this
section.
(a) Within amounts appropriated in this section and sections 205
and 206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to
provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care
programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents eligible
to participate in the basic health plan as subsidized enrollees and
home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at
the minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below
sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(b) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals that are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
that choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(c) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
(i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all applicants, or
(ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from those
persons not required to file income tax returns; (b) check employment
security payroll records at least once every twelve months on all
enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as indicated by payroll
records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based to document
their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d)
require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot
be obtained to document their current income at least once every six
months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by
noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to, depreciation,
amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by the United
States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment and civil
penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as
provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(d) Enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan shall be limited
to only include persons who qualify as subsidized enrollees as defined
in RCW 70.47.020 and who (a) qualify for services under 1115 medicaid
demonstration project number 11-W-00254/10; or (b) are foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.
(3) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as
calculated by the health care authority pursuant to the appropriations
in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by
efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality
services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care
and services are available to the extent that such care and services
are available to the general population in the geographic area. The
legislature finds that the cost reports, payment data from the federal
government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input
constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.
(4) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the
medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health
care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction
of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so
that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation
authority.
(5) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard
recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other
assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.
(6) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for
Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of
the state's health care system.
(7) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of
residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care
authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she
would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the
extent necessary.
(8) $4,261,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $4,261,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $8,522,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share
hospital payments.
(9) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $800,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for disproportionate share hospital payments to rural
hospitals certified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services
as sole community hospitals as of January 1, 2013, with less than one
hundred fifty acute care licensed beds in fiscal year 2011 that do not
participate in the certified public expenditures program.
(10) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for grants to rural hospitals in
Clallam county that were certified by the centers for medicare and
medicaid services as sole community hospitals as of January 1, 2013,
with less than one hundred fifty acute care licensed beds in fiscal
year 2011.
(11) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health
care authority shall provide disproportionate share hospital payments
to hospitals that provide services to children in the children's health
program who are not eligible for services under Title XIX or XXI of the
federal social security act due to their citizenship status.
(12) $6,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by
public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be
responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the
supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum
allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the
payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or
reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E
of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that
costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against
payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because
such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from
these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to
retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing
homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the
interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care
authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or
the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from
the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the
medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The
health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the
eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.
(13) The health care authority shall continue the inpatient
hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2013-2015 fiscal
biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals, including
those owned or operated by the state, except those classified as
critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The
health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and
legislature by November 1, 2013, and by November 1, 2014, that evaluate
whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the
certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no
longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall
submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing
cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources
as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2014 and fiscal
year 2015, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one
hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost
for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical
assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the
maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal
regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an
allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by
the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each
fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount.
The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the
inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the
fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the
reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with
policies approved in the 2013-2015 biennial operating appropriations
act and in effect on July 1, 2013, (b) one-half of the indigent
assistance disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and
retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (c) all of the
other disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and
retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the
same disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the
hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the
hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share
hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match.
If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount,
the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between
payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount.
Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year
and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated
and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year.
The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within eleven
months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be
performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a
hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as
described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess
amounts to the state when requested. $5,319,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2014, of which $6,570,000 is
appropriated in section 204(1) of this act, and $1,141,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, of which
$6,570,000 is appropriated in section 204(1) of this act, are provided
solely for state grants for the participating hospitals.
(14) The health care authority shall seek public-private
partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to
provide on-going support for outreach and education efforts under the
federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of
2009.
(15) The health care authority shall target funding for maternity
support services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to
higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm
or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a
cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe
mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco
use, or African American or Native American race. The health care
authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of
maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care
authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for
maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those
services.
(16) $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $121,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $292,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1519
(service coordination organizations) and Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5732 (behavioral health services). If neither of the bills is
enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(17) $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $55,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to develop a report on state efforts to prevent and
control diabetes. The authority, the department of social and health
services, and the department of health shall submit a coordinated
report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 31, 2014, on the following:
(a) The financial impacts and reach that diabetes of all types and
undiagnosed gestational diabetes are having on the programs
administered by each agency and individuals, including children with
mothers with undiagnosed gestational diabetes, enrolled in those
programs. Items in this assessment must include: (i) The number of
lives with diabetes and undiagnosed gestational diabetes impacted or
covered by the programs administered by each agency; (ii) the number of
lives with diabetes, or at risk for diabetes, and family members
impacted by prevention and diabetes control programs implemented by
each agency; (iii) the financial toll or impact diabetes and its
complications, and undiagnosed gestational diabetes and the
complications experienced during labor to children of mothers with
gestational diabetes places on these programs in comparison to other
chronic diseases and conditions; and (iv) the financial toll or impact
diabetes and its complications, and diagnosed gestational diabetes and
the complications experienced during labor to children of mothers with
gestational diabetes places on these programs;
(b) An assessment of the benefits of implemented and existing
programs and activities aimed at controlling all types of diabetes and
preventing the disease. This assessment must also document the amount
and source for any funding directed to each agency for the programs and
activities aimed at reaching those with diabetes of all types;
(c) A description of the level of coordination existing between the
agencies on activities, programmatic activities, and messaging on
managing, treating, or preventing all types of diabetes and its
complications;
(d) The development or revision of detailed policy-related action
plans and budget recommendations for battling diabetes and undiagnosed
gestational diabetes that includes a range of actionable items for
consideration by the legislature. The plans and budget recommendations
must identify proposed action steps to reduce the impact of diabetes,
prediabetes, related diabetes complications, and undiagnosed
gestational diabetes. The plans and budget recommendations must also
identify expected outcomes of the action steps proposed in the
following biennium while also establishing benchmarks for controlling
and preventing all types of diabetes; and
(e) An estimate of savings, efficiencies, costs, and budgetary
savings and resources required to implement the plans and budget
recommendations identified in (d) of this subsection (15).
(18) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $25,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the development of recommendations for funding
integrated school nursing and outreach services. The authority shall
collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to develop recommendations for increasing federal financial
participation for providing nursing services in schools with the goals
of integrating nursing and outreach services and supporting one nurse
for every four hundred fifty students in elementary schools and one
nurse for every seven hundred fifty students in secondary schools. In
developing these recommendations, the authority shall inquire with the
federal centers for medicare and medicaid services about state plan
amendment or waiver options for receiving additional federal matching
funds for school nursing services provided to children enrolled in
apple health for kids. The recommendations shall include proposals for
funding training and reimbursement for nurses that provide outreach
services to help eligible students enroll in apple health for kids and
other social services programs. The authority and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide these
recommendations to the governor and the legislature by December 1,
2013.
(19) $430,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to complete grant requirements for the health
information exchange.
(20) $143,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $423,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the rebasing of outpatient and inpatient payment
methods.
(21) $822,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $341,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $9,710,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely to implement the conversion to the tenth version of
the world health organization's international classification of
diseases.
(22) $111,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $359,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to update the medicaid information technology
architecture state self-assessment and to develop the five year road
map for the medicaid information technology architecture architect.
(23) $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $126,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to support the Robert Bree collaborative's efforts to
disseminate evidence-based best practices for preventing and treating
health problems.
(24) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority
shall increase reimbursement rates for primary care services provided
by independent nurse practitioners to medicare levels for the period
from July 1, 2013, to December 31, 2014.
(25) The authority shall seek a medicaid state plan amendment to
create a professional services supplemental payment managed care
program for professional services delivered to managed care recipients
by University of Washington medicine and other public professional
providers. This program shall be effective as soon as administratively
possible and shall operate concurrently with the existing professional
services supplemental payment program. The authority shall apply
federal rules for identifying the difference between average commercial
rates and fee-for-service medicaid payments. This difference will be
multiplied by the number of managed care encounters and incorporated
into the managed care plan capitation rates by a certified actuary.
The managed care plans will pay the providers the difference
attributable to the increased capitation rate. Participating providers
shall be solely responsible for providing the local funds required to
obtain federal matching funds. Any incremental costs incurred by the
authority in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this
program shall be the responsibility of the participating providers.
Participating providers shall retain the full amount of supplemental
payments provided under this program, net of any costs related to the
program that are disallowed due to audits or litigation against the
state.
(26) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
authority to provide an adult dental benefit beginning January 1, 2014.
(27) To the extent allowed under federal law, the authority shall
require an adult client to enroll in full medicaid coverage instead of
family planning-only coverage unless the client is at risk of domestic
violence.
(28) The authority shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid
expansion for clients applying for or receiving state funded services
from the authority and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the
authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health
services to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange
for clients that will be ineligible for the medicaid expansion but are
enrolled in coverage that will be eliminated in the transition to the
medicaid expansion.
(29) $90,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $90,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $180,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit organization of a
toll-free hotline that assists families to learn about and enroll in
the apple health for kids program.
(30) The appropriations in this section reflect savings and
efficiencies by transferring children receiving medical care provided
through fee-for-service to medical care provided through managed care.
(31) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $170,561,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for the provider incentive program and other
initiatives related to the health information technology medicaid plan.
(32) The authority shall purchase a brand name drug when it
determines that the cost of the brand name drug after rebates is less
than the cost of generic alternatives and that purchase of the brand
rather than generic version can save at least $250,000. The authority
may purchase generic alternatives when changes in market prices make
the price of the brand name drug after rebates more expensive than the
generic alternatives.
(33) The authority shall not subject antiretroviral drugs used to
treat HIV/AIDS, anticancer medications used to kill or slow the growth
of cancerous cells, antihemophilic drugs, or transplant drugs to any
medicaid preferred drug list or formulary for the fee-for-service
population.
(34) $1,531,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $280,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $10,803,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely to implement phase two of the project to create a
single provider payment system that consolidates medicaid medical and
social services payments and replaces the social service payment
system. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the
authority satisfying the requirements of the project management
oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief
information officer.
(35) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health
care authority and the department of social and health services shall
implement the state option to provide health homes for enrollees with
chronic conditions under section 2703 of the federal affordable care
act. The total state match for enrollees who are dually-eligible for
both medicare and medicaid and not enrolled in managed care shall be no
more than the net savings to the state from the enhanced match rate for
its medicaid-only managed care enrollees under section 2703.
(36) The health care authority shall not initiate any services that
require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The health care authority may
seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the health care
authority receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those
moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any
other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal
amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the
lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial
management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in
this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants
and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on
specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state
funds.
(37) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority
shall reimburse for primary care services provided by naturopathic
physicians.
(38) Within amounts appropriated, the health care authority shall
conduct a review of its management and staffing structure to identify
efficiencies and opportunities to reduce full time equivalent employees
and other administrative costs. A report summarizing the review and
the authority's recommendations to reduce costs and full time
equivalent employees must be submitted to the governor and legislature
by November 1, 2013.
(39) $19,250,000 of the health benefit exchange account--state
appropriation and $2,750,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely to support the operations of the Washington health
benefit exchange from January 1, 2015, to June 30, 2015.
(40) $1,540,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $946,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, $930,000 of the health benefit exchange account--state
appropriation, and $10,743,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the medicaid and children's
health insurance program shares of costs allocated from the health
benefit exchange. The amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse
if Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1947 (Washington health benefit
exchange) is not enacted by June 30, 2013, and the office of financial
management determines by January 1, 2013, that the charges to enrollees
and the state under the health benefit exchange's self-sustaining
methodology exceed 3.4 percent of premiums paid.
(41) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority
shall continue to provide coverage for pregnant teens that cannot
qualify for medicaid or the federal children's health insurance
program.
(42) Upon implementation of the medicaid expansion under subsection
(1) of this section, the breast and cervical cancer treatment program
is eliminated. To maintain continuity of coverage, the authority shall
offer the option to stay in a fee-for-service program to clients that
are already enrolled in the breast and cervical cancer treatment
program and will be transitioned into the new adult group upon
implementation of the medicaid expansion. The authority will continue
to provide coverage to clients that are already enrolled in the breast
and cervical cancer treatment program at the time of program
elimination until their courses of treatment are completed.
(43) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $40,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the authority to create a new position to provide
adequate oversight and assistance to managed care organizations, rural
health clinics, and federally qualified health centers under a new
administratively streamlined payment methodology. Effective July 1,
2013, or upon obtaining any necessary federal approval, but in no case
during the first quarter of a calendar year, the authority shall
implement an administratively streamlined payment methodology for
federally qualified health centers and rural health clinics. State
payments to managed care organizations shall include the full encounter
payments for federally qualified health centers and rural health
clinics as defined in the medicaid state plan and in accordance with
section 1902(bb) of the social security act (42 U.S.C. 1396a(bb)). For
any services eligible for encounter payments, as defined in the
medicaid state plan, managed care organizations shall be required to
pay at least the full published encounter rates directly to each clinic
or center. The authority will require participating managed care
organizations to reimburse federally qualified health centers and rural
health clinics for clean claims in strict adherence to the timeliness
of payment standards established under contract and specified for the
medicaid fee-for-service program in section 1902(a)(37) of the social
security act (42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)(37)), 42 C.F.R. Sec. 447.46, and
specified for health carriers in WAC 284-43-321. The authority shall
exercise all necessary options under its existing sanctions policy to
enforce timely payment of claims. The authority shall ensure necessary
staff and resources are identified to actively monitor and enforce the
timeliness and accuracy of payments to federally qualified health
centers and rural health clinics. By January 1, 2014, and after
collaboration with federally qualified health centers, rural health
clinics, managed care plans, and the centers for medicare and medicaid
services, the authority will produce a report that provides options for
a new payment methodology that rewards innovation and outcomes over
volume of services delivered, and which maintains the integrity of the
rural health clinic program as outlined under federal law. The report
will detail necessary federal authority for implementation and provide
the benefits and drawbacks of each option.
(44) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to remove
the mental health visit limit and to provide the shingles vaccine and
screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment benefits that
are available in the medicaid alternative benefit plan in the current
medicaid benefit plan beginning January 1, 2014. The authority shall
monitor the costs of the habilitative benefit as part of the
forecasting process but shall not provide this benefit in the current
medicaid benefit plan without a direct appropriation in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(45) The appropriations in this section reflect savings and
efficiencies achieved by modifying dispensing methods of contraceptive
drugs. The authority must make arrangements for all medicaid programs
offered through managed care plans or fee-for-service programs to
require dispensing of contraceptive drugs with a one-year supply
provided at one time unless a patient requests a smaller supply or the
prescribing physician instructs that the patient must receive a smaller
supply. Contracts with managed care plans must allow on-site
dispensing of the prescribed contraceptive drugs at family planning
clinics. Dispensing practices must follow clinical guidelines for
appropriate prescribing and dispensing to ensure the health of the
patient while maximizing access to effective contraceptive drugs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,077,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,002,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,190,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,269,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $218,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation is provided for additional financial resources from the
U.S. department of housing and urban development for the investigation
of discrimination cases involving service animals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE
APPEALS
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,790,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,790,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,590,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,360,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,274,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,059,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,597,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,898,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, are provided to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency
of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW
9A.44.130.
(2) $340,000 of the general fund--local appropriation is provided
solely to purchase ammunition for the basic law enforcement academy.
Jurisdictions shall reimburse to the criminal justice training
commission the costs of ammunition, based on the average cost of
ammunition per cadet, for cadets that they enroll in the basic law
enforcement academy.
(3) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic
law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a school safety program. The
commission, in collaboration with the school safety center advisory
committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school
administrators and school safety personnel hired after the effective
date of this section.
(5) $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the school safety center
within the commission. The safety center shall act as an information
dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a school
district in Washington or in another state, coordinate activities
relating to school safety, and review and approve manuals and curricula
used for school safety models and training. Through an interagency
agreement, the commission shall provide funding for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to continue to develop and
maintain a school safety information web site. The school safety
center advisory committee shall develop and revise the training
program, using the best practices in school safety, for all school
safety personnel. The commission shall provide research-related
programs in school safety and security issues beneficial to both law
enforcement and schools.
(6) $123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the costs of providing
statewide advanced driving training with the use of a driving
simulator.
(7) $165,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $165,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for crisis intervention training
for peace officers. The commission shall incorporate eight hours of
crisis intervention curriculum into its basic law enforcement academy
and shall offer an eight-hour in-service crisis intervention training
course.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,054,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,668,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,876,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $367,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,177,000
Farm Labor Contractor Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $904,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,261,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $354,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $260,561,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,626,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $279,402,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,186,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,735,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $654,399,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
increase elevator fees by up to 13.1 percent during the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium. This increase is necessary to support expenditures
authorized in this section, consistent with chapter 70.87 RCW.
(2) $1,336,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5362
(workers' compensation/vocational rehabilitation). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(3) $279,000 of the public works administration account--state
appropriation, $4,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation,
and $4,000 of the accident account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1420
(transportation improvement projects). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $465,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$355,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for the logging safety initiative effort and the goal of
reducing the frequency and severity of injuries in manual or
nonmechanized logging. $200,000 of the medical aid account--state
appropriation provided in this subsection may come from unspent safety
and health investment program grants and is not subject to the process
established in RCW 49.17.243. The department of labor and industries
shall use $620,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection in the
calculation of workers' compensation premiums for the forest products
industry and any other appropriate risk classes in future biennia. The
department shall submit a report to the legislature by December 31,
2014, on the approach of using a third-party safety certification
vendor, and on the accomplishments, work to date, and future plans of
the logging safety task force. The report must identify options for
future funding of the program and provide a permanent funding
recommendation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,996,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,906,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,912,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,340,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,321,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,460,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,425,000
Veteran Estate Management Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,105,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,651,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $300,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to provide
crisis and emergency relief and education, training, and employment
assistance to veterans and their families in their communities through
the veterans innovation program.

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,102,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,209,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,433,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,405,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,467,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $536,270,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $139,534,000
Hospital Data Collection Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $104,223,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $604,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,320,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,273,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,820,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,561,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $340,000
Site Closure Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,000
Biotoxin Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,323,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,805,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,389,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,512,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,236,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $304,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,790,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The department of health shall not initiate any services
that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless
expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department of
health and the state board of health shall not implement any new or
amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities
until the rules and a final cost estimate have been presented to the
legislature, and the legislature has formally funded implementation of
the rules through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The
department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the
federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the
program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the
department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those
moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any
other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal
amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of
any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management
shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this
subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and
other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on
specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state
funds.
(b) The joint administrative rules review committee shall review
the new or amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school
facilities under (a) of this subsection. The review committee shall
determine whether (i) the rules are within the intent of the
legislature as expressed by the statute that the rule implements, (ii)
the rule has been adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions
of law, or (iii) that the agency is using a policy or interpretive
statement in place of a rule. The rules review committee shall report
to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature the
results of committee's review and any recommendations that the
committee deems advisable.
(2) In accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.135.055, the department
is authorized to establish and raise fees in fiscal year 2014 as
necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the
appropriation levels in this section. This authorization applies to
fees required for newborn screening, and fees associated with the
following professions: Agency affiliated counselors; certified
counselors; and certified advisors.
(3)(a) $50,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to integrate the
prescription monitoring program into the coordinated care electronic
tracking program developed in response to section 213, chapter 7, Laws
of 2012, 2nd sp. sess., commonly referred to as the seven best
practices in emergency medicine.
(b) The integration must provide prescription monitoring program
data to emergency department personnel when the patient registers in
the emergency department. Such exchange may be a private or public
joint venture, including the use of the state health information
exchange.
(c) As part of the integration, the department shall request
insurers and third-party administrators that provide coverage to
residents of Washington state to provide the following to the
coordinated care electronic tracking program:
(i) Any available information regarding the assigned primary care
provider, and the primary care provider's telephone and fax numbers.
This information is to be used for real-time communication to an
emergency department provider when caring for a patient; and
(ii) Information regarding any available care plans or treatment
plans for patients with higher utilization of services on a regular
basis. This information is to be provided to the treating provider.
(4) $270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the Washington autism alliance to
assist autistic individuals and families with autistic children during
the transition to federal health reform.
(5) $6,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2014 and $5,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 are provided solely for the department to convene a work
group to study and recommend language for standardized clinical
affiliation agreements for clinical placements associated with the
education and training of physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW,
osteopathic physicians and surgeons licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW,
and nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW. The work group shall
develop one recommended standardized clinical affiliation agreement for
each profession or one recommended standardized clinical affiliation
agreement for all three professions.
(a) When choosing members of the work group, the department shall
consult with the health care personnel shortage task force and shall
attempt to ensure that the membership of the work group is
geographically diverse. The work group must, at a minimum, include
representatives of the following:
(i) Two-year institutions of higher education;
(ii) Four-year institutions of higher education;
(iii) The University of Washington medical school;
(iv) The college of osteopathic medicine at the Pacific Northwest
University of Health Sciences;
(v) The health care personnel shortage task force;
(vi) Statewide organizations representing hospitals and other
facilities that accept clinical placements;
(vii) A statewide organization representing physicians;
(viii) A statewide organization representing osteopathic physicians
and surgeons;
(ix) A statewide organization representing nurses;
(x) A labor organization representing nurses; and
(xi) Any other groups deemed appropriate by the department in
consultation with the health care personnel shortage task force.
(b) The work group shall report its findings to the governor and
the appropriate standing committees of the legislature no later than
November 15, 2014.
(6) $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are for the midwifery licensure and regulatory program
to supplement revenue from fees. Current annual fees for new or
renewed licenses for the midwifery program, except for online access to
HEAL-WA, may increase by no more than the rate of inflation as measured
by the consumer price index. The department shall convene the
midwifery advisory committee on a quarterly basis to address issues
related to licensed midwifery.
(7) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, each person subject to
RCW 43.70.110(3)(c) is required to pay only one surcharge of up to
twenty-five dollars annually for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112,
regardless of how many professional licenses the person holds.
(8) $35,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1003
(health professions licensees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $10,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1270 (board of denturists). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $10,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1271 (denturism). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $11,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1330
(dental hygienists, assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $1,008,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1343 (nurses surcharge). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $34,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1376 (suicide assessment training). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $10,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 1515 (medical assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $2,185,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1518 (disciplinary authorities). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(16) $141,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1525 (birth certificates and information). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $220,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill
No. 1534 (impaired dentist program). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $51,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1609 (board
of pharmacy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $12,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1629 (home care continuing education). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(20) $18,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1737 (physician assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(21) $77,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $38,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to develop a report on state
efforts to prevent and control diabetes. The department, the health
care authority, and the department of social and health services shall
submit a coordinated report to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 31, 2014, on the following:
(a) The financial impacts and reach that diabetes of all types and
undiagnosed gestational diabetes are having on the programs
administered by each agency and individuals, including children with
mothers with undiagnosed gestational diabetes, enrolled in those
programs. Items in this assessment must include: (i) The number of
lives with diabetes and undiagnosed gestational diabetes impacted or
covered by the programs administered by each agency; (ii) the number of
lives with diabetes, or at risk for diabetes, and family members
impacted by prevention and diabetes control programs implemented by
each agency; (iii) the financial toll or impact diabetes and its
complications, and undiagnosed gestational diabetes and the
complications experienced during labor to children of mothers with
gestational diabetes places on these programs in comparison to other
chronic diseases and conditions; and (iv) the financial toll or impact
diabetes and its complications, and diagnosed gestational diabetes and
the complications experienced during labor to children of mothers with
gestational diabetes places on these programs;
(b) An assessment of the benefits of implemented and existing
programs and activities aimed at controlling all types of diabetes and
preventing the disease. This assessment must also document the amount
and source for any funding directed to each agency for the programs and
activities aimed at reaching those with diabetes of all types;
(c) A description of the level of coordination existing between the
agencies on activities, programmatic activities, and messaging on
managing, treating, or preventing all types of diabetes and its
complications;
(d) The development or revision of detailed policy-related action
plans and budget recommendations for battling diabetes and undiagnosed
gestational diabetes that includes a range of actionable items for
consideration by the legislature. The plans and budget recommendations
must identify proposed action steps to reduce the impact of diabetes,
prediabetes, related diabetes complications, and undiagnosed
gestational diabetes. The plans and budget recommendations must also
identify expected outcomes of the action steps proposed in the
following biennium while also establishing benchmarks for controlling
and preventing all types of diabetes; and
(e) An estimate of savings, efficiencies, costs, and budgetary
savings and resources required to implement the plans and budget
recommendations identified in (d) of this subsection (24).
(22) Within the general fund--state amounts appropriated in this
section, the department of health will develop and administer the
certified home care aide examination translated into at least seven
languages in addition to the languages in which the examination is
available on the effective date of this act. The purpose of offering
the examination in additional languages is to encourage an adequate
supply of certified home care aides to meet diverse long-term care
client needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,085,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,585,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,670,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $35,000 of the general fund-- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the support of a statewide
council on mentally ill offenders that includes as its members
representatives of community-based mental health treatment programs,
current or former judicial officers, and directors and commanders of
city and county jails and state prison facilities. The council will
investigate and promote cost-effective approaches to meeting the
long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental disorders who have
a history of offending or who are at-risk of offending, including their
mental health, physiological, housing, employment, and job training
needs.
(b) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the department to contract
with a consultant who can facilitate and provide project expertise on
the implementation of community and prison based offender programming
that follows the risk-needs-responsivity model.
(i) By September 1, 2013, the department shall provide to the
consultant an inventory of all existing programming both in prisons and
in community operations. The department shall consult with the
Washington state institute for public policy (WSIPP) to determine
whether programs are evidence-based or research-based using definitions
provided by WSIPP and shall include this information on the inventory.
(ii) By October 1, 2013, the consultant shall report to the
department, the office of financial management, and legislative fiscal
committees on the department's current plans and processes for managing
offender programming including processes for phasing-out ineffective
programs and implementing evidence-based or research-based programs.
All department programs should be considered by the consultant
regardless of whether they are included on the most recent list of
WSIPP approved identifiable evidence-based practices in (b)(i) of this
subsection.
(iii) The WSIPP, in consultation with the department, shall
systematically review selected programs to determine the effectiveness
of these programs at reducing recidivism or other outcomes. The WSIPP
shall conduct a benefit-cost analysis of these programs when feasible
and shall report to the legislature by December 1, 2013.
(iv) Based on the report provided by the consultant and the WSIPP
review of programs, the department shall work collaboratively with the
consultant to develop and complete a written comprehensive
implementation plan by January 15, 2014. The implementation plan must
clearly identify the types of programs to be included, the recommended
locations where the programs will be sited, an implementation timeline,
and a phasing of the projected number of participants needed to meet
the threshold of available program funds.
(v) Using the written implementation plan as a guide, the
department must have programs in place and fully phased-in no later
than June 30, 2015.
(vi) The department shall hold the consultant on retainer to assist
the department as needed throughout the implementation process. The
consultant shall review quarterly the actual implementation compared to
the written implementation plan and shall provide a report to the
secretary of the department. The department shall provide reports to
the office of financial management and legislative fiscal committees as
follows:
(A) The written comprehensive implementation plan shall be provided
by January 15, 2014; and
(B) Written progress updates shall be provided by July 1, 2014, and
by December 1, 2014.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $606,143,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $607,085,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,322,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,586,000
State Toxics Control--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,224,241,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, when contracts are
established or renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone
services provided to inmates, the department shall select the
contractor or contractors primarily based on the following factors:
(i) The lowest rate charged to both the inmate and the person paying
for the telephone call; and (ii) the lowest commission rates paid to
the department, while providing reasonable compensation to cover the
costs of the department to provide the telephone services to inmates
and provide sufficient revenues for the activities funded from the
institutional welfare betterment account.
(b) By December 1, 2013, the department of corrections shall
provide a report to the office of financial management and the
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature that
evaluates the department's inmate intake processes and expenditures and
makes recommendations for improvements. The evaluation must include an
analysis of lean management processes that, if adopted, could improve
the efficiency and cost effectiveness of inmate intake.
(c) By December 1, 2013, the department of corrections shall
provide a report to the office of financial management and the
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature that
evaluates the department's use of partial confinement and work release
programs and makes recommendations for improving public safety and
decreasing recidivism through increasing participation in partial
confinement re-entry and work release programs. In making its
recommendations, the department shall identify:
(i) Options for increasing the capacity of work release beds to
meet the number of eligible offenders;
(ii) Potential cost savings to the state through contracting for or
building new work release capacity;
(iii) Options for expanding eligibility for partial confinement,
including creation of a structured re-entry program that includes
stable housing, mandatory participation in evidence-based programs, and
intensive supervision; and
(iv) Potential cost savings to the state from creation of a
structured re-entry program.
(d) By December 1, 2013, the department of corrections shall
provide a report to the office of financial management and the
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature that
evaluates the department's community parenting alternative program, and
makes recommendations for increasing participation in the program with
the goals of increasing public safety and decreasing recidivism. The
evaluation shall include recommendations for increasing the placement
of eligible offenders into the program and increasing eligibility to
other populations. In making its recommendations, the department shall
identify the percent of the eligible population currently entering the
program, outcomes to-date for program participants, and potential cost
savings from increasing placement of offenders into the program.
(e) The department of corrections shall contract with local and
tribal governments for the provision of jail capacity to house
offenders who violate the terms of their community supervision. A
contract shall not have a cost of incarceration in excess of $85 per
day per offender. A contract shall not have a year-to-year increase in
excess of three percent per year. The contracts may include rates for
the medical care of offenders which exceed the daily cost of
incarceration and the limitation on year-to-year increase, provided
that medical payments conform to the department's offender health plan,
pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are preapproved
by department utilization management staff.
(f) The department of corrections shall issue a competitive
solicitation by August 1, 2013, to contract with local jurisdictions
for the use of inmate bed capacity in lieu of prison beds operated by
the state. The department may contract for up to 300 beds statewide to
the extent that it is at no net cost to the department. The contracts
shall be for beds in western Washington and eastern Washington. The
duration of the contracts may be for up to four years. The department
shall not pay a rate greater than $65 per day for all costs associated
with the offender while in the local correctional facility to include
programming and health care costs, or the equivalent of $65 per day per
bed including programming and health care costs for full units. The
capacity provided at local correctional facilities must be for
offenders who the department of corrections defines as medium security
offenders. Local jurisdictions must provide health care to offenders
that meet standards set by the department. The department will report
to legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management
by November 1, 2013, to provide a status update on implementation.
(g) The department shall convene a work group to develop health
care cost containment strategies at local jail facilities. The work
group shall identify cost containment strategies in place at the
department and at local jail facilities, identify the costs and
benefits of implementing strategies in jail health-care facilities, and
make recommendations on implementing beneficial strategies. The work
group shall submit a report on its findings and recommendations to the
fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2013. The work
group shall include jail administrators, representatives from health
care facilities at the local jail level and the state prisons level,
and other representatives as deemed necessary.
(h) $1,026,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $781,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to expand the piloted
risk-needs-responsivity model to include the use of cognitive
behavioral therapy with evidence-based programming at two minimum
security prison facilities and at the Monroe correctional complex.
(i) $24,563,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $25,606,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for offender programming.
Pursuant to section 220(1) of this act, the department shall develop
and implement a written comprehensive plan for offender programming
that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity
model, are evidence-based, and have measurable outcomes. The
department is authorized to discontinue ineffective programs and to
repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities in the written
plan.
(j) $36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Senate Bill No. 5484 (assault in the third-degree). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(k) $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the costs incurred by Snohomish county
for State v. Scherf.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,472,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,102,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,906,000
Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $264,680,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $1,906,000 of the county criminal justice assistance account--state appropriation and $2,200,000 of the ignition interlock device
revolving account--state appropriation are provided solely for the
department to contract for additional residential drug offender
sentencing alternative treatment slots. By December 1, 2013, the
department shall provide a report to the appropriate fiscal committees
of the house of representatives and the senate on the use of the
additional treatment slots.
(b) $4,186,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $6,362,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 must be expended on evidence-based programs that
follow the risk-needs-responsivity model. The department is authorized
to use up to ten percent of these funds as necessary to secure physical
space as needed to maximize program delivery of evidence-based
treatment to all high-risk, high-need offenders in community
supervision. Funding may be prioritized by the department to any
program recognized as evidence-based for adult offenders by the
Washington state institute for public policy.
(c) $16,513,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $16,527,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for offender programming.
Pursuant to section 220 (1) of this act, the department shall develop
and implement a written comprehensive plan for offender programming
that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity
model, are evidence-based, and have measurable outcomes. The
department is authorized to discontinue ineffective programs and to
repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities in the written
plan.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,472,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,060,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,532,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $2,985,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $3,583,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the
stewardship of McNeil island. The department shall assume
responsibility of all island maintenance excluding site specific
maintenance operations for the special commitment center and the Pierce
county secure transitional facility. The department shall as part of
its industries program provide job skills to offenders while providing
the minimum maintenance and preservation necessary for the state to
remain in compliance with the federal deed for McNeil island. The
department shall report on efficiencies and potential cost reductions
to the office of financial management and legislative fiscal committees
by December 15, 2013.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,345,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,115,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,460,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The state prison medical facilities may
use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and
supplies through hospital or other group purchasing organizations when
it is cost effective to do so.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE
BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,242,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,202,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,080,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,584,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT

General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,061,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,229,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,596,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,771,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,851,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $683,508,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $12,386,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is from amounts made available to the
state by section 903(g) of the social security act (Reed act). This
amount is provided solely for the replacement of the unemployment
insurance tax information system for the employment security
department. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on
the department satisfying the requirements of the project management
oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief
information officer.
(2) $3,735,000 of the unemployment compensation account--federal
appropriation is from amounts made available to the state by section
903(g) of the social security act (Reed act). This amount is provided
solely for the replacement of call center technology to improve the
integration of the telephone and computing systems to increase
efficiency and improve customer service.
(3) $182,000 of the employment services administrative account--state appropriation is provided for costs associated with the second
stage of the review and evaluation of the training benefits program as
directed in section 15(2), chapter 4, Laws of 2011 (unemployment
insurance program). This second stage shall be developed and conducted
by the joint legislative audit and review committee and shall consist
of further work on the process study and net-impact/cost-benefit
analysis components of the evaluation.
(4) $240,000 of the administrative contingency account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the employment security department
to contract with a center for workers in King county. The amount
appropriated in this subsection shall be used by the contracted center
for workers to support initiatives that generate high-skill, high-wage
jobs; improve workforce and training systems; improve service delivery
for dislocated workers; and build alliances with community and
environmental organizations.
(5) The department is prohibited from expending amounts
appropriated in this section for implementation of chapter 49.86 RCW.

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $444,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $448,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $875,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,798,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,854,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,568,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,314,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,927,000
Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,740,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,987,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,734,000
State Drought Preparedness Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities) -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $427,000
Aquatic Algae Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $513,000
Water Rights Tracking System Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $557,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $613,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,703,000
Water Rights Processing Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,333,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $980,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,337,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,039,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,353,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,046,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,130,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,692,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,136,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,410,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,076,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $357,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,509,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,021,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $455,631,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of
Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program
targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(2) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
increase the following fees as necessary to meet the actual costs of
conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section:
Wastewater discharge permit, not more than 4.55 percent in fiscal year
2014 and 4.63 percent in fiscal year 2015; and reasonably available
control technology fee.
(3) $1,981,000 of the state toxics control account -- state
appropriation is for the department to provide training regarding the
benefits of low-impact development including, but not limited to, when
the use of low-impact development is appropriate and feasible, and the
design, installation, maintenance, and best practices of low-impact
development. The department will consult with Washington State
University extension low-impact development technical center and others
in the development of the low-impact technical training. As
appropriate, the department may contract with the Washington State
University extension low-impact development technical center, private
sector vendors, associations, and others to deliver the technical
training. The training must be provided free of cost to phase I and
phase II permittees and the private development community including
builders, engineers, and other industry professionals. The training
must be sequenced geographically and provided in time for local
jurisdictions to comply with RCW 90.48.260 and 36.70A.130(5). By
August 1, 2013, the department of ecology shall provide the governor
and appropriate legislative committees a plan for how low-impact
development training funds will be spent during fiscal years 2014
through 2017.
(4) $440,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for administering the water pollution
control facilities financial assistance program authorized in chapter
90.50A RCW.
(5) $350,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Spokane river regional toxics
task force to support their efforts to address elevated levels of
polychlorinated biphenyls in the Spokane river. Funding will be used
to determine the extent of the cleanup required, implement cleanup
actions to meet applicable water quality standards, and prevent
recontamination.
(6) $516,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to support an
ultrafine particulate study to determine how, if at all, the biomass
cogeneration facilities in Port Townsend and Port Angeles may impact
air quality and the health of citizens in the region.
(7) $65,000 of the water quality permit account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1245 (derelict and abandoned vessels). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,929,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,929,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,017,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,065,000
ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $215,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,860,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,298,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,976,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest weather and avalanche center.
(2) Prior to closing any state park, the commission must notify all
affected local governments and relevant nonprofit organizations of the
intended closure and provide an opportunity for the notified local
governments and nonprofit organizations to elect to acquire, or enter
into, a maintenance and operating contract with the commission that
would allow the park to remain open.
(3) The commission shall prepare a report on its efforts to
increase revenue from all sources, including the discover pass. The
report shall also include a status update on the fiscal health of the
state parks system, and shall be submitted to the office of financial
management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October
28, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $823,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $816,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,430,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $480,000
Firearms Range Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,089,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $965,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,664,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE
HEARINGS OFFICE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,227,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,153,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,380,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,841,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,746,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,301,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,888,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
conservation commission, in consultation with conservation districts,
must submit to the office of financial management and legislative
fiscal committees by December 10, 2013, a report containing proposals
for the consolidation of conservation districts within counties in
which there is more than one district. The report must include details
on the anticipated future savings that would be expected from
consolidating districts starting on July 1, 2014.
(2) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to implement the voluntary
stewardship program in Thurston and Chelan counties. These amounts may
not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.
(3) $1,000,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely to implement the voluntary stewardship program
statewide. The commission shall place the appropriation in this
subsection in unallotted status, and may not allot any of these funds
until the federal government has provided funding to the commission for
the purpose of implementing the voluntary stewardship program.
(4) The conservation commission must evaluate the current system
for the election of conservation district board supervisors and
recommend improvements to ensure the highest degree of public
involvement in these elections. The commission must engage with
stakeholder groups and conservation districts to gather a set of
options for improvement to district elections, which must include an
option aligning district elections with state and local general
elections. The commission must submit a report detailing the options
to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 10, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,521,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,299,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $107,753,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,890,000
ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $399,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,928,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,595,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,513,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $849,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $209,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $738,000
State Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,510,000
Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,406,000
Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,447,000
Wildlife Rehabilitation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $259,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,224,000
Hydraulic Project Approval Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $674,000
Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid Recovery
Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,001,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $918,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $774,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $368,407,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to pay for emergency fire
suppression costs. These amounts may not be used to fund agency
indirect and administrative expenses.
(2) Prior to submitting its 2015-2017 biennial operating and
capital budget request related to state fish hatcheries to the office
of financial management, the department shall contract with the
hatchery scientific review group (HSRG) to review this request. This
review shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent
with HSRG recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the
requests based on their contributions to protecting wild salmonid
stocks and meeting the recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate
whether the proposed requests are being made in the most cost effective
manner. The department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the
office of financial management with their agency budget proposal.
(3) $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
army corps of engineers.
(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall identify additional opportunities for partnerships in order to
keep fish hatcheries operational. Such partnerships shall aim to
maintain fish production and salmon recovery with less reliance on
state operating funds.
(5) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the department must
retain ownership and continue to occupy the downtown Olympia office
building at 600 Capitol Way.
(6) $1,000,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation
is provided solely to the department for resources that serve to
promote and engage nonlethal deterrence methods relating to wolf and
livestock interaction with a priority given to funding cooperative
agreements with livestock producers, and for providing compensation for
injury or loss of livestock caused by wolves as prescribed in chapter
77.36 RCW.
(7) $180,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract with a community-based
organization to disseminate information about apex predators in the
North Cascades.
(8) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the transfer of trout from the
Clark's Creek hatchery to the Lakewood hatchery.
(9) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to the department for the
production of Steelhead, Coho, and Chinook at the Clark's Creek
hatchery.
(10) $200,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation,
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2014,
and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2015 are provided solely for the department to increase production of
juvenile fall Chinook on the Cowlitz river. The funds provided may be
used to match or leverage funds from private or public sources for the
same purpose.
(11) $596,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $596,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for weed assessments and for
payments in lieu of real property taxes to counties that elect to
receive the payments for department owned game lands within the county.
(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
department must deploy additional wildlife conflict specialists to
provide landowner assistance and address wildlife conflicts, with at
least one additional specialist primarily assigned to each of the
following areas: Administrative region six of the department; Okanogan
and Chelan counties in administrative region two of the department; and
Whatcom and Skagit counties in administrative region four of the
department.
(13) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill
No. 1112 (science and public policy). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) Within the amounts appropriated in this section the department
shall work with the regional fisheries enhancement groups to identify
a revenue source or sources capable of providing long-term funding to
support the community-based salmon restoration work of regional
fisheries enhancement groups. The department shall work with the
regional fisheries enhancement group coalition to submit a report to
the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative
committees by December 1, 2013, with the outcomes and recommendations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,933,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,616,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,970,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,372,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,132,000
ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,501,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,173,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $584,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,279,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,978,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Forest and Fish Support Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,760,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $843,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
Marine Resources Stewardship Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,028,000
Forest Practices Application Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,697,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $786,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $651,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,771,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,716,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $323,524,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,389,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,327,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural
college trust management account and are provided solely to manage
approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.
(2) $19,099,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $19,099,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $5,000,000 of the disaster response account -- state appropriation are provided solely for emergency fire suppression.
None of the general fund and disaster response account amounts provided
in this subsection may be used to fund agency indirect and
administrative expenses. Agency indirect and administrative costs
shall be allocated among the agency's remaining accounts and
appropriations. The department of natural resources shall submit a
quarterly report to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and
planned expenditures from the disaster response account. This work
shall be done in coordination with the military department.
(3) $5,000,000 of the forest and fish support account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based, performance
contracts with tribes to participate in the implementation of the
forest practices program. Contracts awarded may only contain indirect
costs set at or below the rate in the contracting tribe's indirect cost
agreement with the federal government. If federal funding for this
purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $660,000 of the forest and fish support account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based performance
contracts with nongovernmental organizations to participate in the
implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded may
only contain indirect cost set at or below a rate of eighteen percent.
(5) $717,000 of the forest and fish support account -- state
appropriation is provided solely to fund interagency agreements with
the department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife as
part of the adaptive management process.
(6) $440,000 of the state general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $440,000 of the state general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for forest work
crews that support correctional camps and are contingent upon
continuing operations of Naselle youth camp.
(7) $2,382,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation is for addressing the growing backlog of expired aquatic
leases and new aquatic lease applications. The department shall
implement a Lean process to improve the lease review process and
further reduce the backlog, and submit a report on its progress in
addressing the backlog and implementation of the Lean process to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October
1, 2013.
(8) $1,948,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to pay a portion of
the costs to complete remedial investigation work at Whitmarsh landfill
and Mill site A and perform final-year maintenance of the Olympic view
triangle site in Commencement Bay.
(9) $265,000 of the resources management cost account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1764 (geoduck diver licenses). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(10) $425,000 of the derelict vessel removal account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1245 (derelict and abandoned vessels). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(11) $3,700,000 of the marine resources stewardship trust account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of priority
marine management planning efforts including mapping activities,
ecological assessment, data tools, stakeholder engagement, and all
other work identified in Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5603 (marine
advisory councils) during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,300,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,324,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,119,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,840,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,208,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,053,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,308,445 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $5,302,905 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementing the food
assistance program as defined in RCW 43.23.290.
(2) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055 and 16.57.220, the department is
authorized to institute livestock inspection fees in the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium for calves less than thirty days old.
(3) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055 and 16.36.150, the department is
authorized to establish a fee for the sole purpose of purchasing and
operating a database and any other technology or software needed to
administer animal disease traceability activities for cattle sold or
slaughtered in the state or transported out of the state.
(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
of agriculture must convene and facilitate a work group with
appropriate stakeholders to review fees supporting programs within the
department that are also supported with state general fund. In
developing strategies to make the program work more self-supporting,
the workgroup will consider, at minimum, the length of time since the
last fee increase, similar fees that exist in neighboring states, and
fee increases that will ensure reasonable competitiveness in the
respective industries. The workgroup must submit a report containing
recommendations that will make each of the fee supported programs
within the department less reliant on state general fund to the office
of financial management and legislative fiscal committees by December
1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY
INSURANCE PROGRAM
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $988,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,416,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,324,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,577,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,920,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $677,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,914,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $788,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for coordinating a study of Puget
Sound juvenile steelhead marine survival conducted by the department of
fish and wildlife and based on a study plan developed in cooperation
with federal, tribal, and nongovernmental entities.
(2) By October 1, 2014, the Puget Sound partnership shall provide
the governor a single, prioritized list of state agency 2015-2017
capital and operating budget requests related to Puget Sound
restoration.

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,103,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,345,000
Architects' License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $903,000
Professional Engineers' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,563,000
Real Estate Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,946,000
Uniform Commercial Code Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,157,000
Real Estate Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000
Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,705,000
Business and Professions Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,483,000
Funeral and Cemetery Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
Landscape Architects Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Appraisal Management Company Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Real Estate Research Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $415,000
Wildlife Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000
Geologists' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,024,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $566,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1552 (scrap metal theft reduction). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(2) $166,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation in fiscal year 2014 only is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1779 (esthetics). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $592,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1822 (debt collection practices). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,653,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,592,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,195,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,020,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,965,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,338,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,354,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,104,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $517,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,990,000
Vehicle License Fraud Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $448,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $134,361,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the fire service training account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the
state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12
construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the
state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide
these services only to those districts that are located in counties
without qualified review capabilities.
(2) $8,000,000 of the disaster response account--state
appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service
resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or
disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964. The state
patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information
on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall
be done in coordination with the military department.
(3) $1,000,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship
training program.
(4) $3,480,000 of the fingerprint identification account--state
appropriation is provided solely for upgrades to the Washington state
identification system and the Washington crime information center.
Amounts provided in this subsection may not be expended until the
office of the chief information officer approves a plan to move the
Washington state patrol's servers and data center equipment into the
state data center in the 1500 Jefferson building, and the office of the
chief information officer certifies that the Washington state patrol
has begun the move. The amounts provided in this subsection are
conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the
project management oversight standards and policies established by the
office of the chief information officer.
(5) $154,000 of the fingerprint identification account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1612 (firearms offenders). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) In accordance with RCW 43.135.055 and 43.43.742, the state
patrol is authorized to increase the following fees in fiscal year 2014
as necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the
appropriation levels in this section: Electronic and paper-based
fingerprint and name and date of birth background checks.

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,336,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,450,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,862,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,005,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $121,653,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A maximum of $17,429,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $16,878,000 of the general
fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is for state agency
operations.
(a) $9,102,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $8,944,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(i) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(a), the
superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of
four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the
civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans
civic education award.
(ii) Districts shall report to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction daily student unexcused absence data by school,
using a uniform definition of unexcused absence as established by the
superintendent.
(iii) By September of each year, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall produce an annual status report of the
budget provisos in sections 501 and 513 of this act. The status report
of each proviso shall include, but not be limited to, the following
information: Purpose and objective, number of staff, number of
contractors, status of proviso implementation, number of beneficiaries
by year, list of beneficiaries, and proviso outcomes and achievements.
(iv) The superintendent of public instruction shall update the
program prepared and distributed under RCW 28A.230.150 for the
observation of temperance and good citizenship day to include providing
an opportunity for eligible students to register to vote at school.
(b) $1,017,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,017,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for activities associated with the
implementation of new school finance systems required by chapter 236,
Laws of 2010 (K-12 education funding) and chapter 548, Laws of 2009
(state's education system), including technical staff, systems
reprogramming, and workgroup deliberations, including the quality
education council and the data governance working group.
(c)(i) $851,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $851,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities.
(ii) $234,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $234,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to the state board of education
for implementation of Initiative Measure No. 1240 (charter schools).
(d) $1,494,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,494,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to the professional educator
standards board for the following:
(i) $1,050,000 in fiscal year 2014 and $1,050,000 in fiscal year
2015 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional
educator standards board;
(ii) $419,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $419,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are for mentor stipends provided through the
alternative routes to certification program administered by the
professional educator standards board, including the pipeline for
paraeducators program and the retooling to teach conditional loan
programs. Funding within this subsection (1)(d)(ii) is also provided
for the recruiting Washington teachers program; and
(iii) $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the professional educator
standards board to develop educator interpreter standards and identify
interpreter assessments that are available to school districts.
Interpreter assessments should meet the following criteria: (A)
Include both written assessment and performance assessment; (B) be
offered by a national organization of professional sign language
interpreters and transliterators; and (C) be designed to assess
performance in more than one sign system or sign language. The board
shall establish a performance standard, defining what constitutes a
minimum assessment result, for each educational interpreter assessment
identified. The board shall publicize the standards and assessments
for school district use.
(e) $133,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $133,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil
rights.
(f) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the ongoing work of the
education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.
(g) $45,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $45,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on educational
opportunity for military children).
(h) $131,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $131,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of
Initiative Measure No. 1240 (charter schools).
(i) $1,826,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,802,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive
data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including
development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and
research system (CEDARS).
(j) $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for project citizen, a program
sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and the
center for civic education to promote participation in government by
middle school students.
(k) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for collaborative schools for
innovation and success authorized under chapter 53, Laws of 2012. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award $500,000
per year in funding for each collaborative school for innovation and
success selected for participation in the pilot program during 2012.
(l) $123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 163,
Laws of 2012 (foster care outcomes). The office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall annually report each December on the
implementation of the state's plan of cross-system collaboration to
promote educational stability and improve education outcomes of foster
youth.
(m) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 178,
Laws of 2012 (open K-12 education resources).
(n) $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for chapter 185, Laws of 2011
(bullying prevention, which requires the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to convene an ongoing workgroup on school
bullying and harassment prevention. Within the amounts provided,
$140,000 is for youth suicide prevention activities.
(o) $138,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1336
(troubled youth in school). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(p) $118,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $14,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill
No. 1134 (state-tribal education compacts). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(q) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to develop and implement an
outreach and education program to inform school districts and employee
representative organizations of the health insurance plans, premium tax
credits, and out-of-pocket cost subsidies available to individuals who
purchase health plans offered through the Washington health benefit
exchange. The outreach and education program shall be developed in
collaboration with school districts, health care authority, employee
representative organizations, the Washington health benefit exchange,
and other appropriate entities.
(r) $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
competitive grants to school districts to increase the capacity of high
schools to offer AP computer science courses. In making grant
allocations, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
must give priority to schools and districts in rural areas, with
substantial enrollment of low-income students, and that do not offer AP
computer science. School districts may apply to receive either or both
of the following grants:
(i) A grant to establish partnerships to support computer science
professionals from private industry serving on a voluntary basis as
coinstructors along with a certificated teacher, including via
synchronous video, for AP computer science courses; or
(ii) A grant to purchase or upgrade technology and curriculum
needed for AP computer science, as well as provide opportunities for
professional development for classroom teachers to have the requisite
knowledge and skills to teach AP computer science.
(s) $27,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1556
(cardiac arrest education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(t) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the development of recommendations for
funding integrated school nursing and outreach services. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall collaborate with the
health care authority to develop recommendations for increasing federal
financial participation for providing nursing services in schools with
the goals of integrating nursing and outreach services and supporting
one nurse for every four-hundred fifty students in elementary schools
and one nurse for every seven-hundred fifty students in secondary
schools. The recommendations shall include proposals for funding
training and reimbursement for nurses that provide outreach services to
help eligible students enroll in apple health for kids and other social
services programs. The authority and the office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall provide these recommendations to the
governor and the legislature by December 1, 2013.
(u) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to contract with an organization to develop a model
plan for evaluating the outcomes of state funded pilot education
programs, including guidelines for standard data that must be gathered
throughout any education pilot program, as well as guidance for data
and evaluation methods depending on the design of the program and the
target population. The contract must also include a provision to
provide guidance for the evaluation of existing pilot programs.
(v) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the superintendent of public
instruction to convene a committee for the selection and recognition of
Washington innovative schools. The committee shall select and
recognize Washington innovative schools based on the selection criteria
established by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
in accordance with chapter 202, Laws of 2011 (innovation schools--recognition) and chapter 260, Laws of 2011 (innovation schools and
zones).
(2) $9,957,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $9,584,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are for statewide programs.
(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a corps of nurses located at
educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of
public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to
provide direct care to students, health education, and training for
school staff.
(ii) $135,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $135,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a nonviolence and leadership
training program provided by the institute for community leadership.
(b) TECHNOLOGY
$1,221,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year
2014 and $1,221,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network
technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and
avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and
video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be
used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the
network.
(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $2,175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $2,175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers
scholarship program. The funds shall be used to support community
involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer
mentors with students selected as achievers scholars.
(ii) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for contracting with a college
scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach to
students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound
scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007.
(iii) $337,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $337,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of the building
bridges statewide program for comprehensive dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement strategies.
(iv) $135,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $135,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for dropout prevention programs at
the office of the superintendent of public instruction, including the
jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program.
(v) $2,020,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,647,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
340, Laws of 2011 and chapter 51, Laws of 2012. This includes the
development and implementation of the Washington kindergarten inventory
of developing skills (WaKIDS).
(vi) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to subsidize advanced placement
exam fees and international baccalaureate class fees and exam fees for
low-income students. To be eligible for the subsidy, a student must be
either enrolled or eligible to participate in the federal free or
reduced price lunch program, and the student must have maximized the
allowable federal contribution. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall set the subsidy in an amount so that the
advanced placement exam fee does not exceed $15.00 and the combined
class and exam fee for the international baccalaureate does not exceed
$14.50.
(vii) $293,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $293,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to support the dissemination of
the navigation 101 curriculum to all districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,445,282,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,735,636,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,283,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,206,201,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such
funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal
year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(b) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as
provided in the funding formulas and salary schedules in sections 502
and 503 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.
(c) From July 1, 2013 to August 31, 2013, the superintendent shall
allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as
provided in sections 502 and 503, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 1st sp.
sess., as amended through sections 502 and 503 of the 2013 omnibus
supplemental operating appropriations act.
(d) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in
September and on the first school day of each month October through
June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. Any school district concluding its basic education
program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held
in May in lieu of a June enrollment.
(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS
Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the
2013-14 and 2014-15 school years are determined using formula-generated
staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.
(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW
28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size
allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as
provided in RCW 28A.150.260. The superintendent shall make allocations
to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time
equivalent student enrollment in each grade.
(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in
this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW
28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education,
except as otherwise provided in this section.
(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of
prototypical school on the following regular education average class
size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided
in (c)(ii) of this subsection:

General education class size:

Grade RCW 28A.150.260 2013-14
School Year 2014-15
School Year

Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 23.50 23.50

Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00 27.00

Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00 27.00

Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53 28.53

Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74 28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for career and technical
education (CTE) and skill center programs average class size as
provided in RCW 28A.150.260.
(ii) For each level of prototypical school at which more than fifty
percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals
in the prior school year, the superintendent shall allocate funding
based on the following average class size of full-time equivalent
students per teacher:

General education class size in high poverty
school: 2013-14
School Year 2014-15
School Year

Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 21.76 21.76

Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00 27.00

Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00 27.00

Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53 28.53

Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74 28.74

(iii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher
planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is
13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and
(iv) Laboratory science, advanced placement, and international
baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as
general education schools in the same grade; and
(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social
workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated
based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and is
considered certificated instructional staff, except as provided in
(d)(ii) of this subsection.
(ii) Students in approved career and technical education and skill
center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to
provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social
workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following
combined rate per 1000 students:

Career and Technical Education
students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.02 per 1000 student FTE's
Skill Center students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.36 per 1000 student FTE's

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS
(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated
administrative staff salaries for the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years
for general education students are determined using the formula
generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection. The
superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the
district's annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in each
grade. The following prototypical school values shall determine the
allocation for principals, assistance principals, and other
certificated building level administrators:

Prototypical School Building:

Elementary School . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.253

Middle School . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.353

High School . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.880

(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill
center programs generate certificated school building-level
administrator staff units at per student rates that are a multiple of
the general education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following
factors: Career and Technical Education students . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.025
Skill Center students . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.198

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS
Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2013-14 and 2014-15
school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units
provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and adjusted based on each district's
annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS
In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated
in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and
administrative staff units are provided for the 2013-14 and 2014-15
school year for the central office administrative costs of operating a
school district, at the following rates:
(a) The total central office staff units provided in this
subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of
eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and
classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support
services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b), by 5.3 percent.
(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this
subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as
generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.47 percent shall be
allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3)
of this section.
(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of
basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and
staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students,
are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in
(a) of this subsection.
(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center
programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same
staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education
students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office
administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student
rates that exceed the general education rate established for students
in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 1.97 percent in the 2013-14
school year and 1.97 percent in the 2014-15 school year for career and
technical education students, and 21.92 percent in the 2013-14 school
year and 21.92 percent in the 2014-15 school year for skill center
students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS
Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 18.68
percent in the 2013-14 school year and 18.68 percent in the 2014-15
school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 20.95
percent in the 2013-14 school year and 20.95 percent in the 2014-15
school year for classified salary allocations provided under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS
Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504 of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in
subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections
(4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is
intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of
distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent classified
employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per
year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time
equivalent.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS
Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent
student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC)
incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW
28A.150.260.
(a) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at
the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component 2013-14
SCHOOL YEAR 2014-15
SCHOOL YEAR

Technology $82.43 $83.83

Utilities and Insurance $223.98 $227.78

Curriculum and Textbooks $88.50 $90.01

Other Supplies and Library Materials $187.89 $191.08

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated
and Classified Staff
$13.69
$13.92

Facilities Maintenance $110.96 $112.84

Security and Central Office $76.86 $78.18

TOTAL BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE $784.31 $797.64

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student
FTE MSOC allocations of $1,249.17 for the 2013-14 school year and
$1,270.41 for the 2014-15 school year.
(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education programs generate a per student MSOC allocation of
$1,249.17 for the 2013-14 school year and $1,270.41 for the 2014-15
school year.
(d) Students in laboratory science courses generate per student FTE
MSOC allocations which equal the per student FTE rate for general
education students established in (a) of this subsection.

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS
For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, funding for substitute
costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute
days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this
section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING
(a) Amounts provided in this section from July 1, 2013, to August
31, 2013, are adjusted to reflect provisions of chapter 34, Laws of
2011 1st sp. sess. (allocation of funding for funding for students
enrolled in alternative learning experiences).
(b) Amounts provided in this section beginning September 1, 2013,
are adjusted to reflect 2013 legislation that modifies alternative
learning experience courses.
(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all
districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative
learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to
provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE
programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not
limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as
accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic
education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident
students.

(11) VOLUNTARY FULL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS
Funding in this section is sufficient to fund voluntary full day
kindergarten programs in qualifying high poverty schools, pursuant to
RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315. Each kindergarten student who enrolls
for the voluntary full-day program in a qualifying school shall count
as one-half of one full-time equivalent student for purpose of making
allocations under this section. Funding in this section provides full-day kindergarten programs for 48.0 percent of kindergarten enrollment
in the 2013-14 school year and 48.0 percent in the 2014-15 school year.

(12) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND
NECESSARY PLANTS
For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants
within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary
by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are
provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional
administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to
districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education
staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center
enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of
this section on a per district basis.
(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and
enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent
students in grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full-time equivalent students;
(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall
add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any
grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs
with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this
subsection;
(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit;
(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit;
(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit
allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified
staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit; and
(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support
small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under this
subsection (12) shall generate additional MSOC allocations consistent
with the nonemployee related costs (NERC) allocation formula in place
for the 2010-11 school year as provided section 502, chapter 37, Laws
of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental budget), adjusted annually for
inflation.
(13) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(14) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following
programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2014
and 2015 as follows:
(a) $607,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $617,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for fire protection for school
districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter
established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.
(b) $436,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $436,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for programs providing skills
training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day
school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public
instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500
per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.
(15) $214,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $218,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for school district emergencies as
certified by the superintendent of public instruction. At the close of
the fiscal year the superintendent of public instruction shall report
to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature on the allocations provided to districts
and the nature of the emergency.
(16) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of
1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463,
Laws of 2007.
(17) Students participating in running start programs may be funded
up to a combined maximum enrollment of 1.2 FTE including school
district and institution of higher education enrollment. In
calculating the combined 1.2 FTE, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction may average the participating student's September
through June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end
dates for courses provided by the high school and higher education
institution. Additionally, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, in consultation with the state board for community and
technical colleges, the higher education coordinating board, and the
education data center, shall annually track and report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of
students participating in the running start program, including course
load analyses at both the high school and community and technical
college system.
(18) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (12) of this section, the following apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (12) of this section shall be
reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.
(19)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved
career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not
exceed ten percent of the combined basic education and career and
technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds.
Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are
considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting
purposes under this section.
(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent
enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the
enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall
be adjusted for reported career and technical education program
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION
(1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the
state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated
administrative, and classified staff units as provided in RCW
28A.150.280 and under section 502 of this act:
(a) Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units
are determined for each district by multiplying the district's
certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 2
by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated
instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP document
1; and
(b) Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units
and classified staff units for each district are determined based on
the district's certificated administrative and classified salary
allocation amounts shown on LEAP Document 2.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "LEAP Document 1" means the staff mix factors for certificated
instructional staff according to education and years of experience, as
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee on June 1, 2013 at 08:06 hours; and
(b) "LEAP Document 2" means the school year salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff and classified staff and derived and
total base salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed
by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on
June 1, 2013 at 01:29 hours.
(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary
adjustments at a rate of 18.04 percent for school year 2013-14 and
18.04 percent for school year 2014-15 for certificated instructional
and certificated administrative staff and 17.45 percent for school year
2013-14 and 17.45 percent for the 2014-15 school year for classified
staff.
(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state-wide salary
allocation schedules for certificated instructional staff are
established for basic education salary allocations:

Table Of Total Base Salaries For Certificated Instructional Staff For School Year 2013-14

*** Education Experience ***

Years MA+90

of OR

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 Ph.D.

0 34,048 34,968 35,920 36,875 39,939 41,913 40,820 43,885 45,860

1 34,506 35,439 36,403 37,400 40,496 42,459 41,274 44,370 46,332

2 34,943 35,884 36,859 37,933 41,020 43,004 41,731 44,818 46,802

3 35,393 36,343 37,329 38,437 41,518 43,549 42,164 45,243 47,276

4 35,834 36,826 37,818 38,964 42,064 44,110 42,618 45,718 47,765

5 36,290 37,287 38,288 39,498 42,586 44,673 43,080 46,169 48,256

6 36,759 37,734 38,769 40,039 43,113 45,211 43,552 46,626 48,723

7 37,582 38,572 39,621 40,960 44,079 46,235 44,438 47,556 49,713

8 38,787 39,831 40,905 42,355 45,516 47,751 45,832 48,994 51,228

9 41,135 42,262 43,765 46,999 49,310 47,241 50,477 52,788

10 43,635 45,247 48,524 50,913 48,724 52,003 54,390

11 46,772 50,121 52,557 50,249 53,599 56,034

12 48,249 51,761 54,269 51,835 55,238 57,748

13 53,440 56,024 53,476 56,918 59,501

14 55,128 57,844 55,165 58,716 61,322

15 56,563 59,349 56,599 60,242 62,917

16 or
more 57,693 60,535 57,731 61,447 64,174

Table Of Total Base Salaries For Certificated Instructional Staff For School Year 2014-15

*** Education Experience ***

Years MA+90

of OR

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 Ph.D.

0 34,048 34,968 35,920 36,875 39,939 41,913 40,820 43,885 45,860

1 34,506 35,439 36,403 37,400 40,496 42,459 41,274 44,370 46,332

2 34,943 35,884 36,859 37,933 41,020 43,004 41,731 44,818 46,802

3 35,393 36,343 37,329 38,437 41,518 43,549 42,164 45,243 47,276

4 35,834 36,826 37,818 38,964 42,064 44,110 42,618 45,718 47,765

5 36,290 37,287 38,288 39,498 42,586 44,673 43,080 46,169 48,256

6 36,759 37,734 38,769 40,039 43,113 45,211 43,552 46,626 48,723

7 37,582 38,572 39,621 40,960 44,079 46,235 44,438 47,556 49,713

8 38,787 39,831 40,905 42,355 45,516 47,751 45,832 48,994 51,228

9 41,135 42,262 43,765 46,999 49,310 47,241 50,477 52,788

10 43,635 45,247 48,524 50,913 48,724 52,003 54,390

11 46,772 50,121 52,557 50,249 53,599 56,034

12 48,249 51,761 54,269 51,835 55,238 57,748

13 53,440 56,024 53,476 56,918 59,501

14 55,128 57,844 55,165 58,716 61,322

15 56,563 59,349 56,599 60,242 62,917

16 or
more 57,693 60,535 57,731 61,447 64,174

(b) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer
to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate
degree.
(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before
the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be
counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection,
the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:
(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and
(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.
(b) "MA" means a masters degree.
(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.
(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and
28A.415.023.
(6) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by
any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine
compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and
LEAP documents referenced in this part V, or any replacement schedules
and documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(7) The salary allocation schedules established in this section are
for allocation purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Additional salary adjustments as necessary to fund the base
salaries for certificated instructional staff as listed for each
district in LEAP Document 2, defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act.
Allocations for these salary adjustments shall be provided to all
districts that are not grandfathered to receive salary allocations
above the statewide salary allocation schedule, and to certain
grandfathered districts to the extent necessary to ensure that salary
allocations for districts that are currently grandfathered do not fall
below the statewide salary allocation schedule.
(b) Additional salary adjustments to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff as listed for each district in LEAP
Document 2, defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act.
(c) Additional salary adjustments to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for classified
staff as listed for each district in LEAP Document 2, defined in
section 503(2)(b) of this act.
(d) The appropriations in this subsection (1) include associated
incremental fringe benefit allocations at 18.04 percent for the 2013-14
school year and 18.04 percent for the 2014-15 school year for
certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and
17.45 percent for the 2013-14 school year and 17.45 percent for the
2014-15 school year for classified staff.
(e) The appropriations in this section include the increased or
decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all
relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes
for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary
allocation schedules and methodology in sections 502 and 503 of this
act. Changes for special education result from changes in each
district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
502 and 503 of this act.
(f) The appropriations in this section include no salary
adjustments for substitute teachers.
(2) The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is
$768.00 per month for the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years. The
appropriations in this section reflect the incremental change in cost
of allocating rates of $768.00 per month for the 2013-14 school year
and $768.00 per month for the 2014-15 school year.
(3) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,402,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $417,877,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $743,279,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for the
transportation of students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192.
(b) From July 1, 2013 to August 31, 2013, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of
students as provided in section 505, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 1st sp.
sess., as amended through section 505 of the 2013 omnibus supplemental
operating appropriations act.
(3) A maximum of $892,000 of this fiscal year 2014 appropriation
and a maximum of $892,000 of the fiscal year 2015 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus
purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction
determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process
based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to
those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall base
depreciation payments for school district buses on the pre-sales tax
five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus.
In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation
payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus
category for that school year.
(6) Funding levels in this section reflect waivers granted by the
state board of education for four-day school weeks as allowed under RCW
28A.305.141.
(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
annually disburse payments for bus depreciation in August.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,111,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,111,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $473,326,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $487,548,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $7,111,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $7,111,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for state matching money for
federal child nutrition programs, and may support the meals for kids
program through the following allowable uses:
(a) Elimination of breakfast copays for eligible public school
students and lunch copays for eligible public school students in grades
kindergarten through third grade who are eligible for reduced price
lunch;
(b) Assistance to school districts and authorized public and
private nonprofit organizations for supporting summer food service
programs, and initiating new summer food service programs in low-income
areas;
(c) Reimbursements to school districts for school breakfasts served
to students eligible for free and reduced price lunch, pursuant to
chapter 287, Laws of 2005; and
(d) Assistance to school districts in initiating and expanding
school breakfast programs.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report
annually to the fiscal committees of the legislature on annual
expenditures in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $727,748,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $764,041,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $462,020,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $756,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,954,565,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to
implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed
by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to
section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4)(a) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for special
education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390.
(b) From July 1, 2013 to August 31, 2013, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school district programs for special education
students as provided in section 507, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 1st sp.
sess., as amended through section 507 of the 2013 omnibus supplemental
operating appropriations act.
(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions
for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW
28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fund -- state funded special
education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual
enrollment percent or 12.7 percent.
(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW
28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate
rather than individual district units. For purposes of this
subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than
individual district units.
(7) $34,227,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $35,592,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $29,574,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for safety net awards for districts
with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the
amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section. If the federal
safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the
federal appropriation in this subsection (7) in any fiscal year, the
superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds
necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of each school year,
the superintendent shall recover safety net funds that were distributed
prospectively but for which districts were not subsequently eligible.
(a) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, safety net funds
shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as
provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (ESHB 2261).
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
make award determinations for state safety net funding in August of
each school year. Determinations on school district eligibility for
state safety net awards shall be based on analysis of actual
expenditure data from the current school year.
(8) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund -- state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund -- state funds allocated under
this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special
education program.
(11) $252,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $252,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for two additional full-time
equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to
provide training and support to districts applying for safety net
awards.
(12) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $100,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
shall be expended to support a special education ombudsman program
within the office of superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,142,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,150,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,292,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish
financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction
and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).
(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional
professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum
and instructional strategies. Funding shall be distributed among the
educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions
in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use
this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated
instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter
and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials,
and other expenditures related to providing regional professional
development support.
(3) The educational service districts, at the request of the state
board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.305.130, may
receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct
school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education
rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit
recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service
districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus
reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $309,436,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $334,289,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $643,725,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the
increase per full-time equivalent student is 5.0 percent from the 2012-13 school year to the 2013-14 school year and 5.0 percent from the
2013-14 school year to the 2014-15 school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,982,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,496,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,478,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) $1,070,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,070,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to maintain at least one
certificated instructional staff and related support services at an
institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support
one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish
the educational program. The following types of institutions are
included: Residential programs under the department of social and
health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, programs for juveniles
under the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and programs for
juveniles operated by city and county jails.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511 FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,377,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,696,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,073,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable
students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i)
Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly
capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students
per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900
instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the district's average staff
mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this
act.
(b) From July 1, 2013, to August 31, 2013, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable
students as provided in section 511, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 1st sp.
sess., as amended through section 511 of the 2013 omnibus supplemental
operating appropriations act.
(3) $85,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $85,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the centrum program at Fort
Worden state park.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR MISCELLANEOUS -- NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,052,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $124,954,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,126,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $206,242,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,002,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,599,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $451,923,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) $45,484,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014, $30,098,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust
account--state appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for development and
implementation of the Washington state assessment system, including:
(a) Development and implementation of retake assessments for high
school students who are not successful in one or more content areas and
(b) development and implementation of alternative assessments or
appeals procedures to implement the certificate of academic
achievement. The superintendent of public instruction shall report
quarterly on the progress on development and implementation of
alternative assessments or appeals procedures. Within these amounts,
the superintendent of public instruction shall contract for the early
return of 10th grade student assessment results, on or around June 10th
of each year. State funding to districts shall be limited to one
collection of evidence payment per student, per content-area
assessment.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall modify the
statewide student assessment system and implement assessments developed
with a multistate consortium beginning in the 2014-15 school year to
assess student proficiency on the standards adopted under RCW
28A.655.071.
(2) $356,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $356,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington state
leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional
partnership activities coordinated at the Pacific science center,
including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal
professional development, and school and community engagement events.
(3) $980,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $980,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for improving technology
infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on school district technology
development, promoting standards for school district technology,
promoting statewide coordination and planning for technology
development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.
(4) $5,851,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $3,935,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 are provided solely for implementation of a new
performance-based evaluation for certificated educators and other
activities as provided in chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform)
and chapter 35, Laws of 2012 (certificated employee evaluations).
(5)(a) $45,263,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $49,673,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the
following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification
from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are
teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,090 per
teacher in the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years;
(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national
board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where
at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for
federal free or reduced price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least
60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free
or reduced price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70
percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or
reduced price lunch;
(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications
for bonuses under (a)(ii) of this subsection for less than one full
school year receive bonuses in a pro-rated manner. All bonuses in
(a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection will be paid in July of each school
year. Bonuses in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by a factor of 40 percent for first year NBPTS certified teachers, to
reflect the portion of the instructional school year they are
certified; and
(iv) During the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, and within
available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the
eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the
national board for professional teaching standards may receive a
conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward
the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front
candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual
bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in
addition to compensation received under a district's salary schedule
and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average
salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200.
Recipients who fail to receive certification after three years are
required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the
terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including
applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use
revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure
payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section
in each school year.
(6) $477,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $477,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the leadership internship
program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.
(7) $950,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $950,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps.
The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to low-performing schools and school districts that are implementing
comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more
schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.
(8) $810,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $810,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the development of a
leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent
organization to operate a state-of-the-art education leadership academy
that will be accessible throughout the state. Semiannually the
independent organization shall report on amounts committed by
foundations and others to support the development and implementation of
this program. Leadership academy partners shall include the state
level organizations for school administrators and principals, the
superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator
standards board, and others as the independent organization shall
identify.
(9) $3,234,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $3,234,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for grants to school districts to
provide a continuum of care for children and families to help children
become ready to learn. Grant proposals from school districts shall
contain local plans designed collaboratively with community service
providers. If a continuum of care program exists in the area in which
the school district is located, the local plan shall provide for
coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent possible.
(10) $1,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
288, Laws of 2011 (actual student success program), including
allocations to the opportunity internship program, the jobs for
America's graduates program, the building bridges program, services
provided by a college scholarship organization. Funding shall not be
used in the 2013-15 fiscal biennium to provide awards for schools and
school districts.
(11) $2,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $2,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a statewide information
technology (IT) academy program. This public-private partnership will
provide educational software, as well as IT certification and software
training opportunities for students and staff in public schools.
(12) $1,277,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,277,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for secondary career and technical
education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008. If equally
matched by private donations, $300,000 of the 2014 appropriation and
$300,000 of the 2015 appropriation shall be used to support FIRST
robotics programs. Of the amounts in this subsection, $100,000 of the
fiscal year 2014 appropriation and $100,000 of the fiscal year 2015
appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of statewide
supervision activities for career and technical education student
leadership organizations.
(13) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for (a) staff at the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts
to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering
programs in schools and districts across the state; and (b) grants of
$2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year with
professional development training for implementing integrated math,
science, technology, and engineering programs in their schools.
(14) $135,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $135,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for science, technology,
engineering and mathematics lighthouse projects, consistent with
chapter 238, Laws of 2010.
(15) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a beginning educator support
program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for
grant funding. The superintendent shall implement this program in 5 to
15 school districts and/or regional consortia. The program provided by
a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid
orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a
professional growth plan for each beginning teacher aligned with
professional certification; release time for mentors and new teachers
to work together; and teacher observation time with accomplished peers.
$250,000 may be used to provide statewide professional development
opportunities for mentors and beginning educators.
(16) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for advanced project lead the way
courses at ten high schools. To be eligible for funding in 2014, a
high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way
course during the 2012-13 school year. The 2014 funding must be used
for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way
course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2013-14 school year.
To be eligible for funding in 2015, a high school must have offered a
foundational project lead the way course during the 2013-14 school
year. The 2015 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs
for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students
beginning in the 2014-15 school year. The office of the superintendent
of public instruction and the education research and data center at the
office of financial management shall track student participation and
long-term outcome data.
(17) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for annual start-up grants for
aerospace and manufacturing technical programs housed at four skill
centers. The grants are provided for start-up equipment and curriculum
purchases. To be eligible for funding, the skill center must agree to
provide regional high schools with access to a technology laboratory,
expand manufacturing certificate and course offerings at the skill
center, and provide a laboratory space for local high school teachers
to engage in professional development in the instruction of courses
leading to student employment certification in the aerospace and
manufacturing industries. Once a skill center receives a start-up
grant, it is ineligible for additional start-up funding in the
following school year. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall administer the grants in consultation with the center
for excellence for aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing.
(18) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for annual start-up grants to six
high schools to implement the aerospace assembler program.
Participating high schools must agree to offer the aerospace assembler
training program to students by spring semester of school year 2013-14.
Once a high school receives a start-up grant, it is ineligible for
additional start-up funding in the following school year. The office
of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research
and data center at the office of financial management shall track
student participation and long-term outcome data.
(19) $10,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $10,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the
provision of training for teachers in the performance-based teacher
principal evaluation program. Of the amounts appropriated in this
subsection, $5,000,000 for fiscal year 2014 and $5,000,000 for fiscal
year 2015 are one-time appropriations.
(20) $3,600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $6,681,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5329 (persistently failing
schools). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(21) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to promote the financial literacy
of students. The effort will be coordinated through the financial
literacy public-private partnership.
(22) $109,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $99,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to implement a youth dropout
prevention program that incorporates partnerships between community-based organizations, schools, food banks and farms or gardens. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall select one
school district that must partner with an organization that is
operating an existing similar program and that also has the ability to
serve at least 40 students. Of the amount appropriated in this
subsection, up to $10,000 may be used by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for administration of the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,123,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,248,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,016,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $255,387,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual
programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages:
(i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional
bilingual program student in grades kindergarten through six in school
years 2013-14 and 2014-15; (ii) additional instruction of 4.7780 hours
per week in school year 2013-14 and 4.7780 hours per week in school
year 2014-15 per transitional bilingual program student in grades seven
through eight; (iii) additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week in
school year 2013-14 and 4.7780 hours per week in school year 2014-15
per transitional bilingual program student in grades nine through
twelve; (iv) fifteen transitional bilingual program students per
teacher; (v) 36 instructional weeks per year; (vi) 900 instructional
hours per teacher; and (vii) the district's average staff mix and
compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act.
(b) From July 1, 2013, to August 31, 2013, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual
instruction programs as provided in section 514, chapter 50, Laws of
2011 1st sp. sess., as amended through section 512 of the 2013 omnibus
supplemental operating appropriations act.
(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts
in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of
assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the
following amounts: 1.86 percent for school year 2013-14 and 1.79
percent for school year 2014-15.
(4) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is for
migrant education under Title I Part C and English language
acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the
elementary and secondary education act.
(5) $35,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $35,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to track current and former
transitional bilingual program students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,963,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,003,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $448,434,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $782,400,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund -- state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal
year adjustments.
(b)(i) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance
programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages:
(A) Additional instruction of 1.9200 hours per week per funded learning
assistance program student for the 2013-14 school year and the 2014-15
school year; (B) fifteen learning assistance program students per
teacher; (C) 36 instructional weeks per year; (D) 900 instructional
hours per teacher; and (E) the district's average staff mix and
compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act.
(ii) From July 1, 2013, to August 31, 2013, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance
programs as provided in section 515, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 1st sp.
sess., as amended through section 513 of the 2013 omnibus supplemental
operating appropriations act.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent
enrollment in grades K-12 for the prior school year multiplied by the
district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12
eligible for free or reduced price lunch in the prior school year.
(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through
the annual income verification process required by the national school
lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the
learning assistance program dated February, 2010.
(3) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund--state funds allocated under this
program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning
assistance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT--ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,283,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,321,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,604,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation in this section
is provided solely to fund the full basic education allocation for
full-time equivalent students enrolled in alternative learning
experience programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through
part V of this act are for allocations purposes only, unless specified
by part V of this act, and do not entitle a particular district,
district employee, or student to a specific service, beyond what has
been expressly provided in statute. Part V of this act restates the
requirements of various sections of Title 28A RCW. If any conflict
exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control unless this act
explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement. Any amounts
provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts required by
Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the program of basic
education unless clearly stated by this act.
(2) To the maximum extent practicable, when adopting new or revised
rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part
V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall attempt to seek legislative
approval through the budget request process.
(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 The appropriations in sections 605
through 611 of this act are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(1) "Institutions" means the institutions of higher education
receiving appropriations under sections 605 through 611 of this act.
(2) The legislature, the office of financial management, and other
state agencies need consistent and accurate personnel data from
institutions of higher education for policy planning purposes.
Institutions of higher education shall report personnel data to the
department of personnel for inclusion in the department's data
warehouse. Uniform reporting procedures shall be established by the
office of financial management's office of the state human resources
director for use by the reporting institutions, including provisions
for common job classifications and common definitions of full-time
equivalent staff. Annual contract amounts, number of contract months,
and funding sources shall be consistently reported for employees under
contract.
(3) In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW
28B.15.910, the governing boards and the state board may waive all or
a portion of operating fees for any student. State general fund
appropriations shall not be provided to replace tuition and fee revenue
foregone as a result of waivers granted under this subsection.
(4) The institutions of higher education receiving state
appropriations under sections 605 through 611 of this act shall allot
anticipated state and tuition expenditures by budget program and fiscal
year.
(5)(a) For institutions receiving appropriations in section 605 of
this act, the only allowable salary increases provided are those with
normally occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and
staff retention, except as provided in section 604(4) of this act. In
fiscal year 2014 and fiscal year 2015, the state board for community
and technical colleges may use salary and benefit savings from faculty
turnover to provide salary increments and associated benefits for
faculty who qualify through professional development and training.
(b) For employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW,
salary increases will be in accordance with the applicable collective
bargaining agreement. However, an increase shall not be provided to
any classified employee whose salary is above the approved salary range
maximum for the class to which the employee's position is allocated.
(c) For each institution of higher education receiving
appropriations under sections 606 through 611 of this act:
(i) The only allowable salary increases are those associated with
normally occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and
staff retention; and
(ii) Institutions may provide salary increases from other sources
to instructional and research faculty at the universities and The
Evergreen State College, exempt professional staff, teaching and
research assistants, as classified by the office of financial
management, and all other nonclassified staff, but not including
employees under chapter 41.80 RCW. Any salary increase granted under
the authority of this subsection (4)(c)(ii) shall not be included in an
institution's salary base for future state funding. It is the intent
of the legislature that state general fund support for an institution
shall not increase during the current or any future biennium as a
result of any salary increases authorized under this subsection
(4)(c)(ii).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 (1) Within the amounts appropriated in
this act, each institution of higher education is expected to enroll
and educate at least the following numbers of full-time equivalent
state- supported students per academic year:

2013-14
Annual Average 2014-15
Annual Average

University of Washington 37,162 37,162

Washington State University 22,228 22,228

Central Washington University 8,808 8,808

Eastern Washington University 8,734 8,734

The Evergreen State College 4,213 4,213

Western Washington University 11,762 11,762

State Board for Community &
Technical Colleges

Adult Students 139,237 139,237

Running Start Students 11,558 11,558

(2) In achieving or exceeding these enrollment targets, each
institution shall seek to:
(a) Maintain and to the extent possible increase enrollment
opportunities at branch campuses;
(b) Maintain and to the extent possible increase enrollment
opportunities at university centers and other partnership programs that
enable students to earn baccalaureate degrees on community college
campuses; and
(c) Eliminate and consolidate programs of study for which there is
limited student or employer demand, or that are not areas of core
academic strength for the institution, particularly when such programs
duplicate offerings by other in-state institutions.
(3) For purposes of monitoring and reporting statewide enrollment,
the University of Washington and Washington State University shall
notify the office of financial management of the number of full-time
student equivalent enrollments budgeted for each of their campuses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 PUBLIC BACCALAUREATE INSTITUTIONS
(1) In order to operate within the state funds appropriated in this
act, the governing boards of the state research universities, the state
regional universities, and The Evergreen State College are authorized
to adopt and adjust tuition and fees for the 2013-14 and 2014-15
academic years as provided in this section.
(2) For the purposes of chapter 28B.15 RCW, the omnibus
appropriations act assumes increases of tuition levels for resident
undergraduate students over the amounts charged to resident
undergraduate students for the prior year, as follows:

University of Washington 3%

Washington State University 3%

Central Washington University 3%

Eastern Washington University 3%

The Evergreen State College 3%

Western Washington University 3%

(3) The governing boards of the state research universities, the
state regional universities, and The Evergreen State College may exceed
the tuition levels assumed in subsection (2) of this section. However,
to the extent that tuition levels exceed the tuition levels assumed in
subsection (2) of this section, the institution shall be subject to the
conditions and limitations provided in chapter 28B.15 RCW as amended by
chapter 10, Laws of 2011 sp. sess. (higher education opportunity act).
In order to facilitate the full implementation of chapter 10, Laws of
2011 sp. sess., the institutions of higher education are authorized to
adopt tuition levels that are less than, equal to, or greater than the
tuition levels assumed in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Each governing board is authorized to increase tuition charges
to graduate and professional students, and to nonresident undergraduate
students, by amounts judged reasonable and necessary by the governing
board.
(5) Each governing board is authorized to increase summer quarter
or semester tuition fees for resident and nonresident undergraduate,
graduate, and professional students pursuant to RCW 28B.15.067.
(6) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase charges
for fee-based, self-sustaining degree programs, credit courses,
noncredit workshops and courses, and special contract courses by
amounts judged reasonable and necessary by the governing board.
(7) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase
services and activities fees for all categories of students as provided
in RCW 28B.15.069.
(8) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase
technology fees as provided in RCW 28B.15.069.
(9) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase special
course and lab fees, and health and counseling fees, to the extent
necessary to cover the reasonable and necessary exceptional cost of the
course or service.
(10) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase
administrative fees such as, but not limited to, those charged for
application, matriculation, special testing, and transcripts by amounts
judged reasonable and necessary by the governing board.
(11) The state universities, the regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College must accept the transfer of college-level
courses taken by running start students if a student seeking a transfer
of the college-level courses has been admitted to the state university,
the regional university, or The Evergreen State College, and if the
college-level courses are recognized as transferrable by the admitting
institution of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL
COLLEGES
(1) In order to operate within the state funds appropriated in this
act, the state board is authorized to adopt and adjust tuition and fees
for the 2013-14 and 2014-15 academic years as provided in this section.
(2) The state board may increase the tuition fees charged to
resident undergraduate students by no more than three percent over the
amounts charged to resident undergraduates during the prior academic
year. The board may increase tuition fees under this subsection
differentially based on student credit hour load, provided that the
overall increase in average tuition revenue per student does not exceed
three percent.
(3) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 academic years, the state board may
increase tuition fees charged to resident undergraduates enrolled in
upper division applied baccalaureate programs by no more than three
percent over the amounts charged during the prior academic year.
(4) Appropriations in section 605 include the restoration of the
three percent reduction in compensation costs taken in the 2011-2013
fiscal biennium. This funding is sufficient to implement 2013-2015
collective bargaining agreements at institutions of higher education
negotiated under chapter 41.80 RCW. The colleges may also use the
restored funds for any other purpose including restoring prior
compensation reductions, increasing compensation, and implementing
other collective bargaining agreements.
(5) The state board may increase the tuition fees charged to
nonresident students by amounts judged reasonable and necessary by the
board.
(6) The trustees of the technical colleges are authorized to either
(a) increase operating fees for resident undergraduates by no more than
three percent over the amounts charged to resident undergraduates
during the prior academic year; or (b) fully adopt the tuition fee
charge schedule adopted by the state board for community colleges.
(7) For academic years 2013-14 and 2014-15, the trustees of the
technical colleges are authorized to increase building fees by an
amount judged reasonable in order to progress toward parity with the
building fees charged students attending the community colleges.
(8) The state board is authorized to increase the maximum allowable
services and activities fees as provided in RCW 28B.15.069. The
trustees of the community and technical colleges are authorized to
increase services and activities fees up to the maximum level
authorized by the state board.
(9) The trustees of the community and technical colleges are
authorized to adopt or increase charges for fee-based, self-sustaining
programs such as summer session, international student contracts, and
special contract courses by amounts judged reasonable and necessary by
the trustees.
(10) The trustees of the community and technical colleges are
authorized to adopt or increase special course and lab fees to the
extent necessary to cover the reasonable and necessary exceptional cost
of the course or service.
(11) The trustees of the community and technical colleges are
authorized to adopt or increase administrative fees such as but not
limited to those charged for application, matriculation, special
testing, and transcripts by amounts judged reasonable and necessary by
the trustees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $546,347,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $548,382,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,548,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $107,922,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,220,199,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) When implementing the appropriations in this section, the state
board and the trustees of the individual community and technical
colleges shall minimize impact on academic programs, maximize
reductions in administration, and shall at least maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment opportunities and degree and certificate
production in high employer-demand fields of study at their academic
year 2008-09 levels.
(2) $33,261,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $33,261,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely as special funds for training and
related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW
28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 6,200 full-time
equivalent students in fiscal year 2014 and at least 6,200 full-time
equivalent students in fiscal year 2015.
(3) $5,450,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for administration and customized
training contracts through the job skills program.
(4) $3,928,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for the expansion of enrollment in aerospace and
STEM (science, technology, engineering and math) programs. The state
board will work with the education research and data center to
establish program baselines and demonstrate enrollment increases. By
September 1, 2014, and each September 1st thereafter, the state board
shall provide a report that provides the specific detail on how these
amounts were spent in the preceding fiscal year, any process changes or
best-practices implemented by the colleges, and how many students are
enrolled in aerospace and STEM programs above the 2012-2013 academic
year baseline.
(5) $200,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation is
provided solely for the aerospace center of excellence currently hosted
by Everett community college to:
(a) Increase statewide communications and outreach between industry
sectors, industry organizations, businesses, K-12 schools, colleges,
and universities;
(b) Enhance information technology to increase business and student
accessibility and use of the center's web site; and
(c) Act as the information entry point for prospective students and
job seekers regarding education, training, and employment in the
industry.
(6) $362,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation is
provided solely for the opportunity center for employment and education
internet technology integration project at north Seattle community
college.
(7) $510,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of a maritime industries training
program at south Seattle community college.
(8) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the labor center at the
Georgetown south Seattle community college campus. $50,000 of the
amount provided in this subsection for fiscal year 2014 and $50,000 of
the amounts for 2015 are provided solely for the labor center archive
project.
(9) $7,500,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for the student achievement initiative.
(10) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5624 (STEM or career and tech ed). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(11) Community and technical colleges are not required to send mass
mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts. Community
and technical colleges shall consider lower cost alternatives, such as
mailing postcards or brochures that direct individuals to online
information and other ways of acquiring print catalogs.
(12) The state board for community and technical colleges shall not
use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate
athletics programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $223,938,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $224,619,000
Geoduck Aquaculture Research Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,769,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Biotoxin Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,754,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,556,000
Aquatic Land Enhancement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
State Toxics Control Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,120,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $488,146,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and regents shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other noninstructional activities.
(2) $300,000 of the geoduck aquaculture research account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the University of Washington sea
grant program to commission scientific research studies that examine
possible negative and positive effects, including the cumulative
effects and the economic contribution, of evolving shellfish
aquaculture techniques and practices on Washington's economy and marine
ecosystems. The research conducted for the studies is not intended to
be a basis for an increase in the number of shellfish harvesting
permits available and should be coordinated with any research efforts
related to ocean acidification. The University of Washington must
submit an annual report detailing any findings and outline the progress
of the study, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, to the appropriate
legislative committees by December 1st of each year.
(3) $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the center for international
trade in forest products in the college of forest resources.
(4) $2,000,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for the college of engineering to support an
increase in the number of engineering graduates by 425 students. By
September 1, 2013, and each September 1st thereafter, the university
shall provide an updated report that provides the specific detail on
how these amounts were spent in the preceding fiscal year, any process
changes or best-practices implemented by the college, and how many
students are enrolled in engineering programs above the baseline.
(5) $14,491,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for the expansion of computer science and
engineering enrollments. The university will work with the education
research and data center to establish program baselines and demonstrate
enrollment increases. By September 1, 2014, and each September 1st
thereafter, the university shall provide a report that provides the
specific detail on how these amounts were spent in the preceding fiscal
year, including but not limited to the cost per student, student
completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in
each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the
college, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and
engineering programs above the 2012-2013 academic year baseline.
(6) $4,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $4,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for creation of a clean energy
institute. The institute shall integrate physical sciences and
engineering with a research focus on energy storage and solar energy.
(7) $3,000,000 of the economic development strategic reserve
account appropriation is provided solely to support the joint center
for aerospace innovation technology.
(8) Within existing resources, the University of Washington shall
establish a forestry program.
(9) $700,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation and $1,120,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the center on ocean acidification
and related work necessary to implement the recommendations of the
governor's blue ribbon task force on ocean acidification. The
university shall provide staffing for this purpose.
(10) The University of Washington shall not use funds appropriated
in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,725,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,810,000
State Wildlife Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,377,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $333,312,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and regents shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other noninstructional activities.
(2) $2,000,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for the college of engineering to support an
increase in the number of engineering graduates by 425 students. By
September 1, 2013, and each September 1st thereafter, the university
shall provide an updated report that provides the specific detail on
how these amounts were spent in the preceding fiscal year, any process
changes or best-practices implemented by the college, and how many
students are enrolled in engineering programs above the baseline.
(3) $8,389,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for the expansion of computer science and
engineering enrollments. The university will work with the education
research and data center to establish program baselines and demonstrate
enrollment increases. By September 1, 2014, and each September 1st
thereafter, the university shall provide a report that provides the
specific detail on how these amounts were spent in the preceding fiscal
year, including but not limited to the cost per student, student
completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in
each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the
college, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and
engineering programs above the 2012-2013 academic year baseline.
(4) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the Ruckelshaus center to collaborate
with local governments, the media, and representatives of the public
regarding public record requests made to local government. The center
shall facilitate meetings and discussions and report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature. The report shall include information
on:
(a) Recommendations related to balancing open public records with
concerns of local governments related to interfering with the work of
the local government;
(b) Resources necessary to accommodate requests;
(c) Potential harassment of government employees;
(d) Potential safety concerns of people named in the record;
(e) Potentially assisting criminal activity; and
(f) Other issues brought forward by the participants.
The center shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 15, 2013.
(5) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington State
University agricultural research center to conduct public outreach and
education related to nonlethal methods of mitigating conflicts between
livestock and large wild carnivores. An additional $400,000 of the
state wildlife account--state appropriation is provided solely to the
center to conduct a detailed analysis of such methods. The amounts
appropriated in this subsection may not be subject to an administrative
fee or charge, and must be used for costs directly associated with the
research and analysis.
(6) $2,065,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $3,035,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for expansion of medical education
and biomedical research in Spokane.
(7) Washington State University shall not use funds appropriated in
this section to support intercollegiate athletic programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,593,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,702,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,401,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,696,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other noninstructional activities.
(2) $2,082,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for improvements in student completion and retention
rates in order to increase the university's four year graduation rate.
By September 1, 2014, and each September 1st thereafter, the university
shall provide a report that provides the specific details on how these
amounts were spent in the preceding fiscal year, any process changes or
best-practices implemented by the university, and any changes in
completion and retention rates.
(3) At least $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and at least $200,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 shall be expended on the Northwest
autism center.
(4) Eastern Washington University shall not use funds appropriated
in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,851,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,962,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,819,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,632,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other noninstructional activities.
(2) $2,761,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for improvements in student completion and retention
rates in order to increase the university's four year graduation rate.
By September 1, 2014, and each September 1st thereafter, the university
shall provide a report that provides the specific details on how these
amounts were spent in the preceding fiscal year, any process changes or
best-practices implemented by the university, and any changes in
completion and retention rates.
(3) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the college of education to conduct a
study identifying the duties encompassed in a state-funded teacher's
typical work day. The study must include an estimate of the percent of
a teacher's typical day that is spent on teaching related duties and
the percentage of the teacher's day that is spent on duties that are
not directly related to teaching. The university shall submit a report
to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2013.
(4) Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient for the
university to develop a plan to create an online degree granting entity
that awards degrees based on an alternative credit model. The
university shall submit a final plan by December 1, 2013, to the higher
education committees of the legislature.
(5) Central Washington University shall not use funds appropriated
in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,769,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,548,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,855,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,172,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other noninstructional activities.
(2) $1,157,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for instructional support. By September 1, 2014,
and each September 1st thereafter, the college shall provide a report
that provides the specific details on how these amounts were spent in
the preceding fiscal year and any process changes or best-practices
implemented by the college.
(3) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the Washington state institution for
public policy to conduct a comprehensive study of the financial
incentives promoting distributed generation in Washington. Distributed
generation is electric generation, often from renewable resources,
connected to a utility's distribution grid and located at or near where
the electricity will be used.
(a) Specifically, the institute's study shall:
(i) Include a review of the costs and benefits of net metering, the
renewable energy investment cost recovery program, other tax credits,
reductions, and exemptions, and the provisions of double renewable
energy credits for renewable resource generation projects under five
megawatts as allowed under the energy independence act;
(ii) Determine whether the incentives available to distributed
generation are consistent with one another and work together in meeting
the state's goals for the electric distribution system and promoting
cost-effective distributed generation;
(iii) Evaluate whether the current incentive structure encourages
long-term, sustainable energy and environmental benefits to the
ratepayers and the citizens of Washington;
(iv) Recommend, as needed, changes to the current incentive
structure or new policies based on its findings;
(v) Contain both a region specific life-cycle assessment and
economic analysis of distributed generation; and
(vi) Establish a system to properly assign incentives to
distributed generation on a per-technology basis, based on the costs
and benefits associated with each technology type.
(b) The institute shall provide a final report to the legislature
by February 1, 2014.
(4) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for The
Evergreen State College to continue operations of the Longhouse Center
and the Northwest Indian applied research institute.
(5) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy to provide primary staff support for a K-12 funding task
force established in this subsection.
(a) The task force shall be composed of the following members:
(i) Two members from each of the largest caucuses of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(ii) Two members from each of the largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(iii) The superintendent of public instruction or designee; and
(iv) Three members appointed by the governor.
(b) The task force shall be chaired or cochaired by legislative
members selected by members of the task force.
(c) The purpose of the task force is to examine options and make
recommendations to the legislature on the following topics:
(i) Revised salary allocation methodologies and models for
administrative, classified, and certificated instructional staff in
public schools. The salary allocation model for certificated
instructional staff must address regional salary differentials;
(ii) Policies and funding to support career and technical
education, including:
(A) A revised funding allocation methodology for career and
technical education for middle schools, comprehensive high schools, and
skill centers through the prototypical school funding formula;
(B) Recommended capital facilities policies related to the siting
of skill center campuses, including skill centers colocated on
comprehensive high school and higher education campuses; and
(C) The feasibility of establishing technical high schools as an
alternative delivery model for integrated secondary career and academic
education; and
(iii) The appropriate use of state and local property taxes to
support the financing of public schools, modifications to property tax
growth limitations, and strategies for improving the stability and
transparency of such use.
(d) The task force shall submit an interim report to the education
and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2013, and a
final report by December 1, 2014.
(e) Additional staff support for the task force shall be provided
as needed by the house office of program research, the senate committee
services, and the office of financial management.
(6) Notwithstanding other provisions in this section, the board of
directors for the Washington state institute for public policy may
adjust due dates for projects included on the institute's 2013-2015
work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.
(7) The Evergreen State College shall not use funds appropriated in
this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,815,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,962,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,037,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,814,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other noninstructional activities.
(2) $5,958,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for the expansion of computer science and
engineering enrollments. The university will work with the education
research and data center to establish program baselines and demonstrate
enrollment increases. By September 1, 2014, and each September 1st
thereafter, the university shall provide a report that provides the
specific detail on how these amounts were spent in the preceding fiscal
year, including but not limited to the cost per student, student
completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in
each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the
college, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and
engineering programs above the 2012-2013 academic year baseline.
(3) Western Washington University shall not use funds appropriated
in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612 FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL--POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,307,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,331,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,818,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,456,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The student achievement council is
authorized to increase or establish fees for initial degree
authorization, degree authorization renewal, degree authorization
reapplication, new program applications, and new site applications
pursuant to RCW 28B.85.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 613 FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL--OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $234,928,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $236,917,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,653,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,577,000
Washington Opportunity Pathways Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $170,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $720,109,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $224,750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014, $227,290,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation, $47,900,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation, and $150,000,000 of the opportunity pathways account--state appropriation are provided solely for student financial aid
payments under the state need grant and state work study programs
including up to four percent administrative allowance for the state
work study program.
(2) Changes made to the state need grant program in the 2011-2013
fiscal biennium are continued in the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium
including aligning increases in awards given to private institutions
with the annual tuition increases for public research institutions or
the private institution's average annual tuition increase experience of
3.5 percent per year, whichever is less, and reducing the awards for
students who first enrolled as a new student in for-profit institutions
as of the 2011-2012 academic year or thereafter by fifty percent.
(3) Changes made to the state work study program in the 2009-2011
and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia are continued in the 2013-2015 fiscal
biennium including maintaining the increased required employer share of
wages; adjusted employer match rates; discontinuation of nonresident
student eligibility for the program; and revising distribution methods
to institutions by taking into consideration other factors such as off-campus job development, historical utilization trends, and student
need.
(4) Within the funds appropriated in this section, eligibility for
the state need grant shall include students with family incomes at or
below 70 percent of the state median family income (MFI), adjusted for
family size, and shall include students enrolled in three to five
credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits.
The student achievement council shall report to the legislature by
December 1, 2014, regarding the number of students enrolled in three to
five credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester
credits, and their academic progress including degree completion.
Awards for all students shall be adjusted by the estimated amount by
which Pell grant increases exceed projected increases in the
noninstructional costs of attendance. Awards for students with incomes
between 51 and 70 percent of the state median shall be prorated at the
following percentages of the award amount granted to those with incomes
below 51 percent of the MFI: 70 percent for students with family
incomes between 51 and 55 percent MFI; 65 percent for students with
family incomes between 56 and 60 percent MFI; 60 percent for students
with family incomes between 61 and 65 percent MFI; and 50 percent for
students with family incomes between 66 and 70 percent MFI.
(5) Students who are eligible for the college bound scholarship
shall be given priority for the state need grant program if the
students have applied by the institution's priority financial aid
deadline and have completed their financial aid file in a timely
manner. These eligible college bound students whose family incomes are
in the 0-65 median family income ranges shall be awarded the maximum
state need grant for which they are eligible under state policies and
may not be denied maximum state need grant funding due to institutional
policies or delayed awarding of college bound scholarship students.
(6) $18,677,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation, and $20,000,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways
account--state appropriation are provided solely for the college bound
scholarship program. This amount assumes that college bound
scholarship recipients will receive priority for state need grant
awards in fiscal year 2014 and fiscal year 2015. If this policy of
prioritization is not fully achieved, it is the intent of this
legislation to provide supplemental appropriations in the 2014
supplemental operating budget.
(7) Students who meet the qualifications pursuant to section 955 of
this act are eligible to receive state need grant awards.
(8) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the council to develop an alternative
financial aid application for students without a nine digit federal
identification number.
(9) $2,236,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $2,236,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the passport to college
program. The maximum scholarship award shall be $5,000. The board
shall contract with a nonprofit organization to provide support
services to increase student completion in their postsecondary program
and shall, under this contract, provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal
years 2014 and 2015 for this purpose.
(10) In developing the skilled and educated workforce report
pursuant to RCW 28B.77.080(3), the council shall use the bureau of
labor statistics analysis of the education and training requirements of
occupations, in addition to any other method the council may choose to
use, to assess the number and type of higher education and training
credentials required to match employer demand for a skilled and
educated workforce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 614 FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,582,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,484,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,264,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,330,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium the
board shall not designate recipients of the Washington award for
vocational excellence or recognize them at award ceremonies as provided
in RCW 28C.04.535.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,781,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,769,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,727,000
Opportunity Pathways Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000,000
Home Visiting Services Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,868,000
Home Visiting Services Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,757,000
Children's Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $489,082,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $22,197,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $40,538,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $80,000,000 of the opportunity pathways account
appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education
assistance program services. Of these amounts, $10,284,000 is a
portion of the biennial amount of state maintenance of effort dollars
required to receive federal child care and development fund grant
dollars.
(2) $638,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, and $638,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for child care resource and
referral network services.
(3) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to develop and provide culturally
relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers.
(4) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the
federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this
grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives,
agency administration, and other costs associated with child care
subsidies. The department shall transfer a portion of this grant to
the department of social and health services to fund the child care
subsidies paid by the department of social and health services on
behalf of the department of early learning.
(5) $1,434,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $1,434,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for expenditure into the home
visiting services account. This funding is intended to meet federal
maintenance of effort requirements and to secure private matching
funds.
(6)(a) $153,717,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the working connections child care program under
RCW 43.215.135.
(b) In addition to groups that were given prioritized access to the
working connections child care program effective March 1, 2011, the
department shall also give prioritized access into the program to
families in which a parent of a child in care is a minor who is not
living with a parent or guardian and who is a full-time student in a
high school that has a school-sponsored on-site child care center.
(7) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with
the office of financial management and the department of social and
health services shall report quarterly enrollments and active caseload
for the working connections child care program to the legislative
fiscal committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight
task force. The report shall also identify the number of cases
participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and
working connections child care.
(8) $1,025,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $1,025,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $13,424,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the seasonal child care program.
If federal sequestration cuts are realized, cuts to the seasonal child
care program must be proportional to other federal reductions made
within the department.
(9) $4,122,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $2,522,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $4,304,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the medicaid treatment child care
(MTCC) program. The department shall contract for MTCC services to
provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment services
to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children. Priority
for services shall be given to children referred from the department of
social and health services children's administration. In addition to
referrals made by children's administration, the department shall
authorize services for children referred to the MTCC program, as long
as the children meet the eligibility requirements as outlined in the
Washington state plan for the MTCC program.
(a) Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, $60,000 per
fiscal year may be used by the department for administering the MTCC
program, if needed.
(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,600,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided
solely to continue providing services in the event of losing federal
funding for the MTCC program. To the extent that the moneys provided
in this subsection (9)(b) are not necessary for this purpose, the
amounts provided shall lapse.
(10) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit
entity experienced in the provision of promoting early literacy for
children through pediatric office visits.
(11) $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the department to complete development
work of the electronic benefits transfer system.
(12) $793,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $796,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of an
electronic benefits transfer system. To the maximum extent possible,
the department shall work to integrate this system with the department
of social and health services payment system. The amounts provided in
this subsection are conditioned on the department satisfying the
requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies
established by the office of the chief information officer and the
provisions of section 943 of this act, information systems projects.
(13) $32,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5595 (child care reform). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14)(a)(i) The department of early learning is required to provide
to the education research and data center, housed at the office of
financial management, data on all state-funded early childhood
programs. These programs include the early support for infants and
toddlers, early childhood education and assistance program (ECEAP), and
the working connections and seasonal subsidized childcare programs
including license exempt facilities or family, friend, and neighbor
care. The data provided by the department to the education research
data center must include information on children who participate in
these programs, including their name and date of birth, and dates the
child received services at a particular facility.
(ii) The ECEAP early learning professionals must enter
qualifications into the department's professional development registry
during the 2013-14 school year. By October 2015, the department must
provide ECEAP early learning professional data to the education
research data center.
(iii) The department must request federally funded head start
programs to voluntarily provide data to the department and the
education research data center that is equivalent to what is being
provided for state-funded programs.
(iv) The education research and data center must provide a report
on early childhood program participation and K-12 outcomes to the house
of representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and
means committee using available data by November 2013 for the school
year ending in 2012 and again in March 2014 for the school year ending
in 2013.
(b) The department, in consultation with the department of social
and health services, must withhold payment for services to early
childhood programs that do not report on the name, date of birth, and
the dates a child received services at a particular facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 616 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,032,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,832,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,881,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 617 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR
CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,615,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,628,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,243,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 618 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,125,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,104,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,075,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,316,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 619 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,123,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,158,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,281,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 620 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,537,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,137,000

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,839,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,051,513,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,297,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $269,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $211,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retire Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,320,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,032,449,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.
The entire general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 shall
be expended into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account by
June 30, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,138,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,138,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,276,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,636,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,102,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,215,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $181,953,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
expenditure into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement
account. The entire general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year
2014 shall be expended into the nondebt-limit general fund bond
retirement account by June 30, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,726,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,726,000
State Building Construction Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $867,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,421,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- FIRE CONTINGENCY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the disaster response account to be used for any
Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred by
the Washington state patrol in response to an emergency or disaster
authorized under RCW 43.43.960 and 43.43.964.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,100,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,600,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the disaster response account for emergency fire
suppression by the department of natural resources and to complete
projects necessary to recover from previously declared disasters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EMERGENCY FUND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are for
the governor's emergency fund for the critically necessary work of any
agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for expenditure into the education technology revolving
account for the purpose of covering ongoing operational and equipment
replacement costs incurred by the K-20 educational network program in
providing telecommunication services to network participants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--O'BRIEN BUILDING IMPROVEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,948,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,942,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,890,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the general administration services account for
payment of principal, interest, and financing expenses associated with
the certificate of participation for the O'Brien building improvement,
project number 20081007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--COUNTY PUBLIC
HEALTH ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,386,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,386,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,772,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The state treasurer shall distribute the
appropriations to the following counties and health districts in the
amounts designated to support public health services, including public
health nursing:

Health District FY 2014 FY 2015 2013-15
Biennium

Adams County Health District $121,213 $121,213 $242,426

Asotin County Health District $159,890 $159,890 $319,780

Benton-Franklin Health District $1,614,337 $1,614,337 $3,228,674

Chelan-Douglas Health District $399,634 $399,634 $799,268

Clallam County Health and Human Services
Department $291,401 $291,401 $582,802

Clark County Health District $1,767,341 $1,767,341 $3,534,682

Skamania County Health Department $111,327 $111,327 $222,654

Columbia County Health District $119,991 $119,991 $239,982

Cowlitz County Health Department $477,981 $477,981 $955,962

Garfield County Health District $93,154 $93,154 $186,308

Grant County Health District $297,761 $297,762 $595,523

Grays Harbor Health Department $335,666 $335,666 $671,332

Island County Health Department $255,224 $225,224 $510,448

Jefferson County Health and Human Services $184,080 $184,080 $368,160

Seattle-King County Department of Public Health $10,558,598 $10,558,598 $21,117,196

Bremerton-Kitsap County Health District $997,476 $997,476 $1,994,952

Kittitas County Health Department $198,979 $198,979 $397,958

Klickitat County Health Department $153,784 $153,784 $307,568

Lewis County Health Department $263,134 $263,134 $526,268

Lincoln County Health Department $113,917 $113,917 $227,834

Mason County Department of Health Services $227,448 $227,448 $454,896

Okanogan County Health District $169,882 $169,882 $339,764

Pacific County Health Department $169,075 $169,075 $338,150

Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department $4,143,169 $4,143,169 $8,286,338

San Juan County Health and Community Services $2,253,493 $2,253,493 $4,506,986

Skagit County Health Department $449,745 $449,745 $899,490

Snohomish Health District $3,433,291 $3,433,291 $6,866,582

Spokane County Health District $2,877,318 $2,877,318 $5,574,636

Northeast Tri-County Health District $249,303 $249,303 $498,606

Thurston County Health Department $1,046,897 $1,046,897 $2,093,794

Wahkiakum County Health Department $93,181 $9,180 $186,361

Walla Walla County-City Health Department $302,173 $302,173 $604,346

Whatcom County Health Department $1,214,301 $1,214,301 $2,428,602

Whitman County Health Department $189,355 $189,355 $378,710

Yakima Health District $1,052,482 $1,052,482 $2,104,964

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS $36,386,001 $36,386,001 $72,772,002

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 BELATED CLAIMS
The agencies and institutions of the state may expend moneys
appropriated in this act, upon approval of the office of financial
management, for the payment of supplies and services furnished to the
agency or institution in prior fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS--CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a
monthly basis consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations
for the judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a
quarterly basis consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.
(1) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,700,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,600,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,300,000

(2) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial
retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,600,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,600,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- STATE EFFICIENCY AND RESTRUCTURING REPAYMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,981,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,981,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,962,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for expenditure into the cleanup settlement account on
July 1, 2013, and July 1, 2014, as repayment of moneys that were
transferred to the state efficiency and restructuring account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--LEAN MANAGEMENT STRATEGIES EFFICIENCY SAVINGS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($20,000,000)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The legislature is committed to promoting a state government
culture that makes sustained improvement a habitual behavior from
front-line staff to agency leadership.
(2) The office of financial management must develop a strategic
lean management action plan to drive efficiencies in state spending and
to increase productivity of state employees while improving and
increasing state services for taxpayers. The action plan must
determine the specific agencies and programs that would benefit most
from application of the action plan, and the plan must target resources
accordingly.
(3) The office of financial management must integrate lean
principles into all performance management efforts.
(4) The office of financial management and the office of the chief
information officer must integrate lean principles into all major
information technology initiatives.
(5) The office of financial management must develop and implement
a lean practitioner fellowship program to train state agency staff.
Agency staff participating in the fellowship will be assigned to work
on statewide efforts that streamline and improve processes across
agencies.
(6) Agencies must report to the office of financial management at
least twice per fiscal year process improvements and efficiencies
gained through tools such as the lean strategy. The office of
financial management must compile and transmit these reports to the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature at least every six
months, beginning January 1, 2014.
(7) The office of financial management must report to the
legislature by December 2014 on the viability of the lean/performance
management program becoming a self-funding program.
(8) The office of financial management must reduce allotments for
affected state agencies by $20,000,000 from the state general fund for
fiscal year 2015 in this act to reflect fiscal year 2015 savings
resulting from application of the lean management and performance
management strategies required by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY EXPENDITURES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($2,500,000)
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($2,500,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($5,000,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The office of the chief information officer and the office of
financial management shall work to drive efficiency in state
procurement, maintenance, and operations of information technology.
(2) Agencies must report to the office of the chief information
officer and the office of financial management at least annually on
efficiencies gained through these efforts. The office of financial
management must compile and transmit these reports to the appropriate
fiscal committees of the legislature at least every year, beginning
January 1, 2014.
(3) The office of financial management shall reduce allotments for
all affected state agencies by $2,500,000 from fiscal year 2014 general
fund--state appropriations and $2,500,000 from fiscal year 2015 general
fund--state appropriations in this act to reflect savings resulting
from efficiencies in information technology expenditures statewide.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--ELECTRONIC MEDICAL RECORD STUDY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,068,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,066,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,374,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for the state psychiatric hospitals to plan, procure,
and implement the core elements of an electronic medical record system
that is compliant with the international classification of diseases
(ICD-10) by October 1, 2014. These funds must only be used for an
electronic medical record system that meets federal criteria for
electronic sharing of patient information and clinical care summaries
with doctors' offices, hospitals, and health systems which use
federally certified electronic health record systems. The procurement
and implementation shall be conducted to allow for these services to be
expanded to the department of corrections. The amounts provided in
this subsection are conditioned on the department satisfying the
requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies
established by the office of the chief information officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE INSURANCE
COMMISSIONER--HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE ACCOUNT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $676,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amounts in this section are provided
solely for expenditure into the health benefit exchange account--state
and are provided as a loan to be repaid with amounts from the health
benefit exchange account--state by July 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--COMMUNICATION SERVICES REFORM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,953,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for expenditure into the universal communications
services fund to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1971
(communications services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2013, the appropriations provided in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719 LEGISLATIVE TASK FORCE ON CAREER
EDUCATION OPPORTUNITIES
(1) The legislature finds that for too long, there has been a
perception that career readiness and college readiness represent two
separate and unequal tracks. The importance of providing high quality
opportunities for applied learning, cross-disciplinary curriculum, and
career and technical equivalence often appears subsumed by an emphasis
on theoretical academics. The legislature intends to create a vision
for the integration of career education alongside academic education.
(2)(a) A legislative task force on career education opportunities
is established with the following members:
(i) Two members from each of the largest caucuses of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(ii) Two members from each of the largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(iii) The superintendent of public instruction or a designee;
(iv) One representative each from the workforce training and
education coordinating board, state board of education, the student
achievement council, and the Washington association of career and
technical education; and
(v) One member appointed by the governor.
(b) The task force shall be cochaired by one house and one senate
member, selected by the members of the task force.
(3) The purpose of the task force is to identify strategies to
improve the integration of career education into secondary education
opportunities for all students. The strategies to be considered by the
task force include state laws and policies, graduation requirements,
and state funding for instructional programs. The task force must
examine the barriers, incentives and disincentives, costs, and
cost-effectiveness of current policies and practices.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
identify a recommended list of course equivalencies for career and
technical education courses and submit the list to the task force under
this section by September 1, 2013.
(5) A report from the task force is due December 15, 2013, to
include at least the following:
(a) An analysis of the career and college ready graduation
requirements proposed by the state board of education and any
recommendations regarding graduation requirements;
(b) Recommended policies that both support and provide appropriate
state oversight and strategic planning for career and technical
education offered in middle schools, comprehensive high schools, and
skill centers;
(c) Recommendations for how to maximize statewide use of the list
of career and technical education course equivalencies identified by
the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and
(d) Analysis of the feasibility of establishing technical high
schools as an alternative delivery model for integrated secondary
career and academic education.
(6) Staff support for the task force must be provided by senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research, with assistance from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, the student achievement council, and the workforce
training and education coordinating board as necessary.
(7) Legislative members of the task force may be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. The expenses of the
task force must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of
representatives. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by
the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of
representatives executive rules committee.
(8) The task force expires December 31, 2013.

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--STATE REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,248,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,894,000
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,068,000
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety
and education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
General Fund Appropriation for other tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,000
General Fund Appropriation for habitat conservation
program distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly funded
autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,158,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for
harbor improvement revenue distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $146,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for
distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,120,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,983,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,550,000
City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for local
government financial assistance distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,134,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor
excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,487,000
Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Mitigation Account
Appropriation for distribution to local taxing
jurisdictions to mitigate the unintended revenue
redistribution effect of the sourcing law
changes . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,488,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation for
the Confederated Tribes of the Colville
Reservation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,760,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation for
the Spokane Tribe of Indians . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,025,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor
profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,876,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $459,002,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--FOR THE COUNTY
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,469,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties
for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving
penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208,
Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--MUNICIPAL
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,646,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium to
all cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office
of financial management. The distributions to any city that
substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1,
1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with
criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the
county in which the city is located. This funding is provided to
cities for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation
including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk
driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter
208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--FEDERAL REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for federal flood control
funds distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,000
General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing fees
distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,706,000
Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal forest
reserve fund distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,636,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,408,000
The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS
State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $10,000,000 for fiscal
year 2014 and $10,000,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control
Account: For transfer to the state general
fund, $5,850,000 for fiscal year 2014 and
$5,850,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,700,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer to
the drinking water assistance repayment account . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
General Fund: For transfer to the streamlined sales
and use tax account, $25,284,000 for fiscal
year 2014 and $25,204,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,488,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving Account:
For transfer to the state general fund, $8,000,000
for fiscal year 2014 and $8,000,000 for fiscal
year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $197,000,000 for fiscal year 2014
and $197,000,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $394,000,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $10,000,000 for fiscal year 2014
and $11,000,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account: For
transfer to the Columbia River basin taxable bond
water supply development account, an amount not to
exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
General Fund: For transfer to the child and family
reinvestment account, $3,928,421 for fiscal year
2014 and $3,743,404 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,671,825
Flood Control Assistance Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2014
and $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, in an amount not to exceed the actual
amount of the annual base payment to the tobacco
settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $157,221,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state
general fund from the amounts deposited in the
account that are attributable to the annual
strategic contribution payment received in
fiscal year 2014 . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state
general fund from the amounts deposited in the
account that are attributable to the annual
strategic contribution payment received in fiscal
year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the life
sciences discovery fund, in an amount not to exceed
the actual remaining amount of the annual strategic
contribution payment to the tobacco settlement account
for fiscal year 2014 . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,515,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the life
sciences discovery fund, in an amount not to exceed
the actual remaining amount of the annual strategic
contribution payment to the tobacco settlement account
for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,515,000
The transfer to the life sciences discovery fund is subject to the
condition that $250,000 of the appropriation in fiscal year 2014 and
$250,000 of the appropriation in fiscal year 2015 are provided solely
to promote the development and delivery of global health technologies
and products.
(a) The life sciences discovery fund authority must either
administer a grant application, review, and reward process, or contract
with a qualified nonprofit organization for these services. State
moneys must be provided for grants to entities for the development,
production, promotion, and delivery of global health technologies and
products. Grant award criteria must include:
(i) The quality of the proposed research or the proposed technical
assistance in product development or production process design. Any
grant funds awarded for research activities must be awarded for
nonbasic research that will assist in the commercialization or
manufacture of global health technologies;
(ii) The potential for the grant recipient to improve global health
outcomes;
(iii) The potential for the grant to leverage additional funding
for the development of global health technologies and products;
(iv) The potential for the grant to stimulate, or promote technical
skills training for, employment in the development of global health
technologies in the state; and
(v) The willingness of the grant recipient, when appropriate, to
enter into royalty or licensing income agreements with the authority.
(b) The authority, or the contractor of the authority, must report
information including the types of products and research funded, the
funding leveraged by the grants, and the number and types of jobs
created as a result of the grants, to the economic development
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2014.
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to the
geoduck aquaculture research account, $150,000 for
fiscal year 2014 and $150,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Health Benefit Exchange Account: For transfer to the
state general fund for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $676,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $437,000 for fiscal year 2014
and $2,746,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,183,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to the
marine resources stewardship trust account, $1,850,000
for fiscal year 2014 and $1,850,000 for fiscal year
2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000
Legal Services Revolving Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $976,000 for fiscal year 2014
and $1,477,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,453,000
Personnel Service Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $733,000 for fiscal year 2014 and
$733,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,466,000
Data Processing Revolving Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $8,069,000 for fiscal year 2014
and $8,070,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,139,000
Home Security Fund Account: For transfer to the
transitional housing operating and rent account . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000
Professional Engineers' Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $957,000 for fiscal year 2014 and
$956,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,913,000
Electrical License Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $1,700,000 for fiscal year 2014 and
$1,700,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000
Business and Professions Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $1,838,000 for fiscal year 2014
and $1,800,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,638,000

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS
The appropriations contained in this act are maximum expenditure
authorizations. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys disbursed from the
treasury on the basis of a formal loan agreement shall be recorded as
loans receivable and not as expenditures for accounting purposes. To
the extent that moneys are disbursed on a loan basis, the corresponding
appropriation shall be reduced by the amount of loan moneys disbursed
from the treasury during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS
Whenever allocations are made from the governor's emergency fund
appropriation to an agency that is financed in whole or in part by
other than general fund moneys, the director of financial management
may direct the repayment of such allocated amount to the general fund
from any balance in the fund or funds which finance the agency. An
appropriation is not necessary to effect such repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS
In addition to the amounts appropriated in this act for revenues
for distribution, state contributions to the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2, and bond retirement and
interest including ongoing bond registration and transfer charges,
transfers, interest on registered warrants, and certificates of
indebtedness, there is also appropriated such further amounts as may be
required or available for these purposes under any statutory formula or
under chapters 39.94 and 39.96 RCW or any proper bond covenant made
under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 BOND EXPENSES
In addition to such other appropriations as are made by this act,
there is hereby appropriated to the state finance committee from
legally available bond proceeds in the applicable construction or
building funds and accounts such amounts as are necessary to pay the
expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the subject bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT, SEPARATION, AND
DOWNSHIFTING INCENTIVES
As a management tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of
resources, while improving employee productivity and morale, agencies
may implement a voluntary retirement and/or separation, program that is
cost neutral or results in cost savings (including costs to the state
pension systems) over a two-year period following the commencement of
the program, provided that such a program is approved by the director
of financial management. Agencies participating in this authorization
may offer voluntary retirement and/or separation incentives and options
according to procedures and guidelines established by the office of
financial management, in consultation with the office of the state
human resources director and the department of retirement systems. The
options may include, but are not limited to, financial incentives for
voluntary separation or retirement. An employee does not have a
contractual right to a financial incentive offered under this section.
Offers shall be reviewed and monitored jointly by the office of the
state human resources director and the department of retirement
systems. Agencies are required to submit a report by July 30, 2015, to
the legislature and the office of financial management on the outcome
of their approved incentive program. The report should include
information on the details of the program including the incentive
payment amount for each participant, the total cost to the state, and
the projected or actual net dollar savings over the two year period.
The department of retirement systems may collect from employers the
actuarial cost of any incentive provided under this program, or any
other incentive to retire provided by employers to members of the
state's pension systems, for deposit in the appropriate pension
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS NOT
IMPAIRED
Nothing in this act prohibits the expenditure of any funds by an
agency or institution of the state for benefits guaranteed by any
collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS
The following sections represent the results of the 2013-2015
collective bargaining process required under the provisions of chapters
41.80, 41.56 and 74.39A RCW. Provisions of the collective bargaining
agreements contained in sections 908 through 935 of this act are
described in general terms. Only major economic terms are included in
the descriptions. These descriptions do not contain the complete
contents of the agreements. The collective bargaining agreements or
the continuation of terms and conditions of the 2011-2013 agreements
contained in Part IX of this act may also be funded by expenditures
from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded with lidded
grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue, additional
funding from other sources is not provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE
An agreement has been reached between the governor and the
Washington federation of state employees general government under the
provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.
Funding is provided to add a longevity step and for backfill costs for
a personal leave day. The agreement also includes a one percent salary
increase for all bargaining unit members effective July 1, 2014,
through June 30, 2015, contingent on the state collecting $200,000,000
or more in unanticipated general fund-state revenue from increased
economic activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WPEA
An agreement has been reached between the governor and the
Washington public employees association general government under the
provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.
Funding is provided to add a longevity step. The agreement also
includes a one percent salary increase for all bargaining unit members
effective July 1, 2014, through June 30, 2015, contingent on the state
collecting $200,000,000 or more in unanticipated general fund-state
revenue from increased economic activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--COALITION OF UNIONS
An agreement has been reached between the governor and the
coalition of unions under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to add a longevity
step. The agreement also includes a one percent salary increase for
all bargaining unit members effective July 1, 2014, through June 30,
2015, contingent on the state collecting $200,000,000 or more in
unanticipated general fund-state revenue from increased economic
activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WAFWP
An agreement has been reached between the governor and the
Washington association of fish and wildlife professionals under the
provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.
Funding is provided to add a longevity step. The agreement also
includes a one percent salary increase for all bargaining unit members
effective July 1, 2014, through June 30, 2015, contingent on the state
collecting $200,000,000 or more in unanticipated general fund-state
revenue from increased economic activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 912 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--PTE
LOCAL 17
An agreement has been reached between the governor and the
professional and technical employees local 17 under the provisions of
chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Funding is
provided to add a longevity step. The agreement also includes a one
percent salary increase for all bargaining unit members effective July
1, 2014, through June 30, 2015, contingent on the state collecting
$200,000,000 or more in unanticipated general fund-state revenue from
increased economic activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 913 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--SEIU
1199NW
An agreement has been reached between the governor and the service
employees international union healthcare 1199nw under the provisions of
chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Funding is
provided to add a longevity step and for backfill costs for a personal
leave day. The agreement also includes a one percent salary increase
for all bargaining unit members effective July 1, 2014, through June
30, 2015, contingent on the state collecting $200,000,000 or more in
unanticipated general fund-state revenue from increased economic
activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 914 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--TEAMSTERS LOCAL 117
An agreement has been reached between the governor and the
international brotherhood of teamsters local 117 under the provisions
of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Funding is
provided to add a longevity step. The agreement also includes a one
percent salary increase for all bargaining unit members effective July
1, 2014, through June 30, 2015, contingent on the state collecting
$200,000,000 or more in unanticipated general fund-state revenue from
increased economic activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 915 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE
HIGHER EDUCATION COMMUNITY COLLEGE COALITION
An agreement has been reached between the governor and the
Washington federation of state employees community college coalition
under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal
biennium. Funding is provided to add a longevity step. The agreement
also includes a one percent salary increase for all bargaining unit
members effective July 1, 2014, through June 30, 2015, contingent on
the state collecting $200,000,000 or more in unanticipated general
fund-state revenue from increased economic activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 916 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WPEA
HIGHER EDUCATION COMMUNITY COLLEGE COALITION
An agreement has been reached between the governor and the
Washington public employees association community college coalition
under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal
biennium. Funding is provided to add a longevity step. The agreement
also includes a one percent salary increase for all bargaining unit
members effective July 1, 2014, through June 30, 2015, contingent on
the state collecting $200,000,000 or more in unanticipated general
fund-state revenue from increased economic activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 917 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR
NONSTATE EMPLOYEES--LANGUAGE ACCESS PROVIDERS WFSE
An agreement has been reached between the governor and the
Washington federation of state employees for the language access
providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a rate increase of 50 cents
per hour effective July 1, 2013, and rate increase of 50 cents per hour
effective July 1, 2014. Funding is also provided to accommodate a
change to the no-show payment rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 918 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR
NONSTATE EMPLOYEES--SEIU HEALTHCARE 775NW HOMECARE WORKERS
An agreement has been reached between the governor and the service
employees international union healthcare 775nw through an interest
arbitration decision under the provisions of chapter 74.39A and 41.56
RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for
increases to wages and pay differentials, mileage allowance, and
healthcare contributions. Funding is also provided for a paid holiday
and payment of certification and testing fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 919 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR
NONSTATE EMPLOYEES--SEIU LOCAL 925 CHILDCARE WORKERS
An agreement has been reached between the governor and the service
employees international union local 925 under the provisions of chapter
41.56 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for
increases to health care, scholarship funding and non-standard hours
bonus.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 920 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR
NONSTATE EMPLOYEES--WSRCC ADULT FAMILY HOMES
An agreement has been reached between the governor and the
Washington state residential care council under the provisions of
chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Funding is
provided for a specialty adult family home contract for community
placement of clients currently in western state hospital and an
increase in the daily bed hold rate (days eight through twenty).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 921 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WSP
TROOPERS ASSOCIATION
An agreement has been reached between the governor and the
Washington state patrol troopers association through an interest
arbitration decision under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded three
percent salary increase for all bargaining unit members effective July
1, 2013, and a one percent increase to longevity pay for years five
through nine effective July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 922 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WSP
LIEUTENANTS ASSOCIATION
An agreement has been reached between the governor and the
Washington state patrol lieutenants association through an interest
arbitration decision under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for the awarded three
percent salary increase for all bargaining unit members effective July
1, 2014, and for parking of department issued vehicles for employees
assigned vehicles at the general administration building or capital
campus.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 923 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--YAKIMA
VALLEY COMMUNITY COLLEGE--WPEA
An agreement has been reached between Yakima Valley Community
College and the Washington public employees association under the
provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.
Funding is provided to add a longevity step. The agreement also
includes that economic terms and conditions replicate those specified
in the agreement executed by and between the Washington state higher
education coalition and the Washington public employees association
under RCW 41.80.010 for the term July 1, 2013, to June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 924 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--THE
EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE--WFSE
An agreement has been reached between The Evergreen State College
and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions
of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Funding is
provided to add a longevity step and a personal leave day. Funding is
also provided for a one percent salary increase for all bargaining unit
members beginning July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 925 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE
An agreement has been reached between the Western Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees under the
provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.
Funding is provided to add a longevity step. The agreement also
includes compensation equal to any compensation increase approved,
implemented, and funded by the state for general government classified
represented staff through the general service salary schedule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 926 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--PSE
An agreement has been reached between the Western Washington
University and the public schools employees under the provisions of
chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Funding is
provided to add a longevity step. The agreement also includes
compensation equal to any compensation increase approved, implemented,
and funded by the state for general government classified represented
staff through the general service salary schedule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 927 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--EASTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE
An agreement has been reached between Eastern Washington University
and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions
of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Funding is
provided to add a longevity step. Funding is also provided for a one
percent salary increase for all bargaining unit members beginning July
1, 2013, and a one percent salary increase for all bargaining unit
members beginning July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 928 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--CENTRAL
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE
An agreement has been reached between Central Washington University
and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions
of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Funding is
provided to add a longevity step and for a one percent salary increase
for all bargaining unit members beginning July 1, 2014. The agreement
also includes additional one-time payments each November of each fiscal
year for members continually employed during the preceding twelve
months in an amount up to three percent of member's gross wages
contingent on the university's achievement of the goals contained in
its student success incentive program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 929 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--CENTRAL
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--PSE
An agreement has been reached between Central Washington University
and the public schools employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80
RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided to add a
longevity step. The agreement includes a one percent salary increase
for all bargaining unit members beginning July 1, 2014, and in the
event classified employees bargaining at the general government's
higher education tables receive a general wage increase greater than
one percent, salary ranges will increase by the higher amount. The
agreement also includes additional one-time payments each November each
fiscal year for members continually employed during the preceding
twelve months in an amount up to three percent of member's gross wages
contingent on the university's achievement of the goals contained in
its student success incentive program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 930 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--WFSE
An agreement has been reached between the University of Washington
and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions
of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Funding is
provided for additional premium pay, preceptor pay, and professional
development increases. Funding is also provided for a two percent wage
increase for all bargaining unit members beginning July 1, 2013, a two
percent wage increase for all bargaining unit members beginning July 1,
2014. The agreement also provides that if the university agrees to
across-the-board salary increases for any SEIU 925 bargaining unit that
are more favorable than those negotiated with WFSE, the university will
grant the same salary increase to WFSE-represented employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 931 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--SEIU 925
An agreement has been reached between the University of Washington
and the service employees international union local 925 under the
provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.
Funding is provided for additional step increases, a two percent salary
increase for all bargaining unit members beginning July 1, 2013, and a
two percent salary increase for all bargaining unit members beginning
July 1, 2014. The agreement also provides that if the university
agrees to across-the-board salary increases or general increases for a
SEIU 1199 or Washington state nurse association bargaining unit that
are more favorable than those negotiated with SEIU 925, the university
will grant the same salary increase to SEIU 925-represented employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 932 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--TEAMSTERS 117 (UW POLICE OFFICERS)
An agreement has been reached between the University of Washington
and the teamsters 117 under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Funding is provided for a two percent
salary increase for all bargaining unit members beginning July 1, 2013,
and a two percent salary increase for all bargaining unit members
beginning July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 933 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY--WFSE
An agreement has been reached between the Washington State
University and the Washington federation of state employees under the
provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. The
agreement provides that if a general salary increase, implementation of
a salary survey, or a longevity step (Step M) is approved and funded by
the state for university nonbargaining unit covered classified staff,
WFSE bargaining unit members will receive the same.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 934 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY--PSE
An agreement has been reached between the Washington State
University and the public school employees of Washington under the
provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. The
agreement provides that the bargaining unit members have a "me-too"
agreement regarding cost of living increases with university classified
staff utilizing the general service higher education salary schedule
should the university request and receive funding to provide an across-the- board salary increase for classified staff.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 935 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY--WSU POLICE GUILD
An agreement has been reached between the Washington State
University and the Washington State University Police Guild under the
provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.
Funding is provided to add a longevity step.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 936 COMPENSATION--REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--SUPER COALITION--INSURANCE BENEFITS
No agreement was reached between the governor and the health care
super coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Appropriations in this act for state
agencies, including institutions of higher education are sufficient to
continue the provisions of the 2011-2013 collective bargaining
agreement, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $782 per eligible employee for
fiscal year 2014. For fiscal year 2015 the monthly employer funding
rate shall not exceed $791 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require or make
any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2014 and 2015, the subsidy shall be
up to $150.00 per month.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 937 COMPENSATION--REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES
OUTSIDE SUPER COALITION--INSURANCE BENEFITS
Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for
represented employees outside the super coalition for health benefits,
and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $782 per eligible employee for
fiscal year 2014. For fiscal year 2015 the monthly employer funding
rate shall not exceed $791 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require or make
any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2014 and 2015, the subsidy shall be
up to $150.00 per month.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 938 COMPENSATION--NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS
Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for
nonrepresented state employee health benefits for state agencies,
including institutions of higher education, and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $782 per eligible employee for
fiscal year 2014. For fiscal year 2015 the monthly employer funding
rate shall not exceed $791 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require or make
any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2014 and 2015, the subsidy shall be
up to $150.00 per month.
(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service
districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW
41.05.120 the following amounts:
(a) For each full-time employee, $64.40 per month beginning
September 1, 2013, and $70.39 beginning September 1, 2014; and
(b) For each part-time employee, who at the time of the remittance
is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for
basic benefits, $64.40 each month beginning September 1, 2013, and
$70.39 beginning September 1, 2014, prorated by the proportion of
employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the
part-time employee receives. The remittance requirements specified in
this subsection (3) shall not apply to employees of a technical
college, school district, or educational service district who purchase
insurance benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 939 COMPENSATION--REVISE PENSION CONTRIBUTION
RATES
The appropriations for school districts and state agencies,
including institutions of higher education are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Appropriations are adjusted to reflect
changes to agency appropriations to reflect pension contribution rates
adopted by the pension funding council and the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 940 NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE LONGEVITY STEP
For classified state employees, except those within the Washington
management service and except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, or 47.64 RCW, funding is provided within
agency appropriations for implementation of a longevity step, in
accordance with rules adopted under RCW 41.06.133.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 941 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS
For collective bargaining agreements negotiated with the state for
the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium under chapter 41.80 RCW, the governor may
request funds to implement the terms and conditions of any agreement
negotiated by an institution of higher education and submitted to the
office of financial management after October 1, 2012, but before
December 20, 2012, if that agreement is determined to be financially
feasible to the state by the director of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 942 COMPENSATION - CONTINGENT INCREASE IN
SALARIES AND WAGES
(1) If the director of the office of financial management
determines that the February 2014 economic and revenue forecast council
forecast for general fund--state revenues for fiscal year 2015 is
$200,000,000 or more than the September 2012 economic and revenue
forecast council forecast for general fund--state revenues for fiscal
year 2015 as a result of increased economic activity, effective July 1,
2014, appropriations to state agencies will increase in the amounts
specified in LEAP Document 2013-H01 to fund a one percent salary
increase effective July 1, 2014, through June 30, 2015, for the
following state employees:
(a) All classified employees;
(b) Employees in the Washington management service;
(c) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, employees
exempt from merit system rules in the legislative, executive, and
judicial branches;
(d) Employees of the marine division of the department of
transportation represented by the office and professional employees
international union local eight and service employees international
union local six.
(2) The salary increase in this section is not provided to the
following state employees:
(a) Commissioned officers of the Washington state patrol
represented by the Washington state patrol troopers association and the
Washington state patrol lieutenants association;
(b) Employees of the marine division of the department of
transportation represented by:
(i) The ferry agents, supervisors, project administrators
association;
(ii) The Pacific northwest regional council of carpenters;
(iii) The Puget Sound metal trades council;
(iv) The marine engineers' beneficial association unlicensed engine
room employees;
(v) The marine engineers' beneficial association licensed engineer
officers;
(vi) The masters, mates and pilots - mates;
(vii) The masters, mates and pilots – masters;
(viii) The masters, mates and pilots - watch supervisors; and
(ix) The inlandboatmen's union of the pacific.
(c) Employees whose maximum salaries are set by the commission on
salaries for elected officials; and
(d) Faculty employees and employees exempt from merit system rules
at institutions of higher education.
(3) For purposes of this section, "increased economic activity"
means additional revenue derived from taxable business and consumer
activity and does not include revenue changes from changes in state or
federal law or revenue changes characterized by the economic and
revenue forecast council as a noneconomic change.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 943 ACQUISITION OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
PROJECTS THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS
(1) Financial contracts for the acquisition of the information
technology projects authorized in this section must be approved jointly
by the office of the financial management and the office of the chief
information officer. Information technology projects funded under this
section shall meet the following requirements:
(a) The project reduces costs and achieves economies of scale by
leveraging statewide investments in systems and data and other common
or enterprise-wide solutions within and across state agencies;
(b) The project begins or continues replacement of legacy
information technology systems and replacing these systems with modern
and more efficient information technology systems;
(c) The project improves the ability of an agency to recover from
major disaster;
(d) The project provides future savings and efficiencies for an
agency through reduced operating costs, improved customer service, or
increased revenue collections; and
(e) Preference for project approval must be given to an agency that
has prior approval from the office of the chief information officer, an
approved business plan, and where the primary hurdle to project funding
is the lack of funding capacity.
(2) The following state agencies may enter into financial contracts
to finance expenditures for the acquisition and implementation of the
following information technology projects for up to the respective
amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW:
(a) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, $10,000,000 for the
department of enterprise services time, leave, and attendance pilot
project;
(b) $3,867,000 for the Washington state patrol for continuation of
the mobile office platform;
(c) $8,500,000 for the department of social and health services
conversion to the tenth version of the world health organization's
international classification of diseases;
(d) $5,558,343 for the department of early learning system
implementation of electronic benefit transfers;
(e) $9,404,000 for the employment security department to modernize
the unemployment insurance benefit system; and
(f) $4,323,000 for the department of corrections for radio
infrastructure upgrades.
(3) The office of financial management with assistance from the
office of the chief information officer will report to the governor and
fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1st of each year on
the status of distributions and expenditures on information technology
projects and improved statewide or agency performance results achieved
by project funding.
(4) If the Washington state department of transportation enters
into financial contracts pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the
acquisition and implementation of a time, leave, and labor distribution
system, the authorization provided to the department of enterprise
services in subsection (2)(a) of this section expires.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 944 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROJECTS
(1) The office of the chief information officer, in coordination
with the technology services board, must evaluate existing state
technology policies on technology investment planning and project
implementation to determine whether these policies reflect current
industry leading practices. Where necessary, the office of the chief
information officer shall develop revisions to these policies designed
to incorporate leading practices, and to incorporate appropriate
reporting mechanisms designed to improve the transparency of agency
compliance with these policies. All revisions must be submitted to the
technology services board for approval no later than September 30,
2013. The technology services board may create a subcommittee
responsible for the ongoing review and oversight of state technology
policy development.
(2) The office of the chief information officer shall improve the
transparency of agency technology planning and development activities
by implementing a publicly facing web-based reporting tool for
centralized reporting and posting of these documents. The office of
the chief information officer shall develop and implement a policy
requiring that all critical planning documents, including but not
limited to feasibility studies, project management plans, and quality
assurance plans for all major projects, and all quality assurance
status reports. The reporting tool should be in place no later than
September 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 945 PERSONAL COMPUTER ACQUISITION AND
REPLACEMENT
(1) The legislature finds that the state must achieve reduced costs
in the acquisition and deployment of new and replacement personal
computers. The office of the chief information officer of the state
must develop a policy on the procurement of personal computers with the
goal of reducing the total life cycle cost of ownership. The policy
must be effective no later than September 1, 2013.
(2) At a minimum, the policy must address frequency of replacement,
identify a preferred financing method, and identify one or more
preferred equipment configurations. Financing methods examined in
developing the policy must include leasing, lease purchasing,
purchasing using certificates of participation and cash purchase. In
determining total life cycle costs, the office of the chief information
officer must consider the cost of acquisition, deployment, financing,
maintenance, and decommissioning of personal computers including any
residual software licensing costs. The office of the chief information
officer may include any other criteria deemed appropriate in developing
the policy.
(3) The office of the attorney general shall participate in a pilot
acquisition program. Key elements of the pilot will include a regular
replacement cycle that ensures reliable equipment and is acquired by
lease. Deployment of the replacement computer and decommissioning of
the old computer must also be part of the acquisition contract. The
office of the attorney general must work with the office of the chief
information officer to determine the costs and benefits of this
approach relative to cash procurement and agency deployment and
decommissioning. The office of the chief information officer shall
report on the findings of the pilot not later than January 1, 2015.
(4) While judicial, legislative, and higher education agencies are
exempt from this policy, they are encouraged to adhere to the policy to
the maximum extent practicable in meeting the goal of lowering the
total life cycle cost of ownership for personal computers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 946 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SECURITY PROGRAMS
AND TRAINING
(1) The office of the chief information officer has developed
information technology security policies to assist state agencies in
implementing an information technology security program. Before any
agency may expend amounts appropriated in this act on information
technology equipment, the agency must adopt the information technology
security guidelines or the state chief information officer must approve
an agency's information technology security program.
(2) Every agency shall submit to the office of the chief
information officer a schedule for employee information technology
security training, in accordance with technology security policies, no
later than September 1, 2013. In the event an agency has not complied
with this requirement, the chief information officer may request the
office of financial management to embargo all or part of the amounts
appropriated to the agency in this act for information technology
equipment purchases until the agency training schedule is received.

Sec. 947 RCW 2.28.170 and 2009 c 445 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Counties may establish and operate drug courts.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "drug court" means a court
that has special calendars or dockets designed to achieve a reduction
in recidivism and substance abuse among nonviolent, substance abusing
felony and nonfelony offenders, whether adult or juvenile, by
increasing their likelihood for successful rehabilitation through
early, continuous, and intense judicially supervised treatment;
mandatory periodic drug testing; and the use of appropriate sanctions
and other rehabilitation services.
(3)(a) Any jurisdiction that seeks a state appropriation to fund a
drug court program must first:
(i) Exhaust all federal funding that is available to support the
operations of its drug court and associated services; and
(ii) Match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state moneys allocated
for drug court programs with local cash or in-kind resources. Moneys
allocated by the state must be used to supplement, not supplant, other
federal, state, and local funds for drug court operations and
associated services. However, from July 26, 2009, until June 30,
((2013)) 2015, no match is required for state moneys expended for the
administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a
drug court pursuant to RCW 70.96A.350.
(b) Any county that establishes a drug court pursuant to this
section shall establish minimum requirements for the participation of
offenders in the program. The drug court may adopt local requirements
that are more stringent than the minimum. The minimum requirements
are:
(i) The offender would benefit from substance abuse treatment;
(ii) The offender has not previously been convicted of a serious
violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; and
(iii) Without regard to whether proof of any of these elements is
required to convict, the offender is not currently charged with or
convicted of an offense:
(A) That is a sex offense;
(B) That is a serious violent offense;
(C) During which the defendant used a firearm; or
(D) During which the defendant caused substantial or great bodily
harm or death to another person.

Sec. 948 RCW 2.28.170 and 2013 c 257 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Jurisdictions may establish and operate drug courts.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "drug court" means a court
that has special calendars or dockets designed to achieve a reduction
in recidivism and substance abuse among nonviolent, substance abusing
felony and nonfelony offenders, whether adult or juvenile, by
increasing their likelihood for successful rehabilitation through
early, continuous, and intense judicially supervised treatment;
mandatory periodic drug testing; and the use of appropriate sanctions
and other rehabilitation services.
(3)(a) Any jurisdiction that seeks a state appropriation to fund a
drug court program must first:
(i) Exhaust all federal funding that is available to support the
operations of its drug court and associated services; and
(ii) Match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state moneys allocated
for drug court programs with local cash or in-kind resources. Moneys
allocated by the state must be used to supplement, not supplant, other
federal, state, and local funds for drug court operations and
associated services. However, from July 26, 2009, until June 30,
((2013)) 2015, no match is required for state moneys expended for the
administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a
drug court pursuant to RCW 70.96A.350.
(b) Any jurisdiction that establishes a drug court pursuant to this
section shall establish minimum requirements for the participation of
offenders in the program. The drug court may adopt local requirements
that are more stringent than the minimum. The minimum requirements
are:
(i) The offender would benefit from substance abuse treatment;
(ii) The offender has not previously been convicted of a serious
violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; and
(iii) Without regard to whether proof of any of these elements is
required to convict, the offender is not currently charged with or
convicted of an offense:
(A) That is a sex offense;
(B) That is a serious violent offense;
(C) During which the defendant used a firearm; or
(D) During which the defendant caused substantial or great bodily
harm or death to another person.

Sec. 949 RCW 13.40.466 and 2006 c 304 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The reinvesting in youth account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account shall be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used to reimburse
local governments for the implementation of the reinvesting in youth
program established in RCW 13.40.462 and 13.40.464. During the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from
the reinvesting in youth account for juvenile rehabilitation purposes.
(2) Revenues to the reinvesting in youth account consist of
revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.
(3) The department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall review and monitor the expenditures
made by any county or group of counties that is funded, in whole or in
part, with funds provided through the reinvesting in youth account.
Counties shall repay any funds that are not spent in accordance with
RCW 13.40.462 and 13.40.464.

Sec. 950 RCW 18.43.150 and 1991 c 277 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
All fees collected under the provisions of RCW 18.43.050,
18.43.060, 18.43.080, 18.43.100, and 18.43.130 and fines collected
under RCW 18.43.110 shall be paid into the professional engineers'
account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury to
be used to carry out the purposes and provisions of RCW 18.43.050,
18.43.060, 18.43.080, 18.43.100, 18.43.110, 18.43.120, 18.43.130,
18.43.140 and all other duties required for operation and enforcement
of this chapter. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the professional engineers' account to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
account.

Sec. 951 RCW 19.28.351 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 910 are each
amended to read as follows:
All sums received from licenses, permit fees, or other sources,
herein shall be paid to the state treasurer and placed in a special
fund designated as the "electrical license fund," and paid out upon
vouchers duly and regularly issued therefor and approved by the
director of labor and industries or the director's designee following
determination by the board that the sums are necessary to accomplish
the intent of chapter 19.28 RCW. The treasurer shall keep an accurate
record of payments into, or receipts of, the fund, and of all
disbursements therefrom.
During the ((2003-2005)) 2013-2015 biennium, the legislature may
transfer moneys from the electrical license fund to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 952 RCW 28A.500.020 and 2010 c 237 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(a) "Prior tax collection year" means the year immediately
preceding the year in which the local effort assistance shall be
allocated.
(b) "Statewide average fourteen percent levy rate" means fourteen
percent of the total levy bases as defined in RCW 84.52.0531 (3)
through (5) for calendar years 2014 and 2015, and as defined in RCW
84.52.0531 (3) and (4) in calendar years 2016 and thereafter, summed
for all school districts, and divided by the total assessed valuation
for excess levy purposes in the prior tax collection year for all
districts as adjusted to one hundred percent by the county indicated
ratio established in RCW 84.48.075.
(c) The "district's fourteen percent levy amount" means the school
district's maximum levy authority after transfers determined under RCW
84.52.0531(2) (a) through (c) divided by the district's maximum levy
percentage determined under RCW 84.52.0531(((5))) (6) multiplied by
fourteen percent.
(d) The "district's fourteen percent levy rate" means the
district's fourteen percent levy amount divided by the district's
assessed valuation for excess levy purposes for the prior tax
collection year as adjusted to one hundred percent by the county
indicated ratio.
(e) "Districts eligible for local effort assistance" means those
districts with a fourteen percent levy rate that exceeds the statewide
average fourteen percent levy rate.
(2) Unless otherwise stated all rates, percents, and amounts are
for the calendar year for which local effort assistance is being
calculated under this chapter.

Sec. 953 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 914 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning in the 2011-12 academic year, reductions or increases
in full-time tuition fees shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act for resident undergraduate students at community and
technical colleges. The governing boards of the state universities,
regional universities, and The Evergreen State College; and the state
board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including nonresident students, summer school students, and students in
other self-supporting degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition may exceed the fiscal growth factor. Except during the
((2011-2013)) 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the state board for community
and technical colleges may pilot or institute differential tuition
models. The board may define scale, scope, and rationale for the
models.
(3)(a) Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year and through the end
of the 2014-15 academic year, the governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State
College may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students,
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students; however, during the ((2011-2013)) 2013-2015 fiscal biennium,
reductions or increases in tuition must be uniform among resident
undergraduate students.
(b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with
existing student associations or organizations with student
undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of
potential tuition increases. Each governing board shall make public
its proposal for tuition and fee increases twenty-one days before the
governing board of the institution considers adoption and allow
opportunity for public comment. However, the requirement to make
public a proposal for tuition and fee increases twenty-one days before
the governing board considers adoption shall not apply if the omnibus
appropriations act has not passed the legislature by May 15th.
Governing boards shall be required to provide data regarding the
percentage of students receiving financial aid, the sources of aid, and
the percentage of total costs of attendance paid for by aid.
(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the state board for community and technical college system shall
consult with existing student associations or organizations with
undergraduate student representation regarding the impacts of potential
tuition increases. The state board for community and technical
colleges shall provide data regarding the percentage of students
receiving financial aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of
total costs of attendance paid for by aid.
(4) Beginning with the 2015-16 academic year through the 2018-19
academic year, the governing boards of the state universities, regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College may set tuition for
resident undergraduates as follows:
(a) If state funding for a college or university falls below the
state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year 2011,
the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in (d) of
this subsection, reduce enrollments, or both;
(b) If state funding for a college or university is at least at the
level of state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year
2011, the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in
(d) of this subsection and shall continue to at least maintain the
actual enrollment levels for fiscal year 2011 or increase enrollments
as required in the omnibus appropriations act;
(c) If state funding is increased so that combined with resident
undergraduate tuition the sixtieth percentile of the total per-student
funding at similar public institutions of higher education in the
global challenge states under RCW 28B.15.068 is exceeded, the governing
board shall decrease tuition by the amount needed for the total per-student funding to be at the sixtieth percentile under RCW 28B.15.068;
and
(d) The amount of tuition set by the governing board for an
institution under this subsection (4) may not exceed the sixtieth
percentile of the resident undergraduate tuition of similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement program
through an interlocal agreement between a school district and a
community or technical college under RCW 28A.175.100 through
28A.175.110.
(7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose
of obtaining a high school diploma.
(8) Beginning in the 2019-20 academic year, reductions or increases
in full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduates at four-year
institutions of higher education shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(9) The legislative advisory committee to the committee on advanced
tuition payment established in RCW 28B.95.170 shall:
(a) Review the impact of differential tuition rates on the funded
status and future unit price of the Washington advanced college tuition
payment program; and
(b) No later than January 14, 2013, make a recommendation to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding
how differential tuition should be addressed in order to maintain the
ongoing solvency of the Washington advanced college tuition payment
program.

Sec. 954 RCW 28B.20.476 and 2007 c 216 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The geoduck aquaculture research account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from any legislative
appropriations, the aquaculture industry, or any other private or
public source directed to the account must be deposited in the account.
Expenditures from the account may only be used by the sea grant program
for the geoduck research projects identified by RCW 28B.20.475. Only
the president of the University of Washington or the president's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures. During the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium, amounts available in the geoduck aquaculture research
account may also be appropriated for the sea grant program at the
University of Washington to conduct research examining the possible
negative and positive effects of evolving shellfish aquaculture
techniques and practices on Washington's economy and marine ecosystems.

Sec. 955 RCW 28B.92.010 and 2004 c 275 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purposes of this chapter are to establish the principles upon
which the state financial aid programs will be based and to establish
the state of Washington state need grant program, thus assisting
financially needy or disadvantaged students domiciled in Washington to
obtain the opportunity of attending an accredited institution of higher
education. State need grants under this chapter are available only to
students who are resident students as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a)
through (((d))) (e) or any person who has completed the full senior
year of high school and obtained a high school diploma, either at a
Washington public high school or private high school approved under
chapter 28A.195 RCW, or a person who has received the equivalent of a
diploma; who has lived in Washington state for at least three years
immediately before receiving the diploma or its equivalent; who has
continuously lived in the state of Washington after receiving the
diploma or its equivalent and until such time as the individual is
admitted to an eligible institution of higher education and has been
granted deferred action for childhood arrival status pursuant to the
rules and regulations adopted by the United States citizenship and
immigration services.

Sec. 956 RCW 28C.04.535 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 930 are each
amended to read as follows:
Except for the ((2011-12 and 2012-13)) 2013-14 and 2014-15 school
years, the Washington award for vocational excellence shall be granted
annually. The workforce training and education coordinating board
shall notify the students receiving the award, their vocational
instructors, local chambers of commerce, the legislators of their
respective districts, and the governor, after final selections have
been made. The workforce training and education coordinating board, in
conjunction with the governor's office, shall prepare appropriate
certificates to be presented to the selected students. Awards shall be
presented in public ceremonies at times and places determined by the
workforce training and education coordinating board in cooperation with
the office of the governor.

Sec. 957 RCW 38.52.540 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 915 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The enhanced 911 account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from the state enhanced 911 excise taxes imposed by RCW
82.14B.030 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account
must be used only to support the statewide coordination and management
of the enhanced 911 system, for the implementation of wireless enhanced
911 statewide, for the modernization of enhanced 911 emergency
communications systems statewide, and to help supplement, within
available funds, the operational costs of the system, including
adequate funding of counties to enable implementation of wireless
enhanced 911 service and reimbursement of radio communications service
companies for costs incurred in providing wireless enhanced 911 service
pursuant to negotiated contracts between the counties or their agents
and the radio communications service companies. For the 2011-2013
fiscal biennium, the account may be used for modernizing narrowband
radio capability in the department of corrections. For the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium, the account may be used for activities and programs in
the military department. A county must show just cause, including but
not limited to a true and accurate accounting of the funds expended,
for any inability to provide reimbursement to radio communications
service companies of costs incurred in providing enhanced 911 service.
(2) Funds generated by the enhanced 911 excise tax imposed by RCW
82.14B.030(5) may not be distributed to any county that has not imposed
the maximum county enhanced 911 excise tax allowed under RCW
82.14B.030(1). Funds generated by the enhanced 911 excise tax imposed
by RCW 82.14B.030(6) may not be distributed to any county that has not
imposed the maximum county enhanced 911 excise tax allowed under RCW
82.14B.030(2).
(3) The state enhanced 911 coordinator, with the advice and
assistance of the enhanced 911 advisory committee, is authorized to
enter into statewide agreements to improve the efficiency of enhanced
911 services for all counties and shall specify by rule the additional
purposes for which moneys, if available, may be expended from this
account.

Sec. 958 RCW 39.26.210 and 2012 c 224 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Agencies during the 2013-2015 biennia, must ((annually)) submit
to the department a list of all contracts that the agency has entered
into or renewed within ten days of entering into the contract.
"Contracts," for the purposes of this section, does not include
purchase orders. The department must maintain a publicly available
list of all contracts entered into by agencies ((during each fiscal
year)), except that contracts for the employment of expert witnesses
for the purposes of litigation shall not be made publicly available to
the extent that information is exempt from disclosure under state law.
Except as otherwise exempt, the data must identify the contracting
agency, the contractor, the purpose of the contract, effective dates
and periods of performance, the cost of the contract and funding
source, any substantive modifications to the contract, and whether the
contract was competitively procured or awarded on a sole source basis.
(2) The department may conduct audits of its master contracts and
convenience contracts to ensure that the contractor is in compliance
with the contract terms and conditions, including but not limited to
providing only the goods and services specified in the contract at the
contract price.

Sec. 959 RCW 41.06.280 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 419 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury,
designated as the "personnel service fund," to be used by the office of
financial management and the department of enterprise services as a
revolving fund for the payment of salaries, wages, and operations
required for the administration of the provisions of this chapter,
applicable provisions of chapter 41.04 RCW, and chapter 41.60 RCW. An
amount not to exceed one and one-half percent of the salaries and wages
for all positions in the classified service in each of the agencies
subject to this chapter, except the institutions of higher education,
shall be charged to the operations appropriations of each agency and
credited to the personnel service fund as the allotments are approved
pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW. Subject to the above limitations, the
amount shall be charged against the allotments pro rata, at a rate to
be fixed by the director from time to time which, together with income
derived from services rendered under RCW 41.06.080, will provide the
office of financial management and the department of enterprise
services with funds to meet its anticipated expenditures during the
allotment period, including the training requirements in RCW 41.06.500
and 41.06.530.
The director shall fix the terms and charges for services rendered
by the department of enterprise services and the office of financial
management pursuant to RCW 41.06.080, which amounts shall be credited
to the personnel service fund and charged against the proper fund or
appropriation of the recipient of such services on a monthly basis.
Payment for services so rendered under RCW 41.06.080 shall be made on
a monthly basis to the state treasurer and deposited in the personnel
service fund.
Moneys from the personnel service fund shall be disbursed by the
state treasurer by warrants on vouchers duly authorized by the office
of financial management and the department of enterprise services.
During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the personnel service fund to the state general fund such amounts
as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 960 RCW 41.06.280 and 2013 c 251 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury,
designated as the "personnel service fund," to be used by the office of
financial management as a revolving fund for the payment of salaries,
wages, and operations required for the administration of the provisions
of this chapter, applicable provisions of chapter 41.04 RCW, and
chapter 41.60 RCW. An amount not to exceed one and one-half percent of
the salaries and wages for all positions in the classified service in
each of the agencies subject to this chapter, except the institutions
of higher education, shall be charged to the operations appropriations
of each agency and credited to the personnel service fund as the
allotments are approved pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW. Subject to the
above limitations, the amount shall be charged against the allotments
pro rata, at a rate to be fixed by the director from time to time
which, together with income derived from services rendered under RCW
41.06.080, will provide the office of financial management with funds
to meet its anticipated expenditures during the allotment period,
including the training requirements in RCW 41.06.500 and 41.06.530.
All revenues, net of expenditures, previously derived from services
provided by the department of enterprise services under RCW 41.06.080
must be transferred to the enterprise services account.
The director shall fix the terms and charges for services rendered
by the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 41.06.080, which
amounts shall be credited to the personnel service fund and charged
against the proper fund or appropriation of the recipient of such
services on a monthly basis. Payment for services so rendered under
RCW 41.06.080 shall be made on a monthly basis to the state treasurer
and deposited in the personnel service fund.
Moneys from the personnel service fund shall be disbursed by the
state treasurer by warrants on vouchers duly authorized by the office
of financial management.
During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the personnel service fund to the state general fund such amounts
as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 961 RCW 41.26.802 and 2008 c 99 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By September 30, 2011, if the prior fiscal biennium's general
state revenues exceed the previous fiscal biennium's revenues by more
than five percent, subject to appropriation by the legislature, the
state treasurer shall transfer five million dollars to the local public
safety enhancement account.
(2) ((By September 30, 2013, if the prior fiscal biennium's general
state revenues exceed the previous fiscal biennium's revenues by more
than five percent, subject to appropriation by the legislature, the
state treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars to the local public
safety enhancement account.
(3))) By September 30, 2015, if the prior fiscal biennium's general
state revenues exceed the previous fiscal biennium's revenues by more
than five percent, subject to appropriation by the legislature, the
state treasurer shall transfer twenty million dollars to the local
public safety enhancement account.
(4) By September 30, 2017, and by September 30 of each odd-numbered
year thereafter, if the prior fiscal biennium's general state revenues
exceed the previous fiscal biennium's revenues by more than five
percent, subject to appropriation by the legislature, the state
treasurer shall transfer the lesser of one-third of the increase, or
fifty million dollars, to the local public safety enhancement account.

Sec. 962 RCW 41.60.050 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 937 and 2011 1st
sp.s. c 43 s 473 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The legislature shall appropriate from the personnel service fund
for the payment of administrative costs of the productivity board.
However, during the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal ((biennium))
biennia, the operations of the productivity board shall be suspended.

Sec. 963 RCW 41.80.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 938 and 2011 c
344 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of negotiating collective bargaining agreements
under this chapter, the employer shall be represented by the governor
or governor's designee, except as provided for institutions of higher
education in subsection (4) of this section.
(2)(a) If an exclusive bargaining representative represents more
than one bargaining unit, the exclusive bargaining representative shall
negotiate with each employer representative as designated in subsection
(1) of this section one master collective bargaining agreement on
behalf of all the employees in bargaining units that the exclusive
bargaining representative represents. For those exclusive bargaining
representatives who represent fewer than a total of five hundred
employees each, negotiation shall be by a coalition of all those
exclusive bargaining representatives. The coalition shall bargain for
a master collective bargaining agreement covering all of the employees
represented by the coalition. The governor's designee and the
exclusive bargaining representative or representatives are authorized
to enter into supplemental bargaining of agency-specific issues for
inclusion in or as an addendum to the master collective bargaining
agreement, subject to the parties' agreement regarding the issues and
procedures for supplemental bargaining. This section does not prohibit
cooperation and coordination of bargaining between two or more
exclusive bargaining representatives.
(b) This subsection (2) does not apply to exclusive bargaining
representatives who represent employees of institutions of higher
education, except when the institution of higher education has elected
to exercise its option under subsection (4) of this section to have its
negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's designee under the
procedures provided for general government agencies in subsections (1)
through (3) of this section.
(c) If five hundred or more employees of an independent state
elected official listed in RCW 43.01.010 are organized in a bargaining
unit or bargaining units under RCW 41.80.070, the official shall be
consulted by the governor or the governor's designee before any
agreement is reached under (a) of this subsection concerning
supplemental bargaining of agency specific issues affecting the
employees in such bargaining unit.
(3) The governor shall submit a request for funds necessary to
implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions in the master
collective bargaining agreement or for legislation necessary to
implement the agreement. Requests for funds necessary to implement the
provisions of bargaining agreements shall not be submitted to the
legislature by the governor unless such requests:
(a) Have been submitted to the director of the office of financial
management by October 1 prior to the legislative session at which the
requests are to be considered; and
(b) Have been certified by the director of the office of financial
management as being feasible financially for the state.
The legislature shall approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds as a whole. The legislature shall not consider a
request for funds to implement a collective bargaining agreement unless
the request is transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's
budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060. If the
legislature rejects or fails to act on the submission, either party may
reopen all or part of the agreement or the exclusive bargaining
representative may seek to implement the procedures provided for in RCW
41.80.090.
(4)(a)(i) For the purpose of negotiating agreements for
institutions of higher education, the employer shall be the respective
governing board of each of the universities, colleges, or community
colleges or a designee chosen by the board to negotiate on its behalf.
(ii) A governing board of a university or college may elect to have
its negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's designee under
the procedures provided for general government agencies in subsections
(1) through (3) of this section, except that:
(A) The governor or the governor's designee and an exclusive
bargaining representative shall negotiate one master collective
bargaining agreement for all of the bargaining units of employees of a
university or college that the representative represents; or
(B) If the parties mutually agree, the governor or the governor's
designee and an exclusive bargaining representative shall negotiate one
master collective bargaining agreement for all of the bargaining units
of employees of more than one university or college that the
representative represents.
(iii) A governing board of a community college may elect to have
its negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's designee under
the procedures provided for general government agencies in subsections
(1) through (3) of this section.
(b) Prior to entering into negotiations under this chapter, the
institutions of higher education or their designees shall consult with
the director of the office of financial management regarding financial
and budgetary issues that are likely to arise in the impending
negotiations.
(c)(i) In the case of bargaining agreements reached between
institutions of higher education other than the University of
Washington and exclusive bargaining representatives agreed to under the
provisions of this chapter, if appropriations are necessary to
implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of the
bargaining agreements, the governor shall submit a request for such
funds to the legislature according to the provisions of subsection (3)
of this section, except as provided in (c)(iii) of this subsection.
(ii) In the case of bargaining agreements reached between the
University of Washington and exclusive bargaining representatives
agreed to under the provisions of this chapter, if appropriations are
necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions
of a bargaining agreement, the governor shall submit a request for such
funds to the legislature according to the provisions of subsection (3)
of this section, except as provided in this subsection (4)(c)(ii) and
as provided in (c)(iii) of this subsection.
(A) If appropriations of less than ten thousand dollars are
necessary to implement the provisions of a bargaining agreement, a
request for such funds shall not be submitted to the legislature by the
governor unless the request has been submitted to the director of the
office of financial management by October 1 prior to the legislative
session at which the request is to be considered.
(B) If appropriations of ten thousand dollars or more are necessary
to implement the provisions of a bargaining agreement, a request for
such funds shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor
unless the request:
(I) Has been submitted to the director of the office of financial
management by October 1 prior to the legislative session at which the
request is to be considered; and
(II) Has been certified by the director of the office of financial
management as being feasible financially for the state.
(C) If the director of the office of financial management does not
certify a request under (c)(ii)(B) of this subsection as being feasible
financially for the state, the parties shall enter into collective
bargaining solely for the purpose of reaching a mutually agreed upon
modification of the agreement necessary to address the absence of those
requested funds. The legislature may act upon the compensation and
fringe benefit provisions of the modified collective bargaining
agreement if those provisions are agreed upon and submitted to the
office of financial management and legislative budget committees before
final legislative action on the biennial or supplemental operating
budget by the sitting legislature.
(iii) In the case of a bargaining unit of employees of institutions
of higher education in which the exclusive bargaining representative is
certified during or after the conclusion of a legislative session, the
legislature may act upon the compensation and fringe benefit provisions
of the unit's initial collective bargaining agreement if those
provisions are agreed upon and submitted to the office of financial
management and legislative budget committees before final legislative
action on the biennial or supplemental operating budget by the sitting
legislature.
(5) There is hereby created a joint committee on employment
relations, which consists of two members with leadership positions in
the house of representatives, representing each of the two largest
caucuses; the chair and ranking minority member of the house
appropriations committee, or its successor, representing each of the
two largest caucuses; two members with leadership positions in the
senate, representing each of the two largest caucuses; and the chair
and ranking minority member of the senate ways and means committee, or
its successor, representing each of the two largest caucuses. The
governor shall periodically consult with the committee regarding
appropriations necessary to implement the compensation and fringe
benefit provisions in the master collective bargaining agreements, and
upon completion of negotiations, advise the committee on the elements
of the agreements and on any legislation necessary to implement the
agreements.
(6) If, after the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of an
agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue
shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by
proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both
parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a
mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.
(7) After the expiration date of a collective bargaining agreement
negotiated under this chapter, all of the terms and conditions
specified in the collective bargaining agreement remain in effect until
the effective date of a subsequently negotiated agreement, not to
exceed one year from the expiration date stated in the agreement.
Thereafter, the employer may unilaterally implement according to law.
(8) For the ((2011-2013)) 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, a collective
bargaining agreement related to employee health care benefits
negotiated between the employer and coalition pursuant to RCW
41.80.020(3) regarding the dollar amount expended on behalf of each
employee shall be a separate agreement for which the governor may
request funds necessary to implement the agreement. ((If such an
agreement is negotiated and funded by the legislature, this agreement
will supersede any terms and conditions of an expired 2009-2011
biennial master collective bargaining agreement under this chapter
regarding health care benefits.)) The legislature may act upon a
2013-2015 collective bargaining agreement related to employee health
care benefits if an agreement is reached and submitted to the office of
financial management and legislative budget committees before final
legislative action on the biennial or supplemental operating
appropriations act by the sitting legislature.

Sec. 964 RCW 41.80.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 939 and 2011 1st
sp.s. c 43 s 445 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the matters
subject to bargaining include wages, hours, and other terms and
conditions of employment, and the negotiation of any question arising
under a collective bargaining agreement.
(2) The employer is not required to bargain over matters pertaining
to:
(a) Health care benefits or other employee insurance benefits,
except as required in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Any retirement system or retirement benefit; or
(c) Rules of the human resources director, the director of
enterprise services, or the Washington personnel resources board
adopted under RCW 41.06.157.
(3) Matters subject to bargaining include the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits. However,
except as provided otherwise in this subsection for institutions of
higher education, negotiations regarding the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits shall be
conducted between the employer and one coalition of all the exclusive
bargaining representatives subject to this chapter. The exclusive
bargaining representatives for employees that are subject to chapter
47.64 RCW shall bargain the dollar amount expended on behalf of each
employee for health care benefits with the employer as part of the
coalition under this subsection. Any such provision agreed to by the
employer and the coalition shall be included in all master collective
bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties. For institutions of
higher education, promotional preferences and the number of names to be
certified for vacancies shall be bargained under the provisions of RCW
41.80.010(4). For agreements covering the ((2011-2013)) 2013-2015
fiscal biennium, any agreement between the employer and the coalition
regarding the dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee for
health care benefits is a separate agreement and shall not be included
in the master collective bargaining agreements negotiated by the
parties.
(4) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not agree to any proposal that would prevent the implementation of
approved affirmative action plans or that would be inconsistent with
the comparable worth agreement that provided the basis for the salary
changes implemented beginning with the 1983-1985 biennium to achieve
comparable worth.
(5) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not bargain over matters pertaining to management rights established in
RCW 41.80.040.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a conflict
exists between an executive order, administrative rule, or agency
policy relating to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment
and a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter,
the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A provision of a
collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the terms of a
statute is invalid and unenforceable.
(7) This section does not prohibit bargaining that affects
contracts authorized by RCW 41.06.142.

Sec. 965 RCW 43.08.190 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 941 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury to be
known as the "state treasurer's service fund." Such fund shall be used
solely for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the operation
and administration of the state treasurer's office.
Moneys shall be allocated monthly and placed in the state
treasurer's service fund equivalent to a maximum of one percent of the
trust and treasury average daily cash balances from the earnings
generated under the authority of RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.080 other
than earnings generated from investment of balances in funds and
accounts specified in RCW 43.79A.040(4)(c). The allocation shall
precede the distribution of the remaining earnings as prescribed under
RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.092. The state treasurer shall establish a
uniform allocation rate for all funds and accounts; except that the
state treasurer may negotiate a different allocation rate with any
state agency that has independent authority over funds not statutorily
required to be held in the state treasury or in the custody of the
state treasurer. In no event shall the rate be less than the actual
costs incurred by the state treasurer's office. If no rate is
separately negotiated, the default rate for any funds held shall be the
rate set for funds held pursuant to statute.
During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium and the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia, the legislature may transfer from the
state treasurer's service fund to the state general fund such amounts
as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 966 RCW 43.10.150 and 1974 ex.s. c 146 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
A legal services revolving fund is hereby created in the state
treasury for the purpose of a centralized funding, accounting, and
distribution of the actual costs of the legal services provided to
agencies of the state government by the attorney general. During the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the legal
services revolving account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 967 RCW 43.19.791 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 906 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is created a revolving fund to be known as the data
processing revolving fund in the custody of the state treasurer. The
revolving fund shall be used for the acquisition of equipment,
software, supplies, and services and the payment of salaries, wages,
and other costs incidental to the acquisition, development, operation,
and administration of information services, telecommunications,
systems, software, supplies and equipment, including the payment of
principal and interest on bonds issued for capital projects, by the
department, Washington State University's computer services center, the
department of enterprise services' personnel information systems group
and financial systems management group, and other users as determined
by the office of financial management. The revolving fund is subject
to the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW. The chief
information officer or the chief information officer's designee, with
the approval of the technology services board, is authorized to expend
up to one million dollars per fiscal biennium for the technology
services board to conduct independent technical and financial analysis
of proposed information technology projects, and such an expenditure
does not require an appropriation. Disbursements from the revolving
fund for the services component of the department are not subject to
appropriation. Disbursements for the strategic planning and policy
component of the department are subject to appropriation. All
disbursements from the fund are subject to the allotment procedures
provided under chapter 43.88 RCW. The department shall establish and
implement a billing structure to assure all agencies pay an equitable
share of the costs.
During the 2011-2013 and the 2013-2015 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia,
the legislature may transfer from the data processing revolving account
to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance.
As used in this section, the word "supplies" shall not be
interpreted to delegate or abrogate the division of purchasing's
responsibilities and authority to purchase supplies as described in RCW
43.19.190 and 43.19.200.

Sec. 968 RCW 43.24.150 and 2013 c 322 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The business and professions account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from business or professional licenses,
registrations, certifications, renewals, examinations, or civil
penalties assessed and collected by the department from the following
chapters must be deposited into the account:
(a) Chapter 18.11 RCW, auctioneers;
(b) Chapter 18.16 RCW, cosmetologists, barbers, and manicurists;
(c) Chapter 18.145 RCW, court reporters;
(d) Chapter 18.165 RCW, private investigators;
(e) Chapter 18.170 RCW, security guards;
(f) Chapter 18.185 RCW, bail bond agents;
(g) Chapter 18.280 RCW, home inspectors;
(h) Chapter 19.16 RCW, collection agencies;
(i) Chapter 19.31 RCW, employment agencies;
(j) Chapter 19.105 RCW, camping resorts;
(k) Chapter 19.138 RCW, sellers of travel;
(l) Chapter 42.44 RCW, notaries public;
(m) Chapter 64.36 RCW, timeshares;
(n) Chapter 67.08 RCW, boxing, martial arts, and wrestling;
(o) Chapter 18.300 RCW, body art, body piercing, and tattooing;
(p) Chapter 79A.60 RCW, whitewater river outfitters;
(q) Chapter 19.158 RCW, commercial telephone solicitation; and
(r) Chapter 19.290 RCW, scrap metal businesses.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenses incurred in
carrying out these business and professions licensing activities of the
department. Any residue in the account must be accumulated and may not
revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium. During the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the
business and professions account to the state general fund such amounts
as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.
(2) The director must biennially prepare a budget request based on
the anticipated costs of administering the business and professions
licensing activities listed in subsection (1) of this section, which
must include the estimated income from these business and professions
fees.

Sec. 969 RCW 43.71.030 and 2012 c 87 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The exchange may, consistent with the purposes of this chapter:
(a) Sue and be sued in its own name; (b) make and execute agreements,
contracts, and other instruments, with any public or private person or
entity; (c) employ, contract with, or engage personnel; (d) pay
administrative costs; (e) accept grants, donations, loans of funds, and
contributions in money, services, materials or otherwise, from the
United States or any of its agencies, from the state of Washington and
its agencies or from any other source, and use or expend those moneys,
services, materials, or other contributions; (f) aggregate or delegate
the aggregation of funds that comprise the premium for a health plan;
and (g) complete other duties necessary to begin open enrollment in
qualified health plans through the exchange beginning October 1, 2013.
(2) The board shall develop a methodology to ensure the exchange is
self-sustaining after December 31, 2014. The board shall seek input
from health carriers to develop funding mechanisms that fairly and
equitably apportion among carriers the reasonable administrative costs
and expenses incurred to implement the provisions of this chapter. The
board shall submit its recommendations to the legislature by December
1, 2012. If the legislature does not enact legislation during the 2013
regular session to modify or reject the board's recommendations, the
board may proceed with implementation of the recommendations. During
the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, revenues to the exchange from charges to
enrollees and to the state, as appropriated in section 213 of this act,
shall not exceed 3.4 percent of premiums paid.
(3) The board shall establish policies that permit city and county
governments, Indian tribes, tribal organizations, urban Indian
organizations, private foundations, and other entities to pay premiums
on behalf of qualified individuals.
(4) The employees of the exchange may participate in the public
employees' retirement system under chapter 41.40 RCW and the public
employees' benefits board under chapter 41.05 RCW.
(5) Qualified employers may access coverage for their employees
through the exchange for small groups under section 1311 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended. The exchange shall enable any qualified
employer to specify a level of coverage so that any of its employees
may enroll in any qualified health plan offered through the small group
exchange at the specified level of coverage.
(6) The exchange shall report its activities and status to the
governor and the legislature as requested, and no less often than
annually.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 970 Section 969 of this act takes effect July
1, 2013, only if Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1947 (Washington
health benefit exchange) is not enacted by June 30, 2013.

Sec. 971 RCW 43.79.445 and 2005 c 166 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is established an account in the state treasury referred to
as the "death investigations account" which shall exist for the purpose
of receiving, holding, investing, and disbursing funds appropriated or
provided in RCW 70.58.107 and any moneys appropriated or otherwise
provided thereafter.
Moneys in the death investigations account shall be disbursed by
the state treasurer once every year on December 31 and at any other
time determined by the treasurer. The treasurer shall make
disbursements to: The state toxicology laboratory, counties for the
cost of autopsies, the state patrol for providing partial funding for
the state dental identification system, the criminal justice training
commission for training county coroners, medical examiners and their
staff, and the state forensic investigations council. ((Funds from the
death investigations account may be appropriated during the 1997-99
biennium for the purposes of statewide child mortality reviews
administered by the department of health.)) Funds from the death
investigations account may be appropriated during the 2013-2015 fiscal
biennium for the activities of the state crime laboratory within the
Washington state patrol.

Sec. 972 RCW 43.79.480 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 947 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Moneys received by the state of Washington in accordance with
the settlement of the state's legal action against tobacco product
manufacturers, exclusive of costs and attorneys' fees, shall be
deposited in the tobacco settlement account created in this section
except as these moneys are sold or assigned under chapter 43.340 RCW.
(2) The tobacco settlement account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the tobacco settlement account may only be
transferred to the state general fund, and to the tobacco prevention
and control account for purposes set forth in this section. The
legislature shall transfer amounts received as strategic contribution
payments as defined in RCW 43.350.010 to the life sciences discovery
fund created in RCW 43.350.070. During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013
fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer less than the entire
strategic contribution payments, and may transfer amounts attributable
to strategic contribution payments into the basic health plan
stabilization account. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer less than the entire strategic contribution
payments, and may transfer amounts attributable to strategic
contribution payments into the state general fund.
(3) The tobacco prevention and control account is created in the
state treasury. The source of revenue for this account is moneys
transferred to the account from the tobacco settlement account,
investment earnings, donations to the account, and other revenues as
directed by law. Expenditures from the account are subject to
appropriation. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the tobacco prevention and control account to the
state general fund such amounts as represent the excess fund balance of
the account.

Sec. 973 RCW 43.82.010 and 2007 c 506 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services,
on behalf of the agency involved and after consultation with the office
of financial management, shall purchase, lease, lease purchase, rent,
or otherwise acquire all real estate, improved or unimproved, as may be
required by elected state officials, institutions, departments,
commissions, boards, and other state agencies, or federal agencies
where joint state and federal activities are undertaken and may grant
easements and transfer, exchange, sell, lease, or sublease all or part
of any surplus real estate for those state agencies which do not
otherwise have the specific authority to dispose of real estate. This
section does not transfer financial liability for the acquired property
to the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services.
(2) Except for real estate occupied by federal agencies, the
director shall determine the location, size, and design of any real
estate or improvements thereon acquired or held pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section. Facilities acquired or held pursuant to this
chapter, and any improvements thereon, shall conform to standards
adopted by the director and approved by the office of financial
management governing facility efficiency unless a specific exemption
from such standards is provided by the director of ((general
administration)) enterprise services. The director of ((general
administration)) enterprise services shall report to the office of
financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature
annually on any exemptions granted pursuant to this subsection.
(3) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services
may fix the terms and conditions of each lease entered into under this
chapter, except that no lease shall extend greater than twenty years in
duration. The director of ((general administration)) enterprise
services may enter into a long-term lease greater than ten years in
duration upon a determination by the director of the office of
financial management that the long-term lease provides a more favorable
rate than would otherwise be available, it appears to a substantial
certainty that the facility is necessary for use by the state for the
full length of the lease term, and the facility meets the standards
adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The director of
((general administration)) enterprise services may enter into a long-term lease greater than ten years in duration if an analysis shows that
the life-cycle cost of leasing the facility is less than the life-cycle
cost of purchasing or constructing a facility in lieu of leasing the
facility.
(4) Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease for or on
behalf of any state agency may be used or referred to as collateral or
security for the payment of securities offered for sale through a
public offering. Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease
for or on behalf of any state agency may be used or referred to as
collateral or security for the payment of securities offered for sale
through a private placement without the prior written approval of the
state treasurer. However, this limitation shall not prevent a lessor
from assigning or encumbering its interest in a lease as security for
the repayment of a promissory note provided that the transaction would
otherwise be an exempt transaction under RCW 21.20.320. The state
treasurer shall adopt rules that establish the criteria under which any
such approval may be granted. In establishing such criteria the state
treasurer shall give primary consideration to the protection of the
state's credit rating and the integrity of the state's debt management
program. If it appears to the state treasurer that any lease has been
used or referred to in violation of this subsection or rules adopted
under this subsection, then he or she may recommend that the governor
cause such lease to be terminated. The department of ((general
administration)) enterprise services shall promptly notify the state
treasurer whenever it may appear to the department that any lease has
been used or referred to in violation of this subsection or rules
adopted under this subsection.
(5) It is the policy of the state to encourage the colocation and
consolidation of state services into single or adjacent facilities,
whenever appropriate, to improve public service delivery, minimize
duplication of facilities, increase efficiency of operations, and
promote sound growth management planning.
(6) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services
shall provide coordinated long-range planning services to identify and
evaluate opportunities for colocating and consolidating state
facilities. Upon the renewal of any lease, the inception of a new
lease, or the purchase of a facility, the director of ((general
administration)) enterprise services shall determine whether an
opportunity exists for colocating the agency or agencies in a single
facility with other agencies located in the same geographic area. If
a colocation opportunity exists, the director of ((general
administration)) enterprise services shall consult with the affected
state agencies and the office of financial management to evaluate the
impact colocation would have on the cost and delivery of agency
programs, including whether program delivery would be enhanced due to
the centralization of services. The director of ((general
administration)) enterprise services, in consultation with the office
of financial management, shall develop procedures for implementing
colocation and consolidation of state facilities.
(7) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services
is authorized to purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire improved
or unimproved real estate as owner or lessee and to lease or sublet all
or a part of such real estate to state or federal agencies. The
director of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall charge
each using agency its proportionate rental which shall include an
amount sufficient to pay all costs, including, but not limited to,
those for utilities, janitorial and accounting services, and sufficient
to provide for contingencies; which shall not exceed five percent of
the average annual rental, to meet unforeseen expenses incident to
management of the real estate.
(8) If the director of ((general administration)) enterprise
services determines that it is necessary or advisable to undertake any
work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement on any real
estate acquired pursuant to subsection (1) or (7) of this section, the
director shall cause plans and specifications thereof and an estimate
of the cost of such work to be made and filed in his or her office and
the state agency benefiting thereby is hereby authorized to pay for
such work out of any available funds: PROVIDED, That the cost of
executing such work shall not exceed the sum of twenty-five thousand
dollars. Work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement in
excess of twenty-five thousand dollars, other than that done by the
owner of the property if other than the state, shall be performed in
accordance with the public works law of this state.
(9) In order to obtain maximum utilization of space, the director
of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall make space
utilization studies, and shall establish standards for use of space by
state agencies. Such studies shall include the identification of
opportunities for colocation and consolidation of state agency office
and support facilities.
(10) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services
may construct new buildings on, or improve existing facilities, and
furnish and equip, all real estate under his or her management. Prior
to the construction of new buildings or major improvements to existing
facilities or acquisition of facilities using a lease purchase
contract, the director of ((general administration)) enterprise
services shall conduct an evaluation of the facility design and budget
using life-cycle cost analysis, value-engineering, and other techniques
to maximize the long-term effectiveness and efficiency of the facility
or improvement.
(11) All conveyances and contracts to purchase, lease, rent,
transfer, exchange, or sell real estate and to grant and accept
easements shall be approved as to form by the attorney general, signed
by the director of ((general administration)) enterprise services or
the director's designee, and recorded with the county auditor of the
county in which the property is located.
(12) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services
may delegate any or all of the functions specified in this section to
any agency upon such terms and conditions as the director deems
advisable. By January 1st of each year, beginning January 1, 2008, the
department shall submit an annual report to the office of financial
management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on all
delegated leases.
(13) This section does not apply to the acquisition of real estate
by:
(a) The state college and universities for research or experimental
purposes;
(b) The state liquor control board for liquor stores and
warehouses; ((and))
(c) The department of natural resources, the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of transportation, and the state parks and
recreation commission for purposes other than the leasing of offices,
warehouses, and real estate for similar purposes; and
(d) The department of commerce for community college health career
training programs, offices for the department of commerce or other
appropriate state agencies, and other nonprofit community uses,
including community meeting and training facilities, where the real
estate is acquired during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.
(14) Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary,
the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services may
negotiate ground leases for public lands on which property is to be
acquired under a financing contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW under
terms approved by the state finance committee.
(15) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services shall report annually to the office of financial management
and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature on facility
leases executed for all state agencies for the preceding year, lease
terms, and annual lease costs. The report must include leases executed
under RCW 43.82.045 and subsection (12) of this section.

Sec. 974 RCW 43.101.200 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 949 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) All law enforcement personnel, except volunteers, and reserve
officers whether paid or unpaid, initially employed on or after January
1, 1978, shall engage in basic law enforcement training which complies
with standards adopted by the commission pursuant to RCW 43.101.080.
For personnel initially employed before January 1, 1990, such training
shall be successfully completed during the first fifteen months of
employment of such personnel unless otherwise extended or waived by the
commission and shall be requisite to the continuation of such
employment. Personnel initially employed on or after January 1, 1990,
shall commence basic training during the first six months of employment
unless the basic training requirement is otherwise waived or extended
by the commission. Successful completion of basic training is
requisite to the continuation of employment of such personnel initially
employed on or after January 1, 1990.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the commission
shall provide the aforementioned training together with necessary
facilities, supplies, materials, and the board and room of noncommuting
attendees for seven days per week, except during the ((2011-2013))
2013-2015 fiscal biennium when the employing, county, city(([,])), or
state law enforcement agency shall reimburse the commission for twenty-five percent of the cost of training its personnel. Additionally, to
the extent funds are provided for this purpose, the commission shall
reimburse to participating law enforcement agencies with ten or less
full-time commissioned patrol officers the cost of temporary
replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic law enforcement
training: PROVIDED, That such reimbursement shall include only the
actual cost of temporary replacement not to exceed the total amount of
salary and benefits received by the replaced officer during his or her
training period.

Sec. 975 RCW 43.155.050 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 6004 are each
amended to read as follows:
The public works assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may
also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under
federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than
fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the
public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for
preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility
planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent
of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for
emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital
budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning
loans. During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia,
the legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account
to the general fund, the water pollution control revolving account, and
the drinking water assistance account such amounts as reflect the
excess fund balance of the account. During the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for
economic development, innovation, and export grants, including
brownfields; main street improvement grants; and the loan program
consolidation board. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for grants to local
governments for growth management planning and implementation.

Sec. 976 RCW 43.160.080 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6011 are each
amended to read as follows:
There shall be a fund in the state treasury known as the public
facilities construction loan revolving account, which shall consist of
all moneys collected under this chapter and any moneys appropriated to
it by law. Disbursements from the revolving account shall be on
authorization of the board. In order to maintain an effective
expenditure and revenue control, the public facilities construction
loan revolving account shall be subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW. During the 2009-2011 biennium, sums in the public
facilities construction loan revolving account may be used for
community economic revitalization board export assistance grants and
loans in section 1018, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. and for
matching funds for the federal energy regional innovation cluster in
section 1017, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public
facilities construction loan revolving account to the state general
fund such amounts as represent the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 977 RCW 43.333.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
The investing in innovation account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer to receive state and federal funds, grants, private
gifts, or contributions to further the purpose of innovate Washington.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of the
investing in innovation programs established in chapter 70.210 RCW and
any other purpose consistent with this chapter. Only the ((executive))
director of ((innovate Washington)) the department of commerce or the
((executive)) director's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account during the 2013-2015 biennium. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

Sec. 978 RCW 46.66.080 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 958 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The Washington auto theft prevention authority account is
created in the state treasury, subject to appropriation. All revenues
from the traffic infraction surcharge in RCW 46.63.110(7)(b) and all
receipts from gifts, grants, bequests, devises, or other funds from
public and private sources to support the activities of the auto theft
prevention authority must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for activities relating to motor
vehicle theft, including education, prevention, law enforcement,
investigation, prosecution, and confinement. During the ((2009-2011
and)) 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, the legislature may
appropriate moneys from the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account for criminal justice purposes and community building ((and may
transfer funds to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the
excess fund balance of the account)).
(2) The authority shall allocate moneys appropriated from the
account to public agencies for the purpose of establishing,
maintaining, and supporting programs that are designed to prevent motor
vehicle theft, including:
(a) Financial support to prosecution agencies to increase the
effectiveness of motor vehicle theft prosecution;
(b) Financial support to a unit of local government or a team
consisting of units of local governments to increase the effectiveness
of motor vehicle theft enforcement;
(c) Financial support for the procurement of equipment and
technologies for use by law enforcement agencies for the purpose of
enforcing motor vehicle theft laws; and
(d) Financial support for programs that are designed to educate and
assist the public in the prevention of motor vehicle theft.
(3) The costs of administration shall not exceed ten percent of the
moneys in the account in any one year so that the greatest possible
portion of the moneys available to the authority is expended on
combating motor vehicle theft.
(4) Prior to awarding any moneys from the Washington auto theft
prevention authority account for motor vehicle theft enforcement, the
auto theft prevention authority must verify that the financial award
includes sufficient funding to cover proposed activities, which
include, but are not limited to: (a) State, municipal, and county
offender and juvenile confinement costs; (b) administration costs; (c)
law enforcement costs; (d) prosecutor costs; and (e) court costs, with
a priority being given to ensuring that sufficient funding is available
to cover state, municipal, and county offender and juvenile confinement
costs.
(5) Moneys expended from the Washington auto theft prevention
authority account under subsection (2) of this section shall be used to
supplement, not supplant, other moneys that are available for motor
vehicle theft prevention.
(6) Grants provided under subsection (2) of this section constitute
reimbursement for purposes of RCW 43.135.060(1).

Sec. 979 RCW 46.68.340 and 2008 c 282 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ignition interlock device revolving account is created in the
state treasury. All receipts from the fee assessed under RCW
46.20.385(6) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be used only for administering and operating the ignition interlock
device revolving account program and during the 2013-2015 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the ignition
interlock device revolving account for substance abuse programs for
offenders.

Sec. 980 RCW 70.42.090 and 1989 c 386 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a schedule of fees for license
applications, renewals, amendments, and waivers. In fixing said fees,
the department shall set the fees at a sufficient level to defray the
cost of administering the licensure program. All such fees shall be
fixed by rule adopted in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. In determining the
fee schedule, the department shall consider the following: (a)
Complexity of the license required; (b) number and type of tests
performed at the test site; (c) degree of supervision required from the
department staff; (d) whether the license is granted under RCW
70.42.040; and (e) general administrative costs of the test site
licensing program established under this chapter. For each category of
license, fees charged shall be related to program costs.
(2) The medical test site licensure account is created in the state
treasury. The state treasurer shall transfer into the medical test
site licensure account all revenue received from medical test site
license fees. Funds for this account may only be appropriated for the
support of the activities defined under this chapter. For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may be spent for laboratory
services in the department of health.
(3) The department may establish separate fees for repeat
inspections and repeat audits it performs under RCW 70.42.170.

Sec. 981 RCW 70.93.180 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 963 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created an account within the state treasury to
be known as the "waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account". Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account shall be used as follows:
(a) Fifty percent to the department of ecology, for use by the
departments of ecology, natural resources, revenue, transportation, and
corrections, and the parks and recreation commission, for use in litter
collection programs, to be distributed under RCW 70.93.220. The amount
to the department of ecology shall also be used for a central
coordination function for litter control efforts statewide, for the
biennial litter survey under RCW 70.93.200(8), and for statewide public
awareness programs under RCW 70.93.200(7). The amount to the
department shall also be used to defray the costs of administering the
funding, coordination, and oversight of local government programs for
waste reduction, litter control, and recycling, so that local
governments can apply one hundred percent of their funding to achieving
program goals. The amount to the department of revenue shall be used
to enforce compliance with the litter tax imposed in chapter 82.19 RCW;
(b) Twenty percent to the department for local government funding
programs for waste reduction, litter control, and recycling activities
by cities and counties under RCW 70.93.250, to be administered by the
department of ecology; and
(c) Thirty percent to the department of ecology for waste reduction
and recycling efforts.
(2) All taxes imposed in RCW 82.19.010 and fines and bail
forfeitures collected or received pursuant to this chapter shall be
deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account
and used for the programs under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Not less than five percent and no more than ten percent of the
amount appropriated into the waste reduction, recycling, and litter
control account every biennium shall be reserved for capital needs,
including the purchase of vehicles for transporting crews and for
collecting litter and solid waste. Capital funds shall be distributed
among state agencies and local governments according to the same
criteria provided in RCW 70.93.220 for the remainder of the funds, so
that the most effective waste reduction, litter control, and recycling
programs receive the most funding. The intent of this subsection is to
provide funds for the purchase of equipment that will enable the
department to account for the greatest return on investment in terms of
reaching a zero litter goal.
(4) ((During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the account. Additionally, during the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium, subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section is suspended.
(5) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the account. Additionally, during the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section is
suspended.)) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the account. Additionally, during the 2013-2015 fiscal
biennium, subsection (1)(a),(b), and (c) of this section is suspended.

Sec. 982 RCW 70.96A.350 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 910 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The criminal justice treatment account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for: (a)
Substance abuse treatment and treatment support services for offenders
with an addiction or a substance abuse problem that, if not treated,
would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a
prosecuting attorney in Washington state; (b) the provision of drug and
alcohol treatment services and treatment support services for
nonviolent offenders within a drug court program; (c) the
administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a
drug court; and (d) during the 2011-2013 biennium, the legislature may
appropriate up to three million dollars from the account in order to
offset reductions in the state general fund for treatment services
provided by counties. This amount is not subject to the requirements
of subsections (5) through (9) of this section. During the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the criminal justice
treatment account to the state general fund amounts as reflect the
state savings associated with the implementation of the medicaid
expansion of the federal affordable care act. Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Treatment" means services that are critical to a participant's
successful completion of his or her substance abuse treatment program,
but does not include the following services: Housing other than that
provided as part of an inpatient substance abuse treatment program,
vocational training, and mental health counseling; and
(b) "Treatment support" means transportation to or from inpatient
or outpatient treatment services when no viable alternative exists, and
child care services that are necessary to ensure a participant's
ability to attend outpatient treatment sessions.
(3) Revenues to the criminal justice treatment account consist of:
(a) Funds transferred to the account pursuant to this section; and (b)
any other revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.
(4)(a) For the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2003, the state
treasurer shall transfer eight million nine hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the general fund into the criminal justice treatment
account, divided into eight equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2005, and each subsequent fiscal year, the state
treasurer shall transfer eight million two hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the general fund to the criminal justice treatment
account, divided into four equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2006, and each subsequent fiscal year, the
amount transferred shall be increased on an annual basis by the
implicit price deflator as published by the federal bureau of labor
statistics.
(b) In each odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate
the amount transferred to the criminal justice treatment account in (a)
of this subsection to the division of alcohol and substance abuse for
the purposes of subsection (5) of this section.
(5) Moneys appropriated to the division of alcohol and substance
abuse from the criminal justice treatment account shall be distributed
as specified in this subsection. The department shall serve as the
fiscal agent for purposes of distribution. Until July 1, 2004, the
department may not use moneys appropriated from the criminal justice
treatment account for administrative expenses and shall distribute all
amounts appropriated under subsection (4)(b) of this section in
accordance with this subsection. Beginning in July 1, 2004, the
department may retain up to three percent of the amount appropriated
under subsection (4)(b) of this section for its administrative costs.
(a) Seventy percent of amounts appropriated to the division from
the account shall be distributed to counties pursuant to the
distribution formula adopted under this section. The division of
alcohol and substance abuse, in consultation with the department of
corrections, the Washington state association of counties, the
Washington state association of drug court professionals, the superior
court judges' association, the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys, representatives of the criminal defense bar, representatives
of substance abuse treatment providers, and any other person deemed by
the division to be necessary, shall establish a fair and reasonable
methodology for distribution to counties of moneys in the criminal
justice treatment account. County or regional plans submitted for the
expenditure of formula funds must be approved by the panel established
in (b) of this subsection.
(b) Thirty percent of the amounts appropriated to the division from
the account shall be distributed as grants for purposes of treating
offenders against whom charges are filed by a county prosecuting
attorney. The division shall appoint a panel of representatives from
the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges'
association, the Washington state association of counties, the
Washington defender's association or the Washington association of
criminal defense lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington
state association of drug court professionals, substance abuse
treatment providers, and the division. The panel shall review county
or regional plans for funding under (a) of this subsection and grants
approved under this subsection. The panel shall attempt to ensure that
treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.
(6) The county alcohol and drug coordinator, county prosecutor,
county sheriff, county superior court, a substance abuse treatment
provider appointed by the county legislative authority, a member of the
criminal defense bar appointed by the county legislative authority,
and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of the drug court
shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative
authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (5)(b)
of this section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the
criminal justice treatment account within that county. The funds shall
be used solely to provide approved alcohol and substance abuse
treatment pursuant to RCW 70.96A.090, treatment support services, and
for the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation
of a drug court.
(a) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of
counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent on the
administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a
drug court.
(b) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of
counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent for
treatment support services.
(7) Counties are encouraged to consider regional agreements and
submit regional plans for the efficient delivery of treatment under
this section.
(8) Moneys allocated under this section shall be used to
supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds used
for substance abuse treatment.
(9) Counties must meet the criteria established in RCW
2.28.170(3)(b).
(10) The authority under this section to use funds from the
criminal justice treatment account for the administrative and overhead
costs associated with the operation of a drug court expires June 30,
((2013)) 2015.

Sec. 983 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 920 and 2012
2nd sp.s. c 2 s 6005 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship;
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management
priorities of RCW 70.105.150;
(xiii) During the ((2009-2011 and 2011-2013)) 2013-2015 fiscal
biennia, shoreline update technical assistance;
(((xiv) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, multijurisdictional
permitting teams;
(xv) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, actions for reducing
public exposure to toxic air pollution, and actions taken through the
family forest fish passage program to correct barriers to fish passage
on privately owned small forest lands; and
(xvi) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the department of
ecology's water quality, shorelands and environmental assessment,
hazardous waste, waste to resources, nuclear waste, and air quality
programs))
(xiv) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the department of
ecology's water quality, shorelands, environmental assessment,
administration, and air quality programs;
(xv) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, solid and hazardous
waste compliance at the department of corrections;
(xvi) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, activities at the
department of fish and wildlife concerning water quality monitoring,
hatchery water quality regulatory compliance, and technical assistance
to local governments on growth management and shoreline management; and
(xvii) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, forest practices
regulation at the department of natural resources.
(xviii) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, actions at the
University of Washington for reducing ocean acidification.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority:
(i) Remedial actions;
(ii) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(iii) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(iv) Funds for a program to assist in the assessment and cleanup of
sites of methamphetamine production, but not to be used for the initial
containment of such sites, consistent with the responsibilities and
intent of RCW 69.50.511; and
(v) Cleanup and disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or
derelict vessels, defined for the purposes of this section as vessels
that have little or no value and either have no identified owner or
have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean up and
dispose of the vessel, that pose a threat to human health or the
environment.
(b) Funds for plans and programs shall be allocated consistent with
the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters
70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW, except that any applicant that
is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, along with any
project that is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget
Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310, shall, except as conditioned by
RCW 70.105D.120, receive priority for any available funding for any
grant or funding programs or sources that use a competitive bidding
process. ((During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account
may also be used for grants to local governments to retrofit public
sector diesel equipment and for storm water planning and implementation
activities.))
(c) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department shall
partner with local communities and liable parties for cleanups. The
department is authorized to use the following additional strategies in
order to ensure a healthful environment for future generations:
(i) The director may alter grant-matching requirements to create
incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the
following conditions exists:
(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship
imposed by the clean-up liability;
(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development,
public recreational, or habitat restoration opportunities that would
not otherwise occur; or
(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and
redevelopment of vacant, orphaned, or abandoned property under RCW
70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;
(ii) The use of outside contracts to conduct necessary studies;
(iii) The purchase of remedial action cost-cap insurance, when
necessary to expedite multiparty clean-up efforts.
(((d) To facilitate and expedite cleanups using funds from the
local toxics control account, during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium the
director may establish grant-funded accounts to hold and disperse local
toxics control account funds and funds from local governments to be
used for remedial actions.))
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) ((Except during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium,)) One percent of
the moneys deposited into the state and local toxics control accounts
shall be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who
may be adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a
hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest
organizations. The primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate
the participation by persons and organizations in the investigation and
remedying of releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances
and to implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management
priorities. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be
renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from
either account which are not expended at the close of any biennium
shall revert to the state toxics control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation, or, after January 1,
2010, for projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound,
funded in a competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the
action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW
90.71.310.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(8) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the local toxics control account to the state toxics
control account such amounts as reflect excess fund balance in the
account.
(9) ((During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the local toxics
control account may also be used for local government shoreline update
grants and actions for reducing public exposure to toxic air pollution;
funding to local governments for flood levee improvements; and grants
to local governments for brownfield redevelopment.)) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control account may also be used
for local government storm water planning and implementation
activities.
(10) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control
account may also be used for local government shoreline update grants.
(11) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the local toxics control account to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect excess fund balance in the account.

Sec. 984 RCW 74.13.621 and 2009 c 564 s 954 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Within existing resources, the department shall establish an
oversight committee to monitor, guide, and report on kinship care
recommendations and implementation activities. The committee shall:
(a) Draft a kinship care definition that is restricted to persons
related by blood, marriage, or adoption, including marriages that have
been dissolved, or for a minor defined as an "Indian child" under the
federal Indian child welfare act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), the
definition of "extended family member" under the federal Indian child
welfare act, and a set of principles. If the committee concludes that
one or more programs or services would be more efficiently and
effectively delivered under a different definition of kin, it shall
state what definition is needed, and identify the program or service in
the report. It shall also provide evidence of how the program or
service will be more efficiently and effectively delivered under the
different definition. The department shall not adopt rules or policies
changing the definition of kin without authorizing legislation;
(b) Monitor and provide consultation on the implementation of
recommendations contained in the 2002 kinship care report, including
but not limited to the recommendations relating to legal and respite
care services and resources;
(c) Partner with nonprofit organizations and private sector
businesses to guide a public education awareness campaign; and
(d) Assist with developing future recommendations on kinship care
issues.
(2) The department shall consult with the oversight committee on
its efforts to better collaborate and coordinate services to benefit
kinship care families.
(3) The oversight committee must consist of a minimum of thirty
percent kinship caregivers, who shall represent a diversity of kinship
families. Statewide representation with geographic, ethnic, and gender
diversity is required. Other members shall include representatives of
the department, representatives of relevant state agencies,
representatives of the private nonprofit and business sectors, child
advocates, representatives of Washington state Indian tribes as defined
under the federal Indian welfare act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), and
representatives of the legal or judicial field. Birth parents, foster
parents, and others who have an interest in these issues may also be
included.
(4) To the extent funding is available, the department may
reimburse nondepartmental members of the oversight committee for costs
incurred in participating in the meetings of the oversight committee.
(5) The kinship care oversight committee shall update the
legislature and governor annually on committee activities, with the
first update due by January 1, 2006.
(6) This section expires June 30, ((2011)) 2015.

Sec. 985 RCW 74.09.215 and 2012 c 241 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
The medicaid fraud penalty account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from civil penalties collected under RCW
74.09.210, all receipts received under judgments or settlements that
originated under a filing under the federal false claims act, and all
receipts received under judgments or settlements that originated under
the state medicaid fraud false claims act, chapter 74.66 RCW must be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation and must be used only for medicaid services, fraud
detection and prevention activities, recovery of improper payments, and
for other medicaid fraud enforcement activities. For the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may be spent on inpatient and
outpatient rebasing and conversion to the tenth version of the
international classification of diseases.

Sec. 986 RCW 74.09.215 and 2013 c 36 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The medicaid fraud penalty account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from civil penalties collected under RCW
74.09.210, all receipts received under judgments or settlements that
originated under a filing under the federal false claims act, and all
receipts received under judgments or settlements that originated under
the state medicaid fraud false claims act, chapter 74.66 RCW, must be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation and must be used only for medicaid services, fraud
detection and prevention activities, recovery of improper payments, for
other medicaid fraud enforcement activities, and the prescription
monitoring program established in chapter 70.225 RCW. For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may be spent on inpatient
and outpatient rebasing and conversion to the tenth version of the
international classification of diseases.

Sec. 987 RCW 77.12.201 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 923 are each
amended to read as follows:
The legislative authority of a county may elect, by giving written
notice to the director and the treasurer prior to January 1st of any
year, to obtain for the following year an amount in lieu of real
property taxes on game lands as provided in RCW 77.12.203. Upon the
election, the county shall keep a record of all fines, forfeitures,
reimbursements, and costs assessed and collected, in whole or in part,
under this title for violations of law or rules adopted pursuant to
this title, with the exception of the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal
((biennium)) biennia, and shall monthly remit an amount equal to the
amount collected to the state treasurer for deposit in the state
general fund. The election shall continue until the department is
notified differently prior to January 1st of any year.

Sec. 988 RCW 77.12.203 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 924 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section and
notwithstanding RCW 84.36.010 or other statutes to the contrary, the
director shall pay by April 30th of each year on game lands in each
county, if requested by an election under RCW 77.12.201, an amount in
lieu of real property taxes equal to that amount paid on similar
parcels of open space land taxable under chapter 84.34 RCW or the
greater of seventy cents per acre per year or the amount paid in 1984
plus an additional amount for control of noxious weeds equal to that
which would be paid if such lands were privately owned. This amount
shall not be assessed or paid on department buildings, structures,
facilities, game farms, fish hatcheries, tidelands, or public fishing
areas of less than one hundred acres.
(2) "Game lands," as used in this section and RCW 77.12.201, means
those tracts one hundred acres or larger owned in fee by the department
and used for wildlife habitat and public recreational purposes. All
lands purchased for wildlife habitat, public access or recreation
purposes with federal funds in the Snake River drainage basin shall be
considered game lands regardless of acreage.
(3) This section shall not apply to lands transferred after April
23, 1990, to the department from other state agencies.
(4) The county shall distribute the amount received under this
section in lieu of real property taxes to all property taxing districts
except the state in appropriate tax code areas the same way it would
distribute local property taxes from private property. The county
shall distribute the amount received under this section for weed
control to the appropriate weed district.
(5) For the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia,
the director shall pay by April 30th of each year on game lands in each
county, if requested by an election under RCW 77.12.201, an amount in
lieu of real property taxes and shall be distributed as follows:

County

Adams . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,909

Asotin . . . . . . . . . . . . 36,123

Chelan . . . . . . . . . . . . 24,757

Columbia . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,795

Ferry . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,781

Garfield . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,840

Grant . . . . . . . . . . . . 37,443

Kittitas . . . . . . . . . . . . 143,974

Klickitat . . . . . . . . . . . . 21,906

Lincoln . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,535

Okanogan . . . . . . . . . . . . 151,402

Pend Oreille . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,309

Yakima . . . . . . . . . . . . 126,225

These amounts shall not be assessed or paid on department buildings,
structures, facilities, game farms, fish hatcheries, tidelands, or
public fishing areas of less than one hundred acres.

Sec. 989 RCW 79.64.040 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 927 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall determine the amount deemed necessary in order
to achieve the purposes of this chapter and shall provide by rule for
the deduction of this amount from the moneys received from all leases,
sales, contracts, licenses, permits, easements, and rights-of-way
issued by the department and affecting state lands, community forest
trust lands, and aquatic lands, provided that no deduction shall be
made from the proceeds from agricultural college lands.
(2) Moneys received as deposits from successful bidders, advance
payments, and security under RCW 79.15.100, 79.15.080, and 79.11.150
prior to December 1, 1981, which have not been subjected to deduction
under this section are not subject to deduction under this section.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (4) and (6) of this
section, the deductions authorized under this section shall not exceed
twenty-five percent of the moneys received by the department in
connection with any one transaction pertaining to state lands and
aquatic lands other than second-class tide and shore lands and the beds
of navigable waters, and fifty percent of the moneys received by the
department pertaining to second-class tide and shore lands and the beds
of navigable waters.
(4) Deductions authorized under this section for transactions
pertaining to community forest trust lands must be established at a
level sufficient to defray over time the management costs for
activities prescribed in a parcel's management plan adopted pursuant to
RCW 79.155.080, and, if deemed appropriate by the board consistent with
RCW 79.155.090, to reimburse the state and any local entities' eligible
financial contributions for acquisition of the parcel.
(5) In the event that the department sells logs using the contract
harvesting process described in RCW 79.15.500 through 79.15.530, the
moneys received subject to this section are the net proceeds from the
contract harvesting sale.
(6) During the ((2011-2013)) 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the twenty-five percent limitation on deductions set in subsection (3) of this
section may be increased up to thirty percent by the board.

Sec. 990 RCW 79.105.150 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 929 and 2012 2nd
sp.s. c 2 s 6008 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) After deduction for management costs as provided in RCW
79.64.040 and payments to towns under RCW 79.115.150(2), all moneys
received by the state from the sale or lease of state-owned aquatic
lands and from the sale of valuable material from state-owned aquatic
lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement account which
is hereby created in the state treasury. After appropriation, these
funds shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for
the purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public
purposes; for providing and improving access to the lands; and for
volunteer cooperative fish and game projects. ((During the 2011-2013
fiscal biennium, the aquatic lands enhancement account may also be used
for scientific research as part of the adaptive management process and
for developing a planning report for McNeil Island. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the aquatic
lands enhancement account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect excess fund balance of the account.)) During the ((2011-2013))
2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the aquatic lands enhancement account may be
used to support the shellfish program, the ballast water program,
((parks,)) hatcheries, ((and)) the Puget Sound toxic sampling program
at the department of fish and wildlife, the knotweed program at the
department of agriculture, ((and)) the Puget SoundCorps program((.
During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from
the aquatic lands enhancement account to the marine resources
stewardship trust account funds for the purposes of RCW 43.372.070)),
and actions at the University of Washington for reducing ocean
acidification, which may include the creation of a center on ocean
acidification. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the aquatic lands enhancement account to the geoduck
aquaculture research account for research related to shellfish
aquaculture and the marine resources stewardship trust account for the
purposes of chapter 43.372 RCW.
(2) In providing grants for aquatic lands enhancement projects, the
recreation and conservation funding board shall:
(a) Require grant recipients to incorporate the environmental
benefits of the project into their grant applications;
(b) Utilize the statement of environmental benefits, consideration,
except as provided in RCW 79.105.610, of whether the applicant is a
Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, whether a project is
referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound
partnership under RCW 90.71.310, and except as otherwise provided in
RCW 79.105.630, and effective one calendar year following the
development and statewide availability of model evergreen community
management plans and ordinances under RCW 35.105.050, whether the
applicant is an entity that has been recognized, and what gradation of
recognition was received, in the evergreen community recognition
program created in RCW 35.105.030 in its prioritization and selection
process; and
(c) Develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to be
used both for management and performance assessment of the grants.
(3) To the extent possible, the department should coordinate its
performance measure system with other natural resource-related agencies
as defined in RCW 43.41.270.
(4) The department shall consult with affected interest groups in
implementing this section.
(5) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
restoration of Puget Sound may be funded under this chapter only if the
project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the
Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 991 RCW 79A.80.020 and 2012 c 261 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in ((RCW 79A.80.050, 79A.80.060,
and 79A.80.070)) this chapter, a discover pass or day-use permit is
required for any motor vehicle to park or operate on any recreation
site or lands, except for short-term parking as may be authorized under
RCW 79A.80.070.
(2) The cost of a discover pass is thirty dollars. Every four
years the office of financial management must review the cost of the
discover pass and, if necessary, recommend to the legislature an
adjustment to the cost of the discover pass to account for inflation.
(3) A discover pass is valid for one year beginning from the date
that the discover pass is marked for activation. The activation date
may differ from the purchase date pursuant to any policies developed by
the agencies.
(4) Sales of discover passes must be consistent with RCW
79A.80.100.
(5) The discover pass must contain space for two motor vehicle
license plate numbers. A discover pass is valid only for those vehicle
license plate numbers written on the pass. However, the agencies may
offer for sale a family discover pass that is fully transferable among
vehicles and does not require the placement of a license plate number
on the pass to be valid. The agencies must collectively set a price
for the sale of a family discover pass that is no more than fifty
dollars. A discover pass is valid only for use with one motor vehicle
at any one time.
(6) One complimentary discover pass must be provided to a volunteer
who performed twenty-four hours of service on agency-sanctioned
volunteer projects in a year. The agency must provide vouchers to
volunteers identifying the number of volunteer hours they have provided
for each project. The vouchers may be brought to an agency to be
redeemed for a discover pass.

Sec. 992 RCW 79A.80.080 and 2012 c 261 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A discover pass, vehicle access pass, or day-use permit must be
visibly displayed in the front windshield of any motor vehicle or
otherwise in a prominent location for vehicles without a windshield:
(a) Operating on a recreation site or lands; or
(b) Parking at a recreation site or lands.
(2) The discover pass, the vehicle access pass, or the day-use
permit is not required:
(a) On private lands, state-owned aquatic lands other than water
access areas, or at agency offices, hatcheries, or other facilities
where public business is conducted((.
(3) The discover pass, the vehicle access pass, or the day-use
permit is not required for:
(a)));
(b) For persons who use, possess, or enter lands owned or managed
by the agencies for nonrecreational purposes consistent with a written
authorization from the agency, including but not limited to leases,
contracts, and easements; ((or
(b))) (c) On department of fish and wildlife lands only, for
persons possessing a current vehicle access pass pursuant to RCW
79A.80.040; or
(d) During the 2013-2015 biennium, when operating on a road managed
by the department of natural resources or the department of fish and
wildlife, including a forest or land management road, that is not
blocked by a gate.
(((4))) (3)(a) An agency may waive the requirements of this section
for any person who has secured the ability to access specific
recreational land through the provision of monetary consideration to
the agency or for any person attending an event or function that
required the provision of monetary compensation to the agency.
(b) Special events and group activities are core recreational
activities and major public service opportunities within state parks.
When waiving the requirements of this section for special events, the
state parks and recreation commission must consider the direct and
indirect costs and benefits to the state, local market rental rates,
the public service functions of the event sponsor, and other public
interest factors when setting appropriate fees for each event or
activity.
(((5))) (4) Failure to comply with subsection (1) of this section
is a natural resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW. An agency is
authorized to issue a notice of infraction to any person who fails to
comply with subsection (1)(a) of this section or to any motor vehicle
that fails to comply with subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(((6))) (5) The penalty for failure to comply with the requirements
of this section is ninety-nine dollars. This penalty must be reduced
to fifty-nine dollars if an individual provides proof of purchase of a
discover pass to the court within fifteen days after the issuance of
the notice of violation.

Sec. 993 RCW 82.14.310 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 970 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The county criminal justice assistance account is created in
the state treasury. Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer
must transfer into the county criminal justice assistance account from
the general fund the sum of twenty-three million two hundred thousand
dollars divided into four equal deposits occurring on July 1, October
1, January 1, and April 1. For each fiscal year thereafter, the state
treasurer must increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth factor,
as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the
office of financial management in November of the preceding year.
(2) The moneys deposited in the county criminal justice assistance
account for distribution under this section, less any moneys
appropriated for purposes under subsection (4) of this section, must be
distributed at such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150
and on the relative basis of each county's funding factor as determined
under this subsection.
(a) A county's funding factor is the sum of:
(i) The population of the county, divided by one thousand, and
multiplied by two-tenths;
(ii) The crime rate of the county, multiplied by three-tenths; and
(iii) The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county
superior court, for each one thousand in population, multiplied by
five-tenths.
(b) Under this section and RCW 82.14.320 and 82.14.330:
(i) The population of the county or city is as last determined by
the office of financial management;
(ii) The crime rate of the county or city is the annual occurrence
of specified criminal offenses, as calculated in the most recent annual
report on crime in Washington state as published by the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, for each one thousand in
population;
(iii) The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county
superior court must be determined by the most recent annual report of
the courts of Washington, as published by the administrative office of
the courts;
(iv) Distributions and eligibility for distributions in the 1989-1991 biennium must be based on 1988 figures for both the crime rate as
described under (ii) of this subsection and the annual number of
criminal cases that are filed as described under (iii) of this
subsection. Future distributions must be based on the most recent
figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii) of this
subsection and the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as
described under (iii) of this subsection.
(3) Moneys distributed under this section must be expended
exclusively for criminal justice purposes and may not be used to
replace or supplant existing funding. Criminal justice purposes are
defined as activities that substantially assist the criminal justice
system, which may include circumstances where ancillary benefit to the
civil or juvenile justice system occurs, and which includes (a)
domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic violence
programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW
70.123.020, and (b) during the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, juvenile
dispositional hearings relating to petitions for at-risk youth,
truancy, and children in need of services. Existing funding for
purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar year 1989 actual
operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes. Calendar year
1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes
exclude the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events not
likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions for criminal justice
services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction receiving the
services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.
(4) Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the county
criminal justice assistance account may be available for appropriations
for enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory system and the
continuing costs related to these enhancements. Funds appropriated
from this account for such enhancements may not supplant existing funds
from the state general fund.
(5) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the amount that would
otherwise be transferred into the county criminal justice assistance
account from the general fund under subsection (1) of this section must
be reduced by 3.4 percent.
(6) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, for the purposes of
substance abuse and other programs for offenders, the legislature may
appropriate from the county criminal justice assistance account such
amounts as are in excess of the amounts necessary to fully meet the
state's obligations to the counties and to the Washington state patrol.
Excess amounts in this account are not the result of subsection (5) of
this section.

Sec. 994 RCW 86.26.007 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 932 are each
amended to read as follows:
The flood control assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. At the beginning of the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the
state treasurer shall transfer three million dollars from the general
fund to the flood control assistance account. Each biennium thereafter
the state treasurer shall transfer four million dollars from the
general fund to the flood control assistance account((, except that
during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the state treasurer shall
transfer one million dollars from the general fund to the flood control
assistance account)). Moneys in the flood control assistance account
may be spent only after appropriation for purposes specified under this
chapter. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the flood control assistance account to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

(End of part)

SUPPLEMENTAL
PART XI
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 1101 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 111 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,757,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,561,000))
$6,603,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,318,000))
$13,360,000

Sec. 1102 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,504,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
Judicial Information System Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,004,000))
$3,028,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $50,000 of the judicial information system
account--state appropriation is provided solely to evaluate the state
law library and assess its operational structure to determine the most
effective delivery model for providing library services.

Sec. 1103 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,275,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,168,000))
$15,253,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,443,000))
$30,528,000

Sec. 1104 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,725,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,429,000))
$49,123,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,532,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,362,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,954,000))
$5,425,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($150,392,000))
$150,557,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,399,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for school districts for petitions
to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030
and 28A.225.035. The office of the administrator for the courts shall
develop an interagency agreement with the superintendent of public
instruction to allocate the funding provided in this subsection.
Allocation of this money to school districts shall be based on the
number of petitions filed. This funding includes amounts school
districts may expend on the cost of serving petitions filed under RCW
28A.225.030 by certified mail or by personal service or for the
performance of service of process for any hearing associated with RCW
28A.225.030.
(2)(a) $8,252,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $7,313,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for distribution
to county juvenile court administrators to fund the costs of processing
truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions.
The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile
court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution
formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher than
average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties
with lower than average per-petition processing costs.
(b) Each fiscal year during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives and senate ways and means committees no
later than 60 days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are deemed
informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing
funds.
(3) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions
from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to
section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs
for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW
43.135.060.
(4) $265,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for the office of public guardianship to
provide guardianship services for low-income incapacitated persons.
(5) $1,178,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for replacing computer equipment at
state courts and state judicial agencies.
(6) No later than September 30, 2011, the judicial information
systems committee shall provide a report to the legislature on the
recommendations of the case management feasibility study, including
plans for a replacement of the superior court management information
system (SCOMIS) and plans for completing the data exchange core system
component consistent with a complete data exchange standard. No later
than December 31, 2011, the judicial information systems committee
shall provide a report to the legislature on the status of the data
exchange, the procurement process for a SCOMIS replacement, and a case
management system that is designed to meet the requirements approved by
the superior courts and county clerks of all thirty-nine counties. The
legislature shall solicit input on both reports from judicial,
legislative, and executive stakeholders.
(7) In order to gather better data on juveniles in the criminal
justice system, the administrative office of the courts shall modify
the judgment and sentence form for juvenile and adult sentences to
include one or more check boxes indicating whether (a) the adult
superior court had original jurisdiction for a defendant who was
younger than eighteen years of age at the time the case was filed; (b)
the case was originally filed in juvenile court but transferred to
adult superior court jurisdiction; or (c) the case was originally filed
in adult superior court or transferred to adult superior court but then
returned to the juvenile court.
(8) $540,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the office of public guardianship
to continue guardianship services for those low-income incapacitated
persons who were receiving services on June 30, 2012.
(9) The Washington association of juvenile court administrators and
the juvenile rehabilitation administration, in consultation with the
community juvenile accountability act advisory committee and the
Washington state institute for public policy, shall analyze and review
data elements available from the administrative office of the courts
for possible integration into the evidence-based program quality
assurance plans and processes. The administrative office of the
courts, the Washington association of juvenile court administrators,
and the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall provide
information necessary to complete the review and analysis. The
Washington association of juvenile court administrators and the
juvenile rehabilitation administration shall report the findings of
their review and analysis, as well as any recommendations, to the
legislature by December 1, 2012.

Sec. 1105 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,102,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,247,000))
$5,286,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,849,000))
$11,888,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,500,000 of the economic development strategic reserve
account appropriation is provided solely for efforts to assist with
currently active industrial recruitment efforts that will bring new
jobs to the state or will retain headquarter locations of major
companies currently housed in the state.
(2) $540,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $526,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the office of the education
ombudsman.
(3) $39,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5802 (greenhouse gas emissions). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1106 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,047,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,612,000))
$9,972,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,326,000
Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and Access
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,074,000))
$7,185,000
Charitable Organization Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $362,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,516,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,284,000
Washington State Heritage Center Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,028,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,249,000))
$71,720,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,898,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2)(a) $1,847,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $1,926,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2011-2013 biennium. The funding
level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount
provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be
required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions,
in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state
contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or
partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been
satisfactorily documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(3) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and
Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to
the funding for the library as a whole.

Sec. 1107 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,758,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,690,000))
$7,890,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,015,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $968,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($197,375,000))
$197,412,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,129,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($222,205,000))
$222,442,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the
legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management,
the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing
the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown
by division of division administration expenses.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on ways and means.
(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements
and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the
nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for
the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed
electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The
report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.
(4) The attorney general shall enter into an interagency agreement
with the department of social and health services for expenditure of
the state's proceeds from the cy pres settlement in State of Washington
v. AstraZeneca (Seroquel) for the purposes set forth in sections 204
and 213 of this act.
(5) $62,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1770
(state purchasing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $5,924,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2123
(workers' compensation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) The office of the attorney general is authorized to expend
$2,100,000 from the Zyprexa and other cy pres awards towards consumer
protection costs in accordance with uses authorized in the court
orders.
(8) $96,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5076
(financial institutions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $99,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5769 (coal-fired generation). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(10) $416,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5801 (industrial insurance system). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $31,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5021 (election campaign disclosure). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(12) The executive ethics board shall: (a) Develop a statewide
plan, with performance measures, to provide overall direction and
accountability in all executive branch agencies and statewide elected
offices; (b) coordinate and work with the commission on judicial
conduct and the legislative ethics board; (c) assess and evaluate each
agency's ethical culture through employee and stakeholder surveys,
review Washington state quality award feedback reports, and publish an
annual report on the results to the public; and (d) solicit outside
evaluations, studies, and recommendations for improvements from
academics, nonprofit organizations, the public disclosure commission,
or other entities with expertise in ethics, integrity, and the public
sector.
(13) $11,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2301
(boxing, martial arts, wrestling). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $56,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2319
(affordable care act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $5,743,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the legal costs associated with the
evaluation, filing, prosecution, response to petitions for release, and
appeal of sexually violent predator civil commitment cases, as provided
in chapter 71.09 RCW. Within the amount provided in this subsection,
the attorney general may enter into an interagency agreement with a
county prosecutor to perform prosecution services pursuant to chapter
71.09 RCW.
(16) $94,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6103
(reflexology and massage therapy). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $57,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6237 (medical assistants). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(18) If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5978 (medicaid fraud)
is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amounts appropriated in this
section from the medicaid fraud penalty account--state appropriation
shall lapse and an additional $730,000 shall be appropriated from the
general fund--state for fiscal year 2013 for fraud detection and
prevention activities, recovery of improper payments, and for other
medicaid fraud enforcement activities.
(19) $56,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2592
(extended foster care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(20) $65,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6406 (state natural resources). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(21) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for settlement payment of the Backpage.com
litigation.

Sec. 1108 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,799,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($72,839,000))
$60,889,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $340,184,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,036,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,733,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $437,000
Lead Paint Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($65,000))
$100,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Home Security Fund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,007,000
Affordable Housing for All Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,899,000
County Research Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $540,000
Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes Investigation
and Prosecution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,166,000))
$969,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,427,000))
$1,186,000
City and Town Research Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,577,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,781,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,444,000
Prostitution Prevention and Intervention Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $748,000
Washington Community Technology Opportunity Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $713,000
Liquor Revolving Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,802,000))
$3,032,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($541,296,000))
$528,173,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance
program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall
be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account
balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans,
and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed
under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the
terms included in the original loan agreements.
(2) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a grant to resolution
Washington to building statewide capacity for alternative dispute
resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that
citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to
litigation.
(3) $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior
volunteer program.
(4) The department shall administer its growth management act
technical assistance so that smaller cities receive proportionately
more assistance than larger cities or counties.
(5) $1,800,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided for transitional housing assistance or partial payments for
rental assistance under the independent youth housing program.
(6) $5,000,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
for the operation, repair, and staffing of shelters in the homeless
family shelter program.
(7) $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington new Americans
program.
(8) $2,949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for associate development
organizations.
(9) $127,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided
solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1886
(Ruckelshaus center process). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) Up to $200,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation is for a grant to the Washington tourism alliance for the
maintenance of the Washington state tourism web site
www.experiencewa.com and its related sub-sites. The department may
transfer ownership of the web site and other tourism promotion assets
and assign obligations to the Washington tourism alliance for purposes
of tourism promotion throughout the state. The alliance may use the
assets only in a manner consistent with the purposes for which they
were created. Any revenue generated from these assets must be used by
the alliance for the sole purposes of statewide Washington tourism
promotion. The legislature finds that the Washington tourism alliance,
a not-for-profit, 501.c.6 organization established, funded, and
governed by Washington tourism industry stakeholders to sustain
destination tourism marketing across Washington, is an appropriate body
to receive funding and assets from and assume obligations of the
department for the purposes described in this section.
(11) Within the appropriations in this section, specific funding is
provided to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5741 (economic
development commission).
(12) $2,000,000 of the community and economic development fee
account appropriation is provided solely for the department of commerce
for services to homeless families through the Washington families fund.
(13) $234,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $233,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington asset building
coalitions.
(14) $1,859,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,859,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for innovative research teams,
also known as entrepreneurial STARS, at higher education research
institutions, and for entrepreneurs-in-residence programs at higher
education research institutions and entrepreneurial assistance
organizations. Of these amounts no more than $50,000 in fiscal year
2012 and no more than $50,000 in fiscal year 2013 may be provided for
the operation of entrepreneurs-in-residence programs at entrepreneurial
assistance organizations external to higher education research
institutions.
(15) Up to $700,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation is for pass-through grants to cities in central Puget
Sound to plan for transfer of development rights receiving areas under
the central Puget Sound regional transfer of development rights
program.
(16) $16,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely to implement section 503 of Substitute
House Bill No. 1277 (licensed settings for vulnerable adults). The
long-term care ombudsman shall convene an adult family home quality
assurance panel to review problems concerning the quality of care for
residents in adult family homes. If Substitute House Bill No. 1277
(licensed settings for vulnerable adults) is not enacted by June 30,
2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $19,605,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and (($39,527,000)) $27,527,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for
establishment of the essential needs and housing support program
created in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2082 (essential needs
and assistance program). The department of commerce shall contract for
these services with counties or community-based organizations involved
in providing essential needs and housing supports to low-income persons
who meet eligibility pursuant to Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2082. The department shall limit the funding used for administration
of the program to no more than five percent. Counties and community
providers shall limit the funding used for administration of the
program to no more than seven percent.
(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $4,000,000 is
provided solely for essential needs to clients who meet the eligibility
established in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2082. Counties and
community-based organizations shall distribute basic essential products
in a manner that prevents abuse. To the greatest extent possible, the
counties or community-based organizations shall leverage local or
private funds, and volunteer support to acquire and distribute the
basic essential products.
(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, (($55,000,000))
$43,000,000 is provided solely for housing support services to
individuals who are homeless or who may become homeless, and are
eligible for services under this program pursuant to Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2082.
(18) $4,380,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to provide homeless housing services
in accordance with Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2048 (housing
assistance surcharges). If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2048
(housing assistance surcharges) is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the developmental disabilities council
to contract for a family-to-family mentor program to provide
information and support to families and guardians of persons who are
transitioning out of residential habilitation centers. To the maximum
extent allowable under federal law, these funds shall be matched under
medicaid through the department of social and health services and
federal funds shall be transferred to the department for the purposes
stated in this subsection.
(20) (($2,802,000)) $3,032,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract
with the municipal research and services center of Washington.
(21) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for deposit in the shelter to housing
project account, hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer
as a nonappropriated account. The department may expend funds from the
account solely for a two-year pilot project to enable young adults to
move from temporary emergency shelter housing to transitional and
permanent housing throughout King county. The pilot project will be
administered under contract with the YMCA of greater Seattle in
collaboration with the rising out of the shadows young adult shelter.
Funding may be used for case management, housing subsidy,
transportation, shelter services, training and evaluation. The pilot
project and the shelter to housing project account expire December 31,
2014.
(22) $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5292 (irrigation and port districts). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(23) $100,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the department to provide analysis and an advisory
opinion on whether a proposed electric generation project or
conservation resource qualifies to meet mandatory conservation targets
in accordance with Substitute Senate Bill No. 6414 (review
process/utilities). The department is authorized to require an
applicant to pay an application fee to cover the cost of reviewing the
project and preparing an advisory opinion. If Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6414 (review process/utilities) is not enacted by June 30, 2012,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1109 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 131 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,369,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,584,000))
$18,728,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,530,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,370,000
Performance Audits of Government Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $198,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000
Department of Personnel Services--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,551,000
Data Processing Revolving Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,910,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,537,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($86,429,000))
$86,573,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill
No. 1178 (regulatory assistance office). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for the office of financial management to
contract with an independent consultant to evaluate and recommend the
most cost-effective provision of services required to support the
department of social and health services special commitment center on
McNeil Island. The evaluation shall include island operation services
that include, but are not limited to: (a) Marine transport of
passengers and goods; (b) wastewater treatment; (c) fire protection and
suppression; (d) electrical supply; (e) water supply; and (f) road
maintenance.
The office of financial management shall solicit the input of
Pierce county, the department of corrections, and the department of
social and health services in developing the request for proposal,
evaluating applications, and directing the evaluation. The consultant
shall report to the governor and legislature by November 15, 2011.
(3) $100,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the office of financial management
to prepare a report to be used to initiate a comprehensive, long-range
planning process for the future of McNeil Island during the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium.
(a) The report on the initiation of the process must document:
(i) Ownership issues, including consultation with the federal
government about its current legal requirements associated with the
island;
(ii) Federal and state decision-making processes to change use or
ownership;
(iii) Tribal treaty interests;
(iv) Fish and wildlife species and their habitats;
(v) Land use and public safety needs;
(vi) Recreational opportunities for the general public;
(vii) Historic and archaeological resources; and
(viii) Revenue from and necessary to support potential future uses
of the island.
(b) The report shall develop and recommend a comprehensive, long-range planning process for the future of the island and associated
aquatic resources, addressing the items in (a) of this subsection.
(c) The office of financial management may use its own staff and
other public agency and tribal staff or contract for services, and may
create a work group of knowledgeable agencies, organizations, and
individuals to assist in preparing the report.
(d) The office of financial management shall engage in broad
consultation with interested parties, including, but not limited to:
(i) Federal agencies with relevant responsibilities;
(ii) Tribal governments;
(iii) State agencies;
(iv) Local governments and communities in the area, including the
Anderson Island community, Steilacoom, and Pierce county; and
(v) Interested private organizations and individuals.
(e) The report must be submitted to the governor and appropriate
committees of the legislature by October 1, 2012.
(4) The appropriations in this section include funding for
activities transferred from the sentencing guidelines commission to the
office of financial management pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5891 (criminal justice cost savings). Prior to the effective
date of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5891, the appropriations
in this section may be expended for the continued operations and
expenses of the sentencing guidelines commission pursuant to the
expenditure authority schedule produced by the office of financial
management in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.
(((6))) (5) $115,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2483 (higher education coordination). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((7))) (6)(a) The office of financial management shall determine
if cost savings can be achieved by the state through contracting for
interpreter services more effectively. The office of financial
management must work with all state agencies that use interpreter
services to determine:
(i) How agencies currently procure interpreter services;
(ii) To what degree brokers or foreign language agencies are used
in the acquisition of interpreter services; and
(iii) The cost of interpreter services as currently provided.
(b) The office of financial management, in consultation with the
department of enterprise services, must also examine approaches to
procuring interpreter services, including using the department of
enterprise services' master contract, limiting overhead costs
associated with interpreter contracts, and direct scheduling of
interpreters. The report must include recommendations for the state to
procure services in a more consistent and cost-effective manner.
(c) The office of financial management, in consultation with the
department of labor and industries, must determine the impact that any
alternative approach to procuring interpreter services will have on
medical providers.
(d) The report must include:
(i) Analysis of the current process for procuring interpreter
services;
(ii) Recommendations regarding options to make obtaining
interpreter services more consistent and cost-effective; and
(iii) Estimates for potential cost savings.
(e) The office of financial management must report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2012.
(((8))) (7) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for implementation of House
Bill No. 2824 (education funding). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5802 (greenhouse gas emissions). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1110 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 132 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,713,000))
$36,413,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (($769,000)) $700,000 of the
administrative hearings revolving account--state appropriation is
provided solely to ((implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
5921 (social services programs). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse))
accommodate the number of fair hearings associated with medical
assistance programs on behalf of the health care authority.

Sec. 1111 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 136 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,511,000))
$46,591,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $146,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with implementation of House Bill No. 2070 (state and local
government employees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $65,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with implementation of House Bill No. 1625 (plan 3 default
investment option). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $133,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1981 as
amended (post-retirement employment). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $15,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the administrative
costs associated with implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2021
(plan 1 annual increase amounts). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2011, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(5) $32,000 of the department of retirement systems -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5159 (state
patrol retirement system service credit). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1112 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 139 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
OMWBE Enterprises Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,654,000))
$3,754,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $100,000 of the minority and women's
business enterprises account--state appropriation is provided for
implementation of a certification program for small business
enterprises. The agency will collaborate with the department of
transportation to certify small businesses as small business
enterprises.

Sec. 1113 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 142 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,063,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,838,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $945,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,871,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The legislature intends to facilitate the orderly transition of
liquor services as required by Initiative Measure No. 1183. For liquor
control board employees that remain through June 15, 2012, a temporary
opportunity to cash out sick leave is provided to assist the unique
challenges to the liquor control board and its employees posed by this
transition.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section from the liquor
revolving account--state appropriation, liquor control board employees
who: (a) Occupy positions in the job classifications provided in
subsection (3)(c) of this section that will be eliminated after the
liquor control board ceases to distribute liquor; and (b) remain as
liquor control board employees through June 15, 2012, and who separate
from service due to lay off by October 1, 2012, may elect to receive
remuneration for their entire sick leave balance at a rate equal to one
day's current monetary compensation of the employee for each four full
days of accrued sick leave.
(3) The following conditions apply to sick leave cash out under
this subsection:
(a) The rate of monetary compensation for the purposes of this
subsection shall not be reduced by any temporary salary reduction;
(b) Remuneration or benefits received under this subsection shall
not be included for the purpose of computing a retirement allowance
under any public retirement system in this state;
(c) The following job classifications are eligible:
(i) Liquor store clerk;
(ii) Retail assistant store manager 1;
(iii) Retail assistant store manager 2;
(iv) Retail store manager 3;
(v) Retail store manager 4;
(vi) Retail district manager;
(vii) Retail operations manager;
(viii) Director of retail services;
(ix) Director of distribution center;
(x) Director of purchasing;
(xi) Director of business enterprise;
(xii) Warehouse operator 1;
(xiii) Warehouse operator 2;
(xiv) Warehouse operator 3; and
(xv) Warehouse operator 4; and
(d) Should the legislature revoke any remuneration or benefits
granted under this section, an affected employee shall not be entitled
thereafter to receive such benefits as a matter of contractual right.
(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section from the liquor
revolving account--state appropriation, up to $946,000 may be used by
the liquor control board to implement Initiative Measure No. 502.

Sec. 1114 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 144 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,116,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,872,000))
$6,938,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($159,075,000))
$159,114,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,620,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,119,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,368,000
Military Department Rent and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $615,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,163,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($338,948,000))
$339,053,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $18,018,000 of the disaster response account -- state
appropriation and $66,266,000 of the disaster response account--federal
appropriation may be spent only on disasters declared by the governor
and with the approval of the office of financial management. The
military department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees on October 1st and
February 1st of each year detailing information on the disaster
response account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into
the account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting
date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2011-2013
biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.
(2) $75,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee; and
(b) The department shall submit an annual report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; and incremental changes from the
previous estimate.
(3) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in fiscal year
2013 is provided solely to maintain the three generator systems that
allow the emergency operations center and emergency management division
to operate during unexpected power outages.

Sec. 1115 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 149 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,401,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,309,000
((General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $177,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $368,000))
Building Code Council Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,186,000
Department of Personnel Service Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,117,000
Enterprise Services Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,336,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,894,000))
$45,349,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are for the operations and
expenses of the department of enterprise services as established by
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5931 (central service functions of
state government), effective October 1, 2011. Prior to October 1,
2011, the appropriations in this section may be expended for the
continued operations and expenses of the office of financial
management, the department of general administration, the department of
information services, and the department of personnel, pursuant to the
expenditure authority schedules produced by the office of financial
management, in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) $3,028,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,967,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the payment of facilities and
services charges, utilities and contracts charges, public and historic
facilities charges, and capital projects surcharges allocable to the
senate, house of representatives, statute law committee, and joint
legislative systems committee. The department shall allocate charges
attributable to these agencies among the affected revolving funds. The
department shall maintain an interagency agreement with these agencies
to establish performance standards, prioritization of preservation and
capital improvement projects, and quality assurance provisions for the
delivery of services under this subsection. The legislative agencies
named in this subsection shall continue to enjoy all of the same rights
of occupancy and space use on the capitol campus as historically
established.
(3) In accordance with RCW 46.08.172 and 43.135.055, the department
is authorized to increase parking fees in fiscal years 2012 and 2013 as
necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business.
(4) The building code council account appropriation is provided
solely for the operation of the state building code council as required
by statute and modified by the standards established by executive order
10-06. The council shall not consider any proposed code amendment or
take any other action not authorized by statute or in compliance with
the standards established in executive order 10-06. No member of the
council may receive compensation, per diem, or reimbursement for
activities other than physical attendance at those meetings of the
state building code council or the council's designated committees, at
which the opportunity for public comment is provided generally and on
all agenda items upon which the council proposes to take action.
(5) Specific funding is provided for the purposes of section 3 of
House Bill No. 1770 (state purchasing).
(6) The amounts appropriated in this section are for implementation
of Senate Bill No. 5931 (streamlining central service functions).
(7) The department of enterprise services shall purchase flags
needed for ceremonial occasions on the capitol campus in order to fully
represent the countries that have an international consulate in
Washington state.
(8) Before any agency may purchase a passenger motor vehicle as
defined in RCW 43.19.560, the agency must have written approval from
the director of the department of enterprise services.
(9) The department shall adjust billings for self-insurance
premiums to transportation agencies to reflect rate reductions assumed
in this act.

(End of part)

PART XII
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 1201 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the
department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as
expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications
permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be
used for other than that purpose.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3)(a) The health care authority and the department are authorized
to develop an integrated health care program designed to slow the
progression of illness and disability and better manage medicaid
expenditures for the aged and disabled population. Under the
Washington medicaid integration partnership (WMIP) and the medicare
integrated care project (MICP), the health care authority and the
department may combine and transfer such medicaid funds appropriated
under sections 204, 206, 208, and 213 of this act as may be necessary
to finance a unified health care plan for the WMIP and the MICP program
enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not exceed a daily
enrollment of 6,000 persons, nor expand beyond one county during the
2011-2013 fiscal biennium. The amount of funding assigned from each
program may not exceed the average per capita cost assumed in this act
for individuals covered by that program, actuarially adjusted for the
health condition of persons enrolled, times the number of clients
enrolled. In implementing the WMIP and the MICP, the health care
authority and the department may: (i) Withhold from calculations of
"available resources" as set forth in RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the
capitated rate for enrolled individuals; and (ii) employ capitation
financing and risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration with health
care service contractors licensed by the office of the insurance
commissioner and qualified to participate in both the medicaid and
medicare programs. The health care authority and the department shall
conduct an evaluation of the WMIP by October 15, 2012, and of the MICP
measuring changes in participant health outcomes, changes in patterns
of service utilization, participant satisfaction, participant access to
services, and the state fiscal impact.
(b) Effective January 1, 2013, if Washington has been selected to
participate in phase two of the federal demonstration project for
persons dually-eligible for both medicare and medicaid, the department
and the authority may initiate the MICP. Participation in the project
shall be limited to persons who are eligible for both medicare and
medicaid and to counties in which the county legislative authority has
agreed to the terms and conditions under which it will operate. The
purpose of the project shall be to demonstrate and evaluate ways to
improve care while reducing state expenditures for persons enrolled
both in medicare and medicaid. To that end, prior to initiating the
project, the department and the authority shall assure that state
expenditures shall be no greater on either a per person or total basis
than the state would otherwise incur. Individuals who are solely
eligible for medicaid may also participate if their participation is
agreed to by the health care authority, the department, and the county
legislative authority.
(4) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as
calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this
act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by
efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality
services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care
and services are available to the extent that such care and services
are available to the general population in the geographic area. The
legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal
government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input
constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.
(5) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the
same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for
social services appointments as the one established for medical
appointments in section 213 of this act. When contracting directly
with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the
department shall only contract with language access providers who are
working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or
state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available,
the department may use a language access provider who meets other
certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including
interpreters in other states.
(6)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2012)) 2013,
unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer
general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year ((2012)) 2013 among
programs after approval by the director of financial management.
However, the department shall not transfer state moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in
(b) of this subsection.
(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are
insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year
((2012)) 2013 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the
long-term care, foster care, adoptions support, medicaid personal care,
and child support programs, the department may transfer state moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department shall
not transfer funds, and the director of financial management shall not
approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the
objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the
expenditure of state funds. The director of financial management shall
notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment
modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written
notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of
the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and
appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or
transfers.

Sec. 1202 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $287,014,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($285,018,000))
$277,169,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($479,315,000))
$476,739,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,354,000))
$1,804,000
Home Security Fund Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,741,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,240,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $725,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,065,407,000))
$1,055,432,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures.
(2) $668,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $668,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to contract for the operation of
one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide
residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The center shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive,
or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of
consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children
from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and
adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department
shall not require case management as a condition of the contract. The
department shall collaborate with the pediatric interim care center to
determine if and how the center could be appropriately incorporated
into the performance-based contract model and report its findings to
the legislature by December 1, 2012.
(3)(a) $80,887,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, (($81,067,000)) $76,567,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and (($74,800,000))
$71,598,034 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for services for children and families. The amounts provided in
this section shall be allotted on a monthly basis and expenditures
shall not exceed allotments based on a three month rolling average
without approval of the office of financial management following
notification to the legislative fiscal committees.
(b) The department shall use these services to safely reduce the
number of children in out-of-home care, safely reduce the time spent in
out-of-home care prior to achieving permanency, and safely reduce the
number of children returning to out-of-home care following permanency.
The department shall provide an initial report to the legislature and
the governor by January 15, 2012, regarding the start-up costs
associated with performance-based contracts under RCW 74.13.360 .
(c) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $579,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 and $109,000
of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for a
receiving care center east of the Cascade mountains.
(4) $176,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $177,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, $656,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation,
$253,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, and $725,000 of
the education legacy trust account--state appropriation are provided
solely for children's administration to contract with an educational
advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach.
The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted
education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12
and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during
the transition to performance based contracts. Funding shall be
prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth and/or
regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested
educational outreach services exist. The department shall utilize
private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.
(5) $670,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $670,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for services provided through
children's advocacy centers.
(6) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds
appropriated in this section as required by RCW 74.13A.005 and
74.13A.020, the secretary shall not set the amount of any adoption
assistance payment or payments, made pursuant to RCW 26.33.320 and
74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080, to more than ninety percent of the
foster care maintenance payment for that child had he or she remained
in a foster family home during the same period. This subsection does
not apply to adoption assistance agreements in existence on the
effective date of this section.
(7) $10,741,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract for services pursuant to
RCW 13.32A.030 and 74.15.220. The department shall contract and
collaborate with service providers in a manner that maintains the
availability and geographic representation of secure and semi-secure
crisis residential centers and HOPE centers. To achieve efficiencies
and increase utilization, the department shall allow the co-location of
these centers, except that a youth may not be placed in a secure
facility or the secure portion of a co-located facility except as
specifically authorized by chapter 13.32A RCW. The reductions to
appropriations in this subsection related to semi-secure crisis
residential centers reflect a reduction to the number of beds for semi-secure crisis residential centers and not a reduction in rates. Any
secure crisis residential center or semi-secure crisis residential
center bed reduction shall not be based solely upon bed utilization.
The department is to exercise its discretion in reducing the number of
beds but to do so in a manner that maintains availability and
geographic representation of semi-secure and secure crisis residential
centers.
(8) $47,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $14,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $40,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1697 (dependency
system). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $564,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided
solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1128 (extended
foster care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $799,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 and $799,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2264 (child welfare/contracting). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2012, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(11) $178,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2592 (extended foster care). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $616,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 and $616,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6555 (child protective services). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2012, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1203 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,723,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,258,000))
$85,477,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,809,000))
$3,808,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,903,000))
$1,904,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,801,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($179,690,000))
$179,909,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $331,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $331,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal
justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $2,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in
this subsection are intended to provide funding for county impacts
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and
shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $3,482,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $3,482,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to implement community juvenile
accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile
code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection may be used solely
for community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the
grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants.
(4) $1,130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to implement alcohol and substance
abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a competitive
basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of
plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist
counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) $3,123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $3,123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile
courts for the following programs identified by the Washington state
institute for public policy (institute) in its October 2006 report:
"Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison
Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Functional
family therapy, multi-systemic therapy, aggression replacement training
and interagency coordination programs, or other programs with a
positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. County
juvenile courts shall apply to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration for funding for program-specific participation and the
administration shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the
per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.
(6) $1,537,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,537,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for expansion of the following
treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation administration
programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy
in its October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to
Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime
Rates": Multidimensional treatment foster care, family integrated
transitions, and aggression replacement training, or other programs
with a positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. The
administration may concentrate delivery of these treatments and
therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in
a cost-effective manner.
(7)(a) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall administer
a block grant, rather than categorical funding, of consolidated
juvenile service funds, community juvenile accountability act grants,
the chemical dependency disposition alternative funds, the mental
health disposition alternative, and the sentencing disposition
alternative for the purpose of serving youth adjudicated in the
juvenile justice system. In making the block grant, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall follow the following formula and
will prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives
and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in
conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (i) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years
old; (ii) fifteen percent for moderate and high-risk youth; (iii)
twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (iv)
seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (v) three
percent for the chemical dependency disposition alternative; and (vi)
two percent for the mental health and sentencing dispositional
alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition
alternative (SSODA) shall not be included in the block grant, but
allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding
for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the
block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when
approved by the juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile
courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee,
based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state
institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.
(b) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall phase the
implementation of the formula provided in subsection (1) of this
section by including a stop-loss formula of five percent in fiscal year
2012 and five percent in fiscal year 2013.
(c) The juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile
courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight
committee with equal representation from the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee
is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding
formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current
available information. The committee will be cochaired by the juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts, who will also
have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to
achieve its purpose. Initial members will include one juvenile court
representative from the finance committee, the community juvenile
accountability act committee, the risk assessment quality assurance
committee, the executive board of the Washington association of
juvenile court administrators, the Washington state center for court
research, and a representative of the superior court judges
association; two representatives from the juvenile rehabilitation
administration headquarters program oversight staff, two
representatives of the juvenile rehabilitation administration regional
office staff, one representative of the juvenile rehabilitation
administration fiscal staff and a juvenile rehabilitation
administration division director. The committee may make changes to
the formula categories other than the evidence-based program and
disposition alternative categories if it is determined the changes will
increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based
program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost benefit
savings to the state. Long-term cost benefit must be considered.
Percentage changes may occur in the evidence-based program or
disposition alternative categories of the formula should it be
determined the changes will increase evidence-based program or
disposition alternative delivery and increase the cost benefit to the
state. These outcomes will also be considered in determining when
evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition
alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left
separate.
(d) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts
shall be responsible for collecting and distributing information and
providing access to the data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the Washington state institute for public policy
related to program and outcome data. The juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the juvenile courts will work collaboratively to
develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost benefit to
the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and
disposition alternatives.
(8) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts
shall collect and distribute information related to program outcome and
provide access to these data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and Washington state institute for public policy.
Consistent with chapter 13.50 RCW, all confidentiality agreements
necessary to implement this information-sharing shall be approved
within 30 days of the effective date of this section. The agreements
between administrative office of the courts, the juvenile courts, and
the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall be executed to ensure
that the juvenile rehabilitation administration receives the data that
the juvenile rehabilitation administration identifies as needed to
comply with this subsection. This includes, but is not limited to,
information by program at the statewide aggregate level, individual
court level, and individual client level for the purpose of the
juvenile rehabilitation administration providing quality assurance and
oversight for the locally committed youth block grant and associated
funds and at times as specified by the juvenile rehabilitation
administration as necessary to carry out these functions. The data
shall be provided in a manner that reflects the collaborative work the
juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile courts have
developed regarding program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost
benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices
and disposition alternatives.
(9) The Washington association of juvenile court administrators and
the juvenile rehabilitation administration, in consultation with the
community juvenile accountability act advisory committee and the
Washington state institute for public policy, shall analyze and review
data elements available from the administrative office of the courts
for possible integration into the evidence-based program quality
assurance plans and processes. The administrative office of the
courts, the Washington association of juvenile court administrators,
and the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall provide
information necessary to complete the review and analysis. The
Washington association of juvenile court administrators and the
juvenile rehabilitation administration shall report the findings of
their review and analysis, as well as any recommendations, to the
legislature by December 1, 2012.

Sec. 1204 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH
PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $317,734,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($324,319,000))
$321,609,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($449,593,000))
$446,619,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,864,000
Hospital Safety Net Assessment Fund--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,251,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,114,761,000))
$1,109,077,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $109,342,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $109,341,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for persons and
services not covered by the medicaid program. This is a reduction of
$4,348,000 each fiscal year from the nonmedicaid funding that was
allocated for expenditure by regional support networks during fiscal
year 2011 prior to supplemental budget reductions. This $4,348,000
reduction shall be distributed among regional support networks
proportional to each network's share of the total state population. To
the extent possible, levels of regional support network spending shall
be maintained in the following priority order: (i) Crisis and
commitment services; (ii) community inpatient services; and (iii)
residential care services, including personal care and emergency
housing assistance.
(b) $6,590,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $6,590,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $7,620,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the department and regional
support networks to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In
determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided
to regional support networks with PACT teams, the department shall
consider the differences between regional support networks in the
percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that
are not reimbursable under medicaid. The department may allow regional
support networks which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are
higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section
to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under
section 204(1)(a) of this act. The department and regional support
networks shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the
PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this
section.
(c) $5,850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $5,850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $1,300,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the western Washington regional
support networks to provide either community- or hospital campus-based
services for persons who require the level of care previously provided
by the program for adaptive living skills (PALS) at western state
hospital.
(d) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The
number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support
networks at western state hospital shall be 557 per day.
(e) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(((g))) (f) The department is authorized to continue to contract
directly, rather than through contracts with regional support networks,
for children's long-term inpatient facility services.
(((h))) (g) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to continue performance-based
incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support services
for individuals with severe mental illness who were discharged from the
state hospitals as part of the expanding community services initiative.
These funds will be used to enhance community residential and support
services provided by regional support networks through other state and
federal funding.
(((i))) (h) $1,125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $1,125,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Spokane
regional support network to implement services to reduce utilization
and the census at eastern state hospital. Such services shall include:
(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high
utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;
(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the
community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient
care or jail services;
(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to
individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating
those individuals; and
(iv) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.
At least annually, the Spokane regional support network shall
assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at
eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally
effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.
(((j))) (i) $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $1,529,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to reimburse
Pierce and Spokane counties for the cost of conducting 180-day
commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.
(((k))) (j) Regional support networks may use local funds to earn
additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate
does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate
range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide
medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients.
Additionally, regional support networks may use a portion of the state
funds allocated in accordance with (a) of this subsection to earn
additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application
of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of
crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and
outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for
medicaid.
(((l))) (k) Given the recent approval of federal medicaid matching
funds for the disability lifeline and the alcohol and drug abuse
treatment support act programs, the department shall charge regional
support networks for only the state share rather than the total cost of
community psychiatric hospitalization for persons enrolled in those
programs.
(((m))) (l) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $1,500,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to adjust regional support network
capitation rates to account for the per diem rates actually paid for
psychiatric care provided at hospitals participating in the certified
public expenditure program operated pursuant to section 213 of this
act.
(((n))) (m) The appropriations in this section reflect efficiencies
to be achieved through voluntary consolidation of regional support
networks in accordance with Substitute House Bill No. 2139 (regional
support networks). Voluntary consolidation of regional support
networks is expected to result in administrative efficiencies and
maximize dollars available for direct services to individuals with
mental illnesses without corresponding increases in state
appropriations.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,017,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($112,603,000))
$118,883,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($153,618,000))
$152,917,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,325,000))
$64,555,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($448,563,000))
$451,372,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in
this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a community partnership
between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support
community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding
western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (2)(b)
are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time
community service officer at the city of Lakewood.
(c) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for payment to the city of
Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state
hospital and adjacent areas.
(d) $20,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $20,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to maintain staffed capacity to
serve an average daily census in forensic wards at western state
hospital of 270 patients per day.
(e) The appropriations in this section reflect efficiencies to be
achieved through enactment of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6492
(competency to stand trial). These efficiencies are expected to enable
the hospitals to substantially increase the timeliness with which
evaluations of defendant competency to stand trial are completed, and
treatment to restore competency is initiated, without corresponding
increases in state appropriations.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,148,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,276,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,198,000))
$5,198,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,322,000))
$8,322,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $1,161,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,161,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for children's evidence-based
mental health services. Funding is sufficient to continue serving
children at the same levels as fiscal year 2009.
(b) $700,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence-based
practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and
implementation of evidence-based or promising practices for serving
children and youth with mental health disorders. The department shall
enter into an interagency agreement with the office of the attorney
general for expenditure of $700,000 of the state's proceeds of the cy
pres settlement in State of Washington v. AstraZeneca (Seroquel) for
this purpose.
(c) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 and $89,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to contract with the University of
Washington's evidence-based practice institute and the Washington state
institute for public policy to consult with the department and the
health care authority on the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2536 (children services/delivery). The
department's programs responsible for administration of mental health,
child welfare, and juvenile justice programs will coordinate with the
health care authority on the development of contract terms which
facilitate efforts to meet requirements of the bill. If Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2536 (children services/delivery) is
not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,482,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,247,000))
$4,161,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,210,000))
$7,128,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $446,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,385,000))
$16,217,000

(a) The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the
following conditions and limitations: In accordance with RCW
43.20B.110, 43.135.055, and 71.24.035, the department is authorized to
increase license and certification fees in fiscal years 2012 and 2013
to support the costs of the regulatory program. The fee schedule
increases must be developed so that the maximum amount of additional
fees paid by providers statewide in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium is
$446,000. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates
for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the
department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to
those of the department, including but not limited to the joint
commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the
commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the
council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with
regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for
organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower
costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations
which are not accredited.
(b) $19,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $17,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $34,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to support a partnership among the department of social
and health services, the department of health, and agencies that
deliver medical care and behavioral health services in Cowlitz county.
The partnership shall identify and recommend strategies for resolving
regulatory, licensing, data management, reporting, and funding barriers
to more effective integration of primary medical and behavioral health
care services in the county.

Sec. 1205 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $405,412,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($420,327,000))
$411,082,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($752,059,000))
$745,033,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $184,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,577,982,000))
$1,561,711,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b) Amounts appropriated in this subsection reflect a reduction to
funds appropriated for in-home care. The department shall reduce the
number of in-home hours authorized. The reduction shall be scaled
based on the acuity level of care recipients. The largest hour
reductions shall be to lower acuity patients and the smallest hour
reductions shall be to higher acuity patients.
(c) Amounts appropriated in this subsection are sufficient to
develop and implement the use of a consistent, statewide outcome-based
vendor contract for employment and day services by July 1, 2012. The
rates paid to vendors under this contract shall also be made
consistent. In its description of activities the agency shall include
activity listings and dollars appropriated for: Employment services,
day services, child development services and county administration of
services to the developmentally disabled. The department shall begin
reporting to the office of financial management on these activities
beginning in fiscal year 2010.
(d) $944,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $944,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $1,888,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for state contributions for individual provider
health care benefits. Pursuant to the collective bargaining agreement
negotiated with the exclusive bargaining representative of individual
providers established under RCW 74.39A.270, the state shall contribute
to the multiemployer health benefits trust fund $2.21 per paid hour
worked by individual providers.
(e) $1,329,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $1,622,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $2,947,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the state's contribution to the
training partnership, as provided in RCW 74.39A.360, for instructional
costs associated with the training of individual providers.
Contributions are funded at $0.22 per benefit-eligible paid hour worked
by all home care workers. Expenditures for the purposes specified in
this subsection shall not exceed the amounts provided in this
subsection. However, if the governor and the service employees
international union healthcare 775nw can reach agreement on repurposing
funding that is currently provided in the individual provider
collective bargaining agreement for new individual provider wages paid
during training or other training related items, then expenditures for
training trust contributions for individual providers may include the
amounts provided in this subsection and the agreed upon repurposed
funding. Funding in this section for purposes other than the
individual provider collective bargaining agreement cannot be used for
the purposes of this subsection (1)(e). It is the intent of the
legislature that the funding provided in this subsection, including any
repurposed funding, is sufficient to cover the costs of individual
provider training and therefore tuition or other entrance fees are not
necessary.
(f) (($104,669,000)) $107,538,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 and (($104,669,000)) $107,535,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the
department to provide personal care services to waiver and nonwaiver
in-home clients. The department shall provide the legislature with a
report by December 5, 2012, on the feasibility of converting the
medicaid personal care program for in-home adults to a medicaid program
as found in section 1915(i) of the federal social security act that
utilizes the option for self-direction of individualized budgets. The
department shall operate the personal care program within the amounts
specifically provided.
(g)(i) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection, the
department shall revise the current working age adult policy to allow
clients to choose between employment and community access activities.
Clients age 21 and older who are receiving services through a home- and
community-based medicaid waiver shall be offered the choice to
transition to a community access program after nine months of
enrollment in an employment program, and the option to transition from
a community access program to an employment program at any time. The
department shall inform clients and their legal representatives of all
available options for employment and day services. Information
provided to the client and the client's legal representative shall
include the types of activities each service option provides, and the
amount, scope, and duration of service for which the client would be
eligible under each service option. An individual client may be
authorized for only one service option, either employment services or
community access services. Clients may not participate in more than
one of these services at any given time.
(ii) The department shall work with counties and stakeholders to
strengthen and expand the existing community access program. The
program must emphasize support for the client so they are able to
participate in activities that integrate them into their community and
support independent living and skills.
(iii) The appropriation in this subsection includes funding to
provide employment or community access services to 168 medicaid
eligible young adults with developmental disabilities living with their
families who need employment opportunities and assistance after high
school graduation.
(h) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the restoration of direct
support to local organizations that utilize parent-to-parent networks
and communication to promote access and quality of care for individuals
with developmental disabilities and their families.
(i) In accordance with Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1277
(licensed settings for vulnerable adults), adult family home license
fees are increased in fiscal years 2012 and 2013 to support the costs
of conducting licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs.
(i) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes
shall be increased to $100 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2012 and
$175 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2013. Adult family homes shall
receive a corresponding vendor rate increase per medicaid patient day
of $0.22 in fiscal year 2012 and $0.43 in fiscal year 2013, or the
amount necessary to fully fund the license fee increase for publicly
funded beds, pursuant to the most recent bed estimates maintained by
the department.
(ii) Beginning in fiscal year 2012, a processing fee of $2,750
shall be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially
licensed. This fee is nonrefundable.
(j) Clients with developmental disabilities have demonstrated a
need and a desire for a day services program as verified by over 900
clients currently accessing day programs through a long-term care
service model. In addition, every individual, to include those with a
developmental disability, should have the opportunity for meaningful
employment which allows them to contribute to their communities and to
become as self-sufficient as possible. Providing choice empowers
recipients of publicly funded services and their families by expanding
their degree of control over the services and supports they need.
The department shall work with legislators and stakeholders to
develop a new approach to employment and day services. The objective
of this plan is to ensure that adults with developmental disabilities
have optimum choices, and that employment and day offerings are
comprehensive enough to meet the needs of all clients currently served
on a home and community based waiver. The proposal shall be submitted
to the 2012 legislature for consideration and shall be constructed such
that a client ultimately receives employment, community access, or the
community day option but not more than one service at a time. The
proposal shall include options for program efficiencies within the
current employment and day structure and shall provide details on the
plan to implement a consistent, statewide outcome-based vendor contract
for employment and day services as specified in (c) of this subsection.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,436,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,356,000))
$78,154,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($153,570,000))
$152,963,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,043,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($331,405,000))
$328,596,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b) $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are for the department to fulfill its contracts with
the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to provide
transportation, building space, and other support services as are
reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of students
living in residential habilitation centers.
(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,382,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,366,000))
$1,759,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,319,000))
$1,519,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,067,000))
$4,660,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,634,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,553,000))
$6,313,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,588,000))
$9,786,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($998,000))
$791,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,773,000))
$21,524,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
Amounts appropriated in this subsection are for the purposes of
transitioning clients with developmental disabilities into community
settings. The department is authorized as needed to use these funds to
either pay for clients residing within a residential habilitation
center or for placements in the community. Pursuant to Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5459 (services for people with developmental
disabilities), funding in this subsection must be prioritized for the
purpose of facilitating the consolidation and closure of Frances Haddon
Morgan Center. The department shall use a person-centered approach in
developing the discharge plan to assess each resident's needs and
identify services the resident requires to successfully transition to
the community or another residential habilitation center. The
department is authorized to use any savings from this effort for the
purpose of developing community resources to address the needs of
clients with developmental disabilities who are in crisis or in need of
respite. The department shall track the costs and savings of closing
Frances Haddon Morgan Center and any investments into community
placements and resources. The department shall provide a fiscal
progress report to the legislature by December 5, 2011.

Sec. 1206 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $791,493,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($809,338,000))
$802,115,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,690,993,000))
$1,686,998,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,517,000
Traumatic Brain Injury Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,388,000
Nursing Facility Quality Assurance Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,410,729,000))
$3,399,511,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $170.37 for
fiscal year 2012 and shall not exceed (($171.43)) $171.09 for fiscal
year 2013, including the rate add-ons described in (a) and (b) of this
subsection. However, if the waiver requested from the federal centers
for medicare and medicaid services in relation to the safety net
assessment created by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581
(nursing home payments) is for any reason not approved and implemented,
the weighted average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed
$159.87 for fiscal year 2012 and shall not exceed (($160.93)) $161.29
for fiscal year 2013. There will be no adjustments for economic trends
and conditions in fiscal years 2012 and 2013. The economic trends and
conditions factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act
shall not be compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor
or factors defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before
applying it to the component rate allocations established in accordance
with chapter 74.46 RCW. When no economic trends and conditions factor
for either fiscal year is defined in a biennial appropriations act, no
economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any earlier
biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or compounded to
the component rate allocations established in accordance with chapter
74.46 RCW.
(a) Within the funds provided, the department shall continue to
provide an add-on per medicaid resident day per facility not to exceed
$1.57. The add-on shall be used to increase wages, benefits, and/or
staffing levels for certified nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or
benefits for dietary aides, housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other
category of worker whose statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was
less than $15 in calendar year 2008, according to cost report data.
The add-on may also be used to address resulting wage compression for
related job classes immediately affected by wage increases to low-wage
workers. The department shall continue reporting requirements and a
settlement process to ensure that the funds are spent according to this
subsection.
(b) The department shall do a comparative analysis of the facility-based payment rates calculated on July 1, 2012, using the payment
methodology defined in chapter 74.46 RCW and as funded in the omnibus
appropriations act, excluding the comparative add-on, acuity add-on,
and safety net reimbursement, to the facility-based payment rates in
effect June 30, 2010. If the facility-based payment rate calculated on
July 1, 2012, is smaller than the facility-based payment rate on June
30, 2010, then the difference shall be provided to the individual
nursing facilities as an add-on payment per medicaid resident day.
(c) During the comparative analysis performed in subsection (b) of
this section, if it is found that the direct care rate for any facility
calculated using the payment methodology defined in chapter 74.46 RCW
and as funded in the omnibus appropriations act, excluding the
comparative add-on, acuity add-on, and safety net reimbursement, is
greater than the direct care rate in effect on June 30, 2010, then the
facility shall receive a ten percent direct care rate add-on to
compensate that facility for taking on more acute clients than they
have in the past.
(d) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to
reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net
assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety
net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual
statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.
(e) If the waiver requested from the federal centers for medicare
and medicaid services in relation to the safety net assessment created
by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581 (nursing home payments) is
for any reason not approved and implemented, (b), (c), and (d) of this
subsection do not apply.
(2) After examining actual nursing facility cost information, the
legislature finds that the medicaid nursing facility rates calculated
pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581 (nursing home
payments) provide sufficient reimbursement to efficiently and
economically operating nursing facilities and bear a reasonable
relationship to costs.
(3) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue no additional certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2012 and no new certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2013 and shall grant no rate add-ons to payment rates for capital
improvements not requiring a certificate of need and a certificate of
capital authorization for fiscal years 2012 and 2013.
(4) The long-term care program may develop and pay enhanced rates
for exceptional care to nursing homes for persons with traumatic brain
injuries who are transitioning from hospital care. The cost per
patient day for caring for these clients in a nursing home setting may
be equal to or less than the cost of caring for these clients in a
hospital setting.
(5) Amounts appropriated in this section reflect a reduction to
funds appropriated for in-home care. The department shall reduce the
number of in-home hours authorized. The reduction shall be scaled
based on the acuity level of care recipients. The largest hour
reductions shall be to lower acuity patients and the smallest hour
reductions shall be to higher acuity patients.
(6) $1,883,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $1,883,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $3,766,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for state contributions for
individual provider health care benefits. Pursuant to the collective
bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive bargaining
representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270, the state shall contribute to the multiemployer health
benefits trust fund $2.21 per paid hour worked by individual providers.
(7) $2,449,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $3,012,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $5,463,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the state's contribution to the
training partnership, as provided in RCW 74.39A.360, for instructional
costs associated with the training of individual providers.
Contributions are funded at $0.22 per benefit-eligible paid hour worked
by all home care workers. Expenditures for the purposes specified in
this subsection shall not exceed the amounts provided in this
subsection. However, if the governor and the service employees
international union healthcare 775nw can reach agreement on repurposing
funding that is currently provided in the individual provider
collective bargaining agreement for new individual provider wages paid
during training or other training related items, then expenditures for
training trust contributions for individual providers may include the
amounts provided in this subsection and the agreed upon repurposed
funding. Funding in this section for purposes other than the
individual provider collective bargaining agreement cannot be used for
the purposes of this subsection (7). It is the intent of the
legislature that the funding provided in this subsection, including any
repurposed funding, is sufficient to cover the costs of individual
provider training and therefore tuition or other entrance fees are not
necessary.
(8) (($338,550,000)) $325,203,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 and (($338,550,000)) $324,653,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the
department to provide personal care services to waiver and nonwaiver
in-home clients. The department shall provide the legislature with a
report by December 5, 2012, on the feasibility of converting the
medicaid personal care program for in-home adults to a medicaid program
as found in section 1915(i) of the federal social security act that
utilizes the option for self-direction of individualized budgets. The
department shall operate the personal care program within the amounts
specifically provided.
(9) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(10) The department shall eliminate the adult day health program
under the state plan 1915(i) option and shall reestablish it under the
long-term care home and community-based waiver.
(11) $4,588,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $4,559,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $9,237,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of
community residential and support services for persons who are older
adults or who have co-occurring medical and behavioral disorders and
who have been discharged or diverted from a state psychiatric hospital.
These funds shall be used to serve individuals whose treatment needs
constitute substantial barriers to community placement, who no longer
require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of
care, and who no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment.
(12) $1,840,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
services program. Funding shall be prioritized towards serving
populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include
senior citizens and persons with disabilities.
(13) In accordance with Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1277
(licensed settings for vulnerable adults), nursing facility fees are
increased in fiscal year 2012 and adult family home fees are increased
in fiscal year 2012 and fiscal year 2013 to support the costs of
conducting licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs.
(a) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities
shall be increased to $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2012 and
assumes $517,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation.
Nursing facilities shall receive a vendor rate increase of $0.08 per
medicaid patient day to cover the license fee increase for publicly
funded beds.
(b) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes
shall be increased to $100 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2012 and
assumes $1,449,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation;
and $175 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2013 and assumes $2,463,000
of the general fund--private/local appropriation. Adult family homes
shall receive a corresponding vendor rate increase per medicaid patient
day of $0.22 in fiscal year 2012 and $0.43 in fiscal year 2013, or the
amount necessary to fully fund the license fee increase for publicly
funded beds, pursuant to the most recent bed estimates maintained by
the department.
(c) Beginning in fiscal year 2012, a processing fee of $2,750 shall
be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially
licensed. This fee is nonrefundable.
(d) $72,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $708,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation
and $708,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely to implement sections 501 through 503 of Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1277 (licensed settings for vulnerable adults). The
department shall use additional investigative resources to address
complaints about provider practices as well as alleged abuse, neglect,
abandonment, and exploitation of residents in adult family homes. The
department shall develop a statewide internal quality review and
accountability program to improve the accountability of staff and the
consistent application of investigative activities, and shall convene
a quality assurance panel to review problems in the quality of care in
adult family homes.
(14) $3,316,000 of the traumatic brain injury account--state
appropriation is provided solely to continue services for persons with
traumatic brain injury (TBI) as defined in chapter 143, Laws of 2011
(traumatic brain injury strategic partnership).
(15) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients
residing in nursing homes and paid for with state only funds into less
restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the
client's care needs.
(16) The department shall participate in the work group established
by the department of corrections in section 220(2) of this act to
review release options for elderly and infirm offenders.

Sec. 1207 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $415,553,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($438,483,000))
$386,366,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,174,416,000))
$1,180,028,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,592,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,059,044,000))
$2,012,539,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $195,410,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, (($235,808,000)) $178,052,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and (($725,586,000))
$712,784,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. Under section 2 of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5921 (social services programs),
the amounts in this subsection assume that any participant in the
temporary assistance for needy families where their participation is
suspended and does not volunteer to participate in WorkFirst services
or unsubsidized employment does not receive child care subsidies or
WorkFirst subsidies as a condition of the suspension. Within the
amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide
assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary
assistance for needy families.
(a) Within the amounts provided for WorkFirst in this subsection,
the department shall continue to implement WorkFirst program
improvements that are designed to achieve progress against outcome
measures specified in Engrossed House Bill No. 2262 (WorkFirst and
child care) and RCW 74.08A.410.
(b) The department may establish a career services work transition
program.
(c) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the legislature
expressly mandates that the department exercise its authority, granted
in 1997 under RCW 74.08A.290, to contract for work activities services
pursuant to that statutory authority and RCW 41.06.142(3).
(d) The department shall create a temporary assistance for needy
families budget structure that allows for more transparent tracking of
budget units and subunits of expenditures where these units and
subunits are mutually exclusive from other department budget units.
The budget structure shall include budget units for the following:
Grants, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the
program.
(2) $23,679,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, in addition to supplemental security income recoveries, is
provided solely for financial assistance and other services to
recipients in the program established in section 4, chapter 8, Laws of
2010 1st sp. sess., until the program terminates on October 31, 2011.
(3)(a) $12,457,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $21,959,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, in addition to supplemental
security income recoveries, are provided solely for the programs
created in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2082 (essential needs
and assistance program) beginning November 1, 2011.
(b) The department shall review clients receiving services through
the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether
they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens,
and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income
benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization
funding through the department.
(c) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with
the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral
of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement
must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in
selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties
to facilitate applications for veterans' services.
(4) $1,657,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,657,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for naturalization services.
(5) $2,366,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for ((refugee)) employment services for
refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the
department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant
assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway
services; and $2,366,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for ((refugee)) employment services
for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for
the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant
assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway
services.
(6) On December 1, 2011, and annually thereafter, the department
must report to the legislature on all sources of funding available for
both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during
the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service
type and funding source. The report must also include the number of
clients served and outcome data for the clients.
(7) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds
appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit
under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to
be fifty percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance
program benefit amount.

Sec. 1208 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND
SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,742,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($71,218,000))
$71,019,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($184,401,000))
$187,979,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,486,000))
$16,248,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,748,000
Problem Gambling Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,448,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($365,043,000))
$371,184,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
may contract with the University of Washington and community-based
providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program.
For all contractors, indirect charges for administering the program
shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall continue to provide for chemical dependency treatment services
for adult medicaid eligible, pregnant and parenting women, disability
lifeline, and alcoholism and drug addiction treatment and support act,
and medical care services clients.
(3) In accordance with RCW 70.96A.090 and 43.135.055, the
department is authorized to increase fees for the review and approval
of treatment programs in fiscal years 2012 and 2013 as necessary to
support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee
schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of
accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to
have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department,
including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of
health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of
rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To
reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited
programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of
accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these
programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.
(4) $3,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation (from the
substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant) is
provided solely for the continued funding of existing county drug and
alcohol use prevention programs.
(5) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department is
required to increase federal match available for intensive inpatient
services. During fiscal year 2013, the department shall shift
contracts for a minimum of 32 intensive inpatient beds currently
provided in settings that are considered institutions for mental
diseases to two or more facilities with no more than 16 beds that are
able to claim federal match for services provided to medicaid clients
or individuals covered under the department's section 1115 medicaid
waiver. The department is authorized to conduct a request for proposal
process to fulfill this requirement. By December 1, 2012, the
department shall provide a plan to the office of financial management
and to the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature for
transitioning all remaining intensive inpatient beds currently provided
in settings that are considered institutions for mental diseases into
facilities with no more than 16 beds by June 2017. The plan shall
identify the maximum number of additional beds that can be transitioned
into facilities with no more than 16 beds during the 2013-2015 fiscal
biennium and the remaining number that will be transitioned during the
2015-2017 fiscal biennium, a timeline and process for accomplishing
this, and a projection of the related general fund--state savings for
each biennium.
(6) The amounts appropriated in this section include reductions of
$303,000 in the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2012
and $1,815,000 in the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2013. The department must apply this reduction across all levels of
chemical dependency residential treatment services excluding services
contracted through the counties, services provided to pregnant and
parenting women, services provided to juveniles, and services provided
to parents in dependency proceedings.

Sec. 1209 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,854,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,401,000))
$10,353,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,060,000))
$104,922,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,766,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($129,081,000))
$128,895,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $480,000 of the telecommunications devices
for the hearing and speech impaired account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the office of deaf and hard of hearing to contract
for services that provide employment support and help with life
activities for deaf-blind individuals in King county.

Sec. 1210 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- SPECIAL COMMITMENT
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,167,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,128,000))
$38,247,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,295,000))
$86,414,000

Sec. 1211 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,069,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,474,000))
$26,301,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,550,000))
$42,090,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,116,000
Performance Audits of State Government--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,812,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($97,021,000))
$101,388,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington state mentors
program to continue its public-private partnerships to provide
technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve
at-risk youth.
(2) $445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild
project.
(3) $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the juvenile detention
alternatives initiative.
(4) $4,812,000 of the performance audits of state government--state
appropriation is provided solely for support and expansion of the
division of fraud investigation. The division shall conduct
investigatory and enforcement activities for all department programs,
including the child support and TANF programs.
(5) $1,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for the department to distribute as
support to community public health and safety networks that have a
history of providing training and services related to adverse childhood
experiences. Distribution of these funds is contingent upon securing
funding from a private entity or entities to provide one dollar in
matching funds for each dollar in state funds received by a network so
that the funding received by a community public health and safety
network will be equal portions of state and private funding.
(((7))) (6) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for a grant program focused on
criminal street gang prevention and intervention. The Washington state
partnership council on juvenile justice may award grants under this
subsection. The council shall give priority to applicants who have
demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal street gangs.
Applicants composed of, at a minimum, one or more local governmental
entities and one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations that
have a documented history of creating and administering effective
criminal street gang prevention and intervention programs may apply for
funding under this subsection.
(((8))) (7) $113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 and $105,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for staffing costs associated with
implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2536
(children services/delivery). The amounts provided in this subsection
must be used for coordinated evidence-based practice implementation
amongst the department's programs providing mental health, child
welfare, and juvenile justice services to children. If Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2536 (children services/delivery) is
not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 1212 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER
AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,140,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,303,000))
$49,584,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,049,000))
$53,409,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($161,492,000))
$165,133,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $469,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year ((2011)) 2012 and $270,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year ((2012)) 2013 are provided
solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5921
(social services programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2011, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1213 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,034,296,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,031,185,000))
$2,113,980,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,307,323,000))
$5,336,887,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($62,597,000))
$60,582,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,077,000))
$14,032,000
Hospital Safety Net Assessment Fund--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($434,087,000))
$442,930,000
State Health Care Authority Administration Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,040,000
Basic Health Plan Stabilization Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $529,000
Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,972,334,000))
$10,090,476,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations to the authority in this act shall be
expended for the purposes and in the amounts specified in this act. To
the extent that appropriations in this section are insufficient to fund
actual expenditures in excess of caseload forecasts and utilization
assumptions, the authority, after May 1, ((2012)) 2013, may transfer
general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year ((2012)) 2013 that
are provided solely for a specified purpose. The authority shall not
transfer funds, and the director of financial management shall not
approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the
objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the
expenditure of state funds. The director of financial management shall
notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment
modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written
notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of
the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and
appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or
transfers.
(2) Within amounts appropriated in this section and sections 205
and 206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to
provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care
programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents eligible
to participate in the basic health plan as subsidized enrollees and
home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at
the minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below
sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(3) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals that are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
that choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(4)(a) $1,200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 is provided solely to plan the implementation of a
system of consolidated public school employee health benefits
purchasing.
It is the intent of the legislature to improve the administration,
transparency, and equity in delivering a K-12 employees' health
benefits system. In addition, the legislature intends that any cost
savings that result from changes to K-12 health benefits be dedicated
to public schools.
To further this legislative intent, the state health care authority
shall develop a plan to implement a consolidated health benefits'
system for K-12 employees for the 2013-14 school year. The health care
authority shall deliver a report to the legislature by December 15,
2011, that sets forth the implementation plan to the ways and means
committees of the house of representatives and the senate.
(b) The report prepared by the health care authority shall compare
and contrast the costs and benefits, both long and short term, of:
(i) The current K-12 health benefits system;
(ii) A new K-12 employee benefits pool; and
(iii) Enrolling K-12 employees into the health benefits pool for
state employees.
(c) In addition to the implementation plan, the report shall
include the following information:
(i) The costs and benefits of the current K-12 health benefits
system;
(ii) The costs and benefits of providing a new statewide K-12
employees' health benefits pool to school districts and school
employees;
(iii) The costs and benefits of enrolling K-12 employees into the
existing health benefits pool for state employees;
(iv) Recommendations of ways to limit administrative duplication
and costs, improve transparency to employees, the legislature, and the
public and assure equity among beneficiaries of publicly provided
employee health benefits;
(v) Recommendations for standardizing benefit packages and
purchasing efforts in a manner that seeks to maximize funding and
equity for all school employees;
(vi) Recommendations regarding the use of incentives, including how
changes to state health benefit allocations could provide employees
with benefits that would encourage participation;
(vii) Recommendations regarding the implementation of a new K-12
employee benefit plan, with separate options for voluntary
participation and mandatory statewide participation;
(viii) Recommendations regarding methods to reduce inequities
between individual and family coverage;
(ix) Consolidation of the purchasing and budget accountability for
school employee benefits to maximize administrative efficiency and
leverage existing skills and resources; and
(x) Other details the health care authority deems necessary,
including but not limited to recommendations on the following:
(A) Approaches for implementing the transition to a statewide pool,
including administrative and statutory changes necessary to ensure a
successful transition, and whether the pool should be separate from, or
combined with, the public employees' benefits pool;
(B) The structure of a permanent governing group to provide ongoing
oversight to the consolidated pool, in a manner similar to the public
employees benefits board functions for employee health benefits,
including statutory duties and authorities of the board; and
(C) Options for including potential changes to: Eligibility
standardization, the public employees benefits risk pools, the movement
of school employee retirees into the new K-12 pool or pools, and the
movement of educational service district employees into the new K-12
pool or pools.
(d) In determining its costs and benefits of a new statewide K-12
employees' health benefits pool for school districts and school
employees, the health care authority shall assume the following:
(i) School district enrollees must constitute an entire bargaining
unit, or an entire group of nonrepresented employees;
(ii) Staffing and administration for benefits purchasing shall be
provided by the health care authority; and
(iii) The new K-12 pool would operate on a schedule that
coordinates with the financing and enrollment schedule used for school
districts.
(e) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
office of the insurance commissioner shall provide information and
technical assistance to the health care authority as requested by the
health care authority. The health care authority shall not implement
the new school employee benefits pool until authorized to do so by the
legislature.
(5) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
(i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all applicants, or
(ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from those
persons not required to file income tax returns; (b) check employment
security payroll records at least once every twelve months on all
enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as indicated by payroll
records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based to document
their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d)
require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot
be obtained to document their current income at least once every six
months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by
noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to, depreciation,
amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by the United
States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment and civil
penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as
provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(6) Enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan shall be limited
to only include persons who qualify as subsidized enrollees as defined
in RCW 70.47.020 and who (a) qualify for services under 1115 medicaid
demonstration project number 11-W-00254/10; or (b) are foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.
(7) $23,700,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for planning and implementation of a health benefit
exchange under the federal patient protection and affordable care act.
Within the amounts provided in this subsection, funds used by the
authority for information technology projects are conditioned on the
authority satisfying the requirements of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5931 (central service agencies).
(8) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the
medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health
care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction
of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so
that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation
authority.
(9) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard
recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other
assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.
(10) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for
Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of
the state's health care system.
(11) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of
residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care
authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she
would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the
extent necessary.
(12) $4,261,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $4,261,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $8,522,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share
hospital payments ((under RCW 74.09.730(1)(a))).
(13) $6,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by
public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be
responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the
supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum
allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the
payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or
reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E
of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that
costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against
payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because
such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from
these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to
retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing
homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the
interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care
authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or
the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from
the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the
medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The
health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the
eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.
(14) The health care authority shall continue the inpatient
hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals, including
those owned or operated by the state, except those classified as
critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The
health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and
legislature by November 1, 2011, and by November 1, 2012, that evaluate
whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the
certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no
longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall
submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing
cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources
as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2012 and fiscal
year 2013, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one
hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost
for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical
assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the
maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal
regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an
allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by
the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each
fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount.
The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the
inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the
fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the
reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with
policies approved in the 2011-13 biennial operating appropriations act
and in effect on July 1, 2011, (b) one half of the indigent assistance
disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by
each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (c) all of the other
disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by
each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same
disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2011-13 biennium.
If payments during the fiscal year exceed the hospital's baseline
amount, no additional payments will be made to the hospital except the
federal portion of allowable disproportionate share hospital payments
for which the hospital can certify allowable match. If payments during
the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount, the hospital will be
paid a state grant equal to the difference between payments during the
fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state
grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in
monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated and redistributed as
the baseline is updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are
subject to an interim settlement within eleven months after the end of
the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent
that either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in
excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection,
the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested.
$8,102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2012, of which $6,570,000 is appropriated in section 204(1) of this
act, and (($3,162,000)) $10,722,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, of which $6,570,000 is appropriated
in section 204(1) of this act, are provided solely for state grants for
the participating hospitals. CPE hospitals will receive the inpatient
and outpatient reimbursement rate restorations in RCW 74.60.080 and
rate increases in RCW 74.60.090 funded through the hospital safety net
assessment fund rather than through the baseline mechanism specified in
this subsection.
(15) The health care authority shall seek public-private
partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to
provide on-going support for outreach and education efforts under the
federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of
2009.
(16) The health care authority shall target funding for maternity
support services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to
higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm
or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a
cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe
mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco
use, or African American or Native American race. The health care
authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of
maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care
authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for
maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those
services.
(17) ((For children with family incomes above 200 percent of the
federal poverty level in the state-funded children's health program for
children who are not eligible for coverage under the federally funded
children's health insurance program, premiums shall be set every two
years in an amount equal to the average state-only share of the per
capita cost of coverage in the state-funded children's health program
for children in families with incomes at or less than two hundred
percent of the federal poverty level.
(18))) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health
care authority shall provide disproportionate share hospital payments
to hospitals that provide services to children in the children's health
program who are not eligible for services under Title XIX or XXI of the
federal social security act due to their citizenship status.
(((19))) (18) $859,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $979,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $1,841,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase prior authorization
activities for advanced imaging procedures.
(((20))) (19) $196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $442,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase prior authorization
activities for surgical procedures, which may include orthopedic
procedures, spinal procedures and interventions, and nerve procedures.
(((21))) (20) $300,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation and $300,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for a prescriptive practices improvement
collaborative focusing upon atypical antipsychotics and other
medications commonly used in the treatment of severe and persistent
mental illnesses among adults. The project shall promote collaboration
among community mental health centers, other major prescribers of
atypical antipsychotic medications to adults enrolled in state medical
assistance programs, and psychiatrists, pharmacists, and other
specialists at the University of Washington department of psychiatry
and/or other research universities. The collaboration shall include
patient-specific prescriber consultations by psychiatrists and
pharmacists specializing in treatment of severe and persistent mental
illnesses among adults; production of profiles to assist prescribers
and clinics in tracking their prescriptive practices and their
patients' medication use and adherence relative to evidence-based
practices guidelines, other prescribers, and patients at other clinics;
and in-service seminars at which participants can share and increase
their knowledge of evidence-based and other effective prescriptive
practices. The health care authority shall enter into an interagency
agreement with the office of the attorney general for expenditure of
$300,000 of the state's proceeds of the cy pres settlement in State of
Washington v. AstraZeneca (Seroquel) for this purpose.
(((22))) (21) $570,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation is provided solely for continued operation of the
partnership access line for child mental health consultations. The
health care authority shall enter into an interagency agreement with
the office of the attorney general for expenditure of $570,000 of the
state's proceeds of the cy pres settlement in State of Washington v.
AstraZeneca (Seroquel) for this purpose.
(((23))) (22) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $160,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to fund the Tacoma-Pierce county
health department for access and outreach activities to reduce infant
mortality.
(((24))) (23) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $150,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to assist with development and
implementation of evidence-based strategies regarding the appropriate,
safe, and effective role of C-section surgeries and early induced labor
in births and neonatal care. The strategies shall be identified and
implemented in consultation with clinical research specialists,
physicians, hospitals, advanced registered nurse practitioners, and
organizations concerned with maternal and child health.
(((25))) (24) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
health care authority shall continue to provide school-based medical
services by means of an intergovernmental transfer arrangement. Under
the arrangement, the state shall provide forty percent and school
districts sixty percent of the nonfederal matching funds required for
receipt of federal medicaid funding for the service.
(((26))) (25) $263,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $88,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $351,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and submission to the
federal government by October 1, 2011, of a demonstration project
proposal as provided in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5596 (medicaid
demonstration waiver).
(((27))) (26) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
health care authority shall provide spoken-language interpreter
services. The authority shall develop and implement a new model for
delivery of such services no later than July 1, 2012. The model shall
include:
(a) Development by the authority in consultation with subject-area
experts of guidelines to assist medical practitioners identify the
circumstances under which it is appropriate to use telephonic or video-remote interpreting;
(b) The requirement that the state contract with delivery
organizations, including foreign language agencies, who employ or
subcontract only with language access providers or interpreters working
in the state who are certified or authorized by the state. When a
state-certified or state-authorized in-state language access provider
or interpreter is not available, the delivery organization, including
foreign language agencies, may use a provider with other certifications
or qualifications deemed to meet state standards, including
interpreters in other states; and
(c) Provision of a secure, web-based tool that medical
practitioners will use to schedule appointments for interpreter
services and to identify the most appropriate, cost-effective method of
service delivery in accordance with the state guidelines.
Nothing in this subsection affects the ability of health care
providers to provide interpretive services through employed staff or
through telephone and video remote technologies when not reimbursed
directly by the department. The amounts in this subsection do not
include federal administrative funds provided to match nonstate
expenditures by local health jurisdictions and governmental hospitals.
(((28))) (27) In its procurement of contractors for delivery of
medical managed care services for nondisabled, nonelderly persons, the
medical assistance program shall (a) place substantial emphasis upon
price competition in the selection of successful bidders; and (b) not
require delivery of any services that would increase the actuarial cost
of service beyond the levels included in current healthy options
contracts.
(((29))) (28) $1,430,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012, $1,430,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and $2,860,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to pay
federally-designated rural health clinics their standard encounter rate
for prenatal and well-child visits, whether delivered under a managed
care contract or fee-for-service. In reconciling managed care
enhancement payments for calendar years 2009 and 2010, the department
shall treat well-child and prenatal care visits as encounters subject
to the clinic's encounter rate.
(((30))) (29) $280,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $282,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase utilization management of
drugs and drug classes for which there is evidence of over-utilization,
off-label use, excessive dosing, duplicative therapy, or opportunities
to shift utilization to less expensive, equally effective formulations.
(((31))) (30) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $140,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit
organization of a toll-free hotline that assists families to learn
about and enroll in the apple health for kids program.
(((32))) (31) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for the local outreach, case
management, and coordination with dental providers needed to execute
the access to baby and child dentistry program, which provides dental
care to Medicaid eligible children up to age six.
(((33))) (32) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
health care authority shall continue to provide dental services to
pregnant women. Services shall include preventive, routine, and
emergent dental care.
(((34))) (33) $395,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $395,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $790,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for continued operation of the
dental education in care of persons with disabilities (DECOD) program
at the University of Washington.
(((35))) (34) $159,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $302,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation, and $146,072,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the provider incentive program
and other initiatives related to the health information technology
Medicaid plan. The general fund--private/local appropriation in this
subsection shall be funded with proceeds from settlements in the case
of State of Washington vs. GlaxoSmithKline. The authority and the
office of the attorney general shall enter an interagency agreement
regarding use of these funds.
(((36))) (35) $2,926,000 of the general fund--local appropriation
and $2,928,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely to support medical airlift services.
(((37))) (36) The authority shall collect data on enrollment and
utilization to study whether the expansion of family planning coverage
under Substitute Senate Bill No. 5912 is reducing state medical
expenditures by reducing unwanted pregnancies. The authority shall
report its findings to the legislature by December 1, 2012.
(((38))) (37) $480,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $480,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $824,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for customer services staff. The
authority will attempt to improve the phone answer rate to 40 percent
and reduce the response times to written questions to ten days for
clients and 25 days for providers. The authority will report to the
legislature on its progress toward achieving these goals by January 1,
2012. If the authority has not achieved these goals by July 1, 2012,
then the authority shall reduce expenditures on management staff in
order to increase expenditures on customer service staff until the
goals are achieved.
(((39))) (38) The department shall purchase a brand name drug when
it determines that the cost of the brand name drug after rebates is
less than the cost of generic alternatives and that purchase of the
brand rather than generic version can save at least $250,000. The
department may purchase generic alternatives when changes in market
prices make the price of the brand name drug after rebates more
expensive than the generic alternatives.
(((41))) (39) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $1,964,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to implement
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2319 (affordable care act).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(((42))) (40) $1,109,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012, $1,471,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and $21,890,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement phase two
of the project to create a single provider payment system that
consolidates medicaid medical and social services payments and replaces
the social service payment system.
(((43))) (41) In order to achieve the twelve percent reduction in
emergency room expenditures in the fiscal year 2013 appropriations
provided in this section, the authority, in consultation with the
Washington state hospital association, the Washington state medical
association, and the Washington chapter of the American college of
emergency physicians shall designate best practices and performance
measures to reduce medically unnecessary emergency room visits of
medicaid clients. The Washington state hospital association, the
Washington state medical association, and the Washington chapter of the
American college of emergency physicians will work with the authority
to promote these best practices. The best practices and performance
measures shall consist of the following items:
(a) Adoption of a system to exchange patient information among
emergency room departments on a regional or statewide basis;
(b) Active dissemination of patient educational materials produced
by the Washington state hospital association, Washington state medical
association, and the Washington chapter of the American college of
emergency physicians that instruct patients on appropriate facilities
for nonemergent health care needs;
(c) Designation of hospital personnel and emergency room physician
personnel to receive and appropriately disseminate information on
clients participating in the medicaid patient review and coordination
program and to review monthly utilization reports on those clients
provided by the authority;
(d) A process to assist the authority's patient review and
coordination program clients with their care plans. The process must
include substantial efforts by hospitals to schedule an appointment
with the client's assigned primary care provider within seventy-two
hours of the client's medically unnecessary emergency room visit when
appropriate under the client's care plan;
(e) Implementation of narcotic guidelines that incorporate the
Washington chapter of the American college of emergency physician
guidelines;
(f) Physician enrollment in the state's prescription monitoring
program, as long as the program is funded; and
(g) Designation of a hospital emergency department physician
responsible for reviewing the state's medicaid utilization management
feedback reports, which will include defined performance measures. The
emergency department physician and hospital will have a process to take
appropriate action in response to the information in the feedback
reports if performance measures are not met. The authority must
develop feedback reports that include timely emergency room utilization
data such as visit rates, medically unnecessary visit rates (by
hospital and by client), emergency department imaging utilization
rates, and other measures as needed. The authority may utilize the
Robert Bree collaborative for assistance related to this best practice.
The requirements for best practices for a critical access hospital
should not include adoption of a system to exchange patient information
if doing so would pose a financial burden, and should not include
requirements related to the authority's patient review and coordination
program if the volume of those patients seen at the critical access
hospital are small.
Hospitals participating in this medicaid best practices program
shall submit to the authority a declaration from executive level
leadership indicating hospital adoption of and compliance with the best
practices enumerated above. In the declaration, hospitals will affirm
that they have in place written policies, procedures, or guidelines to
implement these best practices and are willing to share them upon
request. The declaration must also give consent for the authority to
disclose feedback reports and performance measures on its web site.
The authority shall submit a list of declaring hospitals to the
relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by July 15,
2012.
If the authority does not receive by July 1, 2012, declarations
from hospitals representing at least seventy-five percent of emergency
room visits by medicaid clients in fiscal year 2010, the authority may
implement a policy of nonpayment of medically unnecessary emergency
room visits, with appropriate client and clinical safeguards such as
exemptions and expedited prior authorization. The authority shall by
January 15, 2013, perform a preliminary fiscal analysis of trends in
implementing the best practices in this subsection, focusing on outlier
hospitals with high rates of unnecessary visits by medicaid clients,
high emergency room visit rates for patient review and coordination
clients, low rates of completion of treatment plans for patient review
and coordination clients assigned to the hospital, and high rates of
prescribed long-acting opiates. In cooperation with the leadership of
the hospital, medical, and emergency physician associations, additional
efforts shall be focused on assisting those outlier hospitals and
providers to achieve more substantial savings. The authority by
January 15, 2013, will report to the legislature about whether assumed
savings based on preliminary trend and forecasted data are on target
and if additional best practices or other actions need to be
implemented.
If necessary, pursuant to RCW 34.05.350(1)(c), the authority may
employ emergency rulemaking to achieve the reductions assumed in the
appropriations under this section.
Nothing in this subsection shall in any way impact the authority's
ability to adopt and implement policies pertaining to the patient
review and coordination program.
(((46))) (42) The ((department)) authority shall seek a medicaid
state plan amendment to create a ((graduate medical education))
professional services supplemental payment managed care program for
professional services delivered to managed care recipients by
University of Washington medicine and other public professional
providers. This program shall be effective as soon as administratively
possible and shall operate concurrently with the existing professional
services supplemental payment program. ((Providers that participate in
the graduate medical education supplemental payment program are not
eligible to participate in the professional services supplemental
payment program.)) The ((department)) authority shall apply federal
rules for identifying the difference between ((current physician
encounter)) average commercial rates and fee-for-service medicaid
payments ((to participating providers and the applicable federal upper
payment limit)). This difference will be multiplied by the number of
managed care encounters and incorporated into the managed care plan
capitation rates by a certified actuary. The managed care plans will
pay the providers the difference attributable to the increased
capitation rate. Participating providers shall be solely responsible
for providing the local funds required to obtain federal matching
funds. Any incremental costs incurred by the ((department)) authority
in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this program
shall be the responsibility of the participating providers.
Participating providers shall retain the full amount of supplemental
payments provided under this program, net of any costs related to the
program that are disallowed due to audits or litigation against the
state.
(((47))) (43) The authority shall exclude antiretroviral drugs used
to treat HIV/AIDS, anticancer medication that is used to kill or slow
the growth of cancerous cells, antihemophilic drugs, insulin and other
drugs to lower blood glucose, and immunosuppressive drugs from any
formulary limitations implemented to operate within the appropriations
provided in this section.
(((48))) (44) If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5978
(medicaid fraud) is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amounts
appropriated in this section from the medicaid fraud penalty account--state appropriation shall lapse and an additional $3,608,000 shall be
appropriated from the general fund--state for fiscal year 2013 for
medicaid services, fraud detection and prevention activities, recovery
of improper payments, and for other medicaid fraud enforcement
activities.
(((50))) (45) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
health care authority and the department of social and health services
shall implement the state option to provide health homes for enrollees
with chronic conditions under section 2703 of the federal affordable
care act. The total state match for enrollees who are dually-eligible
for both medicare and medicaid and not enrolled in managed care shall
be no more than the net savings to the state from the enhanced match
rate for its medicaid-only managed care enrollees under section 2703.
(((51))) (46) The health care authority shall not initiate any
services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless
expressly authorized in this act or other law. The health care
authority may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the
federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the
program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the health
care authority receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys,
those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in
any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal
amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the
lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial
management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in
this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants
and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on
specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state
funds.
(((52))) (47) $66,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 and $66,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2536 (children services/delivery). The department of social and
health services' programs responsible for administration of mental
health, child welfare, and juvenile justice programs will coordinate
with the health care authority on the development of contract terms
which facilitate efforts to meet requirements of the bill. If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((53))) (48) The health care authority shall participate in the
work group established by the department of corrections in section
220(2) of this act to review release options for elderly and infirm
offenders.
(49) $208,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 and $728,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the rebasing of outpatient and inpatient payment
methods.

Sec. 1214 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,589,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,147,000))
$14,549,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $456,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,048,000))
$3,895,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,597,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,445,000))
$42,694,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, are provided to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency
of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW
9A.44.130.
(2) $321,000 of the general fund--local appropriation is provided
solely to purchase ammunition for the basic law enforcement academy.
Jurisdictions shall reimburse to the criminal justice training
commission the costs of ammunition, based on the average cost of
ammunition per cadet, for cadets that they enroll in the basic law
enforcement academy.
(3) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic
law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a school safety program. The
commission, in collaboration with the school safety center advisory
committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school
administrators and school safety personnel hired after the effective
date of this section.
(5) $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the school safety center
within the commission. The safety center shall act as an information
dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a school
district in Washington or in another state, coordinate activities
relating to school safety, and review and approve manuals and curricula
used for school safety models and training. Through an interagency
agreement, the commission shall provide funding for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to continue to develop and
maintain a school safety information web site. The school safety
center advisory committee shall develop and revise the training
program, using the best practices in school safety, for all school
safety personnel. The commission shall provide research-related
programs in school safety and security issues beneficial to both law
enforcement and schools.
(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for grants to counties enforcing
illegal drug laws and which have been underserved by federally funded
state narcotics task forces. The Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys,
and the Washington association of county officials shall jointly
develop funding allocations for the offices of the county sheriff,
county prosecutor, and county clerk in qualifying counties. The
commission shall not impose an administrative cost on this program.

Sec. 1215 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,829,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,801,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,640,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,002,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,964,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,348,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,722,000))
$5,172,000
Veterans Innovations Program Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $810,000
Veteran Estate Management Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,079,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,925,000))
$20,375,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $821,000 of the veterans innovations
program account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
department to continue support for returning combat veterans through
the veterans innovation program, including emergency financial
assistance through the defenders' fund and long-term financial
assistance through the competitive grant program.

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,743,000

General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,437,000))
$60,019,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,506,000))
$30,569,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($92,686,000))
$92,331,000

Sec. 1216 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,404,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($78,114,000))
$77,589,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($553,078,000))
$573,078,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($148,055,000))
$144,055,000
Hospital Data Collection Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $214,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,085,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $604,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,300,000))
$10,523,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,464,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,965,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,528,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
Site Closure Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,000
Biotoxin Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,167,000))
$1,231,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,628,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,311,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,512,000))
$1,348,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $298,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,598,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $295,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,729,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,013,804,000))
$1,027,402,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the
state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules
pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules
and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and
the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through
the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek,
receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal
moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does
not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of
amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that
provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(2) In accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.135.055, the department
is authorized to establish and raise fees in fiscal year 2012 as
necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the
appropriation levels in this section. This authorization applies to
fees required for: The review of health care facility construction;
review of health facility requests for certificate of need; the
regulation and inspection of farm worker housing, hospital licensing,
in-home health service agencies, and producers of radioactive waste;
the regulation and inspection of shellfish sanitary control, surgical
facility licensing, and; fees associated with the following
professions: Dieticians and nutritionists, occupational therapists,
pharmacy, veterinarian, orthotics and prosthetics, surgical
technicians, nursing home administrators, health care assistants,
hearing and speech, psychology, hypnotherapy, chiropractic, social
workers, physicians, and physician assistants.
(3) Pursuant to RCW 18.130.250, the department is authorized to
establish a lower cost fee category for retired licensed practical
nurses and registered nurses.
(4) In accordance with RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized
to adopt fees set forth in and previously authorized in chapter 92,
Laws of 2010.
(5) $1,969,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement online licensing for
health care providers. The department must submit a detailed
investment plan for this project to the office of financial management.
The office of financial management must review and approve this plan
before funding may be expended. The department of health must
successfully implement online application and renewal for at least one
profession as a pilot project before pursuing additional professions.
The department must report to the office of financial management on the
outcome of the pilot project.
(6) $16,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1181 (board
of naturopathy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $21,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1304 (health care assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $54,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1353
(pharmacy technicians). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $142,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5020 (social workers). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $336,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill
No. 5480 (physicians and physician assistants). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(11) $46,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5071 (online access for midwives and marriage and family therapists).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $137,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1133 (massage practitioner license). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(13) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for the developmental disabilities council
to contract for a family-to-family mentor program to provide
information and support to families and guardians of persons who are
transitioning out of residential habilitation centers. To the maximum
extent allowable under federal law, these funds shall be matched under
medicaid through the department of social and health services and
federal funds shall be transferred to the department for the purposes
stated in this subsection. If Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5459
(people with developmental disabilities) is not enacted by June 30,
2011, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $58,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure and
regulatory program to offset a reduction in revenue from fees. There
shall be no change to the current annual fees for new or renewed
licenses for the midwifery program, except from online access to HEAL-WA. The department shall convene the midwifery advisory committee on
a quarterly basis to address issues related to licensed midwifery.
(15) $118,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $118,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for prevention of youth suicides.
(16) $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the senior falls prevention
program.
(17) $19,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6290 (military
spouses and partners). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $102,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6237 (career pathway/medical assistants).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $21,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
6328 (mental health professionals). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(20) $61,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6103 (reflexologists). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(21) $28,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5620 (dental anesthesia assistants). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(22) Appropriations for fiscal year 2013 include funding for
consolidation of the department of ecology's low-level radioactive
waste site use permit program in the department of health.
(23) During the remainder of the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, each
person subject to RCW 43.70.110(3)(c) is required to pay only one
surcharge of up to twenty-five dollars annually for the purposes of RCW
43.70.112, regardless of how many professional licenses the person
holds.
(24) $15,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2056
(assisted living facilities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(25) $11,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement Engrossed House Bill No. 2186 (licensed
midwives). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(26) $11,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 2229 (hospital employees). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(27) $48,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2314 (long-term care workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(28) $280,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 2366 (suicide assessment and training). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(29) $11,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 2582 (health care services billing). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(30) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No.
6105 (prescription monitoring program). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(31) $30,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 2473 (medication assistant endorsement). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(32) General fund--state appropriations for fiscal year 2013
includes funding to subsidize operating license and inspection fees in
the temporary worker housing program. In implementing this subsidy,
the department shall evaluate program regulations including but not
limited to the use of occupancy levels to determine the fee structure
and the frequency of inspections.

Sec. 1217 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
The appropriations to the department of corrections in this act
shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this
section. However, after May 1, ((2012)) 2013, after approval by the
director of financial management and unless specifically prohibited by
this act, the department may transfer general fund--state
appropriations for fiscal year ((2012)) 2013 between programs. The
department shall not transfer funds, and the director of financial
management shall not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is
consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent
possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of financial
management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate
and house of representatives in writing seven days prior to approving
any deviations from appropriation levels. The written notification
shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes,
along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and
appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or
transfers.

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,025,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,981,000))
$52,706,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,006,000))
$104,731,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $35,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the
support of a statewide council on mentally ill offenders that includes
as its members representatives of community-based mental health
treatment programs, current or former judicial officers, and directors
and commanders of city and county jails and state prison facilities.
The council will investigate and promote cost-effective approaches to
meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental
disorders who have a history of offending or who are at-risk of
offending, including their mental health, physiological, housing,
employment, and job training needs.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $598,237,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($575,457,000))
$581,723,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,324,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,079,000))
$13,177,000
Enhanced 911 Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,193,097,000))
$1,198,461,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) During the 2011-13 biennium, when contracts are established or
renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to
inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors
primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged
to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and
(ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department
to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient
revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account.
(b) The Harborview medical center and the University of Washington
medical center shall provide inpatient and outpatient hospital services
to offenders confined in department of corrections facilities at a rate
no greater than the average rate that the department has negotiated
with other community hospitals in Washington state.
(c) $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1290
(health care employee overtime). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2011, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(d) $32,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $33,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 1718 (offenders with developmental disabilities). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(e) The department of corrections shall contract with local and
tribal governments for the provision of jail capacity to house
offenders. A contract shall not have a cost of incarceration in excess
of $85 per day per offender. A contract shall not have a year-to-year
increase in excess of three percent per year. The contracts may
include rates for the medical care of offenders which exceed the daily
cost of incarceration and the limitation on year-to-year increase,
provided that medical payments conform to the department's offender
health plan, pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are
preapproved by department utilization management staff.
(f) $311,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2346
(correctional officer uniforms). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(g) $41,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $165,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the department to maintain the
facility, property, and assets at the institution formerly known as the
maple lane school in Rochester. The department may not house
incarcerated offenders at the maple lane site until specifically
directed by the legislature. By November 1, 2012, the department shall
report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and the senate with a plan for the future use of the
facility.
(h) By December 1, 2012, the department shall provide to the
legislative fiscal committees a report that evaluates health care
expenditures in Washington state correctional institutions and makes
recommendations for controlling health care costs. The report shall
evaluate the source of health care costs, including offender health
issues, use of pharmaceuticals, offsite and specialist medical care,
chronic disease costs, and mental health issues. The department may
include information from other states on cost control in offender
health care, trends in offender health care that indicate potential
cost increases, and management of high-cost diagnoses.
(i) The department shall convene a work group to develop health
care cost containment strategies at local jail facilities. The work
group shall identify cost containment strategies in place at the
department and at local jail facilities, identify the costs and
benefits of implementing strategies in jail health-care facilities, and
make recommendations on implementing beneficial strategies. The work
group shall submit a report on its findings and recommendations to the
fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2013. The work
group shall include jail administrators, representatives from health
care facilities at the local jail level and the state prisons level,
and other representatives as deemed necessary.
(j) The department of corrections, with participation of the health
care authority and the department of social and health services, aging
and adult services administration, shall establish a work group to
analyze and review release options for elderly and infirm offenders and
submit recommendations to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature with release options for these populations no later
than December 1, 2012. In making its recommendations, the work group
shall identify:
(i) The most expensive medical conditions for which the department
has had to treat its offenders and the offenders receiving the most
costly ongoing medical treatments;
(ii) For identified populations, the age, level of disability, cost
of care while incarcerated, safety issues related to release, ease of
placement, and time served in relation to the offender's sentence;
(iii) Potential cost savings to the state that may be generated by
the early release of elderly and infirm offenders;
(iv) Housing options to expedite the release of aging and infirm
offenders while maintaining the safety of housing providers, other
housing residents, and the general public; and
(v) Optimal procedures for reviewing offenders on a case-by-case
basis to ensure that the interests of justice and public safety are
considered in any early release decision.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $127,121,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($128,494,000))
$126,033,000
Federal Narcotics Forfeiture Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $372,000
Controlled Substances Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($256,019,000))
$253,558,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $875,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 5891 (criminal justice cost savings). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(b) (($6,362,000)) $3,753,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 is provided solely to implement an
evidence-based risk-needs-responsivity model for community supervision
of offenders.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,513,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,431,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,944,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $66,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 is provided solely for transfer to
the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts provided
only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and technical
assistance associated with advising cities and counties in developing,
promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient offender
work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,821,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,264,000))
$27,539,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,085,000))
$63,360,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state prison institutions may use funds appropriated in
this subsection to rent uniforms from correctional industries in
accordance with existing legislative mandates.
(b) The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated
in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital or
other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do
so.
(c) The department shall reduce payments to the department of
information services or its successor by $213,000 in fiscal year 2012
and by $1,150,000 in fiscal year 2013. The reduction in payment shall
be related to the elimination of the offender base tracking system,
including moving remaining portions of the offender base tracking
system into the offender management network information system.

Sec. 1218 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,159,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,131,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,239,000))
$19,739,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,000))
$105,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,559,000))
$24,134,000

Sec. 1219 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT

General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $267,069,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,856,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($349,247,000))
$356,767,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,940,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,609,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($704,721,000))
$712,241,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $39,666,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is from amounts made available to the
state by section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed
act). This amount is provided solely for continuing current
unemployment insurance functions and department services to employers
and job seekers.
(2) $35,584,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is from amounts made available to the
state by section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed
act). This amount is provided solely for the replacement of the
unemployment insurance tax information system for the employment
security department. The employment security department shall support
the department of revenue and department of labor and industries to
develop a common vision to ensure technological compatibility between
the three agencies to facilitate a coordinated business tax system for
the future that improves services to business customers. The amounts
provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department
satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight
standards and policies established by the office of the chief
information officer created in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
5931 (information technology management).
(3) $25,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is from amounts made available to the
state by section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed
act). This amount is provided solely for implementation of system
changes to the unemployment insurance tax information system required
under chapter 4, Laws of 2011 (unemployment insurance program).
(4) $1,459,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is from amounts available to the state
by section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is provided solely for implementation of chapter 4, Laws of
2011 (unemployment insurance program).
(5) $80,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided solely for costs associated
with the initial review and evaluation of the training benefits program
as directed in section 15(2), chapter 4, Laws of 2011 (unemployment
insurance program). The initial review shall be developed by the joint
legislative audit and review committee. This appropriation is provided
from funds made available to the state by section 903 (d), (f), and (g)
of the social security act (Reed act).

(End of part)

PART XIII
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 1301 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,955,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,379,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,905,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,759,000))
$2,034,000
ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $224,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,844,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,363,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,505,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($141,234,000))
$141,509,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $8,876,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $8,300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $4,000,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement
account--state appropriation are provided solely to operate and
maintain state parks as the commission implements a new fee structure.
The goal of this structure is to make the parks system self-supporting.
By August 1, 2012, state parks must submit a report to the office of
financial management detailing its progress toward this goal and
outlining any additional statutory changes needed for successful
implementation.
(2) $79,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $79,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(3) $44,528,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5622 (state land recreation access). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) Prior to closing any state park, the commission must notify all
affected local governments and relevant nonprofit organizations of the
intended closure and provide an opportunity for the notified local
governments and nonprofit organizations to elect to acquire, or enter
into, a maintenance and operating contract with the commission that
would allow the park to remain open.
(5) The state parks and recreation commission, in cooperation with
the Fort Worden lifelong learning center public development authority
authorized under RCW 35.21.730 shall provide a report to the governor
and appropriate committees of the legislature no later than October 15,
2012, to create a lifelong learning center at Fort Worden state park.
This plan shall support and be based upon the Fort Worden state park
long-range plan adopted by the state parks and recreation commission in
September 2008. The report shall include a business and governance
plan and supporting materials that provide options and recommendations
on the long-term governance of Fort Worden state park, including
building maintenance and restoration. While the commission may
transfer full or partial operations to the public development authority
the state shall retain title to the property. The state parks and
recreation commission and the public development authority will agree
on the scope and content of the report including the business and
governance plan. In preparing this report the state parks and
recreation commission and the public development authority shall
provide ample opportunity for the public and stakeholders to
participate in the development of the business and governance plan.
The state parks and recreation commission shall review the report and
if it is consistent with the 2008 Fort Worden state park long-range
plan shall take action on a long-term governance and business plan no
later than December 31, 2012.
(6) Within the appropriations contained in this section, the
commission shall review the removal of trees from Brooks memorial state
park that have been killed or damaged by fire in order to determine the
recovery value from the sale of any timber that is surplus to the needs
of the park. The commission shall remove such trees, if the commission
determines that the recovery value from the sale of any timber is at
least cost neutral and the removal is in a manner consistent with RCW
79A.05.035.

Sec. 1302 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,098,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,618,000))
$26,417,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,481,000))
$105,725,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($56,923,000))
$57,107,000
ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $391,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,113,000))
$12,125,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,794,000))
$2,809,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,841,000))
$2,842,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $849,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $848,000
State Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,742,000))
$95,241,000
Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,382,000
Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,415,000
Wildlife Rehabilitation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $259,000
Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid Recovery
Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,001,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $883,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $919,000
Recreation Resources Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000

Hydraulic Project Approval Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $337,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($357,900,000))
$355,652,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $294,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(2) $355,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $355,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the department to continue a
pilot project with the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation
to develop expanded recreational fishing opportunities on Lake Rufus
Woods and its northern shoreline and to conduct joint enforcement of
lake fisheries on Lake Rufus Woods and adjoining waters, pursuant to
state and tribal intergovernmental agreements developed under the
Columbia River water supply program. For the purposes of the pilot
project:
(a) A fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the Colville
Tribes shall satisfy the license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on the
waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(b) The Colville Tribes have agreed to provide to holders of its
nontribal member fishing permits a means to demonstrate that fish in
their possession were lawfully taken in Lake Rufus Woods;
(c) A Colville tribal member identification card shall satisfy the
license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods;
(d) The department and the Colville Tribes shall jointly designate
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods for the purposes
of enhancing access to the recreational fisheries on the lake; and
(e) The Colville Tribes have agreed to recognize a fishing license
issued under RCW 77.32.470 or RCW 77.32.490 as satisfying the nontribal
member fishing permit requirements of Colville tribal law on the
reservation portion of the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and at designated
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(3) Prior to submitting its 2013-2015 biennial operating and
capital budget request related to state fish hatcheries to the office
of financial management, the department shall contract with the
hatchery scientific review group (HSRG) to review this request. This
review shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent
with HSRG recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the
requests based on their contributions to protecting wild salmonid
stocks and meeting the recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate
whether the proposed requests are being made in the most cost effective
manner. The department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the
office of financial management with their agency budget proposal.
(4) $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
army corps of engineers.
(5) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for removal of derelict gear in
Washington waters.
(6) $100,000 of the eastern Washington pheasant enhancement
account -- state appropriation is provided solely for the department to
support efforts to enhance permanent and temporary pheasant habitat on
public and private lands in Grant, Franklin, and Adams counties. The
department may support efforts by entities including conservation
districts, nonprofit organizations, and landowners, and must require
such entities to provide significant nonstate matching resources, which
may be in the form of funds, material, or labor.
(7) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall identify additional opportunities for partnerships in order to
keep fish hatcheries operational. Such partnerships shall aim to
maintain fish production and salmon recovery with less reliance on
state operating funds.
(8) By September 1, 2011, the department shall update its
interagency agreement dated September 30, 2010, with the department of
natural resources concerning land management services on the department
of fish and wildlife's wildlife conservation and recreation lands. The
update shall include rates and terms for services.
(9) Prior to opening game management unit 490 to public hunting,
the department shall complete an environmental impact statement that
includes an assessment of how public hunting activities will impact the
ongoing protection of the public water supply.
(10) $18,514,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5385 (state wildlife account). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $9,418,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5622 (state land recreation access). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) $50,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for mitigation, claims, and assessment costs for injury
or loss of livestock caused by wolves, black bears, and cougars.
(13) $552,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for increased law enforcement capacity
to reduce the occurrence of geoduck poaching and illegal harvest
activities. With these additional funds, the department shall deploy
two new fish and wildlife officers and one detective within Puget Sound
to address on-the-water and marketplace geoduck harvest compliance.
(14) $337,000 of the hydraulic project approval--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6406 (state natural resources).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1303 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,907,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,791,000))
$67,782,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,873,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,372,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,254,000))
$44,116,000
ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,373,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,118,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,131,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,467,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Forest and Fish Support Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,784,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $838,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $540,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $635,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,761,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,848,000
Forest Practices Application Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $780,000
Marine Resources Stewardship Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($262,782,000))
$296,608,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $710,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $915,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural
college trust management account and are provided solely to manage
approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.
(2) $8,030,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, (($10,037,000)) $42,028,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and $5,000,000 of the disaster
response account -- state appropriation are provided solely for emergency
fire suppression. None of the general fund and disaster response
account amounts provided in this subsection may be used to fund agency
indirect and administrative expenses. Agency indirect and
administrative costs shall be allocated among the agency's remaining
accounts and appropriations. The department of natural resources shall
submit a quarterly report to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and
planned expenditures from the disaster response account. This work
shall be done in coordination with the military department.
(3) $4,500,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based, performance
contracts with tribes to participate in the implementation of the
forest practices program. Contracts awarded in fiscal year 2013 may
only contain indirect costs set at or below the rate in the contracting
tribe's indirect cost agreement with the federal government. If
federal funding for this purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $518,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based performance
contracts with nongovernmental organizations to participate in the
implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded in
fiscal year 2013 may only contain indirect cost set at or below a rate
of eighteen percent.
(5) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, $717,000 of the forest
and fish support account--state appropriation is provided solely to
fund interagency agreements with the department of ecology and the
department of fish and wildlife as part of the adaptive management
process.
(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation and
$1,000,000 of the forest and fish support account--state appropriation
are provided solely for continuing scientific studies already underway
as part of the adaptive management process. Funds may not be used to
initiate new studies unless the department secures new federal funding
for the adaptive management process.
(7) The department is authorized to increase the silviculture
burning permit fee in the 2011-2013 biennium by up to eighty dollars
plus fifty cents per ton for each ton of material burned in excess of
one hundred tons.
(8) $440,000 of the state general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $440,000 of the state general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for forest work
crews that support correctional camps and are contingent upon
continuing operations of Naselle youth camp.
(9) By September 1, 2011, the department shall update its
interagency agreement dated September 30, 2010, with the department of
fish and wildlife concerning land management services on the department
of fish and wildlife's wildlife conservation and recreation lands. The
update shall include rates and terms for services.
(10) In partnership with the department of ecology, the departments
shall deliver a report to the governor, the appropriate committees of
the legislature, and the forest practices board by September 1, 2012,
documenting forest practices adaptive management program reforms
implemented, or recommended, that streamline existing processes to
increase program efficiencies and effectiveness. The departments shall
collaborate with interested adaptive management program participants in
the development of the report.
(11)(a) $2,100,000 of the marine resources stewardship account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 252, Laws of 2012 (marine management planning) and 43.372 RCW.
The department will work with the marine interagency team, tribes, and
the Washington state marine resource committee to develop a spending
plan consistent with the priorities in chapter 252, Laws of 2012, for
conducting ecosystem assessments and mapping activities related to
marine resources use and potential economic development, developing
marine management plans for the state's coastal waters, and otherwise
aiding in the implementation of marine planning in the state. As
appropriate, the team shall develop a competitive process for projects
to be funded by the department in fiscal year 2013.
(b) The department, in consultation with the marine interagency
team, shall submit to the office of financial management and the
appropriate legislative committees by September 1, 2012, a prioritized
list of projects and activities for funding consideration through the
marine resources stewardship account in the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.
(((13))) (12) $780,000 of the forest practices application
account--state appropriation, $18,000 of the forest development
account--state appropriation, $23,000 of the resources management cost
account--state appropriation, and $2,000 of the surface mining
reclamation account--state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6406
(state natural resources). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2012, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART XIV
TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 1401 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,395,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,323,000))
$41,947,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,081,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,021,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,537,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,207,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,286,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,002,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,386,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $505,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,067,000
Vehicle License Fraud Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $437,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($125,432,000))
$135,056,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the fire service training account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the
state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12
construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the
state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide
these services only to those districts that are located in counties
without qualified review capabilities.
(2) $8,000,000 of the disaster response account--state
appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service
resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or
disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 and 43.43.964. The state
patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information
on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall
be done in coordination with the military department.
(3) $400,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship
training program.
(4) In accordance with RCW 43.43.742 the state patrol is authorized
to increase the following fees in fiscal year ((2012)) 2013 as
necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the
appropriation levels in this section: Notary service fee.
(5) $59,000 of the fingerprint identification account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1776 (child care center licensing). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(6) $6,000 of the fingerprint identification account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1494 (vulnerable adult referrals). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) $1,000 of the fingerprint identification account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate
Bill No. 6296 (background checks). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART XV
EDUCATION
Sec. 1501 2013 c 147 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,322,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,133,000))
$27,793,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($77,011,000))
$82,011,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($133,466,000))
$139,126,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A maximum of $16,056,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and (($14,875,000)) $15,526,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 is for state
agency operations.
(a) $9,692,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and (($8,169,000)) $8,160,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the
operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(i) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(a), the
superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of
four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the
civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans
civic education award.
(ii) By January 1, 2012, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall issue a report to the legislature with a timeline and
an estimate of costs for implementation of the common core standards.
The report must incorporate feedback from an open public forum for
recommendations to enhance the standards, particularly in math.
(iii) Within the amounts provided, and in consultation with the
public school employees of Washington and the Washington school
counselors' association, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop a model policy that further defines the
recommended roles and responsibilities of graduation coaches and
identifies best practices for how graduation coaches work in
coordination with school counselors and in the context of a
comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
(iv) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall,
no later than August 1, 2011, establish a standard statewide definition
of unexcused absence. The definition shall be reported to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives for
legislative review in the 2012 legislative session. Beginning no later
than January 1, 2012, districts shall report to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, daily student unexcused absence
data by school.
(b) $1,964,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,017,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for activities associated with the
implementation of new school finance systems required by chapter 236,
Laws of 2010 (K-12 education funding) and chapter 548, Laws of 2009
(state's education system), including technical staff, systems
reprogramming, and workgroup deliberations, including the quality
education council and the data governance working group.
(c)(i) $851,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $851,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities.
(ii) $171,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely to the state board of education for
implementation of Initiative Measure No. 1240 (charter schools).
(d) $1,744,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,387,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to the professional educator
standards board for the following:
(i) $1,050,000 in fiscal year 2012 and $1,050,000 in fiscal year
2013 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional
educator standards board;
(ii) $694,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $312,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are for conditional scholarship loans and mentor
stipends provided through the alternative routes to certification
program administered by the professional educator standards board,
including the pipeline for paraeducators program and the retooling to
teach conditional loan programs. Funding within this subsection
(1)(d)(ii) is also provided for the recruiting Washington teachers
program. Funding reductions in this subsection (1)(d)(ii) in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium are intended to be one-time; and
(iii) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the professional educator standards
board to develop educator interpreter standards and identify
interpreter assessments that are available to school districts.
Interpreter assessments should meet the following criteria: (A)
Include both written assessment and performance assessment; (B) be
offered by a national organization of professional sign language
interpreters and transliterators; and (C) be designed to assess
performance in more than one sign system or sign language. The board
shall establish a performance standard, defining what constitutes a
minimum assessment result, for each educational interpreter assessment
identified. The board shall publicize the standards and assessments
for school district use.
(e) $133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil
rights.
(f) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the ongoing work of the
education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.
(g) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on educational
opportunity for military children).
(h) $159,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
185, Laws of 2011 (bullying prevention), which requires the office of
the superintendent of public instruction to convene an ongoing
workgroup on school bullying and harassment prevention. Within the
amounts provided, $140,000 is for youth suicide prevention activities.
(i) $1,227,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,227,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive
data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including
development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and
research system (CEDARS).
(j) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for project citizen, a program
sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and the
center for civic education to promote participation in government by
middle school students.
(k) $166,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 192,
Laws of 2011 (school district insolvency). Funding is provided to
develop a clear legal framework and process for dissolution of a school
district.
(l) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2799
(collaborative schools). If such legislation is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(m) $128,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 2254
(foster care outcomes). The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall report on the implementation of the state's plan of
cross-system collaboration to promote educational stability and improve
education outcomes of foster youth. The first report is due December
1, 2012, and annually thereafter through 2015. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(n) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2337
(open K-12 education resources). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(o) $239,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of Initiative Measure
No. 1240 (charter schools).
(p) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for allocation to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to provide financial assistance to
nonhigh school districts that are experiencing budgetary shortfalls due
to a significant financial condition, including, but not limited to:
Declining total enrollment; increased enrollment of students with
special education needs; and debts owed to school districts serving the
nonhigh school district's high school aged students. The financial
assistance shall be in the form of a loan. The loan agreement shall:
(i) Include conditions, binding on the school district, designed to
improve the district's financial condition;
(ii) Include a repayment schedule of no more than five years in
length; and
(iii) Prohibit districts that receive loans under this subsection
from using cash basis accounting.
(2) $9,267,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $12,267,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are for statewide programs.

(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) $2,541,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,541,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a corps of nurses located at
educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of
public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to
provide direct care to students, health education, and training for
school staff.
(ii) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a nonviolence and leadership
training program provided by the institute for community leadership.

(b) TECHNOLOGY
$1,221,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2012 and $1,221,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network
technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and
avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and
video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be
used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the
network.

(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers
scholarship program. The funds shall be used to support community
involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer
mentors with students selected as achievers scholars.
(ii) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for contracting with a college
scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach to
students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound
scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007.
(iii) $2,808,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $2,808,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the
dissemination of the navigation 101 curriculum to all districts. The
funding shall support electronic student planning tools and software
for analyzing the impact of navigation 101 on student performance, as
well as grants to a maximum of one hundred school districts each year,
based on progress and need for the implementation of the navigation 101
program. The implementation grants shall be awarded to a cross-section
of school districts reflecting a balance of geographic and demographic
characteristics. Within the amounts provided, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction will create a navigation 101
accountability model to analyze the impact of the program.
(iv) $337,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $337,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for implementation of the building
bridges statewide program for comprehensive dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement strategies.
(v) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for dropout prevention programs at
the office of the superintendent of public instruction, including the
jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program.
(vi) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
340, Laws of 2011 (assessment of students in state-funded full-day
kindergarten classrooms), including the development and implementation
of the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills (WaKIDS).
Of the amounts in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the fiscal year 2013
appropriation is for the implementation of House Bill No. 2586
(kindergarten inventory). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012,
this amount shall lapse.
(vii) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for an urban school turnaround
initiative as follows:
(A) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
select two schools in the largest urban school district in the state.
The selected schools shall be among the state's lowest-performing
schools; be located within the same community and form a continuum of
education for the students in that community; have significant
educational achievement gaps; and include a mix of elementary, middle,
or high schools.
(B) The office shall allocate the funds under this subsection
(2)(c)(vii) to the school district to be used exclusively in the
selected schools. The district may not charge an overhead or indirect
fee for the allocated funds or supplant other state, federal, or local
funds in the selected schools. The school district shall use the funds
for intensive supplemental instruction, services, and materials in the
selected schools, including but not limited to professional development
for school staff; updated curriculum, materials, and technology;
extended learning opportunities for students; reduced class size;
summer enrichment activities; school-based health clinics; and other
research-based initiatives to dramatically turn around the performance
and close the achievement gap in the schools. The office shall enter
into an expenditure agreement with the school district under which any
funds under this subsection (2)(c)(vii) remaining unspent on August 31,
2015, shall be returned to the state. Priorities for the expenditure
of the funds shall be determined by the leadership and staff of each
school.
(C) The office shall monitor the activities in the selected schools
and the expenditure of funds to ensure the intent of this subsection
(2)(c)(vii) is met, and submit a report to the legislature by December
1, 2013, including outcomes resulting from the urban school turnaround
initiative. The report submitted to the legislature must include a
comparison of student learning achievement in the selected schools with
schools of comparable demographics that have not participated in the
grant program.
(D) Funding provided in this subsection (2)(c)(vii) is intended to
be one-time.
(viii) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely to subsidize advanced placement exam fees
and international baccalaureate class fees and exam fees for low-income
students. To be eligible for the subsidy, a student must be either
enrolled or eligible to participate in the federal free or reduced
price lunch program, and the student must have maximized the allowable
federal contribution. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall set the subsidy in an amount so that the advanced
placement exam fee does not exceed $15.00 and the combined class and
exam fee for the international baccalaureate does not exceed $14.50.

Sec. 1502 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,241,233,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,170,854,000))
$5,139,496,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,327,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,434,414,000))
$10,403,056,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such
funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal
year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(b) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as
provided in the funding formulas and salary schedules in sections 502
and 503 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.
(c) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as
provided in sections 502 and 504, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as amended
through sections 1402 and 1403 of this act.
(d) The appropriations in this section include federal funds
provided through section 101 of P.L. No. 111-226 (education jobs fund),
which shall be used to support general apportionment program funding.
In distributing general apportionment allocations under this section
for the 2011-12 school year, the superintendent shall include the
additional amount of $3,327,000 allocated by the United States
department of education on September 16, 2011, provided through 101 of
P.L. No. 111-226 (education jobs fund) as part of each district's
general apportionment allocation.
(e) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in
September and on the first school day of each month October through
June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. Any school district concluding its basic education
program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held
in May in lieu of a June enrollment.

(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS
Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the
2011-12 and 2012-13 school years are determined using formula-generated
staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.
(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW
28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size
allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as
provided in RCW 28A.150.260. The superintendent shall make allocations
to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time
equivalent student enrollment in each grade.
(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in
this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW
28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education,
except as otherwise provided in this section.
(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of
prototypical school on the following regular education average class
size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided
in (c)(ii) of this subsection:

General education class size:

Grade RCW 28A.150.260

Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23

Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53

Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for career and technical
education (CTE) and skill center programs average class size as
provided in RCW 28A.150.260.
(ii) For each level of prototypical school at which more than fifty
percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals
in the prior school year, the superintendent shall allocate funding
based on the following average class size of full-time equivalent
students per teacher:

General education class size in high poverty
school:

Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 24.10

Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53

Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(iii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher
planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is
13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and
(iv) Laboratory science, advanced placement, and international
baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as
general education schools in the same grade; and
(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social
workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated
based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and is
considered certificated instructional staff, except as provided in
(d)(ii) of this subsection.
(ii) Students in approved career and technical education and skill
center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to
provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social
workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following
combined rate per 1000 students:

Career and Technical Education
students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.02 per 1000 student FTE's
Skill Center students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.36 per 1000 student FTE's

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS
(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated
administrative staff salaries for the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years
for general education students are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and adjusted based
on a district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment
in each grade.
(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill
center programs generate certificated school building-level
administrator staff units at per student rates that exceed the general
education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following percentages:

Career and Technical Education students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.5 percent
Skill Center students . . . . . . . . . . . . 19.75 percent

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS
Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2011-12 and 2012-13
school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units
provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and adjusted based on each district's
annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS
In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated
in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and
administrative staff units are provided for the 2011-12 and 2012-13
school year for the central office administrative costs of operating a
school district, at the following rates:
(a) The total central office staff units provided in this
subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of
eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and
classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support
services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b), by 5.3 percent.
(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this
subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as
generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.47 percent shall be
allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3)
of this section.
(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of
basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and
staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students,
are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in
(a) of this subsection.
(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center
programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same
staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education
students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office
administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student
rates that exceed the general education rate established for students
in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 3.69 percent for career and
technical education students, and 21.92 percent for skill center
students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS
Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 16.33
percent in the 2011-12 school year and 16.34 percent in the 2012-13
school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 18.73
percent in the 2011-12 school year and 18.73 percent in the 2012-13
school year for classified salary allocations provided under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS
Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504 of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in
subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections
(4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is
intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of
distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent classified
employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per
year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time
equivalent.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS
Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent
student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC)
incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW
28A.150.260.
(a) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at
the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component 2011-12
SCHOOL YEAR 2012-13
SCHOOL YEAR

Technology $57.42 $58.28

Utilities and Insurance $156.03 $158.37

Curriculum and Textbooks $61.65 $62.58

Other Supplies and Library Materials $130.89 $132.85

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated
and Classified Staff
$9.53
$9.68

Facilities Maintenance $77.30 $78.46

Security and Central Office $53.55 $54.35

TOTAL BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE $546.37 $554.57

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student
FTE MSOC allocations which equal the rate for general education
students calculated in (a) of this subsection, multiplied by a factor
of 2.171.
(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education programs generate a per student MSOC allocation
that is equal to the rate for general education students calculated in
(a) of this subsection, multiplied by a factor of 2.442.
(d) Students in laboratory science courses generate per student FTE
MSOC allocations which equal the per student FTE rate for general
education students established in (a) of this subsection.

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS
For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, funding for substitute
costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute
days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this
section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING
(a) Amounts provided in this section are adjusted to reflect
provisions of House Bill No. 2065 (allocation of funding for funding
for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all
districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative
learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to
provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE
programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not
limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as
accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic
education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident
students.

(11) VOLUNTARY FULL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS
Funding in this section is sufficient to fund voluntary full day
kindergarten programs in qualifying high poverty schools, pursuant to
RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315. Each kindergarten student who enrolls
for the voluntary full-day program in a qualifying school shall count
as one-half of one full-time equivalent student for purpose of making
allocations under this section. Funding in this section provides full-day kindergarten programs for 21 percent of kindergarten enrollment in
the 2011-12 school year, and 22 percent in the 2012-13 school year.
Funding priority shall be given to schools with the highest poverty
levels, as measured by prior year free and reduced price lunch
eligibility rates in each school. Funding in this section is
sufficient to fund voluntary full day kindergarten programs for July
and August of the 2010-11 school year.

(12) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND
NECESSARY PLANTS
For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants
within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary
by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are
provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional
administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to
districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education
staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center
enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of
this section on a per district basis.
(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and
enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent
students in grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full-time equivalent students;
(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall
add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any
grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs
with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this
subsection;
(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit;
(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit;
(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit
allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified
staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit; and
(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support
small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under
subsection (12) of this section shall generate additional MSOC
allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC)
allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided
section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental
budget), adjusted annually for inflation.
(13) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(14) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following
programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2012
and 2013 as follows:
(a) $589,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $598,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for fire protection for school
districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter
established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.
(b) $436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for programs providing skills
training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day
school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public
instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500
per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.
(c) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund adjustments to
school districts' allocations resulting from the implementation of the
prototypical school funding formula, pursuant to chapter 236, Laws of
2010 (K-12 education funding). The funding in this section is intended
to hold school districts harmless in total for funding changes
resulting from conversion to the prototypical school formula in the
general apportionment program, the learning assistance program, the
transitional bilingual program, and the highly capable program, after
adjustment for changes in enrollment and other caseload adjustments.
(15) $208,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $211,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for school district emergencies as
certified by the superintendent of public instruction. At the close of
the fiscal year the superintendent of public instruction shall report
to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature on the allocations provided to districts
and the nature of the emergency.
(16) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of
1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463,
Laws of 2007.
(17) Beginning in the 2011-12 school year, students participating
in running start programs may be funded up to a combined maximum
enrollment of 1.2 FTE including school district and institution of
higher education enrollment. In calculating the combined 1.2 FTE, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction may average the
participating student's September through June enrollment to account
for differences in the start and end dates for courses provided by the
high school and higher education institution. Additionally, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the
state board for community and technical colleges, the higher education
coordinating board, and the education data center, shall annually track
and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the combined
FTE experience of students participating in the running start program,
including course load analyses at both the high school and community
and technical college system.
(18) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (12) of this section, the following apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (12) of this section shall be
reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.
(19)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved
career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not
exceed 15 percent of the combined basic education and career and
technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds.
Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are
considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting
purposes under this section.
(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent
enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the
enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall
be adjusted for reported career and technical education program
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

Sec. 1503 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $322,243,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($273,642,000))
$273,893,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($595,885,000))
$596,136,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for the
transportation of students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192.
(b) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of
students as provided in section 505, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1404 of this act.
(3) Any amounts appropriated for maintenance level funding for
pupil transportation that exceed actual maintenance level expenditures
as calculated under the funding formula that takes effect September 1,
2011, shall be distributed to districts according to RCW
28A.160.192(2)(b).
(4) A maximum of $892,000 of this fiscal year 2012 appropriation
and a maximum of $892,000 of the fiscal year 2013 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus
purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction
determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process
based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to
those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.
(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall base
depreciation payments for school district buses on the pre-sales tax
five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus.
In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation
payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus
category for that school year.
(7) Funding levels in this section reflect waivers granted by the
state board of education for four-day school weeks as allowed under RCW
28A.305.141.
(8) Starting with the 2012-13 school year, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall disburse payments for bus
depreciation in August.

Sec. 1504 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE
PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,111,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,111,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($436,400,000))
$506,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($450,622,000))
$520,222,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $7,111,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $7,111,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for state matching money for
federal child nutrition programs, and may support the meals for kids
program through the following allowable uses:
(a) Elimination of breakfast copays for eligible public school
students and lunch copays for eligible public school students in grades
kindergarten through third grade who are eligible for reduced price
lunch;
(b) Assistance to school districts and authorized public and
private nonprofit organizations for supporting summer food service
programs, and initiating new summer food service programs in low-income
areas;
(c) Reimbursements to school districts for school breakfasts served
to students eligible for free and reduced price lunch, pursuant to
chapter 287, Laws of 2005; and
(d) Assistance to school districts in initiating and expanding
school breakfast programs.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report
annually to the fiscal committees of the legislature on annual
expenditures in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection.

Sec. 1505 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $648,369,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($679,832,000))
$659,919,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($486,922,000))
$499,922,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $756,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,815,879,000))
$1,808,966,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to
implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed
by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to
section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.
(c) Beginning with the 2010-11 school year award cycle, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award
determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school
year. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety
net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from
the current school year.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for special
education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390.
(b) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school district programs for special education
students as provided in section 507, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1406 of this act.
(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions
for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW
28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fund--state funded special
education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual
enrollment percent or 12.7 percent.
(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW
28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate
rather than individual district units. For purposes of this
subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than
individual district units.
(7) $8,914,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, (($34,200,000)) $9,469,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and (($29,574,000)) $32,574,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for safety
net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special education
funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section.
If the federal safety net awards based on the federal eligibility
threshold exceed the federal appropriation in this subsection (7) in
any fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all available federal
discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of
each school year, the superintendent shall recover safety net funds
that were distributed prospectively but for which districts were not
subsequently eligible.
(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, safety net funds
shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as
provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (ESHB 2261).
(b) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
operate the safety net oversight committee and shall award safety net
funds as provided in section 507, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as amended
through section 1406 of this act.
(8) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund--state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund--state funds allocated under
this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special
education program.
(11) $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for two additional full-time
equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to
provide training and support to districts applying for safety net
awards.
(12) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $100,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
shall be expended to support a special education ombudsman program
within the office of superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 1506 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE
DISTRICTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,894,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,912,000))
$7,895,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,806,000))
$15,789,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish
financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction
and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).
(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional
professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum
and instructional strategies. Funding shall be distributed among the
educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions
in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use
this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated
instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter
and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials,
and other expenditures related to providing regional professional
development support.
(3) The educational service districts, at the request of the state
board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and ((28A.310.340))
28A.305.130, may receive and screen applications for school
accreditation, conduct school accreditation site visits pursuant to
state board of education rules, and submit to the state board of
education post-site visit recommendations for school accreditation.
The educational service districts may assess a cooperative service fee
to recover actual plus reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of
this subsection.

Sec. 1507 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR LOCAL EFFORT
ASSISTANCE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,768,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($298,166,000))
$299,537,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($603,334,000))
$604,705,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the
increase per full-time equivalent student is 3 percent from the 2010-11
school year to the 2011-12 school year and 5 percent from the 2011-12
school year to the 2012-13 school year.

Sec. 1508 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,694,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,867,000))
$14,547,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,561,000))
$31,241,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund--state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) $586,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and (($549,000)) $899,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to maintain at
least one certificated instructional staff and related support services
at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to
support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to
furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions
are included: Residential programs under the department of social and
health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, programs for juveniles
under the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and programs for
juveniles operated by city and county jails.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 1509 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,745,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,788,000))
$9,159,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,533,000))
$17,904,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable
students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i)
Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly
capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students
per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900
instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the district's average staff
mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this
act.
(b) From July 1, 2011, to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable
students as provided in section 511, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1409 of this act.
(3) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the centrum program at Fort
Worden state park.

Sec. 1510 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,078,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($103,655,000))
$103,455,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($219,147,000))
$221,147,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,596,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($386,476,000))
$388,276,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $40,822,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $41,614,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust
account--state appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for development and
implementation of the Washington state assessment system, including:
(a) Development and implementation of retake assessments for high
school students who are not successful in one or more content areas and
(b) development and implementation of alternative assessments or
appeals procedures to implement the certificate of academic
achievement. The superintendent of public instruction shall report
quarterly on the progress on development and implementation of
alternative assessments or appeals procedures. Within these amounts,
the superintendent of public instruction shall contract for the early
return of 10th grade student assessment results, on or around June 10th
of each year. State funding shall be limited to one collection of
evidence payment per student, per content-area assessment.
(2) $356,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $356,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington state
leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional
partnership activities coordinated at the Pacific science center,
including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal
professional development, and school and community engagement events.
(3) $980,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $980,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for improving technology
infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on school district technology
development, promoting standards for school district technology,
promoting statewide coordination and planning for technology
development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.
(4) $3,852,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,624,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for continued implementation of
chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform) including development of
new performance-based evaluation systems for certificated educators.
(5)(a) $39,296,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for the following bonuses for
teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national
board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching in a
Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,090 per
teacher in the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, adjusted for inflation
in each school year in which Initiative 732 cost of living adjustments
are provided;
(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national
board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where
at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for
federal free or reduced price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least
60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free
or reduced price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70
percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or
reduced price lunch;
(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications
for bonuses under (a)(ii) of this subsection for less than one full
school year receive bonuses in a pro-rated manner. Beginning in the
2011-12 school year, all bonuses in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection
will be paid in July of each school year. Bonuses in (a)(i) and (ii)
of this subsection shall be reduced by a factor of 40 percent for first
year NBPTS certified teachers, to reflect the portion of the
instructional school year they are certified; and
(iv) During the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, and within
available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the
eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the
national board for professional teaching standards may receive a
conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward
the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front
candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual
bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in
addition to compensation received under a district's salary schedule
and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average
salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200.
Recipients who fail to receive certification after three years are
required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the
terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including
applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use
revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure
payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section
in each school year.
(6) $477,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $477,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the leadership internship
program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.
(7) $950,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $950,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps.
The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to low-performing schools and school districts that are implementing
comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more
schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.
(8) $810,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $810,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the development of a
leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent
organization to design, field test, and implement a state-of-the-art
education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the
state. Initial development of the content of the academy activities
shall be supported by private funds. Semiannually the independent
organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and
others to support the development and implementation of this program.
Leadership academy partners shall include the state level organizations
for school administrators and principals, the superintendent of public
instruction, the professional educator standards board, and others as
the independent organization shall identify.
(9) $3,234,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $3,234,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for grants to school districts to
provide a continuum of care for children and families to help children
become ready to learn. Grant proposals from school districts shall
contain local plans designed collaboratively with community service
providers. If a continuum of care program exists in the area in which
the school district is located, the local plan shall provide for
coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent possible.
(10) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
288, Laws of 2011 (actual student success program), including
allocations to the opportunity internship program, the jobs for
America's graduates program, the building bridges program, services
provided by a college scholarship organization. Funding shall not be
used in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium to provide awards for schools and
school districts.
(11) $859,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $808,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $248,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation are for administrative support of education reform
programs.
(12) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a statewide information
technology (IT) academy program. This public-private partnership will
provide educational software, as well as IT certification and software
training opportunities for students and staff in public schools.
(13) $977,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,077,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for secondary career and technical
education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008. If equally
matched by private donations, $300,000 of the 2012 appropriation and
$300,000 of the 2013 appropriation shall be used to support FIRST
robotics programs. Of the amounts in this subsection, $100,000 of the
fiscal year 2013 appropriation is provided solely for the purpose of
statewide supervision activities for career and technical education
student leadership organizations.
(14) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for (a) staff at the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts
to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering
programs in schools and districts across the state; and (b) grants of
$2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year with
professional development training for implementing integrated math,
science, technology, and engineering programs in their schools.
(15) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for science, technology,
engineering and mathematics lighthouse projects, consistent with
chapter 238, Laws of 2010.
(16) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a beginning educator support
program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for
grant funding. The superintendent shall implement this program in 5 to
15 school districts and/or regional consortia. The program provided by
a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid
orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a
professional growth plan for each beginning teacher aligned with
professional certification; release time for mentors and new teachers
to work together; and teacher observation time with accomplished peers.
$250,000 may be used to provide statewide professional development
opportunities for mentors and beginning educators.
(17) $5,767,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5895 (certificated employee evaluations). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((19))) (18) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for advanced project lead the way
courses at ten high schools. To be eligible for funding, a high school
must have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the
2011-12 school year. The funding must be used for one-time start-up
course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered
to students beginning in the 2012-13 school year. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the education research and
data center at the office of financial management shall track student
participation and long-term outcome data.
(((20))) (19) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for aerospace and manufacturing
technical programs housed at two skill centers. The one-time funding
is provided for start-up equipment and curriculum purchases. To be
eligible for funding, the skill center must agree to provide regional
high schools with access to a technology laboratory, expand
manufacturing certificate and course offerings at the skill center, and
provide a laboratory space for local high school teachers to engage in
professional development in the instruction of courses leading to
student employment certification in the aerospace and manufacturing
industries. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall administer the grants in consultation with the center for
excellence for aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing.
(((21))) (20) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for start-up grants to twelve high
schools to implement the aerospace assembler program. Participating
high schools must agree to offer the aerospace assembler training
program to students by spring semester of school year 2012-13. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education
research and data center at the office of financial management shall
track student participation and long-term outcome data.

Sec. 1511 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,575,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,666,000))
$83,896,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,001,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($231,242,000))
$234,472,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual
programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages:
(i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional
bilingual program student; (ii) fifteen transitional bilingual program
students per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900
instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the district's average staff
mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this
act.
(b) From July 1, 2011, to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual
instruction programs as provided in section 514, chapter 564, Laws of
2009, as amended through section 1411 of this act.
(c) The allocations in this section reflect the implementation of
a new funding formula for the transitional bilingual instructional
program, effective September 1, 2011, as specified in RCW
28A.150.260(10)(b).
(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts
in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of
assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the
following amounts: 2.79 percent for school year 2011-12 and 2.11
percent for school year 2012-13.
(4) The general fund--federal appropriation in this section is for
migrant education under Title I Part C and English language
acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the
elementary and secondary education act.
(5) In preparing its 2013-15 biennial budget request, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall prepare for
implementation of a funding model for the transitional bilingual
program, beginning in school year 2013-14, that is scaled to provide
more support to students requiring most intensive intervention,
(students with beginning levels of English language proficiency) and
less support to students requiring less intervention. The funding
model shall also provide up to two years of bonus funding upon
successful exit from the bilingual program to facilitate successful
transition to a standard program of education.
$35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2012 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 are provided solely to track current and former transitional
bilingual program students.

Sec. 1512 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,619,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($128,779,000))
$127,422,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($492,207,000))
$506,207,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,990,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($747,595,000))
$760,238,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund--state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal
year adjustments.
(b)(i) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance
programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages:
(A) Additional instruction of 1.51560 hours per week per funded
learning assistance program student; (B) fifteen learning assistance
program students per teacher; (C) 36 instructional weeks per year; (D)
900 instructional hours per teacher; and (E) the district's average
staff mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of
this act.
(ii) From July 1, 2011, to August 31, 2011, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance
programs as provided in section 515, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1412 of this act.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent
enrollment in grades K-12 for the prior school year multiplied by the
district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12
eligible for free or reduced price lunch in the prior school year.
(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through
the annual income verification process required by the national school
lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the
learning assistance program dated February, 2010.
(3) The general fund--federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund-state or education legacy trust funds
allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be
expended for the learning assistance program.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
research and recommend options for an adjustment factor for middle
school and high school free and reduced price lunch eligibility
reporting rates pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(12)(a), and submit a report
to the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 1, 2012. For the
2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the adjustment factor is 1.0.

Sec. 1513 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through
part V of this act are for allocations purposes only and do not entitle
a particular district, district employee, or student to a specific
service, beyond what has been expressly provided in statute. Part V of
this act restates the requirements of various sections of Title 28A
RCW. If any conflict exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control
unless this act explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement.
Any amounts provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts
required by Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the
program of basic education.
(2) To the maximum extent practicable, when adopting new or revised
rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part
V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall attempt to seek legislative
approval through the budget request process.
(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as
expressly provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2012)) 2013,
unless specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the
director of financial management, the superintendent of public
instruction may transfer state general fund appropriations for fiscal
year ((2012)) 2013 among the following programs to meet the
apportionment schedule for a specified formula in another of these
programs: General apportionment; employee compensation adjustments;
pupil transportation; special education programs; institutional
education programs; transitional bilingual programs; highly capable;
and learning assistance programs.
(5) The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving
any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

(End of part)

PART XVI
HIGHER EDUCATION
Sec. 1601 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 602 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $201,226,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $201,612,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,579,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Biotoxin Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($450,000))
$350,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,681,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,488,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($436,536,000))
$436,436,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and regents shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other noninstructional activities.
(2) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the development of integrated
medical curriculum for the Washington/Wyoming/Alaska/Montana/Idaho
(WWAMI) medical education program in Spokane and eastern Washington.
Funding is contingent on appropriations being provided to Washington
State University for WWAMI program expansion in Spokane and eastern
Washington.
(3) $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the center for international
trade in forest products in the college of forest resources.
(4) $88,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5485 (state's natural resources). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $143,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the ongoing management of the
Washington park arboretum.
(6) $3,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for an expansion in engineering
enrollments, including enrollments in the field of computer science.
Amounts provided in this subsection may be used only to cover direct
costs of instruction associated with this enrollment expansion. By
June 30, 2012, the university shall provide a report to the legislature
that provides specific detail on how these amounts will be spent. Each
September 1st thereafter, the university shall provide an updated
report that provides specific detail on how these amounts were spent in
the preceding twelve months.
(7) Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient for the
university to conduct a comprehensive review of its tuition waiver
policies. The resulting report shall include an overview of tuition
waiver uses and costs (forgone revenue) and outcomes and any
recommendations for changes to tuition waiver policy and shall be
provided to the legislature no later than December 1, 2012.
(8) $610,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely to expand health sciences capacity at the
University of Washington for Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana,
Idaho (WWAMI) and $190,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 is provided solely to expand health sciences capacity
at the University of Washington for Regional Initiatives in Dental
Education (RIDE) for the WWAMI-RIDE program expansion to achieve full
ramp-up of first-year medical students and dental students each year of
the four-year programs.
(9) The University of Washington shall not use funds appropriated
in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.
(10) Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient to cover
the costs associated with the implementation of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6486 (collective bargaining for post-doctoral
researchers).

Sec. 1602 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL--OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $247,034,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,812,000
Washington Opportunity Pathways Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,500,000
Aerospace Training Student Loan Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($326,346,000))
$326,358,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $237,018,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $73,500,000 of the opportunity pathways account--state appropriation are provided solely for student financial aid
payments under the state need grant and the state work study programs
including up to a four percent administrative allowance for the state
work study program.
(2) Within the funds appropriated in this section, eligibility for
the state need grant shall include students with family incomes at or
below 70 percent of the state median family income (MFI), adjusted for
family size, and shall include students enrolled in three to five
credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits.
The higher education coordinating board shall report to the legislature
by December 1, 2013, regarding the number of students enrolled in three
to five credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester
credits, and their academic progress including degree completion.
Awards for all students shall be adjusted by the estimated amount by
which Pell grant increases exceed projected increases in the
noninstructional costs of attendance. Awards for students with incomes
between 51 and 70 percent of the state median shall be prorated at the
following percentages of the award amount granted to those with incomes
below 51 percent of the MFI: 70 percent for students with family
incomes between 51 and 55 percent MFI; 65 percent for students with
family incomes between 56 and 60 percent MFI; 60 percent for students
with family incomes between 61 and 65 percent MFI; and 50 percent for
students with family incomes between 66 and 70 percent MFI.
(3) $1,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of the aerospace
training scholarship and student loan program as specified in Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1846 (aerospace student loans). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(4) For fiscal year 2013, the board shall defer loan or conditional
scholarship repayments to the future teachers conditional scholarship
and loan repayment program for up to one year for each participant if
the participant has shown evidence of efforts to find a teaching job
but has been unable to secure a teaching job per the requirements of
the program.
(5) $1,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the gaining early awareness and
readiness for undergraduate programs project.
(6) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the leadership 1000 program.
(7) $2,436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the passport to college program. The
maximum scholarship award shall be $5,000. The board shall contract
with a nonprofit organization to provide support services to increase
student completion in their postsecondary program and shall, under this
contract, provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal year 2013 for this
purpose.
(8) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 28B.122.010, the
aerospace student loan program may provide loans to students attending
an aerospace training program at Renton technical college.
(9) The office of student financial assistance and the department
of health shall prioritize a portion of any nonfederal balances in the
health professional loan repayment and scholarship fund for conditional
loan repayment contracts with psychiatrists and with advanced
registered nurse practitioners for work at one of the state-operated
psychiatric hospitals. The office and department shall designate the
state hospitals as health professional shortage areas if necessary for
this purpose. The office of student financial assistance shall
coordinate with the department of social and health services to
effectively incorporate these conditional loan repayments into the
department's advanced psychiatric professional recruitment and
retention strategies.
(10) $50,000 of the amount provided in this section shall be used
to convene the higher education loan program work group. The work
group shall develop methods for funding the loan program in the future,
as well as recommendations regarding the best loan program structure
for providing financial aid to underserved populations. The work group
shall seek out technical advice from the housing finance commission.
At a minimum, the recommendations regarding the proposed loan program
must take into account the following: Whether students could benefit
from the creation of a new student loan program; the relationship
between the student loan program and the state need grant program and
the state need grant qualified student population; mechanisms to
achieve interest rates that are below those offered in federally
guaranteed and private bank student loans; sources of initial and
on-going funding for loans and program operation; and default risks,
reserve requirements, and other conditions required for the student
loan program. The work group shall provide a report to the legislature
no later than December 1, 2012.

Sec. 1603 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,497,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,190,000))
$26,658,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,619,000
Children's Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $142,000
Opportunity Pathways Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,000,000
Home Visiting Services Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($411,606,000))
$411,216,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $16,028,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $18,028,000 of the general fund--state appropriation of
fiscal year 2013, $78,000,000 of the opportunity pathways account
appropriation, and $2,256,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education
assistance program services. Of these amounts, $10,284,000 is a
portion of the biennial amount of state maintenance of effort dollars
required to receive federal child care and development fund grant
dollars.
(2) In accordance to RCW 43.215.255(2) and 43.135.055, the
department is authorized to increase child care center and child care
family home licensure fees in fiscal years 2012 and 2013 for costs to
the department for the licensure activity, including costs of necessary
inspection. These increases are necessary to support expenditures
authorized in this section.
(3) $64,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $638,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $574,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for child care resource and referral network services.
(4) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to develop and provide culturally
relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers.
(5) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the
federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this
grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives,
agency administration, and other costs associated with child care
subsidies. The department shall transfer a portion of this grant to
the department of social and health services to fund the child care
subsidies paid by the department of social and health services on
behalf of the department of early learning.
(6) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions in the
appropriations for the department's administrative expenses. It is the
intent of the legislature that these reductions shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those administrative costs
that do not affect direct client services or direct service delivery or
program.
(7) $934,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $934,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $2,400,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for expenditure into the home visiting services
account. This funding is intended to meet federal maintenance of
effort requirements and to secure private matching funds.
(a) All federal funds received by the department for home visiting
activities must be deposited into the home visiting services account.
(b) The department must consult with stakeholders during the
development of the Washington home visiting plan and any future
proposals for federal funding.
(c) No more than $300,000 of the home visiting services account--federal appropriation may be expended for program administration for
fiscal year 2013 pursuant to RCW 43.215.130. No other funds may be
expended for that purpose.
(8)(a) $153,558,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the working connections child care program under
RCW 43.215.135.
(b) In addition to groups that were given prioritized access to the
working connections child care program effective March 1, 2011, the
department shall also give prioritized access into the program to
families in which a parent of a child in care is a minor who is not
living with a parent or guardian and who is a full-time student in a
high school that has a school-sponsored on-site child care center.
(9)(a) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and (($1,050,000)) $329,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for
implementation and administration of an electronic benefit transfer
system. The system shall include electronic time keeping, integrated
with an eligibility information technology system, and an electronic
payment system. The department shall coordinate implementation of this
system with the department of social and health services.
(b) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in this
subsection is provided solely for the department to contract for an
independent consultant to evaluate and recommend the optimum system for
the eligibility determination process. The evaluation must include an
analysis of lean management processes that, if adopted, could improve
the cost effectiveness and delivery of eligibility determination. The
department shall coordinate with the department of social and health
services for this evaluation. The department must report to the office
of financial management and the appropriate fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2012.
(10) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with
the office of financial management and the department of social and
health services shall report quarterly enrollments and active caseload
for the working connections child care program to the legislative
fiscal committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight
task force. The report shall also identify the number of cases
participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and
working connections child care.
(11) $1,025,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 and $6,712,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the seasonal child care program in fiscal year
2013.
(12) $2,522,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $2,522,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $4,304,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the medicaid treatment child care
(MTCC) program. The department shall contract for MTCC services to
provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment services
to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children. Priority
for services shall be given to children referred from the department of
social and health services children's administration. In addition to
referrals made by children's administration, the department shall
authorize services for children referred to the MTCC program, as long
as the children meet the eligibility requirements as outlined in the
Washington state plan for the MTCC program. Of the amounts
appropriated in this subsection, $60,000 per fiscal year may be used by
the department for administering the MTCC program, if needed.
(13)(a) The department shall establish a birth-to-three
subcommittee of the early learning advisory council. The subcommittee
will be cochaired by the department and nongovernmental private-public
partnership created in RCW 43.215.070. The subcommittee shall include
at least one representative from each of the following:
(i) The early learning advisory council;
(ii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(iii) The department of social and health services;
(iv) The department of early learning;
(v) The nongovernmental private-public partnership created in RCW
43.215.070;
(vi) The early learning action alliance; and
(vii) Additional stakeholders with expertise in birth-to-three
policy and programs and quality child care, as designated by the early
learning advisory council.
(b) The subcommittee may convene advisory subgroups on specific
topics as necessary to assure participation and input from a broad
array of diverse stakeholders.
(c) The subcommittee shall be monitored and overseen by the early
learning advisory council created in RCW 43.215.090.
(d) The subcommittee shall develop a birth-to-three implementation
proposal, which shall include further development of the Washington
state birth-to-three plan.
(e) The subcommittee must include recommendations on the following
in its birth-to-three proposal:
(i) Eligibility criteria for providers and programs;
(ii) The level of funding necessary to implement birth-to-three
programs, including an option which makes available funding equivalent
to thirty percent of the funding provided for the program of early
learning established in RCW 43.215.141;
(iii) Options for funding sources for birth-to-three programs;
(iv) Governance responsibilities for the department of early
learning; and
(v) A timeline for implementation that is concurrent with the
expansion to the early learning program outlined in RCW 43.215.142.
The subcommittee must present its recommendations to the early
learning advisory council and the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2012.
(14) $300,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit entity experienced in
the provision of promoting early literacy for children through
pediatric office visits.

Sec. 1604 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 616 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,776,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,671,000))
$5,691,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,447,000))
$11,467,000

Sec. 1605 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 617 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING
LOSS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,439,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,335,000))
$8,431,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,774,000))
$16,870,000

(End of part)

PART XVII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 1701 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT
LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $911,643,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($949,349,000))
$936,965,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,866,000))
$5,016,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($121,000))
$220,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000))
$5,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($90,000))
$71,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,000))
$23,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retire Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,300,000))
$2,299,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,867,386,000))
$1,856,242,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.
The entire general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2012 shall
be expended into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account by
June 30, 2012.

Sec. 1702 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO
BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,400,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,572,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($140,128,000))
$137,290,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($198,100,000))
$195,262,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
expenditure into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement
account. The entire general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year
2012 shall be expended into the nondebt-limit general fund bond
retirement account by June 30, 2012.

Sec. 1703 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,357,000))
$616,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($356,000))
$697,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,000))
$31,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000))
$3,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,119,000))
$2,726,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1704 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE
COSTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $728,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The director of financial management shall
distribute $545,000 to Grant county and $183,000 to Yakima county for
extraordinary criminal justice costs.

Sec. 1705 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 707 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS
The following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are
appropriated from the general fund for fiscal year 2012, unless
otherwise indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and
corporations for sundry claims. These appropriations are to be
disbursed on vouchers approved by the director of financial management,
except as otherwise provided, for reimbursement of criminal defendants
acquitted on the basis of self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110, as
follows:

(1) Clint L. Powell, Jr., claim number 99970048 . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,155.10
(2) Chance L. Hawkins, claim number 99970049 . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,838.95
(3) Edgar L. Hawkins, claim number 99970050 . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,507.00
(4) James Abbott, claim number 99970051 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,880.00
(5) Richard Frisk, claim number 99970052 . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,788.50
(6) Brian Barnd-Spjut, claim number 99970053 . . . . . . . . . . . . $122,821.79
(7) Dwijen Buckendorf, claim number 99970059 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100.00
(8) Todd Chism, claim number 99970061 . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,183.26
(9) James Glasco, claim number 99970062 . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,800.00
(10) David Holtzclaw, claim number 99970057 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,154.52
(11) Gary Richey, claim number 99970063 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,020.00
(12) Shelly Porter, claim number 99970054 . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,525.72
(13) Yakov Topik, claim number 99970047 . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,500.00
(14) Luther Wallace, claim number 99970060 . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,256.93
(15) Mark Fenton, claim number 99970064 . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,637.50
(16) Reid Woods, claim number 99970065 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,296.38
(17) James Daniel Emmett, claim number 99970067 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000.00
(18) Matthew Collet, claim number 99970068 . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000.00
(19) Michael Otto, claim number SCJ-2008-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,250.00

(End of part)

PART XVIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 1801 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,289,000))
$7,773,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,078,000))
$49,883,000
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,281,000))
$5,804,000
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety
and education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
General Fund Appropriation for other tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,000))
$63,000
General Fund Appropriation for habitat conservation
program distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly funded
autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,960,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for
harbor improvement revenue distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for
distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,229,000))
$61,983,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,566,000))
$69,532,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,843,000))
$26,833,000
City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for local
government financial assistance distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,159,000))
$14,922,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor
excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,617,000))
$25,889,000
Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Mitigation Account
Appropriation for distribution to local taxing
jurisdictions to mitigate the unintended revenue
redistribution effect of the sourcing law
changes . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,309,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation for
the Confederated Tribes of the Colville
Reservation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,478,000))
$7,481,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation for
the Spokane Tribe of Indians . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,794,000))
$4,795,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor
profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,132,000))
$96,456,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($407,953,000))
$426,843,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 1802 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE
ACCOUNT
Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,439,000))
$2,422,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties
for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving
penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208,
Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 1803 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 803 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,626,000))
$1,615,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2011-2013 biennium to all
cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially
decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and
that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in
which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the
costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not
limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties);
chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998
(deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license
suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations);
chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998
(DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels
lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215,
Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 1804 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 804 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for federal flood control
funds distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($74,000))
$52,000
General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing fees
distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,430,000))
$1,747,000
Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal forest
reserve fund distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,175,000))
$39,776,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,679,000))
$41,575,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 1805 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 804 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $16,300,000
for fiscal year 2012 and
(($24,800,000)) $26,600,000 for fiscal
year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,100,000))
$42,900,000
Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control
Account: For transfer to the state general
fund, $4,847,000 for fiscal year
2012 and $4,847,000 for fiscal year
2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,694,000
Aquatics Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $3,500,000 for fiscal
year 2012 and $3,500,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Savings Incentive Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $44,618,000 for fiscal year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,618,000
Distinguished Professorship Trust Fund: For transfer to
the state general fund for fiscal year 2012, an amount
not to exceed the actual cash balance of the fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,024,000
Washington Graduate Fellowship Trust Fund: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal year 2012, an
amount not to exceed the actual cash balance of
the fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,028,000
College Faculty Awards Trust Fund: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal year 2012, an amount
not to exceed the actual cash balance of the fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,996,000
Data Processing Revolving Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $5,960,000 for fiscal
year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,960,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer to
the drinking water assistance repayment account . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $2,100,000
for fiscal year 2012 and $2,100,000 for fiscal
year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000
General Fund: For transfer to the streamlined sales
and use tax account, $24,520,000
for fiscal year 2012 and $24,789,000 for fiscal
year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,309,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
water pollution control revolving account,
$7,750,000 for fiscal year 2012 and $7,750,000 for
fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,500,000
The Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $4,500,000 for fiscal year 2012 and
$4,500,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $4,000,000
for fiscal year 2012 and $4,000,000 for fiscal
year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
drinking water assistance account, $10,000,000 for
fiscal year 2012 and $5,000,000 for fiscal year
2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account: For transfer to the state general fund,
$500,000 for fiscal year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Education Savings Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $54,431,000 for fiscal
year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,431,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account:
For transfer to the state general fund,
$2,330,000 for fiscal year 2012 and
$4,330,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,660,000
Education Construction Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $102,000,000 for fiscal year
2012 and $102,000,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $40,000,000
for fiscal year 2012 and $40,000,000
for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000,000
Foster Care Endowed Scholarship Trust Fund: For transfer
to the state general fund, $200,000 for fiscal year
2012 and $200,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Affordable Housing For All Account: For transfer to
the home security fund, $1,000,000 for fiscal year
2012 and $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, in an amount not to exceed the actual
amount of the annual base payment to the tobacco
settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,205,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the basic
health plan stabilization account from the amounts
deposited in the account that are attributable to the
annual strategic contribution payment received in
fiscal year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the basic
health plan stabilization account from the amounts
deposited in the account that are attributable to the
annual strategic contribution payment received in
fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the life
sciences discovery fund, in an amount not to exceed
the actual remaining amount of the annual strategic
contribution payment to the tobacco settlement account
for fiscal year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the life
sciences discovery fund, in an amount not to exceed
the actual remaining amount of the annual strategic
contribution payment to the tobacco settlement account
for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

The transfer to the life sciences discovery fund is subject to the
following conditions: All new grants awarded during the 2011-2013
fiscal biennium shall support and accelerate the commercialization of
an identifiable product.
Financial Services Regulation Fund: For transfer to
the state general fund, $4,000,000 for fiscal
year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
State Nursery Revolving Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $250,000 for fiscal year 2012 and
$250,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Washington State Heritage Center Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $2,000,000 for fiscal
year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the state
toxics control account, $15,000,000 for fiscal
year 2012 and $16,000,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000,000
Coastal Protection Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $500,000 for fiscal year 2012 and
$500,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State: For transfer
to the Public Transportation Grant Program Account
for the purposes of distributions of $3,000,000 on
each of the last working days of December, March,
and June in fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to
the marine resources stewardship trust account,
$2,100,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

(End of part)

PART XIX
MISCELLANEOUS
Sec. 1901 2011 1st sp.s. c 41 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
Upon implementation of the expansion directed in RCW 74.09.659, the
office of financial management shall reduce general fund--state
allotments for the medical assistance program by one million five
hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 2012 ((and by two million
three hundred fifty thousand dollars for fiscal year 2013)). The
amounts reduced from allotments shall be placed in reserve status and
remain unexpended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1902 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1903 Except for section 969 of this act, this
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect immediately; except for section
948 of this act which takes effect August 1, 2013, section 960 of this
act which takes effect June 30, 2013, and sections 968 and 986 of this
act which take effect July 28, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1904 Section 969 of this act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 2013, subject to section 970 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1905 Section 952 of this act expires January
1, 2018.

(End of Bill)

INDEX PAGE #

ACQUISITION OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROJECTS THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 220
ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 6, 280
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 14, 285
BELATED CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 193
BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 86
BOARD OF TAX APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
BOND EXPENSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 205
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR NONSTATE EMPLOYEES
LANGUAGE ACCESS PROVIDERS WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 210
SEIU HEALTHCARE 775NW HOMECARE WORKERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 210
SEIU LOCAL 925 CHILDCARE WORKERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 210
WSRCC ADULT FAMILY HOMES . . . . . . . . . . . . 210
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--PSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 213
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 212
COALITION OF UNIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 207
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 212
PTE LOCAL 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . 208
SEIU 1199NW . . . . . . . . . . . . 208
TEAMSTERS LOCAL 117 . . . . . . . . . . . . 209
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE--WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 211
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--SEIU 925 . . . . . . . . . . . . 214
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--TEAMSTERS 117 (UW POLICE OFFICERS) . . . . . . . . . . . . 214
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 213
WAFWP . . . . . . . . . . . . 208
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY--PSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 214
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY--WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 214
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY--WSU POLICE GUILD . . . . . . . . . . . . 215
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 212
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--PSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 212
WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 207
WFSE HIGHER EDUCATION COMMUNITY COLLEGE COALITION . . . . . . . . . . . . 209
WPEA . . . . . . . . . . . . 207
WPEA HIGHER EDUCATION COMMUNITY COLLEGE COALITION . . . . . . . . . . . . 209
WSP LIEUTENANTS ASSOCIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 211
WSP TROOPERS ASSOCIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 210
YAKIMA VALLEY COMMUNITY COLLEGE--WPEA . . . . . . . . . . . . 211
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 207, 218
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS NOT IMPAIRED . . . . . . . . . . . . 206
COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 106
COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
COMPENSATION - CONTINGENT INCREASE IN SALARIES AND WAGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 218
COMPENSATION
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 217
REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE SUPER COALITION--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 216
REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--SUPER COALITION--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 215
REVISE PENSION CONTRIBUTION RATES . . . . . . . . . . . . 218
CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 110
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 6, 279
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 87, 359
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 116
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 17, 288
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 97, 368
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING . . . . . . . . . . . . 183, 430
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 106
DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 35, 302
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 111, 378
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 91, 362
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 88
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 119
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 114, 381
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 193
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 29, 298
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 104, 373
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 39, 304
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 70, 339
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 61, 328
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 68, 336
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 41, 307
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 58, 322
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 65, 334
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 45, 310
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 50, 315
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 72, 341
SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 70, 339
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 69, 338
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 90, 361
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 188
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 175
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 205
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 104, 373
ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . 110
EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 177
EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 205
FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
HORSE RACING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 86
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 221
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SECURITY PROGRAMS AND TRAINING . . . . . . . . . . . . 223
INSURANCE COMMISSIONER . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
LAW LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 6, 279
LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
LEGISLATIVE TASK FORCE ON CAREER EDUCATION OPPORTUNITIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 197
LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 31, 299
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 32, 300
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE LONGEVITY STEP . . . . . . . . . . . . 218
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 28, 297
OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 24, 294
COMMUNICATION SERVICES REFORM . . . . . . . . . . . . 197
DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 190
EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 191
ELECTRONIC MEDICAL RECORD STUDY . . . . . . . . . . . . 196
EMERGENCY FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 191
EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 438
FIRE CONTINGENCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 190
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY EXPENDITURES . . . . . . . . . . . . 195
LEAN MANAGEMENT STRATEGIES EFFICIENCY SAVINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 194
O'BRIEN BUILDING IMPROVEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 191
STATE EFFICIENCY AND RESTRUCTURING REPAYMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 194
OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . 30, 299
OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 10, 282
OFFICE OF THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER
HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 196
OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
PERSONAL COMPUTER ACQUISITION AND REPLACEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 222
PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 151, 414
PUBLIC BACCALAUREATE INSTITUTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 166
PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 118
RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 109
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 11, 283
SENATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 168, 169
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 73, 341
STATE INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 108
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 376
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 120, 386
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 187, 434
STATE TREASURER . . . . . . . . . . . . 13, 199
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 189, 190
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST: DEBT REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 437
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST: DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT . . . . . . . . . . . . 436
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 437
COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 441
COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 192
FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 201, 442
FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 200
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 200, 442
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 440
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 201, 443
STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 205
STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL
OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 180, 428
POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 180
SUNDRY CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 438
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 122, 162, 388, 424
BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 140
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 152, 415
EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 149, 412
FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT--ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 162
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 129, 395
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 150, 413
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 160, 423
LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 150, 413
MISCELLANEOUS -- NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT . . . . . . . . . . . . 152
PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 145, 406
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 143
SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 146, 408
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 147, 409
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 159, 421
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 6, 279
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 171, 426
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT, SEPARATION, AND DOWNSHIFTING INCENTIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 206
WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 117
WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 187
WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS . . . . . . . . . . . . 187, 435
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 188
WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 173
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 179
WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 183
--- END ---