BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.06.210 and 1977 ex.s. c 328 s 12 are each amended
to read as follows:
The proclamation of a state of emergency and other proclamations or
orders issued by the governor pursuant to RCW 43.06.010, and 43.06.200
through 43.06.270 as now or hereafter amended shall be in writing and
shall be signed by the governor and shall then be filed with the
secretary of state. A proclamation of a state of emergency is
effective upon the governor's signature. The governor shall give as
much public notice as practical through the news media of the issuance
of proclamations or orders pursuant to RCW 43.06.010, and 43.06.200
through 43.06.270 as now or hereafter amended. The state of emergency
shall cease to exist upon the issuance of a proclamation of the
governor declaring its termination: PROVIDED, That the governor must
terminate said state of emergency proclamation when order has been
restored in the area affected.

--- END ---