BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35A.42.020 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.42.020 are each
amended to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in this title, every elective and
appointive officer and all employees of code cities shall: (1) Be
possessed of the qualifications and be subject to forfeiture of office,
impeachment or removal and recall as provided in chapter 42.04 RCW
((and RCW 9.81.040)); and (2) provide official bonds in accordance with
the requirements of this title, and as required in compliance with
chapters 42.08 and 48.28 RCW.
When vacancies in public offices in code cities shall occur the
term of a replacement officer shall be fixed as provided in chapter
42.12 RCW. A public officer charged with misconduct as defined in
chapter 42.20 RCW, shall be charged and, upon conviction, punished as
provided for such misconduct in chapter 42.20 RCW. The officers and
employees of code cities shall be guided and governed by the code of
ethics as provided in chapter 42.23 RCW. Vouchers for the payment of
public funds and the provisions for certifying the same shall be as
provided in chapter 42.24 RCW. The meetings of any board, agency, or
commission of a code city shall be open to the public to the extent and
notice given in the manner required by chapter 42.32 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 9.81.010 (Definitions) and 1953 c 142 s 1 & 1951 c 254 s 1;
(2) RCW 9.81.020 (Subversive activities made felony -- Penalty) and
2003 c 53 s 44 & 1951 c 254 s 2;
(3) RCW 9.81.030 (Membership in subversive organization is felony--Penalty) and 2003 c 53 s 45 & 1951 c 254 s 3;
(4) RCW 9.81.040 (Disqualification from voting or holding public
office) and 1951 c 254 s 4;
(5) RCW 9.81.050 (Dissolution of subversive organizations--Disposition of property) and 1951 c 254 s 5;
(6) RCW 9.81.060 (Public employment -- Subversive person ineligible)
and 1951 c 254 s 11;
(7) RCW 9.81.070 (Public employment -- Determining eligibility--Inquiries -- Oath) and 1955 c 377 s 1 & 1951 c 254 s 12;
(8) RCW 9.81.080 (Public employment -- Inquiries may be dispensed
with, when) and 1955 c 377 s 2 & 1951 c 254 s 13;
(9) RCW 9.81.082 (Membership in subversive organization described)
and 1955 c 377 s 3;
(10) RCW 9.81.083 (Communist party declared a subversive
organization) and 1955 c 377 s 4;
(11) RCW 9.81.090 (Public employees -- Discharge of subversive
persons -- Procedure -- Hearing -- Appeal) and 2011 c 336 s 328, 1971 c 81 s
44, & 1951 c 254 s 15;
(12) RCW 9.81.110 (Misstatements are punishable as perjury--Penalty) and 1951 c 254 s 17; and
(13) RCW 9.81.120 (Constitutional rights -- Censorship or
infringement) and 1951 c 254 s 19.

--- END ---