BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 6.21.040 and 1987 c 442 s 604 are each amended to read
as follows:
The notice of sale shall be printed or typed and shall be in
substantially the following form, except that if the sale is not
pursuant to a judgment of foreclosure of a mortgage or a statutory
lien, the notice shall also contain a statement that the sheriff has
been informed that there is not sufficient personal property to satisfy
the judgment and that if the judgment debtor or debtors do have
sufficient personal property to satisfy the judgment, the judgment
debtor or debtors should contact the sheriff's office immediately:

Sec. 2 RCW 6.23.030 and 1987 c 442 s 703 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the property is subject to a homestead as provided in
chapter 6.13 RCW, the purchaser, or the redemptioner if the property
has been redeemed, shall send a notice, in the form prescribed in
subsection (3) of this section, at least forty but not more than sixty
days before the expiration of the judgment debtor's redemption period
both by regular mail and by certified mail, return receipt requested,
to the judgment debtor or debtors and to each of them separately, if
there is more than one judgment debtor, at their last known address or
addresses and to "occupant" at the property address. The party who
sends the notice shall file a copy of the notice with an affidavit of
mailing with the clerk of the court and deliver or mail a copy to the
sheriff.
(2) Failure to comply with this section extends the judgment
debtor's redemption period six months. If the redemption period is
extended, no further notice need be sent. Time for redemption by
redemptioners shall not be extended.
(3) The notice and affidavit of mailing required by subsection (1)
of this section shall be in substantially the following form:

Sec. 3 RCW 6.27.100 and 2012 c 159 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A writ issued for a continuing lien on earnings shall be
substantially in the form provided in RCW 6.27.105. All other writs of
garnishment shall be substantially in the following form, but if the
writ is issued under an order or judgment for child support, the
following statement shall appear conspicuously in the caption: "This
garnishment is based on a judgment or order for child support"; and if
the writ is issued by an attorney, the writ shall be revised as
indicated in subsection (2) of this section:

YOU ARE HEREBY COMMANDED, unless otherwise directed by the court,
by the attorney of record for the plaintiff, or by this writ, not to
pay any debt, whether earnings subject to this garnishment or any other
debt, owed to the defendant at the time this writ was served and not to
deliver, sell, or transfer, or recognize any sale or transfer of, any
personal property or effects of the defendant in your possession or
control at the time when this writ was served. Any such payment,
delivery, sale, or transfer is void to the extent necessary to satisfy
the plaintiff's claim and costs for this writ with interest.
YOU ARE FURTHER COMMANDED to answer this writ according to the
instructions in this writ and in the answer forms and, within twenty
days after the service of the writ upon you, to mail or deliver the
original of such answer to the court, one copy to the plaintiff or the
plaintiff's attorney, and one copy to the defendant, at the addresses
listed at the bottom of this writ.
If you owe the defendant a debt payable in money in excess of the
amount set forth in the first paragraph of this writ, hold only the
amount set forth in the first paragraph and any processing fee if one
is charged and release all additional funds or property to defendant.
IF YOU FAIL TO ANSWER THIS WRIT AS COMMANDED, A JUDGMENT MAY BE
ENTERED AGAINST YOU FOR THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE PLAINTIFF'S CLAIM
AGAINST THE DEFENDANT WITH ACCRUING INTEREST, ATTORNEY FEES, AND COSTS
WHETHER OR NOT YOU OWE ANYTHING TO THE DEFENDANT. IF YOU PROPERLY
ANSWER THIS WRIT, ANY JUDGMENT AGAINST YOU WILL NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT
OF ANY NONEXEMPT DEBT OR THE VALUE OF ANY NONEXEMPT PROPERTY OR EFFECTS
IN YOUR POSSESSION OR CONTROL.
JUDGMENT MAY ALSO BE ENTERED AGAINST THE DEFENDANT FOR COSTS AND
FEES INCURRED BY THE PLAINTIFF.

Witness, the Honorable . . . . . . . ., Judge of the above-entitled
Court, and the seal thereof, this . . . . day of . . . . . .,
((20. . .)) (year). . . .

[Seal]

(2) If an attorney issues the writ of garnishment, the final
paragraph of the writ, containing the date, and the subscripted
attorney and clerk provisions, shall be replaced with text in
substantially the following form:

"This writ is issued by the undersigned attorney of record for
plaintiff under the authority of chapter 6.27 of the Revised Code of
Washington, and must be complied with in the same manner as a writ
issued by the clerk of the court.

Sec. 4 RCW 6.27.105 and 2012 c 159 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A writ that is issued for a continuing lien on earnings shall
be substantially in the following form, but if the writ is issued under
an order or judgment for child support, the following statement shall
appear conspicuously in the caption: "This garnishment is based on a
judgment or order for child support;" and if the writ is issued by an
attorney, the writ shall be revised as indicated in subsection (2) of
this section:

THIS IS A WRIT FOR A CONTINUING LIEN. THE GARNISHEE SHALL HOLD the
nonexempt portion of the defendant's earnings due at the time of
service of this writ and shall also hold the defendant's nonexempt
earnings that accrue through the last payroll period ending on or
before SIXTY days after the date of service of this writ. HOWEVER, IF
THE GARNISHEE IS PRESENTLY HOLDING THE NONEXEMPT PORTION OF THE
DEFENDANT'S EARNINGS UNDER A PREVIOUSLY SERVED WRIT FOR A CONTINUING
LIEN, THE GARNISHEE SHALL HOLD UNDER THIS WRIT only the defendant's
nonexempt earnings that accrue from the date the previously served writ
or writs terminate and through the last payroll period ending on or
before sixty days after the date of termination of the previous writ or
writs. IN EITHER CASE, THE GARNISHEE SHALL STOP WITHHOLDING WHEN THE
SUM WITHHELD EQUALS THE AMOUNT STATED IN THIS WRIT OF GARNISHMENT.
YOU ARE HEREBY COMMANDED, unless otherwise directed by the court,
by the attorney of record for the plaintiff, or by this writ, not to
pay any debt, whether earnings subject to this garnishment or any other
debt, owed to the defendant at the time this writ was served and not to
deliver, sell, or transfer, or recognize any sale or transfer of, any
personal property or effects of the defendant in your possession or
control at the time when this writ was served. Any such payment,
delivery, sale, or transfer is void to the extent necessary to satisfy
the plaintiff's claim and costs for this writ with interest.
YOU ARE FURTHER COMMANDED to answer this writ according to the
instructions in this writ and in the answer forms and, within twenty
days after the service of the writ upon you, to mail or deliver the
original of such answer to the court, one copy to the plaintiff or the
plaintiff's attorney, and one copy to the defendant, at the addresses
listed at the bottom of this writ.
If, at the time this writ was served, you owed the defendant any
earnings (that is, wages, salary, commission, bonus, tips, or other
compensation for personal services or any periodic payments pursuant to
a nongovernmental pension or retirement program), the defendant is
entitled to receive amounts that are exempt from garnishment under
federal and state law. You must pay the exempt amounts to the
defendant on the day you would customarily pay the compensation or
other periodic payment. As more fully explained in the answer, the
basic exempt amount is the greater of seventy-five percent of
disposable earnings or a minimum amount determined by reference to the
employee's pay period, to be calculated as provided in the answer.
However, if this writ carries a statement in the heading that "This
garnishment is based on a judgment or order for child support," the
basic exempt amount is fifty percent of disposable earnings.
YOU MAY DEDUCT A PROCESSING FEE FROM THE REMAINDER OF THE
EMPLOYEE'S EARNINGS AFTER WITHHOLDING UNDER THIS WRIT. THE PROCESSING
FEE MAY NOT EXCEED TWENTY DOLLARS FOR THE FIRST ANSWER AND TEN DOLLARS
AT THE TIME YOU SUBMIT THE SECOND ANSWER.
If you owe the defendant a debt payable in money in excess of the
amount set forth in the first paragraph of this writ, hold only the
amount set forth in the first paragraph and any processing fee if one
is charged and release all additional funds or property to defendant.
IF YOU FAIL TO ANSWER THIS WRIT AS COMMANDED, A JUDGMENT MAY BE
ENTERED AGAINST YOU FOR THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE PLAINTIFF'S CLAIM
AGAINST THE DEFENDANT WITH ACCRUING INTEREST, ATTORNEY FEES, AND COSTS
WHETHER OR NOT YOU OWE ANYTHING TO THE DEFENDANT. IF YOU PROPERLY
ANSWER THIS WRIT, ANY JUDGMENT AGAINST YOU WILL NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT
OF ANY NONEXEMPT DEBT OR THE VALUE OF ANY NONEXEMPT PROPERTY OR EFFECTS
IN YOUR POSSESSION OR CONTROL.
JUDGMENT MAY ALSO BE ENTERED AGAINST THE DEFENDANT FOR COSTS AND
FEES INCURRED BY THE PLAINTIFF.

Witness, the Honorable . . . . . . . ., Judge of the above-entitled
Court, and the seal thereof, this . . . . day of . . . . . .,
((20. . .)) (year). . . .

[Seal]

(2) If an attorney issues the writ of garnishment, the final
paragraph of the writ, containing the date, and the subscripted
attorney and clerk provisions, shall be replaced with text in
substantially the following form:

"This writ is issued by the undersigned attorney of record for
plaintiff under the authority of chapter 6.27 of the Revised Code of
Washington, and must be complied with in the same manner as a writ
issued by the clerk of the court.

Dated this . . . . . . . . day of. . . . . . . . . . , ((20. . . . . . ))
(year). . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Attorney for Plaintiff

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

Address
Address of the Clerk of the
Court"

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Name of Defendant

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Address of Defendant

Sec. 5 RCW 6.27.265 and 2003 c 222 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The judgment on garnishee's answer or tendered funds, and for costs
against defendant, and the order to pay funds shall be substantially in
the following form:

IN THE . . . . COURT OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON IN AND FOR THE
COUNTY OF . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . No. . . . . .

Plaintiff

vs. JUDGMENT AND ORDER
TO PAY
(Clerk's Action Required)

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Defendant

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Garnishee

Judgment Summary

Judgment Creditor . . . . . . . . . . . .

Garnishment Judgment Debtor . . . . . . . . . . . .

Garnishment Judgment Amount . . . . . . . . . . . .

Costs Judgment Debtor . . . . . . . . . . . .

Costs Judgment Amount . . . . . . . . . . . .

Judgments to bear interest at . . . . . . . . . . . . %

Attorney for Judgment Creditor . . . . . . . . . . . .

IT APPEARING THAT garnishee was indebted to defendant in the
nonexempt amount of $ . . . . . .; that at the time the writ of
garnishment was issued defendant was employed by or maintained a
financial institution account with garnishee, or garnishee had in its
possession or control funds, personal property, or effects of
defendant; and that plaintiff has incurred recoverable costs and
attorney fees of $. . . .; now, therefore, it is hereby

ORDERED, ADJUDGED, AND DECREED that plaintiff is awarded judgment
against garnishee in the amount of $. . . .; that plaintiff is awarded
judgment against defendant in the amount of $ . . . . . . for
recoverable costs; that, if this is a superior court order, garnishee
shall pay its judgment amount to plaintiff [or to plaintiff's attorney]
through the registry of the court, and the clerk of the court shall
note receipt thereof and forthwith disburse such payment to plaintiff
[or to plaintiff's attorney]; that, if this is a district court order,
garnishee shall pay its judgment amount to plaintiff directly [or to
plaintiff's attorney], and if any payment is received by the clerk of
the court, the clerk shall forthwith disburse such payment to plaintiff
[or to plaintiff's attorney]. Garnishee is advised that the failure to
pay its judgment amount may result in execution of the judgment,
including garnishment.

DONE IN OPEN COURT this . . . . . . day of . . . ., ((20. . ))
(year). . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Judge/Court Commissioner

Presented by:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Attorney for Plaintiff

Sec. 6 RCW 6.27.340 and 2012 c 159 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Service of a writ for a continuing lien shall comply fully with
RCW 6.27.110.
(2) If the writ is directed to an employer for the purpose of
garnishing the defendant's wages, the first answer shall accurately
state, as of the date the writ of garnishment was issued as indicated
by the date appearing on the last page of the writ, whether the
defendant was employed by the garnishee defendant (and if not the date
employment terminated), whether the defendant's earnings were subject
to a preexisting writ of garnishment for continuing liens on earnings
(and if so the date such writ will terminate and the current writ will
be enforced), whether the defendant maintained a financial account with
garnishee, and whether the garnishee defendant had possession of or
control over any funds, personal property, or effects of the defendant
(and if so the garnishee defendant shall list all of defendant's
personal property or effects in its possession or control). The first
answer shall further accurately state, as of the time of service of the
writ of garnishment on the garnishee defendant, the amount due and
owing from the garnishee defendant to the defendant, and the
defendant's total earnings, allowable deductions, disposable earnings,
exempt earnings, deductions for superior liens such as child support,
and net earnings withheld under the writ. The first answer may be
substantially in the following form:

IN THE . . . . . COURT
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON IN AND FOR
THE COUNTY OF . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . , NO. . . . . .

Plaintiff,

vs. FIRST ANSWER

. . . . . . . . . . . . , TO WRIT OF

Defendant, GARNISHMENT

. . . . . . . . . . . . FOR CONTINUING LIEN

Garnishee Defendant
ON EARNINGS

SECTION I. If you are withholding the defendant's nonexempt
earnings under a previously served writ for a continuing lien,
answer only sections I and III of this form and mail or deliver
the forms as directed in the writ. Withhold from the
defendant's future nonexempt earnings as directed in the writ,
and a second set of answer forms will be forwarded to you
later.

If you are NOT withholding the defendant's earnings under a
previously served writ for a continuing lien, answer this
ENTIRE form and mail or deliver the forms as directed in the
writ. A second set of answer forms will be forwarded to you
later for subsequently withheld earnings.

ANSWER: I am presently holding the defendant's nonexempt
earnings under a previous writ served on . . . . . . that will
terminate not later than . . . . ., ((20 . . .)) (year). . . .

On the date the writ of garnishment was issued as indicated by
the date appearing on the last page of the writ:

(A) The defendant: (check one) [ ] was, [ ] was not employed
by garnishee. If not employed and you have no possession or
control of any funds of defendant, indicate the last day of
employment: . . . . . . .; and complete section III of this
answer and mail or deliver the forms as directed in the writ;

(B) The defendant: (check one) [ ] did, [ ] did not maintain
a financial account with garnishee; and

(C) The garnishee: (check one) [ ] did, [ ] did not have
possession of or control over any funds, personal property, or
effects of the defendant. (List all of defendant's personal
property or effects in your possession or control on the last
page of this answer form or attach a schedule if necessary.)

SECTION II. At the time of service of the writ of garnishment
on the garnishee there was due and owing from the garnishee to
the above-named defendant $ .....

This writ attaches a maximum of . . . . percent of the
defendant's disposable earnings (that is, compensation payable
for personal services, whether called wages, salary,
commission, bonus, or otherwise, and including periodic
payments pursuant to a nongovernmental pension or retirement
program).

Calculate the attachable amount as follows:

Gross Earnings . . . . . . . . . . . . $. . . . . . . . (1)

Less deductions required by law (social security,

federal withholding tax, etc. Do not include

deductions for child support orders or government

liens here. Deduct child support orders and liens

on line 7): . . . . . . . . . . . . $. . . . . . . . (2)

Disposable Earnings (subtract line 2 from

line 1): . . . . . . . . . . . . $. . . . . . . . (3)

Enter . . . . percent of line 3: . . . . . . . . . . . . $. . . . . . . . (4)

Enter one of the following exempt

amounts*: . . . . . . . . . . . . $. . . . . . . . (5)

If paid: Weekly $. . . . . Semi-monthly $. . . . .

Bi-weekly $. . . . . Monthly $. . . . .

*These are minimum exempt amounts that the

defendant must be paid. If your answer

covers more than one pay period, multiply

the preceding amount by the number of pay

periods and/or fraction thereof your answer

covers. If you use a pay period not shown,

prorate the monthly exempt amount.

Subtract the larger of lines 4 and 5 from

line 3: . . . . . . . . . . . . $. . . . . . . . (6)

Enter amount (if any) withheld for ongoing

government liens such as child support: . . . . . . . . . . . . $. . . . . . . . (7)

Subtract line 7 from line 6. This amount

must be held out for the plaintiff: . . . . . . . . . . . . $. . . . . . . . (8)

This is the formula that you will use for withholding each pay
period over the required sixty day garnishment period. Deduct
any allowable processing fee you may charge from the amount
that is to be paid to the defendant.

If there is any uncertainty about your answer, give an
explanation on the last page or on an attached page.

SECTION III. An attorney may answer for the garnishee.

Under penalty of perjury, I affirm that I have examined this
answer, including accompanying schedules, and to the best of my
knowledge and belief it is true, correct, and complete.

(3) Prior to serving the answer forms for a writ for continuing
lien on earnings, the plaintiff shall fill in the minimum exemption
amounts for the different pay periods, and the maximum percentages of
disposable earnings subject to lien and exempt from lien.
(4) In the event plaintiff fails to comply with this section,
employer may elect to treat the garnishment as one not creating a
continuing lien.

Sec. 7 RCW 6.27.370 and 2012 c 159 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the federal government is named as a garnishee
defendant, the attorney for the plaintiff, or the clerk of the court
shall, upon submitting a notice in the appropriate form by the
plaintiff, issue a notice which directs the garnishee defendant to
disburse any nonexempt earnings to the court in accordance with the
garnishee defendant's normal pay and disbursement cycle.
(2) Funds received by the clerk from a garnishee defendant may be
deposited into the registry of the court or, in the case of negotiable
instruments, may be retained in the court file. Upon presentation of
an order directing the clerk to disburse the funds received, the clerk
shall pay or endorse the funds over to the party entitled to receive
the funds. Except for good cause shown, the funds shall not be paid or
endorsed to the plaintiff prior to the expiration of any minimum
statutory period allowed to the defendant for filing an exemption
claim.
(3) The plaintiff shall, in the same manner permitted for service
of the writ of garnishment, provide to the garnishee defendant a copy
of the notice issued under subsection (1) of this section, and shall
supply to the garnished party a copy of the notice.
(4) Any answer or processing fees charged by the garnishee
defendant to the plaintiff under federal law shall be a recoverable
cost under RCW 6.27.090.
(5) The notice to the federal government garnishee shall be in
substantially the following form:

(6) If the writ of garnishment is issued by the attorney of record
for the judgment creditor, the following paragraph shall replace the
clerk's signature and date:

This notice is issued by the undersigned attorney of record for
plaintiff under the authority of RCW 6.27.370, and must be
complied with in the same manner as a notice issued by the
court.

Sec. 8 RCW 9.96.020 and 2012 c 117 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever the governor shall determine to restore his or her civil
rights to any person convicted of an infamous crime in any superior
court of this state, he or she shall execute and file in the office of
the secretary of state an instrument in writing in substantially the
following form:

Sec. 9 RCW 10.14.085 and 1992 c 143 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the respondent was not personally served with the petition,
notice of hearing, and ex parte order before the hearing, the court
shall reset the hearing for twenty-four days from the date of entry of
the order and may order service by publication instead of personal
service under the following circumstances:
(a) The sheriff or municipal officer files an affidavit stating
that the officer was unable to complete personal service upon the
respondent. The affidavit must describe the number and types of
attempts the officer made to complete service;
(b) The petitioner files an affidavit stating that the petitioner
believes that the respondent is hiding from the server to avoid
service. The petitioner's affidavit must state the reasons for the
belief that the ((petitioner [respondent])) respondent is avoiding
service;
(c) The server has deposited a copy of the summons, in
substantially the form prescribed in subsection (3) of this section,
notice of hearing, and the ex parte order of protection in the post
office, directed to the respondent at the respondent's last known
address, unless the server states that the server does not know the
respondent's address; and
(d) The court finds reasonable grounds exist to believe that the
respondent is concealing himself or herself to avoid service, and that
further attempts to personally serve the respondent would be futile or
unduly burdensome.
(2) The court shall reissue the temporary order of protection not
to exceed another twenty-four days from the date of reissuing the ex
parte protection order and order to provide service by publication.
(3) The publication shall be made in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county where the petition was brought and in the
county of the last known address of the respondent once a week for
three consecutive weeks. The newspaper selected must be one of the
three most widely circulated papers in the county. The publication of
summons shall not be made until the court orders service by publication
under this section. Service of the summons shall be considered
complete when the publication has been made for three consecutive
weeks. The summons must be signed by the petitioner. The summons
shall contain the date of the first publication, and shall require the
respondent upon whom service by publication is desired, to appear and
answer the petition on the date set for the hearing. The summons shall
also contain a brief statement of the reason for the petition and a
summary of the provisions under the ex parte order. The summons shall
be essentially in the following form:

In the . . . . . . . . . court of the state of Washington for
the county of . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . , Petitioner

vs. No. . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . , Respondent

The state of Washington to . . . . . . . . . (respondent):

You are hereby summoned to appear on the . . . . day
of . . . . . . , ((19. . . )) (year). . . . , at . . . . a.m./p.m., and
respond to the petition. If you fail to respond, an order of
protection will be issued against you pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 10.14 RCW, for a minimum of one
year from the date you are required to appear. A temporary
order of protection has been issued against you, restraining
you from the following: (Insert a brief statement of the
provisions of the ex parte order). A copy of the petition,
notice of hearing, and ex parte order has been filed with the
clerk of this court.

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Petitioner . . . . . . . . . . . .

Sec. 10 RCW 10.37.040 and 2010 c 8 s 1036 are each amended to
read as follows:
The indictment may be substantially in the following form:

Sec. 11 RCW 11.28.090 and 2009 c 549 s 1004 are each amended to
read as follows:
Letters testamentary to be issued to executors under the provisions
of this chapter shall be signed by the clerk, and issued under the seal
of the court, and may be in the following form:

State of Washington, county of . . . . . .
In the superior court of the county of . . . . . .
Whereas, the last will of A B, deceased, was, on the . . . . day
of . . . . . . , ((A.D., . . . .)) (year). . . . , duly exhibited,
proven, and recorded in our said superior court; and whereas, it
appears in and by said will that C D is appointed executor thereon,
and, whereas, said C D has duly qualified, now, therefore, know all
persons by these presents, that we do hereby authorize the said C D to
execute said will according to law.
Witness my hand and the seal of said court this . . . . day of
. . . . . ., ((A.D., 19. . .)) (year). . . .

Sec. 12 RCW 11.28.140 and 2009 c 549 s 1005 are each amended to
read as follows:
Letters of administration shall be signed by the clerk, and be
under the seal of the court, and may be substantially in the following
form:

State of Washington, County of . . . . . .
Whereas, A.B., late of . . . . . . on or about the . . . . day of
. . . . . . ((A.D., . . . .)) (year). . . . died intestate, leaving at
the time of his or her death, property in this state subject to
administration: Now, therefore, know all persons by these presents,
that we do hereby appoint . . . . . . . . . administrator upon said
estate, and whereas said administrator has duly qualified, hereby
authorize him or her to administer the same according to law.
Witness my hand and the seal of said court this . . . . day of
. . . . . . ((A.D., 19. . .)) (year). . . .

Sec. 13 RCW 11.68.110 and 1998 c 292 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a personal representative who has acquired nonintervention
powers does not apply to the court for either of the final decrees
provided for in RCW 11.68.100 as now or hereafter amended, the personal
representative shall, when the administration of the estate has been
completed, file a declaration that must state as follows:
(a) The date of the decedent's death and the decedent's residence
at the time of death;
(b) Whether or not the decedent died testate or intestate;
(c) If the decedent died testate, the date of the decedent's last
will and testament and the date of the order probating the will;
(d) That each creditor's claim which was justly due and properly
presented as required by law has been paid or otherwise disposed of by
agreement with the creditor, and that the amount of estate taxes due as
the result of the decedent's death has been determined, settled, and
paid;
(e) That the personal representative has completed the
administration of the decedent's estate without court intervention, and
the estate is ready to be closed;
(f) If the decedent died intestate, the names, addresses (if
known), and relationship of each heir of the decedent, together with
the distributive share of each heir; and
(g) The amount of fees paid or to be paid to each of the following:
(i) Personal representative or representatives; (ii) lawyer or lawyers;
(iii) appraiser or appraisers; and (iv) accountant or accountants; and
that the personal representative believes the fees to be reasonable and
does not intend to obtain court approval of the amount of the fees or
to submit an estate accounting to the court for approval.
(2) Subject to the requirement of notice as provided in this
section, unless an heir, devisee, or legatee of a decedent petitions
the court either for an order requiring the personal representative to
obtain court approval of the amount of fees paid or to be paid to the
personal representative, lawyers, appraisers, or accountants, or for an
order requiring an accounting, or both, within thirty days from the
date of filing a declaration of completion of probate, the personal
representative will be automatically discharged without further order
of the court and the representative's powers will cease thirty days
after the filing of the declaration of completion of probate, and the
declaration of completion of probate shall, at that time, be the
equivalent of the entry of a decree of distribution in accordance with
chapter 11.76 RCW for all legal intents and purposes.
(3) Within five days of the date of the filing of the declaration
of completion, the personal representative or the personal
representative's lawyer shall mail a copy of the declaration of
completion to each heir, legatee, or devisee of the decedent, who: (a)
Has not waived notice of the filing, in writing, filed in the cause;
and (b) either has not received the full amount of the distribution to
which the heir, legatee, or devisee is entitled or has a property right
that might be affected adversely by the discharge of the personal
representative under this section, together with a notice which shall
be substantially as follows:

(4) If all heirs, devisees, and legatees of the decedent entitled
to notice under this section waive, in writing, the notice required by
this section, the personal representative will be automatically
discharged without further order of the court and the declaration of
completion of probate will become effective as a decree of distribution
upon the date of filing thereof. In those instances where the personal
representative has been required to furnish bond, and a declaration of
completion is filed pursuant to this section, any bond furnished by the
personal representative shall be automatically discharged upon the
discharge of the personal representative.

Sec. 14 RCW 11.88.127 and 2011 c 329 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A guardian or limited guardian may not act on behalf of the
incapacitated person without valid letters of guardianship. Upon
appointment and fulfilling all legal requirements to serve, as set
forth in the court's order, the clerk shall issue letters of
guardianship to a guardian or limited guardian appointed by the court.
All letters of guardianship must be in the following form, or a
substantially similar form:

(2) The court shall order the clerk to issue letters of
guardianship that are valid for a period of up to five years from the
anniversary date of the appointment. When determining the time period
for which the letters will be valid, the court must consider: The
length of time the guardian has been serving the incapacitated person;
whether the guardian has timely filed all required reports with the
court; whether the guardian is monitored by other state or local
agencies; and whether there have been any allegations of abuse,
neglect, or a breach of fiduciary duty against the guardian.

Sec. 15 RCW 11.88.140 and 2011 c 329 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) TERMINATION WITHOUT COURT ORDER. A guardianship or limited
guardianship is terminated:
(a) Upon the attainment of full and legal age, as defined in RCW
26.28.010 as now or hereafter amended, of any person defined as an
incapacitated person pursuant to RCW 11.88.010 as now or hereafter
amended solely by reason of youth, RCW 26.28.020 to the contrary
notwithstanding, subject to subsection (2) of this section;
(b) By an adjudication of capacity or an adjudication of
termination of incapacity;
(c) By the death of the incapacitated person;
(d) By expiration of the term of limited guardianship specified in
the order appointing the limited guardian, unless prior to such
expiration a petition has been filed and served, as provided in RCW
11.88.040 as now or hereafter amended, seeking an extension of such
term.
(2) TERMINATION OF GUARDIANSHIP FOR A MINOR BY DECLARATION OF
COMPLETION. A guardianship for the benefit of a minor may be
terminated upon the minor's attainment of legal age, as defined in RCW
26.28.010 as now or hereafter amended, by the guardian filing a
declaration that states:
(a) The date the minor attained legal age;
(b) That the guardian has paid all of the minor's funds in the
guardian's possession to the minor, who has signed a receipt for the
funds, and that the receipt has been filed with the court;
(c) That the guardian has completed the administration of the
minor's estate and the guardianship is ready to be closed; and
(d) The amount of fees paid or to be paid to each of the following:
(i) The guardian, (ii) lawyer or lawyers, (iii) accountant or
accountants; and that the guardian believes the fees are reasonable and
does not intend to obtain court approval of the amount of the fees or
to submit a guardianship accounting to the court for approval. Subject
to the requirement of notice as provided in this section, unless the
minor petitions the court either for an order requiring the guardian to
obtain court approval of the amount of fees paid or to be paid to the
guardian, lawyers, or accountants, or for an order requiring an
accounting, or both, within thirty days from the filing of the
declaration of completion of guardianship, the guardian shall be
automatically discharged without further order of the court. The
guardian's powers will cease thirty days after filing the declaration
of completion of guardianship. The declaration of completion of
guardianship shall, at the time, be the equivalent of an entry of a
decree terminating the guardianship, distributing the assets, and
discharging the guardian for all legal intents and purposes.
Within five days of the date of filing the declaration of
completion of guardianship, the guardian or the guardian's lawyer shall
mail a copy of the declaration of completion to the minor together with
a notice that shall be substantially as follows:

CAPTION OF CASE NOTICE OF FILING A
DECLARATION OF
COMPLETION OF
GUARDIANSHIP

NOTICE IS GIVEN that the attached Declaration of
Completion of Guardianship was filed by the undersigned
in the above-entitled court on the . . . . . . day of . . . . . . ,
((19. . . )) (year). . . . ; unless you file a petition in the
above-entitled court requesting the court to review the
reasonableness of the fees, or for an accounting, or both,
and serve a copy of the petition on the guardian or the
guardian's lawyer, within thirty days after the filing date, the
amount of fees paid or to be paid will be deemed
reasonable, the acts of the guardian will be deemed
approved, the guardian will be automatically discharged
without further order of the court and the Declaration of
Completion of Guardianship will be final and deemed the
equivalent of an order terminating the guardianship,
discharging the guardian and decreeing the distribution of
the guardianship assets.

If you file and serve a petition within the period
specified, the undersigned will request the court to fix a
time and place for the hearing of your petition, and you will
be notified of the time and place of the hearing, by mail, or
by personal service, not less than ten days before the
hearing on the petition.

DATED this . . . . . . day of . . . . . . , ((19. . . ))
(year). . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Guardian

If the minor, after reaching legal age, waives in writing the
notice required by this section, the guardian will be automatically
discharged without further order of the court and the declaration of
completion of guardianship will be effective as an order terminating
the guardianship without an accounting upon filing the declaration. If
the guardian has been required to furnish a bond, and a declaration of
completion of guardianship is filed according to this section, any bond
furnished by the guardian shall be automatically discharged upon the
discharge of the guardian.
(3) TERMINATION ON COURT ORDER. A guardianship or limited
guardianship may be terminated by court order after such notice as the
court may require if the guardianship or limited guardianship is no
longer necessary.
The guardian or limited guardian shall, within ninety days of the
date of termination of the guardianship, unless the court orders a
different deadline for good cause, prepare and file with the court a
final verified account of administration. The final verified account
of administration shall contain the same information as required for
(a) an intermediate verified account of administration of the estate
under RCW 11.92.040(2) and (b) an intermediate personal care status
report under RCW 11.92.043(2).
(4) EFFECT OF TERMINATION. When a guardianship or limited
guardianship terminates other than by the death of the incapacitated
person, the powers of the guardian or limited guardian cease, except
that a guardian or limited guardian of the estate may make
disbursements for claims that are or may be allowed by the court, for
liabilities already properly incurred for the estate or for the
incapacitated person, and for expenses of administration. When a
guardianship or limited guardianship terminates by death of the
incapacitated person, the guardian or limited guardian of the estate
may proceed under RCW 11.88.150 as now or hereafter amended, but the
rights of all creditors against the incapacitated person's estate shall
be determined by the law of decedents' estates.

Sec. 16 RCW 11.96A.250 and 2001 c 14 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The personal representative or trustee may petition the
court having jurisdiction over the matter for the appointment of a
special representative to represent a person who is interested in the
estate or trust and: (i) Who is a minor; (ii) who is incompetent or
disabled; (iii) who is yet unborn or unascertained; or (iv) whose
identity or address is unknown. The petition may be heard by the court
without notice.
(b) In appointing the special representative the court shall give
due consideration and deference to any nomination(s) made in the
petition, the special skills required in the representation, and the
need for a representative who will act independently and prudently.
The nomination of a person as special representative by the personal
representative or trustee and the person's willingness to serve as
special representative are not grounds by themselves for finding a lack
of independence, however, the court may consider any interests that the
nominating fiduciary may have in the estate or trust in making the
determination.
(c) The special representative may enter into a binding agreement
on behalf of the person or beneficiary. The special representative may
be appointed for more than one person or class of persons if the
interests of such persons or class are not in conflict. The petition
shall be verified. The petition and order appointing the special
representative may be in the following form:

CAPTION PETITION FOR APPOINTMENT
OF CASE OF SPECIAL REPRESENTATIVE
UNDER RCW 11.96A.250

The undersigned petitioner petitions the court for the appointment
of a special representative in accordance with RCW 11.96A.250 and shows
the court as follows:
1. Petitioner. Petitioner . . . is the qualified and presently
acting (personal representative) (trustee) of the above (estate)
(trust) having been named (personal representative) (trustee) under
(describe will and reference probate order or describe trust
instrument).
2. Issue Concerning (Estate) (Trust) Administration. A question
concerning administration of the (estate) (trust) has arisen as to
(describe issue, for example: Related to interpretation, construction,
administration, distribution). The issues are appropriate for
determination under RCW 11.96A.250.
3. Beneficiaries. The beneficiaries of the (estate) (trust)
include persons who are unborn, unknown, or unascertained persons, or
who are under eighteen years of age.
4. Special Representative. The nominated special representative
. . . is a lawyer licensed to practice before the courts of this state
or an individual with special skill or training in the administration
of estates or trusts. The nominated special representative does not
have an interest in the affected estate or trust and is not related to
any person interested in the estate or trust. The nominated special
representative is willing to serve. The petitioner has no reason to
believe that the nominated special representative will not act in an
independent and prudent manner and in the best interests of the
represented parties. (It is recommended that the petitioner also
include information specifying the particular skills of the nominated
special representative that relate to the matter in issue.)
5. Resolution. Petitioner desires to achieve a resolution of the
questions that have arisen concerning the (estate) (trust). Petitioner
believes that proceeding in accordance with the procedures permitted
under RCW 11.96A.210 through 11.96A.250 would be in the best interests
of the (estate) (trust) and the beneficiaries.
6. Request of Court. Petitioner requests that . . .((,)) . . . an
attorney licensed to practice in the State of Washington.

(OR)

. . . . an individual with special skill or training in the
administration of estates or trusts

be appointed special representative for those beneficiaries who are not
yet adults, as well as for the unborn, unknown, and unascertained
beneficiaries, as provided under RCW 11.96A.250.

DATED this . . . day of . . . . ., . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Petitioner or petitioner's
legal representative)

VERIFICATION

I certify under penalty of perjury under the laws of the state of
Washington that the foregoing is true and correct.

DATED . . . . . ., ((2000)) (year). . . . , at . . . . . ., Washington.

. . . . . . . . .
(Petitioner or other person
having knowledge)

CAPTION ORDER FOR APPOINTMENT
OF CASE OF SPECIAL REPRESENTATIVE

THIS MATTER having come on for hearing before this Court on
Petition for Appointment of Special Representative filed herein, and it
appearing that it would be in the best interests of the (estate)
(trust) described in the Petition to appoint a special representative
to address the issues that have arisen concerning the (estate) (trust)
and the Court finding that the facts stated in the Petition are true,
now, therefore,
IT IS ORDERED that . . . is appointed under RCW 11.96A.250 as
special representative for the (estate) (trust) beneficiaries who are
not yet adult age, and for unborn, unknown, or unascertained
beneficiaries to represent their respective interests in the (estate)
(trust) as provided in RCW 11.96A.250. The special representative
shall be discharged of responsibility with respect to the (estate)
(trust) at such time as a written agreement is executed resolving the
present issues, all as provided in that statute, or if an agreement is
not reached within six months from entry of this Order, the special
representative appointed under this Order shall be discharged of
responsibility, subject to subsequent reappointment under RCW
11.96A.250.

DONE IN OPEN COURT this . . . day of . . . . ., . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
JUDGE/COURT COMMISSIONER

(2) Upon appointment by the court, the special representative shall
file a certification made under penalty of perjury in accordance with
RCW 9A.72.085 that he or she (a) is not interested in the estate or
trust; (b) is not related to any person interested in the estate or
trust; (c) is willing to serve; and (d) will act independently,
prudently, and in the best interests of the represented parties.
(3) The special representative must be a lawyer licensed to
practice before the courts of this state or an individual with special
skill or training in the administration of estates or trusts. The
special representative may not have an interest in the affected estate
or trust, and may not be related to a person interested in the estate
or trust. The special representative is entitled to reasonable
compensation for services that must be paid from the principal of the
estate or trust whose beneficiaries are represented.
(4) The special representative shall be discharged from any
responsibility and shall have no further duties with respect to the
estate or trust or with respect to any person interested in the estate
or trust, on the earlier of: (a) The expiration of six months from the
date the special representative was appointed unless the order
appointing the special representative provides otherwise, or (b) the
execution of the written agreement by all parties or their virtual
representatives. Any action against a special representative must be
brought within the time limits provided by RCW 11.96A.070(3)(c)(i).

Sec. 17 RCW 11.98.005 and 2011 c 327 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If provisions of a trust instrument designate Washington as the
situs of the trust or designate Washington law to govern the trust or
any of its terms, then the situs of the trust is Washington provided
that one of the following conditions is met:
(a) A trustee has a place of business in or a trustee is a resident
of Washington; or
(b) More than an insignificant part of the trust administration
occurs in Washington; or
(c) The trustor resides in Washington at the time situs is being
established, or resided in Washington at the time the trust became
irrevocable; or
(d) One or more of the beneficiaries resides in Washington; or
(e) An interest in real property located in Washington is an asset
of the trust.
(2)(a) Unless the trust instrument designates a state other than
Washington as the situs of the trust and does not expressly authorize
transfer of situs, the trustee may register the trust as a Washington
trust if any of the factors in subsection (1)(a) through (e) of this
section are present. The trustee shall register the trust by filing
with the clerk of the court in any county where venue lies for the
trust under RCW 11.96A.050, a statement including the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the trustee;
(ii) The date of the trust, name of the trustor, and name of the
trust, if any;
(iii) The factor or factors listed in subsection (1)(a) through (e)
of this section that are present for the trust and which qualify the
trust for registration.
(b) Within five days of filing the registration with the court, the
trustee shall mail a copy of the registration to each person who would
be entitled to notice under RCW 11.97.010 and has not waived notice of
the registration, in writing, filed in the cause, together with a
notice that must be in substantially the same form as set forth in this
section. Persons receiving such notice shall have thirty days from the
date of filing the registration to file a petition in the court
objecting to such registration and requesting the court to issue an
order that Washington is not the proper situs of the trust, and to
serve a copy of such petition upon the trustee or the trustee's lawyer.
If a petition objecting to the registration is filed within thirty days
of the date of filing the registration, the trustee must request the
court to fix a time and place for the hearing of the petition and
notify by mail, personal service or electronic transmission, if a valid
consent to electronic transmission is in effect under the terms of RCW
11.96A.110, all persons who were entitled to notice of the registration
of the time and place of the hearing, not less than ten days before the
hearing on the petition.
(c) Unless a person receiving notice of the registration files a
petition with the court objecting to the registration within thirty
days of the date of filing the registration, the registration shall be
deemed the equivalent of an order entered by the court declaring that
the situs of the trust is Washington. After expiration of the
thirty-day period following filing of the registration, the trustee may
obtain a certificate of registration signed by the clerk, and issued
under the seal of the court, which may be in the form specified in (d)
of this subsection.
(d) Notice of registration and certificates of registration may be
in the following form:
(i) Notice form:

NOTICE OF FILING OF REGISTRATION OF [NAME AND DATE OF TRUST] AS A
WASHINGTON TRUST
NOTICE IS GIVEN that the attached Registration of Trust was filed
by the undersigned in the above-entitled court on the . . . . day of
. . . . . ., ((20. . .)) (year). . . . ; unless you file a petition in
the above-entitled court objecting to such registration and requesting
the court to issue an order that Washington is not the proper situs of
the trust, and serve a copy thereof upon the trustee or the trustee's
lawyer, within thirty days after the date of the filing, the
registration will be deemed the equivalent of an order entered by the
court declaring that the situs of the trust is Washington.
If you file and serve a petition within the period specified, the
undersigned will request the court to fix a time and place for the
hearing of your petition, and you will be notified of the time and
place thereof, by mail, or personal service, not less than ten days
before the hearing on the petition.
(ii) Certificate of Registration:

State of Washington, County of . . . . . .
In the superior court of the county of . . . . . .
Whereas, the attached Registration of Trust was filed with this
court on . . . ., the attached Notice of Filing Registration of Trust
and Affidavit of Mailing Notice of Filing Registration of Trust were
filed with this court on . . . ., and no objections to such
Registration have been filed with this court, the trust known as
. . . ., under trust agreement dated . . . ., between . . . . as
Trustor and . . . . as Trustee, is hereby registered as a Washington
trust.
Witness my hand and the seal of said court this . . . day of
. . . . . ., ((20 . . ..)) (year). . . .

(3) If the instrument establishing a trust does not designate
Washington as the situs or designate Washington law to apply to the
trust, and the trustee of the trust has not registered the trust as
allowed in subsection (2) of this section, the situs of the trust is
Washington if the conditions specified in this subsection (3) are met.
(a) For a testamentary trust, the situs of the trust is Washington
if:
(i) The will was admitted to probate in Washington; or
(ii) The will has not been admitted to probate in Washington, but
any trustee of the trust resides or has a place of business in
Washington, any beneficiary entitled to notice under RCW 11.97.010
resides in Washington, or any real property that is an asset of the
trust is located in Washington.
(b) For an intervivos trust where the trustor is domiciled in
Washington either when the trust becomes irrevocable or, in the case of
a revocable trust, when judicial proceedings under chapter 11.96A RCW
are commenced, the situs of the trust is Washington if:
(i) The trustor is living and Washington is the trustor's domicile
or any of the trustees reside in or have a place of business in
Washington; or
(ii) The trustor is deceased, situs has not previously been
established by any court proceeding, and:
(A) The trustor's will was admitted to probate in Washington;
(B) The trustor's will was not admitted to probate in Washington,
but any person entitled to notice under RCW 11.97.010 resides in
Washington, any trustee resides or has a place of business in
Washington, or any real property that is an asset of the trust is
located in Washington.
(c) If the situs of the trust is not determined under (a) or (b) of
this subsection, the determination regarding the situs of the trust is
a matter for purposes of RCW 11.96A.030. Whether Washington is the
situs shall be determined by a court in a judicial proceeding conducted
under RCW 11.96A.080 if:
(i) A trustee has a place of business in or a trustee is a resident
of Washington; or
(ii) More than an insignificant part of the trust administration
occurs in Washington; or
(iii) One or more of the beneficiaries resides in Washington; or
(iv) An interest in real property located in Washington is an asset
of the trust.
(d) Determination of situs under (c) of this subsection (3) cannot
be made by nonjudicial agreement under RCW 11.96A.220.

Sec. 18 RCW 12.04.020 and 2010 c 8 s 3001 are each amended to
read as follows:
A party desiring to commence an action before a justice of the
peace, for the recovery of a debt by summons, shall file his or her
claim with the justice of the peace, verified by his or her own oath,
or that of his or her agent or attorney, and thereupon the justice of
the peace shall, on payment of his or her fees, if demanded, issue a
summons to the opposite party, which summons shall be in the following
form, or as nearly as the case will admit, viz:

And the summons shall specify a certain place, day and hour for the
appearance and answer of the defendant, not less than six nor more than
twenty days from the date of filing plaintiff's claim with the justice,
which summons shall be served at least five days before the time of
trial mentioned therein, and shall be served by the officer delivering
to the defendant, or leaving at his or her place of abode with some
person over twelve years of age, a true copy of such summons, certified
by the officer to be such.

Sec. 19 RCW 12.04.030 and 2010 c 8 s 3002 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person desiring to commence an action before a justice of the
peace, by the service of a complaint and notice, can do so by filing
his or her complaint verified by his or her own oath or that of his or
her agent or attorney with the justice, and when such complaint is so
filed, upon payment of his or her fees if demanded, the justice shall
attach thereto a notice, which shall be substantially as follows:

Sec. 20 RCW 12.04.100 and 1985 c 469 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
In case personal service cannot be had by reason of the absence of
the defendant from the county in which the action is sought to be
commenced, it shall be proper to publish the summons or notice with a
brief statement of the object and prayer of the claim or complaint, in
some newspaper of general circulation in the county wherein the action
is commenced, which notice shall be published not less than once a week
for three weeks prior to the time fixed for the hearing of the cause,
which shall not be less than four weeks from the first publication of
the notice.
The notice may be substantially as follows:

Sec. 21 RCW 12.04.201 and 2010 c 8 s 3014 are each amended to
read as follows:

Sec. 22 RCW 12.04.203 and 2010 c 8 s 3015 are each amended to
read as follows:

Sec. 23 RCW 12.04.204 and 1957 c 89 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:

Sec. 24 RCW 12.04.205 and 1957 c 89 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:

Sec. 25 RCW 12.04.206 and 2010 c 8 s 3016 are each amended to
read as follows:

FORM OF UNDERTAKING IN REPLEVIN

Whereas, A B, plaintiff, has commenced an action before J P, one of
the justices of the peace in and for . . . . . . county, against C D,
defendant, for the recovery of certain personal property, mentioned and
described in the affidavit of the plaintiff, to wit: [here set forth
the property claimed]. Now, therefore we, A B, plaintiff, E F and G H,
acknowledge ourselves bound unto C D in the sum of . . . . . . dollars
for the prosecution of the action for the return of the property to the
defendant, if return thereof be adjudged, and for the payment to him or
her of such sum as may for any cause be recovered against the
plaintiff.
Dated the . . . . day of . . . . . . , ((19. . . )) (year). . . .
A B, E F, G H.

Sec. 26 RCW 12.04.207 and 2010 c 8 s 3017 are each amended to
read as follows:

FORM OF UNDERTAKING IN ATTACHMENT

Whereas, an application has been made by A B, plaintiff, to J P,
one of the justices of the peace in and for . . . . . . county, for a
writ of attachment against the personal property of C D, defendant;
Now, therefore, we, A B, plaintiff, and E F, acknowledge ourselves
bound to C D in the sum of . . . . . . dollars, that if the defendant
recover judgment in this action, the plaintiff will pay all costs that
may be awarded to the defendant, and all damages which he or she may
sustain by reason of the said attachment and not exceeding the sum of
. . . . . . dollars.
Dated the . . . . day of . . . . . . , ((19. . . )) (year). . . .
A B, E F.

FORM OF UNDERTAKING
TO DISCHARGE ATTACHMENT

Whereas, a writ of attachment has been issued by J P, one of the
justices of the peace in and for . . . . . . county, against the
personal property of C D, defendant, in an action in which A B is
plaintiff; Now, therefore, we C D, defendant, E F, and G H, acknowledge
ourselves bound unto J K, constable, in the sum of . . . . . .
dollars, [double the value of the property], engaging to deliver the
property attached, to wit: [here set forth a list of articles
attached], or pay the value thereof to the sheriff or constable, to
whom the execution upon a judgment obtained by plaintiff in the
aforesaid action may be issued.
Dated this . . . . day of . . . . . . , ((19. . . ))
(year). . . . C D, E F, G H.

Sec. 27 RCW 12.40.110 and 1998 c 52 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the losing party fails to pay the judgment according to the
terms and conditions thereof within thirty days or is in arrears on any
payment plan, and the prevailing party so notifies the court, the court
shall certify the judgment in substantially the following form:

(2) The clerk shall forthwith enter the judgment transcript on the
judgment docket of the district court; and thereafter garnishment,
execution, and other process on execution provided by law may issue
thereon, as in other judgments of district courts.
(3) Transcripts of such judgments may be filed and entered in
judgment lien dockets in superior courts with like effect as in other
cases.

Sec. 28 RCW 17.28.090 and 2011 c 336 s 464 are each amended to
read as follows:
If, from the testimony given before the county commissioners, it
appears to that board that the public necessity or welfare requires the
formation of the district, it shall, by an order entered on its
minutes, declare that to be its finding, and shall further declare and
order that the territory within the boundaries so fixed and determined
be organized as a district, under an appropriate name to be selected by
the county commissioners, subject to approval of the voters of the
district as hereinafter provided. The name shall contain the words
"mosquito control district."
At the time of the declaration establishing and naming the
district, the county commissioners shall by resolution call a special
election to be held not less than thirty days and not more than sixty
days from the date thereof, and shall cause to be published a notice of
such election at least once a week for three consecutive weeks in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county, setting forth the hours
during which the polls will be open, the boundaries of the proposed
district as finally adopted, and the object of the election. If any
portion of the proposed district lies in another county, a notice of
such election shall likewise be published in that county.
The election on the formation of the mosquito control district
shall be conducted by the auditor of the county in which the greater
area of the proposed district is located in accordance with the general
election laws of the state and the results thereof shall be canvassed
by that county's canvassing board. For the purpose of conducting an
election under this section, the auditor of the county in which the
greater area of the proposed district is located may appoint the
auditor of any county or the city clerk of any city lying wholly or
partially within the proposed district as his or her deputies. No
person shall be entitled to vote at such election unless he or she is
a qualified voter under the laws of the state in effect at the time of
such election and has resided within the mosquito control district for
at least thirty days preceding the date of the election. The ballot
proposition shall be in substantially the following form:

If a majority of the persons voting on the proposition shall vote
in favor thereof, the mosquito control district shall thereupon be
established and the county commissioners of the county in which the
greater area of the district is situated shall immediately file for
record in the office of the county auditor of each county in which any
portion of the land embraced in the district is situated, and shall
also forward to the county commissioners of each of the other counties,
if any, in which any portion of the district is situated, and also
shall file with the secretary of state, a certified copy of the order
of the county commissioners. From and after the date of the filing of
the certified copy with the secretary of state, the district named
therein is organized as a district, with all the rights, privileges,
and powers set forth in this chapter, or necessarily incident thereto.
If a majority of the persons voting on the proposition shall vote
in favor thereof, all expenses of the election shall be paid by the
mosquito control district when organized. If the proposition fails to
receive a majority of votes in favor, the expenses of the election
shall be borne by the respective counties in which the district is
located in proportion to the number of votes cast in said counties.

Sec. 29 RCW 18.44.251 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 47 are each
amended to read as follows:
A request for a waiver of the required errors and omissions policy
may be accomplished under the statute by submitting to the director an
affidavit that substantially addresses the following:

Sec. 30 RCW 19.120.040 and 1986 c 320 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding the terms of any motor fuel franchise, the interest
of a motor fuel retailer under such an agreement shall be considered
personal property and shall devolve on the death of the motor fuel
retailer to a designated successor in interest of the retailer, limited
to the retailer's spouse, adult child, or adult stepchild or, if no
successor in interest is designated, to the retailer's spouse, if any.
The designation shall be made, witnessed in writing by at least two
persons, and delivered to the motor fuel refiner-supplier during the
term of the franchise. The designation may be revised at any time by
the motor fuel retailer and shall be substantially in the following
form:

"I (motor fuel retailer name) at the . . . . . . service
station located at . . . . . ., in the City of . . . . . .,
Washington, designate . . . . . . as my successor in interest
under RCW 19.120.030 and . . . . . . as my alternate successor
if the originally designated successor is unable or unwilling
so to act.

I so specify this . . . . day of . . . . . .,
((19. . .)) (year). . . . "

The motor fuel refiner-supplier shall assist the designated
successor in interest temporarily in the day-to-day operation of the
service station to insure continued operation of the service station.

Sec. 31 RCW 26.04.090 and 1967 c 26 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person solemnizing a marriage shall, within thirty days
thereafter, make and deliver to the county auditor of the county
wherein the license was issued a certificate for the files of the
county auditor, and a certificate for the files of the state registrar
of vital statistics. The certificate for the files of the county
auditor shall be substantially as follows:

The certificate for the files of the state registrar of vital
statistics shall be in accordance with RCW 70.58.200. The certificate
forms for the files of the county auditor and for the files of the
state registrar of vital statistics shall be provided by the state
registrar of vital statistics.

Sec. 32 RCW 26.18.100 and 2008 c 6 s 1033 are each amended to
read as follows:
The wage assignment order shall be substantially in the following
form:

The above-named obligee claims that the above-named obligor is
subject to a support order requiring immediate income withholding or is
more than fifteen days past due in either child support or maintenance
payments, or both, in an amount equal to or greater than the child
support or maintenance payable for one month. The amount of the
accrued child support or maintenance debt as of this date is
. . . . . . dollars, the amount of arrearage payments specified in the
support or maintenance order (if applicable) is . . . . . . dollars per
. . . . . ., and the amount of the current and continuing support or
maintenance obligation under the order is . . . . . . dollars per
. . . . . .
You are hereby commanded to answer this order by filling in the
attached form according to the instructions, and you must mail or
deliver the original of the answer to the court, one copy to the
Washington state support registry, one copy to the obligee or obligee's
attorney, and one copy to the obligor within twenty days after service
of this wage assignment order upon you.
If you possess any earnings or other remuneration for employment
due and owing to the obligor, then you shall do as follows:
(1) Withhold from the obligor's earnings or remuneration each
month, or from each regular earnings disbursement, the lesser of:
(a) The sum of the accrued support or maintenance debt and the
current support or maintenance obligation;
(b) The sum of the specified arrearage payment amount and the
current support or maintenance obligation; or
(c) Fifty percent of the disposable earnings or remuneration of the
obligor.
(2) The total amount withheld above is subject to the wage
assignment order, and all other sums may be disbursed to the obligor.
(3) Upon receipt of this wage assignment order you shall make
immediate deductions from the obligor's earnings or remuneration and
remit to the Washington state support registry or other address
specified below the proper amounts within five working days of each
regular pay interval.
You shall continue to withhold the ordered amounts from nonexempt
earnings or remuneration of the obligor until notified by:
(a) The court that the wage assignment has been modified or
terminated; or
(b) The addressee specified in the wage assignment order under this
section that the accrued child support or maintenance debt has been
paid.
You shall promptly notify the court and the addressee specified in
the wage assignment order under this section if and when the employee
is no longer employed by you, or if the obligor no longer receives
earnings or remuneration from you. If you no longer employ the
employee, the wage assignment order shall remain in effect until you
are no longer in possession of any earnings or remuneration owed to the
employee.
You shall deliver the withheld earnings or remuneration to the
Washington state support registry or other address stated below within
five working days of each regular pay interval.
You shall deliver a copy of this order to the obligor as soon as is
reasonably possible. This wage assignment order has priority over any
other wage assignment or garnishment, except for another wage
assignment or garnishment for child support or maintenance, or order to
withhold or deliver under chapter 74.20A RCW.

WHETHER OR NOT YOU OWE ANYTHING TO THE OBLIGOR, YOUR FAILURE TO
ANSWER AS REQUIRED MAY MAKE YOU LIABLE FOR THE AMOUNT OF
SUPPORT MONEYS THAT SHOULD HAVE BEEN WITHHELD FROM THE
OBLIGOR'S EARNINGS OR SUBJECT TO CONTEMPT OF COURT.

NOTICE TO OBLIGOR: YOU HAVE A RIGHT TO REQUEST A HEARING IN THE
SUPERIOR COURT THAT ISSUED THIS WAGE ASSIGNMENT ORDER, TO REQUEST THAT
THE COURT QUASH, MODIFY, OR TERMINATE THE WAGE ASSIGNMENT ORDER.
REGARDLESS OF THE FACT THAT YOUR WAGES ARE BEING WITHHELD PURSUANT TO
THIS ORDER, YOU MAY HAVE SUSPENDED OR NOT RENEWED A PROFESSIONAL,
DRIVER'S, OR OTHER LICENSE IF YOU ACCRUE CHILD SUPPORT ARREARAGES
TOTALING MORE THAN SIX MONTHS OF CHILD SUPPORT PAYMENTS OR FAIL TO MAKE
PAYMENTS TOWARDS A SUPPORT ARREARAGE IN AN AMOUNT THAT EXCEEDS SIX
MONTHS OF PAYMENTS.

DATED THIS . . . . day of . . . ., ((19. . .)) (year). . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

Obligee, Judge/Court Commissioner

or obligee's attorney

Send withheld payments to: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Sec. 33 RCW 26.50.085 and 1992 c 143 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the respondent was not personally served with the petition,
notice of hearing, and ex parte order before the hearing, the court
shall reset the hearing for twenty-four days from the date of entry of
the order and may order service by publication instead of personal
service under the following circumstances:
(a) The sheriff or municipal officer files an affidavit stating
that the officer was unable to complete personal service upon the
respondent. The affidavit must describe the number and types of
attempts the officer made to complete service;
(b) The petitioner files an affidavit stating that the petitioner
believes that the respondent is hiding from the server to avoid
service. The petitioner's affidavit must state the reasons for the
belief that the ((petitioner [respondent])) respondent is avoiding
service;
(c) The server has deposited a copy of the summons, in
substantially the form prescribed in subsection (3) of this section,
notice of hearing, and the ex parte order of protection in the post
office, directed to the respondent at the respondent's last known
address, unless the server states that the server does not know the
respondent's address; and
(d) The court finds reasonable grounds exist to believe that the
respondent is concealing himself or herself to avoid service, and that
further attempts to personally serve the respondent would be futile or
unduly burdensome.
(2) The court shall reissue the temporary order of protection not
to exceed another twenty-four days from the date of reissuing the ex
parte protection order and order to provide service by publication.
(3) The publication shall be made in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county where the petition was brought and in the
county of the last known address of the respondent once a week for
three consecutive weeks. The newspaper selected must be one of the
three most widely circulated papers in the county. The publication of
summons shall not be made until the court orders service by publication
under this section. Service of the summons shall be considered
complete when the publication has been made for three consecutive
weeks. The summons must be signed by the petitioner. The summons
shall contain the date of the first publication, and shall require the
respondent upon whom service by publication is desired, to appear and
answer the petition on the date set for the hearing. The summons shall
also contain a brief statement of the reason for the petition and a
summary of the provisions under the ex parte order. The summons shall
be essentially in the following form:

Sec. 34 RCW 35.22.110 and 1965 ex.s. c 47 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
The authentication of the charter shall be by certificate of the
mayor in substance as follows:

"I . . . . . ., mayor of the city of . . . . . . do hereby certify
that in accordance with the provisions of the Constitution and statutes
of the State of Washington, the city of . . . . . . caused fifteen
freeholders to be elected on the . . . . day of . . . . . . ((19. . .))
(year). . . . to prepare a charter for the city; that due notice of
that election was given in the manner provided by law and that the
following persons were declared elected to prepare and propose a
charter for the city, to wit: . . . . . . . . .
That thereafter on the . . . . day of . . . . . . ((19. . .))
(year). . . . the board of freeholders returned a proposed charter for
the city of . . . . . . signed by the following members thereof:
. . . . . . . . .
That thereafter the proposed charter was published in (Indicate
name of newspaper in which published) for at least once each week for
four weeks next preceding the day of submitting the same to the
electors for their approval. (Indicate dates of publication)
That thereafter on the . . . . day of . . . . . . ((19. . .))
(year). . . . , at an election duly called and held, the proposed
charter was submitted to the qualified electors thereof, and the
returns canvassed resulting as follows: For the proposed charter,
. . . . votes; against the proposed charter, . . . . votes; majority
for the proposed charter, . . . . votes; whereupon the charter was
declared adopted by a majority of the qualified electors voting at the
election.
I further certify that the foregoing is a full, true and complete
copy of the proposed charter so voted upon and adopted as aforesaid.
IN TESTIMONY WHEREOF, I hereunto set my hand and affix the
corporate seal of said city at my office this . . . . day of
. . . . . . ((19. . .)) (year). . . .

Attest:

Clerk of the city of . . . . . . (Corporate Seal)."

Immediately after authentication, the authenticated charter shall
be recorded by the city clerk in a book provided for that purpose known
as the charter book of the city of . . . . . . and when so recorded
shall be attested by the clerk and mayor under the corporate seal of
the city. All amendments shall be in like manner recorded and
attested.
All courts shall take judicial notice of a charter and all
amendments thereto when recorded and attested as required in this
section.

Sec. 35 RCW 35.58.090 and 1993 c 240 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The election on the formation of the metropolitan municipal
corporation shall be conducted by the auditor of the central county in
accordance with the general election laws of the state and the results
thereof shall be canvassed by the county canvassing board of the
central county, which shall certify the result of the election to the
county legislative authority of the central county, and shall cause a
certified copy of such canvass to be filed in the office of the
secretary of state. Notice of the election shall be published in one
or more newspapers of general circulation in each component county in
the manner provided in the general election laws. No person shall be
entitled to vote at such election unless that person is a qualified
voter under the laws of the state in effect at the time of such
election and has resided within the metropolitan area for at least
thirty days preceding the date of the election. The ballot proposition
shall be in substantially the following form:

"FORMATION OF METROPOLITAN MUNICIPAL CORPORATION

Shall a metropolitan municipal corporation be established for
the area described in a resolution of the county legislative
authority of . . . . . . county adopted on the . . . . day of
. . . . . ., ((19. . .)) (year). . . . , to perform the
metropolitan functions of . . . . . . (here insert the title of
each of the functions to be authorized as set forth in the
petition or initial resolution).

YES. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . □
NO . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . □ "

If a majority of the persons voting on the proposition residing
within the central city shall vote in favor thereof and a majority of
the persons voting on the proposition residing in the metropolitan area
outside of the central city shall vote in favor thereof, the
metropolitan municipal corporation shall thereupon be established and
the county legislative authority of the central county shall adopt a
resolution setting a time and place for the first meeting of the
metropolitan council which shall be held not later than sixty days
after the date of such election. A copy of such resolution shall be
transmitted to the legislative body of each component city and county
and of each special district which shall be affected by the particular
metropolitan functions authorized.
At the same election there shall be submitted to the voters
residing within the metropolitan area, for their approval or rejection,
a proposition authorizing the metropolitan municipal corporation, if
formed, to levy at the earliest time permitted by law on all taxable
property located within the metropolitan municipal corporation a
general tax, for one year, of twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value in excess of any constitutional or statutory limitation
for authorized purposes of the metropolitan municipal corporation. The
proposition shall be expressed on the ballots in substantially the
following form:

"ONE YEAR TWENTY-FIVE CENTS PER THOUSAND DOLLARS OF ASSESSED VALUE LEVY

Shall the metropolitan municipal corporation, if formed, levy
a general tax of twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value for one year upon all the taxable property
within said corporation in excess of the constitutional and/or
statutory tax limits for authorized purposes of the
corporation?

YES. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . □
NO . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . □ "

Such proposition to be effective must be approved by a majority of at
least three-fifths of the persons voting on the proposition to levy
such tax, with a forty percent validation requirement, in the manner
set forth in Article VII, section 2(a) of the Constitution of this
state.

Sec. 36 RCW 35A.08.120 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.08.120 are each
amended to read as follows:
The authentication of the charter shall be by certificate of the
mayor in substance as follows:

"I, . . . . . ., mayor of the city of . . . . . ., do hereby
certify that in accordance with the provisions of the Constitution and
statutes of the state of Washington, the city of . . . . . . caused
fifteen freeholders to be elected on the . . . . . . day of
. . . . . ., ((19. . .)) (year). . . . as a charter commission to
prepare a charter for the city; that due notice of that election was
given in the manner provided by law and that the following persons were
declared elected to prepare and propose a charter for the city, to wit:
. . . . . . . . . . . .
That thereafter on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., ((19. . .))
(year). . . . the charter commission returned a proposed charter for
the city of . . . . . . signed by the following members thereof:
. . . . . .
That thereafter the proposed charter was published in
. . . . . . . . . (indicate name of newspaper in which published), for
at least once each week for four weeks next preceding the day of
submitting the same to the electors for their approval.
(Indicate dates of publication.)
That thereafter on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., ((19. . .))
(year). . . . , at an election duly called and held, the proposed
charter was submitted to the qualified electors thereof, and the
returns canvassed resulting as follows: For the proposed charter
. . . . votes; against the proposed charter, . . . . votes; majority
for the proposed charter, . . . . votes; whereupon the charter was
declared adopted by a majority of the qualified electors voting at the
election.
I further certify that the foregoing is a full, true and complete
copy of the proposed charter so voted upon and adopted as aforesaid.
IN TESTIMONY WHEREOF, I hereunto set my hand and affix the
corporate seal of the said city at my office this . . . . day of
. . . . . ., ((19. . .)) (year). . . .

Attest:
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Clerk of the city of . . . . . . (corporate seal)."

Immediately after authentication, the authenticated charter shall
be recorded by the city clerk in a book provided for that purpose known
as the charter book of the city of . . . . . . and when so recorded
shall be attested by the clerk and mayor under the corporate seal of
the city. All amendments shall be in like manner recorded and
attested.
All courts shall take judicial notice of a charter and all
amendments thereto when recorded and attested as required in this
section.

Sec. 37 RCW 36.24.110 and 2009 c 549 s 4037 are each amended to
read as follows:
The coroner's warrant shall be in substantially the following form:

Sec. 38 RCW 36.60.020 and 1983 c 303 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority proposing to establish a county
rail district, or to modify the boundaries of an existing county rail
district, or to dissolve an existing county rail district, shall
conduct a hearing at the time and place specified in a notice published
at least once, not less than ten days prior to the hearing, in a
newspaper of general circulation within the proposed county rail
district. This notice shall be in addition to any other notice
required by law to be published. Additional notice of the hearing may
be given by mail, posting within the proposed county rail district, or
in any manner the county legislative authority deems necessary to
notify affected persons. All hearings shall be public and the county
legislative authority shall hear objections from any person affected by
the formation, modification of the boundaries, or dissolution of the
county rail district.
(2) Following the hearing held under subsection (1) of this
section, the county legislative authority may adopt a resolution
providing for the submission of a proposal to establish a county rail
district, modify the boundaries of an existing county rail district, or
dissolve an existing county rail district, if the county legislative
authority finds the proposal to be in the public interest. The
resolution shall contain the boundaries of the district if applicable.
A proposition to create a county rail district, modify the
boundaries of an existing county rail district, or dissolve an existing
rail district shall be submitted to the affected voters at the next
general election held sixty or more days after the adoption of the
resolution providing for the submittal by the county legislative
authority. The resolution shall establish the boundaries of the
district and include a finding that the creation of the district is in
the public interest and that the area included within the district can
reasonably be expected to benefit from its creation. No portion of a
city may be included in such a district unless the entire city is
included.
The district shall be created upon approval of the proposition by
simple majority vote. The ballot proposition submitted to the voters
shall be in substantially the following form:

FORMATION OF COUNTY RAIL DISTRICT . . . . . .

Shall a county rail district be established for the area described in
a resolution of the legislative authority of . . . . . . county,
adopted on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., ((19. . .)) (year). . . . ?

Yes. . . . . . . .

No . . . . . . . .

Sec. 39 RCW 36.68.470 and 1981 c 210 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon making findings under the provisions of RCW 36.68.460, the
county legislative authority shall, by resolution, order an election of
the voters of the proposed park and recreation service area to
determine if the service area shall be formed. The county legislative
authority shall in their resolution direct the county auditor to set
the election to be held at the next general election or at a special
election held for such purpose; describe the purposes of the proposed
service area; set forth the estimated cost of any initial improvements
or services to be financed by the service area should it be formed;
describe the method of financing the initial improvements or services
described in the resolution or petition; and order that notice of
election be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county at least twice prior to the election date.
(2) A proposition to form a park and recreation service area shall
be submitted to the voters of the proposed service area. Upon approval
by a majority of the voters voting on the proposition, a park and
recreation service area shall be established. The proposition
submitted to the voters by the county auditor on the ballot shall be in
substantially the following form:

Sec. 40 RCW 41.50.590 and 1991 c 365 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The mandatory benefits assignment order shall be in the following
form:

The above-named obligee claims that the above-named obligor is more
than fifteen days past due in spousal maintenance payments and that the
total amount of such past due payments is equal to or greater than one
hundred dollars or that the obligor has requested a withdrawal of
accumulated contributions from the department of retirement systems.
The amount of the accrued past due spousal maintenance debt as of this
date is . . . . . . dollars. If the obligor is receiving periodic
retirement payments from the department, the amount to be withheld from
the obligor's benefits to satisfy such accrued spousal maintenance is
. . . . . . dollars per month and the amount to be withheld from the
obligor's benefits to satisfy current and continuing spousal
maintenance is . . . . . . per month. Upon satisfaction of the accrued
past due spousal maintenance debt, the department shall withhold only
. . . . . . dollars, the amount necessary to satisfy current and
continuing spousal maintenance from the obligor's benefits. If the
obligor has requested a withdrawal of accumulated contributions from
the department, the amount to be withheld from the obligor's benefits
to satisfy such accrued spousal maintenance is . . . . . . dollars.
You are hereby commanded to answer this order by filling in the
attached form according to the instructions, and you must mail or
deliver the original of the answer to the court, one copy to the
obligee or obligee's attorney, and one copy to the obligor within
twenty days after service of this benefits assignment order upon you.
(1) If you are currently paying periodic retirement payments to the
obligor, then you shall do as follows:
(a) Withhold from the obligor's retirement payments each month the
lesser of:
(i) The sum of the specified arrearage payment amount plus the
specified current spousal maintenance amount; or
(ii) Fifty percent of the disposable benefits of the obligor.
(b) The total amount withheld above is subject to the mandatory
benefits assignment order, and all other sums may be disbursed to the
obligor.
You shall continue to withhold the ordered amounts from nonexempt
benefits of the obligor until notified by a court order that the
mandatory benefits assignment order has been modified or terminated.
You shall promptly notify the court if and when the obligor is no
longer receiving periodic retirement payments from the department of
retirement systems.
You shall deliver the withheld benefits to the clerk of the court
that issued this mandatory benefits assignment order each month, but
the first delivery shall occur no sooner than twenty days after your
receipt of this mandatory benefits assignment order.
(2) If you are not currently paying periodic retirement payments to
the obligor but the obligor has requested a withdrawal of accumulated
contributions, then you shall do as follows:
(a) Withhold from the obligor's benefits the sum of the specified
arrearage payment amount plus the specified interest amount, up to one
hundred percent of the disposable benefits of the obligor.
(b) The total amount withheld above is subject to the mandatory
benefits assignment order, and all other sums may be disbursed to the
obligor.
You shall mail a copy of this order and a copy of your answer to
the obligor at the mailing address in the department's files as soon as
is reasonably possible. This mandatory benefits assignment order has
priority over any assignment or order of execution, garnishment,
attachment, levy, or similar legal process authorized by Washington
law, except for a wage assignment order for child support under chapter
26.18 RCW or order to withhold or deliver under chapter 74.20A RCW.

Sec. 41 RCW 43.20B.040 and 1990 c 100 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The form of the lien in RCW 43.20B.060 shall be substantially as
follows:

STATEMENT OF LIEN

Notice is hereby given that the State of Washington, Department of
Social and Health Services, has rendered assistance or provided
residential care to . . . . . ., a person who was injured on or about
the . . . . day of . . . . . . in the county of . . . . . . state of
. . . . . ., and the said department hereby asserts a lien, to the
extent provided in RCW 43.20B.060, for the amount of such assistance or
residential care, upon any sum due and owing . . . . . . (name of
injured person) from . . . . . ., alleged to have caused the injury,
and/or his or her insurer and from any other person or insurer liable
for the injury or obligated to compensate the injured person on account
of such injuries by contract or otherwise.

STATE OF WASHINGTON, DEPARTMENT

OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

By: . . . . . . . . . . . . (Title)

STATE OF WASHINGTON |
|
>
|
|

ss.

COUNTY OF

I, . . . . . ., being first duly sworn, on oath state: That I
am . . . . . . (title); that I have read the foregoing Statement
of Lien, know the contents thereof, and believe the same to
be true.

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Signed and sworn to or affirmed before me this . . . .
day of . . . . . ., ((19. . .)) (year). . . .

by . . . . . . . . . . . .

(name of person making statement).

(Seal or stamp)

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Notary Public in and for the State

of Washington

My appointment expires: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Sec. 42 RCW 58.09.080 and 1973 c 50 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Certificates shall appear on the record of survey map as follows:

SURVEYOR'S CERTIFICATE

This map correctly represents a survey made by me or under my
direction in conformance with the requirements of the Survey Recording
Act at the request of . . . . . . . . . in . . . . . ., ((19. . .))
(year). . . .

AUDITOR'S CERTIFICATE

Filed for record this . . . . day of . . . . . ., ((19. . .))
(year). . . . at . . . . .M. in book . . . . of . . . . at page
. . . . at the request of . . . . . . . . .

Sec. 43 RCW 59.18.257 and 2012 c 41 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Prior to obtaining any information about a prospective
tenant, the prospective landlord shall first notify the prospective
tenant in writing, or by posting, of the following:
(i) What types of information will be accessed to conduct the
tenant screening;
(ii) What criteria may result in denial of the application; and
(iii) If a consumer report is used, the name and address of the
consumer reporting agency and the prospective tenant's rights to obtain
a free copy of the consumer report in the event of a denial or other
adverse action, and to dispute the accuracy of information appearing in
the consumer report.
(b)(i) The landlord may charge a prospective tenant for costs
incurred in obtaining a tenant screening report only if the prospective
landlord provides the information as required in (a) of this
subsection.
(ii) If a prospective landlord conducts his or her own screening of
tenants, the prospective landlord may charge his or her actual costs in
obtaining the background information only if the prospective landlord
provides the information as required in (a) of this subsection. The
amount charged may not exceed the customary costs charged by a
screening service in the general area. The prospective landlord's
actual costs include costs incurred for long distance phone calls and
for time spent calling landlords, employers, and financial
institutions.
(c) If a prospective landlord takes an adverse action, the
prospective landlord shall provide a written notice of the adverse
action to the prospective tenant that states the reasons for the
adverse action. The adverse action notice must contain the following
information in a substantially similar format, including additional
information as may be required under chapter 19.182 RCW:

"ADVERSE ACTION NOTICE

Name
Address
City/State/Zip Code

This notice is to inform you that your application has been:
..... Rejected
..... Approved with conditions:
..... Residency requires an increased deposit
..... Residency requires a qualified guarantor
..... Residency requires last month's rent
..... Residency requires an increased monthly rent of $........
..... Other:

Adverse action on your application was based on the following:
..... Information contained in a consumer report (The prospective
landlord must include the name, address, and phone number of the
consumer reporting agency that furnished the consumer report that
contributed to the adverse action.)
..... The consumer credit report did not contain sufficient information
..... Information received from previous rental history or reference
..... Information received in a criminal record
..... Information received in a civil record
..... Information received from an employment verification

Dated this ..... day of ........, ((20....)) (year). . . .

Agent/Owner Signature"

(2) Any landlord or prospective landlord who violates this section
may be liable to the prospective tenant for an amount not to exceed one
hundred dollars. The prevailing party may also recover court costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees.
(3) A stakeholder work group comprised of landlords, tenant
advocates, and representatives of consumer reporting and tenant
screening companies shall convene for the purposes of addressing the
issues of tenant screening including, but not limited to: A tenant's
cost of obtaining a tenant screening report; the portability of tenant
screening reports; criteria used to evaluate a prospective tenant's
background, including which court records may or may not be considered;
and the regulation of tenant screening services. Specific
recommendations on these issues are due to the legislature by December
1, 2012.
(4) This section does not limit a prospective tenant's rights or
the duties of a screening service as otherwise provided in chapter
19.182 RCW.

Sec. 44 RCW 59.18.575 and 2009 c 395 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If a tenant notifies the landlord in writing that he or she
or a household member was a victim of an act that constitutes a crime
of domestic violence, sexual assault, unlawful harassment, or stalking,
and either (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection applies, then subsection
(2) of this section applies:
(i) The tenant or the household member has a valid order for
protection under one or more of the following: Chapter 7.90, 26.50, or
26.26 RCW or RCW 9A.46.040, 9A.46.050, 10.14.080, 10.99.040 (2) or (3),
or 26.09.050; or
(ii) The tenant or the household member has reported the domestic
violence, sexual assault, unlawful harassment, or stalking to a
qualified third party acting in his or her official capacity and the
qualified third party has provided the tenant or the household member
a written record of the report signed by the qualified third party.
(b) When a copy of a valid order for protection or a written record
of a report signed by a qualified third party, as required under (a) of
this subsection, is made available to the landlord, the tenant may
terminate the rental agreement and quit the premises without further
obligation under the rental agreement or under this chapter ((59.18
RCW)). However, the request to terminate the rental agreement must
occur within ninety days of the reported act, event, or circumstance
that gave rise to the protective order or report to a qualified third
party. A record of the report to a qualified third party that is
provided to the tenant or household member shall consist of a document
signed and dated by the qualified third party stating: (i) That the
tenant or the household member notified him or her that he or she was
a victim of an act or acts that constitute a crime of domestic
violence, sexual assault, unlawful harassment, or stalking; (ii) the
time and date the act or acts occurred; (iii) the location where the
act or acts occurred; (iv) a brief description of the act or acts of
domestic violence, sexual assault, unlawful harassment, or stalking;
and (v) that the tenant or household member informed him or her of the
name of the alleged perpetrator of the act or acts. The record of the
report provided to the tenant or household member shall not include the
name of the alleged perpetrator of the act or acts of domestic
violence, sexual assault, unlawful harassment, or stalking. The
qualified third party shall keep a copy of the record of the report and
shall note on the retained copy the name of the alleged perpetrator of
the act or acts of domestic violence, sexual assault, unlawful
harassment, or stalking. The record of the report to a qualified third
party may be accomplished by completion of a form provided by the
qualified third party, in substantially the following form:

(2) A tenant who terminates a rental agreement under this section
is discharged from the payment of rent for any period following the
last day of the month of the quitting date. The tenant shall remain
liable for the rent for the month in which he or she terminated the
rental agreement unless the termination is in accordance with RCW
59.18.200(1). Notwithstanding lease provisions that allow for
forfeiture of a deposit for early termination, a tenant who terminates
under this section is entitled to the return of the full deposit,
subject to RCW 59.18.020 and 59.18.280. Other tenants who are parties
to the rental agreement, except household members who are the victims
of sexual assault, stalking, unlawful harassment, or domestic violence,
are not released from their obligations under the rental agreement or
other obligations under this chapter.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision under this section, if
a tenant or a household member is a victim of sexual assault, stalking,
or unlawful harassment by a landlord, the tenant may terminate the
rental agreement and quit the premises without further obligation under
the rental agreement or under this chapter prior to making a copy of a
valid order for protection or a written record of a report signed by a
qualified third party available to the landlord, provided that:
(i) The tenant must deliver a copy of a valid order for protection
or written record of a report signed by a qualified third party to the
landlord by mail, fax, or personal delivery by a third party within
seven days of quitting the tenant's dwelling unit; and
(ii) A written record of a report signed by the qualified third
party must be substantially in the form specified under subsection
(1)(b) of this section. The record of the report provided to the
landlord must not include the name of the alleged perpetrator of the
act. On written request by the landlord, the qualified third party
shall, within seven days, provide the name of the alleged perpetrator
of the act to the landlord only if the alleged perpetrator was a person
meeting the definition of the term "landlord" under RCW 59.18.570.
(b) A tenant who terminates his or her rental agreement under this
subsection is discharged from the payment of rent for any period
following the latter of: (i) The date the tenant vacates the unit; or
(ii) the date the record of the report of the qualified third party and
the written notice that the tenant has vacated are delivered to the
landlord by mail, fax, or personal delivery by a third party. The
tenant is entitled to a pro rata refund of any prepaid rent and must
receive a full and specific statement of the basis for retaining any of
the deposit together with any refund due in accordance with RCW
59.18.280.
(4) If a tenant or a household member is a victim of sexual
assault, stalking, or unlawful harassment by a landlord, the tenant may
change or add locks to the tenant's dwelling unit at the tenant's
expense. If a tenant exercises his or her rights to change or add
locks, the following rules apply:
(a) Within seven days of changing or adding locks, the tenant must
deliver to the landlord by mail, fax, or personal delivery by a third
party: (i) Written notice that the tenant has changed or added locks;
and (ii) a copy of a valid order for protection or a written record of
a report signed by a qualified third party. A written record of a
report signed by a qualified third party must be substantially in the
form specified under subsection (1)(b) of this section. The record of
the report provided to the landlord must not include the name of the
alleged perpetrator of the act. On written request by the landlord,
the qualified third party shall, within seven days, provide the name of
the alleged perpetrator to the landlord only if the alleged perpetrator
was a person meeting the definition of the term "landlord" under RCW
59.18.570.
(b) After the tenant provides notice to the landlord that the
tenant has changed or added locks, the tenant's rental agreement shall
terminate on the ninetieth day after providing such notice, unless:
(i) Within sixty days of providing notice that the tenant has
changed or added locks, the tenant notifies the landlord in writing
that the tenant does not wish to terminate his or her rental agreement.
If the perpetrator has been identified by the qualified third party and
is no longer an employee or agent of the landlord or owner and does not
reside at the property, the tenant shall provide the owner or owner's
designated agent with a copy of the key to the new locks at the same
time as providing notice that the tenant does not wish to terminate his
or her rental agreement. A tenant who has a valid protection,
antiharassment, or other protective order against the owner of the
premises or against an employee or agent of the landlord or owner is
not required to provide a key to the new locks until the protective
order expires or the tenant vacates; or
(ii) The tenant exercises his or her rights to terminate the rental
agreement under subsection (3) of this section within sixty days of
providing notice that the tenant has changed or added locks.
(c) After a landlord receives notice that a tenant has changed or
added locks to his or her dwelling unit under (a) of this subsection,
the landlord may not enter the tenant's dwelling unit except as
follows:
(i) In the case of an emergency, the landlord may enter the unit if
accompanied by a law enforcement or fire official acting in his or her
official capacity. If the landlord reasonably concludes that the
circumstances require immediate entry into the unit, the landlord may,
after notifying emergency services, use such force as necessary to
enter the unit if the tenant is not present; or
(ii) The landlord complies with the requirements of RCW 59.18.150
and clearly specifies in writing the time and date that the landlord
intends to enter the unit and the purpose for entering the unit. The
tenant must make arrangements to permit access by the landlord.
(d) The exercise of rights to change or add locks under this
subsection does not discharge the tenant from the payment of rent until
the rental agreement is terminated and the tenant vacates the unit.
(e) The tenant may not change any locks to common areas and must
make keys for new locks available to other household members.
(f) Upon vacating the dwelling unit, the tenant must deliver the
key and all copies of the key to the landlord by mail or personal
delivery by a third party.
(5) A tenant's remedies under this section do not preempt any other
legal remedy available to the tenant.
(6) The provision of verification of a report under subsection
(1)(b) of this section does not waive the confidential or privileged
nature of the communication between a victim of domestic violence,
sexual assault, or stalking with a qualified third party pursuant to
RCW 5.60.060, 70.123.075, or 70.125.065. No record or evidence
obtained from such disclosure may be used in any civil, administrative,
or criminal proceeding against the victim unless a written waiver of
applicable evidentiary privilege is obtained, except that the
verification itself, and no other privileged information, under
subsection (1)(b) of this section may be used in civil proceedings
brought under this section.

Sec. 45 RCW 60.08.020 and 2012 c 117 s 131 are each amended to
read as follows:
In order to make such lien effectual, the lien claimant shall,
within ninety days from the date of delivery of such chattel to the
owner, file in the office of the auditor of the county in which such
chattel is kept, a lien notice, which notice shall state the name of
the claimant, the name of the owner, a description of the chattel upon
which the claimant has performed labor or furnished material, the
amount for which a lien is claimed, and the date upon which such
expenditure of labor or material was completed, which notice shall be
signed by the claimant or someone on his or her behalf, and may be in
substantially the following form:

Sec. 46 RCW 61.12.020 and 1929 c 33 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
Mortgages of land may be made in substantially the following form:
The mortgagor (here insert name or names) mortgages to (here insert
name or names) to secure the payment of (here insert the nature and
amount of indebtedness, showing when due, rate of interest, and whether
evidenced by note, bond or other instrument or not) the following
described real estate (here insert description) situated in the county
of . . . . . ., state of Washington.
Dated this . . . . day of . . . . . ., ((19. . .)) (year). . . .
Every such mortgage, when otherwise properly executed, shall be deemed
and held a good and sufficient conveyance and mortgage to secure the
payment of the money therein specified. The parties may insert in such
mortgage any lawful agreement or condition.

Sec. 47 RCW 61.24.045 and 2008 c 153 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person desiring a copy of any notice of sale described in RCW
61.24.040(1)(f) under any deed of trust, other than a person entitled
to receive such a notice under RCW 61.24.040(1) (b) or (c), must, after
the recordation of such deed of trust and before the recordation of the
notice of sale, cause to be filed for record, in the office of the
auditor of any county in which the deed of trust is recorded, a duly
acknowledged request for a copy of any notice of sale. The request
shall be signed and acknowledged by the person to be notified or such
person's agent, attorney, or representative; shall set forth the name,
mailing address, and telephone number, if any, of the person or persons
to be notified; shall identify the deed of trust by stating the names
of the parties thereto, the date the deed of trust was recorded, the
legal description of the property encumbered by the deed of trust, and
the auditor's file number under which the deed of trust is recorded;
and shall be in substantially the following form:

REQUEST FOR NOTICE

Request is hereby made that a copy of any notice of sale described in
RCW 61.24.040(1)(f) under that certain Deed of Trust dated . . . . . .,
((20. . .)) (year). . . . , recorded on . . . . . ., ((20. . .))
(year). . . . , under auditor's file No. . . . . . ., records of
. . . . . . County, Washington, from . . . . . ., as Grantor, to
. . . . . . . . ., as Trustee, to secure an obligation in favor of
. . . . . . . . ., as Beneficiary, and affecting the following
described real property:

(Legal Description)

be sent by both first-class and either registered or certified mail,
return receipt requested, to . . . . . . . . . at . . . . . . . . .
Dated this . . . . day of . . . . . ., ((20. . .)) (year). . . .

(Acknowledgment)

A request for notice under this section shall not affect title to, or
be deemed notice to any person that any person has any right, title,
interest in, lien or charge upon, the property described in the request
for notice.

Sec. 48 RCW 62A.3-522 and 2000 c 215 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to sending a notice of dishonor to the drawer of the
check under RCW 62A.3-520, the person sending notice shall execute an
affidavit certifying service of the notice by mail. The affidavit of
service by mail must be attached to a copy of the notice of dishonor
and must be substantially in the following form:

AFFIDAVIT OF SERVICE BY MAIL

I, . . . . . ., hereby certify that on the . . . . . . day of
. . . . . ., ((20. . .)) (year). . . . , a copy of the foregoing Notice
was served on . . . . . . by mailing via the United States Postal
Service, postage prepaid, at . . . . . ., Washington.
Dated: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Signature)

The person enforcing the check shall retain the affidavit with the
check but shall file a copy of the affidavit with the clerk of the
court in which an action on the check is commenced.

Sec. 49 RCW 62A.3-540 and 2009 c 185 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a check is assigned or written to a collection agency as
defined in RCW 19.16.100 and the collection agency or its agent
provides a notice of dishonor, the notice of dishonor may be sent by
mail to the drawer at the drawer's last known address. The drawer is
presumed to have received the notice of dishonor three days from the
date it is mailed. The collection agency may, as an alternative to
providing a notice in the form described in RCW 62A.3-520, provide a
notice in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF DISHONOR OF CHECK

A check drawn by you and made payable by you to . . . . . . in the
amount of . . . . . . has not been accepted for payment by . . . . . .,
which is the drawee bank designated on your check. This check is dated
. . . . . ., and it is numbered, No. . . . . . ..
You are CAUTIONED that unless you pay the amount of this check and
a handling fee of . . . . . within thirty-three days after the date
this letter is postmarked or personally delivered, you may very well
have to pay the following additional amounts:
(a) Costs of collecting the amount of the check in the lesser of
the check amount or forty dollars;
(b) Interest on the amount of the check which shall accrue at the
rate of twelve percent per annum from the date of dishonor; and
(c) Three hundred dollars or three times the face amount of the
check, whichever is less, plus court costs and attorneys' fees, by
award of the court in the event of legal action. Note that this
caution regarding increased amounts in any possible legal action is
advisory only and should not be construed as a representation or
implication that legal action is contemplated or intended.
You are also CAUTIONED that law enforcement agencies may be
provided with a copy of this notice of dishonor and the check drawn by
you for the possibility of proceeding with criminal charges if you do
not pay the amount of this check within thirty-three days after the
date this letter is postmarked.
You are advised to make your payment of $. . . . . to . . . . . .
at the following address: . . . . . . . . . .
(2) The cautionary statement regarding law enforcement in
subsection (1) of this section need not be included in a notice of
dishonor sent by a collection agency. However, if included and whether
or not the collection agency regularly refers dishonored checks to law
enforcement, the cautionary statement in subsection (1) of this section
shall not be construed as a threat to take any action not intended to
be taken or that cannot legally be taken; nor shall it be construed to
be harassing, oppressive, or abusive conduct; nor shall it be construed
to be a false, deceptive, or misleading representation; nor shall it be
construed to be unfair or unconscionable; nor shall it otherwise be
construed to violate any law.
(3) In addition to sending a notice of dishonor to the drawer of
the check under this section, the person sending notice shall execute
an affidavit certifying service of the notice by mail. The affidavit
of service by mail must be substantially in the following form:

AFFIDAVIT OF SERVICE BY MAIL

I, . . . . . ., hereby certify that on the . . . . . . day of
. . . . . ., ((20. . .)) (year). . . . , a copy of the foregoing Notice
was served on . . . . . . by mailing via the United States Postal
Service, postage prepaid, at . . . . . ., Washington.
Dated: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Signature)

(4) The person enforcing a check under this section shall file the
affidavit and check, or a true copy thereof, with the clerk of the
court in which an action on the check is commenced as permitted by
court rule or practice.

Sec. 50 RCW 64.04.030 and 2012 c 117 s 186 are each amended to
read as follows:
Warranty deeds for the conveyance of land may be substantially in
the following form, without express covenants:

The grantor (here insert the name or names and place or residence)
for and in consideration of (here insert consideration) in hand paid,
conveys and warrants to (here insert the grantee's name or names) the
following described real estate (here insert description), situated in
the county of . . . . . ., state of Washington. Dated this . . . . day
of . . . . . ., ((19. . .)) (year). . . .

Every deed in substance in the above form, when otherwise duly
executed, shall be deemed and held a conveyance in fee simple to the
grantee, his or her heirs and assigns, with covenants on the part of
the grantor: (1) That at the time of the making and delivery of such
deed he or she was lawfully seized of an indefeasible estate in fee
simple, in and to the premises therein described, and had good right
and full power to convey the same; (2) that the same were then free
from all encumbrances; and (3) that he or she warrants to the grantee,
his or her heirs and assigns, the quiet and peaceable possession of
such premises, and will defend the title thereto against all persons
who may lawfully claim the same, and such covenants shall be obligatory
upon any grantor, his or her heirs and personal representatives, as
fully and with like effect as if written at full length in such deed.

Sec. 51 RCW 64.04.040 and 2012 c 117 s 187 are each amended to
read as follows:
Bargain and sale deeds for the conveyance of land may be
substantially in the following form, without express covenants:

The grantor (here insert name or names and place of residence), for
and in consideration of (here insert consideration) in hand paid,
bargains, sells, and conveys to (here insert the grantee's name or
names) the following described real estate (here insert description)
situated in the county of . . . . . ., state of Washington. Dated this
. . . . day of . . . . . ., ((19. . .)) (year). . . .

Every deed in substance in the above form when otherwise duly executed,
shall convey to the grantee, his or her heirs or assigns an estate of
inheritance in fee simple, and shall be adjudged an express covenant to
the grantee, his or her heirs or assigns, to wit: That the grantor was
seized of an indefeasible estate in fee simple, free from encumbrances,
done or suffered from the grantor, except the rents and services that
may be reserved, and also for quiet enjoyment against the grantor, his
or her heirs and assigns, unless limited by express words contained in
such deed; and the grantee, his or her heirs, executors,
administrators, and assigns may recover in any action for breaches as
if such covenants were expressly inserted.

Sec. 52 RCW 64.04.050 and 2012 c 117 s 188 are each amended to
read as follows:
Quitclaim deeds may be in substance in the following form:

The grantor (here insert the name or names and place of residence),
for and in consideration of (here insert consideration) conveys and
quitclaims to (here insert grantee's name or names) all interest in the
following described real estate (here insert description), situated in
the county of . . . . . ., state of Washington. Dated this . . . . day
of . . . . . ., ((19. . .)) (year). . . .

Every deed in substance in the above form, when otherwise duly
executed, shall be deemed and held a good and sufficient conveyance,
release and quitclaim to the grantee, his or her heirs and assigns in
fee of all the then existing legal and equitable rights of the grantor
in the premises therein described, but shall not extend to the after
acquired title unless words are added expressing such intention.

Sec. 53 RCW 64.08.060 and 1988 c 69 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A certificate of acknowledgment for an individual, substantially in
the following form or, after December 31, 1985, substantially in the
form set forth in RCW 42.44.100(1), shall be sufficient for the
purposes of this chapter and for any acknowledgment required to be
taken in accordance with this chapter:

On this day personally appeared before me (here insert the name of
grantor or grantors) to me known to be the individual, or individuals
described in and who executed the within and foregoing instrument, and
acknowledged that he (she or they) signed the same as his (her or
their) free and voluntary act and deed, for the uses and purposes
therein mentioned. Given under my hand and official seal this . . . .
day of . . . . . ., ((19. . .)) (year). . . . (Signature of officer
and official seal)
If acknowledgment is taken before a notary public of this state the
signature shall be followed by substantially the following: Notary
Public in and for the state of Washington, residing at
. . . . . . . . ., (giving place of residence).

Sec. 54 RCW 64.08.070 and 2012 c 117 s 191 are each amended to
read as follows:
A certificate of acknowledgment for a corporation, substantially in
the following form or, after December 31, 1985, substantially in the
form set forth in RCW 42.44.100(2), shall be sufficient for the
purposes of this chapter and for any acknowledgment required to be
taken in accordance with this chapter:

On this . . . . day of . . . . . ., ((19. . .)) (year). . . . ,
before me personally appeared . . . . . ., to me known to be the
(president, vice president, secretary, treasurer, or other authorized
officer or agent, as the case may be) of the corporation that executed
the within and foregoing instrument, and acknowledged said instrument
to be the free and voluntary act and deed of said corporation, for the
uses and purposes therein mentioned, and on oath stated that he or she
was authorized to execute said instrument and that the seal affixed is
the corporate seal of said corporation.
In Witness Whereof I have hereunto set my hand and affixed my
official seal the day and year first above written. (Signature and
title of officer with place of residence of notary public.)

Sec. 55 RCW 65.12.035 and 2009 c 521 s 145 are each amended to
read as follows:
The form of application may, with appropriate changes, be
substantially as follows:

Sec. 56 RCW 65.12.125 and 1907 c 250 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
The summons provided for in RCW 65.12.135 shall be in substance in
the form following, to wit:

Sec. 57 RCW 65.12.230 and 1917 c 62 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The owner or owners of registered lands, desiring to withdraw the
same from registration, shall make and file with the registrar of
titles in the county in which said lands are situated, an application
in substantially the following form:

Said application shall be acknowledged in the same manner as is
required for the acknowledgment of deeds.

Sec. 58 RCW 65.12.235 and 2012 c 117 s 227 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the filing of such application and the payment of a fee of
five dollars, the registrar of titles, if it shall appear that the
application is signed and acknowledged by all the registered owners of
said land, shall issue to the applicant a certificate in substantially
the following form:

Sec. 59 RCW 65.12.255 and 2012 c 117 s 229 are each amended to
read as follows:
The certificate of registration shall contain the name of the
owner, a description of the land and of the estate of the owner, and
shall by memorial or notation contain a description of all
incumbrances, liens, and interests to which the estate of the owner is
subject; it shall state the residence of the owner and, if a minor,
give his or her age; if under disability, it shall state the nature of
the disability; it shall state whether married or not, and, if married,
the name of the husband or wife; in case of a trust, condition or
limitation, it shall state the trust, condition, or limitation, as the
case may be; and shall contain and conform in respect to all statements
to the certified copy of the decree of registration filed with the
registrar of titles as hereinbefore provided; and shall be in form
substantially as follows:

Sec. 60 RCW 65.12.270 and 1907 c 250 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
All certificates subsequent to the first shall be in like form,
except that they shall be entitled: "Transfer from No. . . . .", (the
number of the next previous certificate relating to the same land), and
shall also contain the words "Originally registered on the . . . . day
of . . . . . ., ((19. . .)) (year). . . . , and entered in the book
. . . . . . at page . . . . of register."

Sec. 61 RCW 67.38.030 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 22 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The process to create a cultural arts, stadium and convention
district may be initiated by:
(a) The adoption of a resolution by the county legislative
authority calling for a public hearing on the proposed creation of such
a district and delineating proposed boundaries of the district; or
(b) The governing bodies of two or more cities located within the
same county adopting resolutions calling for a public hearing on the
proposed creation of such a district and delineating proposed
boundaries of such a district: PROVIDED, That this method may not be
used more frequently than once in any twelve month period in the same
county; or
(c) The filing of a petition with the county legislative authority,
calling for a public hearing on the proposed creation of such a
district and delineating proposed boundaries of the district, that is
signed by at least ten percent of the registered voters residing in the
proposed district at the last general election. Such signatures will
be certified by the county auditor or the county elections department.
(2) Within sixty days of the adoption of such resolutions, or
presentation of such a petition, the county legislative authority shall
hold a public hearing on the proposed creation of such a district.
Notice of the hearing shall be published at least once a week for three
consecutive weeks in one or more newspapers of general circulation
within the proposed boundaries of the district. The notice shall
include a general description and map of the proposed boundaries.
Additional notice shall also be mailed to the governing body of each
city and municipality located all or partially within the proposed
district. At such hearing, or any continuation thereof, any interested
party may appear and be heard on the formation of the proposed
district.
The county legislative authority shall delete the area included
within the boundaries of a city from the proposed district if prior to
the public hearing the city submits to the county legislative authority
a copy of an adopted resolution requesting its deletion from the
proposed district. The county legislative authority may delete any
other areas from the proposed boundaries. Additional territory may be
included within the proposed boundaries, but only if such inclusion is
subject to a subsequent hearing, with notice provided in the same
manner as for the original hearing.
(3) A proposition to create a cultural arts, stadium and convention
district shall be submitted to the voters of the proposed district
within two years of the adoption of a resolution providing for such
submittal by the county legislative authority at the conclusion of such
hearings. The resolution shall establish the boundaries of the
district and include a finding that the creation of the district is in
the public interest and that the area included within the district can
reasonably be expected to benefit from its creation. No portion of a
city may be included in such a district unless the entire city is
included. The boundaries of such a district shall follow school
district or community college boundaries in as far as practicable.
(4) The proposition to create a cultural arts, stadium and
convention district shall be submitted to the voters of the proposed
district at the next general election held sixty or more days after the
adoption of the resolution. The district shall be created upon
approval of the proposition by simple majority vote. The ballot
proposition submitted to the voters shall be in substantially the
following form:

FORMATION OF CULTURAL ARTS, STADIUM AND CONVENTION DISTRICT . . . . . .

Shall a cultural arts, stadium and convention district be established
for the area described in a resolution of the legislative authority of
. . . . . . county, adopted on the . . . . day of . . . . . .,
((19. . .)) (year). . . . ?

Yes. . . . . . . .

No . . . . . . . .

Sec. 62 RCW 84.40.320 and 1988 c 222 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The assessor shall add up and note the amount of each column in the
detail and assessment lists in such manner as prescribed or approved by
the state department of revenue, as will provide a convenient and
permanent record of assessment. The assessor shall also make, under
proper headings, a certification of the assessment rolls and on the
15th day of July shall file the same with the clerk of the county board
of equalization for the purpose of equalization by the said board.
Such certificate shall be verified by an affidavit, substantially in
the following form:

State of Washington, . . . . . . County, ss.
I, . . . . . ., Assessor . . . . . ., do solemnly swear that the
assessment rolls and this certificate contain a correct and full list
of all the real and personal property subject to taxation in this
county for the assessment year ((19. . .)) (year). . . . , so far as I
have been able to ascertain the same; and that the assessed value set
down in the proper column, opposite the several kinds and descriptions
of property, is in each case, except as otherwise provided by law, one
hundred percent of the true and fair value of such property, to the
best of my knowledge and belief, and that the assessment rolls and this
certificate are correct, as I verily believe.

. . . . . . . . . . , Assessor.
Subscribed and sworn to before me this . . . . day of . . . . . .,
((19. . .)) (year). . . .
(L. S.) . . . . . ., Auditor of . . . . . . county.

PROVIDED, That the failure of the assessor to complete the certificate
shall in nowise invalidate the assessment. After the same has been
duly equalized by the county board of equalization, the same shall be
delivered to the county assessor.

Sec. 63 RCW 84.52.080 and 2010 c 106 s 314 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county assessor must extend the taxes upon the tax rolls in
the form prescribed in this section. The rate percent necessary to
raise the amounts of taxes levied for state and county purposes, and
for purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, must be
computed upon the assessed value of the property of the county. The
rate percent necessary to raise the amount of taxes levied for any
taxing district within the county must be computed upon the assessed
value of the property of the district. All taxes assessed against any
property must be added together and extended on the rolls in a column
headed consolidated or total tax. In extending any tax, whenever the
tax amounts to a fractional part of a cent greater than one-half of a
cent it must be rounded up to one cent, and whenever it amounts to one-half of a cent or less it must be dropped. The amount of all taxes
must be entered in the proper columns, as shown by entering the rate
percent necessary to raise the consolidated or total tax and the total
tax assessed against the property.
(2) For the purpose of computing the rate necessary to raise the
amount of any excess levy in a taxing district entitled to a
distribution under RCW 84.33.081, other than the state, the county
assessor must add the district's timber assessed value, as defined in
RCW 84.33.035, to the assessed value of the property. However, for
school districts maintenance and operations levies, only one-half of
the district's timber assessed value or eighty percent of the timber
roll of the district in calendar year 1983 as determined under chapter
84.33 RCW, whichever is greater, must be added to the assessed value of
the property.
(3) Upon the completion of such tax extension, it is the duty of
the county assessor to make in each assessment book, tax roll or list
a certificate in the following form:

(4) The county assessor must deliver the tax rolls to the county
treasurer, on or before the fifteenth day of January, taking a receipt
from the treasurer. At the same time, the county assessor must provide
the county auditor with an abstract of the tax rolls showing the total
amount of taxes collectible in each of the taxing districts.

Sec. 64 RCW 85.28.060 and 1899 c 125 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the filing of the report of the viewers aforesaid, a summons
shall be issued in the same manner as summons are issued in civil
actions, and served upon each person owning or interested in any lands
over which the proposed ditch or drain will pass. Said summons must
inform the person to whom it is directed of the appointment and report
of the viewers; a description of the land over which said ditch will
pass of which such person is the owner, or in which he or she has an
interest; the width and depth of said proposed ditch, and the distance
which it traverses said land, also an accurate description of the
course thereof. It must also show the amount of damages to said land
as estimated by said viewers; and that unless the person so summoned
appears and files objections to the report of the viewers, within
twenty days after the service of said summons upon him or her,
exclusive of the day of service, the same will be approved by the
court, which summons may be in the following form:

In the Superior Court of the State of Washington, for . . . . . .
County.
In the matter of the application of . . . . . . for a private
ditch.
The state of Washington to . . . . . .
Whereas, on the . . . . day of . . . . . . ((19. . .))
(year). . . . filed his or her petition in the above entitled court
praying that a private ditch or drain be established across the
following described lands, to wit: . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . .
for the purpose of draining certain lands belonging to said
. . . . . ., and whereas, on the . . . . day of . . . . . .,
((19. . .)) (year). . . . , Messrs. . . . . . . and . . . . . . with
. . . . . . county surveyor of . . . . . . county, were appointed to
view said premises in the manner provided by law, and said viewers
having, on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., ((19. . .)) (year). . . . ,
filed their report in this court, finding in favor of said ditch and
locating the same upon the following course: . . . . . . . . . . . for
a distance of . . . . . . upon said land, and of a width of . . . .
feet and a depth of . . . . feet; and they further find that said land
will be damaged by the establishing and construction of said ditch in
the sum of $. . . .: Now therefore, you are hereby summoned to appear
within twenty days after the service of this summons, exclusive of the
day of service, and file your objections to said petition and the
report of said viewers, with this court; and in case of your failure so
to do, said report will be approved and said petition granted.

Sec. 65 RCW 88.32.070 and 1985 c 469 s 95 are each amended to
read as follows:
After the return of the assessment roll to the county legislative
authority it shall make an order setting a day for the hearing upon any
objections to the assessment roll by any parties affected thereby who
shall be heard by the county legislative authority as a board of
equalization, which date shall be at least twenty days after the filing
of such roll. It shall be the duty of the county legislative authority
to give, or cause to be given, notice of such assessment, and of the
day fixed for the hearing, as follows:
(1) They shall send or cause to be sent, by mail, to each owner of
premises assessed, whose name and place of residence is known to them,
a notice, substantially in this form, to wit:

" . . . . . . . . . . . .
"Your property (here describe the property) is assessed
$. . . . . . for river and harbor improvement to be made in this
county.
"Hearing on the assessment roll will be had before the undersigned,
at the office of the county commissioners, on the . . . . day of
. . . . . . ((19. . .)) (year). . . .

But failure to send, or cause to be sent, such notice, shall not be
fatal to the proceedings herein prescribed.
(2) They shall cause at least ten days' notice of the hearing to be
given by posting notice in at least ten public places in the county,
three of which shall be in the neighborhood of the proposed
improvement, and by publishing the same at least once a week for two
consecutive weeks in the official newspaper of the county which notice
shall be signed by the county legislative authority, and shall state
the day and place of the hearing of objections to the assessment roll,
and the nature of the improvement, and that all interested parties will
be heard as to any objections to said assessment roll.

Sec. 66 RCW 88.32.140 and 1983 c 167 s 245 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In all cases, the county, as the agent of the local improvement
district, shall, by resolution of its county legislative authority,
cause to be issued in the name of the county, the bonds for such local
improvement district for the whole estimated cost of such improvement,
less such amounts as shall have been paid within the thirty days
provided for redemption, as hereinabove specified. Such bonds shall be
called "Local Improvement Bonds, District No. . . . ., County of
. . . . . ., State of Washington", and shall be payable not more than
ten years after date, and shall be subject to annual call by the county
treasurer, in such manner and amounts as he or she may have cash on
hand to pay the same in the respective local improvement fund from
which such bonds are payable, interest to be paid at the office of the
county treasurer. Such bonds shall be issued and delivered to the
contractor for the work from month to month in such amounts as the
engineer of the government, in charge of the improvement, shall certify
to be due on account of work performed, or, if said county legislative
authority resolves so to do, such bonds may be offered for sale after
thirty days public notice thereof given, to be delivered to the highest
bidder therefor, but in no case shall such bonds be sold for less than
par, the proceeds to be applied in payment for such improvement:
PROVIDED, That unless the contractor for the work shall agree to take
such bonds in payment for his or her work at par, such work shall not
be begun until the bonds shall have been sold and the proceeds shall
have been paid into a fund to be called "Local Improvement Fund No.
. . . ., County of . . . . . .", and the owner or owners of such bonds
shall look only to such fund for the payment of either the principal or
interest of such bonds.
Such bonds shall be issued in denominations of one hundred dollars
each, and shall be substantially in the following form:

"Local Improvement Bond, District Number . . . . of the County of
. . . . . ., State of Washington.

This bond is not a general debt of the county of . . . . . . and
has not been authorized by the voters of said county as a part of its
general indebtedness. It is issued in pursuance of an act of the
legislature of the state of Washington, passed the . . . . day of
. . . . . . A.D. 1907, and is a charge against the fund herein
specified and its issuance and sale is authorized by the resolution of
the county legislative authority, passed on the . . . . day of
. . . . . . A.D. 1907. The county of . . . . . ., a municipal
corporation of the state of Washington, hereby promises to pay to
. . . . . ., or bearer, one hundred dollars, lawful money of the United
States of America, out of the fund established by resolution of the
county legislative authority on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., A.D.
19. . ., and known as local improvement fund district number . . . . of
. . . . . . county, and not otherwise.
"This bond is payable ten years after date, and is subject to
annual call by the county treasurer at the expiration of any year
before maturity in such manner and amounts as he or she may have cash
on hand to pay the same in the said fund from which the same is
payable, and shall bear interest at the rate of . . . . percent per
annum, payable semiannually; both principal and interest payable at the
office of the county treasurer. The county legislative authority of
said county, as the agent of said local improvement district No.
. . . ., established by resolution No. . . . ., has caused this bond to
be issued in the name of said county, as the bond of said local
improvement district, the proceeds thereof to be applied in part
payment of so much of the cost of the improvement of the rivers, lakes,
canals or harbors of . . . . . . county, under resolution No. . . . .,
as is to be borne by the owners of property in said local improvement
district, and the said local improvement fund, district No. . . . . of
. . . . . . county, has been established by resolution for said
purpose; and the owner or owners of this bond shall look only to said
fund for the payment of either the principal or interest of this bond.
"The call for the payment of this bond or any bond, issued on
account of said improvement, may be made by the county treasurer by
publishing the same in an official newspaper of the county for ten
consecutive issues, beginning not more than twenty days before the
expiration of any year from date hereof, and if such call be made,
interest on this bond shall cease at the date named in such call.
"This bond is one of a series of . . . . . . bonds, aggregating in
all the principal sum of . . . . . . dollars, issued for said local
improvement district, all of which bonds are subject to the same terms
and conditions as herein expressed.
"In witness whereof the said county of . . . . . . has caused these
presents to be signed by its ((chairman)) chair of its county
legislative authority, and countersigned by its county auditor and
sealed with its corporate seal, attested by its county clerk, this
. . . . day of . . . . . ., ((in the year of our Lord one thousand nine
hundred and . . . . . . . . .)) (year). . . .

Countersigned, . . . . . . County Auditor.
Attest, . . . . . . Clerk."

The bonds may be in any form, including bearer bonds or registered
bonds as provided in RCW 39.46.030.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds may
be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

Sec. 67 RCW 91.08.380 and 1911 c 23 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
The treasurer receiving such certified copy of the assessment roll
and judgment shall immediately give notice thereof by publishing such
notice at least once in the official newspaper or newspapers of such
county, if such newspaper or newspapers there be; and if there be no
such official newspaper, then by publishing such notice in some
newspaper of general circulation in the county. Such notice may be in
substantially the following form:

"SPECIAL ASSESSMENT NOTICE.

Public notice is hereby given that the superior court of
. . . . . . county, State of Washington, has rendered judgment for a
special assessment upon property benefited by the following improvement
(here insert the character and location of the improvement in general
terms) as will more fully appear from the certified copy of the
assessment roll on file in my office, and that the undersigned is
authorized to collect such assessments. All persons interested are
hereby notified that they can pay the amounts assessed, or any part
thereof, without interest, at my office (here insert location of
office) within sixty days from the date hereof.
Dated this . . . . day of . . . . . . ((A.D. 19. . .))
(year). . . .

--- END ---