BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.150 and 2012 c 2 s 106 (Initiative Measure No.
1183) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected a tax upon each retail sale of
spirits in the original package at the rate of fifteen percent of the
selling price.
(2) There is levied and collected a tax upon each sale of spirits
in the original package at the rate of ten percent of the selling price
on sales by a spirits distributor licensee or other licensee acting as
a spirits distributor pursuant to Title 66 RCW to restaurant spirits
retailers.
(3) There is levied and collected an additional tax upon each sale
of spirits in the original package by a spirits distributor licensee or
other licensee acting as a spirits distributor pursuant to Title 66 RCW
to a restaurant spirits retailer and upon each retail sale of spirits
in the original package by a licensee of the board at the rate of one
dollar and seventy-two cents per liter.
(4) An additional tax is imposed equal to fourteen percent
multiplied by the taxes payable under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of
this section.
(5) An additional tax is imposed upon each sale of spirits in the
original package by a spirits distributor licensee or other licensee
acting as a spirits distributor pursuant to Title 66 RCW to a
restaurant spirits retailer and upon each retail sale of spirits in the
original package by a licensee of the board at the rate of seven cents
per liter. All revenues collected during any month from this
additional tax must be deposited in the state general fund by the
twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(6)(a) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in
the original package at the rate of three and four-tenths percent of
the selling price.
(b) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in the
original package to a restaurant spirits retailer at the rate of two
and three-tenths percent of the selling price.
(c) An additional tax is imposed upon each sale of spirits in the
original package by a spirits distributor licensee or other licensee
acting as a spirits distributor pursuant to Title 66 RCW to a
restaurant spirits retailer and upon each retail sale of spirits in the
original package by a licensee of the board at the rate of forty-one
cents per liter.
(d) All revenues collected during any month from additional taxes
under this subsection must be deposited in the state general fund by
the twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(7)(a) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of
spirits in the original package at the rate of one dollar and thirty-three cents per liter.
(b) All revenues collected during any month from additional taxes
under this subsection must be deposited by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month into the general fund.
(8) The tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
spirits in the original package.
(9)(a) The taxes imposed in this section must be paid by the buyer
to the seller, and each seller must collect from the buyer the full
amount of the tax payable in respect to each taxable sale under this
section.
(b) The taxes required by this section to be collected by the
seller must be stated separately from the selling price((, and for
purposes of determining the tax due from the buyer to the seller, it is
conclusively presumed that the selling price quoted in any price list
does not include the taxes imposed by this section)) on any sales
receipt or invoice; however, the advertised selling price must include
the taxes imposed by this section. Sellers must include the words "tax
included," or similar terminology, in all advertised selling prices.
Sellers must report and return all taxes imposed in this section in
accordance with rules adopted by the department.
(10) As used in this section, the terms, "spirits" and "package"
have the same meaning as provided in chapter 66.04 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the practices covered by RCW
82.08.150(9) are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A
violation of RCW 82.08.150(9) is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.
(2) Remedies available under chapter 19.86 RCW do not affect any
other remedy the injured party may have.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---