BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.95.320 and 2009 c 340 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a program that utilizes
department-partner agreements for the resumption or continued operation
and management of state-owned salmonid hatcheries ((now closed or
scheduled for closure during the 2009-2011 biennium)) that are located
in the Hood Canal basin. To implement the program, the department
shall accept and review applications to determine the appropriateness
of the partner to manage and operate selected salmonid hatcheries. The
department shall accelerate the application process relating to any
hatchery currently in operation to avoid cessation of ongoing salmon
production.
(2)(a) To select a partner, the department shall develop and apply
criteria identifying the appropriateness of a potential partner. The
criteria must seek to ensure that the partner has a long-range business
plan, which may include the sale of hatchery surplus salmon, including
eggs and carcasses, to ensure the long-range future solvency of the
partnership. The business plan may also allow the partner to harvest
hatchery chum salmon in a designated area through persons under
contract with the partner as provided under a permit from the
department or by rule of the commission. All chum salmon harvested
must be sold at prices commensurate with the current market and all
funds must be utilized by the partner to operate the hatchery.
(b) Partners under this section must be:
(i) Qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code;
(ii) A for-profit private entity; or
(iii) A federally recognized tribe.
(3) The department shall place a higher priority on applications
from partners that provide for the maximum resumption or continuation
of existing hatchery production in a manner consistent with the mandate
contained in RCW 77.04.012 to maintain the economic well-being and
stability of the fishing industry.
(4)(a) Agreements entered into with partners under this section
must be consistent with existing federally recognized tribal rights,
state laws, agency rules, collective bargaining agreements, hatchery
management policy involving species listed under the federal endangered
species act, or, in the case of a tribal partner, any applicable tribal
hatchery management policy or recreational and commercial harvest
policy.
(b) Agreements under this section must also require that partners
give preference to retaining classified employees whenever possible.
In circumstances where it is not possible, partners conducting hatchery
operations must maintain staff with comparable qualifications to those
identified in the class specifications for the department's fish
hatchery personnel.
(5) All partnership agreements entered into under this section must
contain a provision that requires the partner to hold harmless the
department and the state for any civil liability arising from the
partner's participation in the agreement or activities at the subject
hatchery or hatcheries.
(6) All partnership agreements entered into under this section must
identify any maintenance or improvements to be made to the hatchery
facility, and the source of funding for such maintenance or
improvements. If funding for the maintenance or improvements is to
come from state funds or revenue sources previously received by the
department, the work must be performed either by employees in the
classified service or in compliance with the contracting procedures set
forth in RCW 41.06.142.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of fish and wildlife
shall prepare and submit a report to the legislature summarizing any
actions taken in the implementation of RCW 77.95.320, including the
types and number of fish released, lessons learned, and suggestions for
future program refinement.
(2) The report required by this section must be submitted
consistent with RCW 43.01.036 by October 31, 2016.
(3) This section expires July 31, 2017.

--- END ---