BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that Washington
is one of the most productive growing regions in the country and
Washington's agriculture is an integral part of this state's economic
health. The legislature also recognizes the agricultural industry's
need for skilled workers and the workers' needs in upgrading their
agricultural skills and marketability. The legislature recognizes that
providing skills and safety training for agricultural workers helps
ensure their success and safety and helps to ensure the continued
success of Washington's agricultural industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department shall create and administer the
agricultural labor skills and safety grant program that will provide
training opportunities for agricultural workers.
(2) The department shall select one recipient that has a community-based organization with the ability to carry out the objectives set
forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The grant recipient shall provide training to agricultural
workers in workforce skills and safety training by working with
agricultural employee and agricultural employer organizations in:
(a) Designing and implementing an agricultural skills development
program;
(b) Developing a plan to increase the number of skilled
agricultural workers through a recruitment process;
(c) Providing agricultural health and safety training to its
participants;
(d) Conducting project evaluations on agricultural trainings and
service delivery strategies for agricultural workers and employers;
(e) Partnering with an agricultural employee and an agricultural
employer organization that has focused on agricultural labor and
employment issues and services for at least ten years, and that has
experience in providing training to agricultural employees in
developing and providing the training curriculum; and
(f) Delivering training through a service delivery system that is
sensitive to the unique needs of agricultural employers and
agricultural workers, including the barriers to employment for
agricultural workers.
(4) The grant recipient may receive up to seven hundred fifty
thousand dollars per year.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2017.

--- END ---