BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.203 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 924 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section)) The
state treasurer must, on behalf of the department and notwithstanding
RCW 84.36.010 or other statutes to the contrary, ((the director shall))
pay by April 30th of each year on game lands in each county((, if
requested by an election under RCW 77.12.201,)) an amount in lieu of
real property taxes equal to that amount paid on similar parcels of
open space land taxable under chapter 84.34 RCW ((or the greater of
seventy cents per acre per year or the amount paid in 1984)) except
taxes levied for any state purpose, plus an additional amount for
control of noxious weeds equal to that which would be paid if such
lands were privately owned. This amount shall not be assessed or paid
on department buildings, structures, facilities, game farms, fish
hatcheries, tidelands, or public fishing areas of less than one hundred
acres.
(2) "Game lands," as used in this section ((and RCW 77.12.201)),
means those tracts one hundred acres or larger owned in fee by the
department and used for wildlife habitat and public recreational
purposes. All lands purchased for wildlife habitat, public access or
recreation purposes with federal funds in the Snake River drainage
basin shall be considered game lands regardless of acreage.
(3) This section shall not apply to lands transferred after April
23, 1990, to the department from other state agencies.
(4) The county shall distribute the amount received under this
section in lieu of real property taxes to all property taxing districts
except the state in appropriate tax code areas the same way it would
distribute local property taxes from private property. The county
shall distribute the amount received under this section for weed
control to the appropriate weed district.
(((5) For the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the director shall pay by
April 30th of each year on game lands in each county, if requested by
an election under RCW 77.12.201, an amount in lieu of real property
taxes and shall be distributed as follows:

County

Adams . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,909

Asotin . . . . . . . . . . . . 36,123

Chelan . . . . . . . . . . . . 24,757

Columbia . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,795

Ferry . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,781

Garfield . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,840

Grant . . . . . . . . . . . . 37,443

Grays Harbor . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,264

Kittitas . . . . . . . . . . . . 143,974

Klickitat . . . . . . . . . . . . 21,906

Lincoln . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,535

Okanogan . . . . . . . . . . . . 151,402

Pend Oreille . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,309

Yakima . . . . . . . . . . . . 126,225

These amounts shall not be assessed or paid on department buildings,
structures, facilities, game farms, fish hatcheries, tidelands, or
public fishing areas of less than one hundred acres.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.201 (Counties may elect to receive
an amount in lieu of taxes -- County to record collections for violations
of law or rules -- Deposit) and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 923, 2009 c 479 s
63, & 1987 c 506 s 29 are each repealed.

--- END ---