BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 58.17.140 and 2012 c 92 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Preliminary plats of any proposed subdivision and dedication
shall be approved, disapproved, or returned to the applicant for
modification or correction within ninety days from date of filing
thereof unless the applicant consents to an extension of such time
period or the ninety day limitation is extended to include up to
twenty-one days as specified under RCW 58.17.095(3): PROVIDED, That if
an environmental impact statement is required as provided in RCW
43.21C.030, the ninety day period shall not include the time spent
preparing and circulating the environmental impact statement by the
local government agency.
(2) Final plats and short plats shall be approved, disapproved, or
returned to the applicant within thirty days from the date of filing
thereof, unless the applicant consents to an extension of such time
period.
(3)(a) Except as provided by (b) of this subsection, a final plat
meeting all requirements of this chapter shall be submitted to the
legislative body of the city, town, or county for approval within seven
years of the date of preliminary plat approval if the date of
preliminary plat approval is on or before December 31, 2014, and within
five years of the date of preliminary plat approval if the date of
preliminary plat approval is on or after January 1, 2015.
(b) A final plat meeting all requirements of this chapter shall be
submitted to the legislative body of the city, town, or county for
approval within ((nine)) ten years of the date of preliminary plat
approval if the project is ((within city limits,)) not subject to
requirements adopted under chapter 90.58 RCW((,)) and the date of
preliminary plat approval is on or before December 31, 2007.
(4) Nothing contained in this section shall act to prevent any
city, town, or county from adopting by ordinance procedures which would
allow extensions of time that may or may not contain additional or
altered conditions and requirements.

Sec. 2 RCW 58.17.170 and 2012 c 92 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the legislative body of the city, town or county finds
that the subdivision proposed for final plat approval conforms to all
terms of the preliminary plat approval, and that said subdivision meets
the requirements of this chapter, other applicable state laws, and any
local ordinances adopted under this chapter which were in effect at the
time of preliminary plat approval, it shall suitably inscribe and
execute its written approval on the face of the plat. The original of
said final plat shall be filed for record with the county auditor. One
reproducible copy shall be furnished to the city, town or county
engineer. One paper copy shall be filed with the county assessor.
Paper copies shall be provided to such other agencies as may be
required by ordinance.
(2)(a) Except as provided by (b) of this subsection, any lots in a
final plat filed for record shall be a valid land use notwithstanding
any change in zoning laws for a period of seven years from the date of
filing if the date of filing is on or before December 31, 2014, and for
a period of five years from the date of filing if the date of filing is
on or after January 1, 2015.
(b) Any lots in a final plat filed for record shall be a valid land
use notwithstanding any change in zoning laws for a period of ((nine))
ten years from the date of filing if the project is ((within city
limits,)) not subject to requirements adopted under chapter 90.58
RCW((,)) and the date of filing is on or before December 31, 2007.
(3)(a) Except as provided by (b) of this subsection, a subdivision
shall be governed by the terms of approval of the final plat, and the
statutes, ordinances, and regulations in effect at the time of approval
under RCW 58.17.150 (1) and (3) for a period of seven years after final
plat approval if the date of final plat approval is on or before
December 31, 2014, and for a period of five years after final plat
approval if the date of final plat approval is on or after January 1,
2015, unless the legislative body finds that a change in conditions
creates a serious threat to the public health or safety in the
subdivision.
(b) A subdivision shall be governed by the terms of approval of the
final plat, and the statutes, ordinances, and regulations in effect at
the time of approval under RCW 58.17.150 (1) and (3) for a period of
((nine)) ten years after final plat approval if the project is ((within
city limits,)) not subject to requirements adopted under chapter 90.58
RCW((,)) and the date of final plat approval is on or before December
31, 2007, unless the legislative body finds that a change in conditions
creates a serious threat to the public health or safety in the
subdivision.

--- END ---