BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.65.100 and 2005 c 82 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies to all commercial fishery licenses,
delivery licenses, and charter licenses.
(((1))) (2) An applicant for a license subject to this section may
designate a vessel to be used with the license. Except for emergency
salmon delivery licenses, the director may issue a license regardless
of whether the applicant designates a vessel. An applicant may
designate no more than one vessel on a license subject to this section.
(((2))) (3) A license for a fishery that requires a vessel
authorizes no taking or delivery of food fish or shellfish unless a
vessel is designated on the license. A delivery license authorizes no
delivery of food fish or shellfish unless a vessel is designated on the
license.
(((3))) (4) No vessel may be designated on more than one commercial
fishery license unless the licenses are for different fisheries,
except:
(a) The same vessel may be designated on two of the following
licenses, provided the licenses are owned by the same licensee:
(i) Shrimp pot-Puget Sound fishery license;
(ii) Sea cucumber dive fishery license; and
(iii) Sea urchin dive fishery license.
(b) Subject to the provisions of RCW 77.65.130, the same vessel may
be designated on ((two)) three Puget Sound Dungeness crab fishery
licenses((, subject to the provision of RCW 77.65.130)) issued pursuant
to RCW 77.70.110.
(((4))) (5) No vessel may be designated on more than one delivery
license, on more than one salmon charter license, or on more than one
nonsalmon charter license.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.65.130 and 2005 c 82 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who holds a commercial fishery license or a delivery
license may operate the vessel designated on the license. A person who
is not the license holder may operate the vessel designated on the
license only if:
(a) The person holds an alternate operator license issued by the
director; and
(b) The person is designated as an alternate operator on the
underlying commercial fishery license or delivery license under RCW
77.65.110.
(2) Only an individual at least sixteen years of age may hold an
alternate operator license.
(3) No individual may hold more than one alternate operator
license. An individual who holds an alternate operator license may be
designated as an alternate operator on an unlimited number of
commercial fishery licenses or delivery licenses under RCW 77.65.110.
(4) An individual who holds ((two)) multiple Dungeness crab -- Puget
Sound fishery licenses issued pursuant to RCW 77.70.110 may operate the
licenses on one vessel if the license holder or alternate operator is
on the vessel. The department shall allow a license holder to operate
up to one hundred crab pots for each license.
(5) Two persons owning separate Dungeness crab -- Puget Sound fishery
licenses may operate ((both)) their licenses on one vessel if the
license holders or their alternate operators are on the vessel.
(6) As used in this section, to "operate" means to control the
deployment or removal of fishing gear from state waters while aboard a
vessel or to operate a vessel delivering food fish or shellfish taken
in offshore waters to a port within the state.

--- END ---