BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.343.370 and 1991 c 60 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In case of a vacancy from any cause on the board of directors
of a school district other than a reconstituted board resulting from
reorganized school districts, a majority of the legally established
number of board members shall fill such vacancy by appointment:
PROVIDED, That should there exist fewer board members on the board of
directors of a school district than constitutes a majority of the
legally established number of board members, the educational service
district board members of the district in which the school district is
located by the vote of a majority of its legally established number of
board members shall appoint a sufficient number of board members to
constitute a legal majority on the board of directors of such school
district; and the remaining vacancies on such board of directors shall
be filled by such board of directors in accordance with the provisions
of this section: PROVIDED FURTHER, That should any board of directors
for whatever reason fail to fill a vacancy within ninety days from the
creation of such vacancy, the members of the educational service
district board of the district in which the school district is located
by majority vote shall fill such vacancy.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,
appointees to fill vacancies on boards of directors of school districts
shall meet the requirements provided by law for school directors and
shall serve until the next regular school district election, at which
time a successor shall be elected for the unexpired term.
(3) When filling a position in a second-class school district that
has been vacant for more than ninety days, if an educational service
district is not able to recruit a qualified candidate after thirty days
of advertising in a newspaper or other media of general circulation in
the school district, the educational service district board may appoint
an otherwise qualified candidate who is a resident of the school
district but does not reside in the director district where there is a
vacancy. The individual so appointed may serve as a school director
for a period lasting at least one year. The county auditor must
conduct an election to replace the temporary appointment at the next
regular school district election following the one-year appointment.
(4) If a vacancy will be created by a board member who has
submitted a resignation, that board member may not vote on the
selection of his or her replacement.

--- END ---