BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.12.175 and 1994 c 223 s 89 are each amended to read
as follows:
A ballot proposition to reduce the terms of office of port
commissioners from six years to four years shall be submitted to the
voters of any port district that otherwise would have commissioners
with six-year terms of office upon either resolution of the port
commissioners or petition of voters of the port district proposing the
reduction in terms of office, which petition has been signed by voters
of the port district equal in number to at least ten percent of the
number of voters in the port district voting at the last general
election. The petition shall be submitted to the county auditor. If
the petition was signed by sufficient valid signatures, the ballot
proposition shall be submitted at the next general ((or special))
election that occurs sixty or more days after the adoption of the
resolution or submission of the petition.
If the ballot proposition reducing the terms of office of port
commissioners is approved by a simple majority vote of the voters
voting on the proposition, the commissioner or commissioners who are
elected at that election shall be elected to four-year terms of office.
The terms of office of the other commissioners shall not be reduced,
but each successor shall be elected to a four-year term of office.

--- END ---