BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.160.010 and 2012 c 225 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that it is the public policy of the state
of Washington to direct financial resources toward the fostering of
economic development through the stimulation of investment and job
opportunities and the retention of sustainable existing employment for
the general welfare of the inhabitants of the state. Reducing
unemployment and reducing the time citizens remain jobless is important
for the economic welfare of the state. A valuable means of fostering
economic development is the construction of public facilities which
contribute to the stability and growth of the state's economic base.
Expenditures made for these purposes as authorized in this chapter are
declared to be in the public interest, and constitute a proper use of
public funds. A community economic revitalization board is needed
which shall aid the development of economic opportunities. The general
objectives of the board should include:
(a) Strengthening the economies of areas of the state which have
experienced or are expected to experience chronically high unemployment
rates or below average growth in their economies;
(b) Encouraging the diversification of the economies of the state
and regions within the state in order to provide greater seasonal and
cyclical stability of income and employment;
(c) Encouraging wider access to financial resources for both large
and small industrial development projects;
(d) Encouraging new economic development or expansions to maximize
employment;
(e) Encouraging the retention of viable existing firms and
employment;
(f) Providing incentives for expansion of employment opportunities
for groups of state residents that have been less successful relative
to other groups in efforts to gain permanent employment; ((and))
(g) Enhancing job and business growth through facility development
and other improvements in innovation partnership zones designated under
RCW 43.330.270; and
(h) Encouraging the revitalization of abandoned and vacant
properties to maximize the number and type of businesses, services, and
employment opportunities available in a community.
(2) The legislature also finds that the state's economic
development efforts can be enhanced by, in certain instances, providing
funds to improve state highways, county roads, or city streets for
industries considering locating or expanding in this state.
(3) The legislature finds it desirable to provide a process whereby
the need for diverse public works improvements necessitated by planned
economic development can be addressed in a timely fashion and with
coordination among all responsible governmental entities.
(4) The legislature also finds that the state's economic
development efforts can be enhanced by, in certain instances, providing
funds to assist development of telecommunications infrastructure that
supports business development, retention, and expansion in the state.
(5) The legislature also finds that the state's economic
development efforts can be enhanced by providing funds to improve
markets for those recyclable materials representing a large fraction of
the waste stream. The legislature finds that public facilities which
result in private construction of processing or remanufacturing
facilities for recyclable materials are eligible for consideration from
the board.
(6) The legislature finds that sharing economic growth statewide is
important to the welfare of the state. The ability of communities to
pursue business and job retention, expansion, and development
opportunities depends on their capacity to ready necessary economic
development project plans, sites, permits, and infrastructure for
private investments. Project-specific planning, predevelopment, and
infrastructure are critical ingredients for economic development. It
is, therefore, the intent of the legislature to increase the amount of
funding available through the community economic revitalization board
and to authorize flexibility for available resources in these areas to
help fund planning, predevelopment, and construction costs of
infrastructure and facilities and sites that foster economic vitality
and diversification.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.160.020 and 2012 c 225 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board.
(2) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(3) "Local government" or "political subdivision" means any port
district, county, city, town, special purpose district, and any other
municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state
providing for public facilities under this chapter.
(4) "Municipality" means a city, county, town, or port district of
this state.
(5) "Public facilities" means a project of a local government,
municipality, or a federally recognized Indian tribe for the planning,
acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement,
rehabilitation, or improvement of: Bridges; roads; research, testing,
training, and incubation facilities in areas designated as innovation
partnership zones under RCW 43.330.270; buildings or structures;
domestic and industrial water, earth stabilization, sanitary sewer,
storm sewer, railroad, electricity, telecommunications, transportation,
natural gas, and port facilities; all for the purpose of job creation,
job retention, or job expansion.
(((5))) (6) "Rural county" means a county with a population density
of fewer than one hundred persons per square mile or a county smaller
than two hundred twenty-five square miles, as determined by the office
of financial management and published each year by the department for
the period July 1st to June 30th.
(7) "Urban growth area" means an area designated by a county
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.160 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the loans and grants authorized in RCW
43.160.060, a revitalization program is established. Under the
revitalization program, the board is authorized to make direct loans to
municipalities for financing the cost of public facilities.
(2) Application for loan funds available under the revitalization
program must be made in the form and manner as the board prescribes.
In making loans, the board must conform to the requirements in this
subsection (2).
(a) One or a combination of loans to a municipality made under the
revitalization program for a specific project may not exceed two
million dollars.
(b) The board must operate the program with the appropriations
provided for this purpose. Excluding repayments, the amount
appropriated may not exceed ten million dollars in any biennium.
(c) The board may not provide financial assistance for a project
that:
(i) Contains evidence that the project would result in a
development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other
community in the state;
(ii) Has a primary purpose to facilitate or promote gambling; or
(iii) Is located outside the jurisdiction of the applicant.
(d) The board may provide financial assistance only for a project
that:
(i) Demonstrates convincing evidence that a specific private
development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the
public facility improvement is made;
(ii) Will improve the opportunities for revitalizing existing
retail, industrial, or commercial properties located in an urban growth
area that have either been abandoned or for which more than seventy-five percent of the square footage is vacant;
(iii) Is part of a local economic development plan consistent with
applicable state planning requirements; and
(iv) Demonstrates project feasibility using standard economic
principles.
(e) An application must demonstrate local match and local
participation, in accordance with guidelines developed by the board.
(f) An application must be approved by the municipality and
supported by the local associate development organization or local
workforce development council.
(g) The board may allow de minimis general system improvements to
be funded if they are critically linked to the viability of the
project.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.160.070 and 2008 c 327 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Public facilities financial assistance, with the exception of
the revitalization program in section 3 of this act, when authorized by
the board, is subject to the following conditions:
(((1))) (a) The moneys in the public facilities construction loan
revolving account shall be used solely to fulfill commitments arising
from financial assistance authorized in this chapter. The total
outstanding amount which the board ((shall)) may dispense at any time
pursuant to this section shall not exceed the moneys available from the
account.
(((2))) (b) On contracts made for public facilities loans the board
shall determine the interest rate which loans shall bear. The interest
rate shall not exceed ten percent per annum. The board may provide
reasonable terms and conditions for repayment for loans, including
partial forgiveness of loan principal and interest payments on projects
located in rural communities as defined by the board, or rural
counties. The loans shall not exceed twenty years in duration.
(((3))) (c) Repayments of loans made from the public facilities
construction loan revolving account under the contracts for public
facilities construction loans shall be paid into the public facilities
construction loan revolving account. Repayments of loans from moneys
from the new appropriation from the public works assistance account for
the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 1999, shall be paid into the public
works assistance account.
(((4))) (d) When every feasible effort has been made to provide
loans and loans are not possible, the board may provide grants upon
finding that unique circumstances exist.
(2) Public facilities financial assistance for the revitalization
program in section 3 of this act, when authorized by the board, is
subject to the conditions in this subsection (2).
(a) The moneys in the public facilities construction loan revolving
account available for the revitalization program shall be used solely
to fulfill commitments arising from financial assistance authorized in
section 3 of this act. The total outstanding amount that the board may
dispense at any time pursuant to this section shall not exceed the
moneys available from the account.
(b) On contracts made for revitalization program loans, the board
may not require the municipality to pay interest.
(c) A municipality must begin repayment of a loan five years after
receiving the loan. No loan may exceed ten years in duration.
(d) Repayments of loans made from the public facilities
construction loan revolving account under the contracts for the
revitalization program must be paid into the public facilities
construction loan revolving account and accounted for separately from
other funds in the account.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.160.076 and 2011 c 180 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as authorized to the contrary under subsection (2) of
this section, from all funds available to the board for financial
assistance in a biennium under this chapter, the board shall approve at
least seventy-five percent of the first twenty million dollars of funds
available and at least fifty percent of any additional funds for
financial assistance for projects in rural counties.
(2) If at any time during the last six months of a biennium the
board finds that the actual and anticipated applications for qualified
projects in rural counties are clearly insufficient to use up the
allocations under subsection (1) of this section, then the board shall
estimate the amount of the insufficiency and during the remainder of
the biennium may use that amount of the allocation for financial
assistance to projects not located in rural counties.
(3) The board shall solicit qualifying projects to plan, design,
and construct public facilities needed to attract new industrial and
commercial activities in areas impacted by the closure or potential
closure of large coal-fired electric generation facilities, which for
the purposes of this section means a facility that emitted more than
one million tons of greenhouse gases in any calendar year prior to
2008. The projects should be consistent with any applicable plans for
major industrial activity on lands formerly used or designated for
surface coal mining and supporting uses under RCW 36.70A.368. When the
board receives timely and eligible project applications from a
political subdivision of the state for financial assistance for such
projects, the board from available funds shall give priority
consideration to such projects.
(4) This section does not apply to section 3 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.160.080 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6011 are each
amended to read as follows:
There shall be a fund in the state treasury known as the public
facilities construction loan revolving account, which shall consist of
all moneys collected under this chapter and any moneys appropriated to
it by law. Within the account, moneys collected under this chapter and
appropriated by law for the purpose of the revitalization program
created in section 3 of this act must be accounted for separately from
all other funds. Disbursements from the revolving account shall be on
authorization of the board. In order to maintain an effective
expenditure and revenue control, the public facilities construction
loan revolving account shall be subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW. ((During the 2009-2011 biennium, sums in the public
facilities construction loan revolving account may be used for
community economic revitalization board export assistance grants and
loans in section 1018, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. and for
matching funds for the federal energy regional innovation cluster in
section 1017, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.160 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When the board makes a loan for the revitalization program, the
municipality must meet the repayment obligations of the loan as
described in this chapter and specified in the contract with the board.
(2) If a city, county, or town is delinquent in repaying a loan
made from the revitalization program, the state treasurer must collect
from the city, county, or town an amount equal to the total amount of
the loan as provided in this section. The conditions of the loan and
its repayment are as provided in this subsection (2).
(a) The term of the loan is ten years from the origination date
subject to prepayment in whole or in part.
(b) The state treasurer must transfer taxes that would otherwise be
distributed to the city, county, or town pursuant to RCW 82.14.030 from
the local sales and use tax account to the public facilities
construction loan revolving account for repayment of the loan, in
amounts sufficient to make equal monthly payments of principal over the
remaining term. If a lump sum payment is received by the state in
repayment of any portion of the loan, the principal amount on the
outstanding loan must be reduced by the lump sum payment and monthly
payments must be recalculated accordingly. In no event may the
requirement to make monthly payments be eliminated in any month.
(3) If a port is delinquent in repaying a loan made from the
revitalization program, the county treasurer must collect from the port
an amount equal to the total amount of the loan as provided in this
section. The conditions of the loan and its repayment are as provided
in this subsection (3).
(a) The term of the loan is ten years from the origination date
subject to prepayment in whole or in part.
(b) The county treasurer must transfer taxes raised by levy that
would otherwise be distributed to the port to the public facilities
construction loan revolving account for repayment of the loan, in
amounts sufficient to make equal monthly payments of principal over the
remaining term. If a lump sum payment is received by the state in
repayment of any portion of the loan, the principal amount on the
outstanding loan must be reduced by the lump sum payment and monthly
payments must be recalculated accordingly. In no event may the
requirement to make monthly payments be eliminated in any month.
(4) Diversion of taxes under subsection (2) or (3) of this section
applies only if a municipality is delinquent in repaying a loan. If
imposed, the diversion terminates once the loan has been paid in full.

--- END ---