BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.04.050 and 2012 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
The following named officers and persons, active or retired, are
hereby authorized to solemnize marriages, to wit: Justices of the
supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of the superior
courts, supreme court commissioners, court of appeals commissioners,
superior court commissioners, judges of courts of limited jurisdiction
as defined in RCW 3.02.010, judges of tribal courts, and any regularly
licensed or ordained minister or any priest, imam, rabbi, or similar
official of any religious organization((, and judges of courts of
limited jurisdiction as defined in RCW 3.02.010)). That a marriage is
solemnized by a tribal court judge pursuant to authority under this
section does not create tribal court jurisdiction and does not affect
state court authority as otherwise provided by law to enter a judgment
for purposes of any dissolution, legal separation, or other proceedings
related to the marriage that is binding on the parties and entitled to
full faith and credit.

--- END ---