BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and,
subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar
amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be
sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2015, out of the several funds specified in this act.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Fiscal year 2014" or "FY 2014" means the period beginning July
1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2014.
(b) "Fiscal year 2015" or "FY 2015" means the period beginning July
1, 2014, and ending June 30, 2015.
(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.
(3) Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any
portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is
not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to
fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.
(4) The amounts shown under the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future
Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for informational purposes only
and do not constitute legislative approval of these amounts. "Prior
biennia" typically refers to the immediate prior biennium for
reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia in the case of
specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an estimate of what
may be appropriated for the project or program in the 2015-2017
biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero does not
necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide funding for
the project or program in the future.
(5) "Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless
the context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant
conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations.
Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended balances remaining
on June 30, 2013, from the 2011-2013 biennial appropriations for each
project.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Rural Washington Loan Fund (19882002)

Reappropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,260,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,365,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (20064008)

The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 131,
chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $692,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,210,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,902,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Rural Washington Loan Fund (20064010)

Reappropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,656,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,471,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,127,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Job and Economic Development Grants (20064950)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 107, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,406,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,051,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,457,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Jobs in Communities (20064951)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 140, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,428,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,822,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water Assistance Program (20074004)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,693,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,347,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Rural Washington Loan Fund (20074008)

Reappropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,751,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,027,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(20074009)

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,434,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $195,566,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Job Development Fund Grants (20074010)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1032, chapter 520, Laws of 2007 and section 1005,
chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,061,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,869,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,930,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Longview Regional Water Treatment Plant Dredging (20081001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $126,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (20084001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $124,394,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,144,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Innovation Partnership Zones (20082003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,958,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Development Fund (20084850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,410,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,506,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,916,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Belfair Sewer Improvements (20084852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $506,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,794,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
2008 Local and Community Projects (20084861)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,535,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,209,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,744,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000005)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,233,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,201,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,434,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,434,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000010)

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,076,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,177,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,253,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Innovation Partnership Zones (30000012)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(30000013)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,964,000
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $751,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,715,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $127,285,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (30000019)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The projects must comply with RCW
43.63A.125 and other requirements for community projects administered
by the department.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $556,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,589,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,145,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
2010 Local and Community Projects (30000082)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The projects must comply with RCW
43.63A.125 and other requirements for community projects administered
by the department.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,961,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,169,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Schools (91000002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1013, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Temporary Public Works Grant Program (92000021)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations in this section are
subject to the provisions of section 6001, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st
sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,049,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,118,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,252,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,370,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Jobs Act for K-12 Public Schools and Higher Education Institutions
(91000085)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1016, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,643,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,166,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,809,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Economic Revitalization Board - Export Assistance Grants
and Loans (92000069)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1018, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $601,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,399,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000095)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For projects involving repair,
replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or
other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency
audit is obtainable, the public works board must require as a contract
condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade
efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the
audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,000,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000097)

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, Affordable Housing Trust Fund
(30000098)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1026, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,332,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,668,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (30000100)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1029, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,554,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,699,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,253,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Building for the Arts Grants (30000101)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1030, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,137,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,325,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,462,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Building Communities Fund Grants (30000102)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1027, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,509,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,894,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,403,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (30000166)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1002, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,541,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,276,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,817,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Clean Energy Partnership (30000175)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided solely for implementation of
the recommendations of the clean energy leadership council by providing
state matching funds for projects that:

(a) Integrate energy efficiency and renewable energy in buildings;
(b) Integrate renewable energy into the regional electrical grid;
(c) Advance bioenergy in the state.
(2) State funding must not exceed fifty percent of the total
program or project funds.
(3) Eligible projects must:
(a) Involve a majority of companies that are located in Washington
state;
(b) Represent a substantially new solution that is not widely
available today; and
(c) Be designed to generate solutions that are applicable both
inside and outside of the state.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,499,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Financing Energy/Water Efficiency (30000180)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,927,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Energy Efficiency Grants for Local Governments (91000241)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 301, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,797,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $203,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Energy Efficiency Grants for Higher Education (91000242)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 307, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,910,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Weatherization (91000247)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1015, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,534,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,466,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Connell Klindworth Water Line Distribution (91000318)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $512,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $540,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1039 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for Families with Children (91000409)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 310, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1040 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for People with Developmental Disabilities (91000410)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1009, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1041 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for Seniors and People with Physical Disabilities
(91000411)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 311, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,666,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,666,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1042 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for People with Chronic Mental Illness (91000412)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1010, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1043 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for the Homeless (91000413)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1011, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,944,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,944,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1044 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for Farmworkers (91000414)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1012, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,215,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,215,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1045 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for People At Risk of Homelessness (91000415)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 312, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for Low-Income Households (91000416)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1013, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,982,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,982,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
2012 Local and Community Projects (91000417)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 302, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,097,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $526,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,623,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1048 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Competitive Pool (91000432)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1014, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,530,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects 2012 (91000437)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 1003, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,831,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,004,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,835,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1050 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Innovation Partnership Zones - Facilities and Infrastructure
(92000089)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 309, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,177,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $343,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,520,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1051 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board Administered Economic
Development, Innovation, and Export Grants (92000096)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 304, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,891,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,871,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,762,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1052 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Main Street Improvement Grants (92000098)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 305, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,771,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $286,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,057,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1053 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Brownfield Redevelopment Grants (92000100)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely for redevelopment of the Bellingham waterfront.

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,492,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1054 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Port and Export Related Infrastructure (92000102)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 306, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,222,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,928,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1055 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Cowlitz River Dredging (20082856)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1056 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Chehalis River Basin Flood Relief Projects (91000398)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,689,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $311,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1057 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Catastrophic Flood Relief (20084850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $752,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,733,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,202,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,687,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1058 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Aerospace and Manufacturing Training Equipment Pool (91000003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,265,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,265,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1059 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Natural Resource Building Roof Replacement/Exterior Foam Insulation
Repairs (30000546)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $366,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $379,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,103,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,482,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1060 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation (30000550)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,698,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $636,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,334,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1061 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Capitol Lake Dredging (30000571)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Within the reappropriation, the department
must prepare a long term financing plan for maintenance dredging
activities that may be required to either maintain Capitol Lake or
support estuary restoration efforts. In consultation with the involved
local governments, the department must recommend an equitable cost
sharing formula for the cost of maintenance dredging based on the
relative benefits received by the state and the various local
governments.

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $181,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1062 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Legislative Building Critical Exterior Repairs (30000577)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $892,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $956,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1063 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Legislative Building Critical Hydronic Loop Repairs (30000584)

Reappropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,025,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $154,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,179,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1064 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Reuse General Administration Building for Heritage Center, State
Library, and State Patrol (92000003)

Reappropriation:
Washington State Heritage Center Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1065 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Legislative Building Critical Exterior Repairs (92000004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $557,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $843,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1066 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Preservation (30000560)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,840,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $417,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,257,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,542,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,799,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1067 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Program (30000561)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,728,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,230,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,958,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1068 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Thurston County Readiness Center (91000005)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1069 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Heritage Barn Preservation Program (30000005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1070 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Courthouse Preservation (30000006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $673,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital: Westlake Building Renovation (30000852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,575,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements
(30001264)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation (30001290)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Facilities Preservation (30001291)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,315,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,760,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,075,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Hazards Abatement and Demolition (30002221)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,244,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,244,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Capacity to Replace Maple Lane School (92000005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,410,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,460,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Rainier School: Cottages Remodel and Renovation (91000017)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000013)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,670,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,840,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $127,510,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Safe Reliable Drinking Water Grants (92000002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,628,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,010,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,638,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Walla Walla Nursing Facility (20082008)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,200,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,978,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,178,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $947,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Housing Units, Kitchen, and Site
Work (30000482)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,442,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,572,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
SW: Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (30000539)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $576,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,924,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
SW: Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000540)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,506,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $994,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Complex: Close Sewer Lagoon (20082022)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $294,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,097,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,891,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
SW: Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code (30000541)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $860,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (19742006)

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $552,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,998,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (19972012)

Reappropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,885,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,548,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,433,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Twin Lake Aquifer Recharge Project (20042951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $191,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $559,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (20044006)

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,467,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,518,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Conveyance Infrastructure Projects (20052850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions in section 322, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,569,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,143,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,712,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Quad Cities Water Right Mitigation (20052852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $421,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,179,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20062003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions in section 136, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $364,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,436,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Program (20062950)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 3008, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,705,000
Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water Supply
Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,404,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,109,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,391,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (20064002)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,223,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,453,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,676,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,940,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (20064007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $317,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $349,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,151,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants for Cleanup and Prevention (20064008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,066,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,834,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Transfer of Water Rights for Cabin Owners (20081951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $305,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grants (20084008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,108,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,767,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (20084010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $771,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $401,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $997,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,169,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,314,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,483,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Loan Program (20084011)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,581,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,068,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,649,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,351,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Yakima River Basin Water Storage Feasibility Study (20084026)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
completion of the United States bureau of reclamation's Yakima basin
storage feasibility study, including the associated joint national
environmental policy act, the state environmental policy act, and the
environmental impact statement. The reappropriated funds are to be
used by the bureau of reclamation and the department of ecology to
evaluate potential in basin storage facilities such as the proposed
Bumping Lake and Wymer reservoirs and other reasonable alternatives
that will enhance water supplies and streamflows in the Yakima Basin.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,167,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20084029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions in section 3054, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,897,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,103,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000007)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,325,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,825,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal
Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,720,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,870,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $142,830,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (30000008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,075,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Upper Columbia River Black Sand Beach Cleanup (30000016)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $383,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000028)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,612,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,388,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Kittitas Groundwater Study (30000029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funds may be provided to develop and implement water banking
and transfer methods and agreements that are fully protective of senior
water rights and that protect domestic groundwater users and improve
the profitability of farming operations. The legislature finds such
activities to be in the public interest because they can help sustain
the viability of the agricultural economy and enhance the certainty of
water supplies for domestic groundwater users.
(2) Funds may be provided to lease or purchase water rights to
create a reserve water supply for domestic groundwater users that have
a groundwater right with a priority date later than May 10, 1905, as
well as for all out-of-priority groundwater users. In securing water
for such domestic groundwater users, strong preference must be given to
the use of water banking and transfer methods that provide alternatives
to permanent purchase and dry-up of agricultural water rights in the
basin, including dry-year options, water banking, long-term water
supply lease agreements, long-term agricultural land fallowing
agreements, and reduced consumptive use through efficiency or
alternative cropping arrangements while maintaining historic return
flows.
(3) A portion of the reappropriation may be used for administrative
costs, not to exceed four percent, and other costs associated with
leasing or acquiring and transferring the water rights. All costs must
be fully recovered from participating domestic water users for their
prorated portion of the cost, including, but not limited to, the costs
of securing a water right or rights for this purpose, costs associated
with the development and implementation of alternative agricultural
water transfer methods, associated annual operational costs, and
federal water service contract costs owed to the United States bureau
of reclamation. Funds recovered in this manner must be deposited in
the state and local improvements revolving account and may be used for
any purpose provided in this section.

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $263,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $437,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grant Program (30000039)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 3006, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,019,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,062,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,081,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,830,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,911,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Storm Water Retrofit and Low-Impact Development Grant Program
(30000097)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 3005, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,151,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving
Account--Waste Facilities 1980--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,812,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,564,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,784,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,609,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reducing Diesel Particle Emissions in Tacoma (30000139)

Reappropriation:
Air Pollution Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000142)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,793,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,742,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,535,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,465,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxic Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 3021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,402,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,670,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,072,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,126,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,198,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Settlement Funding To Clean Up Toxic Sites (30000145)

Reappropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $299,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,201,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Habitat Mitigation (91000007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,338,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,062,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Protect Communities from Flood and Drought (92000002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,984,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,991,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Wastewater Treatment and Water Reclamation (92000041)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 3016, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,641,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,789,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (30000208)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 3024, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,904,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,196,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000209)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For projects involving repair,
replacement, or improvement of a wastewater treatment plant or other
public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is
obtainable, the department of ecology must require as a contract
condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade
efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the
audit as part of its water pollution control revolving fund program
loan.

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,594,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $97,068,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,662,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,482,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,144,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Waste Tire Pile Prevention and Cleanup (30000210)

Reappropriation:
Waste Tire Removal Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $263,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $737,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Wood Stove Pollution Reduction (30000211)

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,111,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $889,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Diesel Emissions Reduction (30000212)

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,419,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,581,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000213)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 3030, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,219,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,781,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Hood Canal Regional Septic Repair Loan Program (30000215)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $395,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,855,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3039 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grant Program (30000216)

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,463,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,371,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,834,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3040 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000217)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,146,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,854,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3041 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Burlington Northern Santa Fe Skykomish Restoration (30000218)

Reappropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $284,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soils Remediation Program - Central Washington (30000263)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,693,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,018,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,711,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3043 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000265)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,410,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $990,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Yakima Basin Integrated Water Management Plan Implementation
(30000278)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,780,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
ASARCO - Tacoma Smelter Plume and Mines (30000280)

Reappropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,963,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,684,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,647,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Padilla Bay Boat Launch (30000281)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects (30000282)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3048 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds Administration (30000283)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,413,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,787,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Irrigation Efficiencies (30000285)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $549,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $451,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Statewide Storm Water Projects (30000294)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
construction projects or design/construction projects statewide that
result in the greatest improvements necessary to meet national
pollution discharge elimination system requirements for communities
least able to pay for those projects or for jurisdictions that are
early adopters of new regulations and effective new technology. The
department must develop specific evaluative criteria to award grants on
a competitive basis to projects that meet the policy objectives in this
section, demonstrate readiness to proceed, and have a minimum cash
match of twenty-five percent.

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,334,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $666,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Green River Flood Levee Improvements (30000295)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Mount Vernon Flood Protection (30000297)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (91000032)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
the following list of projects:

Project Authorized Amount

Port Gamble Bay - Open up 90 acres of geoduck tracts $2,000,000

Port Gamble Bay - Source control, habitat preservation
and clean-up sustainability $7,000,000

Administration $180,000

TOTAL $9,180,000

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (91000033)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 3003, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,543,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,545,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Fiscal Year 2012 Statewide Storm Water Grant Program (91000053)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 3004, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,161,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $912,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,073,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Storm Water Retrofit and Local Improvement District Competitive
Grants (91000054)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 3005, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,459,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,463,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Water Management Projects (91000179)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 502, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Skagit Mitigation (91000181)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely for the department to develop mitigation options and
alternative water sources or tools to make water available for stream
flows and for rural domestic permit-exempt uses within the
Carpenter/Fisher, East Nookachamps, and Upper Nookachamps subbasins.
Up to $100,000 of the amount specified shall be used to develop a rural
domestic demonstration project to determine if onsite best management
practices, including, but not limited to, rainwater infiltration, water
conservation, and low-impact development standards can meet the
mitigation requirements of chapter 173-503 WAC and be reasonably and
feasibly integrated into rural domestic developments.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,156,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Flood Levee Improvements (92000057)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section from the state building
construction account is provided solely for the Mt. Vernon flood
protection project.
(2) The reappropriation in this section from the local toxics
control account is provided solely for the King county flood district
for the Briscoe-Desimone levee improvement project.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Ground Water Management Yakima Basin (92000061)

Reappropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Bay View Park: Wide Wastewater Treatment System (20082041)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $370,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,817,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,187,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Ike Kinswa State Park: Improvement (20082950)

Reappropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $490,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Fish Barrier Removal (30000540)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $538,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,238,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Iron Horse Tunnel Hazard Repair (30000552)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,296,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,896,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3065 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works - Health and Safety (30000667)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works - Facilities and Infrastructure Preservation (30000766)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Facility and Infrastructure Backlog Reduction (30000770)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Picnic Shelters (91000018)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $490,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Rocky Reach Trail (91000035)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Comfort Stations (91000036)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $254,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,754,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3071 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Deferred Maintenance (91000030)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $670,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3072 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Energy Conservation (91000040)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $156,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $215,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3073 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Culverts (91000046)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3074 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Wallace Falls: Footbridge (91000047)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $470,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $486,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3075 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (20044001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $161,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,661,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,714,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,375,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3076 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (20044002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Any amount of the reappropriations that
are not obligated to a specific project may be used to fund alternate
projects approved by the legislature from the same account in biennia
succeeding that in which the moneys were originally appropriated.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $415,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $615,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,915,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3077 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Youth Athletic Fields (20062952)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 172, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,437,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3078 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (20064001)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 403, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,450,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3079 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (20064002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 404, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $928,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,228,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,772,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3080 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (20064004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 170, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
NOVA Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $437,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,142,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,579,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3081 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Family Forest and Fish Passage Program (20082001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 3138, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,761,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3082 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Facilities Program (20084001)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $469,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,552,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,021,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3083 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (20084003)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $424,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $472,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3084 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Restoration and Acquisition (20084004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $783,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,967,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3085 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (20084005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $264,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,761,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3086 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (20084008)

Reappropriation:
NOVA Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $425,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,611,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,036,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3087 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (20084011)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 3146, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,174,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,217,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,391,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,101,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,492,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3088 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (20084851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,929,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,071,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3089 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000002)

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $619,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,721,000
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,040,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,980,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,465,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,445,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3090 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000003)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,300,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $213,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,513,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,487,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3091 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Land and Water Conservation Fund (30000005)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,840,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3092 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000007)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are provided solely
for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2009-3, developed
March 9, 2009.

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $324,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $714,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,311,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3093 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000009)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $210,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $285,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3094 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000080)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,369,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,631,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3095 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000081)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,101,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,899,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3096 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Facilities Program (30000138)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3097 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000139)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are provided solely
for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3A,
developed May 24, 2011.

Reappropriation:
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $314,000
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,330,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,567,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,861,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,139,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3098 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000140)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,350,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,712,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,062,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3099 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (30000141)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 3067, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
NOVA Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,347,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,153,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3100 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Land and Water Conservation Fund (30000142)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3101 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000143)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3B, revised
April 10, 2013.

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,601,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,205,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,806,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3102 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000144)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $365,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3103 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Improvement Grants (30000145)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $359,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,741,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3104 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Recreational Trails Program (30000146)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,960,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,040,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3105 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000148)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation shall not be expended
on the acquisition of lands by state agencies.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,455,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,545,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3106 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Family Forest Fish Passage Program (91000001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $188,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,812,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3107 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Restoration (30000147)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation shall not be expended
on the acquisition of lands by state agencies.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,684,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,316,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3108 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000203)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $367,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,633,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3109 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Family Forest Fish Passage Program (91000097)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,981,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,019,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3110 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (91000007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $427,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,277,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3111 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Farms and Water Quality (91000004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3112 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Voights Creek Hatchery (20081003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,997,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,297,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3113 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Stemilt Basin Acquisition (20082029)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $153,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3114 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000300)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,207,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,557,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3115 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (30000295)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,505,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $321,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,826,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3116 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Access Areas Preservation (30000296)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $336,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $691,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,027,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3117 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Dam and Dike (30000297)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,043,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3118 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Leque Island Highway 532 Road Protection (92000019)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $394,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $286,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3119 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Mitchell Act Federal Grant (91000021)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,328,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $672,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3120 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,778,000
Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Special Wildlife Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $203,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,281,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,515,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $126,750,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $221,546,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3121 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Health Safety and Code Requirements (30000284)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $693,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $548,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,241,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3122 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (30000298)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,930,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3123 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Fish Passage Barrier Corrections (30000372)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $841,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $439,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,280,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3124 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Beebe Springs Development (92000026)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $960,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $931,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,891,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3125 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fishway Improvements/Diversions (91000033)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3126 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Hatchery Improvements (91000036)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,525,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,775,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3127 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Dry Forest Restoration (91000039)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $496,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $796,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3128 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Dam and Dike (91000042)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $197,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3129 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Access Sites (91000044)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,281,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3130 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Fish Passage Barriers (Culverts) (91000045)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $195,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3131 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (91000046)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $516,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3132 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Acquire Dryden Gravel Pit from Washington DOT (92000028)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $251,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $251,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3133 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Deschutes Watershed Center (20062008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $219,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,976,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,534,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,729,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3134 FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
Community Partnership Restoration Grants (30000007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,155,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $445,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3135 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Land Acquisition Grants (20052021)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,714,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,240,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,954,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3136 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Marine Station (20081015)

Reappropriation:
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $318,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $316,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $634,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $866,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3137 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Legacy (30000060)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,519,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,481,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3138 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Hazardous Fuels Reduction, Forest Health, and Ecosystem
Improvements (91000001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3139 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
National Coastal Wetland Conservation Program Lands Acquisition
(91000007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $593,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $407,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3140 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Replacing State Forest Lands with Productive Forests (91000029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The total reappropriation is provided solely to the department
to transfer from state forest land status to natural resources
conservation area status certain state forest lands in counties with a
population of 25,000 or less that are subject to timber harvest
deferrals greater than thirty years due to the presence of wildlife
species listed as endangered or threatened under the federal endangered
species act. The approved list of properties for transfer is
identified in the LEAP capital document No. 2011-5A, revised April 10,
2013.
(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and
transferred at fair market value, without consideration of management
or regulatory encumbrances associated with wildlife species listed
under the federal endangered species act. The value of the timber and
other valuable materials transferred must be distributed as provided in
RCW 79.64.110, in the same manner as valuable material revenues from
other state forest lands in the applicable counties. The value of the
land transferred must be deposited in the park land trust revolving
account and be solely used to buy replacement state forest land within
the same county as the property transferred, consistent with RCW
79.22.060.
(3) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the
department shall execute and record a real property instrument that
dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in
subsection (1) of this section. Transfer agreements for properties
identified in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that
restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose.
(4) The department and applicable counties shall work in good faith
to carry out the intent of this section. However, the department or
applicable counties may remove a property from the transfer list based
on new, substantive information, if it is determined that transfer of
the property is not in the statewide interest of either the state
forest trust or the natural resources conservation area program.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $727,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,273,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3141 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Puget SoundCorps (91000046)

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,436,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,436,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,564,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3142 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Derelict Vessel Removal and Disposal (91000049)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $589,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,411,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3143 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Urban Forest Restoration (Puget Sound Basin) (91000051)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $399,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3144 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Large Debris Removal (91000052)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $188,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3145 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Secret Harbor Estuary Restoration - Cypress Island (91000053)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $415,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $535,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3146 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Restoration Projects to Improve Natural Resources (91000054)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,360,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3147 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Point Ruston Sediment Capping/Shoreline Restoration Stabilization
(91000065)

Reappropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,584,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $616,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3148 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Hazard Reduction and Safety (91000066)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,941,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,529,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,470,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3149 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Shoreline Restoration Projects (92000011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,944,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,022,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,966,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3150 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Creosote Piling Removal (92000014)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $770,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3151 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (30000208)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
ecological restoration of the upland buffer areas within the Elk River
natural resource conservation area.

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Land Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,845,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3152 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (RMAP) (91000040)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,710,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,124,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,834,000

(End of part)

PART 4
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2007-2009 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (20084200)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For school construction projects funded
through the school construction assistance grant program, the
superintendent of public instruction shall require mapping the design
of new facilities and remapping the design of facilities to be
remodeled.

Reappropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $791,109,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $791,759,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Northeast King County Skills Center (20084855)

Reappropriation:
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,561,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,602,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4003 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Pierce County Skills Center (20084856)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,198,000
School Construction and Skills Center Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,248,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,688,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,609,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,545,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4004 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2009-2011 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (30000031)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $14,000,000 of the state building
construction account--state reappropriation in this section is for the
Grand Coulee Dam school district school project, contingent on the
availability of sufficient contributions from federal, local, private,
or other sources to make up the remainder of the total cost of the
project. The Grand Coulee Dam school district is faced with a unique
set of local funding barriers and federal or other funds may substitute
as the usual requirement for school district participation. In the
event sufficient matching contributions are not secured by the Grand
Coulee Dam school district, these funds shall lapse.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $490,595,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $516,595,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4005 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Energy Efficiency and Small Repair Grants (91000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 5007, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,424,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,465,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,889,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4006 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2011-2013 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,566,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $281,191,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $333,757,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $223,435,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $557,192,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4007 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Yakima Valley Technical Skills Center (30000076)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,962,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,481,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,443,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4008 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
SEA-Tech Branch Campus of Tri-Tech Skills Center (30000078)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,570,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $949,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,519,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4009 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Grant County Branch Campus of Wenatchee Valley Skills Center
(30000091)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,861,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $547,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,408,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4010 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Clark County Skills Center (30000093)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,151,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,901,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4011 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Energy Operational Savings Project Grants (30000097)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 5011, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp.s.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,351,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,649,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4012 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Energy Efficiency Grants for K-12 Schools (91000017)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,238,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,762,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4013 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Wenatchee Valley Skills Center (92000004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,386,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4014 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Spokane Area Professional - Technical Skills Center (92000005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,887,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,687,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4015 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
WA-NIC (Washington Network for Innovative Careers) Skills Center -
Snoqualmie Valley School District/Bellevue Community College (92000006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,715,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,715,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4016 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Puget Sound Skills Center (92000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office of the superintendent of public
instruction and the Puget Sound skills center shall enter into an
interagency agreement with the office of financial management to
provide funding for a budget evaluation study. The office of financial
management shall use a budget evaluation study team approach using
value engineering techniques and life cycle cost analysis in conducting
the study. The office of financial management shall select the budget
evaluation team members, contract for the study, and report the results
to the legislature, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, and the Puget Sound skills center in a timely manner
following completion of the study. The study must also include a
review of land acquisitions for the project site, including whether
there was adequate disclosure of fill materials that contained toxic
substances or substandard soils that would require disposal prior to
construction, and whether those disclosed conditions were accounted for
in setting the purchase price and other considerations for the land
acquisition.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4017 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Distressed Schools (92000009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,415,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,985,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4018 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Yakima Valley Technical Skills Center Sunnyside Satellite
(92000013)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,938,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $287,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4019 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Campus Preservation (30000018)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $149,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $401,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4020 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Bothell (20082006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,963,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,663,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,337,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4021 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
House of Knowledge Longhouse (30000021)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4022 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Odegaard Undergraduate Learning Center (30000370)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,675,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4023 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
High Voltage Infrastructure Improvement Project (30000371)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,165,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,365,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4024 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Minor Capital Repairs (30000372)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,487,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,987,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4025 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Tacoma Campus Development and Soil
Remediation (92000002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,300,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4026 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Burke Museum Renovation (20082850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4027 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Tacoma - Soils Remediation (20082852)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4028 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington State University Spokane - Riverpoint Biomedical and
Health Sciences (20162953)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,230,000
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,770,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,140,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,140,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4029 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Preservation (30000525)

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,515,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,315,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4030 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Patterson Hall Remodel (20062002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,885,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,958,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,843,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4031 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Preservation (30000427)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,320,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,654,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,974,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,666,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4032 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Science Building (30000045)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,678,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,483,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,061,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4033 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works Preservation (30000444)

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,930,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4034 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Combined Utilities (30000448)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,810,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,810,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4035 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Samuelson Communication and Technology Center (SCTC) (30000451)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,481,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,481,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4036 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Communications Laboratory Building Preservation and Renovation
(30000002)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,706,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,981,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4037 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Facilities Preservation (30000051)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,660,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,935,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4038 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Science Center - Lab I, 2nd Floor Renovation (30000116)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4039 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Carver Academic Renovation (20081060)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,374,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,531,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,905,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4040 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Classroom and Lab Upgrades (30000425)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $489,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $539,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,260,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,799,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4041 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Fraser Hall Renovation (30000427)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,440,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,940,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4042 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Preservation (30000431)

Reappropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,286,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,794,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4043 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Pacific-Lewis and Clark Station Camp Park Project (2002S001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $226,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,261,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,487,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4044 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Grants (20074004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
provisions of RCW 27.34.330.
(2) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the project
list in section 5137, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.
(3) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
provisions of section 5044, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $626,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,279,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,905,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4045 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Project Capital Grants (30000011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
provisions of section 5120, chapter 497, Laws of 2009.
(2) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
provisions of section 5045, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,152,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,273,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4046 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Building Preservation (30000111)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $414,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $386,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4047 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Grants (30000117)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
provisions of RCW 27.34.330.
(2) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
provisions of section 622, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,729,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,353,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,082,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4048 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College: Humanities and Student Services (20061204)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,305,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,388,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4049 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College: Campus Classrooms (20062696)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,629,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,987,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4050 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Learning Resource Center
(20062698)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,185,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,476,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,661,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4051 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clover Park Technical College: Allied Health Care Facility
(20062699)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,883,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,333,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4052 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Wood Construction Center
(20081216)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $942,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,367,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,309,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4053 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College: Technical Education Building (20081220)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,804,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,626,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4054 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Index Hall Replacement (20081221)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,652,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,662,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,314,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4055 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Trades and Industry Building
(20081222)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $573,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,272,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,332,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,177,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4056 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom: Cascade Core (20081321)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $568,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $219,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $787,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,054,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,841,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4057 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Health Careers Center (20082701)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,971,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,202,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,173,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4058 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: Health Science Building (20082702)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,884,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,475,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,529,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4059 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bates Technical College: Mohler Communications Technology Center
(20082703)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $219,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,709,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,267,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,195,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4060 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Health and Advanced Technologies Building
(20082705)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,335,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,239,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,348,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,922,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4061 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Fort Worden Building 202 (30000114)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,191,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $186,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,377,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4062 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College: Fisheries Program (30000117)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $410,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4063 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lower Columbia College: Myklebust Gymnasium (30000118)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,712,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4064 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Seattle Maritime Academy
(30000120)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,117,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,780,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,117,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4065 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Palmer Martin Building (30000121)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $994,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,735,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,732,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4066 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College: College Instruction Center (30000122)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Olympic community college shall enter into
an interagency agreement with the office of financial management to
provide funding for a budget evaluation study. The office of financial
management shall use a budget evaluation study team approach using
value engineering techniques and life cycle cost analysis in conducting
the study. The office of financial management shall select the budget
evaluation team members, contract for the study, and report the results
to the legislature and agencies in a timely manner following the study.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,212,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $412,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,624,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4067 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College: Technology Building Renewal
(30000129)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,159,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,260,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,419,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4068 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Science, Math, and Technology
Building (30000130)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,271,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,606,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,877,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4069 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs "A" (30000504)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,620,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,379,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,999,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,046,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,045,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4070 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Repairs "A" (30000505)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,676,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,153,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,829,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4071 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs "A" (30000434)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,708,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,417,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4072 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Preservation (30000461)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,544,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,457,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,001,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4073 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (30000674)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,730,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

(End of part)

PART 5
2013 SUPPLEMENTAL CAPITAL BUDGET
Sec. 5001 2012 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 3002 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxic Sites - Puget Sound (91000032)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the following ranked list of projects. ((If a
specified project has not met the requirements for executing a contract
with the department by April 30, 2013, the department may allocate the
amount specified to additional projects awarded on a competitive basis
provided that the awardee is ready to proceed with the project.))

Project Authorized
Amount

Port Gamble Bay - Open up 90
acres of geoduck ((tracks)) tracts $2,000,000

Port Gamble Bay - Source
control, habitat preservation, and
cleanup sustainability $7,000,000

Administration $270,000

Total $9,270,000

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,270,000

Sec. 5002 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 3052 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Fort Worden State Park: Building 202 Rehabilitation (30000027)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,377,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,377,000))
$0

Sec. 5003 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 3070 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000143)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3B, ((developed
April 6, 2011)) revised April 10, 2013.

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,806,000))
$6,461,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,806,000))
$6,461,000

Sec. 5004 2011 1st sp s. c 49 s 3112 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Replacing State Forest Lands with Productive Forests (91000029)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The total appropriation is provided solely to the department to
transfer from state forest land status to natural resources
conservation area status certain state forest lands in counties with a
population of 25,000 or less which are subject to timber harvest
deferrals greater than thirty years due to the presence of wildlife
species listed as endangered or threatened under the federal endangered
species act. The approved list of properties for transfer is
identified in the LEAP capital document No. 2011-5A, ((developed March
24, 2011)) revised April 10, 2013.
(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and
transferred at fair market value, without consideration of management
or regulatory encumbrances associated with wildlife species listed
under the federal endangered species act. The value of the timber and
other valuable materials transferred must be distributed as provided in
RCW 79.64.110, in the same manner as valuable material revenues from
other state forest lands in the applicable counties. The value of the
land transferred must be deposited in the park land trust revolving
account and be solely used to buy replacement state forest land within
the same county as the property transferred, consistent with RCW
79.22.060.
(3) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the
department shall execute and record a real property instrument that
dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in
subsection (1) of this section. Transfer agreements for properties
identified in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that
restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose.
(4) The department and applicable counties shall work in good faith
to carry out the intent of this section. However, the department or
applicable counties may remove a property from the transfer list based
on new, substantive information, if it is determined that transfer of
the property is not in the statewide interest of either the state
forest trust or the natural resources conservation area program.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (30000208)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
ecological restoration of the upland buffer areas within the Elk River
natural resource conservation area.

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,000

Sec. 5006 2012 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 5005 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
2011-13 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,337,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants and for
completing inventory and building condition assessments for all public
school districts once every six years.
(2) In calculating square foot eligibility for state assistance
grants, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced by fifty
percent.
(3) $952,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for mapping the design of new
facilities and remapping the design of facilities to be remodeled, for
school construction projects funded through the school construction
assistance program.

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $307,558,000
Common School Construction Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,600,000))
$2,230,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($309,158,000))
$309,788,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,351,139,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,660,297,000))
$1,660,927,000

Sec. 5007 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5101 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Fort Worden Building 202 (30000114)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$4,377,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$4,377,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008 COLUMBIA RIVER BASIN NONTAXABLE AND
TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS.
Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from
the Columbia river basin water supply development account may be
transferred to the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply
development account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee
to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and
regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. The
state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of
financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation
authority between the Columbia river basin water supply development
account and the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply
development account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation
authority from the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply
development account to the Columbia river basin water supply
development account may be made.

(End of part)

PART 6
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 6001 (1) Allotments for appropriations in this
act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review
requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in
compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing
alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10
RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and
RCW 43.88.110.
(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget
notes or in the governor's budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6002 To ensure that major construction
projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive
intent, appropriations in this act in excess of $5,000,000 shall not be
expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has
reviewed and approved the agency's predesign. The predesign document
shall include, but not be limited to, program, site, and cost analysis,
including life cycle cost, in accordance with the predesign manual
adopted by the office of financial management. The results of life
cycle cost analysis shall be a primary consideration in the selection
of a building design. Construction shall proceed only upon providing
to the office of financial management the life cycle costs. To improve
monitoring of major construction projects, progress reports shall be
submitted by the agency administering the project to the office of
financial management and to the fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and senate. Reports will be submitted on July 1st and
December 31st each year in a format to be developed by the office of
financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6003 (1) To ensure minor works appropriations
are carried out in accordance with legislative intent, funds
appropriated in this act shall not be allotted until project lists are
on file at the office of financial management, the house of
representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means
committee. All projects must meet the criteria included in subsection
(2)(a) of this section. Revisions to the lists must be filed with the
office of financial management, the house of representatives capital
budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee and include
an explanation of variances from the prior lists before funds may be
expended on the revisions.
(2)(a) Minor works projects are single line appropriations that
include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued
between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each, with the exception of higher
education minor works projects that may be valued up to $2,000,000.
These projects can generally be completed within two years of the
appropriation with the funding provided. Agencies are prohibited from
including projects on their minor works lists that are a phase of a
larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time,
would exceed $1,000,000, or $2,000,000 for higher education minor works
projects. Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the
Americans with disabilities act may be included in any of the above
minor works categories.
(b) Minor works appropriations shall not be used for, among other
things: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or
designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor
works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works
list; moveable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment
not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office
of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a
specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition;
rolling stock, computers or to supplement funding for projects with
funding shortfalls unless expressly authorized elsewhere in this act.
The office of financial management may make an exception to the
limitations described in this subsection (2)(b) for exigent
circumstances after notifying the legislative fiscal committees and
waiting ten days for comments by the legislature regarding the proposed
exception.
(c) Minor works preservation projects may include program
improvements of no more than twenty-five percent of the individual
minor works preservation project cost.
(3) Minor works projects are intended to be one-time expenditures
that do not require future state resources to complete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6004 (1) The office of financial management
may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a
capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the
completion of such project to another capital project for which the
appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand
the capacity of any facility beyond that intended in making the
appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital
appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or
institution of higher education and only between capital projects that
are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur
between projects to local government agencies except where the grants
are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such
transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that
govern the grants.
(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is
in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only
if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is
substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have
been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that
the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be
completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in
this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each
project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's
budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history
that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a
different way.
(4) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except
emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with
the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty
days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial
management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within
thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6005 (1) It is expected that projects be ready
to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the
project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this
act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two
biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large
infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often
take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does
not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for
smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.
(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and
appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate
infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation
and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural
environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition
and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional
employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.
(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate
expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and
shall use contracted design and construction services wherever
necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6006 State agencies, including institutions of
higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for
capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for
operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6007 Executive Order No. 05-05, archaeological
and cultural resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005.
Agencies and higher education institutions shall comply with the
requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6008 PUGET SOUND PROTECTION AND RESTORATION.
Consistent with RCW 90.71.340, when expending appropriations under this
act that contribute to Puget Sound protection and recovery, agencies
shall consult with the Puget Sound partnership to ensure that projects
and expenditures are either in, or consistent with the 2020 action
agenda. These consultations shall include the exchange of information
on specific actions, projects, associated funding, performance
measures, and other information necessary to track project
implementation and ensure alignment with the action agenda. In
situations where the Puget Sound partnership finds that a project is
not in, or is not consistent with the action agenda Puget Sound
partnership shall document this finding and report back to the governor
and legislative fiscal committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6009 The amounts shown under the headings
"Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for
informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval
of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate
prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia
in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an
estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the
2015-2017 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero
does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide
funding for the project or program in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6010 To carry out the provisions of this act,
the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design,
construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6011 If any federal moneys appropriated by
this act for capital projects are not received by the state, the
department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace
the federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources.
No replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval
of the director of financial management in consultation with the senate
ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital
budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6012 (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all
appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or
in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW
43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so
that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended
state share of total project costs.
(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not
required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for
phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds
is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6013 The office of financial management, in
consultation with the fiscal committees of the legislature, may select
capital projects that have completed predesign to undergo a budget
evaluation study. The budget evaluation study team approach using
value engineering techniques and life cycle cost analysis must be
utilized by the office of financial management in conducting the
studies. The office of financial management shall select the budget
evaluation team members, contract for the study, and report the results
to the legislature and agencies in a timely manner following the study.
Funds from the project appropriation must be used by the office of
financial management through an interagency agreement with the affected
agencies to cover the cost of the study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6014 COLUMBIA RIVER BASIN NONTAXABLE AND
TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS.
Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from
the Columbia river basin water supply development account may be
transferred to the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply
development account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee
to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and
regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. The
state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of
financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation
authority between the Columbia river basin water supply development
account and the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply
development account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation
authority from the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply
development account to the Columbia river basin water supply
development account may be made.

Sec. 6015 2005 c 8 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Pursuant to chapter 43.155 RCW, the following project loans
recommended by the public works board are authorized to be made with
funds appropriated from the public works assistance account:
(1) Bainbridge Island--storm sewer project--construct a storm sewer
waste management facility including bins for storage of asphalt,
concrete, wood chips, rock, sand and gravel, and miscellaneous woody
debris; and test remaining soil and remove contaminated soils from the
Head of the Bay site . . . . . . . . . . . . $782,000
(2) Bainbridge Island--sanitary sewer project--upgrade wastewater
treatment plant by upgrading the following: Headworks, biosolids,
oxidation ditch aeration basins, sludge holding basins, secondary
clarification, and sludge pumping and effluent outfall . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,618,000
(3) Battle Ground--sanitary sewer project--expand the capacity in
the shared use facilities by performing the design engineering and
construction for a parallel sewer line interceptor, 1 new transmission
pump station, an influent pressure main, and treatment plant
improvements to increase the capacity from 10.3 million gallons per day
to 16 million gallons per day . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(4) Birchbay water and sewer district--sanitary sewer project--extend the existing sanitary sewer system constructing approximately
10,000 feet of gravity sewer mains, including manholes, side sewers to
each lot, and other sewer appurtenances. The project will also include
temporary erosion and sedimentation control measures and other
public/private improvement restoration following sewer installation
. . . . . . . . . . . . $765,000
(5) Blaine--sanitary sewer project--construct a wastewater
pretreatment facility and a 700,000 gallon equalization storage
facilities along and underneath Marine Drive to prevent raw sewage
overflows into Drayton Harbor, construction of control structures
required to operate and maintain facilities, and reconstruction of
existing lift station number one . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,080,000
(6) Brewster--sanitary sewer project--retrofit south lift station
and dry well/wet well system will be converted to a submersible pump
station, headworks structure will be enclosed, including electrical and
ventilation systems, replacement of chlorine gas disinfection system
with UV disinfection, construction of a plant water system, adding new
effluent flow meter and automatic sampler, replacement of activated
sludge pumps, retrofitting primary clarifier, installation of a new
dewatering facility, electrical, and control features and appurtenances
. . . . . . . . . . . . $2,659,600
(7) Carnation--sanitary sewer project--eliminate current septic
tank/drainfield systems and replace them with a centralized sewer
collection system that will connect directly to the treatment facility
being built by King County, including approximately 26,000 feet of
vacuum sewer collector pipes, 3,000 feet of force main, approximately
700 side sewers and the associated abandonment of septic
tank/drainfield systems, relocation of 10,000 feet of water main,
telemetry system for new sewer facilities, and a vacuum/pump station
. . . . . . . . . . . . $4,374,700
(8) Castle Rock--sanitary sewer project--upgrade wastewater
treatment plant by constructing a new treatment process, structures and
equipment, new oxidation ditch, modernized headworks, disinfecting with
ultraviolet, installation of a belt thickener, and press for solids and
secondary clarifiers . . . . . . . . . . . . $655,000
(9) Chinook water district--domestic water project--construct a new
package water filter plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,425,000
(10) College Place--domestic water project--construct a 1.5 million
gallon water storage reservoir, install a booster station,
approximately 7,100 feet of 16 inch water transmission mains, three
pressure reducing valve stations, and a second booster station in the
Regency Park package system, telemetry improvements, and associated
appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,975,000
(11) Douglas county--storm sewer project--construction of a
detention basin of approximately 35 acre feet, construction of an urban
conveyance and water quality project that consists of construction of
about 2,000 feet of closed conduit, 1,000 feet of open channel, and
construction of a water quality treatment facility, and all appropriate
appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,835,600
(12) Dupont--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately 6,600
feet of sanitary sewer line with manholes, 103 side sewers, and
overlaying 4,200 feet of street. The city of DuPont will also purchase
capacity from Pierce County allowing the transfer of flows for
treatment to Pierce County . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,985,600
(13) East Wenatchee water district--domestic water project--increase capacity and remedy leaking mains by replacing approximately
one mile of 12 inch ductile iron transmission main . . . . . . . . . . . . $490,875
(14) Eatonville--domestic water project--construct a membrane
filtration system and use the existing disinfection system, install a
booster pump station, additional well sources, basin modifications, and
approximately 1,200 feet of transmission main to connect to the
existing system . . . . . . . . . . . . $807,500
(15) Edmonds--sanitary sewer project--lift station elimination and
rehabilitation project includes elimination of lift station seven,
demolish the facility and construct approximately 1,550 feet of gravity
sewer line, and install a new line from current location of lift
station seven to lift station eight. Replace lift station eight,
including upsizing of the wet well and replacement of all mechanical
and electrical equipment and replacement and upsizing of approximately
450 feet of force main . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,216,903
(16) Enumclaw--sanitary sewer project--upgrade and expand the
existing wastewater treatment plant by constructing a new headworks,
install new extended aeration activated sludge basins, anaerobic/anoxic
basins, and two additional secondary clarifiers. The city will also
include construction of chemical facilities, enlarging laboratory area,
sludge dewatering, and stabilization facilities and related
appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,750,000
(17) Ephrata--sanitary sewer project--construction of approximately
2,400 feet of sanitary sewer main, 200 feet of side sewer pipe, eight
manholes and appurtenances, and the rehabilitation of approximately one
mile of access roadway in the port of Ephrata . . . . . . . . . . . . $289,000
(18) Everett--sanitary sewer project--construct upgrades to the
wastewater treatment plant that include: A headworks grit system,
construction of two primary clarifiers, a new biofilter, new piping
arrangements, modifications to the trickling filter pump station,
installation of primary sludge grit removal equipment, sludge
dispersion equipment, flow metering, new hypochlorite generation
facilities, new scum collection and dewatering equipment, and minor
upgrade of the north effluent pump station . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(19) Freeland water district--domestic water project--solve the
source and storage needs by constructing a new reservoir, connection of
the new well to the new reservoir, connection of the new reservoir to
the system, rehabilitation of the existing well number one, and all
appropriate appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $308,030
(20) Gig Harbor--sanitary sewer project--upgrade to the wastewater
treatment plant to improve its efficiency and effectiveness. In
addition, an outfall extension into Colvos Passage, including a
diffuser will be constructed. Project will result in a higher quality
effluent being discharged to Puget Sound . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(21) Goldendale--road project--reconstruct approximately 2,700 feet
of East Collins Drive. This will include curb and gutters, storm
drainage facilities, sewer line repair and replacement, water line
replacement, and a 40 foot curb to curb road section consisting of two
eleven foot travel lanes and two nine foot parking areas . . . . . . . . . . . . $827,316
(22) Highland water district--domestic water project--construct a
0.5 million gallon steel water tank and foundation, appurtenances such
as water lines and valves, access road, and other site improvements as
needed . . . . . . . . . . . . $573,750
(23) Ilwaco--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately 2,000
feet of sanitary sewer lines and 2,250 feet of storm sewer lines,
including contributing laterals. In addition, installation of new
manholes, catch basins, and other related improvements would be made as
part of the project . . . . . . . . . . . . $774,000
(24) Jefferson County public utility district 1--domestic water
project--extend water system to service the entire Marrowstone Island.
Replacing individual wells with a public water supply. This will
include installation of approximately 150,000 feet of water mains with
accoutrements, a new 300,000 gallon storage tank, and expansion of
existing treatment facilities. This will ensure a consistent source of
potable water for the residents . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(25) Jefferson County public utility district 1--sanitary sewer
project--replace approximately 80 individual septic systems with a new
community drainfield system, consisting of approximately 12 grinder
pump stations, twin booster pump stations, two dosing tanks, and other
components necessary to enable the system to function properly.
Completion of this project will virtually eliminate the release of any
untreated effluent into the wetland and Discovery Bay . . . . . . . . . . . . $948,924
(26) Kennewick--domestic water project--upgrade the water treatment
plant with installation of a new membrane filtration at the Columbia
River plant and installation of an ultraviolet disinfection system at
the Ranney collector number five. Other related improvements will be
made to the system as part of the project. This project will bring the
city into compliance with the department of health's ground water under
the influence (GWI) requirements . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(27) King county water district No. 111--domestic water project--construct four water treatment facilities. Each facility will include
chlorine generation systems, backwash recycling facilities, SCADA
systems at each plant, and any other related activities necessary to
complete the construction. This will enable the district to be in
compliance with iron and manganese MCLs and eliminate the hazards
associated with chlorine . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,255,428
(28) King county water district No. 125--domestic water project--upgrade pressure zone 2 by installing two secondary source connections,
including pressure-reducing valves, valves, piping, and appurtenances
and approximately 150 feet of water main. The project will also
include replacement of approximately 12,500 feet of undersized water
main, including all valves, fittings, hydrants, and appurtenances and
project area restoration as required . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,088,850
(29) Lake Forest Park--sanitary sewer project--installation of a
series of extensions to the city of Lake Forest Park's sanitary sewer
system to provide service to residential areas currently not serviced.
This will include construction of approximately 3.8 miles of sewer main
extension including gravity sewer, pressure piping, service connections
and side sewers, lift stations, grinder pump assemblies, surface
restoration, temporary erosion and sedimentation control, and related
work . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,656,000
(30) Leavenworth--domestic water project--reconstruct old reservoir
on existing site, including new structural walls, new roof, and related
appurtenances. Project will also include installation of a SCADA
monitoring/radio telemetry control system . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
(31) LOTT wastewater alliance--sanitary sewer project--construct
four secondary clarifier mechanisms, replacement of RAS pumps,
secondary scum pumping improvements, and motorized actuators. Upgrades
to equipment and mechanisms will enable LOTT to meet increasing loads
at the Budd Inlet wastewater treatment plant and improve the effluent
quality . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,278,404
(32) Malaga water district--domestic water project--construct a new
52,000 gallon partially buried concrete reservoir and connecting piping
and install security fencing around tank. This project will enable the
district to ensure a continuous safe water supply to the homes and
businesses in the area . . . . . . . . . . . . $161,500
(33) Manchester water district--domestic water project--upgrade a
wide range of the water system. Project will include installation of
a SCADA system with all hardware, software, and backup equipment.
Installation of a new flow meter at each wellhead and pump station.
Distribution/transmission piping replacements and upgrades to the Mile
Hill Road area, Yukon Harbor Drive and Southworth Drive. Installation
of two interties in the South Street and Garfield Road area.
Construction of two pressure-reducing stations located in the Beach
Drive and Harper Hill areas . . . . . . . . . . . . $970,870
(34) Mason county public utility district 1--domestic water
project--source improvements and system rehabilitation to the newly
acquired Arcadia Estates system. Project will include pump and
controls for well number two, 24,000 gallon storage reservoir with
draft fire hydrant, three booster pumps, two pressure tanks,
pressure-reducing station, service meters, and three blow off
assemblies. This will remove the red operating permit and ensure a
safe and reliable source of potable water for the community . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $95,950
(35) Mason county public utility district 1--domestic water
project--rehabilitate the source of supply at the newly acquired Twanoh
Heights water system. This project will include rehabilitation of well
number one, installation of two pumps, abandonment of well number two
per department of ecology rules, service meters and air release valves.
This project will allow the community to have a continuous, safe and
reliable water source . . . . . . . . . . . . $172,900
(36) Mason county public utility district 1--domestic water
project--address system needs for the Madrona Beach water system by
constructing a 11,500 gallon reservoir, booster station, site
work/plumbing, service meters, and a source meter. This will enable
the public utility district to comply with department of health
requirements and remove a blue operating permit . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,000
(37) Mason county public utility district 1--domestic water
project--make improvements to the newly acquired Canal Beach water
system. The improvements include drilling and testing a new well
source, constructing a 20,000 gallon storage tank, piped system
intertie, fire service line and hydrant, water services with new
meters, and abandonment of existing well sources per department of
ecology rules . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,712
(38) Mason county public utility district 1--domestic water
project--make improvements to the Minerva Terrace water system that
will include drill and test well, integrate well into system, booster
station with all appurtenances, 35,200 gallon reservoir, and a draft
fire hydrant. This will enable the system to have the red operating
permit to be lifted and comply with department of health rules . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $217,550
(39) Northeast Sammamish sewer/water district--domestic water
project--construct a new water treatment plant, new 0.5 million gallon
reservoir and pump station, new transmission water main, and new
distribution main and associated minor improvements. The district will
then be able to meet the federal arsenic level regulations and ensure
a safe source of potable water for the community . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,154,970
(40) Northshore utility district--sanitary sewer project--install
approximately 2,445 feet of gravity sewer main, manholes, connection to
the sanitary sewer system, and related restoration and appurtenances.
In addition, the district will replace approximately 2,400 feet of
asbestos concrete water mains. This will resolve the negative
environmental and health impacts of the failing septic systems in the
area . . . . . . . . . . . . $814,634
(41) Northshore utility district--sanitary sewer project--install
approximately 300 feet of gravity sewer main, manholes, connection to
the sanitary sewer system, and related restoration and appurtenances.
In addition, the district will replace approximately 300 feet of
asbestos concrete water mains. This will resolve the negative
environmental and health impacts of the failing septic systems in the
area . . . . . . . . . . . . $113,334
(42) Oak Harbor--domestic water project--replace existing water
transmission mains being destroyed due to a highway project. The
project includes construction of approximately 4,000 feet of
transmission mains along Highway 20 just south of Deception Pass state
park. Project will meet the city's foreseeable water requirements and
provide sufficient capacity for the Naval Air Station--Whidbey . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $834,700
(43) Orchard Avenue irrigation district number 6--domestic water
project--install approximately 19,100 feet of PVC pipe. Approximately
210 buried meter boxes, reconnect approximately 400 existing services,
and all required valves and other fittings. Project will eliminate
public health concern over potential lead contamination from lead joint
pipe . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,066,800
(44) Pierce County--road project--widen, reconstruct, and overlay
the intersection of Canyon Road E and 176th Street E, which includes
additional travel lanes in each direction and left and right turn lanes
at the intersection, a new traffic signal system, traffic signal
interconnect system, street lights, median, curb and gutter, concrete
sidewalks, landscaping, undergrounding of utilities, storm drainage
conveyance, storage, and treatment facilities. Project will increase
carrying capacity and allow for economic development . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,942,000
(45) Pullman--sanitary sewer project--construct a new variable
volume digester at the wastewater treatment plant, with an approximate
capacity of 350,000 gallons. The work includes site preparation and
construction of the digester, necessary piping modifications, and
modifications to the existing plant control system. Project will
enable the city to meet the environmental protection agency's SRT
requirements . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,912,000
(46) Pullman--domestic water project--construct a well to replace
well number 3. Included in the project will be the drilling of the
replacement well, well pump, motor, controls, disinfection equipment,
fluoride injection equipment, a swell and chemical storage house,
connection of transmission lines, and other related miscellaneous items
and site work . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
(47) Ridgefield--sanitary sewer project--construct a new pump
station, install approximately 3,000 feet of force main, which will
discharge directly into the treatment plant, and construct
approximately 3,000 feet of gravity interceptor sewer. This project
will enable the city to open up service to an area that is currently
not served and allow for economic development . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,718,000
(48) Ritzville--domestic water project--increase the city's water
capacity from 1,200 to 2,000 gallons per minute by drilling a new well.
This will also include installing the necessary pump and connections to
the storage tank and construct a well house to protect the equipment
. . . . . . . . . . . . $845,000
(49) Ronald wastewater district--sanitary sewer project--sewer
extension to unsewered areas includes installation of approximately
2,700 feet PVC sewer main and approximately 2,000 feet PVC sewers in
three separate areas of the district. All associated appurtenances
will also be instilled, such as manholes and side sewer stubs.
Approximately 1,100 sewer trunk main will be repaired. The streets and
other public improvements that are disturbed during construction will
be restored to city of Shoreline's standards . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,021,700
(50) Samish water district--sanitary sewer project--upgrade its
system by replacing pumps and controls at six sewage pump stations,
replace controls at one sewage pump station, upgrade SCADA, and replace
inline valves on existing sewer force main. This will ensure that the
system operates within regulations . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,083,000
(51) Seattle--storm sewer project--increase capacity of the
drainage system by installing approximately 1,760 feet of storm drain
along South Trenton Street, 3rd Avenue South, and 4th Avenue South.
Install 2,380 feet of storm drain along South Director Street and 7th
Avenue South. The last part of the project will construct a new storm
drain system on 8th Avenue South. These new drainage pipes will reduce
flows to the combined sewer system and reduce the number of overflows
. . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000
(52) Seattle--storm sewer project--upgrade two culverts in the
lower reaches of Taylor Creek to remove fish barriers and construct a
fish ladder to improve fish passage and control sediment
transportation. Other related improvements will be made to the area as
part of the project . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,500
(53) Seattle--storm sewer project--construct two ponds that will
include a 4 acre feet sediment collection pond, 2 acre feet decant
pond, 750 feet of access road, 750 of decant piping, a gravel pump and
its housing and controls, and 4,000 feet of landscaping around the new
ponds. Additional related upgrades will be done to complete the
project . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,832,600
(54) Skyway water/sewer district--domestic water project--replace
and upsize the supply meter from the city of Seattle system and replace
approximately 6,350 feet of asbestos water supply line. In addition,
four new pressure zones interties will be installed to improve flow
between pressure zones within the water/sewer district . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,130,526
(55) Spokane--domestic water project--replace about 3,500 feet of
riveted steel water transmission mains with ductile iron pipe. In
addition, project will include all valves, connections, blowoffs, air
valves, railroad crossing, and pavement restoration and traffic control
. . . . . . . . . . . . $3,453,975
(56) Spokane--domestic water project--construct a 2 million gallon
elevated steel tank with an accompanying booster station. This will
include all piping, valves, telemetry, instrumentation, excavation and
site preparation including landscaping, paving, and fencing . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $2,232,950
(57) Spokane county--road project--((construct a total of 8.3 miles
of roadway from Havana Street to Forker Road and from Forker Road from
Bigelow Gulch Road to Wellesley Road. The construction will provide
for expanding the road to four traveled lanes plus eight foot shoulders
to improve safety and traffic capacity. A center turn lane will be
added at locations where vehicles routinely make left turns. Eight
foot shoulders will be added to provide for safety of pedestrians and
bicycles . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000))
expand and realign the Bigelow Gulch/Forker Road Corridor to a four
lane roadway with eight foot shoulders to improve traffic capacity and
increase the overall safety of the corridor. This project will include
engineering and design environmental and cultural review, acquisition
of right-of-way and construction of 1.78 miles of roadway improvement.
In addition, design and right-of-way will be prepared and acquired for
the next continuous phase of the project . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
(58) Stanwood--domestic water project--construct a 1 million gallon
elevated water tank, water main, appurtenances, and equipment necessary
to connect the new water tank to the existing system. Project will
also install telemetry and control systems compatible with existing
system, construction of a Cedarhome booster pump station for filling
the Cedarhome reservoir, and improvements to the sites such as grading,
fencing, and landscaping . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,481,620
(59) Stevens County--solid waste project--expand municipal solid
waste site by construction of an 11 acre lateral expansion,
environmentally protective landfill lining and leachate collection
system and construction of ancillary facilities such as perimeter
roads. Leachate facilities will consist of piping, collection and
conveyance facilities . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
(60) Union Gap--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
3,400 feet of sewer interceptor and 1,800 feet of sewer laterals in
conjunction with new roadways in the Valley Mall Boulevard area . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $676,429
(61) Washougal--sanitary sewer project--construct a redundant
secondary clarifier adjacent to existing secondary clarifier, including
piping connections to the existing clarifier distribution structure,
scum pump station, and RAS/WAS pump room. Additional work will include
RAS/WAS pump room modifications for installation of dedicated return
and waste-activated sludge pumps, sidewalks, and site grading and all
necessary electrical hardware and SCADA control modifications. Project
will enable the city to meet their national pollution discharge
elimination system permit requirements . . . . . . . . . . . . $794,000
(62) West Richland--sanitary sewer project--increase capacity by
constructing a one million gallons per day biolac wastewater treatment
facility, approximately 2,700 feet of sanitary sewer pipe, lift
station, miscellaneous roadway patching, and site restoration. If
additional funds are available, improvements to the facilities outfall
structure will be designed along with facilities for sludge handling
from the sewer maintenance program. Project will enable the city to
meet their national pollution discharge elimination system permit
requirements . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
(63) Witworth water district 2--domestic water project--The
district will solve the area problems by installing approximately
27,090 of water lines together with valves and appurtenances,
connection to the existing system, 15 hydrants, pavement repair, and
other surface restoration. In addition, installation of a two million
gallon steel reservoir and a 1,700 gallons per minute booster pump
station and various piping, appurtenances, pumps, controls, security,
electrical, and connection to existing system . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,502,300
(64) Yakima--sanitary sewer project--The project will be done in
two phases. Phase I will install approximately 6,640 feet of sewer
main trunk line in River Road from North 16th Avenue to North 40th
Avenue. Phase II will install 5,500 feet of sewer main trunk line in
River Road from North 6th Avenue to North 16th Avenue if public works
trust fund loan funds remain and private development proceeds. The
project will help prevent further loss of major employers by providing
the transportation and utility infrastructure necessary to maintain
competitive operations . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,307,000

Sec. 6016 2007 c 4 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Pursuant to chapter 43.155 RCW, the following project loans
recommended by the public works board are authorized to be made with
funds appropriated from the public works assistance account:
(1) Airway Heights--sanitary sewer project--collection system
improvements and an approximately 1 million gallon per day annual
average flow wastewater treatment, reclamation, and groundwater
recharge facility . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(2) Annapolis water district--domestic water project--interior and
exterior of surface water reservoir will be sandblasted and painted to
preserve structural integrity of the tank and eliminate breaches in the
paint coating systems. Structural repairs will also be made to the
tank and foundation . . . . . . . . . . . . $595,000
(3) Blaine--sanitary sewer project--construct a new wastewater
treatment plant to serve the projected demand for the next twenty
years, using the latest membrane filtering technology to produce
reuse-quality water effluent to minimize impacts to local shell fishing
. . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(4) Bremerton--sanitary sewer project--upgrade a sewage pump
station to increase capacity from 1,900 gallons per minute to 3,500
gallons per minute, eliminating combined sewer overflows into the Puget
Sound and meet a court order . . . . . . . . . . . . $675,000
(5) Bremerton--sanitary sewer project--design and construct a
treatment plant upgrade to address the vital needs of the plant, create
redundancy for essential treatment processes, and replace twenty year
old components and meet a court order . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
(6) Bremerton--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
1,300 feet new sewer interceptor and collector pipe to replace old,
failing shallow sewer and meet a court order . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
(7) Chelan county public utility district no. 1--domestic water
project--design and construct: Two pump stations to increase capacity
from approximately 4,000 gallons per minute to approximately 6,000
gallons per minute; a two million gallon reservoir; and approximately
5,000 feet of twelve and sixteen-inch water transmission mains to
provide a reliable water source for approximately 4,500 customers
. . . . . . . . . . . . $5,267,000
(8) Cowlitz county--domestic water project--recoat the interior and
exterior of four reservoirs to address areas of failure with the
original coatings and protect the structural integrity of the
reservoirs . . . . . . . . . . . . $340,000
(9) Cross Valley water district--domestic water project--relocation
and replacement of a failing water supply line that is located in an
extremely wet cow pasture. Approximately 3,500 linear feet of asbestos
cement line will be replaced with twelve-inch ductile iron pipe,
including all valves, hydrants, and appurtenances as well as complete
restoration and paving . . . . . . . . . . . . $532,525
(10) East Wenatchee water district--domestic water project--construct approximately 6,000 lineal feet of twelve-inch water main
that will serve as the supply main to the new approximately 1.5 million
gallon reservoir . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,772,700
(11) Friday Harbor--sanitary sewer project--construct a new
offshore marine pipeline approximately 1,900 feet in length; a new pump
station and approximately 3,650 feet of pipeline to the wastewater
treatment plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,378,000
(12) Grays Harbor county water district no. 1--domestic water
project--provide adequate water supply from primary source to the north
end of the system to mitigate low pressure problems and comply with a
bilateral compliance agreement; extend distribution system to provide
service to residences with failing individual supplies; construct
standby power generation facilities for primary source of supply; and
construct additional storage and pumping facilities to provide reliable
service and fire flow . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,717,575
(13) Lake Stevens sewer district--sanitary sewer project--construction of a state of the art membrane bioreactor wastewater
treatment facility outside the flood plain and an interceptor line and
pump station . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(14) Mattawa--sanitary sewer project--complete public bidding and
construction of the improvements consisting of an approximately 622,000
cubic foot HDPE lined long-term biosolids digestion basin, associated
piping, rehabilitation of the existing biosolids drying beds, and
fencing . . . . . . . . . . . . $465,585
(15) Port Angeles--sanitary sewer project--design and construction
of approximately 4,500 feet of thirty-inch sewer main to the headworks
of the wastewater treatment plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,875,000
(16) Snohomish--sanitary sewer project--((construct a fifteen and
ten-inch sewer to reach an existing pump station; extend the above
sewer using an eight-inch pipe to another pump station; and replace an
existing sewer with a ten-inch pipe to provide additional capacity for
future service and to meet the conditions of a stipulated court order
. . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000))
Segment 2: Add approximately 3,400 feet of sewer trunk to connect to
the Segment 1, thereby allowing two pump stations to be abandoned.
Segment 3: Replace approximately 1,200 feet of existing undersized
sewer to provide additional capacity and to accommodate future service
north and east of Blackmans Lake . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
(17) Toppenish--sanitary sewer project--construct a single
activated sludge process to replace the existing wastewater treatment
facility, including the installation of ultraviolet disinfection
channels to replace chlorine gas. The solids handling system will also
be improved . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(18) Walla Walla--sanitary sewer project--the third and final
upgrade at the wastewater treatment plant to meet class A water reuse
standards and to comply with an agreed order from the department of
ecology . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,856,875
(19) Yakima--sanitary sewer project--replacement of chlorine gas
with ultraviolet disinfection at the Yakima regional wastewater
treatment plant to complete the first phase of the facility
improvements . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000

Sec. 6017 2008 c 5 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Pursuant to chapter 43.155 RCW, the following project loans
recommended by the public works board are authorized to be made with
funds appropriated from the public works assistance account, and no
loan authorized in this act shall bear an interest rate greater than
one-half of one percent:
(1) Arlington--sanitary sewer project--expand and upgrade the
wastewater treatment plant and biosolids composting facility to meet
new discharge limitations, produce a higher quality effluent, and
accommodate future growth . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(2) Auburn--street project--reconstruct approximately 0.3 miles of
roadway with four travel lanes to bring up to current arterial and
truck route standards and modify intersection to optimize efficiency
and level of service . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
(3) Blaine--sanitary sewer project--construct a new wastewater
treatment plant and section of outfall pipe to increase treatment
capacity, produce reuse quality water, and improve Puget Sound water
quality for shellfish . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(4) Bonney Lake--domestic water project--replace approximately
71,000 linear feet of leaky water mains to reduce current water loss by
ten percent . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,352,000
(5) Bonney Lake--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately
12,000 linear feet of failing interceptor sewer pipes . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,648,000
(6) Buckley--sanitary sewer project--rebuild the wastewater
treatment plant to provide nutrient removal and meet state and federal
discharge regulations and the construction of an interceptor . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(7) Camas--sanitary sewer project--construct improvements to the
wastewater treatment facilities to provide class A biosolids at the
main sewage pump station . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(8) Clark county--road project--construct new road segments, widen
roadways, improve and redesign intersections, and install and modify
traffic signals necessary to improve a major interchange with two
freeways . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(9) Clark regional wastewater district--sanitary sewer project--modify existing and construct new wastewater facilities to process
approximately 4.65 million gallons more of wastewater per day and
ensure treatment processes continue to be in compliance with current
regulations . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
(10) Coal creek utility district--sanitary sewer project--construct
sewer lift station, approximately 1,250 lineal feet of gravity sewer
main, and 500 feet of force main to provide public sewer to
approximately 25 properties on a lake that have private septic systems
that have failed or are in prefailure status . . . . . . . . . . . . $898,875
(11) College Place--domestic water project--construct two steel
tanks, a booster station, approximately 6,000 feet of transmission
line, 3,400 feet of water mains, three pressure reducing valves, and
associated telemetry to rectify a deficiency in fire flow and standby
water storage protection . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,710,051
(12) Cowlitz county public utility district No. 1--domestic water
project--construction of approximately six new groundwater supply
wells, 2,100 feet of raw water piping a new water treatment plant
producing approximately 20 million gallons per day of potable water,
and approximately 4,350 feet of transmission main to connect to the
system to replace current water supply that is being impacted by
increasing water sediment . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,213,000
(13) Ephrata--domestic water project--replace approximately 68,000
feet of failing water mains, 50,000 feet of failing water service
pipes, and the resurfacing of 20 miles of overlaying roadway, including
approximately 100 fire hydrants, 400 catch basins, 15 storm sewer
drywells, 22,000 feet of curb and gutter, and 16,000 feet of storm
sewer pipe . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,605,727
(14) Freeland water district--domestic water project--connect a new
well and new reservoir to the existing system, rehabilitate the
existing well, and install new equipment to increase system
reliability, redundancy, and capacity. Install new chlorination
equipment to improve water quality . . . . . . . . . . . . $347,516
(15) Gig Harbor--sanitary sewer project--improvements to the
wastewater treatment plant including new equipment and electrical work,
add a third clarifier, install ultraviolet disinfection, and extend and
upsize the outfall . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(16) Highline water district--domestic water project--construction
of 11,350 feet of transmission main and looping of pipes to eliminate
low pressures and fire flows and improve water quality, and create a
new pressure zone to correct high pressures . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,390,418
(17) Karcher creek sewer district--sanitary sewer project--install
a new sewer system, including a lift station and approximately 3,600
lineal feet of sewer main, in conjunction with a road project to
service approximately 17 homes that will lose their septic systems due
to the road project . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,358,130
(18) Kennewick--sanitary sewer project--construct improvements to
critical wastewater treatment plant processes to enhance reliability,
improve energy efficiency and redundancy, as well as increase the
capacity of the sludge pumping station . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000
(19) Kent--street project--construct ((two)) one bridge((s)), ((one
for the roadway over a set of railroad tracks, and one for railroad
tracks over a lowered roadway. This will grade separate the tracks
from the roadway to provide safe and reliable operations twenty-four
hours a day . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000))
and all preliminary activities, such as utility relocation, to prepare
for the future bridge to be constructed . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(20) King county--sanitary sewer project--construct 13,100 lineal
feet of pipe to convey approximately 9 million gallons per day of
reclaimed water to reduce withdrawals of 250-acre feet per year from
the Sammamish river . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(21) La Center--sanitary sewer project--upgrade wastewater
treatment plant to reduce the levels of nitrogen discharged in the
effluent and approximately doubling the operation of the plant and
producing class A reuse water . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(22) Lake Forest Park water district--domestic water project--replace approximately 6,915 lineal feet of undersized and corroded
water pipes to improve safety and reliability of the system by reducing
pipe failures and increasing fire flow . . . . . . . . . . . . $917,935
(23) Lake Stevens--sanitary sewer project--construct a new
wastewater treatment plant, 9,500 feet of interceptor line, a pump
station, and an outfall pipe in partnership with Lake Stevens sewer
district . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(24) Lake Stevens sewer district--sanitary sewer project--construct
a new wastewater treatment plant, 9,500 feet of interceptor line, a
pump station, and an outfall pipe in partnership with the city of Lake
Stevens . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(25) Lakewood--sanitary sewer project--construct 3 pump stations,
approximately 17,200 linear feet of force mains, 13,500 linear feet of
gravity collector pipe line, and 320 side sewer stubs to service two
neighborhoods currently served exclusively by septic
systems . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,840,000
(26) LOTT alliance--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
7,400 feet of force main and replace existing pump station with new
1,000 gallon per minute pump station . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,003,807
(27) Mansfield--sanitary sewer project--expand and rehabilitate
wastewater treatment lagoons and effluent spray irrigation system as
well as remove the discharge of groundwater from basement sump pumps to
the collection system . . . . . . . . . . . . $235,600
(28) Midway sewer district--sanitary sewer project--replace
approximately 16,500 lineal feet of sewer mains and 50 manholes to
reduce infiltration and inflow . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,782,500
(29) Mount Vernon--sanitary sewer project--upgrade existing
wastewater treatment plant, including a new pretreatment facility, 4
additional clarifiers, upgrade aeration basins, installation of an
ultraviolet disinfection system, and odor control system . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(30) Newcastle--road project--reconstruct, widen, and signalize
approximately 5,200 linear feet of road to 2 lanes in each direction,
add left turn lanes, sidewalks, bicycle lanes, install lighting
systems, replace two-lane bridge with a four-lane bridge, and install
new traffic signals . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(31) Olympia--sanitary sewer project--install approximately 6,500
linear feet of sewer mains and construct a lift station to serve 63
homes with failing on-site sewage systems . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,808,375
(32) Olympus Terrace sewer district--sanitary sewer project--rehabilitate approximately 9,350 linear feet of sewer trunkline,
construct approximately 9,800 linear feet of high-flow storm water
bypass piping for excess flow, construct approximately 4,150 linear
feet of road access, and restore creek habitat . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
(33) Omak--sanitary sewer project--add 2 compost containers,
convert storage tank to sludge holding tank, and install a second
headworks screen to increase the wastewater treatment plant capacity by
35 percent . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
(34) Port Angeles--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
11,500 feet of sewer main, modify a storage tank, and modify the
wastewater treatment plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(35) Regional board of mayors--solid waste project--close landfill
site by capping and sealing with a soil cap . . . . . . . . . . . . $859,500
(36) Regional board of mayors--solid waste project--construct a new
solid waste transfer station, including structures and
equipment . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,541,000
(37) Ronald wastewater district--sanitary sewer project--rehabilitate 2 lift stations by replacing pumps, valves, fittings,
piping, odor control systems, and electrical equipment . . . . . . . . . . . . $955,400
(38) Seattle--domestic water project--replace floating pumps with
land-based pump station with a maximum capacity of approximately 250
million gallons per day, including 8 pumps, concrete structure, a
tunnel, approximately 4,000 feet of pipeline, and a standby
generator. . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(39) Sedro-Woolley--sanitary sewer project--rehabilitate or replace
4 interceptor segments totaling approximately 29,700 linear feet((,))
and install 2 pump stations((, and upgrade the secondary clarifier)) in
order to lift a building moratorium . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,023,491))
$3,803,289
(40) Shelton--sanitary sewer project--construct a satellite
reclamation plant with a capacity of approximately 0.4 million gallons
per day to produce class A reclaimed water, approximately 22,000 linear
feet of sewer pipelines, and approximately 25,000 linear feet of
reclaimed water force main . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,079,360
(41) Shelton--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately 38,480
linear feet of mainline sewers to reduce inflow and
infiltration . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,737,500
(42) Skagit county sewer district No. 2--sanitary sewer project--upgrade wastewater treatment plant to a water reclamation facility to
provide class A reclaimed water with a capacity of approximately 0.35
million gallons per day . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(43) Snohomish--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
1,900 feet of sewer pipe, a new pump station with a capacity of
approximately 8,000 gallons per minute, and approximately 4,300 feet of
force main to reduce overflows . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(44) Snohomish--sanitary sewer project--upgrade existing wastewater
treatment plant including a new influent flow structure, screens,
aerators, effluent filtration, ultraviolet disinfection, effluent pump
station, improvements to the existing lagoons, and electrical
improvements . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
(45) Snohomish county--road project--construct a new, approximately
two-mile, two-lane truck route around the city of Granite Falls,
including 3 roundabouts to improve safety and air quality in the
downtown area . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(46) Southwest Suburban sewer district--sanitary sewer project--replace and/or slipline approximately 5,470 feet of trunk/interceptor
sewer main and construct a new lift station to reduce
overflows . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,268,250
(47) Tacoma--domestic water project--replace 3 open-topped concrete
reservoirs with 2 enclosed concrete reservoirs of approximately 33
million gallons each and related piping to comply with the safe
drinking water act and a bilateral compliance agreement . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(48) Tekoa--sanitary sewer system--reconstruct approximately 1,000
feet of failing sewer line and manholes to reduce significant
groundwater infiltration . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,115
(49) Three rivers regional wastewater authority--sanitary sewer
project--construct 2 clarifiers and associated piping to replace 2
failed clarifiers at the wastewater plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,630,750
(50) Washougal--sanitary sewer project--construct a new wastewater
treatment plant headworks, including a fine screen, grit removal, and
replace approximately 150 linear feet of gravity sewer, and make
improvements to the lagoons, including 450 linear feet of piping,
modify overflow structures, and a new pump . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
(51) Yakima--domestic water project--develop a new, approximately
3,000 gallon per minute, domestic water well, including drilling,
placement of casing, a new pump house, and connection to the existing
water distribution system in order to augment the water supply during
drought conditions . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,257,200
(52) Yakima--street project--construct 2 underpasses and
reconstruct 3 lanes on each roadway under a railroad mainline to
accommodate additional rail and reduce traffic and emergency response
delays and air pollution . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6018 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 81
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 85
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 66
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 80
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 66
RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 78
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 72
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 82
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 78
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 84
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 80
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 83
--- END ---