BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature is responsible for the
oversight and control of the state budget as it applies to the various
state agencies. The legislature finds that state agencies regularly
enter into a wide variety of agreements with the federal government,
requiring the commitment of state resources, but that are neither
reviewed nor expressly approved by the legislature. Accordingly, a
statutory mechanism is needed to provide the legislature with
comprehensive information regarding these federal agreements in order
to enable the legislature to monitor and evaluate the budgetary and
fiscal impacts of the agreements, as well as their policy implications.
This act provides a statutory framework for ongoing legislative
oversight of the agreements between state agencies and the federal
government and will thus enable the legislature to better exercise its
authority to review and control the expenditure of state resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On or before November 1, 2013, and not later than November 1st
each year thereafter, each state agency shall submit a written report
to the speaker and minority leader of the Washington house of
representatives, the majority and minority leaders of the Washington
senate, and the governor, providing a comprehensive, detailed
description of every agreement between the agency and the federal
government. At minimum, the report must contain the following
information:
(a) The type of agreement, including a comprehensive description of
its contents;
(b) The purposes, goals, and public benefits to be derived from the
agreement;
(c) A detailed description, including the dollar amounts, of any
grants, funds, revenues, or fiscal impacts likely to result from the
agreement;
(d) The identification of the specific statute, rule, or
constitutional provision providing the legal basis for the agreement;
(e) The identification of the specific agencies, both state and
federal, entering into the agreement; and
(f) The identification of every state officer, employee, or other
state agent participating in the creation, negotiation, or approval of
the agreement.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Agency" means and includes every state office, officer, and
employee, and every institution, department, board, and commission.
(b) "Agreement" means any contract, agreement, memorandum of
understanding, or other arrangement between a state agency and the
federal government that requires an agency or other state governmental
entity to take action or otherwise expend state resources in order to
comply with the terms of the agreement.
(3) This section applies to all agreements in effect as of the
effective date of this section and to all agreements entered into or
renewed on or after July 1, 2013.

--- END ---