BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.19.100 and 1891 c 28 s 86 are each amended to read
as follows:
The parties, or either of them, against whom such judgment may be
entered in the superior or supreme courts, may stay said execution for
sixty days from the date of the notification by the court by giving a
bond with two or more sureties, to be approved by the clerk,
conditioned for the payment of such judgment at the expiration of sixty
days, unless the same shall be vacated before the expiration of that
time.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.19.160 and 1986 c 322 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The surety on the bond may return a person to custody ((a person))
for good cause in a criminal case under the surety's bond if the
surrender is accompanied by a notice of forfeiture or a notarized
affidavit specifying the reasons for the surrender. Good cause for
surrender includes, but is not limited to, a reasonable belief in a
substantial increase in the likelihood of the risk of flight, violation
of a court order, failure to appear, or the concealment or intentional
misrepresentation of information by the person, provided that good
cause does not include failure to make timely payments to the surety
for the bond premium. The surrender shall be made to the facility in
which the person was originally held in custody or the county or city
jail affiliated with the court issuing the warrant resulting in bail.
If, upon motion by a party to the bail transaction, a court determines
that good cause does not exist for the surety to surrender a person,
the sole remedy is that the surety shall return the premium paid by, or
on behalf of, the person, as well as any recovery fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 10.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The presiding judge of a court shall notify the administrative
office of the courts when the court revokes or reinstates the
justification or certification of a bail bond agent to post bonds in
the court. The notice to the administrative office of the courts must
include the reasons for the revocation or reinstatement. Upon
receiving the notification, the administrative office of the courts
shall notify superior courts and courts of limited jurisdiction
statewide. No civil liability may be imposed by any court on the
administrative office of the courts or its employees under this section
except upon proof of bad faith or willful or wanton misconduct or gross
negligence.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.185.010 and 2004 c 186 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(3) "Commission" means the criminal justice training commission.
(4) "Collateral or security" means property of any kind given as
security to obtain a bail bond.
(5) "Bail bond agency" means a business that sells and issues
corporate surety bail bonds or that provides security in the form of
personal or real property to ensure the appearance of a criminal
defendant before the courts of this state or the United States.
(6) "Qualified agent" means an owner, sole proprietor, partner,
manager, officer, or chief operating officer of a corporation who meets
the requirements set forth in this chapter for obtaining a bail bond
agency license.
(7) "Bail bond agent" means a person who is employed by a bail bond
agency and engages in the sale or issuance of bail bonds, but does not
mean a clerical, secretarial, or other support person who does not
participate in the sale or issuance of bail bonds.
(8) "Licensee" means a bail bond agency, a bail bond agent, a
qualified agent, or a bail bond recovery agent.
(9) "Branch office" means any office physically separated from the
principal place of business of the licensee from which the licensee or
an employee or agent of the licensee conducts any activity meeting the
criteria of a bail bond agency.
(10) "Bail bond recovery agent" means a person who is under
contract with a bail bond agent to receive compensation, reward, or any
other form of lawful consideration for locating, apprehending, and
surrendering a fugitive criminal defendant for whom a bail bond has
been posted. "Bail bond recovery agent" does not include a general
authority Washington peace officer or a limited authority Washington
peace officer.
(11) (("Contract" means a written agreement between a bail bond
agent or qualified agent and a bail bond recovery agent for the purpose
of locating, apprehending, and surrendering a fugitive criminal
defendant in exchange for lawful consideration.
(12))) "Planned forced entry" means a premeditated forcible entry
into a dwelling, building, or other structure without the occupant's
knowledge or consent for the purpose of apprehending a fugitive
criminal defendant subject to a bail bond. "Planned forced entry" does
not include situations where, during an imminent or actual chase or
pursuit of a fleeing fugitive criminal defendant, or during a casual or
unintended encounter with the fugitive, the bail bond recovery agent
forcibly enters into a dwelling, building, or other structure without
advanced planning.
(12) "Property bond" means a bail bond executed for compensation
that is guaranteed by a bail bond agent licensed to do business as a
bail bond agent by the department.
(13) "Property bond agency" means a bail bond agency that issues
property bonds.
(14) "Surety bond" means a bail bond that is guaranteed by an
insurance company that has been qualified to transact surety insurance
business in Washington state by the insurance commissioner.
(15) "Surety bond agency" means a bail bond agency that issues
surety bonds.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.185.020 and 1993 c 260 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant must meet the following minimum requirements to obtain
or renew a bail bond agent license:
(1) Be at least eighteen years of age;
(2) Be a citizen or resident alien of the United States;
(3) Not have been convicted of a crime in any jurisdiction in the
preceding ten years, if the director determines that the applicant's
particular crime directly relates to a capacity to perform the duties
of a bail bond agent and the director determines that the license
should be withheld to protect the citizens of Washington state. If the
director shall make a determination to withhold a license because of
previous convictions, the determination shall be consistent with the
restoration of employment rights act, chapter 9.96A RCW;
(4) Be employed by a bail bond agency or be licensed as a bail bond
agency; and
(5) Pay the required fee.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.185.040 and 2004 c 186 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Applications for licenses required under this chapter shall be
filed with the director on a form provided by the director. The
director may require any information and documentation that reasonably
relates to the need to determine whether the applicant meets the
criteria, including fingerprints.
(2) Applicants for licensure or endorsement as a bail bond agent or
a bail bond recovery agent must complete a records check through the
Washington state patrol criminal identification system and through the
federal bureau of investigation at the applicant's expense. Such
record check shall include a fingerprint check using a Washington state
patrol approved fingerprint card. The Washington state patrol shall
forward the fingerprints of applicants to the federal bureau of
investigation for a national criminal history records check. The
director may accept proof of a recent national crime information
center/III criminal background report or any national or interstate
criminal background report in addition to fingerprints to accelerate
the licensing and endorsement process. The director is authorized to
periodically perform a background investigation of licensees to
identify criminal convictions subsequent to the renewal of a license or
endorsement.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.185.070 and 1993 c 260 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No bail bond agency license may be issued under the provisions
of this chapter unless the qualified agent files with the director a
bond, executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this
state, in the sum of ten thousand dollars for a surety bond agency and
one hundred thousand dollars for a property bond agency conditioned to
recover against the agency and its servants, officers, agents, and
employees by reason of its violation of the provisions of RCW
18.185.100. The bond shall be made payable to the state of Washington,
and anyone so injured by the agency or its servants, officers, agents,
or employees may bring suit upon the bond in any county in which
jurisdiction over the licensee may be obtained. The suit must be
brought not later than two years after the failure to return property
in accordance with RCW 18.185.100. If valid claims against the bond
exceed the amount of the bond or deposit, each claimant shall be
entitled only to a pro rata amount, based on the amount of the claim as
it is valid against the bond, without regard to the date of filing of
any claim or action.
(2) Every licensed bail bond agency must at all times maintain on
file with the director the bond required by this section in full force
and effect. Upon failure by a licensee to do so, the director shall
suspend the licensee's license and shall not reinstate the license
until this requirement is met.
(3) In lieu of posting a bond, a qualified surety agent may deposit
ten thousand dollars in an interest-bearing account((, ten)) and a
qualified property bond agent may deposit one hundred thousand dollars
in an interest-bearing account.
(4) The director may waive the bond requirements of this section,
in his or her discretion, pursuant to adopted rules.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.185.110 and 2008 c 105 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW
18.235.130, the following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute
unprofessional conduct:
(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules
adopted under this chapter;
(2) Failing to meet the qualifications set forth in RCW 18.185.020,
18.185.030, and 18.185.250;
(3) Knowingly committing, or being a party to, any material fraud,
misrepresentation, concealment, conspiracy, collusion, trick, scheme,
or device whereby any other person lawfully relies upon the word,
representation, or conduct of the licensee. However, this subsection
(3) does not prevent a bail bond recovery agent from using any pretext
to locate or apprehend a fugitive criminal defendant or gain any
information regarding the fugitive;
(4) Assigning or transferring any license issued pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter, except as provided in RCW 18.185.030 or
18.185.250;
(5) Conversion of any money or contract, deed, note, mortgage, or
other evidence of title, to his or her own use or to the use of his or
her principal or of any other person, when delivered to him or her in
trust or on condition, in violation of the trust or before the
happening of the condition; and failure to return any money or
contract, deed, note, mortgage, or other evidence of title within
thirty days after the owner is entitled to possession, and makes demand
for possession, shall be prima facie evidence of conversion;
(6) Entering into a contract, including a general power of
attorney, with a person that gives the bail bond agent full authority
over the person's finances, assets, real property, or personal
property;
(7) Failing to keep records, maintain a trust account, or return
collateral or security, as required by RCW 18.185.100;
(((7))) (8) Any conduct in a bail bond transaction which
demonstrates bad faith, dishonesty, or untrustworthiness;
(((8))) (9) Violation of an order to cease and desist that is
issued by the director under chapter 18.235 RCW;
(((9))) (10) Wearing, displaying, holding, or using badges not
approved by the department;
(((10))) (11) Making any statement that would reasonably cause
another person to believe that the bail bond recovery agent is a sworn
peace officer;
(((11))) (12) Failing to carry a copy of the contract or to present
a copy of the contract as required under RCW 18.185.270(1);
(((12))) (13) Using the services of an unlicensed bail bond
recovery agent or using the services of a bail bond recovery agent
without issuing the proper contract;
(((13))) (14) Misrepresenting or knowingly making a material
misstatement or omission in the application for a license;
(((14))) (15) Using the services of a person performing the
functions of a bail bond recovery agent who has not been licensed by
the department as required by this chapter;
(((15))) (16) Performing the functions of a bail bond recovery
agent without being both (a) licensed under this chapter or supervised
by a licensed bail bond recovery agent under RCW 18.185.290; and (b)
under contract with a bail bond agent;
(((16))) (17) Performing the functions of a bail bond recovery
agent without exercising due care to protect the safety of persons
other than the defendant and the property of persons other than the
defendant; ((or
(17))) (18) Using a dog in the apprehension of a fugitive criminal
defendant;
(19) Failing to reasonably disclose, when requested by law
enforcement, information within the bail agent's possession concerning
the location of a fugitive criminal defendant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---