BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 83.100.040 (Estate tax imposed -- Amount
of tax) and 2010 c 106 s 234, 2005 c 516 s 3, 1988 c 64 s 4, & 1981 2nd
ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.040 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to estates of decedents
dying on or after August 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---