BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Everyone is entitled to safe and effective health care;
(b) Our health care delivery system has a paramount duty to make
patient safety a top priority;
(c) Despite the best efforts of health care providers and
facilities, preventable medical errors, prescription drug misuse, and
other unintended consequences that negatively affect patients can
occur;
(d) Health care providers and facilities in Washington are
committed to promoting patient safety and eliminating medical errors;
(e) Common measures for reporting health care performance, along
with patient education and engagement, are critical to Washington
citizens making informed health choices; and
(f) Washington state strives to promote the importance of patient
safety in the delivery of quality health care.
(2) It is therefore the legislature's intent to designate July 25th
of each year as patient safety day in memory of patients who have
suffered from preventable medical errors, to honor all people who
strive to improve medical safety, and to raise the awareness of the
paramount importance of patient safety.

--- END ---