BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.36.111 and 2009 c 414 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of state, in conjunction with the Washington
state association of county auditors, shall develop a uniform ballot
format to be used by each county. The format must be implemented by
the year 2022, or upon replacement of vote tallying equipment,
whichever occurs first.
(2) Every ballot for a single combination of issues, offices, and
candidates shall be uniform within a precinct and shall identify the
type of primary or election, the county, and the date of the primary or
election, and the ballot or voting device shall contain instructions on
the proper method of recording a vote, including write-in votes. Each
position, together with the names of the candidates for that office,
shall be clearly separated from other offices or positions in the same
jurisdiction. The offices in each jurisdiction shall be clearly
separated from each other. No paper ballot or ballot card may be
marked by or at the direction of an election official in any way that
would permit the identification of the person who voted that ballot.
(((2))) (3) An ((elections [election])) election official may not
enter into or extend any contract with a vendor if such contract may
allow the vendor to acquire an ownership interest in any data
pertaining to any voter, any voter's address, registration number, or
history, or any ballot.
(4) The secretary of state, in conjunction with the department of
enterprise services and in consultation with county auditors, may
develop a master contract for vote tallying equipment for purchase by
counties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29A.36 RCW
to read as follows:
A county auditor may establish an equipment replacement fund that
must be used explicitly to replace vote tallying equipment and only the
county auditor may authorize expenditures from the fund. Election
billing charges must be sufficient to fund the replacement of the
equipment no later than the year 2022.

--- END ---