BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of respirator requirements for asbestos abatement
projects, an employer must comply with the federal standards
established in 29 C.F.R. Part 1910, as enacted on the effective date of
this section. To the extent rules adopted by the department are
inconsistent with the federal standards applicable to respirator
requirements for asbestos abatement projects as enacted on the
effective date of this section, and until the time rules consistent
with the federal standard are adopted, the federal standards govern and
control.

--- END ---