BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.210 and 2009 c 333 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall maintain and manage real or personal
property owned, leased, or held by the department and shall control the
construction of buildings, structures, and improvements in or on the
property. The director may adopt rules for the operation and
maintenance of the property.
(2) The commission may authorize the director to sell, lease,
convey, or grant concessions upon real or personal property under the
control of the department. This includes the authority to sell timber,
gravel, sand, and other materials or products from real property held
by the department, and to sell or lease the department's real or
personal property or grant concessions or rights-of-way for roads or
utilities in the property. Oil and gas resources owned by the state
which lie below lands owned, leased, or held by the department shall be
offered for lease by the commissioner of public lands pursuant to
chapter 79.14 RCW with the proceeds being deposited in the state
wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, the commissioner of public lands shall condition such leases
at the request of the department to protect wildlife and its habitat.
(3) The department must give consideration to economic development
opportunities for any real property under its control that provide
benefits to the department, the state, or for the local community where
the property is situated when deciding how to most advantageously use
the property.
(4) If the commission determines that real or personal property
held by the department cannot be used advantageously by the department
or in the furtherance of local, regional, or statewide economic
development, the director may dispose of that property if it is in the
public interest and if disposal is consistent with the provisions of an
economic development plan developed by the department for the parcel.
(5) If the state acquired real property with use limited to
specific purposes, the director may negotiate terms for the return of
the property to the donor or grantor. Other real property shall be
sold to the highest bidder at public auction. After appraisal, notice
of the auction shall be published at least once a week for two
successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the
county where the property is located at least twenty days prior to
sale.
(6) Proceeds from the sales shall be deposited in the state
wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.05.175 and 2007 c 145 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission must give consideration to economic development
opportunities for any real property under its control that provide
benefits to the commission, the state, or for the local community where
the property is situated when deciding how to most advantageously use
the property.
(2) Whenever the commission finds that any land under its control
cannot advantageously be used for park purposes or in the furtherance
of local, regional, or statewide economic development, it is authorized
to dispose of such land by the method provided in this section or by
the method provided in RCW 79A.05.170 if disposal is consistent with
the provisions of an economic development plan developed by the
department for the parcel.
(3) If ((such)) lands identified for disposal are school or other
grant lands, control ((thereof)) of the lands shall be relinquished by
resolution of the commission to the proper state officials. If
((such)) lands identified for disposal were acquired under restrictive
conveyances by which the state may hold them only so long as they are
used for park purposes, they may be returned to the donor or grantors
by the commission. All other ((such)) lands identified for disposal
may be either sold by the commission to the highest bidder or exchanged
for other lands of equal value by the commission, and all conveyance
documents shall be executed by the governor.
(4) All ((such)) exchanges shall be accompanied by a transfer fee,
to be set by the commission and paid by the other party to the
transfer((; such)). The fee shall be paid into the parkland
acquisition account established under RCW 79A.05.170.
(5) The commission may accept sealed bids, electronic bids, or oral
bids at auction. Bids on all sales shall be solicited at least twenty
days in advance of the sale date by an advertisement appearing at least
once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county in which the land to be sold is located. If
the commission feels that no bid received adequately reflects the fair
value of the land to be sold, it may reject all bids, and may call for
new bids. All proceeds derived from the sale of ((such)) park property
shall be paid into the park land acquisition account.
(6) All land considered for exchange shall be evaluated by the
commission to determine its adaptability to park usage and for economic
development uses. The equal value of all lands exchanged shall first
be determined by the appraisals to the satisfaction of the commission.
No sale or exchange of state park lands shall be made without the
unanimous consent of the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79.02 RCW
under the subchapter heading "PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS" to read as
follows:
The board must, when not in conflict with its fiduciary duties,
give consideration to economic development opportunities for any public
lands under its control that provide benefits to the state land trust
beneficiaries, the department, the state, or for the local community
where the property is situated when deciding how to most advantageously
manage property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 79.11 RCW
under the subchapter heading "PART 1 SALES PROCEDURES" to read as
follows:
(1) The department shall develop and the board shall implement a
plan to divest the state by December 31, 2023, of all state lands and
state forest lands that are not being actively used for forestry and
all lands under state title condemned under section 6 of this act.
(2) In implementing the divestiture plan required under this
section, the department shall ensure that the lands sold receive fair
market value from private sector purchasers under the provisions of
this chapter.
(3) Any trust beneficiary affected by the divestiture of state
lands or state forest lands under this section must be made whole by
the provisions of the divestiture plan. The final proceeds of land
sales conducted pursuant to the divestiture plan must be transmitted to
the state investment board created in chapter 43.33A RCW to be managed
in an investment trust for the affected beneficiaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.33A RCW
to read as follows:
The state investment board must work closely with the board of
natural resources to implement the state land divestiture plan required
under section 4 of this act and ensure that revenue produced from the
ensuing land sales are accounted for and managed according to the
fiduciary duty of the state with regard to the trust beneficiaries that
are affected by the sales.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 8.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The attorney general is authorized and empowered to condemn
land owned by the federal government on the effective date of this
section that is forested or available for active forestry uses.
(2)(a) Land acquired by the state under this section must be made
available for sale to private landowners for active forestry uses under
section 4 of this act; and
(b) The acquisition and sale of land condemned under this section
are deemed to be for a state purpose and public use.

Sec. 7 RCW 79.11.010 and 2003 c 334 s 321 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, not more than one
hundred and sixty acres of any land granted to the state by the United
States shall be offered for sale in one parcel and no university lands
shall be offered for sale except by legislative directive or with the
consent of the board of regents of the University of Washington.
(2) Any land granted to the state by the United States may be sold
for any lawful purpose in such minimum acreage as may be fixed by the
department or the legislature.

Sec. 8 RCW 79.11.090 and 2003 c 334 s 352 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 79.11.340, all sales of land under
this chapter shall be at public auction, to the highest bidder, on the
terms prescribed by law and as specified in the notice provided under
RCW 79.11.120, and no land shall be sold for less than its appraised
value.
(2) In implementing the divestiture plan required in section 4 of
this act, the board shall ensure that land sales are awarded to the
highest private sector bidder.

--- END ---