BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that it is
critically important that scientific information used to inform public
policy be of the highest quality and integrity. Furthermore, the
legislature recognizes that a public benefit is derived from greater
transparency as to what scientific information, data, or records are
being used to inform public policy or relied upon in agency decision
making.
(2) Therefore, in order to help ensure that agencies routinely use
scientifically credible information in conducting their policy-making
functions, it is the intent of the legislature to have those sources of
scientific information reviewed and relied upon by agencies be
identified in a clear and transparent way.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Before taking a significant agency action, the department of
fish and wildlife must identify the sources of information reviewed and
relied upon by the agency in the course of preparing to take
significant agency action. Peer-reviewed literature, if applicable,
must be identified, as well as any scientific literature or other
sources of information used. The department of fish and wildlife shall
make available on the agency's web site the index of records required
under RCW 42.56.070(6) that are relied upon, or invoked, in support of
a proposal for significant agency action.
(2)(a) For the purposes of this section, "significant agency
action" means an act of the department of fish and wildlife that:
(i) Results in the development of a significant legislative rule as
defined in RCW 34.05.328;
(ii) Results in the development of technical guidance, technical
assessments, or technical documents that are used to directly support
implementation of a state rule or state statute; or
(iii) Results in the development of fish and wildlife recovery
plans.
(b) "Significant agency action" does not include rule making by the
department of fish and wildlife associated with fishing and hunting
rules.
(3) This section is not intended to affect agency action regarding
individual permitting, compliance and enforcement decisions, or
guidance provided by an agency to a local government on a case-by-case
basis.

--- END ---