BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that it is
critically important that scientific information used to inform public
policy be of the highest quality and integrity. Furthermore, the
legislature recognizes that a public benefit is derived from greater
transparency as to what scientific information, data, or records are
being used to inform public policy or relied upon in agency decision
making.
(2) Therefore, in order to help ensure that agencies routinely use
scientifically credible information in conducting their policy-making
functions, it is the intent of the legislature to have those sources of
scientific information reviewed and relied upon by agencies be
identified in a clear and transparent way.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies only to the water quality and shorelands
and environmental assistance programs within the department of ecology.
(2) Before taking a significant agency action, the department of
ecology must identify the sources of information reviewed and relied
upon by the agency in the course of preparing to take significant
agency action. Peer-reviewed literature, if applicable, must be
identified, as well as any scientific literature or other sources of
information used. The department of ecology shall make available on
the agency's web site the index of records required under RCW
42.56.070(6) that are relied upon, or invoked, in support of a proposal
for significant agency action.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "significant agency action"
means an act of the department of ecology that:
(a) Results in the development of a significant legislative rule as
defined in RCW 34.05.328; or
(b) Results in the development of technical guidance, technical
assessments, or technical documents that are used to directly support
implementation of a state rule or state statute.
(4) This section is not intended to affect agency action regarding
individual permitting, compliance and enforcement decisions, or
guidance provided by an agency to a local government on a case-by-case
basis.

--- END ---