BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that persons with a
mental illness or developmental disability are more likely to be
victimized by crime than to be perpetrators of crime. The legislature
further finds that there are a small number of individuals who commit
repeated violent acts against others while suffering from the effects
of a mental illness and/or developmental disability that both
contributes to their criminal behaviors and renders them legally
incompetent to be held accountable for those behaviors. The
legislature further finds that the primary statutory mechanisms
designed to protect the public from violent behavior, either criminal
commitment to a corrections institution, or long-term commitment as not
guilty by reason of insanity, are unavailable due to the legal
incompetence of these individuals to stand trial. The legislature
further finds that the existing civil system of short-term commitments
under the Washington's involuntary treatment act is insufficient to
protect the public from these violent acts. Finally, the legislature
finds that changes to the involuntary treatment act to account for this
small number of individuals is necessary in order to serve Washington's
compelling interest in public safety and to provide for the proper care
of these individuals.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.77.086 and 2012 c 256 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If the defendant is charged with a felony and determined to
be incompetent, until he or she has regained the competency necessary
to understand the proceedings against him or her and assist in his or
her own defense, or has been determined unlikely to regain competency
pursuant to RCW 10.77.084(1)(b), but in any event for a period of no
longer than ninety days, the court:
(i) Shall commit the defendant to the custody of the secretary who
shall place such defendant in an appropriate facility of the department
for evaluation and treatment; or
(ii) May alternatively order the defendant to undergo evaluation
and treatment at some other facility as determined by the department,
or under the guidance and control of a professional person.
(b) For a defendant whose highest charge is a class C felony, or a
class B felony that is not classified as violent under RCW 9.94A.030,
the maximum time allowed for the initial period of commitment for
competency restoration is forty-five days.
(2) On or before expiration of the initial period of commitment
under subsection (1) of this section the court shall conduct a hearing,
at which it shall determine whether or not the defendant is
incompetent.
(3) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a
defendant charged with a felony is incompetent, the court shall have
the option of extending the order of commitment or alternative
treatment for an additional period of ninety days, but the court must
at the time of extension set a date for a prompt hearing to determine
the defendant's competency before the expiration of the second
restoration period. The defendant, the defendant's attorney, or the
prosecutor has the right to demand that the hearing be before a jury.
No extension shall be ordered for a second or third restoration period
as provided in subsection (4) of this section if the defendant's
incompetence has been determined by the secretary to be solely the
result of a developmental disability which is such that competence is
not reasonably likely to be regained during an extension.
(4) For persons charged with a felony, at the hearing upon the
expiration of the second restoration period or at the end of the first
restoration period, in the case of a defendant with a developmental
disability, if the jury or court finds that the defendant is
incompetent, the charges shall be dismissed without prejudice, and the
court shall ((either order the release of the defendant or)) order the
defendant be committed to a state hospital ((or secure mental health
facility)) as defined in RCW 72.23.010 for up to seventy-two hours
starting from admission to the facility, excluding Saturdays, Sundays,
and holidays, for evaluation for the purpose of filing a civil
commitment petition under chapter 71.05 RCW. The criminal charges
shall not be dismissed if the court or jury finds that: (a) The
defendant (i) is a substantial danger to other persons; or (ii)
presents a substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts
jeopardizing public safety or security; and (b) there is a substantial
probability that the defendant will regain competency within a
reasonable period of time. In the event that the court or jury makes
such a finding, the court may extend the period of commitment for up to
an additional six months.

Sec. 3 RCW 10.77.270 and 2010 c 263 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall establish an independent public safety
review panel for the purpose of advising the secretary and the courts
with respect to persons who have been found not guilty by reason of
insanity, or persons committed under the involuntary treatment act
where the court has made a special finding under RCW 71.05.280(3)(b).
The panel shall provide advice regarding all recommendations to the
secretary, decisions by the secretary, or actions pending in court:
(a) For a change in commitment status; (b) to allow furloughs or
temporary leaves accompanied by staff; (c) not to seek further
commitment terms under RCW 71.05.320; or (((c))) (d) to permit movement
about the grounds of the treatment facility, with or without the
accompaniment of staff.
(2) The members of the public safety review panel shall be
appointed by the governor for a renewable term of three years and shall
include the following:
(a) A psychiatrist;
(b) A licensed clinical psychologist;
(c) A representative of the department of corrections;
(d) A prosecutor or a representative of a prosecutor's association;
(e) A representative of law enforcement or a law enforcement
association;
(f) A consumer and family advocate representative; and
(g) A public defender or a representative of a defender's
association.
(3) Thirty days prior to issuing a recommendation for conditional
release under RCW 10.77.150 or forty-five days prior to issuing a
recommendation for release under RCW 10.77.200, the secretary shall
submit its recommendation with the committed person's application and
the department's risk assessment to the public safety review panel.
The public safety review panel shall complete an independent assessment
of the public safety risk entailed by the secretary's proposed
conditional release recommendation or release recommendation and
provide this assessment in writing to the secretary. The public safety
review panel may, within funds appropriated for this purpose, request
additional evaluations of the committed person. The public safety
review panel may indicate whether it is in agreement with the
secretary's recommendation, or whether it would issue a different
recommendation. The secretary shall provide the panel's assessment
when it is received along with any supporting documentation, including
all previous reports of evaluations of the committed person in the
person's hospital record, to the court, prosecutor in the county that
ordered the person's commitment, and counsel for the committed person.
(4) The secretary shall notify the public safety review panel at
appropriate intervals concerning any changes in the commitment or
custody status of persons found not guilty by reason of insanity, or
persons committed under the involuntary treatment act where the court
has made a special finding under RCW 71.05.280(3)(b). The panel shall
have access, upon request, to a committed person's complete hospital
record, and any other records deemed necessary by the public safety
review panel.
(5) The department shall provide administrative and financial
support to the public safety review panel. The department, in
consultation with the public safety review panel, may adopt rules to
implement this section.
(6) By December 1, 2014, the public safety review panel shall
report to the appropriate legislative committees the following:
(a) Whether the public safety review panel has observed a change in
statewide consistency of evaluations and decisions concerning changes
in the commitment status of persons found not guilty by reason of
insanity;
(b) Whether the public safety review panel should be given the
authority to make release decisions and monitor release conditions;
(c) Whether further changes in the law are necessary to enhance
public safety in cases where incompetency prevents operation of the
criminal justice system and/or long-term commitment of the criminally
insane; and
(d) Any other issues the public safety review panel deems relevant.

Sec. 4 RCW 71.05.280 and 2008 c 213 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
At the expiration of the fourteen-day period of intensive treatment
or a restoration period under RCW 10.77.086, a person may be confined
for further treatment pursuant to RCW 71.05.320 if:
(1) Such person after having been taken into custody for evaluation
and treatment has threatened, attempted, or inflicted: (a) Physical
harm upon the person of another or himself or herself, or substantial
damage upon the property of another, and (b) as a result of mental
disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm; or
(2) Such person was taken into custody as a result of conduct in
which he or she attempted or inflicted physical harm upon the person of
another or himself or herself, or substantial damage upon the property
of others, and continues to present, as a result of mental disorder, a
likelihood of serious harm; or
(3) Such person has been determined to be incompetent and criminal
charges have been dismissed pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4), and has
committed acts constituting a felony, and as a result of a mental
disorder or developmental disability, presents a substantial likelihood
of repeating similar acts.
(a) In any proceeding pursuant to this subsection it shall not be
necessary to show intent, willfulness, or state of mind as an element
of the crime;
(b) For any person subject to commitment under this subsection
where the charge underlying the finding of incompetence is for a felony
classified as violent under RCW 9.94A.030, the court shall determine
whether the acts the person committed constitute a violent offense
under RCW 9.94A.030; or
(4) Such person is gravely disabled.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.05.320 and 2009 c 323 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in RCW
71.05.280 have been proven and that the best interests of the person or
others will not be served by a less restrictive treatment which is an
alternative to detention, the court shall remand him or her to the
custody of the department or to a facility certified for ninety day
treatment by the department for a further period of intensive treatment
not to exceed ninety days from the date of judgment. If the grounds
set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) are the basis of commitment, then the
period of treatment may be up to but not exceed one hundred eighty days
from the date of judgment in a facility certified for one hundred
eighty day treatment by the department.
(2) If the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in RCW
71.05.280 have been proven, but finds that treatment less restrictive
than detention will be in the best interest of the person or others,
then the court shall remand him or her to the custody of the department
or to a facility certified for ninety day treatment by the department
or to a less restrictive alternative for a further period of less
restrictive treatment not to exceed ninety days from the date of
judgment. If the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) are the basis
of commitment, then the period of treatment may be up to but not exceed
one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment.
(3) The person shall be released from involuntary treatment at the
expiration of the period of commitment imposed under subsection (1) or
(2) of this section unless the superintendent or professional person in
charge of the facility in which he or she is confined, or in the event
of a less restrictive alternative, the designated mental health
professional, files a new petition for involuntary treatment on the
grounds that the committed person:
(a) During the current period of court ordered treatment: (i) Has
threatened, attempted, or inflicted physical harm upon the person of
another, or substantial damage upon the property of another, and (ii)
as a result of mental disorder or developmental disability presents a
likelihood of serious harm; or
(b) Was taken into custody as a result of conduct in which he or
she attempted or inflicted serious physical harm upon the person of
another, and continues to present, as a result of mental disorder or
developmental disability a likelihood of serious harm; or
(c)(i) Is in custody pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) and as a result
of mental disorder or developmental disability continues to
present((s)) a substantial likelihood of repeating ((similar)) acts
((considering)) similar to the charged criminal behavior, when
considering the person's life history, progress in treatment, and the
public safety. (ii) In cases under this subsection where the court has
made an affirmative special finding under RCW 71.05.280(3)(b), the
commitment shall continue for up to an additional one hundred eighty
day period whenever the petition presents prima facie evidence that the
person continues to suffer from a mental disorder or developmental
disability that results in a substantial likelihood of committing acts
similar to the charged criminal behavior, unless the person presents
proof through an admissible expert opinion that the person's condition
has so changed such that the mental disorder or developmental
disability no longer presents a substantial likelihood of the person
committing acts similar to the charged criminal behavior. The
additional commitment period may include transfer to a specialized
program of intensive support and treatment, which may be initiated
prior to or after release from the state hospital; or
(d) Continues to be gravely disabled.
If the conduct required to be proven in (b) and (c) of this
subsection was found by a judge or jury in a prior trial under this
chapter, it shall not be necessary to prove such conduct again.
(4) For a person committed under subsection (2) of this section who
has been remanded to a period of less restrictive treatment, in
addition to the grounds specified in subsection (3) of this section,
the designated mental health professional may file a new petition for
continued less restrictive treatment if:
(a) The person was previously committed by a court to detention for
involuntary mental health treatment during the thirty-six months that
preceded the person's initial detention date during the current
involuntary commitment cycle, excluding any time spent in a mental
health facility or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction;
(b) In view of the person's treatment history or current behavior,
the person is unlikely to voluntarily participate in outpatient
treatment without an order for less restrictive treatment; and
(c) Outpatient treatment that would be provided under a less
restrictive treatment order is necessary to prevent a relapse,
decompensation, or deterioration that is likely to result in the person
presenting a likelihood of serious harm or the person becoming gravely
disabled within a reasonably short period of time.
(5) A new petition for involuntary treatment filed under subsection
(3) or (4) of this section shall be filed and heard in the superior
court of the county of the facility which is filing the new petition
for involuntary treatment unless good cause is shown for a change of
venue. The cost of the proceedings shall be borne by the state.
(6) The hearing shall be held as provided in RCW 71.05.310, and if
the court or jury finds that the grounds for additional confinement as
set forth in this section are present, the court may order the
committed person returned for an additional period of treatment not to
exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment. At the end
of the one hundred eighty day period of commitment, the committed
person shall be released unless a petition for another one hundred
eighty day period of continued treatment is filed and heard in the same
manner as provided in this section. Successive one hundred eighty day
commitments are permissible on the same grounds and pursuant to the
same procedures as the original one hundred eighty day commitment.
However, a commitment is not permissible under subsection (4) of this
section if thirty-six months have passed since the last date of
discharge from detention for inpatient treatment that preceded the
current less restrictive alternative order, nor shall a commitment
under subsection (4) of this section be permissible if the likelihood
of serious harm in subsection (4)(c) of this section is based solely on
harm to the property of others.
(7) No person committed as provided in this section may be detained
unless a valid order of commitment is in effect. No order of
commitment can exceed one hundred eighty days in length.

Sec. 6 RCW 71.05.425 and 2011 c 305 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at the
earliest possible date, and in no event later than thirty days before
conditional release, final release, authorized leave under RCW
71.05.325(2), or transfer to a facility other than a state mental
hospital, the superintendent shall send written notice of conditional
release, release, authorized leave, or transfer of a person committed
under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(3)(c) following dismissal of a sex,
violent, or felony harassment offense pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4) to
the following:
(i) The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the person
will reside; ((and))
(ii) The sheriff of the county in which the person will reside; and
(iii) The prosecuting attorney of the county in which the criminal
charges against the committed person were dismissed.
(b) The same notice as required by (a) of this subsection shall be
sent to the following, if such notice has been requested in writing
about a specific person committed under RCW 71.05.280(3) or
71.05.320(3)(c) following dismissal of a sex, violent, or felony
harassment offense pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4):
(i) The victim of the sex, violent, or felony harassment offense
that was dismissed pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4) preceding commitment
under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(3)(c) or the victim's next of kin
if the crime was a homicide;
(ii) Any witnesses who testified against the person in any court
proceedings;
(iii) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney.
Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting the
notice, information regarding any other person specified in writing by
the prosecuting attorney to receive the notice, and the notice are
confidential and shall not be available to the person committed under
this chapter; and
(iv) The chief of police of the city, if any, and the sheriff of
the county, if any, which had jurisdiction of the person on the date of
the applicable offense.
(c) The thirty-day notice requirements contained in this subsection
shall not apply to emergency medical transfers.
(d) The existence of the notice requirements in this subsection
will not require any extension of the release date in the event the
release plan changes after notification.
(2) If a person committed under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(3)(c)
following dismissal of a sex, violent, or felony harassment offense
pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4) escapes, the superintendent shall
immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means
available, the chief of police of the city and the sheriff of the
county in which the person escaped and in which the person resided
immediately before the person's arrest and the prosecuting attorney of
the county in which the criminal charges against the committed person
were dismissed. If previously requested, the superintendent shall also
notify the witnesses and the victim of the sex, violent, or felony
harassment offense that was dismissed pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4)
preceding commitment under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(3) or the
victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide. In addition, the
secretary shall also notify appropriate parties pursuant to RCW
71.05.390(18). If the person is recaptured, the superintendent shall
send notice to the persons designated in this subsection as soon as
possible but in no event later than two working days after the
department learns of such recapture.
(3) If the victim, the victim's next of kin, or any witness is
under the age of sixteen, the notice required by this section shall be
sent to the parent or legal guardian of the child.
(4) The superintendent shall send the notices required by this
chapter to the last address provided to the department by the
requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the department
with a current address.
(5) For purposes of this section the following terms have the
following meanings:
(a) "Violent offense" means a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) "Sex offense" means a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030;
(c) "Next of kin" means a person's spouse, state registered
domestic partner, parents, siblings, and children;
(d) "Felony harassment offense" means a crime of harassment as
defined in RCW 9A.46.060 that is a felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---