BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 62A.4A-108 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-108 are each
amended to read as follows:
RELATIONSHIP TO ELECTRONIC FUND TRANSFER ACT. (a) Except as
provided in subsection (b) of this section, this Article does not apply
to a funds transfer any part of which is governed by the Electronic
Fund Transfer Act of 1978 (Title XX, P.L. 95-630, 92 Stat. 3728, 15
U.S.C. Sec. 1693 et seq.) ((as amended from time to time)).
(b) This Article applies to a funds transfer that is a remittance
transfer as defined in the Electronic Fund Transfer Act (15 U.S.C. Sec.
1693o-1), unless the remittance transfer is an electronic fund transfer
as defined in the Electronic Fund Transfer Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1693a).
(c) In a funds transfer to which this Article applies, in the event
of an inconsistency between an applicable provision of this Article and
an applicable provision of the Electronic Fund Transfer Act, the
provision of the Electronic Fund Transfer Act governs to the extent of
the inconsistency.

Sec. 2 RCW 62A.4A-103 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-103 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) In this Article:
(((a))) (1) "Payment order" means an instruction of a sender to a
receiving bank, transmitted orally, electronically, or in writing, to
pay, or to cause another bank to pay, a fixed or determinable amount of
money to a beneficiary if:
(i) The instruction does not state a condition ((of)) to payment to
the beneficiary other than time of payment;
(ii) The receiving bank is to be reimbursed by debiting an account
of, or otherwise receiving payment from, the sender; and
(iii) The instruction is transmitted by the sender directly to the
receiving bank or to an agent, funds-transfer system, or communication
system for transmittal to the receiving bank.
(((b))) (2) "Beneficiary" means the person to be paid by the
beneficiary's bank.
(((c))) (3) "Beneficiary's bank" means the bank identified in a
payment order in which an account of the beneficiary is to be credited
pursuant to the order or which otherwise is to make payment to the
beneficiary if the order does not provide for payment to an account.
(((d))) (4) "Receiving bank" means the bank to which the sender's
instruction is addressed.
(((e))) (5) "Sender" means the person giving the instruction to the
receiving bank.
(((2))) (b) If an instruction complying with subsection (((1)(a)))
(a)(1) of this section is to make more than one payment to a
beneficiary, the instruction is a separate payment order with respect
to each payment.
(((3))) (c) A payment order is issued when it is sent to the
receiving bank.

Sec. 3 RCW 62A.4A-104 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-104 are each
amended to read as follows:
In this Article:
(((1))) (a) "Funds transfer" means the series of transactions,
beginning with the originator's payment order, made for the purpose of
making payment to the beneficiary of the order. The term includes any
payment order issued by the originator's bank or an intermediary bank
intended to carry out the originator's payment order. A funds transfer
is completed by acceptance by the beneficiary's bank of a payment order
for the benefit of the beneficiary of the originator's payment order.
(((2))) (b) "Intermediary bank" means a receiving bank other than
the originator's bank or the beneficiary's bank.
(((3))) (c) "Originator" means the sender of the first payment
order in a funds transfer.
(((4))) (d) "Originator's bank" means (((a))) (i) the receiving
bank to which the payment order of the originator is issued if the
originator is not a bank, or (((b))) (ii) the originator if the
originator is a bank.

Sec. 4 RCW 62A.4A-105 and 2012 c 214 s 1201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) (a) In this Article:
(((a))) (1) "Authorized account" means a deposit account of a
customer in a bank designated by the customer as a source of payment of
payment orders issued by the customer to the bank. If a customer does
not so designate an account, any account of the customer is an
authorized account if payment of a payment order from that account is
not inconsistent with a restriction on the use of ((the)) that account.
(((b))) (2) "Bank" means a person engaged in the business of
banking and includes a savings bank, savings and loan association,
credit union, and trust company. A branch or separate office of a bank
is a separate bank for purposes of this Article.
(((c))) (3) "Customer" means a person, including a bank, having an
account with a bank or from whom a bank has agreed to receive payment
orders.
(((d))) (4) "Funds-transfer business day" of a receiving bank means
the part of a day during which the receiving bank is open for the
receipt, processing, and transmittal of payment orders and
cancellations and amendments of payment orders.
(((e))) (5) "Funds-transfer system" means a wire transfer network,
automated clearing house, or other communication system of a clearing
house or other association of banks through which a payment order by a
bank may be transmitted to the bank to which the order is addressed.
(((f))) (6) [Reserved.]
(((g))) (7) "Prove" with respect to a fact means to meet the burden
of establishing the fact (RCW 62A.1-201(b)(8)).
(((2))) (b) Other definitions applying to this Article and the
sections in which they appear are:

"Acceptance" RCW 62A.4A-209

"Beneficiary" RCW 62A.4A-103

"Beneficiary's bank" RCW 62A.4A-103

"Executed" RCW 62A.4A-301

"Execution date" RCW 62A.4A-301

"Funds transfer" RCW 62A.4A-104

"Funds-transfer system rule" RCW 62A.4A-501

"Intermediary bank" RCW 62A.4A-104

"Originator" RCW 62A.4A-104

"Originator's bank" RCW 62A.4A-104

"Payment by beneficiary's
bank to beneficiary" RCW 62A.4A-405

"Payment by originator to
beneficiary" RCW 62A.4A-406

"Payment by sender to
receiving bank" RCW 62A.4A-403

"Payment date" RCW 62A.4A-401

"Payment order" RCW 62A.4A-103

"Receiving bank" RCW 62A.4A-103

"Security procedure" RCW 62A.4A-201

"Sender" RCW 62A.4A-103

(((3))) (c) The following definitions in Article 4 (RCW 62A.4-101
through 62A.4-504) apply to this Article:

"Clearing house" RCW 62A.4-104

"Item" RCW 62A.4-104

"Suspends payments" RCW 62A.4-104

(((4))) (d) In addition, Article 1 contains general definitions and
principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout
this Article.

Sec. 5 RCW 62A.4A-106 and 2012 c 214 s 1202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) (a) The time of receipt of a payment order or communication
canceling or amending a payment order is determined by the rules
applicable to receipt of a notice stated in RCW 62A.1-202. A receiving
bank may fix a cut-off time or times on a funds-transfer business day
for the receipt and processing of payment orders and communications
canceling or amending payment orders. Different cut-off times may
apply to payment orders, cancellations, or amendments, or to different
categories of payment orders, cancellations, or amendments. A cut-off
time may apply to senders generally or different cut-off times may
apply to different senders or categories of payment orders. If a
payment order or communication canceling or amending a payment order is
received after the close of a funds-transfer business day or after the
appropriate cut-off time on a funds-transfer business day, the
receiving bank may treat the payment order or communication as received
at the opening of the next funds-transfer business day.
(((2))) (b) If this Article refers to an execution date or payment
date or states a day on which a receiving bank is required to take
action, and the date or day does not fall on a funds-transfer business
day, the next day that is a funds-transfer business day is treated as
the date or day stated, unless the contrary is stated in this Article.

Sec. 6 RCW 62A.4A-202 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-202 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) A payment order received by the receiving bank is the
authorized order of the person identified as sender if that person
authorized the order or is otherwise bound by it under the law of
agency.
(((2))) (b) If a bank and its customer have agreed that the
authenticity of payment orders issued to the bank in the name of the
customer as sender will be verified pursuant to a security procedure,
a payment order received by the receiving bank is effective as the
order of the customer, whether or not authorized, if (((a))) (i) the
security procedure is a commercially reasonable method of providing
security against unauthorized payment orders, and (((b))) (ii) the bank
proves that it accepted the payment order in good faith and in
compliance with the security procedure and any written agreement or
instruction of the customer restricting acceptance of payment orders
issued in the name of the customer. The bank is not required to follow
an instruction that violates a written agreement with the customer or
notice of which is not received at a time and in a manner affording the
bank a reasonable opportunity to act on it before the payment order is
accepted.
(((3))) (c) Commercial reasonableness of a security procedure is a
question of law to be determined by considering the wishes of the
customer expressed to the bank, the circumstances of the customer known
to the bank, including the size, type, and frequency of payment orders
normally issued by the customer to the bank, alternative security
procedures offered to the customer, and security procedures in general
use by customers and receiving banks similarly situated. A security
procedure is deemed to be commercially reasonable if (((a))) (i) the
security procedure was chosen (([by])) by the customer after the bank
offered, and the customer refused, a security procedure that was
commercially reasonable for that customer, and (((b))) (ii) the
customer expressly agreed in writing to be bound by any payment order,
whether or not authorized, issued in its name, and accepted by the bank
in compliance with the security procedure chosen by the customer.
(((4))) (d) The term "sender" in this Article includes the customer
in whose name a payment order is issued if the order is the authorized
order of the customer under subsection (((1))) (a) of this section, or
it is effective as the order of the customer under subsection (((2)))
(b) of this section.
(((5))) (e) This section applies to amendments and cancellations of
payment orders to the same extent it applies to payment orders.
(((6))) (f) Except as provided in this section and RCW
62A.4A-203(((1)(a))) (a)(1), rights and obligations arising under this
section or RCW 62A.4A-203 may not be varied by agreement.

Sec. 7 RCW 62A.4A-203 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-203 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) If an accepted payment order is not, under RCW
((62A.4A-201(1))) 62A.4A-202(a), an authorized order of a customer
identified as sender, but is effective as an order of the customer
pursuant to RCW 62A.4A-202(((2))) (b), the following rules apply.
(((a))) (1) By express written agreement, the receiving bank may
limit the extent to which it is entitled to enforce or retain payment
of the payment order.
(((b))) (2) The receiving bank is not entitled to enforce or retain
payment of the payment order if the customer proves that the order was
not caused, directly or indirectly, by a person (i) entrusted at any
time with duties to act for the customer with respect to payment orders
or the security procedure, or (ii) who obtained access to transmitting
facilities of the customer or who obtained, from a source controlled by
the customer and without authority of the receiving bank, information
facilitating breach of the security procedure, regardless of how the
information was obtained or whether the customer was at fault.
Information includes any access device, computer software, or the like.
(((2))) (b) This section applies to amendments of payment orders to
the same extent it applies to payment orders.

Sec. 8 RCW 62A.4A-204 and 2012 c 214 s 1203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) (a) If a receiving bank accepts a payment order issued in
the name of its customer as sender which is (((a))) (i) not authorized
and not effective as the order of the customer under RCW 62A.4A-202, or
(((b))) (ii) not enforceable, in whole or in part, against the customer
under RCW 62A.4A-203, the bank shall refund any payment of the payment
order received from the customer to the extent the bank is not entitled
to enforce payment and shall pay interest on the refundable amount
calculated from the date the bank received payment to the date of the
refund. However, the customer is not entitled to interest from the
bank on the amount to be refunded if the customer fails to exercise
ordinary care to determine that the order was not authorized by the
customer and to notify the bank of the relevant facts within a
reasonable time not exceeding ninety days after the date the customer
received notification from the bank that the order was accepted or that
the customer's account was debited with respect to the order. The bank
is not entitled to any recovery from the customer on account of a
failure by the customer to give notification as stated in this section.
(((2))) (b) Reasonable time under subsection (((1))) (a) of this
section may be fixed by agreement as stated in RCW 62A.1-302(b), but
the obligation of a receiving bank to refund payment as stated in
subsection (((1))) (a) of this section may not otherwise be varied by
agreement.

Sec. 9 RCW 62A.4A-205 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-205 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) If an accepted payment order was transmitted pursuant
to a security procedure for the detection of error and the payment
order (((a))) (i) erroneously instructed payment to a beneficiary not
intended by the sender, (((b))) (ii) erroneously instructed payment in
an amount greater than the amount intended by the sender, or (((c)))
(iii) was an erroneously transmitted duplicate of a payment order
previously sent by the sender, the following rules apply:
(((i))) (1) If the sender proves that the sender or a person acting
on behalf of the sender pursuant to RCW 62A.4A-206 complied with the
security procedure and that the error would have been detected if the
receiving bank had also complied, the sender is not obliged to pay the
order to the extent stated in (((ii))) paragraphs (2) and (((iii))) (3)
of this subsection.
(((ii))) (2) If the funds transfer is completed on the basis of an
erroneous payment order described in (((b))) clause (i) or (((c)))
(iii) of this subsection (a), the sender is not obliged to pay the
order and the receiving bank is entitled to recover from the
beneficiary any amount paid to the beneficiary to the extent allowed by
the law governing mistake and restitution.
(((iii))) (3) If the funds transfer is completed on the basis of a
payment order described in (((b))) clause (ii) of this subsection (a),
the sender is not obliged to pay the order to the extent the amount
received by the beneficiary is greater than the amount intended by the
sender. In that case, the receiving bank is entitled to recover from
the beneficiary the excess amount received to the extent allowed by the
law governing mistake and restitution.
(((2))) (b) If (((a))) (i) the sender of an erroneous payment order
described in subsection (((1))) (a) of this section is not obliged to
pay all or part of the order, and (((b))) (ii) the sender receives
notification from the receiving bank that the order was accepted by the
bank or that the sender's account was debited with respect to the
order, the sender has a duty to exercise ordinary care, on the basis of
information available to the sender, to discover the error with respect
to the order and to advise the bank of the relevant facts within a
reasonable time, not exceeding ninety days, after the bank's
notification was received by the sender. If the bank proves that the
sender failed to perform that duty, the sender is liable to the bank
for the loss the bank proves it incurred as a result of the failure,
but the liability of the sender may not exceed the amount of the
sender's order.
(((3))) (c) This section applies to amendments to payment orders to
the same extent it applies to payment orders.

Sec. 10 RCW 62A.4A-206 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-206 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) If a payment order addressed to a receiving bank is
transmitted to a funds-transfer system or other third-party
communication system for transmittal to the bank, the system is deemed
to be an agent of the sender for the purpose of transmitting the
payment order to the bank. If there is a discrepancy between the terms
of the payment order transmitted to the system and the terms of the
payment order transmitted by the system to the bank, the terms of the
payment order of the sender are those transmitted by the system. This
section does not apply to a funds-transfer system of the federal
reserve banks.
(((2))) (b) This section applies to cancellations and amendments of
payment orders to the same extent it applies to payment orders.

Sec. 11 RCW 62A.4A-207 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-207 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) Subject to subsection (((2))) (b) of this section, if,
in a payment order received by the beneficiary's bank, the name, bank
account number, or other identification of the beneficiary refers to a
nonexistent or unidentifiable person or account, no person has rights
as a beneficiary of the order and acceptance of the order cannot occur.
(((2))) (b) If a payment order received by the beneficiary's bank
identifies the beneficiary both by name and by an identifying or bank
account number and the name and number identify different persons, the
following rules apply:
(((a))) (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (((3))) (c)
of this section, if the beneficiary's bank does not know that the name
and number refer to different persons, it may rely on the number as the
proper identification of the beneficiary of the order. The
beneficiary's bank need not determine whether the name and number refer
to the same person.
(((b))) (2) If the beneficiary's bank pays the person identified by
name or knows that the name and number identify different persons, no
person has rights as beneficiary except the person paid by the
beneficiary's bank if that person was entitled to receive payment from
the originator of the funds transfer. If no person has rights as
beneficiary, acceptance of the order cannot occur.
(((3))) (c) If (((a))) (i) a payment order described in subsection
(((2))) (b) of this section is accepted, (((b))) (ii) the originator's
payment order described the beneficiary inconsistently by name and
number, and (((c))) (iii) the beneficiary's bank pays the person
identified by number as permitted by subsection (((2)(a))) (b)(1) of
this section, the following rules apply:
(((i))) (1) If the originator is a bank, the originator is obliged
to pay its order.
(((ii))) (2) If the originator is not a bank and proves that the
person identified by number was not entitled to receive payment from
the originator, the originator is not obliged to pay its order unless
the originator's bank proves that the originator, before acceptance of
the originator's order, had notice that payment of a payment order
issued by the originator might be made by the beneficiary's bank on the
basis of an identifying or bank account number even if it identifies a
person different from the named beneficiary. Proof of notice may be
made by any admissible evidence. The originator's bank satisfies the
burden of proof if it proves that the originator, before the payment
order was accepted, signed a writing stating the information to which
the notice relates.
(((4))) (d) In a case governed by subsection (((2)(a))) (b)(1) of
this section, if the beneficiary's bank rightfully pays the person
identified by number and that person was not entitled to receive
payment from the originator, the amount paid may be recovered from that
person to the extent allowed by the law governing mistake and
restitution as follows:
(((a))) (1) If the originator is obliged to pay its payment order
as stated in subsection (((3))) (c) of this section, the originator has
the right to recover.
(((b))) (2) If the originator is not a bank and is not obliged to
pay its payment order, the originator's bank has the right to recover.

Sec. 12 RCW 62A.4A-208 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-208 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) This subsection applies to a payment order identifying
an intermediary bank or the beneficiary's bank only by an identifying
number.
(((a))) (1) The receiving bank may rely on the number as the proper
identification of the intermediary or beneficiary's bank and need not
determine whether the number identifies a bank.
(((b))) (2) The sender is obliged to compensate the receiving bank
for any loss and expenses incurred by the receiving bank as a result of
its reliance on the number in executing or attempting to execute the
order.
(((2))) (b) This subsection applies to a payment order identifying
an intermediary bank or the beneficiary's bank both by name and an
identifying number if the name and number identify different persons.
(((a))) (1) If the sender is a bank, the receiving bank may rely on
the number as the proper identification of the intermediary or
beneficiary's bank if the receiving bank, when it executes the sender's
order, does not know that the name and number identify different
persons. The receiving bank need not determine whether the name and
number refer to the same person or whether the number refers to a bank.
The sender is obliged to compensate the receiving bank for any loss and
expenses incurred by the receiving bank as a result of its reliance on
the number in executing or attempting to execute the order.
(((b))) (2) If the sender is not a bank and the receiving bank
proves that the sender, before the payment order was accepted, had
notice that the receiving bank might rely on the number as the proper
identification of the intermediary or beneficiary's bank even if it
identifies a person different from the bank identified by name, the
rights and obligations of the sender and the receiving bank are
governed by subsection (((2)(a))) (b)(1) of this section, as though the
sender were a bank. Proof of notice may be made by any admissible
evidence. The receiving bank satisfies the burden of proof if it
proves that the sender, before the payment order was accepted, signed
a writing stating the information to which the notice relates.
(((c))) (3) Regardless of whether the sender is a bank, the
receiving bank may rely on the name as the proper identification of the
intermediary or beneficiary's bank if the receiving bank, at the time
it executes the sender's order, does not know that the name and number
identify different persons. The receiving bank need not determine
whether the name and number refer to the same person.
(((d))) (4) If the receiving bank knows that the name and number
identify different persons, reliance on either the name or the number
in executing the sender's payment order is a breach of the obligation
stated in RCW 62A.4A-302(((1)(a))) (a)(1).

Sec. 13 RCW 62A.4A-209 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-209 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) Subject to subsection (((4))) (d) of this section, a
receiving bank other than the beneficiary's bank accepts a payment
order when it executes the order.
(((2))) (b) Subject to subsections (((3) and (4))) (c) and (d) of
this section, a beneficiary's bank accepts a payment order at the
earliest of the following times:
(((a))) (1) When the bank (i) pays the beneficiary as stated in RCW
62A.4A-405 (((1) or (2))) (a) or (b) or (ii) notifies the beneficiary
of receipt of the order or that the account of the beneficiary has been
credited with respect to the order unless the notice indicates that the
bank is rejecting the order or that funds with respect to the order may
not be withdrawn or used until receipt of payment from the sender of
the order;
(((b))) (2) When the bank receives payment of the entire amount of
the sender's order pursuant to RCW 62A.4A-403(((1) (a) or (b))) (a) (1)
or (2); or
(((c))) (3) The opening of the next funds-transfer business day of
the bank following the payment date of the order if, at that time, the
amount of the sender's order is fully covered by a withdrawable credit
balance in an authorized account of the sender or the bank has
otherwise received full payment from the sender, unless the order was
rejected before that time or is rejected within (i) one hour after that
time, or (ii) one hour after the opening of the next business day of
the sender following the payment date if that time is later. If notice
of rejection is received by the sender after the payment date and the
authorized account of the sender does not bear interest, the bank is
obliged to pay interest to the sender on the amount of the order for
the number of days elapsing after the payment date to the day the
sender receives notice or learns that the order was not accepted,
counting that day as an elapsed day. If the withdrawable credit
balance during that period falls below the amount of the order, the
amount of interest payable is reduced accordingly.
(((3))) (c) Acceptance of a payment order cannot occur before the
order is received by the receiving bank. Acceptance does not occur
under subsection (((2)(b) or (c))) (b) (2) or (3) of this section if
the beneficiary of the payment order does not have an account with the
receiving bank, the account has been closed, or the receiving bank is
not permitted by law to receive credits for the beneficiary's account.
(((4))) (d) A payment order issued to the originator's bank cannot
be accepted until the payment date if the bank is the beneficiary's
bank, or the execution date if the bank is not the beneficiary's bank.
If the originator's bank executes the originator's payment order before
the execution date or pays the beneficiary of the originator's payment
order before the payment date and the payment order is subsequently
canceled pursuant to RCW 62A.4A-211(((2))) (b), the bank may recover
from the beneficiary any payment received to the extent allowed by the
law governing mistake and restitution.

Sec. 14 RCW 62A.4A-210 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-210 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) A payment order is rejected by the receiving bank by a
notice of rejection transmitted to the sender orally, electronically,
or in writing. A notice of rejection need not use any particular words
and is sufficient if it indicates that the receiving bank is rejecting
the order or will not execute or pay the order. Rejection is effective
when the notice is given if transmission is by a means that is
reasonable in the circumstances. If notice of rejection is given by a
means that is not reasonable, rejection is effective when the notice is
received. If an agreement of the sender and receiving bank establishes
the means to be used to reject a payment order, (((a))) (i) any means
complying with the agreement is reasonable and (((b))) (ii) any means
not complying is not reasonable unless no significant delay in receipt
of the notice resulted from the use of the noncomplying means.
(((2))) (b) This subsection applies if a receiving bank other than
the beneficiary's bank fails to execute a payment order despite the
existence on the execution date of a withdrawable credit balance in an
authorized account of the sender sufficient to cover the order. If the
sender does not receive notice of rejection of the order on the
execution date and the authorized account of the sender does not bear
interest, the bank is obliged to pay interest to the sender on the
amount of the order for the number of days elapsing after the execution
date to the earlier of the day the order is canceled pursuant to RCW
62A.4A-211(((4))) (d) or the day the sender receives notice or learns
that the order was not executed, counting the final day of the period
as an elapsed day. If the withdrawable credit balance during that
period falls below the amount of the order, the amount of interest is
reduced accordingly.
(((3))) (c) If a receiving bank suspends payments, all unaccepted
payment orders issued to it are deemed rejected at the time the bank
suspends payments.
(((4))) (d) Acceptance of a payment order precludes a later
rejection of the order. Rejection of a payment order precludes a later
acceptance of the order.

Sec. 15 RCW 62A.4A-211 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-211 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) A communication of the sender of a payment order
canceling or amending the order may be transmitted to the receiving
bank orally, electronically, or in writing. If a security procedure is
in effect between the sender and the receiving bank, the communication
is not effective to cancel or amend the order unless the communication
is verified pursuant to the security procedure or the bank agrees to
the cancellation or amendment.
(((2))) (b) Subject to subsection (((1))) (a) of this section, a
communication by the sender canceling or amending a payment order is
effective to cancel or amend the order if notice of the communication
is received at a time and in a manner affording the receiving bank a
reasonable opportunity to act on the communication before the bank
accepts the payment order.
(((3))) (c) After a payment order has been accepted, cancellation
or amendment of the order is not effective unless the receiving bank
agrees or a funds-transfer system rule allows cancellation or amendment
without agreement of the bank.
(((a))) (1) With respect to a payment order accepted by a receiving
bank other than the beneficiary's bank, cancellation or amendment is
not effective unless a conforming cancellation or amendment of the
payment order issued by the receiving bank is also made.
(((b))) (2) With respect to a payment order accepted by the
beneficiary's bank, cancellation or amendment is not effective unless
the order was issued in execution of an unauthorized payment order, or
because of a mistake by a sender in the funds transfer which resulted
in the issuance of a payment order (i) that is a duplicate of a payment
order previously issued by the sender, (ii) that orders payment to a
beneficiary not entitled to receive payment from the originator, or
(iii) that orders payment in an amount greater than the amount the
beneficiary was entitled to receive from the originator. If the
payment order is canceled or amended, the beneficiary's bank is
entitled to recover from the beneficiary any amount paid to the
beneficiary to the extent allowed by the law governing mistake and
restitution.
(((4))) (d) An unaccepted payment order is canceled by operation of
law at the close of the fifth funds-transfer business day of the
receiving bank after the execution date or payment date of the order.
(((5))) (e) A canceled payment order cannot be accepted. If an
accepted payment order is canceled, the acceptance is nullified and no
person has any right or obligation based on the acceptance. Amendment
of a payment order is deemed to be cancellation of the original order
at the time of amendment and issue of a new payment order in the
amended form at the same time.
(((6))) (f) Unless otherwise provided in an agreement of the
parties or in a funds-transfer system rule, if the receiving bank,
after accepting a payment order, agrees to cancellation or amendment of
the order by the sender or is bound by a funds-transfer system rule
allowing cancellation or amendment without the bank's agreement, the
sender, whether or not cancellation or amendment is effective, is
liable to the bank for any loss and expenses, including reasonable
attorneys' fees, incurred by the bank as a result of the cancellation
or amendment or attempted cancellation or amendment.
(((7))) (g) A payment order is not revoked by the death or legal
incapacity of the sender unless the receiving bank knows of the death
or of an adjudication of incapacity by a court of competent
jurisdiction and has reasonable opportunity to act before acceptance of
the order.
(((8))) (h) A funds-transfer system rule is not effective to the
extent it conflicts with subsection (((3)(b))) (c)(2) of this section.

Sec. 16 RCW 62A.4A-212 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-212 are each
amended to read as follows:
If a receiving bank fails to accept a payment order that (([it]))
it is obliged by express agreement to accept, the bank is liable for
breach of the agreement to the extent provided in the agreement or in
this Article, but does not otherwise have any duty to accept a payment
order or, before acceptance, to take any action, or refrain from taking
action, with respect to the order except as provided in this Article or
by express agreement. Liability based on acceptance arises only when
acceptance occurs as stated in RCW 62A.4A-209, and liability is limited
to that provided in this Article. A receiving bank is not the agent of
the sender or beneficiary of the payment order it accepts, or of any
other party to the funds transfer, and the bank owes no duty to any
party to the funds transfer except as provided in this Article or by
express agreement.

Sec. 17 RCW 62A.4A-301 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-301 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) A payment order is "executed" by the receiving bank
when it issues a payment order intended to carry out the payment order
received by the bank. A payment order received by the beneficiary's
bank can be accepted but cannot be executed.
(((2))) (b) "Execution date" of a payment order means the day on
which the receiving bank may properly issue a payment order in
execution of the sender's order. The execution date may be determined
by instruction of the sender but cannot be earlier than the day the
order is received and, unless otherwise determined, is the day the
order is received. If the sender's instruction states a payment date,
the execution date is the payment date or an earlier date on which
execution is reasonably necessary to allow payment to the beneficiary
on the payment date.

Sec. 18 RCW 62A.4A-302 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-302 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) Except as provided in subsections (((2) through (4)))
(b) through (d) of this section, if the receiving bank accepts a
payment order pursuant to RCW 62A.4A-209(((1))) (a), the bank has the
following obligations in executing the order.
(((a))) (1) The receiving bank is obliged to issue, on the
execution date, a payment order complying with the sender's order and
to follow the sender's instructions concerning (i) any intermediary
bank or funds-transfer system to be used in carrying out the funds
transfer, or (ii) the means by which payment orders are to be
transmitted in the funds transfer. If the originator's bank issues a
payment order to an intermediary bank, the originator's bank is obliged
to instruct the intermediary bank according to the instruction of the
originator. An intermediary bank in the funds transfer is similarly
bound by an instruction given to it by the sender of the payment order
it accepts.
(((b))) (2) If the sender's instruction states that the funds
transfer is to be carried out telephonically or by wire transfer or
otherwise indicates that the funds transfer is to be carried out by the
most expeditious means, the receiving bank is obliged to transmit its
payment order by the most expeditious available means, and to instruct
any intermediary bank accordingly. If a sender's instruction states a
payment date, the receiving bank is obliged to transmit its payment
order at a time and by means reasonably necessary to allow payment to
the beneficiary on the payment date or as soon thereafter as is
feasible.
(((2))) (b) Unless otherwise instructed, a receiving bank executing
a payment order may (((a))) (i) use any funds-transfer system if use of
that system is reasonable in the circumstances, and (((b))) (ii) issue
a payment order to the beneficiary's bank or to an intermediary bank
through which a payment order conforming to the sender's order can
expeditiously be issued to the beneficiary's bank if the receiving bank
exercises ordinary care in the selection of the intermediary bank. A
receiving bank is not required to follow an instruction of the sender
designating a funds-transfer system to be used in carrying out the
funds transfer if the receiving bank, in good faith, determines that it
is not feasible to follow the instruction or that following the
instruction would unduly delay completion of the funds transfer.
(((3))) (c) Unless subsection (((1)(b))) (a)(2) of this section
applies or the receiving bank is otherwise instructed, the bank may
execute a payment order by transmitting its payment order by first((-))
class mail or by any means reasonable in the circumstances. If the
receiving bank is instructed to execute the sender's order by
transmitting its payment order by a particular means, the receiving
bank may issue its payment order by the means stated or by any means as
expeditious as the means stated.
(((4))) (d) Unless instructed by the sender, (((a))) (i) the
receiving bank may not obtain payment of its charges for services and
expenses in connection with the execution of the sender's order by
issuing a payment order in an amount equal to the amount of the
sender's order less the amount of the charges, and (((b))) (ii) may not
instruct a subsequent receiving bank to obtain payment of its charges
in the same manner.

Sec. 19 RCW 62A.4A-303 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-303 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) A receiving bank that (((a))) (i) executes the payment
order of the sender by issuing a payment order in an amount greater
than the amount of the sender's order, or (((b))) (ii) issues a payment
order in execution of the sender's order and then issues a duplicate
order, is entitled to payment of the amount of the sender's order under
RCW 62A.4A-402(((3))) (c) if that subsection is otherwise satisfied.
The bank is entitled to recover from the beneficiary of the erroneous
order the excess payment received to the extent allowed by the law
governing mistake and restitution.
(((2))) (b) A receiving bank that executes the payment order of the
sender by issuing a payment order in an amount less than the amount of
the sender's order is entitled to payment of the amount of the sender's
order under RCW 62A.4A-402(((3))) (c) if (((a))) (i) that subsection is
otherwise satisfied and (((b))) (ii) the bank corrects its mistake by
issuing an additional payment order for the benefit of the beneficiary
of the sender's order. If the error is not corrected, the issuer of
the erroneous order is entitled to receive or retain payment from the
sender of the order it accepted only to the extent of the amount of the
erroneous order. This subsection does not apply if the receiving bank
executes the sender's payment order by issuing a payment order in an
amount less than the amount of the sender's order for the purpose of
obtaining payment of its charges for services and expenses pursuant to
instruction of the sender.
(((3))) (c) If a receiving bank executes the payment order of the
sender by issuing a payment order to a beneficiary different from the
beneficiary of the sender's order and the funds transfer is completed
on the basis of that error, the sender of the payment order that was
erroneously executed and all previous senders in the funds transfer are
not obliged to pay the payment orders they issued. The issuer of the
erroneous order is entitled to recover from the beneficiary of the
order the payment received to the extent allowed by the law governing
mistake and restitution.

Sec. 20 RCW 62A.4A-304 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-304 are each
amended to read as follows:
If the sender of a payment order that is erroneously executed as
stated in RCW 62A.4A-303 receives notification from the receiving bank
that the order was executed or that the sender's account was debited
with respect to the order, the sender has a duty to exercise ordinary
care to determine, on the basis of information available to the sender,
that the order was erroneously executed and to notify the bank of the
relevant facts within a reasonable time not exceeding ninety days after
the notification from the bank was received by the sender. If the
sender fails to perform that duty, the bank is not obliged to pay
interest on any amount refundable to the sender under RCW
62A.4A-402(((4))) (d) for the period before the bank learns of the
execution error. The bank is not entitled to any recovery from the
sender on account of a failure by the sender to perform the duty stated
in this section.

Sec. 21 RCW 62A.4A-305 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-305 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) If a funds transfer is completed but execution of a
payment order by the receiving bank in breach of RCW 62A.4A-302 results
in delay in payment to the beneficiary, the bank is obliged to pay
interest to either the originator or the beneficiary of the funds
transfer for the period of delay caused by the improper execution.
Except as provided in subsection (((3))) (c) of this section,
additional damages are not recoverable.
(((2))) (b) If execution of a payment order by a receiving bank in
breach of RCW 62A.4A-302 results in (((a))) (i) noncompletion of the
funds transfer, (((b))) (ii) failure to use an intermediary bank
designated by the originator, or (((c))) (iii) issuance of a payment
order that does not comply with the terms of the payment order of the
originator, the bank is liable to the originator for its expenses in
the funds transfer and for incidental expenses and interest losses, to
the extent not covered by subsection (((1))) (a) of this section,
resulting from the improper execution. Except as provided in
subsection (((3))) (c) of this section, additional damages are not
recoverable.
(((3))) (c) In addition to the amounts payable under subsections
(((1) and (2))) (a) and (b) of this section, damages, including
consequential damages, are recoverable to the extent provided in an
express written agreement of the receiving bank.
(((4))) (d) If a receiving bank fails to execute a payment order it
was obliged by express agreement to execute, the receiving bank is
liable to the sender for its expenses in the transaction and for
incidental expenses and interest losses resulting from the failure to
execute. Additional damages, including consequential damages, are
recoverable to the extent provided in an express written agreement of
the receiving bank, but are not otherwise recoverable.
(((5))) (e) Reasonable attorneys' fees are recoverable if demand
for compensation under subsection (((1) or (2))) (a) or (b) of this
section is made and refused before an action is brought on the claim.
If a claim is made for breach of an agreement under subsection (((4)))
(d) of this section and the agreement does not provide for damages,
reasonable attorneys' fees are recoverable if demand for compensation
under subsection (((4))) (d) of this section is made and refused before
an action is brought on the claim.
(((6))) (f) Except as stated in this section, the liability of a
receiving bank under subsections (((1) and (2))) (a) and (b) of this
section may not be varied by agreement.

Sec. 22 RCW 62A.4A-402 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-402 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) This section is subject to RCW 62A.4A-205 and
62A.4A-207.
(((2))) (b) With respect to a payment order issued to the
beneficiary's bank, acceptance of the order by the bank obliges the
sender to pay the bank the amount of the order, but payment is not due
until the payment date of the order.
(((3))) (c) This subsection is subject to subsection (((5))) (e) of
this section and to RCW 62A.4A-303. With respect to a payment order
issued to a receiving bank other than the beneficiary's bank,
acceptance of the order by the receiving bank obliges the sender to pay
the bank the amount of the sender's order. Payment by the sender is
not due until the execution date of the sender's order. The obligation
of that sender to pay its payment order is excused if the funds
transfer is not completed by acceptance by the beneficiary's bank of a
payment order instructing payment to the beneficiary of that sender's
payment order.
(((4))) (d) If the sender of a payment order pays the order and was
not obliged to pay all or part of the amount paid, the bank receiving
payment is obliged to refund payment to the extent the sender was not
obliged to pay. Except as provided in RCW 62A.4A-204 and 62A.4A-304,
interest is payable on the refundable amount from the date of payment.
(((5))) (e) If a funds transfer is not completed as stated in
((this subsection)) (c) of this section and an intermediary bank is
obliged to refund payment as stated in subsection (((4))) (d) of this
section but is unable to do so because not permitted by applicable law
or because the bank suspends payments, a sender in the funds transfer
that executed a payment order in compliance with an instruction, as
stated in RCW 62A.4A-302(((1)(a))) (a)(1), to route the funds transfer
through that intermediary bank is entitled to receive or retain payment
from the sender of the payment order that it accepted. The first
sender in the funds transfer that issued an instruction requiring
routing through that intermediary bank is subrogated to the right of
the bank that paid the intermediary bank to refund as stated in
subsection (((4))) (d) of this section.
(((6))) (f) The right of the sender of a payment order to be
excused from the obligation to pay the order as stated in subsection
(((3))) (c) of this section or to receive refund under subsection
(((4))) (d) of this section may not be varied by agreement.

Sec. 23 RCW 62A.4A-403 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-403 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) Payment of the sender's obligation under RCW 62A.4A-402
to pay the receiving bank occurs as follows:
(((a))) (1) If the sender is a bank, payment occurs when the
receiving bank receives final settlement of the obligation through a
federal reserve bank or through a funds-transfer system.
(((b))) (2) If the sender is a bank and the sender (i) credited an
account of the receiving bank with the sender, or (ii) caused an
account of the receiving bank in another bank to be credited, payment
occurs when the credit is withdrawn or, if not withdrawn, at midnight
of the day on which the credit is withdrawable and the receiving bank
learns of that fact.
(((c))) (3) If the receiving bank debits an account of the sender
with the receiving bank, payment occurs when the debit is made to the
extent the debit is covered by a withdrawable credit balance in the
account.
(((2))) (b) If the sender and receiving bank are members of a
funds-transfer system that nets obligations multilaterally among
participants, the receiving bank receives final settlement when
settlement is complete in accordance with the rules of the system. The
obligation of the sender to pay the amount of a payment order
transmitted through the funds-transfer system may be satisfied, to the
extent permitted by the rules of the system, by setting off and
applying against the sender's obligation the right of the sender to
receive payment from the receiving bank of the amount of any other
payment order transmitted to the sender by the receiving bank through
the funds-transfer system. The aggregate balance of obligations owed
by each sender to each receiving bank in the funds-transfer system may
be satisfied, to the extent permitted by the rules of the system, by
setting off and applying against that balance the aggregate balance of
obligations owed to the sender by other members of the system. The
aggregate balance is determined after the right of setoff stated in the
second sentence of this subsection has been exercised.
(((3))) (c) If two banks transmit payment orders to each other
under an agreement that settlement of the obligations of each bank to
the other under RCW 62A.4A-402 will be made at the end of the day or
other period, the total amount owed with respect to all orders
transmitted by one bank shall be set off against the total amount owed
with respect to all orders transmitted by the other bank. To the
extent of the setoff, each bank has made payment to the other.
(((4))) (d) In a case not covered by subsection (((1))) (a) of this
section, the time when payment of the sender's obligation under RCW
62A.4A-402 (((2) or (3))) (b) or (c) occurs is governed by applicable
principles of law that determine when an obligation is satisfied.

Sec. 24 RCW 62A.4A-404 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-404 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) Subject to RCW 62A.4A-211(((5))) (e), 62A.4A-405(((4)))
(d), and 62A.4A-405(((5))) (e), if a beneficiary's bank accepts a
payment order, the bank is obliged to pay the amount of the order to
the beneficiary of the order. Payment is due on the payment date of
the order, but if acceptance occurs on the payment date after the close
of the funds-transfer business day of the bank, payment is due on the
next funds-transfer business day. If the bank refuses to pay after
demand by the beneficiary and receipt of notice of particular
circumstances that will give rise to consequential damages as a result
of nonpayment, the beneficiary may recover damages resulting from the
refusal to pay to the extent the bank had notice of the damages, unless
the bank proves that it did not pay because of a reasonable doubt
concerning the right of the beneficiary to payment.
(((2))) (b) If a payment order accepted by the beneficiary's bank
instructs payment to an account of the beneficiary, the bank is obliged
to notify the beneficiary of receipt of the order before midnight of
the next funds-transfer business day following the payment date. If
the payment order does not instruct payment to an account of the
beneficiary, the bank is required to notify the beneficiary only if
notice is required by the order. Notice may be given by first-class
mail or any other means reasonable in the circumstances. If the bank
fails to give the required notice, the bank is obliged to pay interest
to the beneficiary on the amount of the payment order from the day
notice should have been given until the day the beneficiary learned of
receipt of the payment order by the bank. No other damages are
recoverable. Reasonable attorneys' fees are also recoverable if demand
for interest is made and refused before an action is brought on the
claim.
(((3))) (c) The right of a beneficiary to receive payment and
damages as stated in subsection (a) (([subsection (1) of this
section])) of this section may not be varied by agreement or a funds-transfer system rule. The right of a beneficiary to be notified as
stated in subsection (((2))) (b) of this section may be varied by
agreement of the beneficiary or by a funds-transfer system rule if the
beneficiary is notified of the rule before initiation of the funds
transfer.

Sec. 25 RCW 62A.4A-405 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-405 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) If the beneficiary's bank credits an account of the
beneficiary of a payment order, payment of the bank's obligation under
RCW 62A.4A-404(((1))) (a) occurs when and to the extent (((a))) (i) the
beneficiary is notified of the right to withdraw the credit, (((b)))
(ii) the bank lawfully applies the credit to a debt of the beneficiary,
or (((c))) (iii) funds with respect to the order are otherwise made
available to the beneficiary by the bank.
(((2))) (b) If the beneficiary's bank does not credit an account of
the beneficiary of a payment order, the time when payment of the bank's
obligation under RCW 62A.4A-404(((1))) (a) occurs is governed by
principles of law that determine when an obligation is satisfied.
(((3))) (c) Except as stated in subsections (((4) and (5))) (d) and
(e) of this ((act [section])) section, if the beneficiary's bank pays
the beneficiary of a payment order under a condition to payment or
agreement of the beneficiary giving the bank the right to recover
payment from the beneficiary if the bank does not receive payment of
the order, the condition to payment or agreement is not enforceable.
(((4))) (d) A funds-transfer system rule may provide that payments
made to beneficiaries of funds transfers made through the system are
provisional until receipt of payment by the beneficiary's bank of the
payment order it accepted. A beneficiary's bank that makes a payment
that is provisional under the rule is entitled to refund from the
beneficiary if (((a))) (i) the rule requires that both the beneficiary
and the originator be given notice of the provisional nature of the
payment before the funds transfer is initiated, (((b))) (ii) the
beneficiary, the beneficiary's bank and the originator's bank agreed to
be bound by the rule, and (((c))) (iii) the beneficiary's bank did not
receive payment of the payment order that it accepted. If the
beneficiary is obliged to refund payment to the beneficiary's bank,
acceptance of the payment order by the beneficiary's bank is nullified
and no payment by the originator of the funds transfer to the
beneficiary occurs under RCW 62A.4A-406.
(((5))) (e) This subsection applies to a funds transfer that
includes a payment order transmitted over a funds-transfer system that
(((a))) (i) nets obligations multilaterally among participants, and
(((b))) (ii) has in effect a loss-sharing agreement among participants
for the purpose of providing funds necessary to complete settlement of
the obligations of one or more participants that do not meet their
settlement obligations. If the beneficiary's bank in the funds
transfer accepts a payment order and the system fails to complete
settlement pursuant to its rules with respect to any payment order in
the funds transfer, (i) the acceptance by the beneficiary's bank is
nullified and no person has any right or obligation based on the
acceptance, (ii) the beneficiary's bank is entitled to recover payment
from the beneficiary, (iii) no payment by the originator to the
beneficiary occurs under RCW 62A.4A-406, and (iv) subject to RCW
62A.4A-402(((5))) (e), ((each sender in the funds transfer is excused
from its obligation to pay its payment order under RCW 62A.4A-402(5),))
each sender in the funds transfer is excused from its obligation to pay
its payment order under RCW 62A.4A-402(((3))) (c) because the funds
transfer has not been completed.

Sec. 26 RCW 62A.4A-406 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-406 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) Subject to RCW 62A.4A-211(((5))) (e), 62A.4A-405(((4)))
(d), and 62A.4A-405(((5))) (e), the originator of a funds transfer pays
the beneficiary of the originator's payment order (((a))) (i) at the
time a payment order for the benefit of the beneficiary is accepted by
the beneficiary's bank in the funds transfer and (((b))) (ii) in an
amount equal to the amount of the order accepted by the beneficiary's
bank, but not more than the amount of the originator's order.
(((2))) (b) If payment under subsection (((1))) (a) of this section
is made to satisfy an obligation, the obligation is discharged to the
same extent discharge would result from payment to the beneficiary of
the same amount in money, unless (((a))) (i) the payment under
subsection (((1))) (a) of this section was made by a means prohibited
by the contract of the beneficiary with respect to the obligation,
(((b))) (ii) the beneficiary, within a reasonable time after receiving
notice of receipt of the order by the beneficiary's bank, notified the
originator of the beneficiary's refusal of the payment, (((c))) (iii)
funds with respect to the order were not withdrawn by the beneficiary
or applied to a debt of the beneficiary, and (((d))) (iv) the
beneficiary would suffer a loss that could reasonably have been avoided
if payment had been made by a means complying with the contract. If
payment by the originator does not result in discharge under this
section, the originator is subrogated to the rights of the beneficiary
to receive payment from the beneficiary's bank under RCW
62A.4A-404(((1))) (a).
(((3))) (c) For the purpose of determining whether discharge of an
obligation occurs under subsection (((2))) (b) of this section, if the
beneficiary's bank accepts a payment order in an amount equal to the
amount of the originator's payment order less charges of one or more
receiving banks in the funds transfer, payment to the beneficiary is
deemed to be in the amount of the originator's order unless upon demand
by the beneficiary the originator does not pay the beneficiary the
amount of the deducted charges.
(((4))) (d) Rights of the originator or of the beneficiary of a
funds transfer under this section may be varied only by agreement of
the originator and the beneficiary.

Sec. 27 RCW 62A.4A-501 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-501 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Article, the
rights and obligations of a party to a funds transfer may be varied by
agreement of the affected party.
(((2))) (b) "Funds-transfer system rule" means a rule of an
association of banks (((a))) (i) governing transmission of payment
orders by means of a funds-transfer system of the association or rights
and obligations with respect to those orders, or (((b))) (ii) to the
extent the rule governs rights and obligations between banks that are
parties to a funds transfer in which a federal reserve bank, acting as
an intermediary bank, sends a payment order to the beneficiary's bank.
Except as otherwise provided in this Article, a funds-transfer system
rule governing rights and obligations between participating banks using
the system may be effective even if the rule conflicts with ((the))
this Article and indirectly affects another party to the funds transfer
who does not consent to the rule. A funds-transfer system rule may
also govern rights and obligations of parties other than participating
banks using the system to the extent stated in RCW 62A.4A-404(((3)))
(c), 62A.4A-405(((4))) (d), and 62A.4A-507(((3))) (c).

Sec. 28 RCW 62A.4A-502 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-502 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) As used in this section, "creditor process" means levy,
attachment, garnishment, notice of lien, sequestration, or similar
process issued by or on behalf of a creditor or other claimant with
respect to an account.
(((2))) (b) This subsection applies to creditor process with
respect to an authorized account of the sender of a payment order if
the creditor process is served on the receiving bank. For the purpose
of determining rights with respect to the creditor process, if the
receiving bank accepts the payment order the balance in the authorized
account is deemed to be reduced by the amount of the payment order to
the extent the bank did not otherwise receive payment of the order,
unless the creditor process is served at ((the)) a time and in a manner
affording the bank a reasonable opportunity to act on it before the
bank accepts the payment order.
(((3))) (c) If a beneficiary's bank has received a payment order
for payment to the beneficiary's account in the bank, the following
rules apply:
(((a))) (1) The bank may credit the beneficiary's account. The
amount credited may be set off against an obligation owed by the
beneficiary to the bank or may be applied to satisfy creditor process
served on the bank with respect to the account.
(((b))) (2) The bank may credit the beneficiary's account and allow
withdrawal of the amount credited unless creditor process with respect
to the account is served at ((the)) a time and in a manner affording
the bank a reasonable opportunity to act to prevent withdrawal.
(((c))) (3) If creditor process with respect to the beneficiary's
account has been served and the bank has had a reasonable opportunity
to act on it, the bank may not reject the payment order except for a
reason unrelated to the service of process.
(((4))) (d) Creditor process with respect to a payment by the
originator to the beneficiary pursuant to a funds transfer may be
served only on the beneficiary's bank with respect to the debt owed by
that bank to the beneficiary. Any other bank served with the creditor
process is not obliged to act with respect to the process.

Sec. 29 RCW 62A.4A-503 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-503 are each
amended to read as follows:
For proper cause and in compliance with applicable law, a court may
restrain (((1))) (i) a person from issuing a payment order to initiate
a funds transfer, (((2))) (ii) an originator's bank from executing the
payment order of the originator, or (((3))) (iii) the beneficiary's
bank from releasing funds to the beneficiary or the beneficiary from
withdrawing the funds. A court may not otherwise restrain a person
from issuing a payment order, paying or receiving payment of a payment
order, or otherwise acting with respect to a funds transfer.

Sec. 30 RCW 62A.4A-504 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-504 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) If a receiving bank has received more than one payment
order of the sender or one or more payment orders and other items that
are payable from the sender's account, the bank may charge the sender's
account with respect to the various orders and items in any sequence.
(((2))) (b) In determining whether a credit to an account has been
withdrawn by the holder of the account or applied to a debt of the
holder of the account, credits first made to the account are first
withdrawn or applied.

Sec. 31 RCW 62A.4A-506 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-506 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) If, under this Article, a receiving bank is obliged to
pay interest with respect to a payment order issued to the bank, the
amount payable may be determined (((a))) (i) by agreement of the sender
and receiving bank, or (((b))) (ii) by a funds-transfer system rule if
the payment order is transmitted through a funds-transfer system.
(((2))) (b) If the amount of interest is not determined by an
agreement or rule as stated in subsection (((1))) (a) of this section,
the amount is calculated by multiplying the applicable federal funds
rate by the amount on which interest is payable, and then multiplying
the product by the number of days for which interest is payable. The
applicable federal funds rate is the average of the federal funds rates
published by the federal reserve bank of New York for each of the days
for which interest is payable divided by three hundred sixty. The
federal funds rate for any day on which a published rate is not
available is the same as the published rate for the next preceding day
for which there is a published rate. If a receiving bank that accepted
a payment order is required to refund payment to the sender of the
order because the funds transfer was not completed, but the failure to
complete was not due to any fault by the bank, the interest payable is
reduced by a percentage equal to the reserve requirement on deposits of
the receiving bank.

Sec. 32 RCW 62A.4A-507 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-507 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) (a) The following rules apply unless the affected parties
otherwise agree or subsection (((3))) (c) of this section applies((;)):
(((a))) (1) The rights and obligations between the sender of a
payment order and the receiving bank are governed by the law of the
jurisdiction in which the receiving bank is located.
(((b))) (2) The rights and obligations between the beneficiary's
bank and the beneficiary are governed by the law of the jurisdiction in
which the beneficiary's bank is located.
(((c))) (3) The issue of when payment is made pursuant to a funds
transfer by the originator to the beneficiary is governed by the law of
the jurisdiction in which the beneficiary's bank is located.
(((2))) (b) If the parties described in each paragraph of
subsection (((1))) (a) of this section have made an agreement selecting
the law of a particular jurisdiction to govern rights and obligations
between each other, the law of that jurisdiction governs those rights
and obligations, whether or not the payment order or the funds transfer
bears a reasonable relation to that jurisdiction.
(((3))) (c) A funds-transfer system rule may select the law of a
particular jurisdiction to govern (((a))) (i) rights and obligations
between participating banks with respect to payment orders transmitted
or processed through the system, or (((b))) (ii) the rights and
obligations of some or all parties to a funds transfer any part of
which is carried out by means of the system. A choice of law made
pursuant to (((a))) clause (i) of this subsection is binding on
participating banks. A choice of law made pursuant to (((b))) clause
(ii) of this subsection is binding on the originator, other sender, or
a receiving bank having notice that the funds-transfer system might be
used in the funds transfer and of the choice of law by the system when
the originator, other sender, or receiving bank issued or accepted a
payment order. The beneficiary of a funds transfer is bound by the
choice of law if, when the funds transfer is initiated, the beneficiary
has notice that the funds-transfer system might be used in the funds
transfer and of the choice of law by the system. The law of a
jurisdiction selected pursuant to this subsection may govern, whether
or not that law bears a reasonable relation to the matter in issue.
(((4))) (d) In the event of inconsistency between an agreement
under subsection (((2))) (b) of this section and a choice-of-law rule
under subsection (((3))) (c) of this section, the agreement under
subsection (((2))) (b) of this section prevails.
(((5))) (e) If a funds transfer is made by use of more than one
funds-transfer system and there is inconsistency between choice-of-law
rules of the systems, the matter in issue is governed by the law of the
selected jurisdiction that has the most significant relationship to the
matter in issue.

Sec. 33 RCW 62A.9A-502 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-502 are each amended
to read as follows:
(a) Sufficiency of financing statement. Subject to subsection (b)
of this section, a financing statement is sufficient only if it:
(1) Provides the name of the debtor;
(2) Provides the name of the secured party or a representative of
the secured party; and
(3) Indicates the collateral covered by the financing statement.
(b) Real-property-related financing statements. Except as
otherwise provided in RCW 62A.9A-501(b), to be sufficient, a financing
statement that covers as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut, or
which is filed as a fixture filing and covers goods that are or are to
become fixtures, must satisfy subsection (a) of this section and also:
(1) Indicate that it covers this type of collateral;
(2) Indicate that it is to be filed for record in the real property
records;
(3) Provide a description of the real property to which the
collateral is related sufficient to give constructive notice of a
mortgage under the law of this state if the description were contained
in a record of the mortgage of the real property; and
(4) If the debtor does not have an interest of record in the real
property, provide the name of a record owner.
(c) Record of mortgage as financing statement. A record of a
mortgage is effective, from the date of recording, as a financing
statement filed as a fixture filing or as a financing statement
covering as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut only if:
(1) The record indicates the goods or accounts that it covers;
(2) The goods are or are to become fixtures related to the real
property described in the record or the collateral is related to the
real property described in the record and is as-extracted collateral or
timber to be cut;
(3) The record satisfies the requirements for a financing statement
in this section ((other than an indication)), but:
(A) The record need not indicate that it is to be filed in the real
property records; and
(B) The record sufficiently provides the name of a debtor who is an
individual if it provides the individual name of the debtor or the
surname and first personal name of the debtor, even if the debtor is an
individual to whom RCW 62A.9A-503(a)(4) applies; and
(4) The record is recorded.
(d) Filing before security agreement or attachment. A financing
statement may be filed before a security agreement is made or a
security interest otherwise attaches.

Sec. 34 RCW 62A.9A-503 and 2011 c 74 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(a) Sufficiency of debtor's name. A financing statement
sufficiently provides the name of the debtor:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in (3) of this subsection (a), if
the debtor is a registered organization or the collateral is held in a
trust that is a registered organization, only if the financing
statement provides the name that is stated to be the registered
organization's name on the public organic record most recently filed
with or issued or enacted by the registered organization's jurisdiction
of organization which purports to state, amend, or restate the
registered organization's name;
(2) Subject to subsection (f) of this section, if the collateral is
being administered by the personal representative of a decedent, only
if the financing statement provides, as the name of the debtor, the
name of the decedent and, in a separate part of the financing
statement, indicates that the collateral is being administered by a
personal representative;
(3) If the collateral is held in a trust that is not a registered
organization, only if the financing statement:
(A) Provides, as the name of the debtor:
(i) If the organic record of the trust specifies a name for the
trust, the name specified; or
(ii) If the organic record of the trust does not specify a name for
the trust, the name of the settlor or testator; and
(B) In a separate part of the financing statement:
(i) If the name is provided in accordance with (3)(A)(i) of this
subsection, indicates that the collateral is held in a trust; or
(ii) If the name is provided in accordance with (3)(A)(ii) of this
subsection, provides additional information sufficient to distinguish
the trust from other trusts having one or more of the same settlors or
the same testator and indicates that the collateral is held in a trust,
unless the additional information so indicates;
(4) Subject to subsection (g) of this section, if the debtor is an
individual to whom this state has issued a driver's license or
identification card that has not expired, only if the financing
statement((:
(A) Provides the individual name of the debtor;
(B) Provides the surname and first personal name of the debtor; or
(C) Subject to subsection (g) of this section,)) provides the name
of the individual which is indicated on ((a)) the driver's license or
identification card ((that this state has issued to the individual and
which has not expired));
(5) If the debtor is an individual to whom (4) of this subsection
(a) does not apply, only if the financing statement provides the
individual name of the debtor or the surname and first personal name of
the debtor; and
(((5))) (6) In other cases:
(A) If the debtor has a name, only if the financing statement
provides the organizational name of the debtor; and
(B) If the debtor does not have a name, only if the financing
statement provides the names of the partners, members, associates, or
other persons comprising the debtor, in a manner that each name
provided would be sufficient if the person named were the debtor.
(b) Additional debtor-related information. A financing statement
that provides the name of the debtor in accordance with subsection (a)
of this section is not rendered ineffective by the absence of:
(1) A trade name or other name of the debtor; or
(2) Unless required under subsection (((a)(5)(B))) (a)(6)(B) of
this section, names of partners, members, associates, or other persons
comprising the debtor.
(c) Debtor's trade name insufficient. A financing statement that
provides only the debtor's trade name does not sufficiently provide the
name of the debtor.
(d) Representative capacity. Failure to indicate the
representative capacity of a secured party or representative of a
secured party does not affect the sufficiency of a financing statement.
(e) Multiple debtors and secured parties. A financing statement
may provide the name of more than one debtor and the name of more than
one secured party.
(f) Name of decedent. The name of the decedent indicated on the
order appointing the personal representative of the decedent issued by
the court having jurisdiction over the collateral is sufficient as the
"name of the decedent" under subsection (a)(2) of this section.
(g) Multiple driver's licenses. If this state has issued to an
individual more than one driver's license or identification card of a
kind described in subsection (a)(4) of this section, the one that was
issued most recently is the one to which subsection (a)(4) of this
section refers.
(h) Definition. In this section, the "name of the settlor or
testator" means:
(1) If the settlor is a registered organization, the name that is
stated to be the settlor's name on the public organic record most
recently filed with or issued or enacted by the settlor's jurisdiction
of organization which purports to state, amend, or restate the
settlor's name; or
(2) In other cases, the name of the settlor or testator indicated
in the trust's organic record.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 Section captions as used in this act are
law.

--- END ---