BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be known and
cited as the "uniform collaborative law act."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:
(1) "Collaborative law communication" means a statement, whether
oral or in a record, or verbal or nonverbal, that:
(a) Is made to conduct, participate in, continue, or reconvene a
collaborative law process; and
(b) Occurs after the parties sign a collaborative law participation
agreement and before the collaborative law process is concluded.
(2) "Collaborative law participation agreement" means an agreement
by persons to participate in a collaborative law process.
(3) "Collaborative law process" means a procedure intended to
resolve a collaborative matter without intervention by a tribunal in
which persons:
(a) Sign a collaborative law participation agreement; and
(b) Are represented by collaborative lawyers.
(4) "Collaborative lawyer" means a lawyer who represents a party in
a collaborative law process.
(5) "Collaborative matter" means a dispute, transaction, claim,
problem, or issue for resolution, including a dispute, claim, or issue
in a proceeding, which is described in a collaborative law
participation agreement.
(6) "Law firm" means:
(a) Lawyers who practice law together in a partnership,
professional corporation, sole proprietorship, limited liability
company, or association; and
(b) Lawyers employed in a legal services organization, or the legal
department of a corporation or other organization, or the legal
department of a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality.
(7) "Nonparty participant" means a person, other than a party and
the party's collaborative lawyer, that participates in a collaborative
law process.
(8) "Party" means a person that signs a collaborative law
participation agreement and whose consent is necessary to resolve a
collaborative matter.
(9) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or
commercial entity.
(10) "Proceeding" means:
(a) A judicial, administrative, arbitral, or other adjudicative
process before a tribunal, including related prehearing and posthearing
motions, conferences, and discovery; or
(b) a legislative hearing or similar process.
(11) "Prospective party" means a person that discusses with a
prospective collaborative lawyer the possibility of signing a
collaborative law participation agreement.
(12) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible
medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is
retrievable in perceivable form.
(13) "Related to a collaborative matter" means involving the same
parties, transaction or occurrence, nucleus of operative fact, dispute,
claim, or issue as the collaborative matter.
(14) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a
record:
(a) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
(b) To attach to or logically associate with the record an
electronic symbol, sound, or process.
(15) "Tribunal" means:
(a) A court, arbitrator, administrative agency, or other body
acting in an adjudicative capacity which, after presentation of
evidence or legal argument, has jurisdiction to render a decision
affecting a party's interests in a matter; or
(b) A legislative body conducting a hearing or similar process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 APPLICABILITY. (1) This chapter applies to
a collaborative law participation agreement that meets the requirements
of section 4 of this act signed on or after the effective date of this
section.
(2) The use of collaborative law applies only to matters that would
be resolved in civil court and may not be used to resolve matters in
criminal cases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 COLLABORATIVE LAW PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT;
REQUIREMENTS. (1) A collaborative law participation agreement must:
(a) Be in a record;
(b) Be signed by the parties;
(c) State the parties' intention to resolve a collaborative matter
through a collaborative law process under this chapter;
(d) Describe the nature and scope of the matter;
(e) Identify the collaborative lawyer who represents each party in
the process; and
(f) Contain a statement by each collaborative lawyer confirming the
lawyer's representation of a party in the collaborative law process.
(2) Parties may agree to include in a collaborative law
participation agreement additional provisions not inconsistent with
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 BEGINNING AND CONCLUDING COLLABORATIVE LAW
PROCESS. (1) A collaborative law process begins when the parties sign
a collaborative law participation agreement.
(2) A tribunal may not order a party to participate in a
collaborative law process over that party's objection.
(3) A collaborative law process is concluded by a:
(a) Resolution of a collaborative matter as evidenced by a signed
record;
(b) Resolution of a part of the collaborative matter, evidenced by
a signed record, in which the parties agree that the remaining parts of
the matter will not be resolved in the process; or
(c) Termination of the process.
(4) A collaborative law process terminates:
(a) When a party gives notice to other parties in a record that the
process is ended; or
(b) When a party:
(i) Begins a proceeding related to a collaborative matter without
the agreement of all parties; or
(ii) In a pending proceeding related to the matter:
(A) Initiates a pleading, motion, order to show cause, or request
for a conference with the tribunal without the agreement of all parties
as to the relief sought;
(B) Requests that the proceeding be put on the tribunal's active
calendar; or
(C) Takes similar contested action requiring notice to be sent to
the parties; or
(c) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (7) of this section,
when a party discharges a collaborative lawyer or a collaborative
lawyer withdraws from further representation of a party.
(5) A party's collaborative lawyer shall give prompt notice to all
other parties in a record of a discharge or withdrawal.
(6) A party may terminate a collaborative law process with or
without cause.
(7) Notwithstanding the discharge or withdrawal of a collaborative
lawyer, a collaborative law process continues, if not later than thirty
days after the date that the notice of the discharge or withdrawal of
a collaborative lawyer required by subsection (5) of this section is
sent to the parties:
(a) The unrepresented party engages a successor collaborative
lawyer; and
(b) In a signed record:
(i) The parties consent to continue the process by reaffirming the
collaborative law participation agreement;
(ii) The agreement is amended to identify the successor
collaborative lawyer; and
(iii) The successor collaborative lawyer confirms the lawyer's
representation of a party in the collaborative law process.
(8) A collaborative law process does not conclude if, with the
consent of the parties, a party requests a tribunal to approve a
resolution of the collaborative matter or any part thereof as evidenced
by a signed record.
(9) A collaborative law participation agreement may provide
additional methods of concluding a collaborative law process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 PROCEEDINGS PENDING BEFORE TRIBUNAL; STATUS
REPORT. (1) Persons in a proceeding pending before a tribunal may sign
a collaborative law participation agreement to seek to resolve a
collaborative matter related to the proceeding. Parties shall file
promptly with the tribunal a notice of the agreement after it is
signed. Subject to subsection (3) of this section and sections 7 and
8 of this act, the filing operates as an application for a stay of the
proceeding.
(2) The parties shall file promptly with the tribunal notice in a
record when a collaborative law process concludes. The stay of the
proceeding under subsection (1) of this section is lifted when the
notice is filed. The notice may not specify any reason for termination
of the process.
(3) A tribunal in which a proceeding is stayed under subsection (1)
of this section may require the parties and collaborative lawyers to
provide a status report on the collaborative law process and the
proceeding. A status report may include only information on whether
the process is ongoing or concluded. It may not include a report,
assessment, evaluation, recommendation, finding, or other communication
regarding a collaborative law process or collaborative matter.
(4) A tribunal may not consider a communication made in violation
of subsection (3) of this section.
(5) A tribunal shall provide parties notice and an opportunity to
be heard before dismissing a proceeding in which a notice of
collaborative law process is filed based on delay or failure to
prosecute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 EMERGENCY ORDER. During a collaborative law
process, a tribunal may issue emergency orders to protect the health,
safety, welfare, or interest of a party or a family or household
member, as defined in RCW 26.50.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 APPROVAL OF AGREEMENT BY TRIBUNAL. A
tribunal may approve an agreement resulting from a collaborative law
process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 DISQUALIFICATION OF COLLABORATIVE LAWYER AND
LAWYERS IN ASSOCIATED LAW FIRM. (1) Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (3) of this section, a collaborative lawyer is disqualified
from appearing before a tribunal to represent a party in a proceeding
related to the collaborative matter.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section
and section 10 of this act, a lawyer in a law firm with which the
collaborative lawyer is associated is disqualified from appearing
before a tribunal to represent a party in a proceeding related to the
collaborative matter if the collaborative lawyer is disqualified from
doing so under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) A collaborative lawyer or a lawyer in a law firm with which the
collaborative lawyer is associated may represent a party:
(a) To ask a tribunal to approve an agreement resulting from the
collaborative law process; or
(b) To seek or defend an emergency order to protect the health,
safety, welfare, or interest of a party, or family or household member,
as defined in RCW 26.50.010, if a successor lawyer is not immediately
available to represent that person.
(4) If subsection (3)(b) of this section applies, a collaborative
lawyer, or lawyer in a law firm with which the collaborative lawyer is
associated, may represent a party or family or household member only
until the person is represented by a successor lawyer or reasonable
measures are taken to protect the health, safety, welfare, or interest
of the person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY AS PARTY. (1) The
disqualification of section 9(1) of this act applies to a collaborative
lawyer representing a party that is a government or governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.
(2) After a collaborative law process concludes, another lawyer in
a law firm with which the collaborative lawyer is associated may
represent a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality in the collaborative matter or a matter related to the
collaborative matter if:
(a) The collaborative law participation agreement so provides; and
(b) The collaborative lawyer is isolated from any participation in
the collaborative matter or a matter related to the collaborative
matter through procedures within the law firm which are reasonably
calculated to isolate the collaborative lawyer from such participation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION. Except as
provided by law other than this chapter, during the collaborative law
process, on the request of another party, a party shall make timely,
full, candid, and informal disclosure of information related to the
collaborative matter without formal discovery. A party also shall
update promptly previously disclosed information that has materially
changed. The parties may define the scope of disclosure during the
collaborative law process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 STANDARDS OF PROFESSIONAL RESPONSIBILITY
AND MANDATORY REPORTING NOT AFFECTED. (1) This chapter does not affect
the professional responsibility obligations and standards applicable to
a lawyer or other licensed professional or relieve a lawyer or other
licensed professional from the duty to comply with all applicable
professional responsibility obligations and standards.
(2) This chapter does not affect the obligation of a person to
report abuse or neglect, abandonment, or exploitation of a child or
adult under the law of this state.
(3) Noncompliance with an obligation or prohibition imposed by this
chapter does not in itself establish grounds for professional
discipline.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 APPROPRIATENESS OF COLLABORATIVE LAW
PROCESS. Before a prospective party signs a collaborative law
participation agreement, the prospective party must:
(1) Be advised as to whether a collaborative law process is
appropriate for the prospective party's matter;
(2) Be provided with sufficient information to make an informed
decision about the material benefits and risks of a collaborative law
process as compared to the material benefits and risks of other
reasonably available alternatives for resolving the proposed
collaborative matter, such as litigation, mediation, arbitration, or
expert evaluation;
(3) Be informed that after signing an agreement if a party
initiates a proceeding or seeks tribunal intervention in a pending
proceeding related to the collaborative matter, the collaborative law
process terminates;
(4) Be informed that participation in a collaborative law process
is voluntary and any party has the right to terminate unilaterally a
collaborative law process with or without cause; and
(5) Be informed that the collaborative lawyer and any lawyer in a
law firm with which the collaborative lawyer is associated may not
appear before a tribunal to represent a party in a proceeding related
to the collaborative matter, except as authorized by law or court rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 COERCIVE OR VIOLENT RELATIONSHIP. (1)
Before a prospective party signs a collaborative law participation
agreement, a prospective collaborative lawyer shall make reasonable
inquiry whether the prospective party has a history of a coercive or
violent relationship with another prospective party.
(2) Throughout a collaborative law process, a collaborative lawyer
reasonably and continuously shall assess whether the party the
collaborative lawyer represents has a history of a coercive or violent
relationship with another party.
(3) If a collaborative lawyer reasonably believes that the party
the lawyer represents or the prospective party who consults the lawyer
has a history of a coercive or violent relationship with another party
or prospective party, the lawyer may not begin or continue a
collaborative law process unless:
(a) The party or the prospective party requests beginning or
continuing a process; and
(b) The collaborative lawyer reasonably believes that the safety of
the party or prospective party can be protected adequately during a
process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 CONFIDENTIALITY OF COLLABORATIVE LAW
COMMUNICATION. Subject to section 12 of this act, a collaborative law
communication is confidential to the extent agreed by the parties in a
signed record or as provided by law of this state other than this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 PRIVILEGE AGAINST DISCLOSURE FOR
COLLABORATIVE LAW COMMUNICATION; ADMISSIBILITY; DISCOVERY. (1) Subject
to sections 17 and 18 of this act, a collaborative law communication is
privileged under subsection (2) of this section, is not subject to
discovery, and is not admissible in evidence.
(2) In a proceeding, the following privileges apply:
(a) A party may refuse to disclose, and may prevent any other
person from disclosing, a collaborative law communication.
(b) A nonparty participant may refuse to disclose, and may prevent
any other person from disclosing, a collaborative law communication of
the nonparty participant.
(3) Evidence or information that is otherwise admissible or subject
to discovery does not become inadmissible or protected from discovery
solely because of its disclosure or use in a collaborative law process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 WAIVER AND PRECLUSION OF PRIVILEGE. (1) A
privilege under section 16 of this act may be waived in a record or
orally during a proceeding if it is expressly waived by all parties
and, in the case of the privilege of a nonparty participant, it is also
expressly waived by the nonparty participant.
(2) A person that makes a disclosure or representation about a
collaborative law communication which prejudices another person in a
proceeding may not assert a privilege under section 16 of this act, but
this preclusion applies only to the extent necessary for the person
prejudiced to respond to the disclosure or representation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 LIMITS OF PRIVILEGE. (1) There is no
privilege under section 16 of this act for a collaborative law
communication that is:
(a) Available to the public under chapter 42.56 RCW or made during
a session of a collaborative law process that is open, or is required
by law to be open, to the public;
(b) A threat or statement of a plan to inflict bodily injury or
commit a crime of violence;
(c) Intentionally used to plan a crime, commit or attempt to commit
a crime, or conceal an ongoing crime or ongoing criminal activity; or
(d) In an agreement resulting from the collaborative law process,
evidenced by a record signed by all parties to the agreement.
(2) The privileges under section 16 of this act for a collaborative
law communication do not apply to the extent that a communication is:
(a) Sought or offered to prove or disprove a claim or complaint of
professional misconduct or malpractice arising from or related to a
collaborative law process;
(b) Sought or offered to prove or disprove abuse, neglect,
abandonment, or exploitation of a child or adult, unless the child
protective services agency or adult protective services agency is a
party to or otherwise participates in the process; or
(c) Sought or offered to prove or disprove stalking or cyber
stalking of a party or child.
(3) There is no privilege under section 16 of this act if a
tribunal finds, after a hearing in camera, that the party seeking
discovery or the proponent of the evidence has shown the evidence is
not otherwise available, the need for the evidence substantially
outweighs the interest in protecting confidentiality, and the
collaborative law communication is sought or offered in:
(a) A court proceeding involving a felony or misdemeanor; or
(b) A proceeding seeking rescission or reformation of a contract
arising out of the collaborative law process or in which a defense to
avoid liability on the contract is asserted.
(4) If a collaborative law communication is subject to an exception
under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, only the part of the
communication necessary for the application of the exception may be
disclosed or admitted.
(5) Disclosure or admission of evidence excepted from the privilege
under subsection (2) or (3) of this section does not make the evidence
or any other collaborative law communication discoverable or admissible
for any other purpose.
(6) The privileges under section 16 of this act do not apply if the
parties agree in advance in a signed record, or if a record of a
proceeding reflects agreement by the parties, that all or part of a
collaborative law process is not privileged. This subsection does not
apply to a collaborative law communication made by a person that did
not receive actual notice of the agreement before the communication was
made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 AUTHORITY OF TRIBUNAL IN CASE OF
NONCOMPLIANCE. (1) If an agreement fails to meet the requirements of
section 4 of this act, or a lawyer fails to comply with section 13 or
14 of this act, a tribunal may nonetheless find that the parties
intended to enter into a collaborative law participation agreement if
they:
(a) Signed a record indicating an intention to enter into a
collaborative law participation agreement; and
(b) Reasonably believed they were participating in a collaborative
law process.
(2) If a tribunal makes the findings specified in subsection (1) of
this section, and the interests of justice require, the tribunal may:
(a) Enforce an agreement evidenced by a record resulting from the
process in which the parties participated;
(b) Apply the disqualification provisions of sections 5, 6, 9, and
10 of this act; and
(c) Apply a privilege under section 16 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 UNIFORMITY OF APPLICATION AND CONSTRUCTION.
In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be
given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its
subject matter among states that enact it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 RELATION TO ELECTRONIC SIGNATURES IN GLOBAL
AND NATIONAL COMMERCE ACT. This chapter modifies, limits, and
supersedes the federal electronic signatures in global and national
commerce act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001, et seq., but does not modify, limit,
or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c), or
authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in
section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 Sections 1 through 22 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

--- END ---