BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 7.36 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding RCW 36.18.040, the sheriff may waive fees
associated with service of a writ of habeas corpus that was issued for
the return of a child when the person who was granted the writ is, by
reason of poverty, unable to pay the cost of service.

--- END ---