BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All state agencies and institutions shall assign all debts over
ninety days past due to a collection agency licensed under chapter
19.16 RCW.
(2) State agencies and institutions contracting for debt collection
services under this section must give preference to businesses that
have hired state employees displaced by this section. The department
of general administration shall develop a process to certify which
businesses meet this requirement.
(3) Any state employee whose position is displaced as a result of
this section shall be eligible for placement on the statewide layoff
list for employment by other state agencies. A state employee whose
position is displaced as a result of this section and who is not
offered employment with the state within ninety days of termination
shall receive a severance payment equal to six months of the employee's
regular rate of pay at the time of termination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A member whose position was displaced as a result of section 1
of this act after having first earned fifteen years of service credit
while working for the state and who is eligible to retire under RCW
41.40.180, 41.40.630, or 41.40.820 may, at the time of filing a written
application for retirement with the department, apply to the department
for up to five years of additional service credit, subject to the
restrictions in this section.
(2) A member qualifying for service credit under subsection (1) of
this section shall receive additional service credit in the amount of
five years, to be reduced by one service credit month for every month
of employment that the member works for an employer during the five-year period immediately following the displacement of the member's job
as a result of section 1 of this act. The additional service credit
granted to a member under this section shall be provided at no cost to
the member.
(3) Under no circumstances may a member receive more than five
years of additional service credit as a result of credit granted under
this section and the provisions of RCW 41.40.034. Additional service
credit received under this section is not membership service and shall
be used exclusively to increase the value of the member's retirement
allowance.

--- END ---