BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) If it appears that a person required to register as a sex
offender under RCW 9A.44.130 may be seeking residence within an adult
family home upon release from total confinement, the agency with
jurisdiction over the person must notify the department of social and
health services' aging and disability services administration three
months before the anticipated release from total confinement.
(b) The agency must inform the department of social and health
services' aging and disability services administration of the person's
name, identifying factors, anticipated future residence, and offense
history.
(2) The department of social and health services' aging and
disability services administration must relay the information provided
to it to all providers licensed to operate an adult family home and if
a person required to register as a sex offender is admitted to an adult
family home, require the adult family home provider to notify every
resident, residents' representative, and, when possible, an interested
family member for each resident of the information described in
subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(3) The agency with jurisdiction, its employees, and officials, and
the department of social and health services, its employees, and
officials are immune from liability for any good-faith conduct under
this section, including the release of information.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "agency with jurisdiction"
means an agency with the authority to direct the release of a person
serving a sentence of a term of confinement and includes the department
of corrections, the indeterminate sentence review board, eastern and
western state hospitals, and the department of social and health
services.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.843 and 1990 c 3 s 123 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department, its employees, and officials, shall be immune from
liability for release of information regarding sex offenders that
complies with RCW 4.24.550 or section 1(1) of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.128.230 and 2012 c 164 s 705 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Caregiver" includes all adult family home resident managers
and any person who provides residents with hands-on personal care on
behalf of an adult family home, except volunteers who are directly
supervised.
(b) "Indirect supervision" means oversight by a person who has
demonstrated competency in the core areas or has been fully exempted
from the training requirements pursuant to this section and is quickly
and easily available to the caregiver, but not necessarily on-site.
(2) Training must have three components: Orientation, basic
training, and continuing education. All adult family home providers,
resident managers, and employees, or volunteers who routinely interact
with residents shall complete orientation. Caregivers shall complete
orientation, basic training, and continuing education.
(3) Orientation consists of introductory information on residents'
rights, communication skills, fire and life safety, and universal
precautions. Orientation must be provided at the facility by
appropriate adult family home staff to all adult family home employees
before the employees have routine interaction with residents.
(4) Basic training consists of modules on the core knowledge and
skills that caregivers need to learn and understand to effectively and
safely provide care to residents. Basic training must be outcome-based, and the effectiveness of the basic training must be measured by
demonstrated competency in the core areas through the use of a
competency test. Basic training must be completed by caregivers within
one hundred twenty days of the date on which they begin to provide
hands-on care. Until competency in the core areas has been
demonstrated, caregivers shall not provide hands-on personal care to
residents without indirect supervision.
(5) For adult family homes that serve residents with special needs
such as dementia, developmental disabilities, or mental illness,
specialty training is required of providers and resident managers.
(a) Specialty training consists of modules on the core knowledge
and skills that providers and resident managers need to effectively and
safely provide care to residents with special needs. Specialty
training should be integrated into basic training wherever appropriate.
Specialty training must be outcome-based, and the effectiveness of the
specialty training measured by demonstrated competency in the core
specialty areas through the use of a competency test.
(b) Specialty training must be completed by providers and resident
managers before admitting and serving residents who have been
determined to have special needs related to mental illness, dementia,
or a developmental disability. Should a resident develop special needs
while living in a home without specialty designation, the provider and
resident manager have one hundred twenty days to complete specialty
training.
(6) For adult family homes that serve residents who are registered
sex offenders, specialty training is required of providers and resident
managers.
(a) Specialty training consists of modules on the core knowledge
and skills that providers and resident managers need to effectively and
safely provide care to residents, given the special needs of residents
who are registered sex offenders. The specialty training must include,
at a minimum, modules on pathology, triggers, and response tactics.
Specialty training must be outcome-based, and the effectiveness of the
specialty training measured by demonstrated competency in the core
specialty areas through the use of a competency test.
(b) Specialty training must be completed by providers and resident
managers before admitting and serving residents who have been
determined to have special needs related to mental illness, dementia,
or a developmental disability. Should a resident develop special needs
while living in a home without specialty designation, the provider and
resident manager have one hundred twenty days to complete specialty
training.
(7) Continuing education consists of ongoing delivery of
information to caregivers on various topics relevant to the care
setting and care needs of residents. Competency testing is not
required for continuing education. Continuing education is not
required in the same calendar year in which basic or modified basic
training is successfully completed. Continuing education is required
in each calendar year thereafter. If specialty training is completed,
the specialty training applies toward any continuing education
requirement for up to two years following the completion of the
specialty training.
(((7))) (8) Persons who successfully challenge the competency test
for basic training are fully exempt from the basic training
requirements of this section. Persons who successfully challenge the
specialty training competency test are fully exempt from the specialty
training requirements of this section.
(((8))) (9) Licensed persons who perform the tasks for which they
are licensed are fully or partially exempt from the training
requirements of this section, as specified by the department in rule.
(((9))) (10) In an effort to improve access to training and
education and reduce costs, especially for rural communities, the
coordinated system of long-term care training and education must
include the use of innovative types of learning strategies such as
internet resources, videotapes, and distance learning using satellite
technology coordinated through community colleges, private
associations, or other entities, as defined by the department.
(((10))) (11) Adult family homes that desire to deliver facility-based training with facility designated trainers, or adult family homes
that desire to pool their resources to create shared training systems,
must be encouraged by the department in their efforts. The department
shall develop criteria for reviewing and approving trainers and
training materials. The department may approve a curriculum based upon
attestation by an adult family home administrator that the adult family
home's training curriculum addresses basic and specialty training
competencies identified by the department, and shall review a
curriculum to verify that it meets these requirements. The department
may conduct the review as part of the next regularly scheduled
inspection authorized under RCW 70.128.070. The department shall
rescind approval of any curriculum if it determines that the curriculum
does not meet these requirements.
(((11))) (12) The department shall adopt rules by September 1,
2002, for the implementation of this section.
(((12))) (13)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the
orientation, basic training, specialty training, and continuing
education requirements of this section commence September 1, 2002, and
shall be applied to (i) employees hired subsequent to September 1,
2002; or (ii) existing employees that on September 1, 2002, have not
successfully completed the training requirements under RCW 70.128.120
or 70.128.130 and this section. Existing employees who have not
successfully completed the training requirements under RCW 70.128.120
or 70.128.130 shall be subject to all applicable requirements of this
section.
(b) Beginning January 7, 2012, long-term care workers, as defined
in RCW 74.39A.009, employed by an adult family home are also subject to
the training requirements under RCW 74.39A.074.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must adopt rules and standards to provide
enhanced payments to a provider for each resident in an adult family
home under its operation who is a registered sex offender and who is a
medicaid resident. The payments must be calculated to compensate the
providers for any extraordinary expenses due to the presence of sex
offenders in the adult family home.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "extraordinary expenses"
includes, but is not limited to, any demonstrated increase in liability
insurance costs due to the presence of a registered sex offender in the
adult family home and the costs of specialty training required under
RCW 70.128.230(6).

--- END ---