BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that wildfire
occurrence, fire intensity, and values at risk have continued to
increase across the state in recent years. Three of the primary causal
factors behind these increases are population growth, changes in land
use, and weather patterns and drought. The 2012 wildfire season was
one of the worst in history and caused untold millions of dollars'
worth of fire-related damages. Costs associated with ongoing fire
resource deployment, state fire mobilization, as well as lingering air
quality issues and freight delay due to road closures, have added up to
one of the costliest fire seasons on record.
The legislature intends to help limit the scope of future wildfires
by establishing a statewide prefire mitigation plan to be overseen by
the office of the state fire marshal. This plan must provide for
coordination with local fire departments to develop individualized
community-wide protection plans that include public education such as
firewise, partnership building, and personal wildfire action plans in
the event of a wildfire.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.43.934 and 2012 c 229 s 818 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director of fire protection shall:
(((1)))(a)(i)(A) With the state board for community and technical
colleges, provide academic, vocational, and field training programs for
the fire service; and (((ii))) (B) with the state colleges and
universities, provide instructional programs requiring advanced
training, especially in command and management skills;
(((b))) (ii) Cooperate with the common schools, technical and
community colleges, institutions of higher education, and any
department or division of the state, or of any county or municipal
corporation in establishing and maintaining instruction in fire service
training and education in accordance with any act of congress and
legislation enacted by the legislature in pursuance thereof and in
establishing, building, and operating training and education
facilities.
Industrial fire departments and private fire investigators may
participate in training and education programs under this chapter for
a reasonable fee established by rule;
(((c))) (iii) Develop and adopt a master plan for constructing,
equipping, maintaining, and operating necessary fire service training
and education facilities subject to the provisions of chapter ((43.19))
39.26 RCW;
(((d))) (iv) Develop and adopt a master plan for the purchase,
lease, or other acquisition of real estate necessary for fire service
training and education facilities in a manner provided by law; and
(((e))) (v) Develop and adopt a plan with a goal of providing
firefighter one and wildland training to all firefighters in the state.
Wildland training reimbursement will be provided if a fire protection
district or a city fire department has and is fulfilling their interior
attack policy or if they do not have an interior attack policy. The
plan will include a reimbursement for fire protection districts and
city fire departments of not less than three dollars for every hour of
firefighter one or wildland training. The Washington state patrol
shall not provide reimbursement for more than two hundred hours of
firefighter one or wildland training for each firefighter trained((.));
(((2)(a))) (b)(i) Promote mutual aid and disaster planning for fire
services in this state;
(((b))) (ii) Assure the dissemination of information concerning the
amount of fire damage including that damage caused by arson, and its
causes and prevention; and
(((c))) (iii) Implement any legislation enacted by the legislature
to meet the requirements of any acts of congress that apply to this
section((.));
(((3))) (c)(i) Develop a statewide plan for prefire mitigation by
adopting by rule the principles and tenets of the Ready Set Go program
developed by the international association of fire chiefs. The rules
must require coordination with local fire departments to develop
individualized community-wide protection plans that include public
education such as firewise, partnership building, and personal wildfire
action plans in the event of a wildfire.
(ii) The office of the state fire marshal shall work with the state
building code council to identify potential barriers to, and encourage
adoption of, the international wildland urban interface code.
(iii) The wildfire prevention account is hereby created in the
custody of the state treasurer. The account shall consist of: (A) All
bequests, fees, gifts, emoluments, or donations given or paid into the
account; (B) five percent of all moneys received by the state from
taxes on fire insurance premiums under RCW 48.14.020; and (C) interest
on the investments of the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for prefire mitigation efforts as described in this
chapter and any rules adopted under this chapter. Only the director of
state fire protection or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.
(2) In carrying out its statutory duties, the office of the state
fire marshal shall give particular consideration to the appropriate
roles to be played by the state and by local jurisdictions with fire
protection responsibilities. Any determinations on the division of
responsibility shall be made in consultation with local fire officials
and their representatives.
To the extent possible, the office of the state fire marshal shall
encourage development of regional units along compatible geographic,
population, economic, and fire risk dimensions. Such regional units
may serve to: (a) Reinforce coordination among state and local
activities in fire service training, reporting, inspections, and
investigations; (b) identify areas of special need, particularly in
smaller jurisdictions with inadequate resources; (c) assist the state
in its oversight responsibilities; (d) identify funding needs and
options at both the state and local levels; and (e) provide models for
building local capacity in fire protection programs.
(3) "Firewise," for purpose of this chapter, means the firewise
communities program developed by the national fire protection
association, which encourages local solutions for wildfire safety by
involving homeowners, community leaders, planners, developers,
firefighters, and others in the effort to protect people and property
from wildfire risks.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2012 c 198 s 8, 2012 c 196 s 6, 2012 c
187 s 13, and 2012 c 114 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury
for cash management and cash balance purposes.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment
program account, the accessible communities account, the community and
technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the
American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the foster care scholarship
endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the
basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the contract
harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive
account, the commemorative works account, the county enhanced 911
excise tax account, the toll collection account, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the family leave insurance account, the food animal veterinarian
conditional scholarship account, the fruit and vegetable inspection
account, the future teachers conditional scholarship account, the game
farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science
scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and
product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the
industrial insurance rainy day fund, the juvenile accountability
incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan
2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the multiagency
permitting team account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar pool
account, the regional transportation investment district account, the
rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing
commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards
account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund
account, the individual development account program account, the
Washington horse racing commission operating account (earnings from the
Washington horse racing commission operating account must be credited
to the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account),
the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center
account, ((and)) the reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the
center for childhood deafness and hearing loss account, ((and)) the
school for the blind account, the Millersylvania park trust fund, the
public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund, the wildlife
prevention account, and the radiation perpetual maintenance fund.
(c) The following accounts and funds must receive eighty percent of
their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high
occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account,
and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the
state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the
custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office
of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for
the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---