BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.60.322 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The capital vessel replacement account is created in the motor
vehicle fund. All revenues generated from the vessel replacement
surcharge under RCW 47.60.315(7) and the service fees collected under
section 2 of this act must be deposited into the account. Moneys in
the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for the construction or purchase of ferry
vessels and to pay the principal and interest on bonds authorized for
the construction or purchase of ferry vessels. However, expenditures
from the account must first be used to support the construction or
purchase, including any applicable financing costs, of a ferry vessel
with a carrying capacity of at least one hundred forty-four cars.
(2) The state treasurer may not transfer any moneys from the
capital vessel replacement account except to the transportation 2003
account (nickel account) for debt service on bonds issued for the
construction of ((a)) 144-car class ferry vessels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department and a county auditor or other agent appointed by
the director shall collect a service fee of five dollars for each
initial vehicle registration and registration renewal processed by the
department or that county auditor's or other agent's office. The
service fee must be deposited into the capital vessel replacement
account as authorized in RCW 47.60.322.
(2) The department and a county auditor or other agent appointed by
the director shall collect a service fee of twelve dollars for each
certificate of title transaction processed by the department or that
county auditor's or other agent's office. The service fee must be
deposited into the capital vessel replacement account as authorized in
RCW 47.60.322.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to vehicle registrations
that are due or become due on or after January 1, 2015, and certificate
of title transactions that are processed on or after January 1, 2015.

--- END ---