BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.371 and 2011 c 195 s 4 and 2011 c 119 s 204 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a beer and/or wine retailer's license to be
designated as a beer and/or wine specialty shop license to sell beer,
strong beer, and/or wine at retail in bottles, cans, and original
containers, not to be consumed upon the premises where sold((, at any
store other than the state liquor stores)). ((Licensees obtaining a
written endorsement from the board may also sell malt liquor in kegs or
other containers capable of holding four gallons or more of liquid.))
The annual fee for the beer and/or wine specialty shop license is one
hundred dollars for each store. ((The sale of any container holding
four gallons or more must comply with RCW 66.28.200 and 66.28.220.))
(2) Licensees under this section may provide, free or for a charge,
single-serving samples of two ounces or less to customers for the
purpose of sales promotion. Sampling activities of licensees under
this section are subject to RCW 66.28.305 and 66.28.040 and the cost of
sampling under this section may not be borne, directly or indirectly,
by any manufacturer, importer, or distributor of liquor.
(3) Upon approval by the board, a beer and/or wine specialty shop
licensee may obtain the following endorsements:
(a) The beer and/or wine specialty shop licensee that exceeds fifty
percent beer and/or wine sales may also receive an endorsement to
permit the sale of beer to a purchaser in a sanitary container brought
to the premises by the purchaser, or provided by the licensee or
manufacturer, and fill at the tap by the licensee at the time of sale.
If the beer and/or wine specialty shop licensee does not exceed fifty
percent beer and/or wine sales, the board may waive the fifty percent
beer and/or wine sale criteria if the beer and/or wine specialty shop
maintains alcohol inventory that exceeds fifteen thousand dollars.
(b) A beer and/or wine specialty shop licensee may also receive an
endorsement to sell malt liquor in kegs or other containers capable of
holding four gallons or more of liquid. The sale of any container
holding four gallons or more must comply with RCW 66.28.200 and
66.28.220.
(c) A beer and/or wine specialty shop licensee may also receive an
endorsement to sell spirits produced by a distiller producing sixty
thousand gallons or less of spirits per annum.
(i) A beer and/or wine specialty shop licensee with an endorsement
to sell spirits must pay to the board, for deposit into the liquor
revolving fund, an issuance fee equivalent to seventeen percent of all
spirits sales revenues, exclusive of taxes collected by the licensee
with such an endorsement and of sales of items on which a license fee
payable under RCW 66.24.630(4)(a) has otherwise been incurred. The
board must establish rules setting forth the timing of such payments
and reporting of sales dollar volume, with payments required quarterly
in arrears.
(ii) As a condition to receiving and renewing an endorsement to
sell spirits, a beer and/or wine specialty shop licensee must provide
training as prescribed by the board by rule for individuals who sell
spirits or who manage others who sell spirits regarding compliance with
laws and regulations regarding sale of spirits including, without
limitation, the prohibitions against sale of spirits to individuals who
are underage or visibly intoxicated. The training must be provided
before the individual first engages in the sale of spirits and must be
renewed at least every five years. Records must be maintained
documenting the nature and frequency of the training provided. An
employee training program is presumptively sufficient if it
incorporates a responsible vendor program adopted by the board.
(iii) The maximum penalties prescribed by the board in WAC 314-29-020 through 314-29-040 relating to fines and suspensions are doubled
for violations relating to the sale of spirits by beer and/or wine
specialty shop licensees with an endorsement to sell spirits.
(4) The board shall issue a restricted beer and/or wine specialty
shop license, authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table
wine, if the board finds upon issuance or renewal of the license that
the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public
interest. In determining the public interest, the board shall consider
at least the following factors:
(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or
fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;
(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's
establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or
fortified wine at the establishment; and
(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be
detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded
alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.
If the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of
strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest, it
shall issue or renew the license without restriction, as applicable.
The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or fortified
wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on those
persons objecting.
(5) Licensees holding a beer and/or wine specialty shop license
must maintain a minimum three thousand dollar wholesale inventory of
beer, strong beer, and/or wine.
(6) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---