BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.22.050 and 2011 c 281 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The gross sales of cottage food products may not exceed an
annual amount set by the department. The determination of the maximum
annual gross sales must be computed on the basis of the amount of gross
sales within or at a particular domestic residence and may not be
computed on a per person basis within or at an individual domestic
residence.
(2) If gross sales exceed the maximum annual gross sales amount,
the cottage food operation must either obtain a food processing plant
license under chapter 69.07 RCW or cease operations.
(3) A cottage food operation exceeding the maximum annual gross
sales amount is not entitled to a full or partial refund of any fees
paid under RCW 69.22.030 or 69.22.040.
(4) Unless otherwise increased by the department by rule, the
maximum annual gross sales amount ((must be established in rule by the
department consistent with this subsection. The amount must be set at
fifteen thousand dollars until December 31, 2012. Beginning January 1,
2013, the department must increase the fifteen thousand dollar annual
gross sales limit biennially to reflect inflation. The department may
determine inflation-based increases in any matter it deems most
efficient)) is twenty-five thousand dollars.
(5) The director may request in writing documentation to verify the
annual gross sales figure.

--- END ---