BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By August 1, 2013, the department shall establish a temporary
work group of public health officials, health communication experts,
and organizations representing health care providers.
(2) By December 31, 2013, the temporary work group shall report to
the appropriate legislative committees its recommendations for
implementing best practices to communicate significant health risks to
the public, including special emphasis on vulnerable populations.
(3) This section expires August 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each local board of health may adopt a community health alert
notification plan that establishes the method by which the local health
department, health district, or combined city-county health department
keeps the public who reside in its jurisdiction informed of significant
health risks to the public.
(2) If a local board of health adopts a community health alert
notification plan, the plan must be made available to the public on the
web site of each local public health department, health district, or
combined city-county health department.

--- END ---