BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.50A.010 and 1988 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Eligible cost" means the cost of that portion of a water
pollution control facility or activity that can be financed under this
chapter.
(3) "Fund" means the water pollution control revolving fund in the
custody of the state treasurer.
(4) "Water pollution control facility" or "water pollution control
facilities" means any facilities or systems owned or operated by a
public body for the control, collection, storage, treatment, disposal,
or recycling of wastewater, including but not limited to sanitary
sewage, storm water, combined sewer overflows, residential, commercial,
industrial, and agricultural wastes, which are causing water quality
degradation due to concentrations of conventional, nonconventional, or
toxic pollutants. Water pollution control facilities include all
equipment, utilities, structures, real property, and interests in and
improvements on real property necessary for or incidental to such
purpose. Water pollution control facilities also include such
facilities, equipment, and collection systems as are necessary to
protect federally designated sole source aquifers.
(5) "Water pollution control activities" means actions taken by a
public body for the following purposes: (a) To control nonpoint
sources of water pollution; (b) to develop and implement a
comprehensive management plan for estuaries; and (c) to maintain or
improve water quality through the use of water pollution control
facilities or other means.
(6) "Public body" means the state of Washington or any agency,
county, city or town, other political subdivision, municipal
corporation or quasi-municipal corporation, and those Indian tribes now
or hereafter recognized as such by the federal government.
(7) "Water pollution" means such contamination, or other alteration
of the physical, chemical, or biological properties of any waters of
the state, including change in temperature, taste, color, turbidity, or
odor of the waters, or such discharge of any liquid, gaseous, solid,
radioactive, or other substance into any waters of the state as will or
is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters harmful,
detrimental, or injurious to the public health, safety, or welfare, or
to domestic, commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or
other legitimate beneficial uses, or to livestock, wild animals, birds,
fish, or other aquatic life.
(8) "Nonpoint source water pollution" means pollution that enters
any waters of the state from any dispersed water-based or land-use
activities, including, but not limited to, atmospheric deposition,
surface water runoff from agricultural lands, urban areas, and forest
lands, subsurface or underground sources, and discharges from boats or
other marine vessels.
(9) "Federal capitalization grants" means grants from the federal
government provided by the water quality act of 1987 (P.L. 100-4).
(10) "Debt service" means the total of all principal, interest, and
administration charges associated with a water pollution control
revolving fund loan that must be repaid to the department by the public
body.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.50A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The water pollution control revolving administration account is
created in the state treasury. All receipts from charges authorized in
this section must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be used only in a manner consistent with this section.
(2) The department is authorized to assess administration charges
as a portion of the debt service for loans issued under the water
pollution control revolving fund created in RCW 90.50A.020. The sole
purpose of assessing administration charges is to predictably and
adequately fund the department's costs of administering the water
pollution control revolving fund loan program, as identified in
subsection (5) of this section. The department must assess
administration charges on each water pollution control revolving fund
loan at the point the loan enters repayment status, after the effective
date of this section and rule changes are adopted to implement the
administration charge. Loans that are at an interest rate below the
established administration charge rate are exempt from the
administration charge.
(3) The water pollution control revolving administration account
consists of:
(a) Any administration charge levied by the department in
conjunction with administration of the water pollution control
revolving fund; and
(b) Any other revenues derived from gifts, grants, or bequests
pledged to the state for the purpose of administering the water
pollution control revolving fund.
(4) The state treasurer may invest and reinvest moneys in the water
pollution control revolving administration account in the manner
provided by law. All earnings from such investment and reinvestment
must be credited to the water pollution control revolving
administration account.
(5) Moneys in the water pollution control revolving administration
account are to be used for the following water pollution revolving fund
loan program costs:
(a) Administration costs associated with conducting application
processes, managing contracts, collecting loan repayments, managing the
revolving fund, providing technical assistance, and meeting state and
federal reporting requirements; and
(b) Information and data system costs associated with loan tracking
and fund management.
(6) Each biennium, the department may spend from the water
pollution control revolving administration account an amount no greater
than four percent of the water pollution control revolving fund new
capital appropriation.
(7) For its 2017-2019 biennial operating budget submittal, and
every biennium thereafter, the department must compare the projected
water pollution control revolving administration account balance and
the projected administration charge income with projected program
costs, including an adequate working capital reserve as defined by the
office of financial management. In its submittal to the office of
financial management, the department may:
(a) Find that the projected administration charge income is
inadequate to fund the cost of administering the program, and that the
rate of the charge must be increased. However, the administration
charge may never exceed one percent on the declining principal loan
balance;
(b) Find that the projected administration charge income exceeds
what is needed to fund the cost of administering the program, and that
the rate of the charge must be decreased;
(c) Find that there is an excess balance in the revolving
administration account, and that the excess must be transferred to the
water pollution control revolving fund to be used for loans; or
(d) Find that there is no need for any rate adjustments or balance
transfers.
(8) At the point where the water pollution control revolving
administration account adequately covers the program administration
costs, the department may no longer use the federal administration
allowance. If a federal capitalization grant is awarded after that
point, all federal capitalization dollars must be used for making
loans.
(9) By December 1, 2018, the department must submit to the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees a report on implementation of
the administration charge, including information on: The amount of
income the administration charge has produced since its inception; the
uses and adequacy of the income for administrative costs; any excess
balances that have been transferred to the water pollution control
revolving fund; and any additional sources that the department is using
for program administration.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.84.092 and 2012 c 198 s 2, 2012 c 196 s 7, 2012 c
187 s 14, and 2012 c 83 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement
project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel
replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the
Cedar River channel construction and operation account, the Central
Washington University capital projects account, the charitable,
educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the cleanup
settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development
account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development
account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery
account, the common school construction fund, the county arterial
preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account,
the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the Interstate 405
express toll lanes operations account, the education construction fund,
the education legacy trust account, the election account, the energy
freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail
assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond
retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the freight
mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account,
the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account,
the high capacity transportation account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the
highway safety ((account [fund])) fund, the high occupancy toll lanes
operations account, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement
account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial
retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land
account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public transportation systems account, the
public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction
account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puyallup tribal
settlement account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the
recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program
account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust
account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington
loan fund, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility
safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account,
the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol
highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account,
the state route number 520 corridor account, the state wildlife
account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll
bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account,
the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer
firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2
retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2
retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state economic
development commission account, the Washington state health insurance
pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving
administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, and
the Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, the state university permanent fund, and the
state reclamation revolving account shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.84.092 and 2012 c 198 s 2, 2012 c 196 s 7, 2012 c
187 s 14, 2012 c 83 s 4, and 2012 c 36 s 5 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement
project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel
replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the
Cedar River channel construction and operation account, the Central
Washington University capital projects account, the charitable,
educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the cleanup
settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development
account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development
account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery
account, the Columbia river crossing project account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account,
the department of licensing services account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities
community trust account, the drinking water assistance account, the
drinking water assistance administrative account, the drinking water
assistance repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital
projects account, the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the energy freedom account, the energy
recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight
congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment account, the
freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective
fund, the public health services account, the high capacity
transportation account, the state higher education construction
account, the higher education construction account, the highway bond
retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety
((account [fund])) fund, the high occupancy toll lanes operations
account, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the
judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement
principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local
real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account,
the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid
account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund,
the motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the natural
resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension
funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1
account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving
account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account,
the public transportation systems account, the public works assistance
account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound
ferry operations account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the
real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle
account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource
management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural
mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust
fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special
category C account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the
state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number
520 corridor account, the state wildlife account, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond
retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account),
the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain
injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement
system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state economic development
commission account, the Washington state health insurance pool account,
the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration
account, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western
Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal
school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, the state university permanent fund, and the state
reclamation revolving account shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 of this act expires if the
requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 4 of this act takes effect if the
requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met.

--- END ---