BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.26.010 and 2012 c 224 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means any state office or activity of the executive
and judicial branches of state government, including state agencies,
departments, offices, divisions, boards, commissions, institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, and correctional and
other types of institutions.
(2) "Bid" means an offer, proposal, or quote for goods or services
in response to a solicitation issued for such goods or services by the
department or an agency of Washington state government.
(3) "Bidder" means an individual or entity who submits a bid,
quotation, or proposal in response to a solicitation issued for such
goods or services by the department or an agency of Washington state
government.
(4) "Businesses owned and operated by persons with disabilities"
means any for-profit business certified under chapter 39.19 RCW as
being owned and controlled by persons who have been either:
(a) Determined by the department of social and health services to
have a developmental disability, as defined in RCW 71A.10.020;
(b) Determined by an agency established under Title I of the
federal vocational rehabilitation act to be or have been eligible for
vocational rehabilitation services;
(c) Determined by the federal social security administration to be
or have been eligible for either social security disability insurance
or supplemental security income; or
(d) Determined by the United States department of veterans affairs
to be or have been eligible for vocational rehabilitation services due
to service-connected disabilities, under 38 U.S.C. Sec. 3100 et seq.
(5) "Client services" means services provided directly to agency
clients including, but not limited to, medical and dental services,
employment and training programs, residential care, and subsidized
housing.
(6) "Community rehabilitation program of the department of social
and health services" means any entity that:
(a) Is registered as a nonprofit corporation with the secretary of
state; and
(b) Is recognized by the department of social and health services,
division of vocational rehabilitation as eligible to do business as a
community rehabilitation program.
(7) "Competitive solicitation" means a documented formal process
providing an equal and open opportunity to bidders and culminating in
a selection based on predetermined criteria.
(8) "Contractor" means an individual or entity awarded a contract
with an agency to perform a service or provide goods.
(9) "Debar" means to prohibit a contractor, individual, or other
entity from submitting a bid, having a bid considered, or entering into
a state contract during a specified period of time as set forth in a
debarment order.
(10) "Department" means the department of enterprise services.
(11) "Director" means the director of the department of enterprise
services.
(12) "Estimated useful life" of an item means the estimated time
from the date of acquisition to the date of replacement or disposal,
determined in any reasonable manner.
(13) "Goods" means products, materials, supplies, or equipment
provided by a contractor.
(14) "In-state business" means a business that has its principal
office located in Washington.
(15) "Life-cycle cost" means the total cost of an item to the state
over its estimated useful life, including costs of selection,
acquisition, operation, maintenance, and where applicable, disposal, as
far as these costs can reasonably be determined, minus the salvage
value at the end of its estimated useful life.
(16) "Master contracts" means a contract for specific goods or
services, or both, that is solicited and established by the department
in accordance with procurement laws and rules on behalf of and for
general use by agencies as specified by the department.
(17) "Microbusiness" means any business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that:
(a) Is owned and operated independently from all other businesses; and
(b) has a gross revenue of less than one million dollars annually as
reported on its federal tax return or on its return filed with the
department of revenue.
(18) "Minibusiness" means any business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that:
(a) Is owned and operated independently from all other businesses; and
(b) has a gross revenue of less than three million dollars, but one
million dollars or more annually as reported on its federal tax return
or on its return filed with the department of revenue.
(19) "Public agency" means any agency, political subdivision, or
unit of local government of this state including, but not limited to,
municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations, special purpose
districts, and local service districts; any agency of the state
government; any agency of the United States; and any Indian tribe
recognized by the federal government.
(20) "Purchase" means the acquisition of goods or services,
including the leasing or renting of goods.
(((20))) (21) "Services" means labor, work, analysis, or similar
activities provided by a contractor to accomplish a specific scope of
work.
(((21))) (22) "Small business" means an in-state business,
including a sole proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other
legal entity, that:
(a) Certifies, under penalty of perjury, that it is owned and
operated independently from all other businesses and has either:
(i) Fifty or fewer employees; or
(ii) A gross revenue of less than seven million dollars annually as
reported on its federal income tax return or its return filed with the
department of revenue over the previous three consecutive years; or
(b) Is certified with the office of women and minority business
enterprises under chapter 39.19 RCW.
(((22))) (23) "Sole source" means a contractor providing goods or
services of such a unique nature or sole availability at the location
required that the contractor is clearly and justifiably the only
practicable source to provide the goods or services.
(((23))) (24) "Washington grown" has the definition in RCW
15.64.060.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.26.020 and 2012 c 224 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A state officer or employee of an agency who seeks to
acquire goods or services or who participates in those contractual
matters is subject to the requirements in RCW 42.52.150.
(b) A contractor who contracts with an agency to perform services
related to the acquisition of goods and services for or on behalf of
the state is subject to the requirements in RCW 42.52.150.
(2) No person or entity who seeks or may seek a contract with a
state agency may give, loan, transfer, or deliver to any person
something of economic value for which receipt of such item would cause
a state officer or employee to be in a violation of RCW 42.52.040,
42.52.110, 42.52.120, 42.52.140, or 42.52.150.
(3) State policy is that existing procurement contracts must not be
terminated early so that a public agency may use a state master
contract or state sole source contract under this chapter unless
sufficient savings and efficiencies are expected to outweigh the costs
and risks associated with early termination.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.26.050 and 2012 c 224 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the powers and duties provided in chapter 43.19
RCW, the department shall make available goods and services to support
state agencies, and may enter into agreements with any other local or
federal governmental agency or entity or a public benefit nonprofit
organization, in compliance with RCW 39.34.055, and any tribes located
in the state, to furnish such products and services as deemed
appropriate by both parties.
(2) The department shall ensure full cost recovery from state
agencies, other local or federal governmental agency or entity, public
benefit nonprofit organizations, or any tribes located in the state,
for activities performed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
Cost recovery must ensure that the department is reimbursed its full
cost for providing the goods and services furnished as determined by
the department. Cost recovery may be collected through the state
agency, other governmental entity, nonprofit organization, or through
the contractor.
(3) All governmental entities of this state may enter into
agreements under this section with the department, unless otherwise
prohibited.
(4) Any public agency choosing to make purchases pursuant to a
contract issued under this section may not terminate an existing
contract with a different business early in order to use the new
contract unless savings or efficiencies clearly demonstrate that the
taxpayers will receive a benefit under the new contract.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.26.080 and 2012 c 224 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director is responsible for the development and oversight
of policy for the procurement of goods and services by all state
agencies under this chapter. When establishing policies, standards,
and procedures, the director shall account for differentiation in
procurement practices and needs among state agencies and strive to
establish policies, standards, and procedures that promote greater
efficiency in procurement. The policies, standards, and procedures
should discourage public agencies from terminating existing contracts
in order to use a state sole source contract, a state goods and
services contract, or a state master contract unless the public agency
can clearly demonstrate expected savings and efficiencies that outweigh
the cost and risk of early termination.
(2) The director is authorized to adopt rules, policies, and
guidelines governing the procurement, contracting, and contract
management of any and all goods and services procured by state agencies
under this chapter.
(3) The director or designee is the sole authority to enter into
master contracts on behalf of the state. The governor has the
authority to terminate any state contract in accordance with state law,
federal law, or contractual provisions.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.26.090 and 2012 c 224 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall:
(1) Establish overall state policies, standards, and procedures
regarding the procurement of goods and services by all state agencies;
(2) Develop policies and standards for the use of credit cards or
similar methods to make purchases;
(3) Establish procurement processes for information technology
goods and services, using technology standards and policies established
by the office of the chief information officer under chapter 43.41A
RCW;
(4) Enter into contracts or delegate the authority to enter into
contracts on behalf of the state to facilitate the purchase, lease,
rent, or otherwise acquire all goods and services and equipment needed
for the support, maintenance, and use of all state agencies, except as
provided in RCW 39.26.100;
(5) Have authority to delegate to agencies authorization to
purchase goods and services. The authorization must specify
restrictions as to dollar amount or to specific types of goods and
services, based on a risk assessment process developed by the
department. Acceptance of the purchasing authorization by an agency
does not relieve the agency from conformance with this chapter or from
policies established by the director. Also, the director may not
delegate to a state agency the authorization to purchase goods and
services if the agency is not in substantial compliance with overall
procurement policies as established by the director;
(6) Develop procurement policies and procedures, such as unbundled
contracting and subcontracting, that encourage and facilitate the
purchase of goods and services from Washington small businesses,
microbusinesses, and minibusinesses, and minority and women-owned
businesses to the maximum extent practicable and consistent with
international trade agreement commitments;
(7) Develop and implement an enterprise system for electronic
procurement;
(8) Provide for a commodity classification system and provide for
the adoption of goods and services commodity standards;
(9) Establish overall state policy for compliance by all agencies
regarding:
(a) Food procurement procedures and materials that encourage and
facilitate the purchase of Washington grown food by state agencies and
institutions to the maximum extent practicable and consistent with
international trade agreement commitments; and
(b) Policies requiring all food contracts to include a plan to
maximize to the extent practicable and consistent with international
trade agreement commitments the availability of Washington grown food
purchased through the contract;
(10) Develop guidelines and criteria for the purchase of vehicles,
high gas mileage vehicles, and alternate vehicle fuels and systems,
equipment, and materials, that reduce overall energy-related costs and
energy use by the state, including investigations into all
opportunities to aggregate the purchasing of clean technologies by
state and local governments, and including the requirement that new
passenger vehicles purchased by the state meet the minimum standards
for passenger automobile fuel economy established by the United States
secretary of transportation pursuant to the energy policy and
conservation act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 2002); ((and))
(11) Develop and enact rules to implement the provisions of this
chapter;
(12) Limit contracts for services and goods to terms no more than
three years with all potential extensions not to exceed ten years; and
(13) Develop a process whereby the department uses price quotes
from local businesses to determine current prices and labor rates prior
to granting contractual increases. Findings must be posted publicly
ten days prior to the department authorizing any contractual increase.
Only with the governor's approval may a contract be increased in
amounts exceeding the estimated real gross domestic product growth rate
for the year as forecast by the Washington state economic and revenue
forecast council.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.26.125 and 2012 c 224 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
All contracts must be entered into pursuant to competitive
solicitation, except for:
(1) Emergency contracts;
(2) ((Sole source contracts that comply with the provisions of RCW
39.26.140;
(3))) Direct buy purchases, as designated by the director. The
director shall establish policies to define criteria for direct buy
purchases. These criteria may be adjusted to accommodate special
market conditions and to promote market diversity for the benefit of
the citizens of the state of Washington;
(((4))) (3) Purchases involving special facilities, services, or
market conditions, in which instances of direct negotiation is in the
best interest of the state;
(((5))) (4) Purchases from master contracts established by the
department or an agency authorized by the department;
(((6))) (5) Client services contracts;
(((7))) (6) Other specific contracts or classes or groups of
contracts exempted from the competitive solicitation process when the
director determines that a competitive solicitation process is not
appropriate or cost-effective;
(((8))) (7) Off-contract purchases of Washington grown food when
such food is not available from Washington sources through an existing
contract. However, Washington grown food purchased under this
subsection must be of an equivalent or better quality than similar food
available through the contract and must be able to be paid from the
agency's existing budget. This requirement also applies to purchases
and contracts for purchases executed by state agencies, including
institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, under
delegated authority granted in accordance with this chapter or under
RCW 28B.10.029;
(((9))) (8) Contracts awarded to companies that furnish a service
where the tariff is established by the utilities and transportation
commission or other public entity;
(((10))) (9) Intergovernmental agreements awarded to any
governmental entity, whether federal, state, or local and any
department, division, or subdivision thereof;
(((11))) (10) Contracts for services that are necessary to the
conduct of collaborative research if the use of a specific contractor
is mandated by the funding source as a condition of granting funds;
(((12))) (11) Contracts for architectural and engineering services
as defined in RCW 39.80.020, which shall be entered into under chapter
39.80 RCW;
(((13))) (12) Contracts for the employment of expert witnesses for
the purposes of litigation; and
(((14))) (13) Contracts for bank supervision authorized under RCW
30.38.040.

Sec. 7 RCW 39.26.140 and 2012 c 224 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Agencies must submit sole source contracts to the department
and make the contracts available for public inspection not less than
ten working days before the proposed starting date of the contract.
Agencies must provide documented justification for sole source
contracts to the department when the contract is submitted, and must
include evidence that the agency posted the contract opportunity at a
minimum on the state's enterprise vendor registration and bid
notification system.
(2) The department must approve sole source contracts before any
such contract becomes binding and before any services may be performed
or goods provided under the contract. These requirements shall also
apply to all sole source contracts except as otherwise exempted by the
director.
(3) The director may provide an agency an exemption from the
requirements of this section for a contract or contracts. Requests for
exemptions must be submitted to the director in writing.
(4) Contracts awarded by institutions of higher education from
nonstate funds are exempt from the requirements of this section.
(5) Sole source contracts for goods and services may not have a
contractual term of more than three years with all potential extensions
not to exceed ten years.
(6) Any public agency choosing to make purchases pursuant to a
contract issued under this section may not terminate an existing
contract with a different business early in order to use the new
contract unless savings or efficiencies clearly demonstrate that the
taxpayers will receive a benefit under the new contract.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.19.011 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 201 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The director of enterprise services shall supervise and
administer the activities of the department of enterprise services and
shall advise the governor and the legislature with respect to matters
under the jurisdiction of the department.
(2) In addition to other powers and duties granted to the director,
the director shall have the following powers and duties:
(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the
purposes of this chapter;
(b) Accept and expend gifts and grants that are related to the
purposes of this chapter, whether such grants be of federal or other
funds;
(c) Appoint deputy and assistant directors and such other special
assistants as may be needed to administer the department. These
employees are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW;
(d) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform
all other functions necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of
this chapter;
(e) Delegate powers, duties, and functions as the director deems
necessary for efficient administration, but the director shall be
responsible for the official acts of the officers and employees of the
department;
(f) Apply for grants from public and private entities, and receive
and administer any grant funding received for the purpose and intent of
this chapter; ((and))
(g) Adopt policies, contractual provisions, or guidance to prevent
early termination of existing contracts by public agencies choosing to
use state contracts; and
(h) Perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.
(3) The director may establish additional advisory groups as may be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

--- END ---