BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that although the
professional educator standards board has begun work on standards and
assessments for educational interpreters as directed by the 2012
supplemental operating budget, there is a need formally to codify this
as an ongoing responsibility. The legislature also intends to specify
how the standards and assessments will be used to improve learning
opportunities for students who are deaf, deaf-blind, or hearing
impaired.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Educational interpreters" means school district employees,
whether certificated or classified, providing sign language translation
and further explanation of concepts introduced by the teacher for
students who are deaf, deaf-blind, or hearing impaired.
(b) "Educational interpreter assessment" means an assessment that
includes both written assessment and performance assessment that is
offered by a national organization of professional sign language
interpreters and transliterators, and is designed to assess performance
in more than one sign system or sign language.
(2) The professional educator standards board shall adopt standards
for educational interpreters and identify and publicize educational
interpreter assessments that are available and meet the definition in
this section. The board shall establish a performance standard for
each educational interpreter assessment for the purposes of this
section, defining what constitutes a minimum assessment result.
(3) By the beginning of the 2016-17 school year, educational
interpreters who are employed by school districts must have
successfully achieved the performance standard established by the
professional educator standards board on one of the educational
interpreter assessments identified by the board.
(4) By the beginning of the 2019-20 school year, educational
interpreters who are employed by school districts must meet the
requirements of subsection (3) of this section, plus achieve national
interpreter certification by the national association of the deaf
registry of interpreters for the deaf.
(5) The provisions of this section do not apply to educational
interpreters employed to interpret a sign system or sign language for
which no educational interpreter assessment has been identified by the
professional educator standards board.

--- END ---