BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.665 and 2010 c 285 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and maintain a list of certified
water right examiners. Certified water right examiners on the list are
eligible to perform final proof examinations of permitted water uses
leading to the issuance of a water right certificate under RCW
90.03.330. The list must be updated annually and must be made
available to the public through written and electronic media.
(2) In order to qualify, an individual must be registered in
Washington as a professional engineer, professional land surveyor, or
registered hydrogeologist, or an individual must demonstrate at least
five years of applicable experience to the department, or be a board
member of a water conservancy board. Qualified individuals must also
pass a written examination prior to being certified by the department.
Such an examination must be administered by either the department or an
entity formally approved by the department. Each certified water right
examiner must demonstrate knowledge and competency regarding:
(a) Water law in the state of Washington;
(b) Measurement of the flow of water through open channels and
enclosed pipes;
(c) Water use and water level reporting;
(d) Estimation of the capacity of reservoirs and ponds;
(e) Irrigation crop water requirements;
(f) Aerial photo interpretation;
(g) Legal descriptions of land parcels;
(h) Location of land and water infrastructure through the use of
maps and global positioning;
(i) Proper construction and sealing of well bores; and
(j) Other topics related to the preparation and certification of
water rights in Washington state.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, upon
completion of a water appropriation and putting water to beneficial
use, in order to receive a final water right certificate, the permit
holder must secure the services of a certified water right examiner who
has been tested and certified by the department. The examiner shall
carry out a final examination of the project to verify its completion
and to determine and document for the permit holder and the department
the amount of water that has been appropriated for beneficial use, the
location of diversion or withdrawal and conveyance facilities, and the
actual place of use. The examiner shall take measurements or make
estimates of the maximum diversion or withdrawal, the capacity of water
storage facilities, the acreage irrigated, the type and number of
residences served, the type and number of stock watered, and other
information relevant to making a final determination of the amount of
water beneficially used. The examiner shall take photographs of the
facilities to document the use or uses of water and the photographs
must be submitted with the examiner's report to the department. The
department shall specify the format and required content of the reports
and may provide a form for that purpose.
(4) The department may suspend or revoke a certification based on
poor performance, malfeasance, failure to acquire continuing education
credits, or excessive complaints from the examiner's customers. The
department may require the retesting of an examiner. The department
may interview any examiner to determine whether the person is qualified
for this work. The department shall spot-check the work of examiners
to ensure that the public is being competently served. Any person
aggrieved by an order of the department including the granting, denial,
revocation, or suspension of a certificate issued by the department
under this chapter may appeal pursuant to chapter 43.21B RCW.
(5) The decision regarding whether to issue a final water right
certificate is solely the responsibility and function of the
department.
(6) The department shall make its final decision under RCW
90.03.330 within sixty days of the date of receipt of the proof of
examination from the certified water right examiner, unless otherwise
requested by the applicant or returned for correction by the
department. The department may return an initial proof of examination
for correction within thirty days of the department's receipt of such
initial proof from a certified water right examiner. Such proof must
be returned to both the certified water right examiner and the
applicant. Within thirty days of the department's receipt of such
returned proof from the certified water right examiner, the department
shall make its final decision under RCW 90.03.330, unless otherwise
requested by the applicant.
(7) Each certified water right examiner must complete eight hours
annually of qualifying continuing education in the water resources
field. The department shall determine and specify the qualifying
continuing education and shall inform examiners of the opportunities.
The department shall track whether examiners are current in their
continuing education and may suspend the certification of an examiner
who has not complied with the continuing education requirement.
(8) Each certified water right examiner must ((be bonded for at
least fifty thousand dollars)) furnish evidence of insurance or
financial responsibility in a form acceptable to the department.
(9) The department may waive the requirement to secure the services
of a certified water right examiner in situations in which the
department has already conducted a final proof of examination or finds
it unnecessary for purposes of issuing a certificate of water right.
(10) The department shall establish and collect fees for the
examination, certification, and renewal of certification of water right
examiners. Revenue collected from these fees must be deposited into
the water rights processing account created in RCW 90.03.650. Pursuant
to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to set fees for
examination, certification, and renewal of certification for water
right examiners.
(11) The department may adopt rules appropriate to carry out the
purposes of this section.

--- END ---