BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 23B.13.020 and 2009 c 189 s 41 and 2009 c 188 s 1404
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A shareholder is entitled to dissent from, and obtain payment
of the fair value of the shareholder's shares in the event of, any of
the following corporate actions:
(a) A plan of merger, which has become effective, to which the
corporation is a party (i) if shareholder approval was required for the
merger by RCW 23B.11.030, 23B.11.080, or the articles of incorporation,
and the shareholder was entitled to vote on the merger, or (ii) if the
corporation was a subsidiary ((that has been merged)) and the plan of
merger provided for the merger of the subsidiary with its parent under
RCW 23B.11.040;
(b) A plan of share exchange, which has become effective, to which
the corporation is a party as the corporation whose shares have been
acquired, if the shareholder was entitled to vote on the plan;
(c) A sale or exchange, which has become effective, of all, or
substantially all, of the property of the corporation other than in the
usual and regular course of business, if the shareholder was entitled
to vote on the sale or exchange, including a sale in dissolution, but
not including a sale pursuant to court order or a sale for cash
pursuant to a plan by which all or substantially all of the net
proceeds of the sale will be distributed to the shareholders within one
year after the date of sale;
(d) An amendment of the articles of incorporation, whether or not
the shareholder was entitled to vote on the amendment, if the amendment
effects a redemption or cancellation of all of the shareholder's shares
in exchange for cash or other consideration other than shares of the
corporation; ((or))
(e) Any action described in RCW 23B.25.120; or
(f) Any corporate action approved pursuant to a shareholder vote to
the extent the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a resolution of
the board of directors provides that voting or nonvoting shareholders
are entitled to dissent and obtain payment for their shares.
(2) A shareholder entitled to dissent and obtain payment for the
shareholder's shares under this chapter may not challenge the corporate
action creating the shareholder's entitlement unless the action fails
to comply with the procedural requirements imposed by this title, RCW
25.10.831 through 25.10.886, the articles of incorporation, or the
bylaws, or is fraudulent with respect to the shareholder or the
corporation.
(3) The right of a dissenting shareholder to obtain payment of the
fair value of the shareholder's shares shall terminate upon the
occurrence of any one of the following events:
(a) The proposed corporate action is abandoned or rescinded;
(b) A court having jurisdiction permanently enjoins or sets aside
the corporate action; or
(c) The shareholder's demand for payment is withdrawn with the
written consent of the corporation.

Sec. 2 RCW 23B.13.220 and 2009 c 189 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under
RCW 23B.13.020 is approved at a shareholders' meeting, the corporation
shall within ten days after the effective date of the corporate action
deliver to all shareholders who satisfied the requirements of RCW
23B.13.210(1) a notice in compliance with subsection (((3))) (5) of
this section.
(2) If proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under
RCW 23B.13.020 is approved without a vote of shareholders in accordance
with RCW 23B.07.040, the notice delivered pursuant to RCW
23B.07.040(3)(b) to shareholders who satisfied the requirements of RCW
23B.13.210(2) shall comply with subsection (((3))) (5) of this section.
(3) In the case of proposed corporate action creating dissenters'
rights under RCW 23B.13.020(1)(a)(ii), the corporation shall within ten
days after the effective date of the corporate action deliver to all
shareholders of the subsidiary other than the parent a notice in
compliance with subsection (5) of this section.
(4) In the case of proposed corporate action creating dissenters'
rights under RCW 23B.13.020(1)(d) that, pursuant to RCW
23B.10.020(4)(b), is not required to be approved by the shareholders of
the corporation, the corporation shall within ten days after the
effective date of the corporate action deliver to all shareholders
entitled to dissent under RCW 23B.13.020(1)(d) a notice in compliance
with subsection (5) of this section.
(5) Any notice under subsection (1) ((or)), (2), (3), or (4) of
this section must:
(a) State where the payment demand must be sent and where and when
certificates for certificated shares must be deposited;
(b) Inform holders of uncertificated shares to what extent transfer
of the shares will be restricted after the payment demand is received;
(c) Supply a form for demanding payment that includes the date of
the first announcement to news media or to shareholders of the terms of
the proposed corporate action and requires that the person asserting
dissenters' rights certify whether or not the person acquired
beneficial ownership of the shares before that date;
(d) Set a date by which the corporation must receive the payment
demand, which date may not be fewer than thirty nor more than sixty
days after the date the notice in subsection (1) ((or)), (2), (3), or
(4) of this section is delivered; and
(e) Be accompanied by a copy of this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 23B.13.230 and 2002 c 297 s 39 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A shareholder sent a notice described in RCW 23B.13.220 must
demand payment, certify whether the shareholder acquired beneficial
ownership of the shares before the date required to be set forth in the
notice pursuant to RCW 23B.13.220(((2))) (5)(c), and deposit the
shareholder's certificates, all in accordance with the terms of the
notice.
(2) The shareholder who demands payment and deposits the
shareholder's share certificates under subsection (1) of this section
retains all other rights of a shareholder until the proposed corporate
action is effected.
(3) A shareholder who does not demand payment or deposit the
shareholder's share certificates where required, each by the date set
in the notice, is not entitled to payment for the shareholder's shares
under this chapter.

--- END ---