BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.145 and 2012 c 2 s 205 (Initiative Measure No.
1183) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Any craft distillery may sell spirits of its own production for
consumption off the premises, up to ((two)) three liters per person per
day. A craft distillery selling spirits under this subsection must
comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to retailers.
(2) Any craft distillery may contract distilled spirits for, and
sell contract distilled spirits to, holders of distillers' or
manufacturers' licenses, including licenses issued under RCW 66.24.520,
or for export.
(3) Any craft distillery licensed under this section may provide,
free of charge, one-half ounce or less samples of spirits of its own
production to persons on the premises of the distillery. The maximum
total per person per day is two ounces. Every person who participates
in any manner in the service of samples must obtain a class 12 alcohol
server permit.
(4) The board must adopt rules to implement the alcohol server
permit requirement and may adopt additional rules to implement this
section.
(5) Distilling is an agricultural practice.

--- END ---