BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employer shall provide employees with meal and rest periods
as required by law, subject to the following:
(a) Rest periods may be taken at any point during each work period
during which the employee is required to receive a rest period; and
(b) Meal and rest periods must be uninterrupted, and an employer
may not require an employee to take intermittent meal or rest periods.
This subsection (1)(b) does not apply when there is:
(i) An unforeseeable emergent circumstance, as defined in RCW
49.28.130; or
(ii) A clinical circumstance that may lead to patient harm without
the specific skill or expertise of the employee taking a meal or rest
period.
(2) The employer shall record when an employee takes or misses a
meal or rest period and maintain these records as required by the
department.
(3) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the
following meanings:
(a) "Employee" means a person who:
(i) Is employed by a health care facility;
(ii) Is involved in direct patient care activities or clinical
services;
(iii) Receives an hourly wage or is covered by a collective
bargaining agreement; and
(iv) Is a licensed practical nurse or registered nurse licensed
under chapter 18.79 RCW, a surgical technologist registered under
chapter 18.215 RCW, a diagnostic radiologic technologist or
cardiovascular invasive specialist certified under chapter 18.84 RCW,
a respiratory care practitioner licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW, or a
nursing assistant-certified as defined in RCW 18.88A.020.
(b) "Employer" means hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.

--- END ---