BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.41.010 and 2012 c 10 s 44 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Administer" means the direct application of a legend drug
whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the
body of a patient or research subject by:
(a) A practitioner; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the
practitioner.
(2) "Community-based care settings" include: Community residential
programs for ((the developmentally disabled)) persons with a
developmental disability, certified by the department of social and
health services under chapter 71A.12 RCW; adult family homes licensed
under chapter 70.128 RCW; and assisted living facilities licensed under
chapter 18.20 RCW. Community-based care settings do not include acute
care or skilled nursing facilities.
(3) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or
attempted transfer from one person to another of a legend drug, whether
or not there is an agency relationship.
(4) "Department" means the department of health.
(5) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order
for a legend drug and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the
proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging
necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.
(6) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.
(7) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or
dispensing a legend drug.
(8) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.
(9) "Drug" means:
(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States
pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States,
or official national formulary, or any supplement to any of them;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease in human beings or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food, minerals or vitamins) intended to
affect the structure or any function of the body of human beings or
animals; and
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any article
specified in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection. It does not include
devices or their components, parts, or accessories.
(10) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means
the ((communication of prescription information by computer, or the))
transmission of ((an exact visual image of)) a prescription ((by
facsimile,)) or ((other electronic means for original prescription
information or prescription)) refill ((information)) authorization for
a ((legend)) drug ((between an authorized)) of a practitioner ((and a
pharmacy or the transfer of prescription information for a legend drug
from one pharmacy to another pharmacy)) using computer systems. The
term does not include a prescription or refill authorization
transmitted verbally by telephone nor a facsimile manually signed by
the practitioner.
(11) "In-home care settings" include an individual's place of
temporary and permanent residence, but does not include acute care or
skilled nursing facilities, and does not include community-based care
settings.
(12) "Legend drugs" means any drugs which are required by state law
or regulation of the state board of pharmacy to be dispensed on
prescription only or are restricted to use by practitioners only.
(13) "Legible prescription" means a prescription or medication
order issued by a practitioner that is capable of being read and
understood by the pharmacist filling the prescription or the nurse or
other practitioner implementing the medication order. A prescription
must be hand printed, typewritten, or electronically generated.
(14) "Medication assistance" means assistance rendered by a
nonpractitioner to an individual residing in a community-based care
setting or in-home care setting to facilitate the individual's self-administration of a legend drug or controlled substance. It includes
reminding or coaching the individual, handing the medication container
to the individual, opening the individual's medication container, using
an enabler, or placing the medication in the individual's hand, and
such other means of medication assistance as defined by rule adopted by
the department. A nonpractitioner may help in the preparation of
legend drugs or controlled substances for self-administration where a
practitioner has determined and communicated orally or by written
direction that such medication preparation assistance is necessary and
appropriate. Medication assistance shall not include assistance with
intravenous medications or injectable medications, except prefilled
insulin syringes.
(15) "Person" means individual, corporation, government or
governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust,
partnership or association, or any other legal entity.
(16) "Practitioner" means:
(a) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician
or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, a
dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon
under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a
registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed
practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW, an optometrist under chapter
18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010,
an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW, a
physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW, a naturopath licensed
under chapter 18.36A RCW, a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW, or,
when acting under the required supervision of a dentist licensed under
chapter 18.32 RCW, a dental hygienist licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(b) A pharmacy, hospital, or other institution licensed,
registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct
research with respect to, or to administer a legend drug in the course
of professional practice or research in this state; and
(c) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a
physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery in any
state, or province of Canada, which shares a common border with the
state of Washington.
(17) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.50.101 and 2013 c 3 s 2 (Initiative Measure No.
502) and 2012 c 8 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, definitions of terms
shall be as indicated where used in this chapter:
(a) "Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by
injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the
body of a patient or research subject by:
(1) a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the
practitioner's authorized agent); or
(2) the patient or research subject at the direction and in the
presence of the practitioner.
(b) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at
the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does
not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or
employee of the carrier or warehouseperson.
(c) "Board" means the state board of pharmacy.
(d) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate
precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or
state laws, or federal or board rules.
(e)(1) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical
structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure
of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:
(i) that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on
the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant,
depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of
a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or
(ii) with respect to a particular individual, that the individual
represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or
hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially
similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule
I or II.
(2) The term does not include:
(i) a controlled substance;
(ii) a substance for which there is an approved new drug
application;
(iii) a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect
for investigational use by a particular person under Section 505 of the
federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, to the extent
conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption; or
(iv) any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption
before an exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.
(f) "Deliver" or "delivery," means the actual or constructive
transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not
there is an agency relationship.
(g) "Department" means the department of health.
(h) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order
for a controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order,
the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging
necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.
(i) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.
(j) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or
dispensing a controlled substance.
(k) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.
(l) "Drug" means (1) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in
the official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the
official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any
supplement to them; (2) controlled substances intended for use in the
diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in
individuals or animals; (3) controlled substances (other than food)
intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of
individuals or animals; and (4) controlled substances intended for use
as a component of any article specified in (1), (2), or (3) of this
subsection. The term does not include devices or their components,
parts, or accessories.
(m) "Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement
administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its
successor agency.
(n) "Immediate precursor" means a substance:
(1) that the state board of pharmacy has found to be and by rule
designates as being the principal compound commonly used, or produced
primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled substance;
(2) that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be
used in the manufacture of a controlled substance; and
(3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit
the manufacture of the controlled substance.
(o) "Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in ((RCW 69.50.101))
subsection (x)(5) of this section, RCW 69.50.204(a) (12) and (34), and
69.50.206(b)(4), the term includes any geometrical isomer; in RCW
69.50.204(a) (8) and (42), and 69.50.210(c) the term includes any
positional isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(a)(35), 69.50.204(c), and
69.50.208(a) the term includes any positional or geometric isomer.
(p) "Lot" means a definite quantity of marijuana, useable
marijuana, or marijuana-infused product identified by a lot number,
every portion or package of which is uniform within recognized
tolerances for the factors that appear in the labeling.
(q) "Lot number" shall identify the licensee by business or trade
name and Washington state unified business identifier number, and the
date of harvest or processing for each lot of marijuana, useable
marijuana, or marijuana-infused product.
(r) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation,
compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance,
either directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of
natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by
a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any
packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of
its container. The term does not include the preparation, compounding,
packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a controlled
substance:
(1) by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's
administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of
the practitioner's professional practice; or
(2) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent
under the practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an
incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(s) "Marijuana" or "marihuana" means all parts of the plant
Cannabis, whether growing or not, with a THC concentration greater than
0.3 percent on a dry weight basis; the seeds thereof; the resin
extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture,
salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or
resin. The term does not include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber
produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant,
any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or
preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted
therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant
which is incapable of germination.
(t) "Marijuana processor" means a person licensed by the state
liquor control board to process marijuana into useable marijuana and
marijuana-infused products, package and label useable marijuana and
marijuana-infused products for sale in retail outlets, and sell useable
marijuana and marijuana-infused products at wholesale to marijuana
retailers.
(u) "Marijuana producer" means a person licensed by the state
liquor control board to produce and sell marijuana at wholesale to
marijuana processors and other marijuana producers.
(v) "Marijuana-infused products" means products that contain
marijuana or marijuana extracts and are intended for human use. The
term "marijuana-infused products" does not include useable marijuana.
(w) "Marijuana retailer" means a person licensed by the state
liquor control board to sell useable marijuana and marijuana-infused
products in a retail outlet.
(x) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced
directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable
origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a
combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:
(1) Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium
derivative, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers,
whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
possible within the specific chemical designation. The term does not
include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.
(2) Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate,
including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers,
esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers, esters,
ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.
(3) Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.
(4) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves
from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their
salts have been removed.
(5) Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.
(6) Cocaine base.
(7) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer
thereof.
(8) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity
of any substance referred to in subparagraphs (1) through (7).
(y) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or
addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of
conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining
liability. The term includes opium, substances derived from opium
(opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The term does not include,
unless specifically designated as controlled under RCW 69.50.201, the
dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts
(dextromethorphan). The term includes the racemic and levorotatory
forms of dextromethorphan.
(z) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum
L., except its seeds.
(aa) "Person" means individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government,
governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial
entity.
(bb) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium
poppy, after mowing.
(cc) "Practitioner" means:
(1) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW; a physician assistant
under chapter 18.71A RCW; an osteopathic physician and surgeon under
chapter 18.57 RCW; an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter
18.57A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.57A.020 subject to any
limitations in RCW 18.57A.040; an optometrist licensed under chapter
18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010
subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010; a dentist under chapter
18.32 RCW; a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW;
a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW; a registered nurse, advanced
registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under
chapter 18.79 RCW; a naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW
who is licensed under RCW 18.36A.030 subject to any limitations in RCW
18.36A.040; a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific
investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise
permitted insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to
distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a
controlled substance in the course of their professional practice or
research in this state.
(2) A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered,
or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with
respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of
professional practice or research in this state.
(3) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a
physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a
dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and
surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, an
advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed to prescribe controlled
substances, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine
in any state of the United States.
(dd) "Prescription" means an order for controlled substances issued
by a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of
Washington to prescribe controlled substances within the scope of his
or her professional practice for a legitimate medical purpose.
(ee) "Production" includes the manufacturing, planting,
cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.
(ff) "Retail outlet" means a location licensed by the state liquor
control board for the retail sale of useable marijuana and marijuana-infused products.
(gg) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(hh) "State," unless the context otherwise requires, means a state
of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of
Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession subject to the
jurisdiction of the United States.
(ii) "THC concentration" means percent of delta-9
tetrahydrocannabinol content per dry weight of any part of the plant
Cannabis, or per volume or weight of marijuana product.
(jj) "Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully possesses a
controlled substance for the individual's own use or for the use of a
member of the individual's household or for administering to an animal
owned by the individual or by a member of the individual's household.
(kk) "Useable marijuana" means dried marijuana flowers. The term
"useable marijuana" does not include marijuana-infused products.
(ll) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means
the ((communication of prescription information by computer, or the))
transmission of ((an exact visual image of)) a prescription ((by
facsimile,)) or ((other electronic means for original prescription
information or prescription)) refill ((information)) authorization for
a ((Schedule III-V controlled substance between an authorized
practitioner and a pharmacy or the transfer of prescription information
for a controlled substance from one pharmacy to another pharmacy)) drug
of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a
prescription or refill authorization verbally transmitted by telephone
nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.

Sec. 3 RCW 69.50.308 and 2012 c 10 s 46 are each amended to read
as follows:
(a) A controlled substance may be dispensed only as provided in
this section. Prescriptions electronically communicated must also meet
the requirements under RCW 69.50.312.
(b) Except when dispensed directly by a practitioner authorized to
prescribe or administer a controlled substance, other than a pharmacy,
to an ultimate user, a substance included in Schedule II may not be
dispensed without the written or electronically communicated
prescription of a practitioner.
(1) Schedule II narcotic substances may be dispensed by a pharmacy
pursuant to a facsimile prescription under the following circumstances:
(i) The facsimile prescription is transmitted by a practitioner to
the pharmacy; and
(ii) The facsimile prescription is for a patient in a long-term
care facility or a hospice program certified or paid by medicare under
Title XVIII of the federal social security act. "Long-term care
facility" means nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW,
assisted living facilities licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, and adult
family homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW; or
(iii) ((The facsimile prescription is for a patient of a hospice
program certified or paid for by medicare under Title XVIII; or
(iv))) The facsimile prescription is for a patient of a hospice
program licensed by the state; and
(((v))) (iv) The practitioner or the practitioner's agent notes on
the facsimile prescription that the patient is a long-term care or
hospice patient.
(2) Injectable Schedule II narcotic substances that are to be
compounded for patient use may be dispensed by a pharmacy pursuant to
a facsimile prescription if the facsimile prescription is transmitted
by a practitioner to the pharmacy.
(3) Under (1) and (2) of this subsection the facsimile prescription
shall serve as the original prescription and shall be maintained as
other Schedule II narcotic substances prescriptions.
(c) In emergency situations, as defined by rule of the state board
of pharmacy, a substance included in Schedule II may be dispensed upon
oral prescription of a practitioner, reduced promptly to writing and
filed by the pharmacy. Prescriptions shall be retained in conformity
with the requirements of RCW 69.50.306. ((A prescription for a
substance included in Schedule II may not be refilled.))
(d) A prescription for a substance included in Schedule II may not
be refilled. A prescription for a substance included in Schedule II
may not be filled more than six months after the date the prescription
was issued.
(e) Except when dispensed directly by a practitioner authorized to
prescribe or administer a controlled substance, other than a pharmacy,
to an ultimate user, a substance included in Schedule III ((or)), IV,
or V, which is a prescription drug as determined under RCW 69.04.560,
may not be dispensed without a written ((or)), oral, or electronically
communicated prescription of a practitioner. Any oral prescription
must be promptly reduced to writing. ((The prescription shall not be
filled or refilled more than six months after the date thereof or be
refilled more than five times, unless renewed by the practitioner.
(e))) (f) The prescription for a substance included in Schedule
III, IV, or V may not be filled or refilled more than six months after
the date issued by the practitioner or be refilled more than five
times, unless renewed by the practitioner.
(g) A valid prescription or lawful order of a practitioner, in
order to be effective in legalizing the possession of controlled
substances, must be issued in good faith for a legitimate medical
purpose by one authorized to prescribe the use of such controlled
substance. An order purporting to be a prescription not in the course
of professional treatment is not a valid prescription or lawful order
of a practitioner within the meaning and intent of this chapter; and
the person who knows or should know that the person is filling such an
order, as well as the person issuing it, can be charged with a
violation of this chapter.
(((f))) (h) A substance included in Schedule V must be distributed
or dispensed only for a medical purpose.
(((g))) (i) A practitioner may dispense or deliver a controlled
substance to or for an individual or animal only for medical treatment
or authorized research in the ordinary course of that practitioner's
profession. Medical treatment includes dispensing or administering a
narcotic drug for pain, including intractable pain.
(((h))) (j) No administrative sanction, or civil or criminal
liability, authorized or created by this chapter may be imposed on a
pharmacist for action taken in reliance on a reasonable belief that an
order purporting to be a prescription was issued by a practitioner in
the usual course of professional treatment or in authorized research.
(((i))) (k) An individual practitioner may not dispense a substance
included in Schedule II, III, or IV for that individual practitioner's
personal use.

Sec. 4 RCW 69.50.312 and 1998 c 222 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Information concerning ((an original)) a prescription for a
controlled substance included in Schedules II through V, or information
concerning a ((prescription)) refill authorization for a controlled
substance included in Schedules III through V may be electronically
communicated to a pharmacy of the patient's choice pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter if the electronically communicated
prescription information complies with the following:
(a) Electronically communicated prescription information must
comply with all applicable statutes and rules regarding the form,
content, recordkeeping, and processing of a prescription for a legend
drug;
(b) The system used for transmitting electronically communicated
prescription information ((and the system used for receiving
electronically communicated prescription information)) must be approved
by the board and in accordance with federal rules for electronically
communicated prescriptions for controlled substance included in
Schedules II through V, as set forth in Title 21 C.F.R. Parts 1300,
1304, 1306, and 1311. This subsection does not apply to currently used
facsimile equipment transmitting an exact visual image of the
prescription. The board shall maintain and provide, upon request, a
list of systems used for electronically communicating prescription
information currently approved by the board;
(c) An explicit opportunity for practitioners must be made to
indicate their preference on whether a therapeutically equivalent
generic drug may be substituted;
(d) Prescription drug orders are confidential health information,
and may be released only to the patient or the patient's authorized
representative, the prescriber or other authorized practitioner then
caring for the patient, or other persons specifically authorized by law
to receive such information;
(e) To maintain confidentiality of prescription records, the
electronic system shall have adequate security and systems safeguards
designed to prevent and detect unauthorized access, modification, or
manipulation of these records. The pharmacist in charge shall
establish or verify the existence of policies and procedures which
ensure the integrity and confidentiality of prescription information
transmitted to the pharmacy by electronic means. All managers,
employees, and agents of the pharmacy are required to read, sign, and
comply with the established policies and procedures; and
(f) The pharmacist shall exercise professional judgment regarding
the accuracy, validity, and authenticity of the prescription drug order
received by way of electronic transmission, consistent with federal and
state laws and rules and guidelines of the board.
(2) The board may adopt rules implementing this section.

--- END ---