BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the adoption of
Initiative Measure No. 1183 by the voters in 2011 privatized the
wholesale and retail distribution of spirits in Washington and made
more efficient and competitive the distribution of wine. The
legislature also finds that some of the regulations adopted to
implement the initiative are at odds with the intent of the people to
privatize and modernize both the wholesale distribution and retail sale
of spirits and to make more efficient and competitive the distribution
of wine. Therefore, the legislature is providing the definitions in
section 2 of this act as further guidance to help accomplish the
transition envisioned by voters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The license issuance fee under RCW 66.24.630(4) does not apply
to spirits retail licensees with respect to sales of spirits in
original containers to retailers licensed to sell spirits for resale
and consumption at their licensed premises.
(2) If no distributor license fee has been paid on a sale of
spirits from a spirits retail licensee to a retailer licensed to sell
spirits for resale and consumption at their licensed premises, the
spirits retail licensee must pay the distributor license fee to the
board, for deposit into the liquor revolving fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---