BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "political subdivision" means the
state, any county, incorporated city, unincorporated city, public local
entity, special purpose district, public-private partnership, and any
other public entity of the state, a county, or city.
(2) The state of Washington and all political subdivisions may not
adopt or implement policy recommendations that deliberately or
inadvertently infringe or restrict private property rights without due
process as may be required by policy recommendations originating in or
traceable to Agenda 21, adopted by the United Nations in 1992 at its
conference on environment and development, or any other international
law or ancillary plan of action that contravenes the Constitution of
the United States or the Constitution of the state of Washington.
(3) Since the United Nations has accredited and enlisted numerous
nongovernmental and intergovernmental organizations to assist in the
implementation of its policies relative to Agenda 21 around the world,
the state of Washington and all political subdivisions may not enter
into any agreement, expend any sum of money, or receive funds
contracting services or giving financial aid to or from the
nongovernmental and intergovernmental organizations defined in Agenda
21.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
Section 1 of this act applies to all actions required by or taken
under the authority of this chapter.

--- END ---