BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the growth
management planning requirements established in chapter 36.70A RCW, the
growth management act, create compliance costs that are a significant
burden to taxpayers and inappropriate redirection of limited financial
resources away from essential local government functions. The
legislature finds also that the growth management act creates unfunded
mandates for counties and cities facing numerous fiscal challenges.
The legislature further finds that local governments have
sufficient expertise and ability to make thoughtful land use and
planning decisions that are consistent with local needs and
preferences, and that a state-directed approach to land use and
planning disregards the insight and responsiveness that can only be
accessed through local decision makers. The legislature, therefore,
intends to repeal chapter 36.70A RCW, the growth management act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 36.70A.010 (Legislative findings) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17
s 1;
(2) RCW 36.70A.011 (Findings -- Rural lands) and 2002 c 212 s 1;
(3) RCW 36.70A.020 (Planning goals) and 2002 c 154 s 1 & 1990 1st
ex.s. c 17 s 2;
(4) RCW 36.70A.030 (Definitions) and 2012 c 21 s 1;
(5) RCW 36.70A.035 (Public participation -- Notice provisions) and
1999 c 315 s 708 & 1997 c 429 s 9;
(6) RCW 36.70A.040 (Who must plan -- Summary of requirements--Development regulations must implement comprehensive plans) and 2000 c
36 s 1, 1998 c 171 s 1, 1995 c 400 s 1, 1993 sp.s. c 6 s 1, & 1990 1st
ex.s. c 17 s 4;
(7) RCW 36.70A.045 (Phasing of comprehensive plan submittal) and
1991 sp.s. c 32 s 15;
(8) RCW 36.70A.050 (Guidelines to classify agriculture, forest, and
mineral lands and critical areas) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 5;
(9) RCW 36.70A.060 (Natural resource lands and critical areas--Development regulations) and 2005 c 423 s 3, 1998 c 286 s 5, 1991 sp.s.
c 32 s 21, & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 6;
(10) RCW 36.70A.070 (Comprehensive plans -- Mandatory elements) and
2010 1st sp.s. c 26 s 6, 2005 c 360 s 2, 2004 c 196 s 1, & 2003 c 152
s 1;
(11) RCW 36.70A.080 (Comprehensive plans -- Optional elements) and
2011 c 318 s 801 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 8;
(12) RCW 36.70A.085 (Comprehensive plans -- Port elements) and 2009
c 514 s 2;
(13) RCW 36.70A.090 (Comprehensive plans -- Innovative techniques)
and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 9;
(14) RCW 36.70A.100 (Comprehensive plans--Must be coordinated) and
1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 10;
(15) RCW 36.70A.103 (State agencies required to comply with
comprehensive plans) and 2002 c 68 s 15, 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 203, &
1991 sp.s. c 32 s 4;
(16) RCW 36.70A.106 (Comprehensive plans -- Development regulations--Transmittal to state -- Amendments -- Expedited review) and 2004 c 197 s 1
& 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 8;
(17) RCW 36.70A.108 (Comprehensive plans -- Transportation element--Multimodal transportation improvements and strategies) and 2005 c 328
s 1;
(18) RCW 36.70A.110 (Comprehensive plans -- Urban growth areas) and
2010 c 211 s 1;
(19) RCW 36.70A.115 (Comprehensive plans and development
regulations must provide sufficient land capacity for development) and
2009 c 121 s 3 & 2003 c 333 s 1;
(20) RCW 36.70A.120 (Planning activities and capital budget
decisions -- Implementation in conformity with comprehensive plan) and
1993 sp.s. c 6 s 3 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 12;
(21) RCW 36.70A.130 (Comprehensive plans -- Review procedures and
schedules -- Amendments) and 2012 c 191 s 1;
(22) RCW 36.70A.1301 (Request to amend urban growth area -- Timing--Criteria) and 2012 c 191 s 2;
(23) RCW 36.70A.131 (Mineral resource lands -- Review of related
designations and development regulations) and 1998 c 286 s 7;
(24) RCW 36.70A.140 (Comprehensive plans -- Ensure public
participation) and 1995 c 347 s 107 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 14;
(25) RCW 36.70A.150 (Identification of lands useful for public
purposes) and 1991 c 322 s 23 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 15;
(26) RCW 36.70A.160 (Identification of open space corridors--Purchase authorized) and 1992 c 227 s 1 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 16;
(27) RCW 36.70A.165 (Property designated as greenbelt or open
space -- Not subject to adverse possession) and 1997 c 429 s 41;
(28) RCW 36.70A.170 (Natural resource lands and critical areas--Designations) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 17;
(29) RCW 36.70A.171 (Playing fields -- Compliance with this chapter)
and 2005 c 423 s 5;
(30) RCW 36.70A.172 (Critical areas -- Designation and protection--Best available science to be used) and 2010 c 211 s 3 & 1995 c 347 s
105;
(31) RCW 36.70A.175 (Wetlands to be delineated in accordance with
manual) and 1995 c 382 s 12;
(32) RCW 36.70A.177 (Agricultural lands -- Innovative zoning
techniques -- Accessory uses) and 2006 c 147 s 1, 2004 c 207 s 1, & 1997
c 429 s 23;
(33) RCW 36.70A.180 (Chapter implementation -- Intent) and 2012 1st
sp.s. c 5 s 3 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 19;
(34) RCW 36.70A.190 (Technical assistance, procedural criteria,
grants, and mediation services) and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 3 & 1990 1st
ex.s. c 17 s 20;
(35) RCW 36.70A.200 (Siting of essential public facilities--Limitation on liability) and 2011 c 60 s 17, 2010 c 62 s 1, 2002 c 68
s 2, 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 205, 1998 c 171 s 3, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 1;
(36) RCW 36.70A.210 (Countywide planning policies) and 2009 c 121
s 2, 1998 c 171 s 4, 1994 c 249 s 28, 1993 sp.s. c 6 s 4, & 1991 sp.s.
c 32 s 2;
(37) RCW 36.70A.215 (Review and evaluation program) and 2011 c 353
s 3 & 1997 c 429 s 25;
(38) RCW 36.70A.250 (Growth management hearings board -- Creation--Members) and 2010 c 211 s 4, 1994 c 249 s 29, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 5;
(39) RCW 36.70A.252 (Growth management hearings board--Consolidation into environmental and land use hearings office) and 2010
c 210 s 15;
(40) RCW 36.70A.260 (Growth management hearings board -- Regional
panels) and 2010 c 211 s 5, 1994 c 249 s 30, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 6;
(41) RCW 36.70A.270 (Growth management hearings board -- Conduct,
procedure, and compensation) and 2010 c 211 s 6, 2010 c 210 s 16, 1997
c 429 s 11, 1996 c 325 s 1, 1994 c 257 s 1, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 7;
(42) RCW 36.70A.280 (Growth management hearings board -- Matters
subject to review) and 2011 c 360 s 17, 2010 c 211 s 7, 2008 c 289 s 5,
2003 c 332 s 2, 1996 c 325 s 2, 1995 c 347 s 108, 1994 c 249 s 31, &
1991 sp.s. c 32 s 9;
(43) RCW 36.70A.290 (Growth management hearings board -- Petitions--Evidence) and 2011 c 277 s 1, 2010 c 211 s 8, 1997 c 429 s 12, & 1995
c 347 s 109;
(44) RCW 36.70A.295 (Growth management hearings board -- Direct
judicial review) and 2010 c 211 s 9 & 1997 c 429 s 13;
(45) RCW 36.70A.300 (Final orders) and 1997 c 429 s 14, 1995 c 347
s 110, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 11;
(46) RCW 36.70A.302 (Growth management hearings board--Determination of invalidity -- Vesting of development permits -- Interim
controls) and 2010 c 211 s 10 & 1997 c 429 s 16;
(47) RCW 36.70A.305 (Expedited review) and 1996 c 325 s 4;
(48) RCW 36.70A.310 (Growth management hearings board -- Limitations
on appeal by the state) and 2010 c 211 s 11, 1994 c 249 s 32, & 1991
sp.s. c 32 s 12;
(49) RCW 36.70A.320 (Presumption of validity -- Burden of proof--Plans and regulations) and 1997 c 429 s 20, 1995 c 347 s 111, & 1991
sp.s. c 32 s 13;
(50) RCW 36.70A.3201 (Growth management hearings board -- Legislative
intent and finding) and 2010 c 211 s 12 & 1997 c 429 s 2;
(51) RCW 36.70A.330 (Noncompliance) and 1997 c 429 s 21, 1995 c 347
s 112, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 14;
(52) RCW 36.70A.335 (Order of invalidity issued before July 27,
1997) and 1997 c 429 s 22;
(53) RCW 36.70A.340 (Noncompliance and sanctions) and 2011 c 120 s
2 & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 26;
(54) RCW 36.70A.345 (Sanctions) and 2010 c 211 s 13, 1994 c 249 s
33, & 1993 sp.s. c 6 s 5;
(55) RCW 36.70A.350 (New fully contained communities) and 1991
sp.s. c 32 s 16;
(56) RCW 36.70A.360 (Master planned resorts) and 1998 c 112 s 2 &
1991 sp.s. c 32 s 17;
(57) RCW 36.70A.362 (Master planned resorts -- Existing resort may be
included) and 1997 c 382 s 1;
(58) RCW 36.70A.365 (Major industrial developments) and 1995 c 190
s 1;
(59) RCW 36.70A.367 (Major industrial developments -- Master planned
locations) and 2007 c 433 s 1, 2004 c 208 s 1, 2003 c 88 s 1, 2002 c
306 s 1, 2001 c 326 s 1, 1998 c 289 s 2, 1997 c 402 s 1, & 1996 c 167
s 2;
(60) RCW 36.70A.368 (Major industrial developments -- Master planned
locations -- Reclaimed surface coal mine sites) and 2007 c 194 s 1;
(61) RCW 36.70A.370 (Protection of private property) and 1991 sp.s.
c 32 s 18;
(62) RCW 36.70A.380 (Extension of designation date) and 1991 sp.s.
c 32 s 39;
(63) RCW 36.70A.385 (Environmental planning pilot projects) and
1998 c 245 s 30, 1995 c 399 s 43, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 20;
(64) RCW 36.70A.390 (Moratoria, interim zoning controls -- Public
hearing -- Limitation on length -- Exceptions) and 1992 c 207 s 6;
(65) RCW 36.70A.400 (Accessory apartments) and 1993 c 478 s 11;
(66) RCW 36.70A.410 (Treatment of residential structures occupied
by persons with handicaps) and 1993 c 478 s 23;
(67) RCW 36.70A.420 (Transportation projects -- Findings -- Intent) and
1994 c 258 s 1;
(68) RCW 36.70A.430 (Transportation projects -- Collaborative review
process) and 1994 c 258 s 2;
(69) RCW 36.70A.450 (Family day-care provider's home facility--County or city may not prohibit in residential or commercial area--Conditions) and 2007 c 17 s 13, 2003 c 286 s 5, 1995 c 49 s 3, & 1994
c 273 s 17;
(70) RCW 36.70A.460 (Watershed restoration projects -- Permit
processing -- Fish habitat enhancement project) and 2003 c 39 s 21, 1998
c 249 s 11, & 1995 c 378 s 11;
(71) RCW 36.70A.470 (Project review -- Amendment suggestion
procedure -- Definitions) and 1995 c 347 s 102;
(72) RCW 36.70A.480 (Shorelines of the state) and 2010 c 107 s 2,
2003 c 321 s 5, & 1995 c 347 s 104;
(73) RCW 36.70A.481 (Construction -- Chapter 347, Laws of 1995) and
1995 c 382 s 13;
(74) RCW 36.70A.490 (Growth management planning and environmental
review fund -- Established) and 2012 1st sp.s. c 1 s 309 & 1995 c 347 s
115;
(75) RCW 36.70A.500 (Growth management planning and environmental
review fund -- Awarding of grant or loan -- Procedures) and 2012 1st sp.s.
c 1 s 310, 1997 c 429 s 28, & 1995 c 347 s 116;
(76) RCW 36.70A.510 (General aviation airports) and 1996 c 239 s 5;
(77) RCW 36.70A.520 (National historic towns -- Designation) and 2000
c 196 s 1;
(78) RCW 36.70A.530 (Land use development incompatible with
military installation not allowed -- Revision of comprehensive plans and
development regulations) and 2004 c 28 s 2;
(79) RCW 36.70A.540 (Affordable housing incentive programs -- Low-income housing units) and 2009 c 80 s 1 & 2006 c 149 s 2;
(80) RCW 36.70A.550 (Aquifer conservation zones) and 2007 c 159 s
1;
(81) RCW 36.70A.570 (Regulation of forest practices) and 2007 c 236
s 2;
(82) RCW 36.70A.695 (Development regulations -- Jurisdictions
specified -- Electric vehicle infrastructure) and 2009 c 459 s 12;
(83) RCW 36.70A.700 (Purpose -- Intent -- 2011 c 360) and 2011 c 360 s
1;
(84) RCW 36.70A.702 (Construction) and 2011 c 360 s 15;
(85) RCW 36.70A.703 (Definitions) and 2011 c 360 s 2;
(86) RCW 36.70A.705 (Voluntary stewardship program established--Administered by commission -- Agency participation) and 2011 c 360 s 3;
(87) RCW 36.70A.710 (Critical areas protection -- Alternative to RCW
36.70A.060 -- County's responsibilities -- Procedures) and 2011 c 360 s 4;
(88) RCW 36.70A.715 (Funding by commission -- County's duties--Watershed group established) and 2011 c 360 s 5;
(89) RCW 36.70A.720 (Watershed group's duties -- Work plan--Conditional priority funding) and 2011 c 360 s 6;
(90) RCW 36.70A.725 (Technical review of work plan -- Time frame for
action by director) and 2011 c 360 s 7;
(91) RCW 36.70A.730 (Report by watershed group -- Director consults
with statewide advisory committee) and 2011 c 360 s 8;
(92) RCW 36.70A.735 (When work plan is not approved, fails, or is
unfunded -- County's duties -- Rules) and 2011 c 360 s 9;
(93) RCW 36.70A.740 (Commission's duties -- Timelines) and 2011 c 360
s 10;
(94) RCW 36.70A.745 (Statewide advisory committee -- Membership) and
2011 c 360 s 11;
(95) RCW 36.70A.750 (Agricultural operators -- Individual stewardship
plan) and 2011 c 360 s 12;
(96) RCW 36.70A.755 (Implementing the work plan) and 2011 c 360 s
13;
(97) RCW 36.70A.760 (Agricultural operators -- Withdrawal from
program) and 2011 c 360 s 14;
(98) RCW 36.70A.800 (Role of growth strategies commission) and 1990
1st ex.s. c 17 s 86;
(99) RCW 36.70A.900 (Severability -- 1990 1st ex.s. c 17) and 1990
1st ex.s. c 17 s 88;
(100) RCW 36.70A.901 (Part, section headings not law -- 1990 1st
ex.s. c 17) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 89;
(101) RCW 36.70A.902 (Section headings not law -- 1991 sp.s. c 32)
and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 40;
(102) RCW 36.70A.903 (Transfer of powers, duties, and functions)
and 2010 c 210 s 43; and
(103) RCW 36.70A.904 (Conflict with federal requirements -- 2011 c
360) and 2011 c 360 s 21.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of commerce shall prepare
recommendations, in the form of draft legislation, to modify or repeal
statutory provisions associated with chapter 36.70A RCW that are
affected by the repeal of chapter 36.70A RCW. The recommendations
required by this section must be submitted to the appropriate
committees of the house of representatives and the senate by December
1, 2013.

--- END ---