BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that state,
regional, or federal programs designed to propose or implement a cap
and trade system, regulate motor vehicle fuel economy, or otherwise
address greenhouse gas emissions would have a substantial effect on the
economy of the state of Washington and the livelihood of all
Washingtonians.
(2) The legislature further finds that proper procedural safeguards
to control arbitrary administrative action and the abuse of
discretionary power at the administrative level do not currently exist
in this area as necessary to protect the interests of the people of
Washington. As such, it is the intent of the legislature to expressly
limit any delegations to its various administrative agencies in regards
to programs designed to implement a cap and trade system, regulate
motor vehicle fuel economy, or otherwise address greenhouse gas
emissions and to create a mechanism whereby the legislature can
adequately fulfill its constitutional duty to ensure oversight of
administrative action in this important regulatory area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Greenhouse gas" means carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide,
sulfur hexafluoride, hydrofluorocarbon, or perfluorocarbon.
(2) "Western climate initiative" means the process that was
initiated in February 2007 by the governors of Arizona, California, New
Mexico, Oregon, and Washington to evaluate and implement ways to reduce
their states' emissions of greenhouse gases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) No state agency may implement a cap and
trade system, regulate motor vehicle fuel economy, or otherwise address
greenhouse gas emissions without direct and specific legislative
authorization to conduct the activity.
(2) To qualify as direct and specific legislative authorization,
the authorization must take the form of a section of substantive law or
provision in a budget included as a session law published by the
statute law committee in the year 2013 or later. Sections of
legislation vetoed by the governor do not qualify as legislative
authorization.
(3) To assist the legislature with evaluating agency activity in
this area, state agencies may formally request legislation or budget
items related to addressing greenhouse gas emissions. Any such request
of the legislature from the executive branch must be accompanied by a
comprehensive assessment of the fiscal and regulatory impacts of their
proposal on Washington's budget, economy, consumers, families, and both
large and small businesses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1)(a) Any state agency either in the
process of, or planning for, the implementation of a cap and trade
system, regulation of motor vehicle fuel economy, or otherwise
addressing greenhouse gas emissions as of the effective date of this
section must suspend all activities related to those efforts, including
the enforcing or administrating of any existing rules, until the
conditions of section 3 of this act are satisfied.
(b) This section includes, but is not limited to, the
implementation of chapter 70.120A RCW and any participation in the
western climate initiative or other multijurisdictional partnerships to
develop greenhouse gas regulations.
(2) Any state agency that must suspend an activity under this
section or that has initiated or completed a related rule-making
process within three months of either the effective date of this
section or the release of any recommendations by the participants in
the western climate initiative must provide a written report to the
legislature, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, and to the governor, on the
related activity. The report must include a detailed description of
the affected program, a comprehensive analysis of the fiscal and
regulatory impacts of the proposed program on Washington's budget,
economy, consumers, families, and both small and large businesses, and
the contents of any proposed legislation that could authorize the
affected program for consideration under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Any federal law, rule, order, or other act
by the federal government violating the provisions of this chapter is
declared to be invalid in this state, is not recognized by and is
specifically rejected by this state, and is considered as null and void
and of no effect in this state.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.235.020 and 2008 c 14 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, the state shall
limit emissions of greenhouse gases to achieve the following emission
reductions for Washington state:
(i) By 2020, reduce overall emissions of greenhouse gases in the
state to 1990 levels;
(ii) By 2035, reduce overall emissions of greenhouse gases in the
state to twenty-five percent below 1990 levels;
(iii) By 2050, the state will do its part to reach global climate
stabilization levels by reducing overall emissions to fifty percent
below 1990 levels, or seventy percent below the state's expected
emissions that year.
(b) By December 1, 2008, the department shall submit a greenhouse
gas reduction plan for review and approval to the legislature,
describing those actions necessary to achieve the emission reductions
in (a) of this subsection by using existing statutory authority and any
additional authority granted by the legislature. Except as provided in
section 4 of this act, actions taken using existing statutory authority
may proceed prior to approval of the greenhouse gas reduction plan.
(c) Except where explicitly stated otherwise, nothing in chapter
14, Laws of 2008 limits any state agency authorities as they existed
prior to June 12, 2008.
(d) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, and consistent
with this directive, the department shall take the following actions:
(i) Develop and implement a system for monitoring and reporting
emissions of greenhouse gases as required under RCW 70.94.151; and
(ii) Track progress toward meeting the emission reductions
established in this subsection, including the results from policies
currently in effect that have been previously adopted by the state and
policies adopted in the future, and report on that progress.
(2) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, by December 31st
of each even-numbered year beginning in 2010, the department and the
department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce
shall report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
senate and house of representatives the total emissions of greenhouse
gases for the preceding two years, and totals in each major source
sector. The department shall ensure the reporting rules adopted under
RCW 70.94.151 allow it to develop a comprehensive inventory of
emissions of greenhouse gases from all significant sectors of the
Washington economy.
(3) Except for purposes of reporting, emissions of carbon dioxide
from industrial combustion of biomass in the form of fuel wood, wood
waste, wood by-products, and wood residuals shall not be considered a
greenhouse gas as long as the region's silvicultural sequestration
capacity is maintained or increased.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.235.040 and 2008 c 14 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in section 4 of this act, within eighteen months
of the next and each successive global or national assessment of
climate change science, the department shall consult with the climate
impacts group at the University of Washington regarding the science on
human-caused climate change and provide a report to the legislature
summarizing that science and make recommendations regarding whether the
greenhouse gas emissions reductions required under RCW 70.235.020 need
to be updated.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.235.050 and 2009 c 519 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, all state agencies
shall meet the statewide greenhouse gas emission limits established in
RCW 70.235.020 to achieve the following, using the estimates and
strategy established in subsections (2) and (3) of this section:
(a) By July 1, 2020, reduce emissions by fifteen percent from 2005
emission levels;
(b) By 2035, reduce emissions to thirty-six percent below 2005
levels; and
(c) By 2050, reduce emissions to the greater reduction of fifty-seven and one-half percent below 2005 levels, or seventy percent below
the expected state government emissions that year.
(2)(a) By June 30, 2010, all state agencies shall report estimates
of emissions for 2005 to the department, including 2009 levels of
emissions, and projected emissions through 2035.
(b) State agencies required to report under RCW 70.94.151 must
estimate emissions from methodologies recommended by the department and
must be based on actual operation of those agencies. Agencies not
required to report under RCW 70.94.151 shall derive emissions estimates
using an emissions calculator provided by the department.
(3) By June 30, 2011, each state agency shall submit to the
department a strategy to meet the requirements in subsection (1) of
this section. The strategy must address employee travel activities,
teleconferencing alternatives, and include existing and proposed
actions, a timeline for reductions, and recommendations for budgetary
and other incentives to reduce emissions, especially from employee
business travel.
(4) By October 1st of each even-numbered year beginning in 2012,
each state agency shall report to the department the actions taken to
meet the emission reduction targets under the strategy for the
preceding fiscal biennium. The department may authorize the department
of ((general administration)) enterprise services to report on behalf
of any state agency having fewer than five hundred full-time equivalent
employees at any time during the reporting period. The department
shall cooperate with the department of ((general administration))
enterprise services and the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce to develop consolidated reporting
methodologies that incorporate emission reduction actions taken across
all or substantially all state agencies.
(5) All state agencies shall cooperate in providing information to
the department, the department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services, and the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce for the purposes of this section.
(6) The governor shall designate a person as the single point of
accountability for all energy and climate change initiatives within
state agencies. This position must be funded from current full-time
equivalent allocations without increasing budgets or staffing levels.
If duties must be shifted within an agency, they must be shifted among
current full-time equivalent allocations. All agencies, councils, or
work groups with energy or climate change initiatives shall coordinate
with this designee.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.235.060 and 2009 c 519 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, the department
shall develop an emissions calculator to assist state agencies in
estimating aggregate emissions as well as in estimating the relative
emissions from different ways in carrying out activities.
(2) The department may use data such as totals of building space
occupied, energy purchases and generation, motor vehicle fuel purchases
and total mileage driven, and other reasonable sources of data to make
these estimates. The estimates may be derived from a single
methodology using these or other factors, except that for the top ten
state agencies in occupied building space and vehicle miles driven, the
estimates must be based upon the actual and projected operations of
those agencies. The estimates may be adjusted, and reasonable
estimates derived, when agencies have been created since 1990 or
functions reorganized among state agencies since 1990. The estimates
may incorporate projected emissions reductions that also affect state
agencies under the program authorized in RCW 70.235.020 and other
existing policies that will result in emissions reductions.
(3) By December 31st of each even-numbered year beginning in 2010,
the department shall report to the governor and to the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives the total state
agencies' emissions of greenhouse gases for 2005 and the preceding two
years and actions taken to meet the emissions reduction targets.

Sec. 10 RCW 70.235.070 and 2009 c 519 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in section 4 of this act, beginning in 2010,
when distributing capital funds through competitive programs for
infrastructure and economic development projects, all state agencies
must consider whether the entity receiving the funds has adopted
policies to reduce greenhouse gas emissions. Agencies also must
consider whether the project is consistent with:
(1) The state's limits on the emissions of greenhouse gases
established in RCW 70.235.020;
(2) Statewide goals to reduce annual per capita vehicle miles
traveled by 2050, in accordance with RCW 47.01.440, except that the
agency shall consider whether project locations in rural counties, as
defined in RCW 43.160.020, will maximize the reduction of vehicle miles
traveled; and
(3) Applicable federal emissions reduction requirements.

Sec. 11 RCW 70.120A.010 and 2010 c 76 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, pursuant to the
federal clean air act, the legislature adopts the California motor
vehicle emission standards in Title 13 of the California Code of
Regulations, effective January 1, 2005, except as provided in this
chapter. The department of ecology shall adopt rules to implement the
emission standards of the state of California for passenger cars, light
duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles, and shall amend the
rules from time to time, to maintain consistency with the California
motor vehicle emission standards and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 7507 (section 177
of the federal clean air act). Notwithstanding other provisions of
this chapter, the department of ecology shall not adopt the zero
emission vehicle program regulations contained in Title 13 section 1962
of the California Code of Regulations effective January 1, 2005.
During rule development, the department of ecology shall convene an
advisory group composed of industry and consumer group representatives.
Any proposed rules or changes to rules shall be subject to review and
comment by the advisory group, prior to rule adoption. The order of
adoption for the rules required in this section shall include the
signature of the governor. The rules shall be effective only for those
model years for which the state of Oregon has adopted the California
motor vehicle emission standards. This section does not limit the
department of ecology's authority to regulate motor vehicle emissions
for any other class of vehicle.
(2) Motor vehicles with a model year equal to or later than the
first model year for which new vehicles sold to Washington state
residents are required to comply with California motor vehicle emission
standards are exempt from emission inspections under chapter 70.120
RCW.
(3) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use by a resident of this state of a motor vehicle acquired and used
while the resident is a member of the armed services and is stationed
outside this state pursuant to military orders.

Sec. 12 RCW 70.120A.050 and 2008 c 32 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, no model year 2010
or subsequent model year new passenger car, light duty truck, or medium
duty passenger vehicle may be sold in Washington unless there is
securely and conspicuously affixed in a clearly visible location a
label on which the manufacturer clearly discloses comparative
greenhouse gas emissions for that new vehicle.
(2) The label required by this section should include a greenhouse
gas index or rating system that contains quantitative and graphical
information presented in a continuous, easy-to-read scale that compares
the greenhouse gas emissions from the vehicle with the average
projected greenhouse gas emissions from all passenger cars, light duty
trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles of the same model year. For
reference purposes, the index or rating system should also identify the
greenhouse gas emissions from the vehicle model of that same model year
that has the lowest greenhouse gas emissions.
(3) The index or rating system included in the label under
subsection (2) of this section shall be updated as necessary to ensure
that the differences in greenhouse gas emissions among vehicles are
readily apparent to the consumer.
(4) An automobile manufacturer may apply to the department of
ecology for approval of an alternative to the disclosure labeling
requirement that is at least as effective in providing notification and
disclosure of the vehicle's greenhouse gas emissions as is the labeling
required by this section.
(5) A label that complies with the requirements of the California
greenhouse gas vehicle labeling program shall be deemed to meet the
requirements of this section and any rules adopted under this section.
(6) The department of ecology may adopt such rules as are necessary
to implement this section.
(7) The department of ecology shall provide a status report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on or before December 1,
2008, (a) outlining its approach and progress toward implementing a
greenhouse gas vehicle emissions disclosure labeling program for
Washington, (b) providing an update on the status of California's
greenhouse gas vehicle labeling program, and (c) making recommendations
as necessary for legislation to meet the intent and purpose of chapter
32, Laws of 2008 by the 2010 model year.

Sec. 13 RCW 70.94.151 and 2010 c 146 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of any activated authority or the department, may
classify air contaminant sources, by ordinance, resolution, rule or
regulation, which in its judgment may cause or contribute to air
pollution, according to levels and types of emissions and other
characteristics which cause or contribute to air pollution, and may
require registration or reporting or both for any such class or
classes. Classifications made pursuant to this section may be for
application to the area of jurisdiction of such authority, or the state
as a whole or to any designated area within the jurisdiction, and shall
be made with special reference to effects on health, economic and
social factors, and physical effects on property.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any
person operating or responsible for the operation of air contaminant
sources of any class for which the ordinances, resolutions, rules or
regulations of the department or board of the authority, require
registration or reporting shall register therewith and make reports
containing information as may be required by such department or board
concerning location, size and height of contaminant outlets, processes
employed, nature of the contaminant emission and such other information
as is relevant to air pollution and available or reasonably capable of
being assembled. In the case of emissions of greenhouse gases as
defined in RCW 70.235.010 the department shall, except as provided in
section 4 of this act, adopt rules requiring reporting of those
emissions. The department or board may require that such registration
or reporting be accompanied by a fee, and may determine the amount of
such fee for such class or classes: PROVIDED, That the amount of the
fee shall only be to compensate for the costs of administering such
registration or reporting program which shall be defined as initial
registration and annual or other periodic reports from the source owner
providing information directly related to air pollution registration,
on-site inspections necessary to verify compliance with registration
requirements, data storage and retrieval systems necessary for support
of the registration program, emission inventory reports and emission
reduction credits computed from information provided by sources
pursuant to registration program requirements, staff review, including
engineering or other reliable analysis for accuracy and currentness, of
information provided by sources pursuant to registration program
requirements, clerical and other office support provided in direct
furtherance of the registration program, and administrative support
provided in directly carrying out the registration program: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That any such registration made with either the board or the
department shall preclude a further registration and reporting with any
other board or the department, except that emissions of greenhouse
gases as defined in RCW 70.235.010 must be reported as required under
subsection (5) of this section.
All registration program and reporting fees collected by the
department shall be deposited in the air pollution control account.
All registration program fees collected by the local air authorities
shall be deposited in their respective treasuries.
(3) If a registration or report has been filed for a grain
warehouse or grain elevator as required under this section,
registration, reporting, or a registration program fee shall not, after
January 1, 1997, again be required under this section for the warehouse
or elevator unless the capacity of the warehouse or elevator as listed
as part of the license issued for the facility has been increased since
the date the registration or reporting was last made. If the capacity
of the warehouse or elevator listed as part of the license is
increased, any registration or reporting required for the warehouse or
elevator under this section must be made by the date the warehouse or
elevator receives grain from the first harvest season that occurs after
the increase in its capacity is listed in the license.
This subsection does not apply to a grain warehouse or grain
elevator if the warehouse or elevator handles more than ten million
bushels of grain annually.
(4) For the purposes of subsection (3) of this section:
(a) A "grain warehouse" or "grain elevator" is an establishment
classified in standard industrial classification (SIC) code 5153 for
wholesale trade for which a license is required and includes, but is
not limited to, such a licensed facility that also conducts cleaning
operations for grain;
(b) A "license" is a license issued by the department of
agriculture licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain elevator
under chapter 22.09 RCW or a license issued by the federal government
licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain elevator for
purposes similar to those of licensure for the facility under chapter
22.09 RCW; and
(c) "Grain" means a grain or a pulse.
(5)(a) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, the department
shall adopt rules requiring persons to report emissions of greenhouse
gases as defined in RCW 70.235.010 where those emissions from a single
facility, source, or site, or from fossil fuels sold in Washington by
a single supplier meet or exceed ten thousand metric tons of carbon
dioxide equivalent annually. The department may phase in the
requirement to report greenhouse gas emissions until the reporting
threshold in this subsection is met, which must occur by January 1,
2012. In addition, the rules must require that:
(i) Emissions of greenhouse gases resulting from the combustion of
fossil fuels be reported separately from emissions of greenhouse gases
resulting from the combustion of biomass;
(ii) Reporting will start in 2010 for 2009 emissions. Each annual
report must include emissions data for the preceding calendar year and
must be submitted to the department by October 31st of the year in
which the report is due. However, starting in 2011, a person who is
required to report greenhouse gas emissions to the United States
environmental protection agency under 40 C.F.R. Part 98, as adopted on
September 22, 2009, must submit the report required under this section
to the department concurrent with the submission to the United States
environmental protection agency. Except as otherwise provided in this
section, the data for emissions in Washington and any corrections
thereto that are reported to the United States environmental protection
agency must be the emissions data reported to the department; and
(iii) Emissions of carbon dioxide associated with the complete
combustion or oxidation of liquid motor vehicle fuel, special fuel, or
aircraft fuel that is sold in Washington where the annual emissions
associated with that combustion or oxidation equal or exceed ten
thousand metric tons be reported to the department. Each person who is
required to file periodic tax reports of motor vehicle fuel sales under
RCW 82.36.031 or special fuel sales under RCW 82.38.150, or each
distributor of aircraft fuel required to file periodic tax reports
under RCW 82.42.040 must report to the department the annual emissions
of carbon dioxide from the complete combustion or oxidation of the
fuels listed in those reports as sold in the state of Washington. The
department shall not require suppliers to use additional data to
calculate greenhouse gas emissions other than the data the suppliers
report to the department of licensing. The rules may allow this
information to be aggregated when reported to the department. The
department and the department of licensing shall enter into an
interagency agreement to ensure proprietary and confidential
information is protected if the departments share reported information.
Any proprietary or confidential information exempt from disclosure when
reported to the department of licensing is exempt from disclosure when
shared by the department of licensing with the department under this
provision.
(b)(i) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the rules
adopted by the department under (a) of this subsection must be
consistent with the regulations adopted by the United States
environmental protection agency in 40 C.F.R. Part 98 on September 22,
2009.
(ii) The department may by rule include additional gases to the
definition of "greenhouse gas" in RCW 70.235.010 only if the gas has
been designated as a greenhouse gas by the United States congress or by
the United States environmental protection agency. Prior to including
additional gases to the definition of "greenhouse gas" in RCW
70.235.010, the department shall notify the appropriate committees of
the legislature. Decisions to amend the rule to include additional
gases must be made prior to December 1st of any year and the amended
rule may not take effect before the end of the regular legislative
session in the next year.
(iii) The department may by rule exempt persons who are required to
report greenhouse gas emissions to the United States environmental
protection agency and who emit less than ten thousand metric tons
carbon dioxide equivalent annually.
(iv) The department must establish a methodology for persons who
are not required to report under this section to voluntarily report
their greenhouse gas emissions.
(c) The department shall review and if necessary update its rules
whenever the United States environmental protection agency adopts final
amendments to 40 C.F.R. Part 98 to ensure consistency with federal
reporting requirements for emissions of greenhouse gases. However, the
department shall not amend its rules in a manner that conflicts with
(a) of this subsection.
(d) The department shall share any reporting information reported
to it with the local air authority in which the person reporting under
the rules adopted by the department operates.
(e) The fee provisions in subsection (2) of this section apply to
reporting of emissions of greenhouse gases. Persons required to report
under (a) of this subsection who fail to report or pay the fee required
in subsection (2) of this section are subject to enforcement penalties
under this chapter. The department shall enforce the reporting rule
requirements unless it approves a local air authority's request to
enforce the requirements for persons operating within the authority's
jurisdiction. However, neither the department nor a local air
authority approved under this section are authorized to assess
enforcement penalties on persons required to report under (a) of this
subsection until six months after the department adopts its reporting
rule in 2010.
(f) The energy facility site evaluation council shall, except as
provided in section 4 of this act, simultaneously with the department,
adopt rules that impose greenhouse gas reporting requirements in site
certifications on owners or operators of a facility permitted by the
energy facility site evaluation council. The greenhouse gas reporting
requirements imposed by the energy facility site evaluation council
must be the same as the greenhouse gas reporting requirements imposed
by the department. The department shall share any information reported
to it from facilities permitted by the energy facility site evaluation
council with the council, including notice of a facility that has
failed to report as required. The energy facility site evaluation
council shall contract with the department to monitor the reporting
requirements adopted under this section.
(g) The inclusion or failure to include any person, source, classes
of persons or sources, or types of emissions of greenhouse gases into
the department's rules for reporting under this section does not
indicate whether such a person, source, or category is appropriate for
inclusion in state, regional, or national greenhouse gas reduction
programs or strategies. Furthermore, aircraft fuel purchased in the
state may not be considered equivalent to aircraft fuel combusted in
the state.
(h)(i) The definitions in RCW 70.235.010 apply throughout this
subsection (5) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(ii) For the purpose of this subsection (5), the term "supplier"
includes: (A) A motor vehicle fuel supplier or a motor vehicle fuel
importer, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.36.010; (B) a special
fuel supplier or a special fuel importer, as those terms are defined in
RCW 82.38.020; and (C) a distributor of aircraft fuel, as those terms
are defined in RCW 82.42.010.
(iii) For the purpose of this subsection (5), the term "person"
includes: (A) An owner or operator, as those terms are defined by the
United States environmental protection agency in its mandatory
greenhouse gas reporting regulation in 40 C.F.R. Part 98, as adopted on
September 22, 2009; and (B) a supplier.

Sec. 14 RCW 70.94.161 and 2008 c 14 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of ecology, or board of an authority, shall require
renewable permits for the operation of air contaminant sources subject
to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) Permits shall be issued for a term of five years. A permit may
be modified or amended during its term at the request of the permittee,
or for any reason allowed by the federal clean air act. The rules
adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall include rules
for permit amendments and modifications. The terms and conditions of
a permit shall remain in effect after the permit itself expires if the
permittee submits a timely and complete application for permit renewal.
(2)(a) Rules establishing the elements for a statewide operating
permit program and the process for permit application and renewal
consistent with federal requirements shall be established by the
department by January 1, 1993. The rules shall provide that every
proposed permit must be reviewed prior to issuance by a professional
engineer or staff under the direct supervision of a professional
engineer in the employ of the permitting authority. The permit program
established by these rules shall be administered by the department and
delegated local air authorities. Rules developed under this subsection
shall not preclude a delegated local air authority from including in a
permit its own more stringent emission standards and operating
restrictions.
(b) The board of any local air pollution control authority may
apply to the department of ecology for a delegation order authorizing
the local authority to administer the operating permit program for
sources under that authority's jurisdiction. The department shall, by
order, approve such delegation, if the department finds that the local
authority has the technical and financial resources, to discharge the
responsibilities of a permitting authority under the federal clean air
act. A delegation request shall include adequate information about the
local authority's resources to enable the department to make the
findings required by this subsection. However, any delegation order
issued under this subsection shall take effect ninety days after the
environmental protection agency authorizes the local authority to issue
operating permits under the federal clean air act.
(c) Except for the authority granted the energy facility site
evaluation council to issue permits for the new construction,
reconstruction, or enlargement or operation of new energy facilities
under chapter 80.50 RCW, the department may exercise the authority, as
delegated by the environmental protection agency, to administer Title
IV of the federal clean air act as amended and to delegate such
administration to local authorities as applicable pursuant to (b) of
this subsection.
(3) In establishing technical standards, defined in RCW 70.94.030,
the permitting authority shall consider and, if found to be
appropriate, give credit for waste reduction within the process.
(4) Operating permits shall apply to all sources (a) where required
by the federal clean air act, and (b) for any source that may cause or
contribute to air pollution in such quantity as to create a threat to
the public health or welfare. Subsection (b) of this subsection is not
intended to apply to small businesses except when both of the following
limitations are satisfied: (i) The source is in an area exceeding or
threatening to exceed federal or state air quality standards; and (ii)
the department provides a reasonable justification that requiring a
source to have a permit is necessary to meet a federal or state air
quality standard, or to prevent exceeding a standard in an area
threatening to exceed the standard. For purposes of this subsection
"areas threatening to exceed air quality standards" shall mean areas
projected by the department to exceed such standards within five years.
Prior to identifying threatened areas the department shall hold a
public hearing or hearings within the proposed areas.
(5) Sources operated by government agencies are not exempt under
this section.
(6) Within one hundred eighty days after the United States
environmental protection agency approves the state operating permit
program, a person required to have a permit shall submit to the
permitting authority a compliance plan and permit application, signed
by a responsible official, certifying the accuracy of the information
submitted. Until permits are issued, existing sources shall be allowed
to operate under presently applicable standards and conditions provided
that such sources submit complete and timely permit applications.
(7) All draft permits shall be subject to public notice and
comment. The rules adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section
shall specify procedures for public notice and comment. Such
procedures shall provide the permitting agency with an opportunity to
respond to comments received from interested parties prior to the time
that the proposed permit is submitted to the environmental protection
agency for review pursuant to section 505(a) of the federal clean air
act. In the event that the environmental protection agency objects to
a proposed permit pursuant to section 505(b) of the federal clean air
act, the permitting authority shall not issue the permit, unless the
permittee consents to the changes required by the environmental
protection agency.
(8) The procedures contained in chapter 43.21B RCW shall apply to
permit appeals. The pollution control hearings board may stay the
effectiveness of any permit issued under this section during the
pendency of an appeal filed by the permittee, if the permittee
demonstrates that compliance with the permit during the pendency of the
appeal would require significant expenditures that would not be
necessary in the event that the permittee prevailed on the merits of
the appeal.
(9) After the effective date of any permit program promulgated
under this section, it shall be unlawful for any person to: (a)
Operate a permitted source in violation of any requirement of a permit
issued under this section; or (b) fail to submit a permit application
at the time required by rules adopted under subsection (2) of this
section.
(10) Each air operating permit shall state the origin of and
specific legal authority for each requirement included therein. Every
requirement in an operating permit shall be based upon the most
stringent of the following requirements:
(a) The federal clean air act and rules implementing that act,
including provision of the approved state implementation plan;
(b) This chapter and rules adopted thereunder;
(c) In permits issued by a local air pollution control authority,
the requirements of any order or regulation adopted by that authority;
(d) Chapter 70.98 RCW and rules adopted thereunder; and
(e) Chapter 80.50 RCW and rules adopted thereunder.
(11) Consistent with the provisions of the federal clean air act,
the permitting authority may issue general permits covering categories
of permitted sources, and temporary permits authorizing emissions from
similar operations at multiple temporary locations.
(12) Permit program sources within the territorial jurisdiction of
an authority delegated the operating permit program shall file their
permit applications with that authority, except that permit
applications for sources regulated on a statewide basis pursuant to RCW
70.94.395 shall be filed with the department. Permit program sources
outside the territorial jurisdiction of a delegated authority shall
file their applications with the department. Permit program sources
subject to chapter 80.50 RCW shall, irrespective of their location,
file their applications with the energy facility site evaluation
council.
(13) When issuing operating permits to coal-fired electric
generating plants, the permitting authority shall establish
requirements consistent with Title IV of the federal clean air act.
(14)(a) The department and the local air authorities are authorized
to assess and to collect, and each source emitting one hundred tons or
more per year of a regulated pollutant shall pay an interim assessment
to fund the development of the operating permit program during fiscal
year 1994.
(b) The department shall conduct a workload analysis and prepare an
operating permit program development budget for fiscal year 1994. The
department shall allocate among all sources emitting one hundred tons
or more per year of a regulated pollutant during calendar year 1992 the
costs identified in its program development budget according to a
three-tiered model, with each of the three tiers being equally
weighted, based upon:
(i) The number of sources;
(ii) The complexity of sources; and
(iii) The size of sources, as measured by the quantity of each
regulated pollutant emitted by the source.
(c) Each local authority and the department shall collect from
sources under their respective jurisdictions the interim fee determined
by the department and shall remit the fee to the department.
(d) Each local authority may, in addition, allocate its fiscal year
1994 operating permit program development costs among the sources under
its jurisdiction emitting one hundred tons or more per year of a
regulated pollutant during calendar year 1992 and may collect an
interim fee from these sources. A fee assessed pursuant to this
subsection (14)(d) shall be collected at the same time as the fee
assessed pursuant to (c) of this subsection.
(e) The fees assessed to a source under this subsection shall be
limited to the first seven thousand five hundred tons for each
regulated pollutant per year.
(15)(a) The department shall determine the persons liable for the
fee imposed by subsection (14) of this section, compute the fee, and
provide by November 1, 1993, the identity of the fee payer with the
computation of the fee to each local authority and to the department of
revenue for collection. The department of revenue shall collect the
fee computed by the department from the fee payers under the
jurisdiction of the department. The administrative, collection, and
penalty provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW shall apply to the collection
of the fee by the department of revenue. The department shall provide
technical assistance to the department of revenue for decisions made by
the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 82.32.160 and 82.32.170. All
interim fees collected by the department of revenue on behalf of the
department and all interim fees collected by local authorities on
behalf of the department shall be deposited in the air operating permit
account. The interim fees collected by the local air authorities to
cover their permit program development costs under subsection (14)(d)
of this section shall be deposited in the dedicated accounts of their
respective treasuries.
(b) All fees identified in this section shall be due and payable on
March 1, 1994, except that the local air pollution control authorities
may adopt by rule an earlier date on which fees are to be due and
payable. The section 5, chapter 252, Laws of 1993 amendments to RCW
70.94.161 do not have the effect of terminating, or in any way
modifying, any liability, civil or criminal, incurred pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 70.94.161 (15) and (17) as they existed prior to July
25, 1993.
(16) For sources or source categories not required to obtain
permits under subsection (4) of this section, the department or local
authority may establish by rule control technology requirements. If
control technology rule revisions are made by the department or local
authority under this subsection, the department or local authority
shall consider the remaining useful life of control equipment
previously installed on existing sources before requiring technology
changes. The department or any local air authority may issue a general
permit, as authorized under the federal clean air act, for such
sources.
(17) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, emissions of
greenhouse gases as defined in RCW 70.235.010 must be reported as
required by RCW 70.94.151. The reporting provisions of RCW 70.94.151
shall not apply to any other emissions from any permit program source
after the effective date of United States environmental protection
agency approval of the state operating permit program.

Sec. 15 RCW 80.80.040 and 2011 c 180 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, beginning July 1,
2008, the greenhouse gas emissions performance standard for all
baseload electric generation for which electric utilities enter into
long-term financial commitments on or after such date is the lower of:
(a) One thousand one hundred pounds of greenhouse gases per
megawatt-hour; or
(b) The average available greenhouse gas emissions output as
determined under RCW 80.80.050.
(2) This chapter does not apply to long-term financial commitments
with the Bonneville power administration.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, all baseload
electric generation facilities in operation as of June 30, 2008, are
deemed to be in compliance with the greenhouse gas emissions
performance standard established under this section until the
facilities are the subject of long-term financial commitments.
(b) All baseload electric generation that commences operation after
June 30, 2008, and is located in Washington, must comply with the
greenhouse gas emissions performance standard established in subsection
(1) of this section.
(c)(i) A coal-fired baseload electric generation facility in
Washington that emitted more than one million tons of greenhouse gases
in any calendar year prior to 2008 must comply with the lower of the
following greenhouse gas emissions performance standard such that one
generating boiler is in compliance by December 31, 2020, and any other
generating boiler is in compliance by December 31, 2025:
(A) One thousand one hundred pounds of greenhouse gases per
megawatt-hour; or
(B) The average available greenhouse gas emissions output as
determined under RCW 80.80.050.
(ii) This subsection (3)(c) does not apply to a coal-fired baseload
electric ((generating [generation])) generation facility in the event
the department determines as a requirement of state or federal law or
regulation that selective catalytic reduction technology must be
installed on any of its boilers.
(4) All electric generation facilities or power plants powered
exclusively by renewable resources, as defined in RCW 19.280.020, are
deemed to be in compliance with the greenhouse gas emissions
performance standard established under this section.
(5) All cogeneration facilities in the state that are fueled by
natural gas or waste gas or a combination of the two fuels, and that
are in operation as of June 30, 2008, are deemed to be in compliance
with the greenhouse gas emissions performance standard established
under this section until the facilities are the subject of a new
ownership interest or are upgraded.
(6) In determining the rate of emissions of greenhouse gases for
baseload electric generation, the total emissions associated with
producing electricity shall be included.
(7) In no case shall a long-term financial commitment be determined
to be in compliance with the greenhouse gas emissions performance
standard if the commitment includes more than twelve percent of
electricity from unspecified sources.
(8) For a long-term financial commitment with multiple power
plants, each specified power plant must be treated individually for the
purpose of determining the annualized plant capacity factor and net
emissions, and each power plant must comply with subsection (1) of this
section, except as provided in subsections (3) through (5) of this
section.
(9) The department shall establish an output-based methodology to
ensure that the calculation of emissions of greenhouse gases for a
cogeneration facility recognizes the total usable energy output of the
process, and includes all greenhouse gases emitted by the facility in
the production of both electrical and thermal energy. In developing
and implementing the greenhouse gas emissions performance standard, the
department shall consider and act in a manner consistent with any rules
adopted pursuant to the public utilities regulatory policy act of 1978
(16 U.S.C. Sec. 824a-3), as amended.
(10) The following greenhouse gas emissions produced by baseload
electric generation owned or contracted through a long-term financial
commitment shall not be counted as emissions of the power plant in
determining compliance with the greenhouse gas emissions performance
standard:
(a) Those emissions that are injected permanently in geological
formations;
(b) Those emissions that are permanently sequestered by other means
approved by the department; and
(c) Those emissions sequestered or mitigated as approved under
subsection (16) of this section.
(11) In adopting and implementing the greenhouse gas emissions
performance standard, the department of commerce energy policy
division, in consultation with the commission, the department, the
Bonneville power administration, the western electricity coordinating
council, the energy facility site evaluation council, electric
utilities, public interest representatives, and consumer
representatives, shall consider the effects of the greenhouse gas
emissions performance standard on system reliability and overall costs
to electricity customers.
(12) In developing and implementing the greenhouse gas emissions
performance standard, the department shall, with assistance of the
commission, the department of commerce energy policy division, and
electric utilities, and to the extent practicable, address long-term
purchases of electricity from unspecified sources in a manner
consistent with this chapter.
(13) The directors of the energy facility site evaluation council
and the department shall each adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW in
coordination with each other to implement and enforce the greenhouse
gas emissions performance standard. The rules necessary to implement
this section shall be adopted by June 30, 2008.
(14) In adopting the rules for implementing this section, the
energy facility site evaluation council and the department shall
include criteria to be applied in evaluating the carbon sequestration
plan, for baseload electric generation that will rely on subsection
(10) of this section to demonstrate compliance, but that will commence
sequestration after the date that electricity is first produced. The
rules shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Provisions for financial assurances, as a condition of plant
operation, sufficient to ensure successful implementation of the carbon
sequestration plan, including construction and operation of necessary
equipment, and any other significant costs;
(b) Provisions for geological or other approved sequestration
commencing within five years of plant operation, including full and
sufficient technical documentation to support the planned
sequestration;
(c) Provisions for monitoring the effectiveness of the
implementation of the sequestration plan;
(d) Penalties for failure to achieve implementation of the plan on
schedule;
(e) Provisions for an owner to purchase emissions reductions in the
event of the failure of a sequestration plan under subsection (16) of
this section; and
(f) Provisions for public notice and comment on the carbon
sequestration plan.
(15)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, as part of
its role enforcing the greenhouse gas emissions performance standard,
the department shall determine whether sequestration or a plan for
sequestration will provide safe, reliable, and permanent protection
against the greenhouse gases entering the atmosphere from the power
plant and all ancillary facilities.
(b) For facilities under its jurisdiction, the energy facility site
evaluation council shall contract for review of sequestration or the
carbon sequestration plan with the department consistent with the
conditions under (a) of this subsection, consider the adequacy of
sequestration or the plan in its adjudicative proceedings conducted
under RCW 80.50.090(3), and incorporate specific findings regarding
adequacy in its recommendation to the governor under RCW 80.50.100.
(16) A project under consideration by the energy facility site
evaluation council by July 22, 2007, is required to include all of the
requirements of subsection (14) of this section in its carbon
sequestration plan submitted as part of the energy facility site
evaluation council process. A project under consideration by the
energy facility site evaluation council by July 22, 2007, that receives
final site certification agreement approval under chapter 80.50 RCW
shall make a good faith effort to implement the sequestration plan. If
the project owner determines that implementation is not feasible, the
project owner shall submit documentation of that determination to the
energy facility site evaluation council. The documentation shall
demonstrate the steps taken to implement the sequestration plan and
evidence of the technological and economic barriers to successful
implementation. The project owner shall then provide to the energy
facility site evaluation council notification that they shall implement
the plan that requires the project owner to meet the greenhouse gas
emissions performance standard by purchasing verifiable greenhouse gas
emissions reductions from an electric generation facility located
within the western interconnection, where the reduction would not have
occurred otherwise or absent this contractual agreement, such that the
sum of the emissions reductions purchased and the facility's emissions
meets the standard for the life of the facility.

Sec. 16 RCW 80.80.080 and 2007 c 307 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in section 4 of this act, for the purposes of
RCW 80.80.040 through 80.80.080 and 80.70.020, the department, in
consultation with the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce energy policy division, the energy facility site
evaluation council, the commission, and the governing boards of
consumer-owned utilities, shall review the greenhouse ((gases)) gas
emissions performance standard established in this chapter to determine
need, applicability, and effectiveness no less than every five years
following July 22, 2007, or upon implementation of a federal or state
law or rule regulating carbon dioxide emissions of electric utilities,
and report to the legislature.

Sec. 17 RCW 47.01.440 and 2011 c 171 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
To support the implementation of RCW 47.04.280 and 47.01.078(4),
the department shall adopt broad statewide goals to reduce annual per
capita vehicle miles traveled by 2050 consistent with the stated goals
of executive order 07-02. Consistent with these goals, the department
shall:
(1) Establish the following benchmarks using a statewide baseline
of seventy-five billion vehicle miles traveled less the vehicle miles
traveled attributable to vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16A.455 and
weighing ten thousand pounds or more, which are exempt from this
section:
(a) Decrease the annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by
eighteen percent by 2020;
(b) Decrease the annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by thirty
percent by 2035; and
(c) Decrease the annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by fifty
percent by 2050;
(2) By July 1, 2008, establish and convene a collaborative process
to develop a set of tools and best practices to assist state, regional,
and local entities in making progress towards the benchmarks
established in subsection (1) of this section. The collaborative
process must provide an opportunity for public review and comment and
must:
(a) Be jointly facilitated by the department, the department of
ecology, and the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce;
(b) Provide for participation from regional transportation planning
organizations, the Washington state transit association, the Puget
Sound clean air agency, a statewide business organization representing
the sale of motor vehicles, at least one major private employer that
participates in the commute trip reduction program, and other
interested parties, including but not limited to parties representing
diverse perspectives on issues relating to growth, development, and
transportation;
(c) Identify current strategies to reduce vehicle miles traveled in
the state as well as successful strategies in other jurisdictions that
may be applicable in the state;
(d) Identify potential new revenue options for local and regional
governments to authorize to finance vehicle miles traveled reduction
efforts;
(e) Provide for the development of measurement tools that can, with
a high level of confidence, measure annual progress toward the
benchmarks at the local, regional, and state levels, measure the
effects of strategies implemented to reduce vehicle miles traveled and
adequately distinguish between common travel purposes, such as moving
freight or commuting to work, and measure trends of vehicle miles
traveled per capita on a five-year basis;
(f) Establish a process for the department to periodically evaluate
progress toward the vehicle miles traveled benchmarks, measure achieved
and projected emissions reductions, and, except as provided in section
4 of this act, recommend whether the benchmarks should be adjusted to
meet the state's overall goals for the reduction of greenhouse gas
emissions;
(g) Estimate, except as provided in section 4 of this act, the
projected reductions in greenhouse gas emissions if the benchmarks are
achieved, taking into account the expected implementation of existing
state and federal mandates for vehicle technology and fuels, as well as
expected growth in population and vehicle travel;
(h) Examine access to public transportation for people living in
areas with affordable housing to and from employment centers, and make
recommendations for steps necessary to ensure that areas with
affordable housing are served by adequate levels of public
transportation; and
(i) By December 1, 2008, provide a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature on the collaborative process and
resulting recommended tools and best practices to achieve the reduction
in annual per capita vehicle miles traveled goals.
(3) Included in the December 1, 2008, report to the transportation
committees of the legislature, the department shall identify strategies
to reduce vehicle miles traveled in the state as well as successful
strategies in other jurisdictions that may be applicable in the state
that recognize the differing urban and rural transportation
requirements.
(4) Prior to implementation of the goals in this section, the
department, in consultation with the department of ((community, trade,
and economic development)) commerce, cities, counties, local economic
development organizations, and local and regional chambers of commerce,
shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
on the anticipated impacts of the goals established in this section on
the following:
(a) The economic hardship on small businesses as it relates to the
ability to hire and retain workers who do not reside in the county in
which they are employed;
(b) Impacts on low-income residents;
(c) Impacts on agricultural employers and their employees,
especially on the migrant farmworker community;
(d) Impacts on distressed rural counties; and
(e) Impacts in counties with more than fifty percent of the land
base of the county in public or tribal lands.

Sec. 18 RCW 47.01.440 and 2011 c 171 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
To support the implementation of RCW 47.04.280 and 47.01.078(4),
the department shall adopt broad statewide goals to reduce annual per
capita vehicle miles traveled by 2050 consistent with the stated goals
of executive order 07-02. Consistent with these goals, the department
shall:
(1) Establish the following benchmarks using a statewide baseline
of seventy-five billion vehicle miles traveled less the vehicle miles
traveled attributable to vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16A.455 and
weighing ten thousand pounds or more, which are exempt from this
section:
(a) Decrease the annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by
eighteen percent by 2020;
(b) Decrease the annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by thirty
percent by 2035; and
(c) Decrease the annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by fifty
percent by 2050;
(2) By July 1, 2008, establish and convene a collaborative process
to develop a set of tools and best practices to assist state, regional,
and local entities in making progress towards the benchmarks
established in subsection (1) of this section. The collaborative
process must provide an opportunity for public review and comment and
must:
(a) Be jointly facilitated by the department, the department of
ecology, and the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce;
(b) Provide for participation from regional transportation planning
organizations, the Washington state transit association, the Puget
Sound clean air agency, a statewide business organization representing
the sale of motor vehicles, at least one major private employer that
participates in the commute trip reduction program, and other
interested parties, including but not limited to parties representing
diverse perspectives on issues relating to growth, development, and
transportation;
(c) Identify current strategies to reduce vehicle miles traveled in
the state as well as successful strategies in other jurisdictions that
may be applicable in the state;
(d) Identify potential new revenue options for local and regional
governments to authorize to finance vehicle miles traveled reduction
efforts;
(e) Provide for the development of measurement tools that can, with
a high level of confidence, measure annual progress toward the
benchmarks at the local, regional, and state levels, measure the
effects of strategies implemented to reduce vehicle miles traveled and
adequately distinguish between common travel purposes, such as moving
freight or commuting to work, and measure trends of vehicle miles
traveled per capita on a five-year basis;
(f) Establish a process for the department to periodically evaluate
progress toward the vehicle miles traveled benchmarks, measure achieved
and projected emissions reductions, and recommend whether the
benchmarks should be adjusted to meet the state's overall goals for the
reduction of greenhouse gas emissions;
(g) Estimate, except as provided in section 4 of this act, the
projected reductions in greenhouse gas emissions if the benchmarks are
achieved, taking into account the expected implementation of existing
state and federal mandates for vehicle technology and fuels, as well as
expected growth in population and vehicle travel;
(h) Examine access to public transportation for people living in
areas with affordable housing to and from employment centers, and make
recommendations for steps necessary to ensure that areas with
affordable housing are served by adequate levels of public
transportation; and
(i) By December 1, 2008, provide a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature on the collaborative process and
resulting recommended tools and best practices to achieve the reduction
in annual per capita vehicle miles traveled goals.
(3) Included in the December 1, 2008, report to the transportation
committees of the legislature, the department shall identify strategies
to reduce vehicle miles traveled in the state as well as successful
strategies in other jurisdictions that may be applicable in the state
that recognize the differing urban and rural transportation
requirements.
(4) Prior to implementation of the goals in this section, the
department, in consultation with the department of ((community, trade,
and economic development)) commerce, cities, counties, local economic
development organizations, and local and regional chambers of commerce,
shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
on the anticipated impacts of the goals established in this section on
the following:
(a) The economic hardship on small businesses as it relates to the
ability to hire and retain workers who do not reside in the county in
which they are employed;
(b) Impacts on low-income residents;
(c) Impacts on agricultural employers and their employees,
especially on the migrant farmworker community;
(d) Impacts on distressed rural counties; and
(e) Impacts in counties with more than fifty percent of the land
base of the county in public or tribal lands.

Sec. 19 RCW 19.27A.020 and 2010 c 271 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state building code council shall adopt rules to be known
as the Washington state energy code as part of the state building code.
(2) The council shall follow the legislature's standards set forth
in this section to adopt rules to be known as the Washington state
energy code. The Washington state energy code shall, except as
provided in section 4 of this act, be designed to:
(a) Construct increasingly energy efficient homes and buildings
that help achieve the broader goal of building zero fossil-fuel
greenhouse gas emission homes and buildings by the year 2031;
(b) Require new buildings to meet a certain level of energy
efficiency, but allow flexibility in building design, construction, and
heating equipment efficiencies within that framework; and
(c) Allow space heating equipment efficiency to offset or
substitute for building envelope thermal performance.
(3) The Washington state energy code shall take into account
regional climatic conditions. Climate zone 1 shall include all
counties not included in climate zone 2. Climate zone 2 includes:
Adams, Chelan, Douglas, Ferry, Grant, Kittitas, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pend
Oreille, Spokane, Stevens, and Whitman counties.
(4) The Washington state energy code for residential buildings
shall be the 2006 edition of the Washington state energy code, or as
amended by rule by the council.
(5) The minimum state energy code for new nonresidential buildings
shall be the Washington state energy code, 2006 edition, or as amended
by the council by rule.
(6)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the Washington
state energy code for residential structures shall preempt the
residential energy code of each city, town, and county in the state of
Washington.
(b) The state energy code for residential structures does not
preempt a city, town, or county's energy code for residential
structures which exceeds the requirements of the state energy code and
which was adopted by the city, town, or county prior to March 1, 1990.
Such cities, towns, or counties may not subsequently amend their energy
code for residential structures to exceed the requirements adopted
prior to March 1, 1990.
(7) The state building code council shall consult with the
department of ((general administration)) enterprise services as
provided in RCW 34.05.310 prior to publication of proposed rules. The
director of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services shall recommend to the state building code council any changes
necessary to conform the proposed rules to the requirements of this
section.
(8) The state building code council shall evaluate and consider
adoption of the international energy conservation code in Washington
state in place of the existing state energy code.
(9) The definitions in RCW 19.27A.140 apply throughout this
section.

Sec. 20 RCW 19.27A.150 and 2010 c 271 s 306 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To the extent that funding is appropriated specifically for the
purposes of this section, the department of commerce shall, except as
provided in section 4 of this act, develop and implement a strategic
plan for enhancing energy efficiency in and reducing greenhouse gas
emissions from homes, buildings, districts, and neighborhoods. The
strategic plan must be used to help direct the future code increases in
RCW 19.27A.020, with targets for new buildings consistent with RCW
19.27A.160. The strategic plan will identify barriers to achieving net
zero energy use in homes and buildings and identify how to overcome
these barriers in future energy code updates and through complementary
policies.
(2) The department of commerce must complete and release the
strategic plan to the legislature and the council by December 31, 2010,
and update the plan every three years.
(3) The strategic plan must include recommendations to the council
on energy code upgrades. At a minimum, the strategic plan must:
(a) Consider development of aspirational codes separate from the
state energy code that contain economically and technically feasible
optional standards that could achieve higher energy efficiency for
those builders that elected to follow the aspirational codes in lieu of
or in addition to complying with the standards set forth in the state
energy code;
(b) Determine the appropriate methodology to measure achievement of
state energy code targets using the United States environmental
protection agency's target finder program or equivalent methodology;
(c) Address the need for enhanced code training and enforcement;
(d) Include state strategies to support research, demonstration,
and education programs designed to achieve a seventy percent reduction
in annual net energy consumption as specified in RCW 19.27A.160 and
enhance energy efficiency and on-site renewable energy production in
buildings;
(e) Recommend incentives, education, training programs and
certifications, particularly state-approved training or certification
programs, joint apprenticeship programs, or labor-management
partnership programs that train workers for energy-efficiency projects
to ensure proposed programs are designed to increase building
professionals' ability to design, construct, and operate buildings that
will meet the seventy percent reduction in annual net energy
consumption as specified in RCW 19.27A.160;
(f) Address barriers for utilities to serve net zero energy homes
and buildings and policies to overcome those barriers;
(g) Address the limits of a prescriptive code in achieving net zero
energy use homes and buildings and propose a transition to performance-based codes;
(h) Identify financial mechanisms such as tax incentives, rebates,
and innovative financing to motivate energy consumers to take action to
increase energy efficiency and their use of on-site renewable energy.
Such incentives, rebates, or financing options may consider the role of
government programs as well as utility-sponsored programs;
(i) Address the adequacy of education and technical assistance,
including school curricula, technical training, and peer-to-peer
exchanges for professional and trade audiences;
(j) Develop strategies to develop and install district and
neighborhood-wide energy systems that help meet net zero energy use in
homes and buildings;
(k) Identify costs and benefits of energy efficiency measures on
residential and nonresidential construction; and
(l) Investigate methodologies and standards for the measurement of
the amount of embodied energy used in building materials.
(4) The department of commerce and the council shall convene a work
group with the affected parties to inform the initial development of
the strategic plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 70.235.030 (Development of a design for a regional
multisector market-based system to limit and reduce emissions of
greenhouse gas -- Information required to be submitted to the
legislature) and 2008 c 14 s 4; and
(2) RCW 80.80.030 (Achieving greenhouse gases emissions reduction
goals -- Submission of policy recommendations to legislature by governor)
and 2007 c 307 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington state energy freedom act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Sections 1 through 5 and 23 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---