BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Under this chapter, "pretrial release program" is any program,
either run directly by a county or city, or by a private or public
entity through contract with a county or city, into whose custody an
offender is released prior to trial and which agrees to supervise the
offender. As used in this section, "supervision" includes, but is not
limited to, work release, day monitoring, or electronic monitoring.
(2) A pretrial release program may not agree to supervise, or
accept into its custody, an offender who is currently awaiting trial
for a violent offense or sex offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, who
has been convicted of one or more violent offenses or sex offenses in
the ten years before the date of the current offense, unless the
offender's release before trial was secured with a payment of bail.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.21.030 and 2010 c 254 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The judicial officer may at any time amend the order to impose
additional or different conditions of release. The conditions imposed
under this chapter supplement but do not supplant provisions of law
allowing the imposition of conditions to assure the appearance of the
defendant at trial or to prevent interference with the administration
of justice.
(2) Appropriate conditions of release under this chapter include,
but are not limited to, the following:
(a) The defendant may be placed in the custody of a ((designated
person or organization agreeing to supervise the defendant)) pretrial
release program;
(b) The defendant may have restrictions placed upon travel,
association, or place of abode during the period of release;
(c) The defendant may be required to comply with a specified
curfew;
(d) The defendant may be required to return to custody during
specified hours or to be placed on electronic monitoring, if available.
The defendant, if convicted, may not have the period of incarceration
reduced by the number of days spent on electronic monitoring;
(e) The defendant may be prohibited from approaching or
communicating in any manner with particular persons or classes of
persons;
(f) The defendant may be prohibited from going to certain
geographical areas or premises;
(g) The defendant may be prohibited from possessing any dangerous
weapons or firearms;
(h) The defendant may be prohibited from possessing or consuming
any intoxicating liquors or drugs not prescribed to the defendant. The
defendant may be required to submit to testing to determine the
defendant's compliance with this condition;
(i) The defendant may be prohibited from operating a motor vehicle
that is not equipped with an ignition interlock device;
(j) The defendant may be required to report regularly to and remain
under the supervision of an officer of the court or other person or
agency; and
(k) The defendant may be prohibited from committing any violations
of criminal law.

--- END ---