BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
The children of family day care providers, who are present in the
home where child care is provided and who are twelve years of age or
older, shall not be counted in the staff-to-child ratio required by the
department for family day care providers. These children are not
subject to the supervision requirements established by the department
for child care licensing.

--- END ---