BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the use of a
basic skills test as an entrance requirement to teacher certification
programs has unintentionally created a barrier to the effective
recruitment of candidates from underrepresented populations who are
otherwise qualified for the program. Therefore, the legislature
intends to expand the pool of potential teacher candidates by expanding
the types of testing instruments and assessments that may be used to
measure basic skills. The legislature intends to review any
alternative assessments to ensure that candidates must continue to meet
the established standards for admission to a teacher certification
program.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.410.220 and 2008 c 176 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning not later than September 1, 2001, the Washington
professional educator standards board shall make available and pilot a
means of assessing an applicant's knowledge in the basic skills. For
the purposes of this section, "basic skills" means the subjects of at
least reading, writing, and mathematics. Beginning September 1, 2002,
except as provided in (c) and (d) of this subsection and subsection (4)
of this section, passing this assessment shall be required for
admission to approved teacher preparation programs and for persons from
out-of-state applying for a Washington state residency teaching
certificate.
(b) On an individual student basis, approved teacher preparation
programs may admit into their programs a candidate who has not achieved
the minimum basic skills assessment score established by the Washington
professional educator standards board. Individuals so admitted may not
receive residency certification without passing the basic skills
assessment under this section.
(c) The Washington professional educator standards board may
establish criteria to ensure that persons from out-of-state who are
applying for residency certification and persons applying to master's
degree level teacher preparation programs can demonstrate to the
board's satisfaction that they have the requisite basic skills based
upon having completed another basic skills assessment acceptable to the
Washington professional educator standards board or by some other
alternative approved by the Washington professional educator standards
board.
(d) The Washington professional educator standards board may
identify and accept other tests and test scores as long as the tests
are comparable in rigor to the basic skills assessment and candidates
meet or exceed the basic skills requirements established by the board.
The board must submit any other tests and test scores under this
subsection (1)(d) to the education committees of the legislature for
review and must provide an opportunity for the legislature to act
before the tests are implemented.
(2) The Washington professional educator standards board shall set
performance standards and develop, pilot, and implement a uniform and
externally administered professional-level certification assessment
based on demonstrated teaching skill. In the development of this
assessment, consideration shall be given to changes in professional
certification program components such as the culminating seminar.
(3) Beginning not later than September 1, 2002, the Washington
professional educator standards board shall provide for the initial
piloting and implementation of a means of assessing an applicant's
knowledge in the subjects for which the applicant has applied for an
endorsement to his or her residency or professional teaching
certificate. The assessment of subject knowledge shall not include
instructional methodology. Beginning September 1, 2005, passing this
assessment shall be required to receive an endorsement for
certification purposes.
(4) The Washington professional educator standards board may permit
exceptions from the assessment requirements under subsections (1), (2),
and (3) of this section on a case-by-case basis.
(5) The Washington professional educator standards board shall
provide for reasonable accommodations for individuals who are required
to take the assessments in subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section
if the individuals have learning or other disabilities.
(6) With the exception of applicants exempt from the requirements
of subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, an applicant must
achieve a minimum assessment score or scores established by the
Washington professional educator standards board on each of the
assessments under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section.
(7) The Washington professional educator standards board and
superintendent of public instruction, as determined by the Washington
professional educator standards board, may contract with one or more
third parties for:
(a) The development, purchase, administration, scoring, and
reporting of scores of the assessments established by the Washington
professional educator standards board under subsections (1), (2), and
(3) of this section;
(b) Related clerical and administrative activities; or
(c) Any combination of the purposes in this subsection.
(8) Applicants for admission to a Washington teacher preparation
program and applicants for residency and professional certificates who
are required to successfully complete one or more of the assessments
under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, and who are
charged a fee for the assessment by a third party contracted with under
subsection (7) of this section, shall pay the fee charged by the
contractor directly to the contractor. Such fees shall be reasonably
related to the actual costs of the contractor in providing the
assessment.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction is responsible for
supervision and providing support services to administer this section.
(10) The Washington professional educator standards board shall
collaboratively select or develop and implement the assessments and
minimum assessment scores required under this section with the
superintendent of public instruction and shall provide opportunities
for representatives of other interested educational organizations to
participate in the selection or development and implementation of such
assessments in a manner deemed appropriate by the Washington
professional educator standards board.
(11) The Washington professional educator standards board shall
adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that are reasonably necessary for
the effective and efficient implementation of this section.

--- END ---