BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.24.160 and 2001 c 134 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Whenever a participant dies as the result of injuries
received, or sickness contracted in consequence or as the result of the
performance of his or her duties, the board of trustees shall order and
direct the payment from the principal fund of (i) the sum of ((one
hundred fifty-two)) two hundred fourteen thousand dollars to his widow
or her widower, or if there is no widow or widower, then to his or her
dependent child or children, or if there is no dependent child or
children, then to his or her dependent parents or either of them, or if
there are no dependent parents or parent, then the death benefit shall
be paid to the member's estate, and (ii)(A) the sum of one thousand two
hundred seventy-five dollars per month to his widow or her widower
((during his or her life together with the additional monthly sum of
one hundred ten dollars for each child of the member, unemancipated or
under eighteen years of age, dependent upon the member for support at
the time of his or her death, (B) to a maximum total of two thousand
five hundred fifty dollars per month)), with (B) an additional amount
of five hundred dollars per month paid to the legal guardian or
surviving parent of each birth or legally adopted child, unemancipated
or under eighteen years of age, and dependent upon the member for
support at the time of his or her death.
(b) Beginning on July 1, 2001, and each July 1st thereafter, the
compensation amounts specified in (a)(ii) (A) and (B) of this
subsection shall be readjusted to reflect the percentage change in the
consumer price index, calculated as follows: The index for the
calendar year preceding the year in which the July calculation is made,
to be known as "calendar year A," is divided by the index for the
calendar year preceding calendar year A, and the resulting ratio is
multiplied by the compensation amount in effect on June 30th
immediately preceding the July 1st on which the respective calculation
is made. For the purposes of this subsection, "index" means the same
as the definition in RCW 2.12.037(1).
(2) ((If the widow or widower does not have legal custody of one or
more dependent children of the deceased participant or if, after the
death of the participant, legal custody of such child or children
passes from the widow or widower to another person, any payment on
account of such child or children not in the legal custody of the widow
or widower shall be made to the person or persons having legal custody
of such child or children. Such payments on account of such child or
children shall be subtracted from the amount to which such widow or
widower would have been entitled had such widow or widower had legal
custody of all the children and the widow or widower shall receive the
remainder after such payments on account of such child or children have
been subtracted. If there is no widow or widower, or the widow or
widower dies while there are children, unemancipated or under eighteen
years of age, then the amount of one thousand two hundred seventy-five
dollars per month shall be paid for the youngest or only child together
with an additional one hundred ten dollars per month for each
additional of such children to a maximum of two thousand five hundred
fifty dollars per month until they become emancipated or reach the age
of eighteen years; and if there are no widow or widower, child, or
children entitled thereto, then to his or her parents or either of them
the sum of one thousand two hundred seventy-five dollars per month for
life, if it is proved to the satisfaction of the board that the
parents, or either of them, were dependent on the deceased for their
support at the time of his or her death. In any instance in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, if the widow or widower, child
or children, or the parents, or either of them, marries while receiving
such pension the person so marrying shall thereafter receive no further
pension from the fund.
(3))) In the case provided for in this section, the monthly payment
provided may be converted in whole or in part into a lump sum payment,
not in any case to exceed ((twelve)) twenty-five thousand dollars,
equal or proportionate, as the case may be, to the actuarial equivalent
of the monthly payment in which event the monthly payments shall cease
in whole or in part accordingly or proportionately. Such conversion
may be made either upon written application to the state board and
shall rest in the discretion of the state board; or the state board is
authorized to make, and authority is given it to make, on its own
motion, lump sum payments, equal or proportionate, as the case may be,
to the value of the annuity then remaining in full satisfaction of
claims due to dependents. Within the rule under this subsection the
amount and value of the lump sum payment may be agreed upon between the
applicant and the state board.

--- END ---