BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state's
consumers and real estate industry recognize the benefits of home
energy efficiency. The legislature also finds that home inspections
occur in a majority of residential real estate transactions, and that
the state has recently adopted a comprehensive system of educating and
licensing home inspectors. It is therefore the intent of the
legislature to ensure that residential home inspections provide
consumers with information about home energy efficiency based on
standards developed by the home inspector advisory licensing board.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.280.030 and 2008 c 119 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person licensed under this chapter is responsible for performing
a visual and noninvasive inspection of the following readily accessible
systems and components of a home and reporting on the general condition
of those systems and components at the time of the inspection in his or
her written report: The roof, foundation, exterior, heating system,
air-conditioning system, structure, plumbing and electrical systems,
and other aspects of the home as may be identified by the board. The
inspection must include looking for certain fire and safety hazards as
defined by the board. The written report must include information
describing those systems and components of homes that affect energy
efficiency, consistent with the standards of practice developed by the
board. The standards of practice to be developed by the board will be
used as the minimum standards for an inspection. The duties of the
home inspector with regard to wood destroying organisms are provided in
RCW 18.280.190.

--- END ---