BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW
to read as follows:
A veterinarian lawfully licensed in this state to practice
veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry who reports, in good faith
and in the normal course of business, a suspected incident of animal
cruelty that is punishable under this chapter to the proper authorities
is immune from liability in any civil or criminal action brought
against such veterinarian for reporting the suspected incident.

--- END ---