BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there is a
large collection of small acreage landholdings in the central and
southern Puget Sound region that are currently appropriate for
agricultural production but are being maintained in a fallow state.
Collectively, these landholdings represent a potentially significant
agricultural base that could, through a focused effort on
reestablishing a rural agricultural economy in western Washington, be
used as a foundation for rural economic development and the
rejuvenation of a local agricultural industry and way of life.
(2) The legislature further finds that there is a significant and
growing demand for local agricultural products and organic grains used
as feedstock by western Washington dairy, egg, and livestock producers.
Local organic grain growers would find an existing local market for
their product among producers who must currently rely on organic grains
brought in from other states or imported from foreign countries.
Expanding this synergy between locally grown organic grains, other
local agricultural products, and local demand would benefit the growers
and producers, enhance the local rural economy, and allow consumers an
option to enjoy the holistic benefits of truly local food sourcing.
(3) The legislature further finds that an investment in an
inventory of the idle lands in western Washington that assesses the
viability of expanding the cultivation of organic and specialty grains
and other agricultural production in western Washington is a tool for
connecting potential growers with the existing local market and for
promoting a resurgence in central and southern Puget Sound agriculture
that turns currently underutilized agricultural lands into a resource
that drives rural economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.23 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To inform a focused effort on reestablishing a rural
agricultural economy in western Washington that focuses on investments
aimed at returning underproducing land back into a state of active
agricultural production, the department must rely on existing programs
to develop an inventory of idle agricultural lands in the following
western Washington counties: Clallam, Jefferson, Mason, Lewis,
Thurston, Pierce, Clark, Cowlitz, Pacific, Kitsap, Grays Harbor,
Island, and San Juan. The initial focus of the survey must be land
located in the central and southern Puget Sound region.
(2) For the purposes of this section, idle lands are to be
considered lands that have been recently removed from crop production,
lands that have in the past been used to support livestock operations
that are not currently used for that purpose, open spaces not
designated for conflicting use, or other lands suitable for
agricultural operations, such as the raising of organic and specialty
grains.
(3) The department shall, during the course of implementing this
section, expand upon the agricultural lands assessment project that the
department has conducted since 2002. The department shall expand this
mapping to include idle agricultural lands suitable for the commercial
growing of organic and specialty grains. Project elements must
include:
(a) An initial assessment of idle agricultural lands using the
current database maintained by the department;
(b) The identification of potential parcels using a combination of
field mapping, aerial photography, and statewide parcel databases;
(c) An evaluation of potential fields using soil layers, wetlands,
and other limiting factors;
(d) An assessment of water availability as needed;
(e) Field verification of potential fields; and
(f) The production of a geographic information system layer and
accompanying database that will identify parcels in western Washington
counties currently idle from agricultural activity and evaluate the
quality of those parcels in terms of growing organic and specialty
grains.
(4) The department must consult with Washington State University in
the implementation of this section.
(5) This section expires July 31, 2017.

--- END ---