BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.04.030 and 2001 c 155 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The fish and wildlife commission consists of nine registered
voters of the state. In January of each odd-numbered year, the
governor shall appoint consistent with this section and RCW 77.04.040,
and with the advice and consent of the senate, three registered voters
to the commission to serve for terms of six years from that January or
until their successors are appointed and qualified. If a vacancy
occurs on the commission prior to the expiration of a term, the
governor shall appoint a registered voter within sixty days to complete
the term.
(2) Three members ((shall)) of the commission must be residents of
that portion of the state lying east of the summit of the Cascade
mountains, and three shall be residents of that portion of the state
lying west of the summit of the Cascade mountains. Three additional
members shall be appointed at-large. No two members may be residents
of the same county.
(3) The legal office of the commission is at the administrative
office of the department in Olympia.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.04.040 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Persons eligible for appointment as members of the commission
((shall)) must have general knowledge of the habits and distribution of
fish and wildlife and ((shall)) may not hold another state, county, or
municipal elective or appointive office.
(2) In making these appointments, the governor shall ((seek to))
maintain a balance reflecting all aspects of fish and wildlife((,))
management by including on the commission, at a minimum, representation
((recommended by)) reflecting the interests of organized groups
representing each of the following: Sportfishers, commercial fishers,
hunters, private landowners, and environmentalists.
(3) Persons eligible for appointment as fish and wildlife
commissioners shall comply with the provisions of chapters 42.52 and
((42.17)) 42.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Section 2 of this act must be
implemented as vacancies occur on the fish and wildlife commission.
Nothing in this act requires the dismissal of any individual from the
fish and wildlife commission before the end of his or her term.
(2) This section expires August 31, 2018.

--- END ---