BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.480 and 2007 c 254 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon written application, a combination fishing license shall
be issued at the reduced rate of five dollars((,)) and all hunting
licenses shall((,)) be issued at the reduced rate of a youth hunting
license fee for the following individuals:
(((1))) (a) A resident sixty-five years old or older who is an
honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed forces having
a service-connected disability;
(((2))) (b) A resident who is an honorably discharged veteran of
the United States armed forces with a thirty percent or more service-connected disability;
(((3))) (c) A resident with a disability who permanently uses a
wheelchair;
(((4))) (d) A resident who is blind or visually impaired; and
(((5))) (e) A resident with a developmental disability as defined
in RCW 71A.10.020 with documentation of the disability certified by a
physician licensed to practice in this state.
(2) Upon department verification of eligibility, a nonstate
resident veteran with a disability who otherwise satisfies the criteria
of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section must be issued a
combination fishing license or any hunting license at the same cost
charged to a nondisabled Washington resident for the same license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect February 1, 2014.

--- END ---