BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to other notifications that may be required by law,
the applicant of a permit to construct a wind turbine with an
electrical generating capacity of more than one hundred kilowatts must,
in accordance with applicable requirements or guidelines of the county,
provide notice of the application to adjacent landowners by mailing or
personally serving the notice to the latest recorded real property
owners, as shown by the records of the county assessor, who own
property located within one thousand feet from the base of each
proposed turbine.
(2) The notices must include the base height, blade diameter,
electrical generating capacity in kilowatts, and detailed siting
location information for each proposed turbine, including proposed
setback distances from adjacent properties. The notices must also
specify which entity or entities, including pertinent contact
information, are responsible for a decision on the application.
(3) Notices are not required under this section if the properties
located within one thousand feet from the base of each proposed turbine
are owned by the person or persons who own the property upon which the
proposed turbine or turbines are to be located.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits or otherwise limits counties
from adopting notification requirements for applications to construct
wind turbines that are supplemental to those required by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to other notifications that may be required by law,
the applicant of a permit to construct a wind turbine with an
electrical generating capacity of more than one hundred kilowatts must,
in accordance with applicable requirements or guidelines of the city or
town, provide notice of the application to adjacent landowners by
mailing or personally serving the notice to the latest recorded real
property owners, as shown by the records of the county assessor, who
own property located within one thousand feet from the base of each
proposed turbine.
(2) The notices must include the base height, blade diameter,
electrical generating capacity in kilowatts, and detailed siting
location information for each proposed turbine, including proposed
setback distances from adjacent properties. The notices must also
specify which entity or entities, including pertinent contact
information, are responsible for a decision on the application.
(3) Notices are not required under this section if the properties
located within one thousand feet from the base of each proposed turbine
are owned by the person or persons who own the property upon which the
proposed turbine or turbines are to be located.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits or otherwise limits cities or
towns from adopting notification requirements for applications to
construct wind turbines that are supplemental to those required by this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to other notifications that may be required by law,
the applicant of a permit to construct a wind turbine with an
electrical generating capacity of more than one hundred kilowatts must,
in accordance with applicable requirements or guidelines of the city,
provide notice of the application to adjacent landowners by mailing or
personally serving the notice to the latest recorded real property
owners, as shown by the records of the county assessor, who own
property located within one thousand feet from the base of each
proposed turbine.
(2) The notices must include the base height, blade diameter,
electrical generating capacity in kilowatts, and detailed siting
location information for each proposed turbine, including proposed
setback distances from adjacent properties. The notices must also
specify which entity or entities, including pertinent contact
information, are responsible for a decision on the application.
(3) Notices are not required under this section if the properties
located within one thousand feet from the base of each proposed turbine
are owned by the person or persons who own the property upon which the
proposed turbine or turbines are to be located.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits or otherwise limits cities
from adopting notification requirements for applications to construct
wind turbines that are supplemental to those required by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 80.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to other notifications that may be required by law,
the applicant of a permit to construct a wind turbine with an
electrical generating capacity of more than one hundred kilowatts must,
in accordance with applicable requirements or guidelines of the county,
city, town, or council, provide notice of the application to adjacent
landowners by mailing or personally serving the notice to the latest
recorded real property owners, as shown by the records of the county
assessor, who own property located within one thousand feet from the
base of each proposed turbine.
(2) The notices must include the base height, blade diameter,
electrical generating capacity in kilowatts, and detailed siting
location information for each proposed turbine, including proposed
setback distances from adjacent properties. The notices must also
specify which entity or entities, including pertinent contact
information, are responsible for a decision on the application.
(3) Notices are not required under this section if the properties
located within one thousand feet from the base of each proposed turbine
are owned by the person or persons who own the property upon which the
proposed turbine or turbines are to be located.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits or otherwise limits a county,
city, town, or council from adopting notification requirements for
applications to construct wind turbines that are supplemental to those
required by this section.

--- END ---