BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.52.220 and 2005 c 153 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No primary may be held for any single position in any ((city,
town, district, or district court, as required by RCW 29A.52.210))
nonpartisan office, if, after the last day allowed for candidates to
withdraw, there are no more than two candidates filed for the position.
The county auditor shall, as soon as possible, notify all the
candidates so affected that the office for which they filed will not
appear on the primary ballot.
(2) ((No primary may be held for nonpartisan offices in any first-class city if the city:
(a) Is a qualifying city that has been certified to participate in
the pilot project authorized by RCW 29A.53.020; and
(b) Is conducting an election using the instant runoff voting
method for the pilot project authorized by RCW 29A.53.020.
(c) This subsection (2) expires July 1, 2013.
(3))) No primary may be held for the office of commissioner of a
park and recreation district or for the office of cemetery district
commissioner.
(((4))) (3) Names of candidates for offices that do not appear on
the primary ballot shall be printed upon the general election ballot in
the manner specified by RCW 29A.36.131.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.52.010 (Elections to fill unexpired term -- No primary,
when) and 2005 c 2 s 13 & 2003 c 111 s 1301; and
(2) RCW 29A.52.011 (Elections to fill unexpired term--No primary,
when) and 2006 c 344 s 14 & 2004 c 271 s 172.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---