BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.155 and 2009 c 269 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a) When purchasing any hunting license, persons under the age
of eighteen shall present certification of completion of a course of
instruction of at least ten hours in the safe handling of firearms,
safety, conservation, and sportsmanship. All persons purchasing any
hunting license for the first time, if born after January 1, 1972,
shall present such certification.
(b)(i) The director may establish a program for training persons in
the safe handling of firearms, conservation, and sportsmanship and
shall prescribe the type of instruction and the qualifications of the
instructors. The director shall, as part of establishing the training
program, exempt members of the United States military from the firearms
skills portion of any instruction course completed over the internet.
(ii) The director may cooperate with the National Rifle
Association, organized sportsmen's groups, or other public or private
organizations when establishing the training program.
(c) Upon the successful completion of a course established under
this section, the trainee shall receive a hunter education certificate
signed by an authorized instructor. The certificate is evidence of
compliance with this section.
(d) The director may accept certificates from other states that
persons have successfully completed firearm safety, hunter education,
or similar courses as evidence of compliance with this section.
(2))) To purchase a Washington hunting license for the first time,
a person born after January 1, 1972, must present proof of successfully
passing a hunter education training course. Proof is either:
(a) A hunter education certificate of completion from a course
instructed by or being taught under a contract with the department in
the safe handling of firearms, safety, conservation, and ethical
hunting behavior; or
(b) A hunter education certificate from another state or country
whose course is department approved.
(2) Members of the United States military who are residents of or
stationed in Washington are exempt from the firearms skills portion of
any hunter education training course instructed by or being taught
under a contract with the department and completed over the internet.
(3)(a) Beginning August 1, 2013, the director is authorized to
charge a registration fee of not more than twenty dollars for any
hunter education training course. This fee must be collected as
program income as defined in 50 C.F.R. Sec. 80.120 (2011). Program
income may be added to the moneys committed to the grant agreement by
the federal agency and the grantee. The program income must be used
for the purposes and under the conditions of the grant agreement.
(b) The commission shall adopt rules specifying the use of moneys
established under this subsection.
(4) Upon the successful completion of a hunter education training
course instructed by or being taught under a contract with the
department in the safe handling of firearms, safety, conservation, and
ethical hunting behavior, the trainee must receive an approved hunter
education certificate.
(5)(a) The department is authorized to collect an application fee,
not to exceed ten dollars, for providing a duplicate hunter education
certificate. This fee must be collected as program income, as defined
in 50 C.F.R. Sec. 80.120 (2011). Program income may be added to the
moneys committed to the grant agreement by the federal agency and the
grantee. The program income must be used for the purposes and under
the conditions of the grant agreement.
(b) The commission shall adopt rules specifying the use of moneys
established under this subsection.
(6) All hunters under the age of fourteen are required to hunt in
compliance with section 2 of this act.
(7)(a) The ((director)) department may authorize a once in a
lifetime, one license year deferral of hunter education training for
individuals who are accompanied ((by a nondeferred Washington-licensed
hunter who has held a Washington hunting license for the prior three
years and is over eighteen years of age)), while hunting, by a hunter
currently licensed to hunt in Washington, age eighteen or older, and
whose Washington license is not a one-year deferral license. The
commission shall adopt rules for the administration of this subsection
to avoid potential fraud and abuse.
(b) The ((director)) department is authorized to collect an
application fee, not to exceed twenty dollars, for obtaining the once
in a lifetime, one license year deferral of hunter education training
from the department. This fee must be deposited into the fish and
wildlife enforcement reward account and must be used exclusively to
administer the deferral program created in this subsection.
(((c))) (8) For the purposes of this ((subsection)) section,
"accompanied" means to go along with another person while staying
within a range of the other person that permits continual unaided
visual and auditory communication.
(((3))) (9) To encourage the participation of an adequate number of
instructors for the hunter education training ((program)) course, the
commission shall develop nonmonetary incentives available to
individuals who commit to serving as an instructor. The incentives may
include additional hunting opportunities for instructors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All hunters under age fourteen must be accompanied, while
hunting, by a hunter who is currently licensed to hunt in Washington,
is age eighteen or older, and whose Washington hunting license is not
a one-year deferral license allowed under RCW 77.32.155. However, a
hunter under the age of fourteen is not required to be accompanied if
he or she is the immediate family member of a private property owner or
lessee and is hunting on property his or her family owns or is leasing.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the term "accompanied" has
the same meaning as provided in RCW 77.32.155.
(3) A violation of this section is a natural resources infraction
subject to the provisions of chapter 7.84 RCW.

--- END ---