BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.04.060 and 2003 c 53 s 314 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any person who
violates any provision of RCW 69.04.040 is guilty of a misdemeanor and
shall on conviction thereof be subject to the following penalties:
(1) A fine of not more than two hundred dollars; or
(2) If the violation is committed after a conviction of such person
under this section has become final, imprisonment for not more than
thirty days, or a fine of not more than five hundred dollars, or both
such imprisonment and fine.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.04.928 and 2002 c 301 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of agriculture ((must)) may:
(1) Develop a pamphlet that generally describes the labeling
requirements for seafood((,)) as set forth in this chapter((, and));
(2) Provide ((an adequate quantity of)) to the department of fish
and wildlife a website link to the pamphlet((s to the department of
fish and wildlife to distribute with the issuance of a direct retail
endorsement under RCW 77.65.510)); and
(3) Make the pamphlet available to holders of any license
associated with buying and selling fish or shellfish under chapter
77.65 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 69.04.932 and 1993 c 282 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout ((RCW 69.04.933 through 69.04.935))
this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commercially caught" means wild or hatchery-raised salmon
harvested in the wild by commercial fishers. The term does not apply
to farmed fish raised exclusively by private sector aquaculture.
(2) "Food fish" means fresh or saltwater finfish and other forms of
aquatic animal life other than crustaceans, mollusks, birds, and
mammals where the animal life is intended for human consumption.
(3) "Salmon" means all species of the genus Oncorhynchus, except
those classified as game fish in ((Title 77)) RCW 77.08.020, and
includes:

SCIENTIFIC NAME COMMON NAME

Oncorhynchus tshawytscha Chinook salmon or king salmon

Oncorhynchus kisutch Coho salmon or silver salmon

Oncorhynchus keta Chum or "keta" salmon

Oncorhynchus gorbuscha Pink salmon

Oncorhynchus nerka Sockeye or "red" salmon

Salmo salar (in other than Atlantic salmon

its landlocked form)

(((2) "Commercially caught" means salmon harvested by commercial
fishers.)) (4) "Shellfish" means crustaceans and all mollusks where the
animal life is intended for human consumption.

Sec. 4 RCW 69.04.933 and 1993 c 282 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((With the exception of a commercial fisher engaged in sales of
fish to a fish buyer, no person may sell)) (1) It is unlawful to
knowingly sell or offer for sale at wholesale or retail any fresh
((or)), frozen ((salmon)), or processed food fish or ((cultured aquatic
salmon)) shellfish without identifying for the buyer at the point of
sale the species of ((salmon)) food fish or shellfish by its common
name ((to the buyer at the point of sale)), such that the buyer can
make an informed purchasing decision ((in purchasing)) for his or her
protection, health, and safety. ((A person knowingly violating this
section is guilty of misbranding under this chapter. A person who
receives misleading or erroneous information about the species of
salmon and subsequently inaccurately identifies salmon shall not be
guilty of misbranding. This section shall not apply to salmon that is
minced, pulverized, coated with batter, or breaded.))
(2) It is unlawful to knowingly label or offer for sale any food
fish designated as halibut, with or without additional descriptive
words, unless the food fish product is Hippoglossus hippoglossus or
Hippoglossus stenolepsis.
(3) This section does not apply to salmon that is minced,
pulverized, coated with batter, or breaded.
(4) This section does not apply to a commercial fisher properly
licensed under chapter 77.65 RCW and engaged in sales of fish to a fish
buyer.
(5) A violation of this section constitutes misbranding under
section 7 of this act and is punishable as a misdemeanor, gross
misdemeanor, or felony depending on the fair market value of the fish
or shellfish involved in the violation.
(6)(a) The common names for salmon species are as listed in RCW
69.04.932.
(b) The common names for all other food fish and shellfish are the
common names for food fish and shellfish species as defined by rule of
the director. If the common name for a species is not defined by rule
of the director, then the common name is the acceptable market name or
common name as provided in the United States food and drug
administration's publication "Seafood list - FDA's guide to acceptable
market names for seafood sold in interstate commerce," as the
publication existed on the effective date of this section.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "processed" means food fish
or shellfish processed by heat for human consumption, such as food fish
or shellfish that is kippered, smoked, boiled, canned, cleaned,
portioned, or prepared for sale or attempted sale for human
consumption.
(8) Nothing in this section precludes using additional descriptive
language or trade names to describe food fish or shellfish as long as
the labeling requirements in this section are met.

Sec. 5 RCW 69.04.934 and 2003 c 39 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
((With the exception of a commercial fisher engaged in sales of
fish to a fish buyer, no person may sell at wholesale or retail any
fresh or frozen:))
(1) It is unlawful to knowingly sell or offer for sale at wholesale
or retail any fresh, frozen, or processed salmon without identifying
private sector cultured aquatic salmon ((without identifying the)) or
salmon products as farm-raised salmon((; or
(2))), or identifying commercially caught salmon ((designated as
food fish under Title 77 RCW without identifying the)) or salmon
products as commercially caught salmon.
(2) Identification of the products under subsection((s)) (1) ((and
(2))) of this section ((shall)) must be made to the buyer at the point
of sale such that the buyer can make an informed purchasing decision
((in purchasing)) for his or her protection, health, and safety.
(3) A ((person knowingly violating)) violation of this section ((is
guilty of)) constitutes misbranding under ((this chapter. A person who
receives misleading or erroneous information about whether the salmon
is farm-raised or commercially caught, and subsequently inaccurately
identifies salmon shall not be guilty of misbranding)) section 7 of
this act and is punishable as a misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor, or
felony depending on the fair market value of the fish or shellfish
involved in the violation.
(4) This section ((shall)) does not apply to salmon that is minced,
pulverized, coated with batter, or breaded.
(5) This section does not apply to a commercial fisher properly
licensed under chapter 77.65 RCW and lawfully engaged in the sale of
fish to a fish buyer.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes using additional descriptive
language or trade names to describe food fish or shellfish as long as
the labeling requirements of this section are met.

Sec. 6 RCW 69.04.935 and 1994 c 264 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
To promote honesty and fair dealing for consumers and to protect
public health and safety, the director, in consultation with the
director of the department of fish and wildlife, ((shall)) may adopt
rules as necessary to:
(1) ((Fixing and establishing)) Establish and implement a
reasonable definition and identification standard ((of identity for
salmon for purposes of identifying and selling salmon)) for species of
food fish and shellfish that are sold for human consumption;
(2) ((Enforcing RCW 69.04.933 and 69.04.934)) Provide procedures
for enforcing this chapter's food fish and shellfish labeling
requirements and misbranding prohibitions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 69.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful misbranding of food fish or
shellfish in the third degree if the person commits an act that
violates RCW 69.04.933 or 69.04.934, and the misbranding involves food
fish or shellfish with a fair market value up to five hundred dollars.
Unlawful misbranding of food fish or shellfish in the third degree is
a misdemeanor.
(2) A person is guilty of unlawful misbranding of food fish or
shellfish in the second degree if the person commits an act that
violates RCW 69.04.933 or 69.04.934, and the misbranding involves food
fish or shellfish with a fair market value of five hundred dollars or
more, up to five thousand dollars. Unlawful misbranding of food fish
or shellfish in the second degree is a gross misdemeanor.
(3) A person is guilty of unlawful misbranding of food fish or
shellfish in the first degree if the person commits an act that
violates RCW 69.04.933 or 69.04.934, and the misbranding involves food
fish or shellfish with a fair market value of five thousand dollars or
more. Unlawful misbranding of food fish or shellfish in the first
degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 8 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2012 c 176 s 3 and 2012 c 162 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse
of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Abandonment of Dependent Person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless manner
(RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged
in sexually explicit conduct 1
(RCW 9.68A.050(1))

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of a
Signal Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.675)

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct 1 (RCW
9.68A.060(1))

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.070(1))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of Dependent Person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Dealing in Depictions of Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.050(2))

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Driving While Under the Influence
(RCW 46.61.502(6))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW
9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Physical Control of a Vehicle While
Under the Influence (RCW
46.61.504(6))

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sending, Bringing into State Depictions
of Minor Engaged in Sexually
Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW
9.68A.060(2))

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a
Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW
9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event
(RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Possession of Depictions of a Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.070(2))

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW 48.17.063(2))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Viewing of Depictions of a Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.075(1))

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Animal Cruelty 1 (Sexual Conduct or
Contact) (RCW 16.52.205(3))

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace
Officer With a Projectile Stun
Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except
subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction
or threat of death) (RCW
9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily
Harm By Use of a Signal
Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.674)

Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW
9A.56.350(2))

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Retail Theft with Extenuating
Circumstances 1 (RCW
9A.56.360(2))

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW
9A.56.340(2))

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Hunting of Big Game 1
(RCW 77.15.410(3)(b))

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful Misbranding of Food Fish or
Shellfish 1 (section 7(3) of this act)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Unlawful Taking of Endangered Fish
or Wildlife 1 (RCW
77.15.120(3)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish,
or Wildlife 1 (RCW
77.15.260(3)(b))

Unlawful Use of a Nondesignated
Vessel (RCW 77.15.530(4))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Commercial Fishing Without a License
1 (RCW 77.15.500(3)(b))

Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Engaging in Fish Dealing Activity
Unlicensed 1 (RCW 77.15.620(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender
(second or subsequent offense)
(RCW 9A.44.132)

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW
9A.56.350(3))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW
9A.56.068)

Retail Theft with Extenuating
Circumstances 2 (RCW
9A.56.360(3))

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW
9A.56.065)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW
9A.56.340(3))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Participation of Non-Indians
in Indian Fishery (RCW
77.15.570(2))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

Unlawful Purchase or Use of a License
(RCW 77.15.650(3)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish,
or Wildlife 2 (RCW
77.15.260(3)(a))

Voyeurism (RCW 9A.44.115)

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Spotlighting Big Game 1 (RCW
77.15.450(3)(b))

Suspension of Department Privileges 1
(RCW 77.15.670(3)(b))

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063)

Unlawful Fish and Shellfish Catch
Accounting (RCW
77.15.630(3)(b))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Release of Deleterious Exotic
Wildlife (RCW 77.15.250(2)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Unlawful Use of Net to Take Fish 1
(RCW 77.15.580(3)(b))

Unlawful Use of Prohibited Aquatic
Animal Species (RCW
77.15.253(3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Violating Commercial Fishing Area or
Time 1 (RCW 77.15.550(3)(b))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RCW 69.04.315 (Halibut -- Misbranding by
failure to show proper name) and 1967 ex.s. c 79 s 1 are each repealed.

--- END ---