BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Washington state legislature recognizes
the importance of ensuring frequent and meaningful contact for siblings
separated due to involvement in the foster care system. The
legislature also recognizes that children and youth in foster care are
not being provided adequate opportunities for visitation with their
siblings. It is the intent of the legislature to ensure appropriate
facilitation of sibling visits by enumerating the specific and
appropriate limitations for such visits for the information of case
managers, caregivers, birth families, and youth.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.136 and 2011 c 309 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a child is ordered removed from the home, a permanency
plan shall be developed no later than sixty days from the time the
supervising agency assumes responsibility for providing services,
including placing the child, or at the time of a hearing under RCW
13.34.130, whichever occurs first. The permanency planning process
continues until a permanency planning goal is achieved or dependency is
dismissed. The planning process shall include reasonable efforts to
return the child to the parent's home.
(2) The agency supervising the dependency shall submit a written
permanency plan to all parties and the court not less than fourteen
days prior to the scheduled hearing. Responsive reports of parties not
in agreement with the department's or supervising agency's proposed
permanency plan must be provided to the department or supervising
agency, all other parties, and the court at least seven days prior to
the hearing.
The permanency plan shall include:
(a) A permanency plan of care that shall identify one of the
following outcomes as a primary goal and may identify additional
outcomes as alternative goals: Return of the child to the home of the
child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian; adoption, including a
tribal customary adoption as defined in RCW 13.38.040; guardianship;
permanent legal custody; long-term relative or foster care, until the
child is age eighteen, with a written agreement between the parties and
the care provider; successful completion of a responsible living skills
program; or independent living, if appropriate and if the child is age
sixteen or older. The department or supervising agency shall not
discharge a child to an independent living situation before the child
is eighteen years of age unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant
to chapter 13.64 RCW;
(b) Unless the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(((6)))
(8), that a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where
the child will be placed, what steps will be taken to return the child
home, what steps the supervising agency or the department will take to
promote existing appropriate sibling relationships and/or facilitate
placement together or contact in accordance with the best interests of
each child, and what actions the department or supervising agency will
take to maintain parent-child ties. All aspects of the plan shall
include the goal of achieving permanence for the child.
(i) The department's or supervising agency's plan shall specify
what services the parents will be offered to enable them to resume
custody, what requirements the parents must meet to resume custody, and
a time limit for each service plan and parental requirement.
(ii) Visitation is the right of the family, including the child and
the parent, in cases in which visitation is in the best interest of the
child. Early, consistent, and frequent visitation is crucial for
maintaining parent-child relationships and making it possible for
parents and children to safely reunify. The supervising agency or
department shall encourage the maximum parent and child ((and sibling))
contact possible, when it is in the best interest of the child,
including regular visitation and participation by the parents in the
care of the child while the child is in placement. Visitation shall
not be limited as a sanction for a parent's failure to comply with
court orders or services where the health, safety, or welfare of the
child is not at risk as a result of the visitation. Visitation may be
limited or denied only if the court determines that such limitation or
denial is necessary to protect the child's health, safety, or welfare.
The court and the department or supervising agency should rely upon
community resources, relatives, foster parents, and other appropriate
persons to provide transportation and supervision for visitation to the
extent that such resources are available, and appropriate, and the
child's safety would not be compromised.
(iii) The supervising agency or department shall facilitate child
and sibling interaction, including at least two visits or contacts per
month. In-person visits are presumed to be in the child's best
interest over other forms of contact. Contact or visitation may not be
limited or denied unless:
(A) A court order prevents or limits visits or contacts;
(B) The department has determined that visits or contacts would be
contrary to the child's health, safety, or welfare or that they would
hinder reunification efforts; or
(C) The department has documented that:
(I) The child or sibling is developmentally able to determine his
or her needs for sibling visits or contacts and has requested that
there be no contact with his or her sibling or that such contact should
occur less than two times per month;
(II) The parent of a nondependent sibling objects to or requests a
limitation of visits or contacts with the dependent child;
(III) The facility where the child or sibling resides prohibits or
limits visits or contacts with siblings;
(IV) The child is on the run from his or her placement for a
majority of the current calendar month; or
(V) The child is not complying with visitation arrangements.
Any exceptions, limitation, or denial of contacts or visitation
must be approved by the supervisor of the department case worker and
documented. The department, court, or caregiver in the out-of-home
placement may not limit visitation as a sanction for a child's behavior
or as an incentive to the child to change his or her behavior. The
child, the parent, the department, the guardian ad litem, or the court-appointed special advocate, may challenge the denial of visits in
court.
(iv) A child shall be placed as close to the child's home as
possible, preferably in the child's own neighborhood, unless the court
finds that placement at a greater distance is necessary to promote the
child's or parents' well-being.
(((iv))) (v) The plan shall state whether both in-state and, where
appropriate, out-of-state placement options have been considered by the
department or supervising agency.
(((v))) (vi) Unless it is not in the best interests of the child,
whenever practical, the plan should ensure the child remains enrolled
in the school the child was attending at the time the child entered
foster care.
(((vi))) (vii) The supervising agency or department shall provide
all reasonable services that are available within the department or
supervising agency, or within the community, or those services which
the department has existing contracts to purchase. It shall report to
the court if it is unable to provide such services; and
(c) If the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(((6))) (8),
that a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the
child will be placed, what steps will be taken to achieve permanency
for the child, services to be offered or provided to the child, and, if
visitation would be in the best interests of the child, a
recommendation to the court regarding visitation between parent and
child pending a fact-finding hearing on the termination petition. The
department or supervising agency shall not be required to develop a
plan of services for the parents or provide services to the parents if
the court orders a termination petition be filed. However, reasonable
efforts to ensure visitation and contact between siblings shall be made
unless there is reasonable cause to believe the best interests of the
child or siblings would be jeopardized.
(3) Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the earliest
possible date. If the child has been in out-of-home care for fifteen
of the most recent twenty-two months, the court shall require the
department or supervising agency to file a petition seeking termination
of parental rights in accordance with RCW 13.34.145(3)(b)(vi). In
cases where parental rights have been terminated, the child is legally
free for adoption, and adoption has been identified as the primary
permanency planning goal, it shall be a goal to complete the adoption
within six months following entry of the termination order.
(4) If the court determines that the continuation of reasonable
efforts to prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from his
or her home or to safely return the child home should not be part of
the permanency plan of care for the child, reasonable efforts shall be
made to place the child in a timely manner and to complete whatever
steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.
(5) The identified outcomes and goals of the permanency plan may
change over time based upon the circumstances of the particular case.
(6) The court shall consider the child's relationships with the
child's siblings in accordance with RCW 13.34.130(((4))) (6). Whenever
the permanency plan for a child is adoption, the court shall encourage
the prospective adoptive parents, birth parents, foster parents,
kinship caregivers, and the department or other supervising agency to
seriously consider the long-term benefits to the child adoptee and his
or her siblings of providing for and facilitating continuing
postadoption contact between the siblings. To the extent that it is
feasible, and when it is in the best interests of the child adoptee and
his or her siblings, contact between the siblings should be frequent
and of a similar nature as that which existed prior to the adoption.
If the child adoptee or his or her siblings are represented by an
attorney or guardian ad litem in a proceeding under this chapter or in
any other child custody proceeding, the court shall inquire of each
attorney and guardian ad litem regarding the potential benefits of
continuing contact between the siblings and the potential detriments of
severing contact. This section does not require the department of
social and health services or other supervising agency to agree to any
specific provisions in an open adoption agreement and does not create
a new obligation for the department to provide supervision or
transportation for visits between siblings separated by adoption from
foster care.
(7) For purposes related to permanency planning:
(a) "Guardianship" means a dependency guardianship or a legal
guardianship pursuant to chapter 11.88 RCW or equivalent laws of
another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.
(b) "Permanent custody order" means a custody order entered
pursuant to chapter 26.10 RCW.
(c) "Permanent legal custody" means legal custody pursuant to
chapter 26.10 RCW or equivalent laws of another state or a federally
recognized Indian tribe.

--- END ---