BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that despite
increased enrollment of students in online college courses, more use
could be made of the power and reach of digital technology,
particularly to expand access to dual credit opportunities for students
in rural areas. The legislature further finds that low-income students
and students of color continue to be underrepresented in dual credit
programs, due in part to the barriers imposed by cost and the lack of
academic support to ensure their success.
(2) Therefore the legislature intends to establish a pilot project
to expand free access to online college courses for high school
students. The digital college in the high school is also intended to
address some of the known barriers to student success in dual credit
and online courses by eliminating costs for textbooks, fees, and
transportation; providing a simple and consistent process for
application and enrollment; and assuring continued support for the
student from his or her high school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The digital college in the high school is established under
this section and section 3 of this act as a pilot project for a two-year period beginning with the 2013-14 school year.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
state board for community and technical colleges must establish a
single online portal for eligible high school students to apply and
enroll in college courses offered by community and technical colleges
through the Washington online system, regardless of which college
offers the course. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall host the enrollment portal on its web site.
(3) The digital college in the high school is limited to courses
that may be applied both toward local or state high school graduation
requirements and toward distribution requirements at a four-year
institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 under the
statewide direct transfer agreement.
(4) Courses may be taught by community and technical college
faculty or by a high school teacher approved by a community or
technical college to be the course instructor on behalf of a college
using the Washington online system.
(5) The state board for community and technical colleges, in
consultation with the colleges, must establish a common admission
standard for students enrolling in the digital college in the high
school. The standard may be based on one or more readily available
placement tests but must be the same regardless of which college offers
the course. The enrollment portal for the pilot project must contain
information about how students may access the placement tests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not
yet received the credits required for the award of a high school
diploma and are eligible to be in the eleventh or twelfth grades may
apply to enroll in courses offered through the digital college in the
high school. However, students are eligible to enroll in program
courses only if the board of directors of the student's school district
has decided to participate in the pilot project. If a student is
accepted to enroll in a college course under the pilot project, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, via the online
enrollment portal, must send an electronic notice to the student's
school district indicating the course information, including the
college offering the course, course hours and credits, and contact
information for the course instructor.
(2) Students may not be required to pay any tuition and fees for
courses in the digital college in the high school, or any other fees
charged by community and technical colleges. Costs for textbooks and
materials must be paid using the reimbursement system under subsection
(3) of this section.
(3) Each student's school district must transmit to the state board
for community and technical colleges an amount per each full-time
equivalent college student at statewide uniform rates. The
superintendent of public instruction shall separately calculate and
allocate moneys appropriated for basic education under RCW 28A.150.260
to school districts for purposes of making such payments and for
granting school districts fifteen percent thereof to provide support
services as required under subsection (4) of this section. The
calculations and allocations must be based upon the estimated statewide
annual average per full-time equivalent high school student allocations
under RCW 28A.150.260, excluding small high school enhancements and
career and technical education enhancements, and applicable rules
adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The state board for community and
technical colleges must transmit the per full-time equivalent student
funding to the appropriate community or technical college based on the
standards and procedures of the Washington online system, including
covering the costs of textbooks and materials. The funds received by
a college shall not be deemed tuition or operating fees.
(4) A school district must assign a staff member at the student's
high school to monitor the progress of each student enrolled in the
digital college in the high school, including providing technical
assistance, instructional assistance, and initiating contact with the
course instructor as necessary to support the student in successfully
completing the course. If the student continues also to be enrolled in
courses offered by the high school, the student may access the online
courses using available computers on the high school campus. The state
board for community and technical colleges and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction must develop a common consent form
for students enrolling in the digital college in the high school to
permit disclosure of education records under the family education
rights and privacy act between the course instructor and the designated
high school staff member so that the staff member may monitor the
student's progress under this subsection.
(5) A school district must grant academic credit to a student who
successfully completes a course under the digital college in the high
school. The credit must be applied toward graduation requirements and
subject area requirements. Evidence of the successful completion of
each course must be included in the student's education records and
high school transcript. The transcript must note that the course was
taken through an institution of higher education.
(6) The community or technical college that provided the course
instruction must award college credit to a student who successfully
completes a course under the digital college in the high school. The
college may not charge a fee for the award of the credit.
(7) The digital college in the high school is in addition to and
does not affect students' opportunities to enroll in online college
courses or on-campus college courses under the running start program
under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400, or on-campus college in the
high school program courses under RCW 28A.600.290.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
conduct a marketing and communications campaign to inform parents,
students, and school districts about the opportunity for students to
earn dual high school and college credit under the digital college in
the high school, with no cost for tuition, fees, or textbooks.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges,
must evaluate the digital college in the high school and submit a
report to the education and higher education committees of the
legislature by January 15, 2015. The report must include information
about student demographics, course enrollment, and course completion
under the program compared to regularly enrolled high school students
and students enrolled in the running start program and the on-campus
college in the high school program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires August 31, 2015.

--- END ---