BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.10.220 and 2013 c 222 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board is created in the department of enterprise services
to provide an evaluation of public capital projects construction
processes, including the impact of contracting methods on project
outcomes, and to advise the legislature on policies related to public
works delivery methods.
(2) Members of the board are appointed as follows:
(a) Two representatives from construction general contracting; one
representative from the architectural profession; one representative
from the engineering profession; two representatives from construction
specialty subcontracting; two representatives from construction trades
labor organizations; one representative from the office of minority and
women's business enterprises; one representative from a higher
education institution; one representative from the department of
enterprise services; one individual representing Washington cities; two
representatives from private industry; and one representative of a
domestic insurer authorized to write surety bonds for contractors in
Washington state, each appointed by the governor. All appointed
members must be knowledgeable about public works contracting
procedures. If a vacancy occurs, the governor shall fill the vacancy
for the unexpired term;
(b) One member representing counties, selected by the Washington
state association of counties;
(c) One member representing public ports, selected by the
Washington public ports association;
(d) One member representing public hospital districts, selected by
the association of Washington public hospital districts;
(e) One member representing school districts, selected by the
Washington state school directors' association; ((and))
(f) One member representing regional transit authorities; and
(g) Two members of the house of representatives, one from each
major caucus, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives,
and two members of the senate, one from each major caucus, appointed by
the president of the senate. Legislative members are nonvoting.
(3) Members selected under subsection (2)(a) of this section shall
serve for terms of four years, with the terms expiring on June 30th on
the fourth year of the term.
(4) The board chair is selected from among the appointed members by
the majority vote of the voting members.
(5) Legislative members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members of
the board, project review committee members, and committee chairs shall
be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(6) Vacancies are filled in the same manner as appointed. Members
of the board may be removed for malfeasance or misfeasance in office,
upon specific written charges by the governor, under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(7) The board shall meet as often as necessary.
(8) Board members are expected to consistently attend board
meetings. The chair of the board may ask the governor to remove any
member who misses more than two meetings in any calendar year without
cause.
(9) The department of enterprise services shall provide staff
support as may be required for the proper discharge of the function of
the board.
(10) The board may establish committees as it desires and may
invite nonmembers of the board to serve as committee members.
(11) The board shall encourage participation from persons and
entities not represented on the board.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.131.408 and 2013 c 222 s 22 and 2013 c 186 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2022:
(1) RCW 39.10.200 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 2, 2007 c 494 s 1, &
1994 c 132 s 1;
(2) RCW 39.10.210 and 2013 c 222 s 1, 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6014,
2007 c 494 s 101, & 2005 c 469 s 3;
(3) RCW 39.10.220 and 2014 c . . . s 1 (section 1 of this act),
2013 c 222 s 2, 2007 c 494 s 102, & 2005 c 377 s 1;
(4) RCW 39.10.230 and 2013 c 222 s 3, 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 3, 2009
c 75 s 1, 2007 c 494 s 103, & 2005 c 377 s 2;
(5) RCW 39.10.240 and 2013 c 222 s 4 & 2007 c 494 s 104;
(6) RCW 39.10.250 and 2013 c 222 s 5, 2009 c 75 s 2, & 2007 c 494
s 105;
(7) RCW 39.10.260 and 2013 c 222 s 6 & 2007 c 494 s 106;
(8) RCW 39.10.270 and 2013 c 222 s 7, 2009 c 75 s 3, & 2007 c 494
s 107;
(9) RCW 39.10.280 and 2013 c 222 s 8 & 2007 c 494 s 108;
(10) RCW 39.10.290 and 2007 c 494 s 109;
(11) RCW 39.10.300 and 2013 c 222 s 9, 2009 c 75 s 4, & 2007 c 494
s 201;
(12) RCW 39.10.320 and 2013 c 222 s 10, 2007 c 494 s 203, & 1994 c
132 s 7;
(13) RCW 39.10.330 and 2013 c 222 s 11, 2009 c 75 s 5, & 2007 c 494
s 204;
(14) RCW 39.10.340 and 2013 c 222 s 12 & 2007 c 494 s 301;
(15) RCW 39.10.350 and 2007 c 494 s 302;
(16) RCW 39.10.360 and 2013 c 222 s 13, 2009 c 75 s 6, & 2007 c 494
s 303;
(17) RCW 39.10.370 and 2007 c 494 s 304;
(18) RCW 39.10.380 and 2013 c 222 s 14 & 2007 c 494 s 305;
(19) RCW 39.10.385 and 2013 c 222 s 15 & 2010 c 163 s 1;
(20) RCW 39.10.390 and 2013 c 222 s 16 & 2007 c 494 s 306;
(21) RCW 39.10.400 and 2013 c 222 s 17 & 2007 c 494 s 307;
(22) RCW 39.10.410 and 2007 c 494 s 308;
(23) RCW 39.10.420 and 2013 c 222 s 18, 2013 c 186 s 1, 2012 c 102
s 1, 2009 c 75 s 7, 2007 c 494 s 401, & 2003 c 301 s 1;
(24) RCW 39.10.430 and 2007 c 494 s 402;
(25) RCW 39.10.440 and 2013 c 222 s 19 & 2007 c 494 s 403;
(26) RCW 39.10.450 and 2012 c 102 s 2 & 2007 c 494 s 404;
(27) RCW 39.10.460 and 2012 c 102 s 3 & 2007 c 494 s 405;
(28) RCW 39.10.470 and 2005 c 274 s 275 & 1994 c 132 s 10;
(29) RCW 39.10.480 and 1994 c 132 s 9;
(30) RCW 39.10.490 and 2013 c 222 s 20, 2007 c 494 s 501, & 2001 c
328 s 5;
(31) RCW 39.10.900 and 1994 c 132 s 13;
(32) RCW 39.10.901 and 1994 c 132 s 14;
(33) RCW 39.10.903 and 2007 c 494 s 510;
(34) RCW 39.10.904 and 2007 c 494 s 512; and
(35) RCW 39.10.905 and 2007 c 494 s 513.

--- END ---