BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.18.545 and 2002 c 360 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Adverse action" has the same meaning as defined in the fair
credit reporting act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq. Adverse actions
include, but are not limited to:
(i) Cancellation, denial, or nonrenewal of personal insurance
coverage;
(ii) Charging a higher insurance premium for personal insurance
than would have been offered if the credit history or insurance score
had been more favorable, whether the charge is by:
(A) Application of a rating rule;
(B) Assignment to a rating tier that does not have the lowest
available rates; or
(C) Placement with an affiliate company that does not offer the
lowest rates available to the consumer within the affiliate group of
insurance companies; or
(iii) Any reduction, adverse, or unfavorable change in the terms of
coverage or amount of any personal insurance due to a consumer's credit
history or insurance score. A reduction, adverse, or unfavorable
change in the terms of coverage occurs when:
(A) Coverage provided to the consumer is not as broad in scope as
coverage requested by the consumer but available to other insureds of
the insurer or any affiliate; or
(B) The consumer is not eligible for benefits such as dividends
that are available through affiliate insurers.
(b) "Affiliate" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.31B.005(1).
(c) "Consumer" means an individual policyholder or applicant for
insurance.
(d) "Consumer report" has the same meaning as defined in the fair
credit reporting act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.
(e) "Credit history" means any written, oral, or other
communication of any information by a consumer reporting agency bearing
on a consumer's creditworthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity
that is used or expected to be used, or collected in whole or in part,
for the purpose of serving as a factor in determining personal
insurance premiums or eligibility for coverage.
(f) "Deny" means an insurer refuses to offer insurance coverage to
a consumer.
(g) "Insurance score" means a number or rating that is derived from
an algorithm, computer application, model, or other process that is
based in whole or in part on credit history.
(((g))) (h) "Personal insurance" means:
(i) Private passenger automobile coverage;
(ii) ((Homeowner's coverage, including mobile homeowners,
manufactured homeowners, condominium owners, and renter's coverage;
(iii) Dwelling property coverage;
(iv) Earthquake coverage for a residence or personal property;
(v))) Personal liability and theft coverage;
(((vi))) (iii) Personal inland marine coverage; and
(((vii))) (iv) Mechanical breakdown coverage for personal auto or
home appliances.
(((h))) (i) "Tier" means a category within a single insurer into
which insureds with substantially like insuring, risk or exposure
factors, and expense elements are placed for purposes of determining
rate or premium.
(2) An insurer that takes adverse action against a consumer based
in whole or in part on credit history or insurance score shall provide
written notice to the applicant or named insured. The notice must
state the significant factors of the credit history or insurance score
that resulted in the adverse action. The insurer shall also inform the
consumer that the consumer is entitled to a free copy of their consumer
report under the fair credit reporting act.
(3) An insurer shall not cancel or nonrenew personal insurance
based in whole or in part on a consumer's credit history or insurance
score. An offer of placement with an affiliate insurer does not
constitute cancellation or nonrenewal under this section.
(4) An insurer may use credit history to deny personal insurance
only in combination with other substantive underwriting factors. For
the purposes of this subsection:
(a) (("Deny" means an insurer refuses to offer insurance coverage
to a consumer;
(b))) An offer of placement with an affiliate insurer does not
constitute denial of coverage; and
(((c))) (b) An insurer may reject an application when coverage is
not bound or cancel an insurance contract within the first sixty days
after the effective date of the contract.
(5) Insurers shall not deny personal insurance coverage based on:
(a) The absence of credit history or the inability to determine the
consumer's credit history, if the insurer has received accurate and
complete information from the consumer;
(b) The number of credit inquiries;
(c) Credit history or an insurance score based on collection
accounts identified with a medical industry code;
(d) The initial purchase or finance of a vehicle or house that adds
a new loan to the consumer's existing credit history, if evident from
the consumer report; however, an insurer may consider the bill payment
history of any loan, the total number of loans, or both;
(e) The consumer's use of a particular type of credit card, charge
card, or debit card; or
(f) The consumer's total available line of credit; however, an
insurer may consider the total amount of outstanding debt in relation
to the total available line of credit.
(6)(a) If disputed credit history is used to determine eligibility
for coverage and a consumer is placed with an affiliate that charges
higher premiums or offers less favorable policy terms:
(i) The insurer shall reissue or rerate the policy retroactive to
the effective date of the current policy term; and
(ii) The policy, as reissued or rerated, shall provide premiums and
policy terms the consumer would have been eligible for if accurate
credit history had been used to determine eligibility.
(b) This subsection only applies if the consumer resolves the
dispute under the process set forth in the fair credit reporting act
and notifies the insurer in writing that the dispute has been resolved.
(7) An insurer may not use credit history to deny, cancel, or
nonrenew homeowners insurance, dwelling property coverage, or
earthquake coverage for a residence. This subsection applies to all
insurance policies applied for, issued, or renewed after the effective
date of this section and to all insurance policies in force after
January 1, 2014.
(8) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section.
(((8) This section applies to all personal insurance policies
issued or renewed after January 1, 2003.))

Sec. 2 RCW 48.19.035 and 2004 c 86 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Affiliate" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.31B.005(1).
(b) "Consumer" means an individual policyholder or applicant for
insurance.
(c) "Credit history" means any written, oral, or other
communication of any information by a consumer reporting agency bearing
on a consumer's creditworthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity
that is used or expected to be used, or collected in whole or in part,
for the purpose of serving as a factor in determining personal
insurance premiums or eligibility for coverage.
(d) "Insurance score" means a number or rating that is derived from
an algorithm, computer application, model, or other process that is
based in whole or in part on credit history.
(e) "Personal insurance" means:
(i) Private passenger automobile coverage;
(ii) ((Homeowner's coverage, including mobile homeowners,
manufactured homeowners, condominium owners, and renter's coverage;
(iii) Dwelling property coverage;
(iv) Earthquake coverage for a residence or personal property;
(v))) Personal liability and theft coverage;
(((vi))) (iii) Personal inland marine coverage; and
(((vii))) (iv) Mechanical breakdown coverage for personal auto or
home appliances.
(2)(a) Credit history shall not be used to determine personal
insurance rates, premiums, or eligibility for coverage unless the
insurance scoring models are filed with the commissioner. Insurance
scoring models include all attributes and factors used in the
calculation of an insurance score. RCW 48.19.040(5) does not apply to
any information filed under this subsection, and the information shall
be withheld from public inspection and kept confidential by the
commissioner. All information filed under this subsection shall be
considered trade secrets under RCW 48.02.120(3). Information filed
under this subsection may be made public by the commissioner for the
sole purpose of enforcement actions taken by the commissioner.
(b) Each insurer that uses credit history or an insurance score to
determine personal insurance rates, premiums, or eligibility for
coverage must file all rates and rating plans for that line of coverage
with the commissioner. This requirement applies equally to a single
insurer and two or more affiliated insurers. RCW 48.19.040(5) applies
to information filed under this subsection except that any eligibility
rules or guidelines shall be withheld from public inspection under RCW
48.02.120(3) from the date that the information is filed and after it
becomes effective.
(3) Insurers shall not use the following types of credit history to
calculate a personal insurance score or determine personal insurance
premiums or rates:
(a) The absence of credit history or the inability to determine the
consumer's credit history, unless the insurer has filed actuarial data
segmented by demographic factors in a manner prescribed by the
commissioner that demonstrates compliance with RCW 48.19.020;
(b) The number of credit inquiries;
(c) Credit history or an insurance score based on collection
accounts identified with a medical industry code;
(d) The initial purchase or finance of a vehicle or house that adds
a new loan to the consumer's existing credit history, if evident from
the consumer report; however, an insurer may consider the bill payment
history of any loan, the total number of loans, or both;
(e) The consumer's use of a particular type of credit card, charge
card, or debit card; or
(f) The consumer's total available line of credit; however, an
insurer may consider the total amount of outstanding debt in relation
to the total available line of credit.
(4) If a consumer is charged higher premiums due to disputed credit
history, the insurer shall rerate the policy retroactive to the
effective date of the current policy term. As rerated, the consumer
shall be charged the same premiums they would have been charged if
accurate credit history was used to calculate an insurance score. This
subsection applies only if the consumer resolves the dispute under the
process set forth in the fair credit reporting act and notifies the
insurer in writing that the dispute has been resolved.
(5) Credit history may not be used to determine rates, premiums, or
eligibility for homeowners insurance, dwelling property coverage, or
earthquake coverage for a residence. This subsection applies to all
insurance policies applied for, issued, or renewed after the effective
date of this section and to all insurance policies in force after
January 1, 2014.
(6) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section.
(((6) This section applies to all personal insurance policies
issued or renewed on or after June 30, 2003.))

--- END ---