BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of health shall, using the
procedures and standards set forth in chapter 48.47 RCW, conduct a
sunrise review of the proposal, as set forth in House Bill No. 1216
(2013), requiring health carriers to include formulas necessary for the
treatment of eosinophilia gastrointestinal associated disorders,
regardless of the delivery method of the formula. The department shall
report the results of the review no later than thirty days prior to the
2014 legislative session.

--- END ---