BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.48.150 and 1994 c 301 s 46 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The assessor shall, upon the request of any taxpayer who
petitions the board of equalization for review of a tax claim or
valuation dispute, make available to said taxpayer a compilation of
comparable sales utilized by the assessor in establishing such
taxpayer's property valuation. If valuation criteria other than
comparable sales were used, the assessor shall furnish the taxpayer
with such other factors and the addresses of such other property used
in making the determination of value.
(2) The assessor shall within sixty days of such request but at
least fourteen business days, excluding legal holidays, prior to such
taxpayer's appearance before the board of equalization make available
to the taxpayer the valuation criteria and/or comparable sales which
shall not be subsequently changed by the assessor unless the assessor
has found new evidence supporting the assessor's valuation, in which
situation the assessor shall provide such additional evidence to the
taxpayer and the board of equalization at least fourteen business days
prior to the hearing at the board of equalization. A taxpayer who
lists comparable sales on a notice of appeal shall not subsequently
change such sales unless the taxpayer has found new evidence supporting
the taxpayer's proposed valuation in which case the taxpayer shall
provide such additional evidence to the assessor and board of
equalization at least seven business days, excluding legal holidays,
prior to the hearing. If either the assessor or taxpayer does not meet
the requirements of this section the board of equalization may continue
the hearing to provide the parties an opportunity to review all
evidence or, upon objection, refuse to consider sales not submitted in
a timely manner.
(3) Within sixty days from the date a petition challenging the
assessed value of commercial property is either postmarked for delivery
or delivered in person to the county board of equalization, the
taxpayer must submit to the clerk of the county board of equalization
income and expense statements for the two years prior to the assessment
date. If a taxpayer fails to provide such income and expense
statements within the time required, he or she is precluded from
challenging the valuation assessment of the commercial property on the
basis that the assessor committed an error in the assessor's
consideration of any capitalization of income that would be derived
from prudent use of the property.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "commercial property"
includes any property except:
(a) A single-family residence, including single-family manufactured
homes; and
(b) A single-family residential unit within a condominium,
townhouse, or similar building, excluding such buildings or units that
are or have been declared as apartments or are operated as apartments.

--- END ---