BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.15.670 and 1999 c 258 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of violating a suspension of department
privileges in the second degree if the person engages in any activity
that is licensed by the department and the person's privileges to
engage in that activity were revoked or suspended by any court or the
department.
(2) A person is guilty of violating a suspension of department
privileges in the first degree if the person commits the act described
by subsection (1) of this section and:
(a) The suspension of privileges that was violated was a permanent
suspension;
(b) The person takes or possesses more than two hundred fifty
dollars' worth of unlawfully taken food fish, wildlife, game fish,
seaweed, or shellfish; or
(c) The violation involves the hunting, taking, or possession of
fish or wildlife classified as endangered or threatened or big game.
(3)(a) Violating a suspension of department privileges in the
second degree is a gross misdemeanor. ((Upon conviction, the
department shall order)) Except for violations of child support-based
suspensions, which are covered in (c) of this subsection, a conviction
under this subsection requires the department to order a permanent
suspension of the person's privileges to engage in ((such)) the hunting
or fishing activities that he or she was engaged in when he or she
violated a suspension of department privileges in the second degree.
(b) Violating a suspension of department privileges in the first
degree is a class C felony. ((Upon conviction, the department shall
order)) Except for violations of child support-based suspensions, which
are covered in (c) of this subsection, a conviction under this
subsection requires the department to order a permanent suspension of
all of the person's privileges to hunt, fish, trap, or take wildlife,
food fish, game fish, or shellfish.
(c) Suspension periods for violations of child support-based
suspensions are as follows:
(i) If the suspension that the person violated in the second degree
was based on noncompliance with child support and was ordered under RCW
74.20A.322 or 77.32.014, then the department must order a suspension of
all of the person's privileges to hunt, fish, trap, or take wildlife,
food fish, game fish, or shellfish for a period of two years. This
suspension is in addition to any suspension required by the statute for
the underlying fish or wildlife violation.
(ii) If the suspension that the person violated in the first degree
was based on noncompliance with child support and was ordered under RCW
74.20A.322 or 77.32.014, then the department must order a suspension of
all of the person's privileges to hunt, fish, trap, or take wildlife,
food fish, game fish, or shellfish for a period of four years. This
suspension is in addition to any suspension required by the statute for
the underlying fish or wildlife violation.
(iii) Suspensions pursuant to (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection do
not affect any underlying hunting and fishing privilege suspensions
based on noncompliance with child support and ordered under RCW
74.20A.322 or 77.32.014. If a person who is suspended pursuant to
(c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection completes the period of suspension
ordered under this section but is still suspended for child support
noncompliance, the person is prohibited from hunting, fishing, or
engaging in any activity regulated by the department until he or she
obtains a release from the department of social and health services and
provides a copy of the release to the department.
(4) As used in this section, hunting includes trapping with a
trapping license.

--- END ---