BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.09.050 and 2011 c 207 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall establish by rule which forest practices shall
be included within each of the following classes:
Class I: Minimal or specific forest practices that have no direct
potential for damaging a public resource and that may be conducted
without submitting an application or a notification except that when
the regulating authority is transferred to a local governmental entity,
those Class I forest practices that involve timber harvesting or road
construction within "urban growth areas," designated pursuant to
chapter 36.70A RCW, are processed as Class IV forest practices, but are
not subject to environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW;
Class II: Forest practices which have a less than ordinary
potential for damaging a public resource that may be conducted without
submitting an application and may begin five calendar days, or such
lesser time as the department may determine, after written notification
by the operator, in the manner, content, and form as prescribed by the
department, is received by the department. However, the work may not
begin until all forest practice fees required under RCW 76.09.065 have
been received by the department. Class II shall not include forest
practices:
(a) On forest lands that are being converted to another use;
(b) Which require approvals under the provisions of the hydraulics
act, RCW 77.55.021;
(c) Within "shorelines of the state" as defined in RCW 90.58.030;
(d) Excluded from Class II by the board; or
(e) Including timber harvesting or road construction within "urban
growth areas," designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, which are
Class IV;
Class III: Forest practices other than those contained in Class I,
II, or IV. A Class III application must be approved or disapproved by
the department within thirty calendar days from the date the department
receives the application. However, the applicant may not begin work on
that forest practice until all forest practice fees required under RCW
76.09.065 have been received by the department;
Class IV: Forest practices other than those contained in Class I
or II:
(a) On forest lands that are being converted to another use;
(b) On lands which, pursuant to RCW 76.09.070 as now or hereafter
amended, are not to be reforested because of the likelihood of future
conversion to urban development;
(c) That involve timber harvesting or road construction on forest
lands that are contained within "urban growth areas," designated
pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, except where the forest landowner
provides:
(i) A written statement of intent signed by the forest landowner
not to convert to a use other than commercial forest product operations
for ten years, accompanied by either a written forest management plan
acceptable to the department or documentation that the land is enrolled
under the provisions of chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW; or
(ii) A conversion option harvest plan approved by the local
governmental entity and submitted to the department as part of the
application; and/or
(d) Which have a potential for a substantial impact on the
environment and therefore require an evaluation by the department as to
whether or not a detailed statement must be prepared pursuant to the
state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW. Such evaluation
shall be made within ten days from the date the department receives the
application: PROVIDED, That nothing herein shall be construed to
prevent any local or regional governmental entity from determining that
a detailed statement must be prepared for an action pursuant to a Class
IV forest practice taken by that governmental entity concerning the
land on which forest practices will be conducted. A Class IV
application must be approved or disapproved by the department within
thirty calendar days from the date the department receives the
application, unless the department determines that a detailed statement
must be made, in which case the application must be approved or
disapproved by the department within sixty calendar days from the date
the department receives the application, unless the commissioner of
public lands, through the promulgation of a formal order, determines
that the process cannot be completed within such period. However, the
applicant may not begin work on that forest practice until all forest
practice fees required under RCW 76.09.065 have been received by the
department.
Forest practices under Classes I, II, and III are exempt from the
requirements for preparation of a detailed statement under the state
environmental policy act.
(2)(a) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, no Class
II, Class III, or Class IV forest practice shall be commenced or
continued after January 1, 1975, unless the department has received a
notification with regard to a Class II forest practice or approved an
application with regard to a Class III or Class IV forest practice
containing all information required by RCW 76.09.060 ((as now or
hereafter amended. However,)). Any application denials must be
consistent with RCW 76.09.140 or section 3 of this act.
(b) In the event forest practices regulations necessary for the
scheduled implementation of this chapter and RCW 90.48.420 have not
been adopted in time to meet such schedules, the department shall have
the authority to regulate forest practices and approve applications on
such terms and conditions consistent with this chapter and RCW
90.48.420 and the purposes and policies of RCW 76.09.010 until
applicable forest practices regulations are in effect.
(3) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, if a
notification or application is delivered in person to the department by
the operator or the operator's agent, the department shall immediately
provide a dated receipt thereof. In all other cases, the department
shall immediately mail a dated receipt to the operator.
(4) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, forest
practices shall be conducted in accordance with the forest practices
regulations, orders and directives as authorized by this chapter or the
forest practices regulations, and the terms and conditions of any
approved applications.
(5) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, the
department of natural resources shall notify the applicant in writing
of either its approval of the application or its disapproval of the
application and the specific manner in which the application fails to
comply with the provisions of this section or with the forest practices
regulations. Except as provided otherwise in this section, if the
department fails to either approve or disapprove an application or any
portion thereof within the applicable time limit, the application shall
be deemed approved and the operation may be commenced: PROVIDED, That
this provision shall not apply to applications which are neither
approved nor disapproved pursuant to the provisions of subsection (7)
of this section: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That if seasonal field conditions
prevent the department from being able to properly evaluate the
application, the department may issue an approval conditional upon
further review within sixty days: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the
department shall have until April 1, 1975, to approve or disapprove an
application involving forest practices allowed to continue to April 1,
1975, under the provisions of subsection (2) of this section. Upon
receipt of any notification or any satisfactorily completed application
the department shall in any event no later than two business days after
such receipt transmit a copy to the departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife, and to the county, city, or town in whose jurisdiction the
forest practice is to be commenced. Any comments by such agencies
shall be directed to the department of natural resources.
(6) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, if the county, city, or town believes that an application
is inconsistent with this chapter, the forest practices regulations, or
any local authority consistent with RCW 76.09.240 as now or hereafter
amended, it may so notify the department and the applicant, specifying
its objections.
(7) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, the department shall not approve portions of applications
to which a county, city, or town objects if:
(a) The department receives written notice from the county, city,
or town of such objections within fourteen business days from the time
of transmittal of the application to the county, city, or town, or one
day before the department acts on the application, whichever is later;
and
(b) The objections relate to forest lands that are being converted
to another use.
The department shall either disapprove those portions of such
application or appeal the county, city, or town objections to the
appeals board. If the objections related to (b) of this subsection are
based on local authority consistent with RCW 76.09.240 as now or
hereafter amended, the department shall disapprove the application
until such time as the county, city, or town consents to its approval
or such disapproval is reversed on appeal. The applicant shall be a
party to all department appeals of county, city, or town objections.
Unless the county, city, or town either consents or has waived its
rights under this subsection, the department shall not approve portions
of an application affecting such lands until the minimum time for
county, city, or town objections has expired.
(8) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, in addition to any rights under the above paragraph, the
county, city, or town may appeal any department approval of an
application with respect to any lands within its jurisdiction. The
appeals board may suspend the department's approval in whole or in part
pending such appeal where there exists potential for immediate and
material damage to a public resource.
(9) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, appeals under this section shall be made to the appeals
board in the manner and time provided in RCW 76.09.205. In such
appeals there shall be no presumption of correctness of either the
county, city, or town or the department position.
(10) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, the department shall, within four business days notify the
county, city, or town of all notifications, approvals, and disapprovals
of an application affecting lands within the county, city, or town,
except to the extent the county, city, or town has waived its right to
such notice.
(11) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, a county, city, or town may waive in whole or in part its
rights under this section, and may withdraw or modify any such waiver,
at any time by written notice to the department.
(12) Notwithstanding subsections (2) through (5) of this section,
forest practices applications or notifications are not required for
exotic insect and disease control operations conducted in accordance
with RCW 76.09.060(8) where eradication can reasonably be expected.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.09.050 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 1 s 205 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall establish by rule which forest practices shall
be included within each of the following classes:
Class I: Minimal or specific forest practices that have no direct
potential for damaging a public resource and that may be conducted
without submitting an application or a notification except that when
the regulating authority is transferred to a local governmental entity,
those Class I forest practices that involve timber harvesting or road
construction within "urban growth areas," designated pursuant to
chapter 36.70A RCW, are processed as Class IV forest practices, but are
not subject to environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW;
Class II: Forest practices which have a less than ordinary
potential for damaging a public resource that may be conducted without
submitting an application and may begin five calendar days, or such
lesser time as the department may determine, after written notification
by the operator, in the manner, content, and form as prescribed by the
department, is received by the department. However, the work may not
begin until all forest practice fees required under RCW 76.09.065 have
been received by the department. Class II shall not include forest
practices:
(a) On forest lands that are being converted to another use;
(b) Within "shorelines of the state" as defined in RCW 90.58.030;
(c) Excluded from Class II by the board; or
(d) Including timber harvesting or road construction within "urban
growth areas," designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, which are
Class IV;
Class III: Forest practices other than those contained in Class I,
II, or IV. A Class III application must be approved or disapproved by
the department according to the following timelines; however, the
applicant may not begin work on the forest practice until all forest
practice fees required under RCW 76.09.065 have been received by the
department:
(a) Within thirty calendar days from the date the department
receives the application if the application is not subject to
concurrence review by the department of fish and wildlife under RCW
76.09.490; and
(b) Within thirty days of the completion of the concurrence review
by the department of fish and wildlife if the application is subject to
concurrence review by the department of fish and wildlife under RCW
76.09.490;
Class IV: Forest practices other than those contained in Class I
or II:
(a) On forest lands that are being converted to another use;
(b) On lands which, pursuant to RCW 76.09.070 as now or hereafter
amended, are not to be reforested because of the likelihood of future
conversion to urban development;
(c) That involve timber harvesting or road construction on forest
lands that are contained within "urban growth areas," designated
pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, except where the forest landowner
provides:
(i) A written statement of intent signed by the forest landowner
not to convert to a use other than commercial forest product operations
for ten years, accompanied by either a written forest management plan
acceptable to the department or documentation that the land is enrolled
under the provisions of chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW; or
(ii) A conversion option harvest plan approved by the local
governmental entity and submitted to the department as part of the
application; and/or
(d) Which have a potential for a substantial impact on the
environment and therefore require an evaluation by the department as to
whether or not a detailed statement must be prepared pursuant to the
state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW. Such evaluation
shall be made within the timelines established in RCW 43.21C.037;
however, nothing herein shall be construed to prevent any local or
regional governmental entity from determining that a detailed statement
must be prepared for an action pursuant to a Class IV forest practice
taken by that governmental entity concerning the land on which forest
practices will be conducted. Unless the application is subject to
concurrence review by the department of fish and wildlife under RCW
76.09.490, a Class IV application must be approved or disapproved by
the department within thirty calendar days from the date the department
receives the application. If a Class IV application is subject to
concurrence review by the department of fish and wildlife under RCW
76.09.490, then the application must be approved or disapproved by the
department within thirty calendar days from the completion of the
concurrence review by the department of fish and wildlife. However,
the department may extend the timelines applicable to the approval or
disapproval of the application an additional thirty calendar days if
the department determines that a detailed statement must be made,
unless the commissioner of public lands, through the promulgation of a
formal order, determines that the process cannot be completed within
such a period. However, the applicant may not begin work on that
forest practice until all forest practice fees required under RCW
76.09.065 have been received by the department.
Forest practices under Classes I, II, and III are exempt from the
requirements for preparation of a detailed statement under the state
environmental policy act.
(2)(a) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, no Class
II, Class III, or Class IV forest practice shall be commenced or
continued after January 1, 1975, unless the department has received a
notification with regard to a Class II forest practice or approved an
application with regard to a Class III or Class IV forest practice
containing all information required by RCW 76.09.060 ((as now or
hereafter amended. However,)). Any application denials must be
consistent with RCW 76.09.140 or section 3 of this act.
(b) In the event forest practices regulations necessary for the
scheduled implementation of this chapter and RCW 90.48.420 have not
been adopted in time to meet such schedules, the department shall have
the authority to regulate forest practices and approve applications on
such terms and conditions consistent with this chapter and RCW
90.48.420 and the purposes and policies of RCW 76.09.010 until
applicable forest practices regulations are in effect.
(3) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, if a
notification or application is delivered in person to the department by
the operator or the operator's agent, the department shall immediately
provide a dated receipt thereof. In all other cases, the department
shall immediately mail a dated receipt to the operator.
(4) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, forest
practices shall be conducted in accordance with the forest practices
regulations, orders and directives as authorized by this chapter or the
forest practices regulations, and the terms and conditions of any
approved applications.
(5) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, the
department of natural resources shall notify the applicant in writing
of either its approval of the application or its disapproval of the
application and the specific manner in which the application fails to
comply with the provisions of this section or with the forest practices
regulations. Except as provided otherwise in this section, if the
department fails to either approve or disapprove an application or any
portion thereof within the applicable time limit, the application shall
be deemed approved and the operation may be commenced: PROVIDED, That
this provision shall not apply to applications which are neither
approved nor disapproved pursuant to the provisions of subsection (7)
of this section: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That if seasonal field conditions
prevent the department from being able to properly evaluate the
application, the department may issue an approval conditional upon
further review within sixty days. Upon receipt of any notification or
any satisfactorily completed application the department shall in any
event no later than two business days after such receipt transmit a
copy to the departments of ecology and fish and wildlife, and to the
county, city, or town in whose jurisdiction the forest practice is to
be commenced. Any comments by such agencies shall be directed to the
department of natural resources.
(6) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, if the county, city, or town believes that an application
is inconsistent with this chapter, the forest practices regulations, or
any local authority consistent with RCW 76.09.240 as now or hereafter
amended, it may so notify the department and the applicant, specifying
its objections.
(7) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, the department shall not approve portions of applications
to which a county, city, or town objects if:
(a) The department receives written notice from the county, city,
or town of such objections within fourteen business days from the time
of transmittal of the application to the county, city, or town, or one
day before the department acts on the application, whichever is later;
and
(b) The objections relate to forest lands that are being converted
to another use.
The department shall either disapprove those portions of such
application or appeal the county, city, or town objections to the
appeals board. If the objections related to (b) of this subsection are
based on local authority consistent with RCW 76.09.240 as now or
hereafter amended, the department shall disapprove the application
until such time as the county, city, or town consents to its approval
or such disapproval is reversed on appeal. The applicant shall be a
party to all department appeals of county, city, or town objections.
Unless the county, city, or town either consents or has waived its
rights under this subsection, the department shall not approve portions
of an application affecting such lands until the minimum time for
county, city, or town objections has expired.
(8) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, in addition to any rights under the above paragraph, the
county, city, or town may appeal any department approval of an
application with respect to any lands within its jurisdiction. The
appeals board may suspend the department's approval in whole or in part
pending such appeal where there exists potential for immediate and
material damage to a public resource.
(9) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, appeals under this section shall be made to the appeals
board in the manner and time provided in RCW 76.09.205. In such
appeals there shall be no presumption of correctness of either the
county, city, or town or the department position.
(10) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, the department shall, within four business days notify the
county, city, or town of all notifications, approvals, and disapprovals
of an application affecting lands within the county, city, or town,
except to the extent the county, city, or town has waived its right to
such notice.
(11) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, a county, city, or town may waive in whole or in part its
rights under this section, and may withdraw or modify any such waiver,
at any time by written notice to the department.
(12) Notwithstanding subsections (2) through (5) of this section,
forest practices applications or notifications are not required for
exotic insect and disease control operations conducted in accordance
with RCW 76.09.060(8) where eradication can reasonably be expected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may not deny an application submitted under RCW
76.09.050 due to the presence of an archaeological object, as that term
is defined in RCW 27.53.030, unless an employee or contractor with
either the department or the department of archaeology and historic
preservation has physically inspected the proposed forest practice site
and confirmed the likely presence of an archaeological object or
objects. The inspection must occur on the actual land where the forest
practice is proposed at a time agreed upon by the applicant.
(2) If the department denies, or plans to deny, an application
submitted under RCW 76.09.050 due to the presence of an archaeological
object, then the department must:
(a) Provide to the applicant, concurrent with the denial, all
information available to the department concerning the archaeological
object or objects that will be, or are suspected to be, disturbed by
the forest practice; and
(b) Provide the applicant, at the applicant's discretion, with the
option of accepting an amended approval from the department, developed
in consultation with the department of archaeology and historic
preservation, that allows the proposed forest practice to be executed
in all areas of the affected parcel except for within a clearly
identified area that is to serve as a buffer to protect the identified
archaeological object or objects. The size and location of the buffer
area must be solely based on the information provided to the applicant
under (a) of this subsection and must be agreed to by the department
and the applicant.
(3) If an applicant accepts an amended approval under subsection
(2)(b) of this section, the original application must be considered
conditionally approved and all timelines applicable to the original
application remain in effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 1 of this act expires on the date
the requirements set out in section 215, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 1st
sp. sess. are met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act takes effect on the
date the requirements set out in section 215, chapter 1, Laws of 2012
1st sp. sess. are met.

--- END ---