BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.040 and 2000 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county that has both a population of fifty thousand or
more and, until May 16, 1995, has had its population increase by more
than ten percent in the previous ten years or, on or after May 16,
1995, has had its population increase by more than seventeen percent in
the previous ten years, and the cities located within such county, and
any other county regardless of its population that has had its
population increase by more than twenty percent in the previous ten
years, and the cities located within such county, shall conform with
all of the requirements of this chapter. However, the county
legislative authority of such a county with a population of less than
fifty thousand population may adopt a resolution removing the county,
and the cities located within the county, from the requirements of
adopting comprehensive land use plans and development regulations under
this chapter if this resolution is adopted and filed with the
department by December 31, 1990, for counties initially meeting this
set of criteria, or within sixty days of the date the office of
financial management certifies that a county meets this set of criteria
under subsection (5) of this section. For the purposes of this
subsection, a county not currently planning under this chapter is not
required to include in its population count those persons confined in
a correctional facility under the jurisdiction of the department of
corrections that is located in the county.
Once a county meets either of these sets of criteria, the
requirement to conform with all of the requirements of this chapter
remains in effect, even if the county no longer meets one of these sets
of criteria.
(2)(a) The county legislative authority of any county that does not
meet either of the sets of criteria established under subsection (1) of
this section may adopt a resolution indicating its intention to have
subsection (1) of this section apply to the county. Each city, located
in a county that chooses to plan under this subsection, shall conform
with all of the requirements of this chapter. Once such a resolution
has been adopted, the county and the cities located within the county,
except as provided otherwise by this chapter, remain subject to all
((of the)) requirements of this chapter.
(b) Until December 31, 2014, the legislative authority of a county
may adopt a withdrawal resolution exempting the county and the cities
located within the county from, except as provided otherwise by this
chapter, requirements to adopt comprehensive land use plans and
development regulations under this section if:
(i) The county has a population of twenty thousand or fewer
inhabitants at any time between January 1, 2010, and December 31, 2014;
(ii) The county previously adopted a resolution indicating its
intention to have subsection (1) of this section apply to the county;
(iii) At least sixty days prior to adopting the withdrawal
resolution, the county provides written notification to the legislative
body of each city within the county of its intent to consider adopting
the resolution; and
(iv) Before the county legislative authority adopts the withdrawal
resolution, the legislative bodies of at least sixty percent of those
cities having an aggregate population of at least seventy-five percent
of the incorporated county population adopt resolutions supporting the
action by the county and provide written notification of this support
to the county.
(c) Upon adoption of a withdrawal resolution under (b) of this
subsection, the county and the cities within the county are no longer
obligated to plan under this section and, except as provided otherwise
by this chapter, are exempt from this chapter. However, if a county
meets the population criteria for mandatory planning under subsection
(1) of this section as of January 1, 2010, or on any subsequent date,
the withdrawal resolution of the county is invalid and the county and
each city located within the county is required to comply with all the
requirements of this chapter.
(d) The county legislative authority of a county that has adopted
a withdrawal resolution under (b) of this subsection may subsequently
pass a resolution indicating its intention to have subsection (1) of
this section apply to the county.
(3) Any county or city that is initially required to conform with
all of the requirements of this chapter under subsection (1) of this
section shall take actions under this chapter as follows: (a) The
county legislative authority shall adopt a countywide planning policy
under RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county and each city located within the
county shall designate critical areas, agricultural lands, forest
lands, and mineral resource lands, and adopt development regulations
conserving these designated agricultural lands, forest lands, and
mineral resource lands and protecting these designated critical areas,
under RCW 36.70A.170 and 36.70A.060; (c) the county shall designate and
take other actions related to urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110;
(d) if the county has a population of fifty thousand or more, the
county and each city located within the county shall adopt a
comprehensive plan under this chapter and development regulations that
are consistent with and implement the comprehensive plan on or before
July 1, 1994, and if the county has a population of less than fifty
thousand, the county and each city located within the county shall
adopt a comprehensive plan under this chapter and development
regulations that are consistent with and implement the comprehensive
plan by January 1, 1995, but if the governor makes written findings
that a county with a population of less than fifty thousand or a city
located within such a county is not making reasonable progress toward
adopting a comprehensive plan and development regulations the governor
may reduce this deadline for such actions to be taken by no more than
one hundred eighty days. Any county or city subject to this subsection
may obtain an additional six months before it is required to have
adopted its development regulations by submitting a letter notifying
the department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) of its
need prior to the deadline for adopting both a comprehensive plan and
development regulations.
(4)(a) Any county or city that is required to conform with all the
requirements of this chapter, as a result of the county legislative
authority adopting its resolution of intention under subsection (2) of
this section, shall take actions under this chapter as follows:
(((a))) (i) The county legislative authority shall adopt a county-wide
planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210; (((b))) (ii) the county and each
city that is located within the county shall adopt development
regulations conserving agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral
resource lands it designated under RCW 36.70A.060 within one year of
the date the county legislative authority adopts its resolution of
intention; (((c))) (iii) the county shall designate and take other
actions related to urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110; and (((d)))
(iv) the county and each city that is located within the county shall
adopt a comprehensive plan and development regulations that are
consistent with and implement the comprehensive plan not later than
four years from the date the county legislative authority adopts its
resolution of intention, but a county or city may obtain an additional
six months before it is required to have adopted its development
regulations by submitting a letter notifying the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) of its need prior to the
deadline for adopting both a comprehensive plan and development
regulations. The requirements of this subsection (4)(a)(iv), as they
apply to the rural element required by RCW 36.70A.070(5), are not
affected or otherwise modified by the adoption of a withdrawal
resolution under subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(b) The requirements of (a)(ii) of this subsection, as they apply
to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.060(1), are not affected or otherwise
modified by the adoption of a withdrawal resolution under subsection
(2)(b) of this section.
(5) If the office of financial management certifies that the
population of a county that previously had not been required to plan
under subsection (1) or (2) of this section has changed sufficiently to
meet either of the sets of criteria specified under subsection (1) of
this section, and where applicable, the county legislative authority
has not adopted a resolution removing the county from these
requirements as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the county
and each city within such county shall take actions under this chapter
as follows: (a) The county legislative authority shall adopt a
countywide planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county and
each city located within the county shall adopt development regulations
under RCW 36.70A.060 conserving agricultural lands, forest lands, and
mineral resource lands it designated within one year of the
certification by the office of financial management; (c) the county
shall designate and take other actions related to urban growth areas
under RCW 36.70A.110; and (d) the county and each city located within
the county shall adopt a comprehensive land use plan and development
regulations that are consistent with and implement the comprehensive
plan within four years of the certification by the office of financial
management, but a county or city may obtain an additional six months
before it is required to have adopted its development regulations by
submitting a letter notifying the department ((of community, trade, and
economic development)) of its need prior to the deadline for adopting
both a comprehensive plan and development regulations.
(6) A copy of each document that is required under this section
shall be submitted to the department at the time of its adoption.
(7) Cities and counties planning under this chapter must amend the
transportation element of the comprehensive plan to be in compliance
with this chapter and chapter 47.80 RCW no later than December 31,
2000.
(8)(a) Each county that adopts a withdrawal resolution under
subsection (2)(b) of this section that is not in compliance with RCW
36.70A.060, 36.70A.170, or 36.70A.172 on the date of the adoption of
the resolution must, within one year of the adoption of the resolution,
adopt an ordinance complying with the applicable provisions of RCW
36.70A.060, 36.70A.170, and 36.70A.172.
(b) Each city that is both within a county that adopts a withdrawal
resolution under subsection (2)(b) of this section that is not in
compliance with RCW 36.70A.060, 36.70A.170, or 36.70A.172 on the date
of the adoption of the resolution must, within one year of the adoption
of the resolution, adopt an ordinance complying with the applicable
provisions of RCW 36.70A.060, 36.70A.170, and 36.70A.172.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.070 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 26 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
The comprehensive plan of a county or city that is required or
chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall consist of a map or maps,
and descriptive text covering objectives, principles, and standards
used to develop the comprehensive plan. The plan shall be an
internally consistent document and all elements shall be consistent
with the future land use map. A comprehensive plan shall be adopted
and amended with public participation as provided in RCW 36.70A.140.
Each comprehensive plan shall include a plan, scheme, or design for
each of the following:
(1) A land use element designating the proposed general
distribution and general location and extent of the uses of land, where
appropriate, for agriculture, timber production, housing, commerce,
industry, recreation, open spaces, general aviation airports, public
utilities, public facilities, and other land uses. The land use
element shall include population densities, building intensities, and
estimates of future population growth. The land use element shall
provide for protection of the quality and quantity of groundwater used
for public water supplies. Wherever possible, the land use element
should consider utilizing urban planning approaches that promote
physical activity. Where applicable, the land use element shall review
drainage, flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby
jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate
or cleanse those discharges that pollute waters of the state, including
Puget Sound or waters entering Puget Sound.
(2) A housing element ensuring the vitality and character of
established residential neighborhoods that: (a) Includes an inventory
and analysis of existing and projected housing needs that identifies
the number of housing units necessary to manage projected growth; (b)
includes a statement of goals, policies, objectives, and mandatory
provisions for the preservation, improvement, and development of
housing, including single-family residences; (c) identifies sufficient
land for housing, including, but not limited to, government-assisted
housing, housing for low-income families, manufactured housing,
multifamily housing, and group homes and foster care facilities; and
(d) makes adequate provisions for existing and projected needs of all
economic segments of the community.
(3) A capital facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An
inventory of existing capital facilities owned by public entities,
showing the locations and capacities of the capital facilities; (b) a
forecast of the future needs for such capital facilities; (c) the
proposed locations and capacities of expanded or new capital
facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such capital
facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies
sources of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to
reassess the land use element if probable funding falls short of
meeting existing needs and to ensure that the land use element, capital
facilities plan element, and financing plan within the capital
facilities plan element are coordinated and consistent. Park and
recreation facilities shall be included in the capital facilities plan
element.
(4) A utilities element consisting of the general location,
proposed location, and capacity of all existing and proposed utilities,
including, but not limited to, electrical lines, telecommunication
lines, and natural gas lines.
(5) Rural element. Counties shall include a rural element
including lands that are not designated for urban growth, agriculture,
forest, or mineral resources. The following provisions shall apply to
the rural element:
(a) Growth management act goals and local circumstances. Because
circumstances vary from county to county, in establishing patterns of
rural densities and uses, a county may consider local circumstances,
but shall develop a written record explaining how the rural element
harmonizes the planning goals in RCW 36.70A.020 and meets the
requirements of this chapter.
(b) Rural development. The rural element shall permit rural
development, forestry, and agriculture in rural areas. The rural
element shall provide for a variety of rural densities, uses, essential
public facilities, and rural governmental services needed to serve the
permitted densities and uses. To achieve a variety of rural densities
and uses, counties may provide for clustering, density transfer, design
guidelines, conservation easements, and other innovative techniques
that will accommodate appropriate rural densities and uses that are not
characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with rural
character.
(c) Measures governing rural development. The rural element shall
include measures that apply to rural development and protect the rural
character of the area, as established by the county, by:
(i) Containing or otherwise controlling rural development;
(ii) Assuring visual compatibility of rural development with the
surrounding rural area;
(iii) Reducing the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land
into sprawling, low-density development in the rural area;
(iv) Protecting critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and
surface water and groundwater resources; and
(v) Protecting against conflicts with the use of agricultural,
forest, and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.
(d) Limited areas of more intensive rural development. Subject to
the requirements of this subsection and except as otherwise
specifically provided in this subsection (5)(d), the rural element may
allow for limited areas of more intensive rural development, including
necessary public facilities and public services to serve the limited
area as follows:
(i) Rural development consisting of the infill, development, or
redevelopment of existing commercial, industrial, residential, or
mixed-use areas, whether characterized as shoreline development,
villages, hamlets, rural activity centers, or crossroads developments.
(A) A commercial, industrial, residential, shoreline, or mixed-use
area shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of this
subsection, but shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and
(iii) of this subsection.
(B) Any development or redevelopment other than an industrial area
or an industrial use within a mixed-use area or an industrial area
under this subsection (5)(d)(i) must be principally designed to serve
the existing and projected rural population.
(C) Any development or redevelopment in terms of building size,
scale, use, or intensity shall be consistent with the character of the
existing areas. Development and redevelopment may include changes in
use from vacant land or a previously existing use so long as the new
use conforms to the requirements of this subsection (5);
(ii) The intensification of development on lots containing, or new
development of, small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including
commercial facilities to serve those recreational or tourist uses, that
rely on a rural location and setting, but that do not include new
residential development. A small-scale recreation or tourist use is
not required to be principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population. Public services and public facilities
shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or tourist
use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density
sprawl;
(iii) The intensification of development on lots containing
isolated nonresidential uses or new development of isolated cottage
industries and isolated small-scale businesses that are not principally
designed to serve the existing and projected rural population and
nonresidential uses, but do provide job opportunities for rural
residents. Rural counties may allow the expansion of small-scale
businesses as long as those small-scale businesses conform with the
rural character of the area as defined by the local government
according to RCW 36.70A.030(15). Rural counties may also allow new
small-scale businesses to utilize a site previously occupied by an
existing business as long as the new small-scale business conforms to
the rural character of the area as defined by the local government
according to RCW 36.70A.030(15). Public services and public facilities
shall be limited to those necessary to serve the isolated
nonresidential use and shall be provided in a manner that does not
permit low-density sprawl;
(iv) A county shall adopt measures to minimize and contain the
existing areas or uses of more intensive rural development, as
appropriate, authorized under this subsection. Lands included in such
existing areas or uses shall not extend beyond the logical outer
boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing a new pattern of
low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary
delineated predominately by the built environment, but that may also
include undeveloped lands if limited as provided in this subsection.
The county shall establish the logical outer boundary of an area of
more intensive rural development. In establishing the logical outer
boundary, the county shall address (A) the need to preserve the
character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities, (B)
physical boundaries, such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and
land forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular
boundaries, and (D) the ability to provide public facilities and public
services in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;
(v) For purposes of (d) of this subsection, an existing area or
existing use is one that was in existence:
(A) On July 1, 1990, in a county that was initially required to
plan under all of the provisions of this chapter;
(B) On the date the county adopted a resolution under RCW
36.70A.040(2), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions
of this chapter under RCW 36.70A.040(2); or
(C) On the date the office of financial management certifies the
county's population as provided in RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that
is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter pursuant to RCW
36.70A.040(5).
(e) Exception. This subsection shall not be interpreted to permit
in the rural area a major industrial development or a master planned
resort unless otherwise specifically permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and
36.70A.365.
(f) The requirements of this subsection (5) are not affected or
otherwise modified by the adoption of a withdrawal resolution under RCW
36.70A.040(2)(b).
(6) A transportation element that implements, and is consistent
with, the land use element.
(a) The transportation element shall include the following
subelements:
(i) Land use assumptions used in estimating travel;
(ii) Estimated traffic impacts to state-owned transportation
facilities resulting from land use assumptions to assist the department
of transportation in monitoring the performance of state facilities, to
plan improvements for the facilities, and to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned transportation facilities;
(iii) Facilities and services needs, including:
(A) An inventory of air, water, and ground transportation
facilities and services, including transit alignments and general
aviation airport facilities, to define existing capital facilities and
travel levels as a basis for future planning. This inventory must
include state-owned transportation facilities within the city or
county's jurisdictional boundaries;
(B) Level of service standards for all locally owned arterials and
transit routes to serve as a gauge to judge performance of the system.
These standards should be regionally coordinated;
(C) For state-owned transportation facilities, level of service
standards for highways, as prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW,
to gauge the performance of the system. The purposes of reflecting
level of service standards for state highways in the local
comprehensive plan are to monitor the performance of the system, to
evaluate improvement strategies, and to facilitate coordination between
the county's or city's six-year street, road, or transit program and
the office of financial management's ten-year investment program. The
concurrency requirements of (b) of this subsection do not apply to
transportation facilities and services of statewide significance except
for counties consisting of islands whose only connection to the
mainland are state highways or ferry routes. In these island counties,
state highways and ferry route capacity must be a factor in meeting the
concurrency requirements in (b) of this subsection;
(D) Specific actions and requirements for bringing into compliance
locally owned transportation facilities or services that are below an
established level of service standard;
(E) Forecasts of traffic for at least ten years based on the
adopted land use plan to provide information on the location, timing,
and capacity needs of future growth;
(F) Identification of state and local system needs to meet current
and future demands. Identified needs on state-owned transportation
facilities must be consistent with the statewide multimodal
transportation plan required under chapter 47.06 RCW;
(iv) Finance, including:
(A) An analysis of funding capability to judge needs against
probable funding resources;
(B) A multiyear financing plan based on the needs identified in the
comprehensive plan, the appropriate parts of which shall serve as the
basis for the six-year street, road, or transit program required by RCW
35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795
for public transportation systems. The multiyear financing plan should
be coordinated with the ten-year investment program developed by the
office of financial management as required by RCW 47.05.030;
(C) If probable funding falls short of meeting identified needs, a
discussion of how additional funding will be raised, or how land use
assumptions will be reassessed to ensure that level of service
standards will be met;
(v) Intergovernmental coordination efforts, including an assessment
of the impacts of the transportation plan and land use assumptions on
the transportation systems of adjacent jurisdictions;
(vi) Demand-management strategies;
(vii) Pedestrian and bicycle component to include collaborative
efforts to identify and designate planned improvements for pedestrian
and bicycle facilities and corridors that address and encourage
enhanced community access and promote healthy lifestyles.
(b) After adoption of the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions
required to plan or who choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, local
jurisdictions must adopt and enforce ordinances which prohibit
development approval if the development causes the level of service on
a locally owned transportation facility to decline below the standards
adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan, unless
transportation improvements or strategies to accommodate the impacts of
development are made concurrent with the development. These strategies
may include increased public transportation service, ride sharing
programs, demand management, and other transportation systems
management strategies. For the purposes of this subsection (6),
"concurrent with the development" means that improvements or strategies
are in place at the time of development, or that a financial commitment
is in place to complete the improvements or strategies within six
years.
(c) The transportation element described in this subsection (6),
the six-year plans required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121
for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems, and
the ten-year investment program required by RCW 47.05.030 for the
state, must be consistent.
(7) An economic development element establishing local goals,
policies, objectives, and provisions for economic growth and vitality
and a high quality of life. The element shall include: (a) A summary
of the local economy such as population, employment, payroll, sectors,
businesses, sales, and other information as appropriate; (b) a summary
of the strengths and weaknesses of the local economy defined as the
commercial and industrial sectors and supporting factors such as land
use, transportation, utilities, education, workforce, housing, and
natural/cultural resources; and (c) an identification of policies,
programs, and projects to foster economic growth and development and to
address future needs. A city that has chosen to be a residential
community is exempt from the economic development element requirement
of this subsection.
(8) A park and recreation element that implements, and is
consistent with, the capital facilities plan element as it relates to
park and recreation facilities. The element shall include: (a)
Estimates of park and recreation demand for at least a ten-year period;
(b) an evaluation of facilities and service needs; and (c) an
evaluation of intergovernmental coordination opportunities to provide
regional approaches for meeting park and recreational demand.
(9) It is the intent that new or amended elements required after
January 1, 2002, be adopted concurrent with the scheduled update
provided in RCW 36.70A.130. Requirements to incorporate any such new
or amended elements shall be null and void until funds sufficient to
cover applicable local government costs are appropriated and
distributed by the state at least two years before local government
must update comprehensive plans as required in RCW 36.70A.130.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.110 and 2010 c 211 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 shall designate an urban growth area or areas within which
urban growth shall be encouraged and outside of which growth can occur
only if it is not urban in nature. Each city that is located in such
a county shall be included within an urban growth area. An urban
growth area may include more than a single city. An urban growth area
may include territory that is located outside of a city only if such
territory already is characterized by urban growth whether or not the
urban growth area includes a city, or is adjacent to territory already
characterized by urban growth, or is a designated new fully contained
community as defined by RCW 36.70A.350.
(2) Based upon the growth management population projection made for
the county by the office of financial management, the county and each
city within the county shall include areas and densities sufficient to
permit the urban growth that is projected to occur in the county or
city for the succeeding twenty-year period, except for those urban
growth areas contained totally within a national historical reserve.
As part of this planning process, each city within the county must
include areas sufficient to accommodate the broad range of needs and
uses that will accompany the projected urban growth including, as
appropriate, medical, governmental, institutional, commercial, service,
retail, and other nonresidential uses.
Each urban growth area shall permit urban densities and shall
include greenbelt and open space areas. In the case of urban growth
areas contained totally within a national historical reserve, the city
may restrict densities, intensities, and forms of urban growth as
determined to be necessary and appropriate to protect the physical,
cultural, or historic integrity of the reserve. An urban growth area
determination may include a reasonable land market supply factor and
shall permit a range of urban densities and uses. In determining this
market factor, cities and counties may consider local circumstances.
Cities and counties have discretion in their comprehensive plans to
make many choices about accommodating growth.
Within one year of July 1, 1990, each county that as of June 1,
1991, was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, shall begin
consulting with each city located within its boundaries and each city
shall propose the location of an urban growth area. Within sixty days
of the date the county legislative authority of a county adopts its
resolution of intention or of certification by the office of financial
management, all other counties that are required or choose to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall begin this consultation with each city
located within its boundaries. The county shall attempt to reach
agreement with each city on the location of an urban growth area within
which the city is located. If such an agreement is not reached with
each city located within the urban growth area, the county shall
justify in writing why it so designated the area an urban growth area.
A city may object formally with the department over the designation of
the urban growth area within which it is located. Where appropriate,
the department shall attempt to resolve the conflicts, including the
use of mediation services.
(3) Urban growth should be located first in areas already
characterized by urban growth that have adequate existing public
facility and service capacities to serve such development, second in
areas already characterized by urban growth that will be served
adequately by a combination of both existing public facilities and
services and any additional needed public facilities and services that
are provided by either public or private sources, and third in the
remaining portions of the urban growth areas. Urban growth may also be
located in designated new fully contained communities as defined by RCW
36.70A.350.
(4) In general, cities are the units of local government most
appropriate to provide urban governmental services. In general, it is
not appropriate that urban governmental services be extended to or
expanded in rural areas except in those limited circumstances shown to
be necessary to protect basic public health and safety and the
environment and when such services are financially supportable at rural
densities and do not permit urban development.
(5) On or before October 1, 1993, each county that was initially
required to plan under RCW 36.70A.040(1) shall adopt development
regulations designating interim urban growth areas under this chapter.
Within three years and three months of the date the county legislative
authority of a county adopts its resolution of intention or of
certification by the office of financial management, all other counties
that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt
development regulations designating interim urban growth areas under
this chapter. Adoption of the interim urban growth areas may only
occur after public notice; public hearing; and compliance with the
state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, and under this
section. Such action may be appealed to the growth management hearings
board under RCW 36.70A.280. Final urban growth areas shall be adopted
at the time of comprehensive plan adoption under this chapter.
(6) Each county shall include designations of urban growth areas in
its comprehensive plan.
(7) An urban growth area designated in accordance with this section
may include within its boundaries urban service areas or potential
annexation areas designated for specific cities or towns within the
county.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the expansion
of an urban growth area is prohibited into the one hundred year
floodplain of any river or river segment that: (i) Is located west of
the crest of the Cascade mountains; and (ii) has a mean annual flow of
one thousand or more cubic feet per second as determined by the
department of ecology.
(b) Subsection (8)(a) of this section does not apply to:
(i) Urban growth areas that are fully contained within a floodplain
and lack adjacent buildable areas outside the floodplain;
(ii) Urban growth areas where expansions are precluded outside
floodplains because:
(A) Urban governmental services cannot be physically provided to
serve areas outside the floodplain; or
(B) Expansions outside the floodplain would require a river or
estuary crossing to access the expansion; or
(iii) Urban growth area expansions where:
(A) Public facilities already exist within the floodplain and the
expansion of an existing public facility is only possible on the land
to be included in the urban growth area and located within the
floodplain; or
(B) Urban development already exists within a floodplain as of July
26, 2009, and is adjacent to, but outside of, the urban growth area,
and the expansion of the urban growth area is necessary to include such
urban development within the urban growth area; or
(C) The land is owned by a jurisdiction planning under this chapter
or the rights to the development of the land have been permanently
extinguished, and the following criteria are met:
(I) The permissible use of the land is limited to one of the
following: Outdoor recreation; environmentally beneficial projects,
including but not limited to habitat enhancement or environmental
restoration; storm water facilities; flood control facilities; or
underground conveyances; and
(II) The development and use of such facilities or projects will
not decrease flood storage, increase storm water runoff, discharge
pollutants to fresh or salt waters during normal operations or floods,
or increase hazards to people and property.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (8), "one hundred year
floodplain" means the same as "special flood hazard area" as set forth
in WAC 173-158-040 as it exists on July 26, 2009.
(9) The requirements of this section do not apply to a county that
has adopted a withdrawal resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b).

Sec. 4 RCW 36.70A.115 and 2009 c 121 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Counties and cities that are required or choose to plan under
RCW 36.70A.040 shall ensure that, taken collectively, adoption of and
amendments to their comprehensive plans and/or development regulations
provide sufficient capacity of land suitable for development within
their jurisdictions to accommodate their allocated housing and
employment growth, including the accommodation of, as appropriate, the
medical, governmental, educational, institutional, commercial, and
industrial facilities related to such growth, as adopted in the
applicable countywide planning policies and consistent with the twenty-year population forecast from the office of financial management.
(2) The requirements of this section do not apply to a county that
has adopted a withdrawal resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b) and the
cities within that county.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.70A.120 and 1993 sp.s. c 6 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each county and city that is required or chooses to plan under
RCW 36.70A.040 shall perform its activities and make capital budget
decisions in conformity with its comprehensive plan.
(2) The requirements of this section do not apply to a county that
has adopted a withdrawal resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b) and the
cities within that county.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.70A.140 and 1995 c 347 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each county and city that is required or chooses to plan under
RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a
public participation program identifying procedures providing for early
and continuous public participation in the development and amendment of
comprehensive land use plans and development regulations implementing
such plans. The procedures shall provide for broad dissemination of
proposals and alternatives, opportunity for written comments, public
meetings after effective notice, provision for open discussion,
communication programs, information services, and consideration of and
response to public comments. In enacting legislation in response to
the board's decision pursuant to RCW 36.70A.300 declaring part or all
of a comprehensive plan or development regulation invalid, the county
or city shall provide for public participation that is appropriate and
effective under the circumstances presented by the board's order.
Errors in exact compliance with the established program and procedures
shall not render the comprehensive land use plan or development
regulations invalid if the spirit of the program and procedures is
observed.
(2) The requirements of this section do not apply to a county that
has adopted a withdrawal resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b) and the
cities within that county.

Sec. 7 RCW 36.70A.150 and 1991 c 322 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each county and city that is required or chooses to prepare a
comprehensive land use plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall identify lands
useful for public purposes such as utility corridors, transportation
corridors, landfills, sewage treatment facilities, storm water
management facilities, recreation, schools, and other public uses. The
county shall work with the state and the cities within its borders to
identify areas of shared need for public facilities. The jurisdictions
within the county shall prepare a prioritized list of lands necessary
for the identified public uses including an estimated date by which the
acquisition will be needed.
The respective capital acquisition budgets for each jurisdiction
shall reflect the jointly agreed upon priorities and time schedule.
(2) The requirements of this section do not apply to a county that
has adopted a withdrawal resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b) and the
cities within that county.

Sec. 8 RCW 36.70A.160 and 1992 c 227 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county and city that is required or chooses to prepare a
comprehensive land use plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall identify open
space corridors within and between urban growth areas. They shall
include lands useful for recreation, wildlife habitat, trails, and
connection of critical areas as defined in RCW 36.70A.030.
Identification of a corridor under this section by a county or city
shall not restrict the use or management of lands within the corridor
for agricultural or forest purposes. Restrictions on the use or
management of such lands for agricultural or forest purposes imposed
after identification solely to maintain or enhance the value of such
lands as a corridor may occur only if the county or city acquires
sufficient interest to prevent development of the lands or to control
the resource development of the lands. The requirement for acquisition
of sufficient interest does not include those corridors regulated by
the interstate commerce commission, under provisions of 16 U.S.C. Sec.
1247(d), 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1248, or 43 U.S.C. Sec. 912. Nothing in this
section shall be interpreted to alter the authority of the state, or a
county or city, to regulate land use activities.
(2) The city or county may acquire by donation or purchase the fee
simple or lesser interests in these open space corridors using funds
authorized by RCW 84.34.230 or other sources.
(3) The requirements of this section do not apply to a county that
has adopted a withdrawal resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b) and the
cities within that county.

Sec. 9 RCW 36.70A.200 and 2013 c 275 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The comprehensive plan of each county and city that is planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall include a process for identifying and siting
essential public facilities. Essential public facilities include those
facilities that are typically difficult to site, such as airports,
state education facilities and state or regional transportation
facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140, regional transit authority
facilities as defined in RCW 81.112.020, state and local correctional
facilities, solid waste handling facilities, and inpatient facilities
including substance abuse facilities, mental health facilities, group
homes, and secure community transition facilities as defined in RCW
71.09.020.
(2) Each county and city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not
later than September 1, 2002, establish a process, or amend its
existing process, for identifying and siting essential public
facilities and adopt or amend its development regulations as necessary
to provide for the siting of secure community transition facilities
consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.
(3) Any city or county not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not
later than September 1, 2002, establish a process for siting secure
community transition facilities and adopt or amend its development
regulations as necessary to provide for the siting of such facilities
consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.
(4) The office of financial management shall maintain a list of
those essential state public facilities that are required or likely to
be built within the next six years. The office of financial management
may at any time add facilities to the list.
(5) No local comprehensive plan or development regulation may
preclude the siting of essential public facilities.
(6) No person may bring a cause of action for civil damages based
on the good faith actions of any county or city to provide for the
siting of secure community transition facilities in accordance with
this section and with the requirements of chapter 12, Laws of 2001 2nd
sp. sess. For purposes of this subsection, "person" includes, but is
not limited to, any individual, agency as defined in RCW 42.17A.005,
corporation, partnership, association, and limited liability entity.
(7) Counties or cities siting facilities pursuant to subsection (2)
or (3) of this section shall comply with RCW 71.09.341.
(8) The failure of a county or city to act by the deadlines
established in subsections (2) and (3) of this section is not:
(a) A condition that would disqualify the county or city for
grants, loans, or pledges under RCW 43.155.070 or 70.146.070;
(b) A consideration for grants or loans provided under RCW
43.17.250(3); or
(c) A basis for any petition under RCW 36.70A.280 or for any
private cause of action.
(9) The requirements of subsections (1), (2), and (5) through (8)
of this section do not apply to a county that has adopted a withdrawal
resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b) and the cities within that
county.

Sec. 10 RCW 36.70A.210 and 2009 c 121 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that counties are regional
governments within their boundaries, and cities are primary providers
of urban governmental services within urban growth areas. For the
purposes of this section, a "countywide planning policy" is a written
policy statement or statements used solely for establishing a
countywide framework from which county and city comprehensive plans are
developed and adopted pursuant to this chapter. This framework shall
ensure that city and county comprehensive plans are consistent as
required in RCW 36.70A.100. Nothing in this section shall be construed
to alter the land-use powers of cities.
(2) The legislative authority of a county that plans under RCW
36.70A.040 shall adopt a countywide planning policy in cooperation with
the cities located in whole or in part within the county as follows:
(a) No later than sixty calendar days from July 16, 1991, the
legislative authority of each county that as of June 1, 1991, was
required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall convene a meeting
with representatives of each city located within the county for the
purpose of establishing a collaborative process that will provide a
framework for the adoption of a countywide planning policy. In other
counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, this
meeting shall be convened no later than sixty days after the date the
county adopts its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management.
(b) The process and framework for adoption of a countywide planning
policy specified in (a) of this subsection shall determine the manner
in which the county and the cities agree to all procedures and
provisions including but not limited to desired planning policies,
deadlines, ratification of final agreements and demonstration thereof,
and financing, if any, of all activities associated therewith.
(c) If a county fails for any reason to convene a meeting with
representatives of cities as required in (a) of this subsection, the
governor may immediately impose any appropriate sanction or sanctions
on the county from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340.
(d) If there is no agreement by October 1, 1991, in a county that
was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991,
or if there is no agreement within one hundred twenty days of the date
the county adopted its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management in any other county that is required or
chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, the governor shall first inquire
of the jurisdictions as to the reason or reasons for failure to reach
an agreement. If the governor deems it appropriate, the governor may
immediately request the assistance of the department ((of community,
trade, and economic development)) to mediate any disputes that preclude
agreement. If mediation is unsuccessful in resolving all disputes that
will lead to agreement, the governor may impose appropriate sanctions
from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340 on the county, city, or
cities for failure to reach an agreement as provided in this section.
The governor shall specify the reason or reasons for the imposition of
any sanction.
(e) No later than July 1, 1992, the legislative authority of each
county that was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of
June 1, 1991, or no later than fourteen months after the date the
county adopted its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management the county legislative authority of any
other county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040,
shall adopt a countywide planning policy according to the process
provided under this section and that is consistent with the agreement
pursuant to (b) of this subsection, and after holding a public hearing
or hearings on the proposed countywide planning policy.
(3) A countywide planning policy shall at a minimum, address the
following:
(a) Policies to implement RCW 36.70A.110;
(b) Policies for promotion of contiguous and orderly development
and provision of urban services to such development;
(c) Policies for siting public capital facilities of a countywide
or statewide nature, including transportation facilities of statewide
significance as defined in RCW 47.06.140;
(d) Policies for countywide transportation facilities and
strategies;
(e) Policies that consider the need for affordable housing, such as
housing for all economic segments of the population and parameters for
its distribution;
(f) Policies for joint county and city planning within urban growth
areas;
(g) Policies for countywide economic development and employment,
which must include consideration of the future development of
commercial and industrial facilities; and
(h) An analysis of the fiscal impact.
(4) Federal agencies and Indian tribes may participate in and
cooperate with the countywide planning policy adoption process.
Adopted countywide planning policies shall be adhered to by state
agencies.
(5) Failure to adopt a countywide planning policy that meets the
requirements of this section may result in the imposition of a sanction
or sanctions on a county or city within the county, as specified in RCW
36.70A.340. In imposing a sanction or sanctions, the governor shall
specify the reasons for failure to adopt a countywide planning policy
in order that any imposed sanction or sanctions are fairly and
equitably related to the failure to adopt a countywide planning policy.
(6) Cities and the governor may appeal an adopted countywide
planning policy to the growth management hearings board within sixty
days of the adoption of the countywide planning policy.
(7) Multicounty planning policies shall be adopted by two or more
counties, each with a population of four hundred fifty thousand or
more, with contiguous urban areas and may be adopted by other counties,
according to the process established under this section or other
processes agreed to among the counties and cities within the affected
counties throughout the multicounty region.
(8) The requirements of this section do not apply to a county that
has adopted a withdrawal resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b).

Sec. 11 RCW 36.70A.350 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 16 are each amended
to read as follows:
A county required or choosing to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 may
establish a process as part of its urban growth areas, that are
designated under RCW 36.70A.110, for reviewing proposals to authorize
new fully contained communities located outside of the initially
designated urban growth areas.
(1) A new fully contained community may be approved in a county
planning under this chapter if criteria including but not limited to
the following are met:
(a) New infrastructure is provided for and impact fees are
established consistent with the requirements of RCW 82.02.050;
(b) Transit-oriented site planning and traffic demand management
programs are implemented;
(c) Buffers are provided between the new fully contained
communities and adjacent urban development;
(d) A mix of uses is provided to offer jobs, housing, and services
to the residents of the new community;
(e) Affordable housing is provided within the new community for a
broad range of income levels;
(f) Environmental protection has been addressed and provided for;
(g) Development regulations are established to ensure urban growth
will not occur in adjacent nonurban areas;
(h) Provision is made to mitigate impacts on designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands;
(i) The plan for the new fully contained community is consistent
with the development regulations established for the protection of
critical areas by the county pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170.
(2) New fully contained communities may be approved outside
established urban growth areas only if a county reserves a portion of
the twenty-year population projection and offsets the urban growth area
accordingly for allocation to new fully contained communities that meet
the requirements of this chapter. Any county electing to establish a
new community reserve shall do so no more often than once every five
years as a part of the designation or review of urban growth areas
required by this chapter. The new community reserve shall be allocated
on a project-by-project basis, only after specific project approval
procedures have been adopted pursuant to this chapter as a development
regulation. When a new community reserve is established, urban growth
areas designated pursuant to this chapter shall accommodate the
unreserved portion of the twenty-year population projection.
Final approval of an application for a new fully contained
community shall be considered an adopted amendment to the comprehensive
plan prepared pursuant to RCW 36.70A.070 designating the new fully
contained community as an urban growth area.
(3) This section does not apply to a county that has adopted a
withdrawal resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b).

Sec. 12 RCW 36.70A.360 and 1998 c 112 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 may permit master planned resorts which may constitute urban
growth outside of urban growth areas as limited by this section. A
master planned resort means a self-contained and fully integrated
planned unit development, in a setting of significant natural
amenities, with primary focus on destination resort facilities
consisting of short-term visitor accommodations associated with a range
of developed on-site indoor or outdoor recreational facilities.
(2) Capital facilities, utilities, and services, including those
related to sewer, water, storm water, security, fire suppression, and
emergency medical, provided on-site shall be limited to meeting the
needs of the master planned resort. Such facilities, utilities, and
services may be provided to a master planned resort by outside service
providers, including municipalities and special purpose districts,
provided that all costs associated with service extensions and capacity
increases directly attributable to the master planned resort are fully
borne by the resort. A master planned resort and service providers may
enter into agreements for shared capital facilities and utilities,
provided that such facilities and utilities serve only the master
planned resort or urban growth areas.
Nothing in this subsection may be construed as: Establishing an
order of priority for processing applications for water right permits,
for granting such permits, or for issuing certificates of water right;
altering or authorizing in any manner the alteration of the place of
use for a water right; or affecting or impairing in any manner
whatsoever an existing water right.
All waters or the use of waters shall be regulated and controlled
as provided in chapters 90.03 and 90.44 RCW and not otherwise.
(3) A master planned resort may include other residential uses
within its boundaries, but only if the residential uses are integrated
into and support the on-site recreational nature of the resort.
(4) A master planned resort may be authorized by a county only if:
(a) The comprehensive plan specifically identifies policies to
guide the development of master planned resorts;
(b) The comprehensive plan and development regulations include
restrictions that preclude new urban or suburban land uses in the
vicinity of the master planned resort, except in areas otherwise
designated for urban growth under RCW 36.70A.110;
(c) The county includes a finding as a part of the approval process
that the land is better suited, and has more long-term importance, for
the master planned resort than for the commercial harvesting of timber
or agricultural production, if located on land that otherwise would be
designated as forest land or agricultural land under RCW 36.70A.170;
(d) The county ensures that the resort plan is consistent with the
development regulations established for critical areas; and
(e) On-site and off-site infrastructure and service impacts are
fully considered and mitigated.
(5) This section does not apply to a county that has adopted a
withdrawal resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b).

Sec. 13 RCW 36.70A.370 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 18 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The state attorney general shall establish by October 1, 1991,
an orderly, consistent process, including a checklist if appropriate,
that better enables state agencies and local governments to evaluate
proposed regulatory or administrative actions to assure that such
actions do not result in an unconstitutional taking of private
property. It is not the purpose of this section to expand or reduce
the scope of private property protections provided in the state and
federal Constitutions. The attorney general shall review and update
the process at least on an annual basis to maintain consistency with
changes in case law.
(2) Local governments that are required or choose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 and state agencies shall utilize the process established by
subsection (1) of this section to assure that proposed regulatory or
administrative actions do not result in an unconstitutional taking of
private property.
(3) The attorney general, in consultation with the Washington state
bar association, shall develop a continuing education course to
implement this section.
(4) The process used by government agencies shall be protected by
attorney client privilege. Nothing in this section grants a private
party the right to seek judicial relief requiring compliance with the
provisions of this section.
(5) The requirements of this section do not apply to a county that
has adopted a withdrawal resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b) and the
cities within that county.

Sec. 14 RCW 36.70A.410 and 1993 c 478 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No county or city that plans or elects to plan under this
chapter may enact or maintain an ordinance, development regulation,
zoning regulation or official control, policy, or administrative
practice which treats a residential structure occupied by persons with
handicaps differently than a similar residential structure occupied by
a family or other unrelated individuals. As used in this section,
"handicaps" are as defined in the federal fair housing amendments act
of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3602).
(2) This section does not apply to a county that has adopted a
withdrawal resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b) and the cities within
that county.

Sec. 15 RCW 36.70A.430 and 1994 c 258 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For counties engaged in planning under this chapter, there
shall be established by December 31, 1994, a collaborative process to
review and coordinate state and local permits for all transportation
projects that cross more than one city or county boundary. This
process shall at a minimum, establish a mechanism among affected cities
and counties to designate a permit coordinating agency to facilitate
multijurisdictional review and approval of such transportation
projects.
(2) The requirements of this section do not apply to a county that
has adopted a withdrawal resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b) and the
cities within that county.

Sec. 16 RCW 36.70A.520 and 2000 c 196 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040
may authorize and designate national historic towns that may constitute
urban growth outside of urban growth areas as limited by this section.
A national historic town means a town or district that has been
designated a national historic landmark by the United States secretary
of the interior pursuant to 16 U.S.C. 461 et seq., as amended, based on
its significant historic urban features, and which historically
contained a mix of residential and commercial or industrial uses.
A national historic town may be designated under this chapter by a
county only if:
(1) The comprehensive plan specifically identifies policies to
guide the preservation, redevelopment, infill, and development of the
town;
(2) The comprehensive plan and development regulations specify a
mix of residential, commercial, industrial, tourism-recreation,
waterfront, or other historical uses, along with other uses,
infrastructure, and services which promote the economic sustainability
of the town and its historic character. To promote historic
preservation, redevelopment, and an economically sustainable community,
the town also may include the types of uses that existed at times
during its history and is not limited to those present at the time of
the historic designation. Portions of the town may include urban
densities if they reflect density patterns that existed at times during
its history;
(3) The boundaries of the town include all of the area contained in
the national historic landmark designation, along with any additional
limited areas determined by the county as appropriate for transitional
uses and buffering. Provisions for transitional uses and buffering
must be compatible with the town's historic character and must protect
the existing natural and built environment under the requirements of
this chapter within and beyond the additional limited areas, including
visual compatibility. The comprehensive plan and development
regulations must include restrictions that preclude new urban or
suburban land uses in the vicinity of the town, including the
additional limited areas, except in areas otherwise designated for
urban growth under this chapter;
(4) The development regulations provide for architectural controls
and review procedures applicable to the rehabilitation, redevelopment,
infill, or new development to promote the historic character of the
town;
(5) The county finds that the national historic town is consistent
with the development regulations established for critical areas; and
(6) On-site and off-site infrastructure impacts are fully
considered and mitigated concurrent with development.
A county may allocate a portion of its twenty-year population
projection, prepared by the office of financial management, to the
national historic town corresponding to the projected number of
permanent residents within the national historic town.
This section does not apply to a county that has adopted a
withdrawal resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b).

Sec. 17 RCW 36.70A.530 and 2004 c 28 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Military installations are of particular importance to the
economic health of the state of Washington and it is a priority of the
state to protect the land surrounding our military installations from
incompatible development.
(2) Comprehensive plans, amendments to comprehensive plans,
development regulations, or amendments to development regulations
adopted under this section shall be adopted or amended concurrent with
the scheduled update provided in RCW 36.70A.130, except that counties
and cities identified in RCW 36.70A.130(4)(a) shall comply with this
section on or before December 1, 2005, and shall thereafter comply with
this section on a schedule consistent with RCW 36.70A.130(4).
(3) A comprehensive plan, amendment to a plan, a development
regulation or amendment to a development regulation, should not allow
development in the vicinity of a military installation that is
incompatible with the installation's ability to carry out its mission
requirements. A city or county may find that an existing comprehensive
plan or development regulations are compatible with the installation's
ability to carry out its mission requirements.
(4) As part of the requirements of RCW 36.70A.070(1) each county
and city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that has a federal military
installation, other than a reserve center, that employs one hundred or
more personnel and is operated by the United States department of
defense within or adjacent to its border, shall notify the commander of
the military installation of the county's or city's intent to amend its
comprehensive plan or development regulations to address lands adjacent
to military installations to ensure those lands are protected from
incompatible development.
(5)(a) The notice provided under subsection (4) of this section
shall request from the commander of the military installation a written
recommendation and supporting facts relating to the use of land being
considered in the adoption of a comprehensive plan or an amendment to
a plan. The notice shall provide sixty days for a response from the
commander. If the commander does not submit a response to such request
within sixty days, the local government may presume that implementation
of the proposed plan or amendment will not have any adverse effect on
the operation of the installation.
(b) When a county or city intends to amend its development
regulations to be consistent with the comprehensive plan elements
addressed in (a) of this subsection, notice shall be provided to the
commander of the military installation consistent with subsection (4)
of this section. The notice shall request from the commander of the
military installation a written recommendation and supporting facts
relating to the use of land being considered in the amendment to the
development regulations. The notice shall provide sixty days for a
response from the commander to the requesting government. If the
commander does not submit a response to such request within sixty days,
the local government may presume that implementation of the proposed
development regulation or amendment will not have any adverse effect on
the operation of the installation.
(6) The requirements of this section do not apply to a county that
has adopted a withdrawal resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b) and the
cities within that county.

Sec. 18 RCW 36.70A.540 and 2009 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any city or county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may enact
or expand affordable housing incentive programs providing for the
development of low-income housing units through development regulations
or conditions on rezoning or permit decisions, or both, on one or more
of the following types of development: Residential; commercial;
industrial; or mixed-use. An affordable housing incentive program may
include, but is not limited to, one or more of the following:
(i) Density bonuses within the urban growth area;
(ii) Height and bulk bonuses;
(iii) Fee waivers or exemptions;
(iv) Parking reductions; or
(v) Expedited permitting.
(b) The city or county may enact or expand such programs whether or
not the programs may impose a tax, fee, or charge on the development or
construction of property.
(c) If a developer chooses not to participate in an optional
affordable housing incentive program adopted and authorized under this
section, a city, county, or town may not condition, deny, or delay the
issuance of a permit or development approval that is consistent with
zoning and development standards on the subject property absent
incentive provisions of this program.
(2) Affordable housing incentive programs enacted or expanded under
this section shall comply with the following:
(a) The incentives or bonuses shall provide for the development of
low-income housing units;
(b) Jurisdictions shall establish standards for low-income renter
or owner occupancy housing, including income guidelines consistent with
local housing needs, to assist low-income households that cannot afford
market-rate housing. Low-income households are defined for renter and
owner occupancy program purposes as follows:
(i) Rental housing units to be developed shall be affordable to and
occupied by households with an income of fifty percent or less of the
county median family income, adjusted for family size;
(ii) Owner occupancy housing units shall be affordable to and
occupied by households with an income of eighty percent or less of the
county median family income, adjusted for family size. The legislative
authority of a jurisdiction, after holding a public hearing, may
establish lower income levels; and
(iii) The legislative authority of a jurisdiction, after holding a
public hearing, may also establish higher income levels for rental
housing or for owner occupancy housing upon finding that higher income
levels are needed to address local housing market conditions. The
higher income level for rental housing may not exceed eighty percent of
the county area median family income. The higher income level for
owner occupancy housing may not exceed one hundred percent of the
county area median family income. These established higher income
levels are considered "low-income" for the purposes of this section;
(c) The jurisdiction shall establish a maximum rent level or sales
price for each low-income housing unit developed under the terms of a
program and may adjust these levels or prices based on the average size
of the household expected to occupy the unit. For renter-occupied
housing units, the total housing costs, including basic utilities as
determined by the jurisdiction, may not exceed thirty percent of the
income limit for the low-income housing unit;
(d) Where a developer is utilizing a housing incentive program
authorized under this section to develop market rate housing, and is
developing low-income housing to satisfy the requirements of the
housing incentive program, the low-income housing units shall be
provided in a range of sizes comparable to those units that are
available to other residents. To the extent practicable, the number of
bedrooms in low-income units must be in the same proportion as the
number of bedrooms in units within the entire development. The
low-income units shall generally be distributed throughout the
development and have substantially the same functionality as the other
units in the development;
(e) Low-income housing units developed under an affordable housing
incentive program shall be committed to continuing affordability for at
least fifty years. A local government, however, may accept payments in
lieu of continuing affordability. The program shall include measures
to enforce continuing affordability and income standards applicable to
low-income units constructed under this section that may include, but
are not limited to, covenants, options, or other agreements to be
executed and recorded by owners and developers;
(f) Programs authorized under subsection (1) of this section may
apply to part or all of a jurisdiction and different standards may be
applied to different areas within a jurisdiction or to different types
of development. Programs authorized under this section may be modified
to meet local needs and may include provisions not expressly provided
in this section or RCW 82.02.020;
(g) Low-income housing units developed under an affordable housing
incentive program are encouraged to be provided within developments for
which a bonus or incentive is provided. However, programs may allow
units to be provided in a building located in the general area of the
development for which a bonus or incentive is provided; and
(h) Affordable housing incentive programs may allow a payment of
money or property in lieu of low-income housing units if the
jurisdiction determines that the payment achieves a result equal to or
better than providing the affordable housing on-site, as long as the
payment does not exceed the approximate cost of developing the same
number and quality of housing units that would otherwise be developed.
Any city or county shall use these funds or property to support the
development of low-income housing, including support provided through
loans or grants to public or private owners or developers of housing.
(3) Affordable housing incentive programs enacted or expanded under
this section may be applied within the jurisdiction to address the need
for increased residential development, consistent with local growth
management and housing policies, as follows:
(a) The jurisdiction shall identify certain land use designations
within a geographic area where increased residential development will
assist in achieving local growth management and housing policies;
(b) The jurisdiction shall provide increased residential
development capacity through zoning changes, bonus densities, height
and bulk increases, parking reductions, or other regulatory changes or
other incentives;
(c) The jurisdiction shall determine that increased residential
development capacity or other incentives can be achieved within the
identified area, subject to consideration of other regulatory controls
on development; and
(d) The jurisdiction may establish a minimum amount of affordable
housing that must be provided by all residential developments being
built under the revised regulations, consistent with the requirements
of this section.
(4) This section does not apply to a county that has adopted a
withdrawal resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b) and the cities within
that county.

--- END ---