BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.20A.320 and 2009 c 408 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department may serve upon a responsible parent a notice
informing the responsible parent of the department's intent to submit
the parent's name to the department of licensing and any appropriate
licensing entity as a licensee who is not in compliance with a child
support order. ((The department shall attach a copy of the responsible
parent's child support order to the notice.)) If the support order
establishing or modifying the child support obligation includes a
statement required under RCW 26.23.050 that the responsible parent's
privileges to obtain and maintain a license may not be renewed or may
be suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a support order,
the department may send the notice required by this section to the
responsible parent by first-class mail, addressed to the responsible
parent's last known mailing address on file with the department,
postage prepaid, or by personal service. Notice by first-class mail is
deemed served three days from the date the notice was deposited with
the United States postal service.
(b) If the support order does not include a statement as required
under RCW 26.23.050 that the responsible parent's privileges to obtain
and maintain a license may not be renewed or may be suspended if the
parent is not in compliance with a support order, service of the notice
required by this section to the responsible parent must be by certified
mail, return receipt requested. If service by certified mail is not
successful, service shall be by personal service.
(c) The department shall provide a copy of the child support order
to the responsible parent upon the responsible parent's request.
(2) The notice of noncompliance must include the following
information:
(a) The address and telephone number of the department's division
of child support office that issued the notice;
(b) That in order to prevent the department from certifying the
parent's name to the department of licensing or any other licensing
entity, the parent has twenty days from receipt of the notice to
contact the department and:
(i) Pay the overdue support amount in full;
(ii) Request an adjudicative proceeding as provided in RCW
74.20A.322;
(iii) Agree to a payment schedule with the department as provided
in RCW 74.20A.326; or
(iv) File an action to modify the child support order with the
appropriate court or administrative forum, in which case the department
will stay the certification process up to six months;
(c) That failure to contact the department within twenty days of
receipt of the notice will result in certification of the responsible
parent's name to the department of licensing and any other appropriate
licensing entity for noncompliance with a child support order. Upon
receipt of the notice:
(i) The licensing entity will suspend or not renew the parent's
license and the department of licensing will suspend or not renew any
driver's license that the parent holds until the parent provides the
department of licensing and the licensing entity with a release from
the department stating that the responsible parent is in compliance
with the child support order;
(ii) The department of fish and wildlife will suspend a fishing
license, hunting license, occupational licenses, such as a commercial
fishing license, or any other license issued under chapter 77.32 RCW
that the responsible parent may possess, and suspension of a license by
the department of fish and wildlife may also affect the parent's
ability to obtain permits, such as special hunting permits, issued by
the department. Notice from the department of licensing that a
responsible parent's driver's license has been suspended shall serve as
notice of the suspension of a license issued under chapter 77.32 RCW;
(d) That suspension of a license will affect insurability if the
responsible parent's insurance policy excludes coverage for acts
occurring after the suspension of a license;
(e) If the responsible parent subsequently comes into compliance
with the child support order, the department will promptly provide the
parent and the appropriate licensing entities with a release stating
that the parent is in compliance with the order.
(3) When a responsible parent who is served notice under subsection
(1) of this section subsequently complies with the child support order,
a copy of a release stating that the responsible parent is in
compliance with the order shall be transmitted by the department to the
appropriate licensing entities.
(4) The department of licensing and a licensing entity may renew,
reinstate, or otherwise extend a license in accordance with the
licensing entity's or the department of licensing's rules after the
licensing entity or the department of licensing receives a copy of the
release specified in subsection (3) of this section. The department of
licensing and a licensing entity may waive any applicable requirement
for reissuance, renewal, or other extension if it determines that the
imposition of that requirement places an undue burden on the person and
that waiver of the requirement is consistent with the public interest.

--- END ---