BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
A family day care provider may meet the minimum education
requirement for licensing by achieving a level three rating in the
early achievers program, Washington state's quality rating improvement
system.

--- END ---