BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.43.080 and 2005 c 29 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Certificates of registration, and certificates of authorization
and renewals thereof, shall expire on the last day of the month of
December following their issuance or renewal and shall become invalid
on that date unless renewed. It shall be the duty of the administrator
of the division of professional licensing to notify every person, firm,
or corporation registered under this chapter of the date of the
expiration of his or her certificate and the amount of the renewal fee
that shall be required for its renewal for one year. Such notice shall
be mailed at least thirty days before the end of December of each year.
Renewal may be effected during the month of December by the payment of
a fee determined by the director as provided in RCW 43.24.086. In case
any professional engineer and/or land surveyor registered under this
chapter shall fail to pay the renewal fee hereinabove provided for,
within ninety days from the date when the same shall become due, the
renewal fee shall be the current fee plus an amount equal to one year's
fee.
(2) ((Beginning July 1, 2007,)) The department of licensing may not
renew a certificate of registration for a land surveyor or engineer
unless the registrant verifies to the board that he or she has
completed at least fifteen hours of continuing professional development
per year of the registration period. ((By July 1, 2006,)) The board
shall adopt rules governing continuing professional development for
land surveyors and engineers that are generally patterned after the
model rules of the national council of examiners for engineering and
surveying. An engineer may satisfy the requirements of this subsection
with work performed in a volunteer capacity or active participation in
outreach activities involving students, so long as the volunteer work
or outreach activities are related to science, technology, engineering,
or mathematics. Each hour of volunteer work or participation in
outreach activities is equivalent to one hour of continuing
professional development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The requirements of RCW 18.43.080(2) do not apply to an
engineer employed by an electric utility or a gas company. An engineer
employed by an electric utility or gas company may voluntarily report
his or her hours of continuing professional development to the
department of licensing in the same manner and at the same time as land
surveyors and other engineers under RCW 18.43.080(2), and the
department of licensing shall maintain records of the reported
continuing professional development hours.
(2) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the
following meanings:
(a) "Electric utility" means a company owned by investors that
meets the definition in RCW 80.04.010 and is engaged in distributing
electricity to more than one retail electric customer in the state; a
municipal electric utility formed under Title 35 RCW; a public utility
district formed under Title 54 RCW; an irrigation district formed under
chapter 87.03 RCW; a cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW; or a
mutual corporation or association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW that
is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to more than one
retail electric customer in the state.
(b) "Gas company" has the same meaning as in RCW 80.04.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.43 RCW
to read as follows:
The requirements of RCW 18.43.080(2) do not apply to an engineer
who affirms that he or she is not engaged in the practice of
engineering.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect November 1, 2014.

--- END ---