BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.729 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The term of the sentence of an offender committed to a
correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by
earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and adopted by the correctional agency having jurisdiction in
which the offender is confined. The earned release time shall be for
good behavior and good performance, as determined by the correctional
agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency shall not credit
the offender with earned release credits in advance of the offender
actually earning the credits.
(b) Any program established pursuant to this section shall allow an
offender to earn early release credits for presentence incarceration.
If an offender is transferred from a county jail to the department, the
administrator of a county jail facility shall certify to the department
the amount of time spent in custody at the facility and the amount of
earned release time. The department may approve a jail certification
from a correctional agency that calculates earned release time based on
the actual amount of confinement time served by the offender before
sentencing when an erroneous calculation of confinement time served by
the offender before sentencing appears on the judgment and sentence.
(2) An offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after
July 23, 1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements
under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good
time credits or earned release time for that portion of his or her
sentence that results from any deadly weapon enhancements.
(3) An offender may earn early release time as follows:
(a) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence.
(b) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed
ten percent of the sentence.
(c) An offender is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time if he or she:
(i) Is not classified as an offender who is at a high risk to
reoffend as provided in subsection (4) of this section;
(ii) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(iii) Has no prior conviction for the offenses listed in (c)(ii) of
this subsection;
(iv) Participates in programming or activities as directed by the
offender's individual reentry plan as provided under RCW 72.09.270 to
the extent that such programming or activities are made available by
the department; and
(v) Has not committed a new felony after July 22, 2007, while under
community custody.
(d) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence.
(4) The department shall perform a risk assessment of each offender
who may qualify for earned early release under subsection (3)(c) of
this section utilizing the risk assessment tool recommended by the
Washington state institute for public policy. Subsection (3)(c) of
this section does not apply to offenders convicted after July 1, 2010.
(5)(a) A person who is eligible for earned early release as
provided in this section and who will be supervised by the department
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.501 or 9.94A.5011, shall be transferred to
community custody in lieu of earned release time;
(b) The department shall, as a part of its program for release to
the community in lieu of earned release, require the offender to
propose a release plan that includes an approved residence and living
arrangement. All offenders with community custody terms eligible for
release to community custody in lieu of earned release shall provide an
approved residence and living arrangement prior to release to the
community;
(c) The department may deny transfer to community custody in lieu
of earned release time if the department determines an offender's
release plan, including proposed residence location and living
arrangements, may violate the conditions of the sentence or conditions
of supervision, place the offender at risk to violate the conditions of
the sentence, place the offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk
to victim safety or community safety. The department's authority under
this section is independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence
or statutory provision regarding conditions for community custody;
(d) If the department is unable to approve the offender's release
plan, the department may do one or more of the following:
(i) Transfer an offender to partial confinement in lieu of earned
early release for a period not to exceed three months. The three
months in partial confinement is in addition to that portion of the
offender's term of confinement that may be served in partial
confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728(5);
(ii) Provide rental vouchers to the offender for a period not to
exceed three months if rental assistance will result in an approved
release plan. ((The)) A voucher ((must)) may only be provided in
conjunction with additional transition support programming or services
that enable an offender to participate in services including, but not
limited to, substance abuse treatment, mental health treatment, sex
offender treatment, educational programming, or employment programming;
(e) The department shall maintain a list of housing providers that
meets the requirements of section 2 of this act. A rental voucher for
a person required to register under RCW 9A.44.130 may only be paid to
a housing provider on the department's list;
(f) For each offender who is the recipient of a rental voucher, the
department shall ((include, concurrent with the data that the
department otherwise obtains and records, the housing status of the
offender for the duration of the offender's supervision)) gather data
as recommended by the Washington state institute for public policy in
order to best demonstrate whether rental vouchers are effective in
reducing recidivism.
(6) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under RCW
9.94A.670(5)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A housing provider may be placed on a list with the department
to receive rental vouchers, as described in RCW 9.94A.729(5)(e), in
accordance with the provisions of this section.
(2) The department shall give preference to housing providers that
provide a small, family oriented, living environment. For a dwelling
unit, as defined in RCW 59.18.030, that houses between four and eight
individuals, or a greater number if permitted by local code, the
department shall provide transition support that verifies an offender
is participating in programming or services including, but not limited
to, substance abuse treatment, mental health treatment, sex offender
treatment, educational programming, development of positive living
skills, or employment programming. In addition, when selecting housing
providers, the department shall consider the compatibility of the
proposed offender housing with the surrounding neighborhood and
underlying zoning.
(3) The department shall provide the local law and justice council,
as described in RCW 72.09.300, or other designated county authority,
and a city's chief law enforcement officer if such housing is located
within a city, with notice any time a housing provider or new housing
location is added to the list within that county.
(4) If a certificate of inspection, as provided in RCW 59.18.125,
is required by local regulation and the local government does not have
a current certificate of inspection on file, the local government shall
have ten business days from the later of (a) receipt of notice from the
department as provided in subsection (3) of this section; or (b) from
the date the local government is given access to the dwelling unit to
conduct an inspection or reinspection to issue a certificate. If the
local government does not issue a certificate of inspection or deny a
certificate of inspection for failure to fulfill a substantial
obligation, as described in RCW 59.18.030(1), within the specified time
frame, the local regulation is deemed satisfied.
(5)(a) If, within ten business days of receipt of a notice from the
department of a new location or new housing provider, the relevant
county authority or city determines that the housing is in a
neighborhood with an existing concentration of special needs housing,
including retirement homes, assisted living, emergency or transitional
housing, or adult family homes, the county authority or city may
request the new location or new housing provider be removed from the
list.
(b) This subsection does not apply to housing providers approved by
the department to receive rental vouchers on the effective date of this
section.
(6) The county authority or city may at any time request a housing
provider be removed from the list if the county authority or city
provides information to the department that:
(a) It has determined that the housing does not comply with state
and local fire and building codes or applicable zoning and development
regulations in effect at the time the housing provider first began
receiving housing vouchers; or
(b) The housing provider is not complying with the provisions of
this section.
(7) After receiving a request to remove a housing provider from the
local law and justice council or city, the department shall immediately
notify the provider of the concerns and request that the provider
demonstrate that it is in compliance with the provisions of this
section. If, after ten days' written notice, the housing provider
cannot demonstrate to the department that it is in compliance with the
reasons for the county authority's or city's request for removal, the
department shall remove the housing provider from the list.
(8) This section does not create any civil liability on the part of
the state or an appointed or elected public official, public employee,
or public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470, or a unit of local
government or any of its employees.
(9) A housing provider who provides housing pursuant to this
section is not liable for civil damages arising from the criminal
conduct of an offender to any greater extent than a regular tenant, and
no special duties are created under this section.
(10) This section only applies to the granting of vouchers to
offenders required to register under RCW 9A.44.130.

--- END ---