BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that the
consideration of health implications in transportation policy has the
potential to save lives, improve health and well-being, and reduce
health care costs by creating transportation opportunities that prevent
chronic diseases, improve air quality, and reduce obesity. Wise
transportation investments that include a consideration of health
consequences will save billions of dollars in health care costs.
The rate of obesity in Washington has almost doubled over the last
fifteen years, disproportionately affecting those of lower
socioeconomic and educational status. Twenty-five percent of adults
are obese and thirty-six percent are overweight, while more than
twenty-five percent of our youth are overweight or obese. Washington
is committed to reducing the 1.33 billion dollars that the state spends
on the medical costs of obesity annually by increasing opportunities
for active transportation. For the last few generations, opportunities
for physical activity have declined as they have been engineered out of
our transportation system. Lack of physical activity is a major
contributor to the steady rise in rates of obesity, diabetes, heart
disease, stroke, and other chronic health conditions in the United
States.
Washington is committed to considering the health implications of
transportation planning and community design with the goal of
increasing health and decreasing health care costs. Many Americans
view walking, bicycling, and taking public transit within their
communities as unsafe because of traffic and the lack of sidewalks,
crosswalks, and bicycle facilities. To encourage people to utilize
healthy transportation options, safe facilities, such as sidewalks, are
a necessity. In 2008 the Washington state nutrition and physical
activity plan called for increasing the number of active community
environments by changing transportation policy and funding to promote
walking and bicycling.
Washington is committed to reducing unhealthy air quality and the
associated negative effects on health. Exposure to traffic emissions
has been linked to many adverse health effects, including premature
mortality, cardiac symptoms, exacerbation of asthma symptoms,
diminished lung function, and increased hospitalization. More than
fifty percent of Washington's residents suffer from at least one
medical condition that is made worse by air pollution.
Transportation planning and projects that connect low-income
communities to basic goods and services hold enormous potential for
addressing many of our state's most pressing health issues.
Transportation solutions that benefit public health are shared
solutions that can create social and economic equity and improve the
economy.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature that this act serves
to expand the existing goals, objectives, and responsibilities related
to the operation of an efficient statewide transportation system to
include the health of the citizens of Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.04.280 and 2010 c 74 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to establish policy goals
for the planning, operation, performance of, and investment in, the
state's transportation system. The policy goals established under this
section are deemed consistent with the benchmark categories adopted by
the state's blue ribbon commission on transportation on November 30,
2000. Public investments in transportation should support achievement
of these policy goals:
(a) Economic vitality: To promote and develop transportation
systems that stimulate, support, and enhance the movement of people and
goods to ensure a prosperous economy;
(b) Preservation: To maintain, preserve, and extend the life and
utility of prior investments in transportation systems and services;
(c) Safety: To provide for and improve the safety and security of
transportation customers and the transportation system;
(d) Mobility: To improve the predictable movement of goods and
people throughout Washington state;
(e) Environment: To enhance Washington's quality of life through
transportation investments that promote energy conservation, enhance
healthy communities, and protect the environment; ((and))
(f) Stewardship: To continuously improve the quality,
effectiveness, and efficiency of the transportation system; and
(g) Health: To improve the health of Washington's citizens and
reduce health care costs by considering health implications when
planning, designing, building, and maintaining Washington's
transportation system.
(2) The powers, duties, and functions of state transportation
agencies must be performed in a manner consistent with the policy goals
set forth in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) These policy goals are intended to be the basis for
establishing detailed and measurable objectives and related performance
measures.
(4) It is the intent of the legislature that the office of
financial management establish objectives and performance measures for
the department of transportation and other state agencies with
transportation-related responsibilities to ensure transportation system
performance at local, regional, and state government levels progresses
toward the attainment of the policy goals set forth in subsection (1)
of this section. The office of financial management shall submit
initial objectives and performance measures to the legislature for its
review and shall provide copies of the same to the commission during
the 2008 legislative session. The office of financial management shall
submit objectives and performance measures to the legislature for its
review and shall provide copies of the same to the commission during
each regular session of the legislature during an even-numbered year
thereafter.
(5) This section does not create a private right of action.

--- END ---