BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Law enforcement personnel may not find an operator of a
motorcycle who enters or crosses an intersection controlled by a
traffic control signal against a steady red indicator, including
traffic control signals equipped with automated traffic safety cameras,
to be in violation of this chapter, chapter 46.63 RCW, or local laws
if, as an affirmative defense to such a violation, the operator
establishes all of the following conditions:
(a) The motorcycle has been brought to a complete stop;
(b) The traffic control signal continues to display a steady red
indicator for more than ninety seconds;
(c) The traffic control signal is apparently malfunctioning or, if
programmed or engineered to change to a steady green indicator only
after detecting the approach of a motor vehicle, the signal has
apparently failed to detect the arrival of the motorcycle; and
(d) Another motor vehicle or person is not approaching on the
street or highway to be crossed or entered or is at a far enough
distance from the intersection that it does not constitute an immediate
hazard.
(2) The affirmative defense provided in subsection (1) of this
section applies only to a violation of entering or crossing an
intersection controlled by a traffic control signal against a steady
red indicator and is not a defense to any other civil or criminal
action.

--- END ---