BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2009 c 418 s 7 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
This act expires January 1, ((2014)) 2019.

Sec. 2 2010 c 126 s 15 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Section 11 of this act expires January 1, ((2014)) 2019.

Sec. 3 2010 c 126 s 16 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Section 12 of this act takes effect January 1, ((2014)) 2019.

--- END ---