BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.145.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 13 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The opportunity scholarship board is created. The opportunity
scholarship board consists of ((seven)) nine members:
(a) Three members appointed by the governor. For two of the three
appointments, the governor shall consider names from a list provided by
the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(b) ((Four)) Six foundation or business and industry
representatives appointed by the governor from among the state's most
productive industries such as aerospace, manufacturing, health
sciences, information technology, and others. The foundation or
business and industry representatives shall be selected from among
nominations provided by the private sector donors to the opportunity
scholarship and opportunity expansion programs. However, the governor
may request, and the private sector donors shall provide, an additional
list or lists from which the governor shall select these
representatives.
(2) Board members shall hold their offices for a term of four years
from the first day of September and until their successors are
appointed. No more than the terms of two members may expire
simultaneously on the last day of August in any one year.
(3) The members of the opportunity scholarship board shall elect
one of the business and industry representatives to serve as chair.
(4) Five members of the board constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In case of a vacancy, or when an appointment
is made after the date of expiration of the term, the governor or the
president of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives,
depending upon which made the initial appointment to that position,
shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the board
member whose office has become vacant or expired.
(5) The opportunity scholarship board shall be staffed by the
program administrator.
(6) The purpose of the opportunity scholarship board is to provide
oversight and guidance for the opportunity expansion and the
opportunity scholarship programs in light of established legislative
priorities and to fulfill the duties and responsibilities under this
chapter, including but not limited to determining eligible education
programs for purposes of the opportunity scholarship program. Duties,
exercised jointly with the program administrator, include soliciting
funds and setting annual fund-raising goals.
(7) The opportunity scholarship board may report to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the legislature with recommendations
as to:
(a) Whether some or all of the scholarships should be changed to
conditional scholarships that must be repaid in the event the
participant does not complete the eligible education program; and
(b) A source or sources of funds for the opportunity expansion
program in addition to the voluntary contributions of the high
technology research and development tax credit under RCW 82.32.800.

--- END ---