BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington
educators possess great skills and knowledge about both subject matter
content and instructional pedagogy, and that sharing this knowledge
with other educators benefits the entire educational system. The
quality of any professional development is enhanced by drawing from
experts in the field with deep understanding of the profession.
However, the legislature finds that little data is available regarding
the quality, quantity, or effectiveness of professional development
across school districts, and that a better understanding of best
practices would be useful to share with teachers and principals
statewide.
(2) The legislature further finds that technology provides
increasing opportunities for educators across Washington state to
access professional development regardless of the time of year, time of
day, or geographic location, as well as share best practices,
experiences, and skills with others. The legislature recognizes that
online professional development does not replace in-person, face-to-face dialogue among educators. National standards for professional
development emphasize the creation of professional learning communities
where educators come together to analyze data, set goals, coach one
another, and continuously improve their practice. However, the power
and reach of the internet to provide information, resources, videos,
and forums for discussion should be harnessed so that all teachers and
principals in all districts within the state have free, open access to
high quality, robust, and relevant professional development focused on
improving instruction and instructional practices. Specialized
professional development for principals should include instructional
and noninstructional modules such as financial and building management,
evaluation methodologies, team building, and community relations, among
other topics.
(3) Therefore it is the legislature's intent to create a dynamic,
real-time, and interactive online professional development system to
augment the current system. The online professional development system
will be designed, managed, and implemented by Washington educators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose,
the Washington K-12 online professional development project is
established. The purpose of the project is to make online professional
development modules for K-12 teachers and principals available on
demand and at no cost to any educator who chooses to use them.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop a request for proposals and select through a competitive
process an applicant to serve as the contracted facilitator and
administrator for the Washington K-12 online professional development
project. School districts, educational service districts, institutions
of higher education, and public or private entities or organizations
may apply. The facilitator must:
(a) Appoint and convene a steering committee of K-12 educators that
shall be responsible for the overall design and structure of the
project, identifying the topics for the online professional development
modules, and preparing the project evaluation and report to the
legislature;
(b) Oversee and provide support for creation of the professional
development modules by K-12 educators;
(c) Provide necessary technical support and infrastructure for the
project; and
(d) Actively seek public-private partnerships in the development
and implementation of the project.
(3) The professional development modules for the project must
incorporate a variety of media, including demonstration videos, links
to research and resources, webinars, and discussion forums. The
project must include modules that incorporate hybrid learning through
a combination of online and face-to-face collegial interaction among
educators. The project must also provide for data collection on usage
and customer feedback.
(4) The professional development modules must cover a range of
topics, including but not limited to:
(a) Academic content that is aligned with and supports the common
core state standards;
(b) Strategies for improving instructional practice, pedagogy, and
classroom management;
(c) Strategies for closing the educational opportunity gap and
providing specialized instruction for low-achieving students, English
language learners, and students in special education; and
(d) Topics of particular interest to principals, such as effective
leadership, managing people and resources, and community and parent
involvement.
(5) Each professional development module must contain an end-of-module assessment that documents the user's successful completion.
(6) Completion of the online professional development modules under
this section may only be considered approved in-service training for
purposes of the statewide salary allocation schedule according to rules
adopted by the professional educator standards board under section 3 of
this act and only after the rules take effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
The professional educator standards board shall adopt rules that
establish standards for minimum content, documentation of
participation, and verification of completion of the online
professional development modules developed under section 2 of this act
in order for completion of the modules to be considered equivalent to
clock hours of approved in-service training under RCW 28A.415.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The steering committee for the Washington
K-12 online professional development project must submit a status
report to the education committees of the legislature by December 1,
2015. At a minimum, the report must address the following topics:
(1) Data on usage of the professional development modules by
teachers and principals;
(2) Customer feedback on the usefulness of the modules and how to
improve the system;
(3) Recommendations and estimated costs to maintain and regularly
refresh the professional development modules; and
(4) Recommendations for expanding the reach and improving the
usefulness of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The joint legislative audit and review
committee must conduct an analysis of K-12 professional development for
teachers and principals. The purpose of the analysis is to improve the
baseline understanding of policymakers regarding the level of public
school resources currently expended to support professional
development, the sources of funds, the type and content of professional
development purchased, and the extent that professional development is
based on individual preference, professional growth plans, school
instructional teams, or district priorities. For the purposes of the
analysis, "professional development" includes both traditional forms
such as seminars, conferences, courses, or training sessions and
nontraditional, job-embedded forms such as dedicated time for
instructional teams to examine student data, coaching and mentoring,
and professional learning communities. In the analysis, the committee
must use both qualitative and quantitative methods, access statewide
data to the extent available and informative, and select a sample of
school districts for more detailed review. The analysis must be
submitted to the legislature by December 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If specific funding for the purposes of
sections 2, 3, and 4 of this act, referencing sections 2, 3, and 4 of
this act by bill or chapter number and section number, is not provided
by June 30, 2013, in the omnibus appropriations act, sections 2, 3, and
4 of this act are null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 5 of this act, referencing section 5 of this act by bill or
chapter number and section number, is not provided by June 30, 2013, in
the omnibus appropriations act, section 5 of this act is null and void.

--- END ---