BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that in 2007 the
legislature passed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5647, which expanded the
allowable uses of lodging tax revenues for tourism promotion. The
legislature further finds that the 2007 legislation was temporary but
required the analysis of the economic impact of the expanded uses of
lodging tax revenues. The legislature further finds that hoteliers are
the cornerstone of the tourism industry and are the entities that
generate lodging tax revenues that benefit the local jurisdictions
throughout the state. The legislature further finds that lodging tax
revenues stimulate economic activity when the use of revenues is
specific and targeted based on the differing needs of local
jurisdictions.
(2) Because of the diverging needs of local jurisdictions, the
legislature intends to continue to allow the expanded uses of lodging
tax revenues to promote tourism and increase economic activity for
local jurisdictions. The legislature further intends to subject the
use of lodging tax revenues to a periodic review to ensure that the
incremental economic benefit is measured and that the use of lodging
tax revenues continues to increase tourism and generate revenue for
local jurisdictions.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.28.1816 and 2008 c 28 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Lodging tax revenues under this chapter may be used, directly
by local jurisdictions or indirectly through a convention and visitors
bureau or destination marketing organization, for the marketing and
operations of special events and festivals designed to attract tourists
and local travelers and to support the operations and capital
expenditures of tourism-related facilities, designed to attract
tourists and local travelers, owned or operated by public entities, or
nonprofit organizations described under section 501(c)(3) and section
501(c)(6) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended. In
counties with a population of one million five hundred thousand or
less, lodging tax revenues may not be used for debt service on bonds
issued on or after the effective date of this section. Lodging tax
revenues used for capital expenditures under this section may not
supplant existing funding for capital expenditures for tourism-related
facilities.
(2) ((Local jurisdictions that use the lodging tax revenues under
this section must submit an annual economic impact report to the
department of community, trade, and economic development for
expenditures made beginning January 1, 2008. These reports must
include the expenditures by the local jurisdiction for tourism
promotion purposes and what is used by a nonprofit organization exempt
from taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6). This
economic impact report, at a minimum, must include: (a) The total
revenue received under this chapter for each year; (b) the list of
festivals, special events, or nonprofit 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6)
organizations that received funds under this chapter; (c) the list of
festivals, special events, or tourism facilities sponsored or owned by
the local jurisdiction that received funds under this chapter; (d) the
amount of revenue expended on each festival, special event, or
tourism-related facility owned or sponsored by a nonprofit 501(c)(3) or
501(c)(6) organization or local jurisdiction; (e) the estimated number
of tourists, persons traveling over fifty miles to the destination,
persons remaining at the destination overnight, and lodging stays
generated per festival, special event, or tourism-related facility
owned or sponsored by a nonprofit 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6) organization
or local jurisdiction; and (f) any other measurements the local
government finds that demonstrate the impact of the increased tourism
attributable to the festival, special event, or tourism-related
facility owned or sponsored by a nonprofit 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6)
organization or local jurisdiction.
(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee must report to
the legislature and the governor on the use and economic impact of
lodging tax revenues by local jurisdictions since January 1, 2008, to
support festivals, special events, and tourism-related facilities owned
or sponsored by a nonprofit organization under section 501(c)(3) or
501(c)(6) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, or a local
jurisdiction, and the economic impact generated by these festivals,
events, and facilities. This report shall be due September 1, 2012.
(4) Reporting under this section must begin with calendar year
2008.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2013.)) (a) Except as provided in
(b) of this subsection, applicants applying for use of revenues in this
chapter must provide the legislative body of the municipality to which
they are applying estimates of how any moneys received will result in
increases in:
(i) The number of tourists and local travelers visiting the
municipality including anticipated overnight stays; and
(ii) Tourism-related and local traveler-related economic activity
benefiting the municipality.
(b) In a municipality with a population of five thousand or more,
applicants applying for use of revenues in this chapter must submit
their applications and estimates described under (a) of this subsection
to the local lodging tax advisory committee.
(c)(i) All recipients must submit a report to the legislative body
of the municipality reporting pertinent data evaluating tourism and
local visitor benefits resulting from the use of the funds as compared
with the estimates contained in the application. The legislative body
of the municipality receiving a report must: Make such report
available to the public and furnish copies of the report to the joint
legislative audit and review committee and members of the local lodging
tax advisory committee by December 31st each year.
(ii) On a biennial basis, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the
joint legislative audit and review committee must submit a report to
the economic development committees of the legislature that details the
use and economic impact of lodging tax revenues by local jurisdictions
based on the reports furnished to the joint legislative audit and
review committee under (c)(i) of this subsection. Reporting under this
subsection must begin in calendar year 2015.
(d) This section does not apply to the revenues of any lodging tax
authorized under this chapter imposed by a county with a population of
one million five hundred thousand or more.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.28.080 and 2007 c 497 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Acquisition" includes, but is not limited to, siting,
acquisition, design, construction, refurbishing, expansion, repair, and
improvement, including paying or securing the payment of all or any
portion of general obligation bonds, leases, revenue bonds, or other
obligations issued or incurred for such purpose or purposes under this
chapter.
(2) "Local traveler" means a person who travels less than fifty
miles from their residence or business, or a person who travels by
ferry, to attend a special event or festival.
(3) "Local traveler economic impacts" means economic activity
resulting from local travelers which may include meals, admissions
fees, souvenirs, tours, and gifts.
(4) "Municipality" means any county, city or town of the state of
Washington.
(((3))) (5) "Operation" includes, but is not limited to, operation,
management, and marketing.
(((4))) (6) "Person" means the federal government or any agency
thereof, the state or any agency, subdivision, taxing district or
municipal corporation thereof other than county, city or town, any
private corporation, partnership, association, or individual.
(((5))) (7) "Tourism" means economic activity resulting from
tourists, which may include sales of overnight lodging, meals, tours,
gifts, or souvenirs.
(((6))) (8) "Tourism promotion" means activities, operations, and
expenditures designed to increase tourism, including but not limited to
advertising, publicizing, or otherwise distributing information for the
purpose of attracting and welcoming tourists; developing strategies to
expand tourism; operating tourism promotion agencies; and funding the
marketing of or the operation of special events and festivals designed
to attract tourists.
(((7))) (9) "Tourism-related facility" means real or tangible
personal property with a usable life of three or more years, or
constructed with volunteer labor that is: (a)(i) Owned by a public
entity; (ii) owned by a nonprofit organization described under section
501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended; or
(iii) owned by a nonprofit organization described under section
501(c)(6) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, a
business organization, destination marketing organization, main street
organization, lodging association, or chamber of commerce and (b) used
to support tourism, performing arts, or to accommodate tourist
activities.
(((8))) (10) "Tourist" means a person who travels ((from a place of
residence to a different town, city, county, state, or country, for
purposes of business, pleasure, recreation, education, arts, heritage,
or culture.
(9) Amendments made in section 1, chapter 497, Laws of 2007 expire
June 30, 2013)) for business or pleasure on a trip: Away from their
place of residence or business and stays overnight in paid
accommodations; to a place fifty miles or more one way from their place
of residence or their business for the day or stays overnight; or from
another country or state outside of their place of residence or their
business.

Sec. 4 RCW 67.28.1817 and 1998 c 35 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Before proposing imposition of a new tax under this chapter,
an increase in the rate of a tax imposed under this chapter, repeal of
an exemption from a tax imposed under this chapter, or a change in the
use of revenue received under this chapter, a municipality with a
population of five thousand or more shall establish a lodging tax
advisory committee under this section)) (a) A municipality with a
population of five thousand or more must establish a lodging tax
advisory committee under this section before either:
(i) Proposing imposition of a new tax under this chapter, an
increase in the rate of a tax imposed under this chapter, or a repeal
of an exemption from a tax imposed under this chapter; or
(ii) Approving an application for use of revenue received under
this chapter.
(b)(i) A lodging tax advisory committee ((shall)) must consist of
at least five members, appointed by the legislative body of the
municipality, unless the municipality has a charter providing for a
different appointment authority.
(ii) The committee membership ((shall)) must include:
(((a))) (A) At least two members who are representatives of
businesses required to collect tax under this chapter; and
(((b))) (B) At least two members who are persons involved in
activities authorized to be funded by revenue received under this
chapter. Persons who are eligible for appointment under (((a)))
(b)(ii)(A) of this subsection are not eligible for appointment under
(b)(ii)(B) of this subsection. Persons who are eligible for
appointment under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection are not eligible for
appointment under (((a))) (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection.
(c) Organizations representing businesses required to collect tax
under this chapter, organizations involved in activities authorized to
be funded by revenue received under this chapter, and local agencies
involved in tourism promotion may submit recommendations for membership
on the committee. The number of members who are representatives of
businesses required to collect tax under this chapter ((shall)) must
equal the number of members who are involved in activities authorized
to be funded by revenue received under this chapter. One member
((shall)) must be an elected official of the municipality who ((shall))
must serve as chair of the committee. An advisory committee for a
county may include one nonvoting member who is an elected official of
a city or town in the county. An advisory committee for a city or town
may include one nonvoting member who is an elected official of the
county in which the city or town is located. The appointing authority
((shall)) must review the membership of the advisory committee annually
and make changes as appropriate.
(2)(a) Any municipality that: (i) Proposes imposition of a tax
under this chapter, an increase in the rate of a tax imposed under this
chapter, or a repeal of an exemption from a tax imposed under this
chapter((, or a change in the)); or (ii) approves an application for
use of revenue received under this chapter ((shall)), must submit ((the
proposal)) all proposals and applications received pursuant to RCW
67.28.1816(2) to the lodging tax advisory committee for review ((and
comment)). The submissions ((shall)) must occur at least forty-five
days before final action on or passage of the proposal by the
municipality.
(b)(i) The advisory committee ((shall)) must submit comments on
((the)) any proposal ((in a timely manner through generally applicable
public comment procedures. The comments shall include an analysis of
the extent to which the proposal will accommodate activities for
tourists or increase tourism, and the extent to which the proposal will
affect the long-term stability of the fund created under RCW
67.28.1815. Failure of the advisory committee to submit comments
before final action on or passage of the proposal shall not prevent the
municipality from acting on the proposal. A municipality is not
required to submit an amended proposal to an advisory committee under
this section)) for imposition of a tax under this chapter, an increase
in the rate of a tax imposed under this chapter, repeal of an exemption
from a tax imposed under this chapter, or an approval of an application
for use of revenue received under this chapter in a timely manner
through generally applicable public comment procedures.
(ii) The lodging tax advisory committee must prioritize all
applications for use of revenue in this chapter and submit the
prioritized list and funding levels to the legislative body of the
municipality for final determination.
(iii) The lodging tax advisory committee must consider the extent
to which the proposed use of the funds will affect the long-term
stability of the fund created under RCW 67.28.1815.
(iv) The legislative body of the municipality may only choose
recipients from the prioritized list of applications and funding levels
provided by the local lodging tax advisory committee. The legislative
body of the municipality may only change the funding level after the
lodging tax advisory committee has been given the opportunity to review
the proposed change.
(v) Failure of the advisory committee to submit comments and a
prioritized list before final action on a proposal or approval of
applicants for use of the funds does not prevent the municipality from
acting.
(c) The legislative body of the municipality is not required to
submit an amended proposal to an advisory committee under this section.
(d) This section does not apply to any lodging tax authorized under
this chapter imposed by a county with a population of one million five
hundred thousand or more.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---