BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.12.070 and 2008 c 285 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of labor and industries may charge fees to
awarding agencies on public works for the approval of statements of
intent to pay prevailing wages and the certification of affidavits of
wages paid. The department may also charge fees to persons or
organizations requesting the arbitration of disputes under RCW
39.12.060. The amount of the fees shall be established by rules
adopted by the department under the procedures in the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Except as provided in subsection (3)
of this section, the fees shall apply to all approvals, certifications,
and arbitration requests made after the effective date of the rules.
All fees shall be deposited in the public works administration account.
The department may refuse to arbitrate for contractors, subcontractors,
persons, or organizations which have not paid the proper fees. The
department may, if necessary, request the attorney general to take
legal action to collect delinquent fees.
(2) The department shall set the fees permitted by this section at
a level that generates revenue that is as near as practicable to the
amount of the appropriation to administer this chapter, including, but
not limited to, the performance of adequate wage surveys, and to
investigate and enforce all alleged violations of this chapter,
including, but not limited to, incorrect statements of intent to pay
prevailing wage, incorrect certificates of affidavits of wages paid,
and wage claims, as provided for in this chapter and chapters 49.48 and
49.52 RCW. However, the fees charged for the approval of statements of
intent to pay prevailing wages and the certification of affidavits of
wages paid shall be forty dollars.
(3) If, at the time an individual or entity files an affidavit of
wages paid, the individual or entity is exempt from the requirement to
pay the prevailing rate of wage under RCW 39.12.020, the department of
labor and industries may not charge a fee to certify the affidavit of
wages paid.

--- END ---