BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.06A.020 and 2005 c 319 s 125 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall:
(a) Adopt rules and procedures necessary to implement the freight
mobility strategic investment program;
(b) Solicit from public entities proposed projects that meet
eligibility criteria established in accordance with subsection (4) of
this section; and
(c) Review and evaluate project applications based on criteria
established under this section, and prioritize and select projects
comprising a portfolio to be funded in part with grants from state
funds appropriated for the freight mobility strategic investment
program. In determining the appropriate level of state funding for a
project, the board shall ensure that state funds are allocated to
leverage the greatest amount of partnership funding possible. ((After
selecting projects comprising the portfolio, the board shall submit
them as part of its budget request to the office of financial
management and the legislature.)) The board shall ensure that projects
((submitted as part of)) included in the portfolio are not more
appropriately funded with other federal, state, or local government
funding mechanisms or programs. The board shall reject those projects
that appear to improve overall general mobility with limited
enhancement for freight mobility.
The board shall provide periodic progress reports on its activities
to the office of financial management and the senate and house
transportation committees.
(2) The board may:
(a) Accept from any state or federal agency, loans or grants for
the financing of any transportation project and enter into agreements
with any such agency concerning the loans or grants;
(b) Provide technical assistance to project applicants;
(c) Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or
financial, or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms
and conditions which are not in conflict with this chapter;
(d) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter; and
(e) Do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers
expressly granted or implied under this chapter.
(3) The board shall designate strategic freight corridors within
the state. The board shall update the list of designated strategic
corridors not less than every two years, and shall establish a method
of collecting and verifying data, including information on city and
county-owned roadways.
(4) The board shall utilize threshold project eligibility criteria
that, at a minimum, includes the following:
(a) The project must be on a strategic freight corridor;
(b) The project must meet one of the following conditions:
(i) It is primarily aimed at reducing identified barriers to
freight movement with only incidental benefits to general or personal
mobility; or
(ii) It is primarily aimed at increasing capacity for the movement
of freight with only incidental benefits to general or personal
mobility; or
(iii) It is primarily aimed at mitigating the impact on communities
of increasing freight movement, including roadway/railway conflicts;
and
(c) The project must have a total public benefit/total public cost
ratio of equal to or greater than one.
(5) From June 11, 1998, through the biennium ending June 30, 2001,
the board shall use the multicriteria analysis and scoring framework
for evaluating and ranking eligible freight mobility and freight
mitigation projects developed by the freight mobility project
prioritization committee and contained in the January 16, 1998, report
entitled "Project Eligibility, Priority and Selection Process for a
Strategic Freight Investment Program." The prioritization process
shall measure the degree to which projects address important program
objectives and shall generate a project score that reflects a project's
priority compared to other projects. The board shall assign scoring
points to each criterion that indicate the relative importance of the
criterion in the overall determination of project priority. After June
30, 2001, the board may supplement and refine the initial project
priority criteria and scoring framework developed by the freight
mobility project prioritization committee as expertise and experience
is gained in administering the freight mobility program.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature that each freight mobility
project contained in the project portfolio ((submitted)) approved by
the board utilize the greatest amount of nonstate funding possible.
The board shall adopt rules that give preference to projects that
contain the greatest levels of financial participation from nonprogram
fund sources. The board shall consider twenty percent as the minimum
partnership contribution, but shall also ensure that there are
provisions allowing exceptions for projects that are located in areas
where minimal local funding capacity exists or where the magnitude of
the project makes the adopted partnership contribution financially
unfeasible.
(7) The board shall develop and recommend policies that address
operational improvements that primarily benefit and enhance freight
movement, including, but not limited to, policies that reduce
congestion in truck lanes at border crossings and weigh stations and
provide for access to ports during nonpeak hours.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.06A.050 and 1998 c 175 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of allocating funds for the freight mobility
strategic investment program, the board shall allocate the first fifty-five percent of funds to the highest priority projects, without regard
to location.
(2) The remaining funds shall be allocated equally among three
regions of the state, defined as follows:
(a) The Puget Sound region includes King, Pierce, and Snohomish
counties;
(b) The western Washington region includes Clallam, Jefferson,
Island, Kitsap, San Juan, Skagit, Whatcom, Clark, Cowlitz, Grays
Harbor, Lewis, Mason, Pacific, Skamania, Thurston, and Wahkiakum
counties; and
(c) The eastern Washington region includes Adams, Chelan, Douglas,
Ferry, Grant, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pend Oreille, Spokane, Stevens,
Whitman, Asotin, Benton, Columbia, Franklin, Garfield, Kittitas,
Klickitat, Walla Walla, and Yakima counties.
(3) If a region does not have enough qualifying projects to utilize
its allocation of funds, the funds will be made available to the next
highest priority project, without regard to location.
(4) In the event that a proposal contains projects in more than one
region, for purposes of assuring that equitable geographic
distributions are made under subsection (2) of this section, the board
shall evaluate the proposal and proportionally assign the benefits that
are attributable to each region.
(5) If the board identifies a project for funding, but later
determines that the project is not ready to proceed ((at the time the
legislature's funding decision is pending)), the board shall recommend
removing the project from consideration and the next highest priority
project shall be substituted in the project portfolio. Any project
removed from funding consideration because it is not ready to proceed
shall retain its position on the priority project list ((and is
eligible to be recommended for funding in the next project portfolio
submitted by the board)).

Sec. 3 RCW 46.68.300 and 2005 c 314 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
The freight mobility investment account is hereby created in the
state treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
freight mobility projects ((identified in the omnibus transportation
appropriations act, including)) that have been approved by the freight
mobility strategic investment board in RCW 47.06A.020 and may include
any principal and interest on bonds authorized for the projects or
improvements.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.68.310 and 2006 c 337 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The freight mobility multimodal account is created in the state
treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for freight mobility
projects ((identified in the omnibus transportation appropriations act,
including)) that have been approved by the freight mobility strategic
investment board in RCW 47.06A.020 and may include any principal and
interest on bonds authorized for the projects or improvements.

--- END ---