BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the rich
habitat created by the land stewardship of Washington's private
landowners has created circumstances that allow the state to enjoy an
expanding gray wolf population. Unfortunately, however, this bounty
has been geographically limited to areas in eastern Washington and the
entire citizenship of the state has not been fully able to enjoy the
reestablishment of this majestic species.
(2) The legislature further finds that the department of fish and
wildlife can accelerate the pace by which all Washingtonians can enjoy
the ecological benefits of an intact food web with a healthy population
of apex predators by translocating gray wolves in areas of the state
where wolf numbers are plentiful to areas currently deprived of their
ecological contributions.
(3) The legislature further finds that an adult gray wolf needs a
minimum of fifty square miles to range on an annual basis; a size of
suitable habitat that can be provided in areas of the state west of the
crest of the Cascade mountains. In fact, the western part of
Washington is uniquely situated to support wolf ranges of this size
while still providing natural and existing man-made barriers to
migration from the translocation sites to the large population centers
of the Interstate 5 corridor.
(4) The legislature further finds that a robust wolf translocation
program will benefit both the species, in its efforts to repopulate
Washington, and the areas receiving the wolves through the increases in
ecological health brought by the species. Although the areas from
where the wolves are removed will experience a slight reduction in wolf
population and the benefits they bring, the legislature finds that the
remaining individuals will quickly fill this void through breeding and
the natural migration of the species from other political
jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall, in an effort to perpetuate the species
and minimize landowner conflicts, rely on the translocation of wolves
as the primary tool for managing wolf-related wildlife interactions in
the areas of the state where wolves are naturally occurring.
(2) A wolf may only be translocated from an area of the state where
it naturally occurred to an area of the state where conditions exist to
improve, maintain, or manage riparian or other ecosystem functions and
where a geographic barrier exists between the translocation area and
the rest of the state. Such areas include:
(a) Any island sized at least fifty square miles, due to the
natural water barrier to migration; and
(b) The Olympic Peninsula, due to Interstate 5 and highway 12
barriers to migration.

--- END ---