BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that when a child is
removed from his or her home due to suspected abuse or neglect it can
take several hours or even days for placement plans to be made for the
child during which time caseworkers have to care for the child while
also trying to locate an appropriate placement for him or her. The
legislature also finds that licensed foster homes are often unable to
take a child into their home if his or her care needs have not been
thoroughly assessed or he or she is in immediate need of health care or
social services. The legislature further finds that there are
organizations in our state that are providing or wanting to provide
short-term emergency and crisis care for children under the age of
thirteen; however, there is currently no appropriate, cost-effective
licensure category for organizations to provide these services. The
legislature intends to create a resource and assessment center license
for agencies to provide short-term emergency and crisis care for
children ages birth through twelve, or for children ages thirteen
through seventeen who have a sibling under thirteen years of age who
have been removed from their homes by child protective services or law
enforcement. The legislature further intends that resource and
assessment centers be reimbursed at the same rate as foster family
homes.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.15.020 and 2012 c 10 s 61 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter and
RCW 74.13.031 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, or facility which receives children, expectant mothers, or
persons with developmental disabilities for control, care, or
maintenance outside their own homes, or which places, arranges the
placement of, or assists in the placement of children, expectant
mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities for foster care or
placement of children for adoption, and shall include the following
irrespective of whether there is compensation to the agency or to the
children, expectant mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities
for services rendered:
(a) "Child-placing agency" means an agency which places a child or
children for temporary care, continued care, or for adoption;
(b) "Community facility" means a group care facility operated for
the care of juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185.
A county detention facility that houses juveniles committed to the
department under RCW 13.40.185 pursuant to a contract with the
department is not a community facility;
(c) "Crisis residential center" means an agency which is a
temporary protective residential facility operated to perform the
duties specified in chapter 13.32A RCW, in the manner provided in RCW
74.13.032 through 74.13.036;
(d) "Emergency respite center" is an agency that may be commonly
known as a crisis nursery, that provides emergency and crisis care for
up to seventy-two hours to children who have been admitted by their
parents or guardians to prevent abuse or neglect. Emergency respite
centers may operate for up to twenty-four hours a day, and for up to
seven days a week. Emergency respite centers may provide care for
children ages birth through seventeen, and for persons eighteen through
twenty with developmental disabilities who are admitted with a sibling
or siblings through age seventeen. Emergency respite centers may not
substitute for crisis residential centers or HOPE centers, or any other
services defined under this section, and may not substitute for
services which are required under chapter 13.32A or 13.34 RCW;
(e) "Foster-family home" means an agency which regularly provides
care on a twenty-four hour basis to one or more children, expectant
mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities in the family abode
of the person or persons under whose direct care and supervision the
child, expectant mother, or person with a developmental disability is
placed;
(f) "Group-care facility" means an agency, other than a foster-family home, which is maintained and operated for the care of a group
of children on a twenty-four hour basis;
(g) "HOPE center" means an agency licensed by the secretary to
provide temporary residential placement and other services to street
youth. A street youth may remain in a HOPE center for thirty days
while services are arranged and permanent placement is coordinated. No
street youth may stay longer than thirty days unless approved by the
department and any additional days approved by the department must be
based on the unavailability of a long-term placement option. A street
youth whose parent wants him or her returned to home may remain in a
HOPE center until his or her parent arranges return of the youth, not
longer. All other street youth must have court approval under chapter
13.34 or 13.32A RCW to remain in a HOPE center up to thirty days;
(h) "Maternity service" means an agency which provides or arranges
for care or services to expectant mothers, before or during
confinement, or which provides care as needed to mothers and their
infants after confinement;
(i) "Resource and assessment center" means an agency that provides
short-term emergency and crisis care for a period up to seventy-two
hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays to children who have
been removed from their parent's or guardian's care by child protective
services or law enforcement;
(j) "Responsible living skills program" means an agency licensed by
the secretary that provides residential and transitional living
services to persons ages sixteen to eighteen who are dependent under
chapter 13.34 RCW and who have been unable to live in his or her
legally authorized residence and, as a result, the minor lived outdoors
or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy by the minor.
Dependent minors ages fourteen and fifteen may be eligible if no other
placement alternative is available and the department approves the
placement;
(((j))) (k) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a
community facility.
(2) "Agency" shall not include the following:
(a) Persons related to the child, expectant mother, or person with
developmental disability in the following ways:
(i) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and
including first cousins, second cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons
of preceding generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or
great-great;
(ii) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;
(iii) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as
well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons,
and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state
law;
(iv) Spouses of any persons named in (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection (2)(((a))), even after the marriage is terminated;
(v) Relatives, as named in (a)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this
subsection (2)(((a))), of any half sibling of the child; or
(vi) Extended family members, as defined by the law or custom of
the Indian child's tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, a
person who has reached the age of eighteen and who is the Indian
child's grandparent, aunt or uncle, brother or sister, brother-in-law
or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or second cousin, or
stepparent who provides care in the family abode on a twenty-four-hour
basis to an Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4);
(b) Persons who are legal guardians of the child, expectant mother,
or persons with developmental disabilities;
(c) Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or
children, with or without compensation, where the parent and person
providing care on a twenty-four-hour basis have agreed to the placement
in writing and the state is not providing any payment for the care;
(d) A person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that
provides placement or similar services to exchange students or
international student exchange visitors or persons who have the care of
an exchange student in their home;
(e) A person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that
provides placement or similar services to international children who
have entered the country by obtaining visas that meet the criteria for
medical care as established by the United States citizenship and
immigration services, or persons who have the care of such an
international child in their home;
(f) Schools, including boarding schools, which are engaged
primarily in education, operate on a definite school year schedule,
follow a stated academic curriculum, accept only school-age children
and do not accept custody of children;
(g) Hospitals licensed pursuant to chapter 70.41 RCW when
performing functions defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, nursing homes
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW and assisted living facilities
licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW;
(h) Licensed physicians or lawyers;
(i) Facilities approved and certified under chapter 71A.22 RCW;
(j) Any agency having been in operation in this state ten years
prior to June 8, 1967, and not seeking or accepting moneys or
assistance from any state or federal agency, and is supported in part
by an endowment or trust fund;
(k) Persons who have a child in their home for purposes of
adoption, if the child was placed in such home by a licensed child-placing agency, an authorized public or tribal agency or court or if a
replacement report has been filed under chapter 26.33 RCW and the
placement has been approved by the court;
(l) An agency operated by any unit of local, state, or federal
government or an agency licensed by an Indian tribe pursuant to RCW
74.15.190;
(m) A maximum or medium security program for juvenile offenders
operated by or under contract with the department;
(n) An agency located on a federal military reservation, except
where the military authorities request that such agency be subject to
the licensing requirements of this chapter.
(3) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(4) "Juvenile" means a person under the age of twenty-one who has
been sentenced to a term of confinement under the supervision of the
department under RCW 13.40.185.
(5) "Performance-based contracts" or "contracting" means the
structuring of all aspects of the procurement of services around the
purpose of the work to be performed and the desired results with the
contract requirements set forth in clear, specific, and objective terms
with measurable outcomes. Contracts may also include provisions that
link the performance of the contractor to the level and timing of the
reimbursement.
(6) "Probationary license" means a license issued as a disciplinary
measure to an agency that has previously been issued a full license but
is out of compliance with licensing standards.
(7) "Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard of care
to be maintained by an agency.
(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.
(9) "Street youth" means a person under the age of eighteen who
lives outdoors or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy
by the minor and who is not residing with his or her parent or at his
or her legally authorized residence.
(10) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the state
under RCW 74.15.090 or an Indian tribe under RCW 74.15.190 that has
entered into a performance-based contract with the department to
provide child welfare services.
(11) "Transitional living services" means at a minimum, to the
extent funds are available, the following:
(a) Educational services, including basic literacy and
computational skills training, either in local alternative or public
high schools or in a high school equivalency program that leads to
obtaining a high school equivalency degree;
(b) Assistance and counseling related to obtaining vocational
training or higher education, job readiness, job search assistance, and
placement programs;
(c) Counseling and instruction in life skills such as money
management, home management, consumer skills, parenting, health care,
access to community resources, and transportation and housing options;
(d) Individual and group counseling; and
(e) Establishing networks with federal agencies and state and local
organizations such as the United States department of labor, employment
and training administration programs including the workforce investment
act which administers private industry councils and the job corps;
vocational rehabilitation; and volunteer programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary is authorized to license resource and assessment
centers if the agency meets the following requirements:
(a) There is a demonstrated need in the local community for a
resource and assessment center;
(b) The resource and assessment center will be primarily staffed by
trained volunteers; and
(c) The resource and assessment center demonstrates it is not
financially dependent on reimbursement from the state to operate.
(2) The department may adopt rules to specify licensing
requirements for resource and assessment centers. Rules adopted by the
department shall allow:
(a) A sufficient number of trained volunteers to meet staffing
requirements;
(b) Flexibility in hours of operation and not require the resource
and assessment center to be open if there are no children in its care;
and
(c) The ability to operate in a residential area.
(3) Resource and assessment centers licensed under this section
may:
(a) Provide care for children ages birth through twelve, or for
children ages thirteen through seventeen who have a sibling or siblings
under thirteen years of age who are being admitted to the resource and
assessment center; and
(b) Operate up to twenty-four hours per day, and for up to seven
days per week.
(4) Resource and assessment centers may not be used to address
placement disruptions for children who have been removed from a foster
home because of behavior or safety concerns.

--- END ---