BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.44.026 and 1999 c 130 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Checks in payment for claims pursuant to any health care service
contract for health care services provided by persons licensed or
regulated under chapter((s)) 18.25, 18.29, 18.30, 18.32, 18.53, 18.57,
18.64, 18.71, 18.73, 18.74, 18.83, or 18.79 RCW, as it applies to
registered nurses and advanced registered nurse practitioners, where
the provider is not a participating provider under a contract with the
health care service contractor, shall be made out to both the provider
and the enrolled participant with the provider as the first named
payee, jointly, to require endorsement by each((: PROVIDED, That)).
Payment shall be made in the single name of the enrolled participant if
the enrolled participant as part of his or her claim furnishes clear
and convincing evidence ((of prepayment)) that payment has been made to
the health care service provider((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
Nothing in this section shall preclude a health care service contractor
from voluntarily issuing payment in the single name of the provider.

--- END ---