BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.06.090 and 1989 c 63 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
A part of one district may be transferred and merged with an
adjacent district if the area can be better served by the merged
district. To effect such a merger, a petition, signed by a majority of
the commissioners of the merging district or signed by not less than
fifteen percent of the qualified electors residing in the area to be
merged, shall be filed with the commissioners of the merging district,
if signed by electors, or with the commissioners of the merger district
if signed by commissioners of the merging district. If the
commissioners of the merging district approve the petition, the
petition shall be presented to the commissioners of the merger
district. If the commissioners of the merger district approve the
petition, an election shall be called in the area to be merged.
In the event that either board of fire district commissioners does
not approve the petition, the ((petition may be approved by the
boundary review board of the county or the county legislative authority
of the county in which the area to be merged is situated, and may
approve the merger if it decides the area can be better served by a
merger. If the part of the merging district that is proposed to merge
with the merger district is located in more than one county, the
approval must be by the boundary review board or county legislative
authority of each county. If there is an affirmative decision, an
election shall be called in the area to be merged)) partial merger must
not proceed.
A majority of the votes cast is necessary to approve the transfer.

Sec. 2 RCW 52.06.100 and 1989 c 63 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the partial merger petition has been approved by the
commissioners of the merging district and the merger district and if
three-fifths of the qualified electors in the area to be merged sign a
petition to merge the districts, no election on the question of the
merger is necessary, in which case the auditor or lead auditor shall
return the petition, together with a certificate of sufficiency, to the
board of the merger district. The board of the merger district shall
then adopt a resolution declaring the portion of the district merged in
the same manner and to the same effect as if the same had been
authorized by an election.

Sec. 3 RCW 52.06.140 and 1989 c 63 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
A merger fire protection district located in a single county, that
merged with a merging fire protection district located in another
county or counties, shall be identified by the name of each county in
which the fire protection district is located, listed alphabetically,
followed by a number that is the next highest number available for a
fire protection district in the one of these counties that has the
greatest number of fire protection districts.
This section does not apply to partial mergers under RCW 52.06.090.

--- END ---