BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.08.140 and 2011 c 10 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to vote in any primary, special election, or general
election, a person who is not registered to vote in Washington must:
(a) Submit a registration application no later than ((twenty-nine))
twenty-eight days before the day of the primary, special election, or
general election; or
(b) ((Register)) Submit a registration application electronically
pursuant to RCW 29A.08.123, or in person at the county auditor's office
in his or her county of residence, or an alternate location designated
by the county auditor, no later than ((eight)) eleven days before the
day of the primary, special election, or general election.
(2) A person who is already registered to vote in Washington may
update his or her registration no later than ((twenty-nine)) twenty-eight days before the day of the primary, special election, or general
election to be in effect for that primary, special election, or general
election. A registered voter who fails to transfer his or her
residential address by this deadline may vote according to his or her
previous registration address.

--- END ---