BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.30.040 and 1989 c 431 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a unit of local government is required to make
purchases from the lowest bidder or from the supplier offering the
lowest price for the items desired to be purchased, the unit of local
government may, at its option when awarding a purchase contract, take
into consideration tax revenue it would receive from purchasing the
supplies, materials, or equipment from a supplier located within its
boundaries. The unit of local government must award the purchase
contract to the lowest bidder after such tax revenue has been
considered. However, any local government may allow for preferential
purchase of products made from recycled materials or products that may
be recycled or reused. The tax revenues which units of local
government may consider include sales taxes that the unit of local
government imposes upon the sale of such supplies, materials, or
equipment from the supplier to the unit of local government, and
business and occupation taxes that the unit of local government imposes
upon the supplier that are measured by the gross receipts of the
supplier from such sale. Any unit of local government which considers
tax revenues it would receive from the imposition of taxes upon a
supplier located within its boundaries, shall also consider tax
revenues it would receive from taxes it imposes upon a supplier located
outside its boundaries.
(2) A unit of local government may award a contract to a bidder
submitting the lowest bid before taxes are applied. The unit of local
government must provide notice of its intent to award a contract based
on this method prior to bids being submitted.
(3) As used in this section, the term "unit of local government"
means any county, city, town, metropolitan municipal corporation,
public transit benefit area, county transportation authority, or other
municipal or quasi-municipal corporation authorized to impose sales and
use taxes or business and occupation taxes.

--- END ---