BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 85.38.010 and 1991 c 349 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Governing body" means the board of commissioners, board of
supervisors, or board of directors of a special district.
(2) "Owner of land" means the record owner of at least a majority
ownership interest in a separate and legally created lot or parcel of
land, as determined by the records of the county auditor, except that
if the lot or parcel has been sold under a real estate contract, the
vendee or grantee shall be deemed to be the owner of such land for
purposes of authorizing voting rights. It is assumed, unless shown
otherwise, that the name appearing as the owner of property on the
property tax rolls is the current owner.
(3) "Qualified voter of a special district" means a person ((who is
either)) or legal entity that has owned land in the special district
for a period of not less than thirty days before the election and is:
(a) A natural person who is a voter under general state election
laws((,)) and registered to vote in the state of Washington for a
period of not less than thirty days before the election((, and the
owner of land located in the special district for a period of not less
than thirty days before the election)); (b) ((a corporation or
partnership that has owned land located in the special district for a
period of not less than sixty days before the election)) a natural
person who is a registered voter under the general state election laws
and registered with the district by a legal entity owner as the person
authorized to cast the entity's votes; ((or)) (c) the state, its
agencies, or political subdivisions that own land in the special
district or lands proposed to be annexed into the special district
except that the state, its agencies, and political subdivisions shall
not be eligible to vote to elect a member of the governing board of a
special district; or (d) a natural person who is a registered voter
under the general state election laws and is an executor,
administrator, or guardian for an owner of land within the special
district.
(4) "Special district" means: (a) A diking district; (b) a
drainage district; (c) a diking, drainage, and/or sewerage improvement
district; (d) an intercounty diking and drainage district; (e) a
consolidated diking district, drainage district, diking improvement
district, and/or drainage improvement district; or (f) a flood control
district.
(5) "Special district general election" means the election of a
special district regularly held on the first Tuesday after the first
Monday in February in each even-numbered year at which a member of the
special district governing body is regularly elected.

Sec. 2 RCW 85.38.105 and 2009 c 144 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The owner of land located in a special district who is a
qualified voter of the special district shall receive two votes at any
election. This section does not apply to special flood control
districts consisting of three or more counties.
(2) If multiple undivided interests, other than community property
interests, exist in a lot or parcel and no person owns a majority
undivided interest, the owners of undivided interests at least equal to
a majority interest may designate in writing:
(a) Which owner is eligible to vote and may cast two votes; or
(b) Which two owners are eligible to vote and may cast one vote
each.
(3) If land is owned as community property, each spouse is entitled
to one vote if both spouses otherwise qualify to vote, unless one
spouse designates in writing that the other spouse may cast both votes.
(4) A legal entity, including but not limited to all forms of
corporations, partnerships, limited liability companies, associations,
trusts, estates, and representatives of deceased persons or
governmental ((entity)) entities, shall designate by registering with
the diking district in advance of the deadlines in RCW 85.38.110:
(a) A natural person to cast its two votes; or
(b) Two natural persons to each cast one of its votes.
(5) Except as provided in RCW 85.08.025 and 86.09.377, no owner of
land may cast more than two votes or have more than two votes cast for
him or her in a special district election.

Sec. 3 RCW 85.38.110 and 1991 c 349 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A list of presumed eligible voters shall be prepared and
maintained by each special district. The list shall include: (a) The
assessor's tax number for each lot or parcel in the district((,)); (b)
the name or the names of the owners of such lots and parcels and their
mailing address((,)); (c) the extent of the ownership interest of such
persons, and if such persons are natural persons, whether they are
known to be registered voters in the state of Washington; and (d) the
natural person or persons designated to cast the votes for a legal
entity.
(2) Whenever such a list is prepared, the district shall attempt to
notify each owner of the requirements necessary to establish voting
authority to vote. Whenever lots or parcels in the district are sold,
the district shall attempt to notify the purchasers of the requirements
necessary to establish voting authority.
(3) Each special district shall provide a copy of this list, and
any revised list, to the auditor of the county within which all or the
largest portion of the special district is located. The special
district must compile the list of eligible voters and provide it to the
county auditor by the first day of November preceding the special
district general election. In the event the special district does not
provide the county auditor with the list of qualified voters by this
date, the county auditor shall compile the list and charge the special
district for the costs required for its preparation. The county
auditor shall not be held responsible for any errors in the list.

--- END ---