BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.30.030 and 1995 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
No person may represent himself or herself as a licensed denturist
or use any title or description of services without applying for
licensure, meeting the required qualifications, and being licensed as
a denturist by the ((department)) board, unless otherwise exempted by
this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.30.065 and 2002 c 160 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall:
(1) Determine the qualifications of persons applying for licensure
under this chapter;
(2) Prescribe, administer, and determine the requirements for
examinations under this chapter and establish a passing grade for
licensure under this chapter;
(3) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to carry out the provisions
of this chapter ((in consultation and in agreement with the
secretary));
(4) Have authority to provide requirements for continuing
competency as a condition of license renewal by rule ((in agreement
with the secretary)); and
(5) Evaluate and approve those schools from which graduation is
accepted as proof of an applicant's completion of coursework
requirements for licensure.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.30.090 and 2002 c 160 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary shall issue a license to practice denturism to an
applicant who submits a completed application, pays the appropriate
fees, and meets the following requirements:
(1) A person currently licensed to practice denturism under
statutory provisions of another state, territory of the United States,
District of Columbia, or Puerto Rico, with substantially equivalent
licensing standards to this chapter shall be licensed without
examination upon providing the ((department)) board with the following:
(a) Proof of successfully passing a written and clinical
examination for denturism in a state, territory of the United States,
District of Columbia, or Puerto Rico, that the board has determined has
substantially equivalent licensing standards as those in this chapter,
including but not limited to both the written and clinical
examinations; and
(b) An affidavit from the licensing agency where the person is
licensed or certified attesting to the fact of the person's licensure
or certification.
(2) A person graduating from a formal denturism program shall be
licensed if he or she:
(a) Documents successful completion of formal training with a major
course of study in denturism of not less than two years in duration at
an educational institution approved by the board; and
(b) Passes a written and clinical examination approved by the
board.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.30.095 and 2011 c 32 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the
((secretary)) board determines that the military training or experience
is not substantially equivalent to the standards of the state.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.30.130 and 1996 c 191 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary)) board shall establish by rule the requirements
for renewal of licenses to practice denturism, but shall not increase
the licensure requirements provided in this chapter. The secretary
shall establish administrative procedures, administrative requirements,
and fees for license periods and renewals as provided in RCW 43.70.250
and 43.70.280.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.30.135 and 1995 c 336 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW, shall govern the
issuance and denial of licenses, unauthorized practice, and the
discipline of persons licensed under this chapter. The ((secretary))
board shall be the disciplinary authority under this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.130.040 and 2012 c 208 s 10, 2012 c 153 s 16, 2012
c 137 s 19, and 2012 c 23 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iii) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(iv) Massage practitioners and businesses licensed under chapter
18.108 RCW;
(v) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vi) East Asian medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06
RCW;
(vii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(viii) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(ix) Hypnotherapists and agency affiliated counselors registered
and advisors and counselors certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(x) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, mental health
counselor associates, marriage and family therapists, marriage and
family therapist associates, social workers, social work associates--advanced, and social work associates -- independent clinical under
chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xi) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xii) Nursing assistants registered or certified or medication
assistants endorsed under chapter 18.88A RCW;
(xiii) Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xiv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xv) Chemical dependency professionals and chemical dependency
professional trainees certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;
(xvi) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex
offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;
(xvii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xviii) ((Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xix))) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200
RCW;
(((xx))) (xix) Surgical technologists registered under chapter
18.215 RCW;
(((xxi))) (xx) Recreational therapists under chapter 18.230 RCW;
(((xxii))) (xxi) Animal massage practitioners certified under
chapter 18.240 RCW;
(((xxiii))) (xxii) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250
RCW;
(((xxiv))) (xxiii) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B
RCW;
(((xxv))) (xxiv) Genetic counselors licensed under chapter 18.290
RCW; and
(((xxvi))) (xxv) Reflexologists certified under chapter 18.108 RCW;
and
(((xxvii))) (xxvi) Medical assistants-certified, medical
assistants-hemodialysis technician, medical assistants-phlebotomist,
and medical assistants-registered certified and registered under
chapter 18.360 RCW.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW,
licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW, and
certifications issued under chapter 18.350 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW;
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW; ((and))
(xv) The board of naturopathy established in chapter 18.36A RCW;
and
(xvi) the board of denturists established in chapter 18.30 RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses.
The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to
conditions.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the uniform
disciplinary act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.130.040 and 2012 c 208 s 10, 2012 c 153 s 17, 2012
c 137 s 19, and 2012 c 23 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iii) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(iv) Massage practitioners and businesses licensed under chapter
18.108 RCW;
(v) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vi) East Asian medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06
RCW;
(vii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(viii) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(ix) Hypnotherapists and agency affiliated counselors registered
and advisors and counselors certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(x) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, mental health
counselor associates, marriage and family therapists, marriage and
family therapist associates, social workers, social work associates--advanced, and social work associates -- independent clinical under
chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xi) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xii) Nursing assistants registered or certified or medication
assistants endorsed under chapter 18.88A RCW;
(xiii) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xiv) Chemical dependency professionals and chemical dependency
professional trainees certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;
(xv) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex
offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;
(xvi) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or RCW
18.71.205;
(xvii) ((Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xviii))) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200
RCW;
(((xix))) (xviii) Surgical technologists registered under chapter
18.215 RCW;
(((xx))) (xix) Recreational therapists under chapter 18.230 RCW;
(((xxi))) (xx) Animal massage practitioners certified under chapter
18.240 RCW;
(((xxii))) (xxi) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250
RCW;
(((xxiii))) (xxii) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B
RCW;
(((xxiv))) (xxiii) Genetic counselors licensed under chapter 18.290
RCW; ((and
(xxv))) (xxiv) Reflexolgists certified under chapter 18.108 RCW;
and
(((xxvi))) (xxv) Medical assistants-certified, medical assistants-hemodialysis technician, medical assistants-phlebotomist, and medical
assistants-registered certified and registered under chapter 18.360
RCW.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW,
licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW, and
certifications issued under chapter 18.350 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW;
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW; ((and))
(xv) The board of naturopathy established in chapter 18.36A RCW;
and
(xvi) The board of denturists established in chapter 18.30 RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses.
The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to
conditions.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the uniform
disciplinary act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 7 of this act expires July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 8 of this act takes effect July 1,
2016.

--- END ---