BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.30.010 and 2002 c 160 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the Washington state board of denturists.
(2) "Denture" means a removable full or partial upper or lower
dental appliance to be worn in the mouth to replace missing natural
teeth.
(3) "Denturist" means a person licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of denturism.
(4) "Department" means the department of health.
(5) "Practice of denturism" means:
(a) Making, placing, constructing, altering, reproducing, or
repairing a denture; ((and))
(b) Taking impressions and furnishing or supplying a denture
directly to a person or advising the use of a denture, and maintaining
a facility for the same;
(c) Making, placing, constructing, altering, reproducing, or
repairing the following nonorthodontic removable oral devices,
excluding devices intended to treat obstructive sleep apnea or to treat
temporomandibular joint dysfunction, where accompanied by written
encouragement to have regular dental checkups with a licensed dentist:
(i) Bruxism devices;
(ii) Sports mouth guards;
(iii) Removable cosmetic appliances, regardless of whether the
patient is missing teeth; and
(iv) Snoring devices, only after a physician has ruled out snoring
associated with sleep breathing disorders, including obstructive sleep
apnea; and
(d) Providing teeth whitening services, including fabricating
whitening trays, providing whitening solutions determined to be safe
for public use, and providing required follow-up care and instructions
for use of the trays and solutions at home.
(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.30 RCW
to read as follows:
Prior to providing the services mentioned in RCW 18.30.010(5) (c)
and (d), a licensed denturist must provide documentation to the board
that he or she received education and training on providing the
services. The board must, by rule, specify the education and training
necessary to provide the services mentioned in RCW 18.30.010(5) (c) and
(d).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---