BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.33.075 and 1995 c 301 s 41 are each amended to read
as follows:
Following conclusion of the hearing, and prior to the beginning of
the fiscal year, the legislative body shall make such adjustments and
changes as it deems necessary or proper and after determining the
allowance in each item, department, classification and fund, and shall
by ordinance, adopt the budget in its final form and content.
Appropriations shall be limited to the total estimated revenues
contained therein including the amount to be raised by ad valorem taxes
and the unencumbered fund balances estimated to be available at the
close of the current fiscal year. Such ordinances may adopt the final
budget by reference: PROVIDED, That the ordinance adopting such budget
shall set forth in summary form the totals of estimated revenues and
appropriations for each separate fund and the aggregate totals for all
such funds combined.
((A complete copy of the final budget as adopted shall be
transmitted to the association of Washington cities.))

Sec. 2 RCW 35.34.120 and 1995 c 301 s 45 are each amended to read
as follows:
Following conclusion of the hearing, and prior to the beginning of
the fiscal biennium, the legislative body shall make such adjustments
and changes as it deems necessary or proper and, after determining the
allowance in each item, department, classification, and fund, shall by
ordinance adopt the budget in its final form and content.
Appropriations shall be limited to the total estimated revenues
contained therein including the amount to be raised by ad valorem taxes
and the unencumbered fund balances estimated to be available at the
close of the current fiscal biennium. Such ordinances may adopt the
final budget by reference. However, the ordinance adopting the budget
shall set forth in summary form the totals of estimated revenues and
appropriations for each separate fund and the aggregate totals for all
such funds combined.
((A complete copy of the final budget as adopted shall be
transmitted to the state auditor and to the association of Washington
cities.))

Sec. 3 RCW 35.34.130 and 1995 c 301 s 46 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislative authority of a city or town having adopted the
provisions of this chapter shall provide by ordinance for a mid-biennial review and modification of the biennial budget. The ordinance
shall provide that such review and modification shall occur no sooner
than eight months after the start nor later than conclusion of the
first year of the fiscal biennium. The chief administrative officer
shall prepare the proposed budget modification and shall provide for
publication of notice of hearings consistent with publication of
notices for adoption of other city or town ordinances. City or town
ordinances providing for a mid-biennium review and modification shall
establish procedures for distribution of the proposed modification to
members of the city or town legislative authority, procedures for
making copies available to the public, and shall provide for public
hearings on the proposed budget modification. The budget modification
shall be by ordinance approved in the same manner as are other
ordinances of the city or town.
((A complete copy of the budget modification as adopted shall be
transmitted to the state auditor and to the association of Washington
cities.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Any city or town is authorized to accept credit cards, charge
cards, debit cards, smart cards, stored value cards, federal wire, and
automatic clearinghouse system transactions, or other electronic
communication, for any payment of any kind including, but not limited
to, taxes, fines, interest, penalties, special assessments, fees,
rates, charges, or moneys due cities or towns. A payer desiring to pay
by a credit card, charge card, debit card, smart card, stored value
card, federal wire, automatic clearinghouse system, or other electronic
communication must be assessed a convenience fee to cover the cost of
processing the transaction in an amount determined by the city or town.
The city or town's cost determination of the convenience fee must be
based upon costs incurred by the city or town and may not, in any
event, exceed the additional direct costs incurred by the city or town
to accept the specific form of payment utilized by the payer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 36.28.060 (Duplicate receipts -- Penalties) and 2003 c 53 s 202 & 1963 c 4 s 36.28.060 are each
repealed.

--- END ---