BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.48.465 and 2009 c 456 s 6 and 2009 c 249 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish fees to collect expenses for
issuing and administering each class of permits under RCW 90.48.160,
90.48.162, and 90.48.260. An initial fee schedule shall be established
by rule and be adjusted no more often than once every two years. This
fee schedule shall apply to all permits, regardless of date of
issuance, and fees shall be assessed prospectively. All fees charged
shall be based on factors relating to the complexity of permit issuance
and compliance and may be based on pollutant loading and toxicity and
be designed to encourage recycling and the reduction of the quantity of
pollutants. Fees shall be established in amounts to fully recover and
not to exceed expenses incurred by the department in processing permit
applications and modifications, monitoring and evaluating compliance
with permits, conducting inspections, securing laboratory analysis of
samples taken during inspections, reviewing plans and documents
directly related to operations of permittees, overseeing performance of
delegated pretreatment programs, and supporting the overhead expenses
that are directly related to these activities.
(2)(a) The annual fee paid by a municipality, as defined in 33
U.S.C. Sec. 1362, for all domestic wastewater facility permits issued
under RCW 90.48.162 and 90.48.260 ((shall not exceed the total of)) is
the greater of:
(i) A minimum fee adopted by the department by rule; or
(ii) A maximum ((of eighteen)) not to exceed twenty cents per month
per residence or residential equivalent contributing to the
municipality's wastewater system.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, the limitation on monthly per residence
or residential equivalent paid by a municipality in (a)(ii) of this
subsection rises each year in accordance with the fiscal growth factor
as provided in chapter 43.135 RCW.
(3) The department shall ensure that indirect dischargers do not
pay twice for the administrative expense of a permit. Accordingly,
administrative expenses for permits issued by a municipality under RCW
90.48.165 are not recoverable by the department.
(4) In establishing fees, the department shall consider the
economic impact of fees on small dischargers and the economic impact of
fees on public entities required to obtain permits for storm water
runoff and shall provide appropriate adjustments.
(5) The fee for an individual permit issued for a dairy farm as
defined under chapter 90.64 RCW shall be fifty cents per animal unit up
to one thousand two hundred fourteen dollars for fiscal year 1999. The
fee for a general permit issued for a dairy farm as defined under
chapter 90.64 RCW shall be fifty cents per animal unit up to eight
hundred fifty dollars for fiscal year 1999. Thereafter, these fees may
rise in accordance with the fiscal growth factor as provided in chapter
43.135 RCW.
(6) ((The fee for)) A general permit or an individual permit
developed solely as a result of the federal court of appeals decision
in Headwaters, Inc. v. Talent Irrigation District, 243 F.3rd 526 (9th
Cir. 2001) ((is limited, until June 30, 2003, to a maximum of three
hundred dollars. Such a permit)) is required only, and as long as, the
interpretation of this court decision is not overturned or modified by
future court rulings, administrative rule making, or clarification of
scope by the United States environmental protection agency or
legislative action. In such a case the department shall take
appropriate action to rescind or modify these permits.
(7) All fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the
water quality permit account hereby created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the account may be appropriated only for purposes of
administering permits under RCW 90.46.220, 90.48.160, 90.48.162, and
90.48.260.
(8) The department shall present a biennial progress report on the
use of moneys from the account to the legislature. The report will be
due December 31st of odd-numbered years. The report shall consist of
information on fees collected, actual expenses incurred, and
anticipated expenses for the current and following fiscal years.

--- END ---