BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that low-income youth
are not only at higher risk of dropping out of school, they are also
less likely to have dependable access to sufficient and nutritious
food. Innovative partnerships between community-based organizations,
schools, food banks, and farms or gardens offer promise to address both
dropout prevention and food security for such youth, as well as
enhancing health and nutrition in the surrounding community. These
types of partnerships should be supported as pilot projects and
carefully evaluated to assure that desired outcomes are met and to
identify opportunities for expansion and replication in other parts of
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The dropout prevention through farm engagement pilot project is
established for a three-year period beginning in the 2013-14 school
year.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
select two pilot projects from school districts that agree to partner
with community-based organizations, food banks, and farms or gardens to
establish an alternative high school program targeted primarily to at-risk youth as provided in subsection (3) of this section. One of the
selected projects must be a currently operating program with a record
of success in engaging low-income and disengaged youth. The second
selected project must create a new program in a different community.
One of the projects must be selected from east of the crest of the
Cascade mountains and one must be selected from west of the crest of
the Cascade mountains. The selected projects must operate near farm-related activities and may include partnerships with farm-oriented
student clubs and organizations. Participating in this pilot project
may be incorporated into a student's culminating project to meet any
community service requirements.
(3) Dropout prevention through farm engagement pilot projects must
have the following characteristics:
(a) Primarily target low-income and disengaged youth who have
dropped out or are at risk of dropping out of high school;
(b) Provide participating youth with opportunities for community
service such as building food gardens for low-income families and work-based learning and employment training during the school year and
during the summer through a farm or garden program;
(c) Provide participating youth with opportunities to earn core
credits and elective credits toward high school graduation, including
but not limited to science, health, and career and technical education
credits;
(d) Offer youth development support and services to participating
youth including social emotional learning, counseling, leadership
training, and career and college guidance; and
(e) Improve food security for participating youth and the community
through the farm or garden program.
(4) For each annual average full-time equivalent student enrolled
in the pilot project, including enrollment during the summer months,
the participating school district shall receive a basic education
allocation as calculated under RCW 28A.150.260 and the omnibus
appropriations act for a skill center student. The allocation under
this subsection does not apply to a student's enrollment in courses of
study that are not part of the pilot project. The allocations provided
for the pilot project based on the basic education allocation as
calculated under RCW 28A.150.260 and the omnibus appropriations act for
a skills center student may not be used to provide participating youth
with stipends. No funds from levies under RCW 84.52.0531 may be used
to provide participating youth with stipends. Any stipends that are
provided to participating youth through other funds must be prorated
based on attendance, and youth who are absent for a day may not receive
any stipend amount for that day.
(5) The purpose of the dropout prevention through farm engagement
pilot project is to measure the effectiveness and cost-benefit of a
particular alternative high school program on improving outcomes for
at-risk youth. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall conduct a rigorous evaluation after the pilot projects have been
operating for two years, including analysis of a statistical comparison
group of students who did not participate in the project. The office
shall submit the evaluation results to the education committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2015, including recommendations for whether
the pilot projects should be continued or replicated in other parts of
the state.
(6) Outcomes to be measured under the pilot project include:
(a) Student GPA overall and in science;
(b) Number of earned credits in core courses and elective courses;
(c) Incidence of discipline issues;
(d) School attendance rates;
(e) High school graduation and GED attainment;
(f) Student health and nutrition;
(g) Acreage used for fresh produce;
(h) Volume of produce produced and made available to students,
families, school district food programs, and community food banks; and
(i) Hours of community service activity by students.
(7) This section expires August 31, 2016.

--- END ---