BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.04.130 and 1987 c 341 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A development right, easement, covenant, restriction, or other
right, or any interest less than the fee simple, to protect, preserve,
maintain, improve, restore, limit the future use of, or conserve for
open space purposes, any land or improvement on the land, whether the
right or interest be appurtenant or in gross, may be held or acquired
by any state agency, federal agency, county, city, town, federally
recognized Indian tribe, or metropolitan municipal corporation,
nonprofit historic preservation corporation, or nonprofit nature
conservancy corporation. Any such right or interest ((shall))
constitutes and ((be)) is classified as real property. All instruments
for the conveyance thereof ((shall)) must be substantially in the form
required by law for the conveyance of any land or other real property.
((As used in this section,)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Nonprofit nature conservancy corporation" means an
organization which qualifies as being tax exempt under 26 U.S.C.
section 501(c)(3) (of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1954,
as amended) as it existed on June 25, 1976, and which has as one of its
principal purposes the conducting or facilitating of scientific
research; the conserving of natural resources, including but not
limited to biological resources, for the general public; or the
conserving of natural areas including but not limited to wildlife or
plant habitat.
((As used in this section,)) (2) "Nonprofit historic preservation
corporation" means an organization which qualifies as being tax exempt
under 26 U.S.C. section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue
Code of 1954, as amended, and which has as one of its principal
purposes the conducting or facilitating of historic preservation
activities within the state, including conservation or preservation of
historic sites, districts, buildings, and artifacts.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.34.210 and 1993 c 248 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any county, city, town, metropolitan park district, metropolitan
municipal corporation, nonprofit historic preservation corporation as
defined in RCW 64.04.130, federally recognized Indian tribe, or
nonprofit nature conservancy corporation or association, as such are
defined in RCW 84.34.250, may acquire by purchase, gift, grant,
bequest, devise, lease, or otherwise, except by eminent domain, the fee
simple or any lesser interest, development right, easement, covenant,
or other contractual right necessary to protect, preserve, maintain,
improve, restore, limit the future use of, or otherwise conserve,
selected open space land, farm and agricultural land, and timber land
as such are defined in chapter 84.34 RCW for public use or enjoyment.
Among interests that may be so acquired are mineral rights. Any
county, city, town, metropolitan park district, metropolitan municipal
corporation, nonprofit historic preservation corporation as defined in
RCW 64.04.130, or nonprofit nature conservancy corporation or
association, as such are defined in RCW 84.34.250, may acquire such
property for the purpose of conveying or leasing the property back to
its original owner or other person under such covenants or other
contractual arrangements as will limit the future use of the property
in accordance with the purposes of chapter 243, Laws of 1971 ex. sess.

--- END ---