BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.420 and 2003 c 111 s 147 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever state officers or measures are voted upon at a state
primary or general election held in an odd-numbered year under RCW
((29A.04.320)) 29A.04.321, the state of Washington shall assume a
prorated share of the costs of that state primary or general election.
(2) Whenever a primary or vacancy election is held to fill a
vacancy in the position of United States senator or United States
representative under chapter 29A.28 RCW, the state of Washington shall
assume a prorated share of the costs of that primary or vacancy
election.
(3) The state shall reimburse counties for the cost of return
postage on ballot return envelopes for primary and general elections
held in even-numbered years, and for special elections to fill
unexpired terms of statewide elected officials and state legislators.
(4) The county auditor shall apportion the state's share of these
expenses when prorating election costs under RCW 29A.04.410 and shall
file such expense claims with the secretary of state.
(((4))) (5) The secretary of state shall include in his or her
biennial budget requests sufficient funds to carry out this section.
Reimbursements for election costs shall be from appropriations
specifically provided by law for that purpose.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.40.091 and 2011 c 349 s 17, 2011 c 348 s 3, 2011
c 182 s 1, and 2011 c 10 s 39 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) The county auditor shall send each voter a ballot, a security
envelope in which to conceal the ballot after voting, a larger envelope
in which to return the security envelope, a declaration that the voter
must sign, and instructions on how to obtain information about the
election, how to mark the ballot, and how to return the ballot to the
county auditor. The return envelope must include prepaid postage for
the primary and general election in even-numbered years, and for
special elections to fill unexpired terms of statewide elected
officials and state legislators.
(2) The voter must swear under penalty of perjury that he or she
meets the qualifications to vote, and has not voted in any other
jurisdiction at this election. The declaration must clearly inform the
voter that it is illegal to vote if he or she is not a United States
citizen; it is illegal to vote if he or she has been convicted of a
felony and has not had his or her voting rights restored; and it is
illegal to cast a ballot or sign a ((return envelope)) ballot
declaration on behalf of another voter. The ballot materials must
provide space for the voter ((must)) to sign the declaration, indicate
the date on which the ballot was voted, and ((sign the declaration.
The ballot materials must also contain a space so that the voter may))
include a telephone number.
(3) For overseas and service voters, the signed declaration ((on
the return envelope)) constitutes the equivalent of a voter
registration for the election or primary ((for which the ballot has
been issued)). Return envelopes for overseas and service voters must
enable the ballot to be returned postage free if mailed through the
United States postal service, United States armed forces postal
service, or the postal service of a United States foreign embassy under
39 U.S.C. 3406.
(4) The voter must be instructed to either return the ballot to the
county auditor no later than 8:00 p.m. the day of the election or
primary, or mail the ballot to the county auditor with a postmark no
later than the day of the election or primary. Service and overseas
voters must be provided with instructions and a ((secrecy cover))
privacy sheet for returning the ballot and signed declaration by fax or
e-mail. A voted ballot and signed declaration returned by fax or e-mail must be received by 8:00 p.m. on the day of the election or
primary.

--- END ---