BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature is committed to granting
equal access to voter registration for all voters. The legislature
recognizes the importance of fostering lifelong civic participation.
Currently, many young people are denied access to the most popular form
of voter registration, motor voter. More than forty percent of new
voters are registered through motor voter, but this easy and popular
form of voter registration is not available to young people if they
obtained their driver's license at the age of sixteen or seventeen.
Denial of motor voter to so many young voters has contributed to lower
voter registration levels in the youngest voter age groups. In
Washington, according to the United States census bureau, only 50.8
percent of eligible citizens between the ages of eighteen and twenty-four are registered to vote, compared to sixty-eight to eighty percent
for other age groups. Studies show that young adults who vote are
likely to continue to do so throughout adulthood. The legislature
recognizes that these representational disparities in registration
rates and voting rates within the youth electorate will improve by
enacting election policies that engage all young citizens. Therefore,
the legislature declares that this act, allowing eligible youth at
least sixteen years of age to preregister to vote, is intended to
increase voter turnout in young adults.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.155 and 2013 c 11 s 90 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before issuing an original license or identicard or renewing a
license or identicard under this chapter, the licensing agent shall
determine if the applicant wants to preregister or register to vote or
update his or her voter registration by asking the following question:

"Do you want to preregister or register to vote or update your
voter registration?"

If the applicant chooses to preregister, register, or update a
registration, the agent shall ask the following:

(1) "Are you a United States citizen?"
(2) "Are you ((or will you be eighteen)) at least sixteen years of
age ((on or before the next election))?"

If the applicant answers in the affirmative to both questions, the
agent shall then submit the preregistration, registration, or update.
If the applicant answers in the negative to either question, the agent
shall not submit ((a voter registration)) an application. Information
provided for preregistration under this section is exempt from public
inspection and copying pursuant to RCW 42.56.250.
(2) The department shall establish a procedure that substantially
meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section when
permitting an applicant to renew a license or identicard by mail or by
electronic commerce.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.08.710 and 2005 c 246 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county auditor shall have custody of the original voter
registration records for each county. The original voter registration
form must be filed without regard to precinct and is considered
confidential and unavailable for public inspection and copying. An
automated file of all registered voters must be maintained pursuant to
RCW 29A.08.125. An auditor may maintain the automated file in lieu of
filing or maintaining the original voter registration forms if the
automated file includes all of the information from the original voter
registration forms including, but not limited to, a retrievable
facsimile of each voter's signature.
(2) The following information contained in voter registration
records or files regarding a voter or a group of voters is available
for public inspection and copying, except as provided in RCW 40.24.060:
The voter's name, address, political jurisdiction, gender, date of
birth, voting record, date of registration, and registration number.
The information contained in voter preregistration applications under
RCW 46.20.155 is exempt from public inspection and copying. No other
information from voter registration records or files is available for
public inspection or copying.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.56.250 and 2010 c 257 s 1 and 2010 c 128 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following employment and licensing information is exempt from
public inspection and copying under this chapter:
(1) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used
to administer a license, employment, or academic examination;
(2) All applications for public employment, including the names of
applicants, resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect
to an applicant;
(3) The residential addresses, residential telephone numbers,
personal wireless telephone numbers, personal electronic mail
addresses, social security numbers, and emergency contact information
of employees or volunteers of a public agency, and the names, dates of
birth, residential addresses, residential telephone numbers, personal
wireless telephone numbers, personal electronic mail addresses, social
security numbers, and emergency contact information of dependents of
employees or volunteers of a public agency that are held by any public
agency in personnel records, public employment related records, or
volunteer rosters, or are included in any mailing list of employees or
volunteers of any public agency. For purposes of this subsection,
"employees" includes independent provider home care workers as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240;
(4) Information that identifies a person who, while an agency
employee: (a) Seeks advice, under an informal process established by
the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or her rights in
connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW
against the person; and (b) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed;
(5) Investigative records compiled by an employing agency
conducting an active and ongoing investigation of a possible unfair
practice under chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of other
federal, state, or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment;
(6) Criminal history records checks for board staff finalist
candidates conducted pursuant to RCW 43.33A.025;
(7) ((Except as provided in RCW 47.64.220, salary and benefit
information for maritime employees collected from private employers
under RCW 47.64.220(1) and described in RCW 47.64.220(2))) Information
contained in voter preregistration records under RCW 46.20.155; and
(8) Photographs and month and year of birth in the personnel files
of employees and workers of criminal justice agencies as defined in RCW
10.97.030. The news media, as defined in RCW 5.68.010(5), shall have
access to the photographs and full date of birth. For the purposes of
this subsection, news media does not include any person or organization
of persons in the custody of a criminal justice agency as defined in
RCW 10.97.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act may be known and cited as the young
voter registration equality act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect January 1, 2015.

--- END ---