BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.60A.185 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 924 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The veterans innovations program account is created in the
state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
purposes of the veterans innovations program. ((During the 2009-2011
fiscal biennium, the funds may be used for contracting for veterans'
claims assistance services.))
(2)(a) If the legislature increases future appropriations for the
veterans innovations program above the amounts provided in the 2011-2013 omnibus appropriations act, the additional amounts may be used to
provide program grants to any veteran, as defined in RCW 73.08.005.
Applicants for such grants, other than members of the Washington
national guard and reservists eligible under RCW 43.60A.165, must show
evidence of local matching resources before the grant may be awarded.
(b) If the legislature does not increase future appropriations for
the veterans innovations program above the amounts provided in the
2011-2013 omnibus appropriations act, the department shall continue to
provide program grants exclusively to members of the Washington
national guard and reservists eligible under RCW 43.60A.165.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.131.405 (Veterans innovations program -- Termination) and
2006 c 343 s 10; and
(2) RCW 43.131.406 (Veterans innovations program -- Repeal) and 2010
1st sp.s. c 37 s 925, 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 116, & 2006 c 343 s 11.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The sum of eight hundred sixty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2015, from the veterans innovations
program account-state to the department of veterans affairs for the
purposes of the veterans innovations program.
(2) Fifty thousand dollars of the veterans innovations program
appropriation in this section is for the purposes of section 1(2)(a) of
this act.

--- END ---