BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and subject to the
provisions in this section, two or more retail licensees of the same
type may agree to group purchase wine or spirits from a licensed
distributor, distiller, rectifier, importer, or a certificate of
approval holder. The purchasing group shall use a designated agent to
conduct its group purchase using a master purchase order.
(2)(a) The designated agent must have a retail license of the same
type as the licensees of the purchasing group and must be operating a
retail business under that license.
(b) A designated agent may not act as an agent for more than one
purchasing group and a purchasing group may not have more than one
designated agent to conduct its group purchases.
(c) The purchasing group shall submit the name of the designated
agent to the board.
(3)(a) The designated agent shall keep a master purchase order.
Each retail licensee of the purchasing group shall provide the
designated agent with a signed order setting forth the retail
licensee's order. Each retail licensee's signed order must be attached
to or made a part of the designated agent's master purchase order.
(b) Each retail licensee of the purchasing group is responsible for
full payment of its own order as set forth in the signed order. Each
retail licensee is responsible for accounting for any of its own
product loss that might occur.
(4)(a) The wine and spirits purchased by the purchasing group may
be delivered to and stored in a single warehouse facility or single
licensed premises or may be delivered to multiple licensed facilities
if the parties to the contract agree.
(b) The product is deemed to have been received by each retail
licensee of the purchasing group upon delivery of the order to the
single warehouse facility or single licensed premises.
(c) Delivery must be made within two consecutive business days from
the date of the purchase. "Business days" may include Saturdays,
Sundays, and holidays if the parties to the contract agree.

--- END ---