BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.225.010 and 1998 c 244 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All parents in this state of any child ((eight)) six years of
age and under eighteen years of age shall cause such child to attend
the public school of the district in which the child resides and such
child shall have the responsibility to and therefore shall attend for
the full time when such school may be in session unless:
(a) The child is attending an approved private school for the same
time or is enrolled in an extension program as provided in RCW
28A.195.010(4);
(b) The child is receiving home-based instruction as provided in
subsection (4) of this section;
(c) The child is attending an education center as provided in
chapter 28A.205 RCW;
(d) The school district superintendent of the district in which the
child resides shall have excused such child from attendance because the
child is physically or mentally unable to attend school, is attending
a residential school operated by the department of social and health
services, is incarcerated in an adult correctional facility, or has
been temporarily excused upon the request of his or her parents for
purposes agreed upon by the school authorities and the parent:
PROVIDED, That such excused absences shall not be permitted if deemed
to cause a serious adverse effect upon the student's educational
progress: PROVIDED FURTHER, That students excused for such temporary
absences may be claimed as full time equivalent students to the extent
they would otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 and shall not affect school district
compliance with the provisions of RCW 28A.150.220; or
(e) The child is sixteen years of age or older and:
(i) The child is regularly and lawfully employed and either the
parent agrees that the child should not be required to attend school or
the child is emancipated in accordance with chapter 13.64 RCW;
(ii) The child has already met graduation requirements in
accordance with state board of education rules and regulations; or
(iii) The child has received a certificate of educational
competence under rules and regulations established by the state board
of education under RCW 28A.305.190.
(2) A parent for the purpose of this chapter means a parent,
guardian, or person having legal custody of a child.
(3) An approved private school for the purposes of this chapter and
chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be one approved under regulations established
by the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.305.130.
(4) For the purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW,
instruction shall be home-based if it consists of planned and
supervised instructional and related educational activities, including
a curriculum and instruction in the basic skills of occupational
education, science, mathematics, language, social studies, history,
health, reading, writing, spelling, and the development of an
appreciation of art and music, provided for a number of hours
equivalent to the total annual program hours per grade level
established for approved private schools under RCW 28A.195.010 and
28A.195.040 and if such activities are:
(a) Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only
and are supervised by a certificated person. A certificated person for
purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be a person
certified under chapter 28A.410 RCW. For purposes of this section,
"supervised by a certificated person" means: The planning by the
certificated person and the parent of objectives consistent with this
subsection; a minimum each month of an average of one contact hour per
week with the child being supervised by the certificated person; and
evaluation of such child's progress by the certificated person. The
number of children supervised by the certificated person shall not
exceed thirty for purposes of this subsection; or
(b) Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only
and who has either earned forty-five college level quarter credit hours
or its equivalent in semester hours or has completed a course in home-based instruction at a postsecondary institution or a vocational-technical institute; or
(c) Provided by a parent who is deemed sufficiently qualified to
provide home-based instruction by the superintendent of the local
school district in which the child resides.
(5) The legislature recognizes that home-based instruction is less
structured and more experiential than the instruction normally provided
in a classroom setting. Therefore, the provisions of subsection (4) of
this section relating to the nature and quantity of instructional and
related educational activities shall be liberally construed.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.225.020 and 2009 c 266 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a child required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010
fails to attend school without valid justification, the public school
in which the child is enrolled shall:
(a) Inform the child's custodial parent, parents, or guardian by a
notice in writing or by telephone whenever the child has failed to
attend school after one unexcused absence within any month during the
current school year. School officials shall inform the parent of the
potential consequences of additional unexcused absences. If the
custodial parent, parents, or guardian is not fluent in English, the
preferred practice is to provide this information in a language in
which the custodial parent, parents, or guardian is fluent;
(b) Schedule a conference or conferences with the custodial parent,
parents, or guardian and child at a time reasonably convenient for all
persons included for the purpose of analyzing the causes of the child's
absences after two unexcused absences within any month during the
current school year. If a regularly scheduled parent-teacher
conference day is to take place within thirty days of the second
unexcused absence, then the school district may schedule this
conference on that day; and
(c) Take steps to eliminate or reduce the child's absences. These
steps shall include, where appropriate, adjusting the child's school
program or school or course assignment, providing more individualized
or remedial instruction, providing appropriate vocational courses or
work experience, referring the child to a community truancy board, if
available, requiring the child to attend an alternative school or
program, or assisting the parent or child to obtain supplementary
services that might eliminate or ameliorate the cause or causes for the
absence from school. If the child's parent does not attend the
scheduled conference, the conference may be conducted with the student
and school official. However, the parent shall be notified of the
steps to be taken to eliminate or reduce the child's absence.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, an "unexcused absence" means that
a child:
(a) Has failed to attend the majority of hours or periods in an
average school day or has failed to comply with a more restrictive
school district policy; and
(b) Has failed to meet the school district's policy for excused
absences.
(3) If a child transfers from one school district to another during
the school year, the receiving school or school district shall include
the unexcused absences accumulated at the previous school or from the
previous school district for purposes of this section((,)) and RCW
28A.225.030((, and 28A.225.015)).

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.225.025 and 2009 c 266 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter, "community truancy board" means
a board composed of members of the local community in which the child
attends school. Juvenile courts may establish and operate community
truancy boards. If the juvenile court and the school district agree,
a school district may establish and operate a community truancy board
under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court. Juvenile courts may
create a community truancy board or may use other entities that exist
or are created, such as diversion units. However, a diversion unit or
other existing entity must agree before it is used as a truancy board.
Duties of a community truancy board shall include, but not be limited
to, recommending methods for improving school attendance such as
assisting the parent or the child to obtain supplementary services that
might eliminate or ameliorate the causes for the absences or suggesting
to the school district that the child enroll in another school, an
alternative education program, an education center, a skill center, a
dropout prevention program, or another public or private educational
program.
(2) The legislature finds that utilization of community truancy
boards, or other diversion units that fulfill a similar function, is
the preferred means of intervention when preliminary methods of notice
and parent conferences and taking appropriate steps to eliminate or
reduce unexcused absences have not been effective in securing the
child's attendance at school. The legislature intends to encourage and
support the development and expansion of community truancy boards and
other diversion programs which are effective in promoting school
attendance and preventing the need for more intrusive intervention by
the court. Operation of a school truancy board does not excuse a
district from the obligation of filing a petition within the
requirements of RCW ((28A.225.015(3))) 28A.225.030.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.225.030 and 2012 c 157 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a child under the age of seventeen is required to attend
school under RCW 28A.225.010 and is eight years old or older and if the
actions taken by a school district under RCW 28A.225.020 are not
successful in substantially reducing ((an)) the enrolled student's
absences from public school, not later than the seventh unexcused
absence by such a child within any month during the current school year
or not later than the tenth unexcused absence during the current school
year the school district shall file a petition and supporting affidavit
for a civil action with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW
28A.225.010: (a) By the parent; (b) by the child; or (c) by the parent
and the child. Except as provided in this subsection, no additional
documents need be filed with the petition. Nothing in this subsection
requires court jurisdiction to terminate when a child turns seventeen
or precludes a school district from filing a petition for a child that
is seventeen years of age.
(2) The district shall not later than the fifth unexcused absence
in a month by a child eight years old or older:
(a) Enter into an agreement with ((a)) the student and parent that
establishes school attendance requirements;
(b) Refer ((a)) the student to a community truancy board, if
available, as defined in RCW 28A.225.025. The community truancy board
shall enter into an agreement with the student and parent that
establishes school attendance requirements and take other appropriate
actions to reduce the child's absences; or
(c) File a petition under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The petition may be filed by a school district employee who is
not an attorney.
(4) If the school district fails to file a petition under this
section, the parent of a child who is eight years old or older with
five or more unexcused absences in any month during the current school
year or upon the tenth unexcused absence during the current school year
may file a petition with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW
28A.225.010.
(5) Petitions filed under this section may be served by certified
mail, return receipt requested. If such service is unsuccessful, or
the return receipt is not signed by the addressee, personal service is
required.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.225.035 and 2012 c 157 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A petition for a civil action under RCW 28A.225.030 ((or
28A.225.015)) shall consist of a written notification to the court
alleging that:
(a) The child has unexcused absences during the current school
year;
(b) Actions taken by the school district have not been successful
in substantially reducing the child's absences from school; and
(c) Court intervention and supervision are necessary to assist the
school district or parent to reduce the child's absences from school.
(2) The petition shall set forth the name, date of birth, school,
address, gender, race, and ethnicity of the child and the names and
addresses of the child's parents, and shall set forth whether the child
and parent are fluent in English, whether there is an existing
individualized education program, and the child's current academic
status in school.
(3) The petition shall set forth facts that support the allegations
in this section and shall generally request relief available under this
chapter and provide information about what the court might order under
RCW 28A.225.090.
(4) When a petition is filed under RCW 28A.225.030 ((or
28A.225.015)), the juvenile court shall schedule a hearing at which the
court shall consider the petition, or if the court determines that a
referral to an available community truancy board would substantially
reduce the child's unexcused absences, the court may refer the case to
a community truancy board under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.
(5) If a referral is made to a community truancy board, the truancy
board must meet with the child, a parent, and the school district
representative and enter into an agreement with the petitioner and
respondent regarding expectations and any actions necessary to address
the child's truancy within twenty days of the referral. ((If the
petition is based on RCW 28A.225.015, the child shall not be required
to attend and the agreement under this subsection shall be between the
truancy board, the school district, and the child's parent. The court
may permit the truancy board or truancy prevention counselor to provide
continued supervision over the student, or parent if the petition is
based on RCW 28A.225.015.))
(6) If the truancy board fails to reach an agreement, or the parent
or student does not comply with the agreement, the truancy board shall
return the case to the juvenile court for a hearing.
(7)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions in subsection (4) of this
section, a hearing shall not be required if other actions by the court
would substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences. When a
juvenile court hearing is held, the court shall:
(i) Separately notify the child, the parent of the child, and the
school district of the hearing. If the parent is not fluent in
English, the preferred practice is for notice to be provided in a
language in which the parent is fluent;
(ii) Notify the parent and the child of their rights to present
evidence at the hearing; and
(iii) Notify the parent and the child of the options and rights
available under chapter 13.32A RCW.
(b) If the child is not provided with counsel, the advisement of
rights must take place in court by means of a colloquy between the
court, the child ((if eight years old or older)), and the parent.
(8)(a) The court may require the attendance of the child ((if eight
years old or older)), the parents, and the school district at any
hearing on a petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030.
(b) The court may not issue a bench warrant for a child for failure
to appear at a hearing on an initial truancy petition filed under RCW
28A.225.030. If there has been proper service, the court may instead
enter a default order assuming jurisdiction under the terms specified
in subsection (12) of this section.
(9) A school district is responsible for determining who shall
represent the school district at hearings on a petition filed under RCW
28A.225.030 ((or 28A.225.015)).
(10) The court may permit the first hearing to be held without
requiring that either party be represented by legal counsel, and to be
held without a guardian ad litem for the child under RCW 4.08.050. At
the request of the school district, the court shall permit a school
district representative who is not an attorney to represent the school
district at any future hearings.
(11) If the child is in a special education program or has a
diagnosed mental or emotional disorder, the court shall inquire as to
what efforts the school district has made to assist the child in
attending school.
(12) If the allegations in the petition are established by a
preponderance of the evidence, the court shall grant the petition and
enter an order assuming jurisdiction to intervene for the period of
time determined by the court, after considering the facts alleged in
the petition and the circumstances of the juvenile, to most likely
cause the juvenile to return to and remain in school while the juvenile
is subject to this chapter. In no case may the order expire before the
end of the school year in which it is entered.
(13)(a) If the court assumes jurisdiction, the school district
shall periodically report to the court any additional unexcused
absences by the child, actions taken by the school district, and an
update on the child's academic status in school at a schedule specified
by the court.
(b) The first report under this subsection (13) must be received no
later than three months from the date that the court assumes
jurisdiction.
(14) Community truancy boards and the courts shall coordinate, to
the extent possible, proceedings and actions pertaining to children who
are subject to truancy petitions and at-risk youth petitions in RCW
13.32A.191 or child in need of services petitions in RCW 13.32A.140.
(15) If after a juvenile court assumes jurisdiction in one county
the child relocates to another county, the juvenile court in the
receiving county shall, upon the request of a school district or
parent, assume jurisdiction of the petition filed in the previous
county.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.225.090 and 2009 c 266 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A court may order a child subject to a petition under RCW
28A.225.035 to do one or more of the following:
(a) Attend the child's current school, and set forth minimum
attendance requirements, including suspensions;
(b) If there is space available and the program can provide
educational services appropriate for the child, order the child to
attend another public school, an alternative education program, center,
a skill center, dropout prevention program, or another public
educational program;
(c) Attend a private nonsectarian school or program including an
education center. Before ordering a child to attend an approved or
certified private nonsectarian school or program, the court shall: (i)
Consider the public and private programs available; (ii) find that
placement is in the best interest of the child; and (iii) find that the
private school or program is willing to accept the child and will not
charge any fees in addition to those established by contract with the
student's school district. If the court orders the child to enroll in
a private school or program, the child's school district shall contract
with the school or program to provide educational services for the
child. The school district shall not be required to contract for a
weekly rate that exceeds the state general apportionment dollars
calculated on a weekly basis generated by the child and received by the
district. A school district shall not be required to enter into a
contract that is longer than the remainder of the school year. A
school district shall not be required to enter into or continue a
contract if the child is no longer enrolled in the district;
(d) Be referred to a community truancy board, if available; or
(e) Submit to testing for the use of controlled substances or
alcohol based on a determination that such testing is appropriate to
the circumstances and behavior of the child and will facilitate the
child's compliance with the mandatory attendance law and, if any test
ordered under this subsection indicates the use of controlled
substances or alcohol, order the minor to abstain from the unlawful
consumption of controlled substances or alcohol and adhere to the
recommendations of the drug assessment at no expense to the school.
(2) If the child fails to comply with the court order, the court
may order the child to be subject to detention, as provided in RCW
7.21.030(2)(e), or may impose alternatives to detention such as
community restitution. Failure by a child to comply with an order
issued under this subsection shall not be subject to detention for a
period greater than that permitted pursuant to a civil contempt
proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW. Detention ordered
under this subsection may be for no longer than seven days. A warrant
of arrest for a child under this subsection may not be served on a
child inside of school during school hours in a location where other
students are present.
(3) Any parent violating any of the provisions of either RCW
28A.225.010((, 28A.225.015,)) or 28A.225.080 shall be fined not more
than twenty-five dollars for each day of unexcused absence from school.
The court shall remit fifty percent of the fine collected under this
section to the child's school district. It shall be a defense for a
parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 to show that he or she
exercised reasonable diligence in attempting to cause a child in his or
her custody to attend school or that the child's school did not perform
its duties as required in RCW 28A.225.020. The court may order the
parent to provide community restitution instead of imposing a fine.
Any fine imposed pursuant to this section may be suspended upon the
condition that a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 shall
participate with the school and the child in a supervised plan for the
child's attendance at school or upon condition that the parent attend
a conference or conferences scheduled by a school for the purpose of
analyzing the causes of a child's absence.
(4) If a child continues to be truant after entering into a court-approved order with the truancy board under RCW 28A.225.035, the
juvenile court shall find the child in contempt, and the court may
order the child to be subject to detention, as provided in RCW
7.21.030(2)(e), or may impose alternatives to detention such as
meaningful community restitution. Failure by a child to comply with an
order issued under this subsection may not subject a child to detention
for a period greater than that permitted under a civil contempt
proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW.
(((5) Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section shall not apply
to a six or seven year-old child required to attend public school under
RCW 28A.225.015.))

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.200.010 and 2004 c 19 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each parent whose child is receiving home-based instruction
under RCW 28A.225.010(4) and is six years old or older shall have the
duty to((:
(a))) file annually a signed declaration of intent that he or she
is planning to cause his or her child to receive home-based
instruction. The statement shall include the name and age of the
child, shall specify whether a certificated person will be supervising
the instruction, and shall be written in a format prescribed by the
superintendent of public instruction. Each parent shall file the
statement by September 15th of the school year or within two weeks of
the beginning of any public school quarter, trimester, or semester with
the superintendent of the public school district within which the
parent resides or the district that accepts the transfer, and the
student shall be deemed a transfer student of the nonresident district.
Parents may apply for transfer under RCW 28A.225.220((;)).
(((b))) (2) Each parent whose child is receiving home-based
instruction under RCW 28A.225.010(4) and is eight years old or older
shall have the duty to:
(a) Ensure that test scores or annual academic progress assessments
and immunization records, together with any other records that are kept
relating to the instructional and educational activities provided, are
forwarded to any other public or private school to which the child
transfers. At the time of a transfer to a public school, the
superintendent of the local school district in which the child enrolls
may require a standardized achievement test to be administered and
shall have the authority to determine the appropriate grade and course
level placement of the child after consultation with parents and review
of the child's records; and
(((c))) (b) Ensure that a standardized achievement test approved by
the state board of education is administered annually to the child by
a qualified individual or that an annual assessment of the student's
academic progress is written by a certificated person who is currently
working in the field of education. The state board of education shall
not require these children to meet the student learning goals, master
the essential academic learning requirements, to take the assessments,
or to obtain a certificate of academic achievement or a certificate of
individual achievement pursuant to RCW 28A.655.061 and 28A.155.045.
The standardized test administered or the annual academic progress
assessment written shall be made a part of the child's permanent
records. If, as a result of the annual test or assessment, it is
determined that the child is not making reasonable progress consistent
with his or her age or stage of development, the parent shall make a
good faith effort to remedy any deficiency.
(((2))) (3) Failure of a parent to comply with the duties in this
section shall be deemed a failure of such parent's child to attend
school without valid justification under RCW 28A.225.020. Parents who
do comply with the duties set forth in this section shall be presumed
to be providing home-based instruction as set forth in RCW
28A.225.010(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 28A.225.015 (Attendance mandatory -- Six
or seven year olds -- Unexcused absences -- Petition) and 1999 c 319 s 6
are each repealed.

--- END ---