BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 36 s 13 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Abandoned" means when the child's parent, guardian, or other
custodian has expressed, either by statement or conduct, an intent to
forego, for an extended period, parental rights or responsibilities
despite an ability to exercise such rights and responsibilities. If
the court finds that the petitioner has exercised due diligence in
attempting to locate the parent, no contact between the child and the
child's parent, guardian, or other custodian for a period of three
months creates a rebuttable presumption of abandonment, even if there
is no expressed intent to abandon.
(2) "Child," "juvenile," and "youth" means:
(a) Any individual under the age of eighteen years; or
(b) Any individual age eighteen to twenty-one years who is eligible
to receive and who elects to receive the extended foster care services
authorized under RCW 74.13.031. A youth who remains dependent and who
receives extended foster care services under RCW 74.13.031 shall not be
considered a "child" under any other statute or for any other purpose.
(3) "Current placement episode" means the period of time that
begins with the most recent date that the child was removed from the
home of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian for purposes of
placement in out-of-home care and continues until: (a) The child
returns home; (b) an adoption decree, a permanent custody order, or
guardianship order is entered; or (c) the dependency is dismissed,
whichever occurs first.
(4) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(5) "Dependency guardian" means the person, nonprofit corporation,
or Indian tribe appointed by the court pursuant to this chapter for the
limited purpose of assisting the court in the supervision of the
dependency.
(6) "Dependent child" means any child who:
(a) Has been abandoned;
(b) Is abused or neglected as defined in chapter 26.44 RCW by a
person legally responsible for the care of the child;
(c) Has no parent, guardian, or custodian capable of adequately
caring for the child, such that the child is in circumstances which
constitute a danger of substantial damage to the child's psychological
or physical development; or
(d) Is receiving extended foster care services, as authorized by
RCW 74.13.031.
(7) "Developmental disability" means a disability attributable to
intellectual disability, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, autism, or another
neurological or other condition of an individual found by the secretary
to be closely related to an intellectual disability or to require
treatment similar to that required for individuals with intellectual
disabilities, which disability originates before the individual attains
age eighteen, which has continued or can be expected to continue
indefinitely, and which constitutes a substantial limitation to the
individual.
(8) "Extended foster care services" means residential and other
support services the department is authorized to provide under RCW
74.13.031.
(9) "Guardian" means the person or agency that: (a) Has been
appointed as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding, including
a guardian appointed pursuant to chapter 13.36 RCW; and (b) has the
legal right to custody of the child pursuant to such appointment. The
term "guardian" does not include a "dependency guardian" appointed
pursuant to a proceeding under this chapter.
(10) "Guardian ad litem" means a person, appointed by the court to
represent the best interests of a child in a proceeding under this
chapter, or in any matter which may be consolidated with a proceeding
under this chapter. A "court-appointed special advocate" appointed by
the court to be the guardian ad litem for the child, or to perform
substantially the same duties and functions as a guardian ad litem,
shall be deemed to be guardian ad litem for all purposes and uses of
this chapter.
(11) "Guardian ad litem program" means a court-authorized volunteer
program, which is or may be established by the superior court of the
county in which such proceeding is filed, to manage all aspects of
volunteer guardian ad litem representation for children alleged or
found to be dependent. Such management shall include but is not
limited to: Recruitment, screening, training, supervision, assignment,
and discharge of volunteers.
(12) "Housing assistance" means appropriate referrals by the
department or other supervising agencies to federal, state, local, or
private agencies or organizations, assistance with forms, applications,
or financial subsidies or other monetary assistance for housing. For
purposes of this chapter, "housing assistance" is not a remedial
service or time-limited family reunification service as described in
RCW 13.34.025(2).
(13) "Indigent" means a person who, at any stage of a court
proceeding, is:
(a) Receiving one of the following types of public assistance:
Temporary assistance for needy families, aged, blind, or disabled
assistance benefits, medical care services under RCW 74.09.035,
pregnant women assistance benefits, poverty-related veterans' benefits,
food stamps or food stamp benefits transferred electronically, refugee
resettlement benefits, medicaid, or supplemental security income; or
(b) Involuntarily committed to a public mental health facility; or
(c) Receiving an annual income, after taxes, of one hundred twenty-five percent or less of the federally established poverty level; or
(d) Unable to pay the anticipated cost of counsel for the matter
before the court because his or her available funds are insufficient to
pay any amount for the retention of counsel.
(14) "Out-of-home care" means placement in a foster family home or
group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or placement
in a home, other than that of the child's parent, guardian, or legal
custodian, not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.
(15) "Preventive services" means preservation services, as defined
in chapter 74.14C RCW, and other reasonably available services,
including housing assistance, capable of preventing the need for out-of-home placement while protecting the child.
(16) "Reasonable efforts" means good faith attempts by an
authorized agency to assist, develop, and encourage a meaningful
relationship between the parent and child including, but not limited
to, consultation and cooperation with the parent in developing a plan
for appropriate services, facilitating appropriate visitation, and
providing remedial services required under RCW 13.34.025. This extends
to parents who are incarcerated or participating in a residential
substance abuse treatment program.
(17) "Shelter care" means temporary physical care in a facility
licensed pursuant to RCW 74.15.030 or in a home not required to be
licensed pursuant to RCW 74.15.030.
(((17))) (18) "Sibling" means a child's birth brother, birth
sister, adoptive brother, adoptive sister, half-brother, or half-sister, or as defined by the law or custom of the Indian child's tribe
for an Indian child as defined in RCW 13.38.040.
(((18))) (19) "Social study" means a written evaluation of matters
relevant to the disposition of the case and shall contain the following
information:
(a) A statement of the specific harm or harms to the child that
intervention is designed to alleviate;
(b) A description of the specific services and activities, for both
the parents and child, that are needed in order to prevent serious harm
to the child; the reasons why such services and activities are likely
to be useful; the availability of any proposed services; and the
agency's overall plan for ensuring that the services will be delivered.
The description shall identify the services chosen and approved by the
parent;
(c) If removal is recommended, a full description of the reasons
why the child cannot be protected adequately in the home, including a
description of any previous efforts to work with the parents and the
child in the home; the in-home treatment programs that have been
considered and rejected; the preventive services, including housing
assistance, that have been offered or provided and have failed to
prevent the need for out-of-home placement, unless the health, safety,
and welfare of the child cannot be protected adequately in the home;
and the parents' attitude toward placement of the child;
(d) A statement of the likely harms the child will suffer as a
result of removal;
(e) A description of the steps that will be taken to minimize the
harm to the child that may result if separation occurs including an
assessment of the child's relationship and emotional bond with any
siblings, and the agency's plan to provide ongoing contact between the
child and the child's siblings if appropriate; and
(f) Behavior that will be expected before determination that
supervision of the family or placement is no longer necessary.
(((19))) (20) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the
state under RCW 74.15.090, or licensed by a federally recognized Indian
tribe located in this state under RCW 74.15.190, that has entered into
a performance-based contract with the department to provide case
management for the delivery and documentation of child welfare services
as defined in RCW 74.13.020.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.067 and 2009 c 520 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Following shelter care and no later than thirty days prior
to fact-finding, the department or supervising agency shall convene a
case conference as required in the shelter care order to develop and
specify in a written service agreement the expectations of both the
department or supervising agency and the parent regarding voluntary
services for the parent.
(b) The case conference shall include the parent, counsel for the
parent, caseworker, counsel for the state, guardian ad litem, counsel
for the child, and any other person agreed upon by the parties. Once
the shelter care order is entered, the department or supervising agency
is not required to provide additional notice of the case conference to
any participants in the case conference.
(c) The written service agreement expectations must correlate with
the court's findings at the shelter care hearing. The written service
agreement must set forth specific services to be provided to the
parent.
(d) The case conference agreement must be agreed to and signed by
the parties. The court shall not consider the content of the
discussions at the case conference at the time of the fact-finding
hearing for the purposes of establishing that the child is a dependent
child, and the court shall not consider any documents or written
materials presented at the case conference but not incorporated into
the case conference agreement, unless the documents or written
materials were prepared for purposes other than or as a result of the
case conference and are otherwise admissible under the rules of
evidence.
(2) At any other stage in a dependency proceeding, the department
or supervising agency, upon the parent's request, shall convene a case
conference.
(3) If a case conference is convened pursuant to subsection (1) or
(2) of this section and the parent is unable to participate in person
due to incarceration or participation in a residential substance abuse
treatment program, the parent must have the option to participate
through the use of a teleconference or videoconference.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.34.136 and 2011 c 309 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a child is ordered removed from the home, a permanency
plan shall be developed no later than sixty days from the time the
supervising agency assumes responsibility for providing services,
including placing the child, or at the time of a hearing under RCW
13.34.130, whichever occurs first. The permanency planning process
continues until a permanency planning goal is achieved or dependency is
dismissed. The planning process shall include reasonable efforts to
return the child to the parent's home.
(2) The agency supervising the dependency shall submit a written
permanency plan to all parties and the court not less than fourteen
days prior to the scheduled hearing. Responsive reports of parties not
in agreement with the department's or supervising agency's proposed
permanency plan must be provided to the department or supervising
agency, all other parties, and the court at least seven days prior to
the hearing.
The permanency plan shall include:
(a) A permanency plan of care that shall identify one of the
following outcomes as a primary goal and may identify additional
outcomes as alternative goals: Return of the child to the home of the
child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian; adoption, including a
tribal customary adoption as defined in RCW 13.38.040; guardianship;
permanent legal custody; long-term relative or foster care, until the
child is age eighteen, with a written agreement between the parties and
the care provider; successful completion of a responsible living skills
program; or independent living, if appropriate and if the child is age
sixteen or older. The department or supervising agency shall not
discharge a child to an independent living situation before the child
is eighteen years of age unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant
to chapter 13.64 RCW;
(b) Unless the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(((6)))
(8), that a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where
the child will be placed, what steps will be taken to return the child
home, what steps the supervising agency or the department will take to
promote existing appropriate sibling relationships and/or facilitate
placement together or contact in accordance with the best interests of
each child, and what actions the department or supervising agency will
take to maintain parent-child ties. All aspects of the plan shall
include the goal of achieving permanence for the child.
(i) The department's or supervising agency's plan shall specify
what services the parents will be offered to enable them to resume
custody, what requirements the parents must meet to resume custody, and
a time limit for each service plan and parental requirement. If the
parent is incarcerated or residing in a residential substance abuse
treatment facility, the plan must address how the parent will
participate in the case conference and permanency planning meetings
and, where possible, must include treatment that reflects the resources
available at the facility where the parent is confined. The plan must
provide for visitation opportunities, unless visitation is not in the
best interests of the child.
(ii) Visitation is the right of the family, including the child and
the parent, in cases in which visitation is in the best interest of the
child. Early, consistent, and frequent visitation is crucial for
maintaining parent-child relationships and making it possible for
parents and children to safely reunify. The supervising agency or
department shall encourage the maximum parent and child and sibling
contact possible, when it is in the best interest of the child,
including regular visitation and participation by the parents in the
care of the child while the child is in placement. Visitation shall
not be limited as a sanction for a parent's failure to comply with
court orders or services where the health, safety, or welfare of the
child is not at risk as a result of the visitation. Visitation may be
limited or denied only if the court determines that such limitation or
denial is necessary to protect the child's health, safety, or welfare.
The court and the department or supervising agency should rely upon
community resources, relatives, foster parents, and other appropriate
persons to provide transportation and supervision for visitation to the
extent that such resources are available, and appropriate, and the
child's safety would not be compromised.
(iii) A child shall be placed as close to the child's home as
possible, preferably in the child's own neighborhood, unless the court
finds that placement at a greater distance is necessary to promote the
child's or parents' well-being.
(iv) The plan shall state whether both in-state and, where
appropriate, out-of-state placement options have been considered by the
department or supervising agency.
(v) Unless it is not in the best interests of the child, whenever
practical, the plan should ensure the child remains enrolled in the
school the child was attending at the time the child entered foster
care.
(vi) The supervising agency or department shall provide all
reasonable services that are available within the department or
supervising agency, or within the community, or those services which
the department has existing contracts to purchase. It shall report to
the court if it is unable to provide such services; and
(c) If the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(((6))) (8),
that a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the
child will be placed, what steps will be taken to achieve permanency
for the child, services to be offered or provided to the child, and, if
visitation would be in the best interests of the child, a
recommendation to the court regarding visitation between parent and
child pending a fact-finding hearing on the termination petition. The
department or supervising agency shall not be required to develop a
plan of services for the parents or provide services to the parents if
the court orders a termination petition be filed. However, reasonable
efforts to ensure visitation and contact between siblings shall be made
unless there is reasonable cause to believe the best interests of the
child or siblings would be jeopardized.
(3) Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the earliest
possible date. If the child has been in out-of-home care for fifteen
of the most recent twenty-two months, and the court has not made a good
cause exception, the court shall require the department or supervising
agency to file a petition seeking termination of parental rights in
accordance with RCW 13.34.145(3)(b)(vi). In cases where parental
rights have been terminated, the child is legally free for adoption,
and adoption has been identified as the primary permanency planning
goal, it shall be a goal to complete the adoption within six months
following entry of the termination order.
(4) If the court determines that the continuation of reasonable
efforts to prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from his
or her home or to safely return the child home should not be part of
the permanency plan of care for the child, reasonable efforts shall be
made to place the child in a timely manner and to complete whatever
steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.
(5) The identified outcomes and goals of the permanency plan may
change over time based upon the circumstances of the particular case.
(6) The court shall consider the child's relationships with the
child's siblings in accordance with RCW 13.34.130(((4))) (6). Whenever
the permanency plan for a child is adoption, the court shall encourage
the prospective adoptive parents, birth parents, foster parents,
kinship caregivers, and the department or other supervising agency to
seriously consider the long-term benefits to the child adoptee and his
or her siblings of providing for and facilitating continuing
postadoption contact between the siblings. To the extent that it is
feasible, and when it is in the best interests of the child adoptee and
his or her siblings, contact between the siblings should be frequent
and of a similar nature as that which existed prior to the adoption.
If the child adoptee or his or her siblings are represented by an
attorney or guardian ad litem in a proceeding under this chapter or in
any other child custody proceeding, the court shall inquire of each
attorney and guardian ad litem regarding the potential benefits of
continuing contact between the siblings and the potential detriments of
severing contact. This section does not require the department of
social and health services or other supervising agency to agree to any
specific provisions in an open adoption agreement and does not create
a new obligation for the department to provide supervision or
transportation for visits between siblings separated by adoption from
foster care.
(7) For purposes related to permanency planning:
(a) "Guardianship" means a dependency guardianship or a legal
guardianship pursuant to chapter 11.88 RCW or equivalent laws of
another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.
(b) "Permanent custody order" means a custody order entered
pursuant to chapter 26.10 RCW.
(c) "Permanent legal custody" means legal custody pursuant to
chapter 26.10 RCW or equivalent laws of another state or a federally
recognized Indian tribe.

Sec. 4 RCW 13.34.145 and 2011 c 330 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The purpose of a permanency planning hearing is to review the
permanency plan for the child, inquire into the welfare of the child
and progress of the case, and reach decisions regarding the permanent
placement of the child.
(a) A permanency planning hearing shall be held in all cases where
the child has remained in out-of-home care for at least nine months and
an adoption decree, guardianship order, or permanent custody order has
not previously been entered. The hearing shall take place no later
than twelve months following commencement of the current placement
episode.
(b) Whenever a child is removed from the home of a dependency
guardian or long-term relative or foster care provider, and the child
is not returned to the home of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian
but is placed in out-of-home care, a permanency planning hearing shall
take place no later than twelve months, as provided in this section,
following the date of removal unless, prior to the hearing, the child
returns to the home of the dependency guardian or long-term care
provider, the child is placed in the home of the parent, guardian, or
legal custodian, an adoption decree, guardianship order, or a permanent
custody order is entered, or the dependency is dismissed. Every effort
shall be made to provide stability in long-term placement, and to avoid
disruption of placement, unless the child is being returned home or it
is in the best interest of the child.
(c) Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the earliest
possible date, preferably before the child has been in out-of-home care
for fifteen months. In cases where parental rights have been
terminated, the child is legally free for adoption, and adoption has
been identified as the primary permanency planning goal, it shall be a
goal to complete the adoption within six months following entry of the
termination order.
(2) No later than ten working days prior to the permanency planning
hearing, the agency having custody of the child shall submit a written
permanency plan to the court and shall mail a copy of the plan to all
parties and their legal counsel, if any.
(3) At the permanency planning hearing, the court shall conduct the
following inquiry:
(a) If a goal of long-term foster or relative care has been
achieved prior to the permanency planning hearing, the court shall
review the child's status to determine whether the placement and the
plan for the child's care remain appropriate.
(b) In cases where the primary permanency planning goal has not
been achieved, the court shall inquire regarding the reasons why the
primary goal has not been achieved and determine what needs to be done
to make it possible to achieve the primary goal. The court shall
review the permanency plan prepared by the agency and make explicit
findings regarding each of the following:
(i) The continuing necessity for, and the safety and
appropriateness of, the placement;
(ii) The extent of compliance with the permanency plan by the
department or supervising agency and any other service providers, the
child's parents, the child, and the child's guardian, if any;
(iii) The extent of any efforts to involve appropriate service
providers in addition to department or supervising agency staff in
planning to meet the special needs of the child and the child's
parents;
(iv) The progress toward eliminating the causes for the child's
placement outside of his or her home and toward returning the child
safely to his or her home or obtaining a permanent placement for the
child;
(v) The date by which it is likely that the child will be returned
to his or her home or placed for adoption, with a guardian or in some
other alternative permanent placement; and
(vi) If the child has been placed outside of his or her home for
fifteen of the most recent twenty-two months, not including any period
during which the child was a runaway from the out-of-home placement or
the first six months of any period during which the child was returned
to his or her home for a trial home visit, the appropriateness of the
permanency plan, whether reasonable efforts were made by the department
or supervising agency to achieve the goal of the permanency plan, and
the circumstances which prevent the child from any of the following:
(A) Being returned safely to his or her home;
(B) Having a petition for the involuntary termination of parental
rights filed on behalf of the child;
(C) Being placed for adoption;
(D) Being placed with a guardian;
(E) Being placed in the home of a fit and willing relative of the
child; or
(F) Being placed in some other alternative permanent placement,
including independent living or long-term foster care.
At this hearing, the court shall order the department or
supervising agency to file a petition seeking termination of parental
rights if the child has been in out-of-home care for fifteen of the
last twenty-two months since the date the dependency petition was filed
unless the court makes a good cause exception as to why the filing of
a termination of parental rights petition is not appropriate. Any good
cause finding shall be reviewed at all subsequent hearings pertaining
to the child. For purposes of this section, "good cause exception"
includes but is not limited to the following:
(I) The child is being cared for by a relative;
(II) The department has not provided to the child's family such
services as the court and the department have deemed necessary for the
child's safe return home; ((or))
(III) The department has documented in the case plan a compelling
reason for determining that filing a petition to terminate parental
rights would not be in the child's best interests;
(IV) The parent is incarcerated or participating in a residential
substance abuse treatment program, or the parent's prior incarceration
or participation in a residential substance abuse treatment program is
a significant factor in why the child has been in foster care for
fifteen of the last twenty-two months, provided that the parent
maintains a meaningful role in the child's life based on the criteria
set forth in (c)(i) of this subsection, and the department has not
documented a reason why it would otherwise be appropriate to file a
petition pursuant to this section; or
(V) Where aggravated circumstances are determined to exist under
RCW 13.34.132(4)(g) for an incarcerated parent's failure to complete
available treatment, and the parent's failure is due to the constraints
of a current or prior incarceration or current or prior participation
in a residential substance abuse treatment program. Such consideration
must include, but not be limited to, delays in or barriers to accessing
court-mandated services.
(c) Whether a parent maintains a meaningful role in his or her
child's life.
(i) The court's assessment of whether a parent maintains a
meaningful role in his or her child's life may include, but is not
limited to, the following:
(A) A parent's expressions or acts of manifesting concern for the
child, such as letters, telephone calls, visits, and other forms of
communication with the child;
(B) Efforts by the parent to communicate and work with the
department or supervising agency, legal guardian, foster parent, the
court, and the parent's attorney or other individuals providing
services to the parent, including correctional mental health and
substance abuse treatment program personnel, for the purpose of
complying with the service plan and repairing, maintaining, or building
the parent-child relationship;
(C) A positive response by the parent to the reasonable efforts of
the department or the supervising agency;
(D) Whether the continued involvement of the parent in the child's
life is in the child's best interest; and
(E) Information obtained from individuals and agencies in a
reasonable position to help make this assessment. Such individuals and
agencies may include, but are not limited to, the supervising agency,
legal guardian, parent, child, foster parent, or other individuals of
importance in the child's life. Sources of information may also
include the parent's attorney, correctional mental health and substance
abuse treatment program personnel, or other individuals providing
services to the parent.
(ii) The court shall consider the parent's limited access to family
support programs, therapeutic services, and visiting opportunities;
highly restricted telephone and mail services; inability to participate
in foster care planning meetings; and difficulty accessing lawyers and
participating meaningfully in court proceedings.
(((c))) (d)(i) If the permanency plan identifies independent living
as a goal, the court shall make a finding that the provision of
services to assist the child in making a transition from foster care to
independent living will allow the child to manage his or her financial,
personal, social, educational, and nonfinancial affairs prior to
approving independent living as a permanency plan of care. The court
will inquire whether the child has been provided information about
extended foster care services.
(ii) The permanency plan shall also specifically identify the
services, including extended foster care services, where appropriate,
that will be provided to assist the child to make a successful
transition from foster care to independent living.
(iii) The department or supervising agency shall not discharge a
child to an independent living situation before the child is eighteen
years of age unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter
13.64 RCW.
(((d))) (e) If the child has resided in the home of a foster parent
or relative for more than six months prior to the permanency planning
hearing, the court shall:
(i) Enter a finding regarding whether the foster parent or relative
was informed of the hearing as required in RCW 74.13.280, 13.34.215(6),
and 13.34.096; and
(ii) If the department or supervising agency is recommending a
placement other than the child's current placement with a foster
parent, relative, or other suitable person, enter a finding as to the
reasons for the recommendation for a change in placement.
(4) In all cases, at the permanency planning hearing, the court
shall:
(a)(i) Order the permanency plan prepared by the supervising agency
to be implemented; or
(ii) Modify the permanency plan, and order implementation of the
modified plan; and
(b)(i) Order the child returned home only if the court finds that
a reason for removal as set forth in RCW 13.34.130 no longer exists; or
(ii) Order the child to remain in out-of-home care for a limited
specified time period while efforts are made to implement the
permanency plan.
(5) Following the first permanency planning hearing, the court
shall hold a further permanency planning hearing in accordance with
this section at least once every twelve months until a permanency
planning goal is achieved or the dependency is dismissed, whichever
occurs first.
(6) Prior to the second permanency planning hearing, the agency
that has custody of the child shall consider whether to file a petition
for termination of parental rights.
(7) If the court orders the child returned home, casework
supervision by the department or supervising agency shall continue for
at least six months, at which time a review hearing shall be held
pursuant to RCW 13.34.138, and the court shall determine the need for
continued intervention.
(8) The juvenile court may hear a petition for permanent legal
custody when: (a) The court has ordered implementation of a permanency
plan that includes permanent legal custody; and (b) the party pursuing
the permanent legal custody is the party identified in the permanency
plan as the prospective legal custodian. During the pendency of such
proceeding, the court shall conduct review hearings and further
permanency planning hearings as provided in this chapter. At the
conclusion of the legal guardianship or permanent legal custody
proceeding, a juvenile court hearing shall be held for the purpose of
determining whether dependency should be dismissed. If a guardianship
or permanent custody order has been entered, the dependency shall be
dismissed.
(9) Continued juvenile court jurisdiction under this chapter shall
not be a barrier to the entry of an order establishing a legal
guardianship or permanent legal custody when the requirements of
subsection (8) of this section are met.
(10) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the ability
of the agency that has custody of the child to file a petition for
termination of parental rights or a guardianship petition at any time
following the establishment of dependency. Upon the filing of such a
petition, a fact-finding hearing shall be scheduled and held in
accordance with this chapter unless the department or supervising
agency requests dismissal of the petition prior to the hearing or
unless the parties enter an agreed order terminating parental rights,
establishing guardianship, or otherwise resolving the matter.
(11) The approval of a permanency plan that does not contemplate
return of the child to the parent does not relieve the supervising
agency of its obligation to provide reasonable services, under this
chapter, intended to effectuate the return of the child to the parent,
including but not limited to, visitation rights. The court shall
consider the child's relationships with siblings in accordance with RCW
13.34.130.
(12) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the
procedural due process rights of any party in a termination or
guardianship proceeding filed under this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 13.34.180 and 2009 c 520 s 34 and 2009 c 477 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A petition seeking termination of a parent and child
relationship may be filed in juvenile court by any party, including the
supervising agency, to the dependency proceedings concerning that
child. Such petition shall conform to the requirements of RCW
13.34.040, shall be served upon the parties as provided in RCW
13.34.070(8), and shall allege all of the following unless subsection
(((2) or)) (3) or (4) of this section applies:
(a) That the child has been found to be a dependent child;
(b) That the court has entered a dispositional order pursuant to
RCW 13.34.130;
(c) That the child has been removed or will, at the time of the
hearing, have been removed from the custody of the parent for a period
of at least six months pursuant to a finding of dependency;
(d) That the services ordered under RCW 13.34.136 have been
expressly and understandably offered or provided and all necessary
services, reasonably available, capable of correcting the parental
deficiencies within the foreseeable future have been expressly and
understandably offered or provided;
(e) That there is little likelihood that conditions will be
remedied so that the child can be returned to the parent in the near
future. A parent's failure to substantially improve parental
deficiencies within twelve months following entry of the dispositional
order shall give rise to a rebuttable presumption that there is little
likelihood that conditions will be remedied so that the child can be
returned to the parent in the near future. The presumption shall not
arise unless the petitioner makes a showing that all necessary services
reasonably capable of correcting the parental deficiencies within the
foreseeable future have been clearly offered or provided. In
determining whether the conditions will be remedied the court may
consider, but is not limited to, the following factors:
(i) Use of intoxicating or controlled substances so as to render
the parent incapable of providing proper care for the child for
extended periods of time or for periods of time that present a risk of
imminent harm to the child, and documented unwillingness of the parent
to receive and complete treatment or documented multiple failed
treatment attempts;
(ii) Psychological incapacity or mental deficiency of the parent
that is so severe and chronic as to render the parent incapable of
providing proper care for the child for extended periods of time or for
periods of time that present a risk of imminent harm to the child, and
documented unwillingness of the parent to receive and complete
treatment or documentation that there is no treatment that can render
the parent capable of providing proper care for the child in the near
future; or
(iii) Failure of the parent to have contact with the child for an
extended period of time after the filing of the dependency petition if
the parent was provided an opportunity to have a relationship with the
child by the department or the court and received documented notice of
the potential consequences of this failure, except that the actual
inability of a parent to have visitation with the child including, but
not limited to, mitigating circumstances such as a parent's current or
prior incarceration, current or prior participation in a residential
treatment program for substance abuse, or service in the military does
not in and of itself constitute failure to have contact with the child;
and
(f) That continuation of the parent and child relationship clearly
diminishes the child's prospects for early integration into a stable
and permanent home. The court shall consider whether a parent
maintains a meaningful role in his or her child's life based on factors
identified in RCW 13.34.145(3)(c); whether the department or
supervising agency made reasonable efforts as defined in this chapter;
and whether particular barriers existed as described in RCW
13.34.145(3)(c) including, but not limited to, delays or barriers
experienced in keeping the agency apprised of his or her location and
in accessing visitation or other meaningful contact with the child.
(2) As evidence of rebuttal to any presumption established pursuant
to subsection (1)(e) of this section, the court may consider the
particular constraints of a parent's current or prior incarceration or
current or prior participation in a residential substance abuse
treatment program. Such evidence may include, but is not limited to,
delays or barriers a parent may experience in keeping the agency
apprised of his or her location and in accessing visitation or other
meaningful contact with the child.
(3) In lieu of the allegations in subsection (1) of this section,
the petition may allege that the child was found under such
circumstances that the whereabouts of the child's parent are unknown
and no person has acknowledged paternity or maternity and requested
custody of the child within two months after the child was found.
(((3))) (4) In lieu of the allegations in subsection (1)(b) through
(f) of this section, the petition may allege that the parent has been
convicted of:
(a) Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree, or
homicide by abuse as defined in chapter 9A.32 RCW against another child
of the parent;
(b) Manslaughter in the first degree or manslaughter in the second
degree, as defined in chapter 9A.32 RCW against another child of the
parent;
(c) Attempting, conspiring, or soliciting another to commit one or
more of the crimes listed in (a) or (b) of this subsection; or
(d) Assault in the first or second degree, as defined in chapter
9A.36 RCW, against the surviving child or another child of the parent.
(((4))) (5) When a parent has been sentenced to a long-term
incarceration and has met the criteria provided in RCW
13.34.145(3)(c)(i), the department must seek a permanent placement that
allows the parent to maintain a relationship with his or her child,
such as a guardianship pursuant to chapter 13.36 RCW, rather than a
termination of parental rights.
(6) Notice of rights shall be served upon the parent, guardian, or
legal custodian with the petition and shall be in substantially the
following form:

"NOTICE

A petition for termination of parental rights has been filed
against you. You have important legal rights and you must take
steps to protect your interests. This petition could result in
permanent loss of your parental rights.

1. You have the right to a fact-finding hearing before
a judge.

2. You have the right to have a lawyer represent you at
the hearing. A lawyer can look at the files in your case, talk
to the department of social and health services or the
supervising agency and other agencies, tell you about the law,
help you understand your rights, and help you at hearings. If
you cannot afford a lawyer, the court will appoint one to
represent you. To get a court-appointed lawyer you must
contact: (explain local procedure) .

3. At the hearing, you have the right to speak on your
own behalf, to introduce evidence, to examine witnesses, and to
receive a decision based solely on the evidence presented to
the judge.

You should be present at this hearing.

You may call (insert agency) for more information
about your child. The agency's name and telephone number are
(insert name and telephone number) ."

--- END ---