BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.12.080 and 1984 c 7 s 121 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of transportation may transfer and convey to the
United States, its agencies or instrumentalities, to a federally
recognized Indian tribe, to any other state agency, to any county or
city or port district of this state, or to any public utility company,
any unused state-owned real property under the jurisdiction of the
department of transportation when, in the judgment of the secretary of
transportation and the attorney general, the transfer and conveyance is
consistent with public interest. Whenever the secretary makes an
agreement for any such transfer or conveyance, and the attorney general
concurs therein, the secretary shall execute and deliver unto the
grantee a deed of conveyance, easement, or other instrument, duly
acknowledged, as shall be necessary to fulfill the terms of the
aforesaid agreement. All moneys paid to the state of Washington under
any of the provisions hereof shall be deposited in the motor vehicle
fund.

--- END ---