BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.56.042 and 1984 c 7 s 249 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to enter into agreements with any
county of this state and/or with an adjoining state or county thereof
for the purpose of implementing an investigation of the feasibility of
any toll bridge project for the bridging of a river forming a portion
of the boundary of this state, and the adjoining state. The department
may use funds available to it to carry out the purposes of this
((section)) subsection. These agreements may provide that if any such
project is determined to be feasible and is adopted, any advancement of
funds by any state or county may be reimbursed out of any proceeds
derived from the sale of bonds or out of tolls and revenues to be
derived from the project.
(2)(a) If state, local, or department funds are appropriated for
the purpose of constructing a state boundary bridge, the department
must assign steel fabrication inspector travel costs to the project
contractor when elements of the project are fabricated outside of three
hundred miles from Olympia, Washington.
(b) If it is impracticable and difficult to ascertain and determine
the actual increase in expenses to the department for steel fabrication
inspections:
(i) Payment to a contractor for furnishing elements of the project
from a fabrication site located more than three hundred miles, but not
more than three thousand miles, from Olympia, Washington must be
reduced by five thousand dollars or an amount computed at five cents
per pound of structural steel fabricated, whichever is greater; or
(ii) Payment to a contractor for furnishing elements of the project
from a fabrication site located more than three thousand miles from
Olympia, Washington must be reduced by eight thousand dollars or an
amount computed at seven cents per pound of structural steel
fabricated, whichever is greater.

--- END ---