BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each county auditor or other local election official must place
at least one ballot drop box at each public college and university, the
branch campuses of Washington State University and the University of
Washington, and the main campuses of each public community college and
technical college. This requirement is waived if the county already
has a ballot drop box within one mile of the campus. Ballot drop boxes
may be placed inside a building or outdoors, and must be in place at
least eighteen days before the next general election. The
administration or an associated student body association may assist
with funding the ballot drop boxes provided under this section.
(2) The county auditor or election official may install a ballot
drop box on any campus, in addition to those required in subsection (1)
of this section, if the administration or an associated student body
association commits to jointly funding the installation of the ballot
drop box.
(3) Each county auditor or local election official shall establish
and maintain an advisory committee that includes a representative from
the Washington student association and a representative from the
administration and student government associated with each public
college, university, community college, and technical college located
in that county. The committee shall assist election officials by:
(a) Identifying locations for the ballot drop boxes that will
maximize accessibility to students; and
(b) Developing an outreach plan that identifies other means to
promote students' voting by use of the ballot drop boxes.
(4) The requirements of this section do not apply to Western
Governors University, which is an online university.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29A.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within ninety days of the effective date of this section, each
county auditor or local election official shall provide a report to the
secretary of state's office that includes the following information:
(a) The number, type, and location of the county's ballot boxes,
including those permanently installed and those installed on a
temporary basis in the periods immediately preceding an election; and
(b) A description of the methods used to inform voters of the
location of the ballot drop boxes.
(2) The secretary of state, in consultation with county auditors
and county election officials, shall compile the information listed in
subsection (1)(a) of this section and develop and implement a plan to
provide voter access to drop boxes in every county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 29A.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) County auditors, local election officials, and the secretary of
state must consider Indian reservations, especially those in remote
locations, when identifying ballot drop box locations or developing
proposals for the placement of ballot drop boxes.
(2) Any person who tampers with or destroys a ballot drop box is
subject to a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars. The
civil penalty imposed in this section is in addition to any other
penalties authorized by law.

--- END ---