BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes there are many
state agencies and private organizations that might be called on to
provide services to victims of sex trafficking. Victims of human
trafficking are often in need of services such as emergency medical
attention, food and shelter, vocational and English language training,
mental health counseling, and legal support. The state intends to
improve the response of state, local, and private entities to incidents
of trafficking of humans. Victims would be better served if there is
an established, coordinated system of identifying the needs of sex
trafficking victims, training of service delivery agencies and staff,
timely and appropriate delivery of services, and better investigations
and prosecutions of trafficking.
Leadership in providing services to victims of sex trafficking also
extends beyond government efforts and is grounded in the work of highly
dedicated individuals and community-based groups. Without these
efforts the struggle against human trafficking will be very difficult
to win. The legislature, therefore, finds that such efforts merit
regular public recognition and appreciation. Such recognition and
appreciation will encourage the efforts of all persons to end sex
trafficking, and provide the public with information and education
about the necessity of its involvement in this struggle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.280 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The statewide coordinating committee on sex trafficking is
established to address the issues of sex trafficking, to examine the
practices of local and regional entities involved in addressing sex
trafficking, and to develop a statewide plan to address sex
trafficking.
(2) The committee is administered by the department of commerce and
consists of the following members:
(a) Two members of the house of representatives, one from each
caucus, and two members of the senate, one from each caucus, to be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and the
president of the senate, respectively;
(b) The secretary of the children's administration or his or her
designee;
(c) The secretary of the juvenile rehabilitation administration or
his or her designee;
(d) The superintendent of public instruction or his or her
designee;
(e) A representative of the administrative office of the courts
appointed by the administrative office of the courts;
(f) The executive director of the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs or his or her designee;
(g) The executive director of the Washington state criminal justice
training commission or his or her designee;
(h) A representative of the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys appointed by the association;
(i) Representatives of community service providers that serve
victims of human trafficking, to be appointed by commerce's office of
crime victims advocacy;
(j) Any existing chairs of regional task forces that address human
trafficking;
(k) The executive director of the Washington coalition of crime
victim advocates or his or her designee;
(l) The executive director of the Washington coalition of sexual
assault programs or his or her designee;
(m) The executive director of the Washington state coalition
against domestic violence or his or her designee;
(n) The executive director of the Washington association of cities
or his or her designee;
(o) The executive director of the Washington association of
counties or his or her designee; and
(p) The director or a representative from the crime victims
compensation program.
(3) The duties of the committee include, but are not limited to:
(a) Gathering and assessing service practices from diverse sources
regarding service demand and delivery;
(b) Analyzing data regarding the implementation of sex trafficking
legislation passed in recent years by the legislature, including
reports submitted to the department of commerce pursuant to RCW
9.68A.105, 9A.88.120, and 9A.88.140, and assessing the efficacy of such
legislation in addressing sex trafficking, as well as any obstacles to
the impact of legislation on the commercial sex trade; and
(c) Gathering and reviewing existing data, research, and literature
to help shape a plan of action to address human trafficking in
Washington to include:
(i) Strategies for Washington to undertake to end sex trafficking;
and
(ii) Necessary data collection improvements.
(4) The committee shall meet twice and, by December 2014, produce
a report on its activities, together with a statewide plan to address
sex trafficking in Washington, to the governor's office and the
legislature.
(5) All expenses of the committee shall come from the prostitution
prevention and intervention account created in RCW 43.63A.740.
(6) The members of the committee shall serve without compensation,
but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060, within available resources.
(7) The committee expires December 31, 2014.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.63A.740 and 2010 c 289 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The prostitution prevention and intervention account is created in
the state treasury. ((All designated receipts from fees under RCW
9.68A.105 and 9A.88.120 and fines collected under RCW 9A.88.140 shall
be deposited into the account.)) Expenditures from the account may be
used in the following order of priority:
(1) Funding the statewide coordinating committee on sex
trafficking;
(2) Programs that provide mental health and substance abuse
counseling, parenting skills training, housing relief, education, and
vocational training for youth who have been diverted for a prostitution
or prostitution loitering offense pursuant to RCW 13.40.213;
(((2))) (3) Funding for services provided to sexually exploited
children as defined in RCW 13.32A.030 in secure and semi-secure crisis
residential centers with access to staff trained to meet their specific
needs;
(((3))) (4) Funding for services specified in RCW 74.14B.060 and
74.14B.070 for sexually exploited children; and
(((4))) (5) Funding the grant program to enhance prostitution
prevention and intervention services under RCW 43.63A.720.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.68A.105 and 2012 c 134 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9.68A.100,
9.68A.101, and 9.68A.102, a person who is either convicted or given a
deferred sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a
statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest
for violating RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9.68A.102, or a comparable
county or municipal ordinance shall be assessed a five thousand dollar
fee.
(b) The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend payment of all or
part of the fee assessed unless it finds, on the record, that the
person does not have the ability to pay in which case it may reduce the
fee by an amount up to two-thirds of the maximum allowable fee.
(c) When a minor has been adjudicated a juvenile offender or has
entered into a statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement for an
offense which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a violation
of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9.68A.102, or a comparable county or
municipal ordinance, the court shall assess the fee under (a) of this
subsection. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend payment of all
or part of the fee assessed unless it finds, on the record, that the
minor does not have the ability to pay the fee in which case it may
reduce the fee by an amount up to two-thirds of the maximum allowable
fee.
(2) Fees assessed under this section shall be collected by the
clerk of the court and remitted to the treasurer of the county where
the offense occurred for deposit in the county general fund, except in
cases in which the offense occurred in a city or town that provides for
its own law enforcement, in which case these amounts shall be remitted
to the treasurer of the city or town for deposit in the general fund of
the city or town. Revenue from the fees must be used for local efforts
to reduce the commercial sale of sex including, but not limited to,
increasing enforcement of commercial sex laws.
(a) At least fifty percent of the revenue from fees imposed under
this section must be spent on prevention, including education programs
for offenders, such as john school, and rehabilitative services for
victims, such as mental health and substance abuse counseling,
parenting skills, training, housing relief, education, vocational
training, drop-in centers, and employment counseling.
(b) Two percent of the revenue from fees imposed under this section
shall be remitted quarterly to the department of commerce, together
with a report detailing the fees assessed, the revenue received, and
how that revenue was spent.
(c) Revenues from these fees are not subject to the distribution
requirements under RCW 3.50.100, 3.62.020, 3.62.040, 10.82.070, or
35.20.220.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement" means an
agreement under RCW 13.40.080 or any written agreement between a person
accused of an offense listed in subsection (1) of this section and a
court, county or city prosecutor, or designee thereof, whereby the
person agrees to fulfill certain conditions in lieu of prosecution.
(b) "Deferred sentence" means a sentence that will not be carried
out if the defendant meets certain requirements, such as complying with
the conditions of probation.

Sec. 5 RCW 9A.88.120 and 2012 c 134 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.010 and
9A.88.030, a person who is either convicted or given a deferred
sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a statutory
or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for
violating RCW 9A.88.010, 9A.88.030, or comparable county or municipal
ordinances shall be assessed a fifty dollar fee.
(b) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.090, a person
who is either convicted or given a deferred sentence or a deferred
prosecution or who has entered into a statutory or nonstatutory
diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for violating RCW
9A.88.090 or comparable county or municipal ordinances shall be
assessed a fee in the amount of:
(i) One thousand five hundred dollars if the defendant has no prior
convictions, deferred sentences, deferred prosecutions, or statutory or
nonstatutory diversion agreements for this offense;
(ii) Two thousand five hundred dollars if the defendant has one
prior conviction, deferred sentence, deferred prosecution, or statutory
or nonstatutory diversion agreement for this offense; and
(iii) Five thousand dollars if the defendant has two or more prior
convictions, deferred sentences, deferred prosecutions, or statutory or
nonstatutory diversion agreements for this offense.
(c) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.110, a person
who is either convicted or given a deferred sentence or a deferred
prosecution or who has entered into a statutory or nonstatutory
diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for violating RCW
9A.88.110 or a comparable county or municipal ordinance shall be
assessed a fee in the amount of:
(i) One thousand five hundred dollars if the defendant has no prior
convictions, deferred sentences, deferred prosecutions, or statutory or
nonstatutory diversion agreements for this offense;
(ii) Two thousand five hundred dollars if the defendant has one
prior conviction, deferred sentence, deferred prosecution, or statutory
or nonstatutory diversion agreement for this offense; and
(iii) Five thousand dollars if the defendant has two or more prior
convictions, deferred sentences, deferred prosecutions, or statutory or
nonstatutory diversion agreements for this offense.
(d) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.070 and
9A.88.080, a person who is either convicted or given a deferred
sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a statutory
or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for
violating RCW 9A.88.070, 9A.88.080, or comparable county or municipal
ordinances shall be assessed a fee in the amount of:
(i) Three thousand dollars if the defendant has no prior
convictions, deferred sentences, deferred prosecutions, or statutory or
nonstatutory diversion agreements for this offense;
(ii) Six thousand dollars if the defendant has one prior
conviction, deferred sentence, deferred prosecution, or statutory or
nonstatutory diversion agreement for this offense; and
(iii) Ten thousand dollars if the defendant has two or more prior
convictions, deferred sentences, deferred prosecutions, or statutory or
nonstatutory diversion agreements for this offense.
(2) When a minor has been adjudicated a juvenile offender or has
entered into a statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement for an
offense which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a violation
under this chapter or comparable county or municipal ordinances, the
court shall assess the fee as specified under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) The court shall not reduce, waive, or suspend payment of all or
part of the assessed fee in this section unless it finds, on the
record, that the offender does not have the ability to pay the fee in
which case it may reduce the fee by an amount up to two-thirds of the
maximum allowable fee.
(a) A superior court may, as described in RCW 9.94A.760, set a sum
that the offender is required to pay on a monthly basis towards
satisfying the fee imposed in this section.
(b) A district or municipal court may enter into a payment plan
with the defendant, in which the fee assessed in this section is paid
through scheduled periodic payments. The court may assess the
defendant a reasonable fee for administrative services related to the
operation of the payment plan.
(4) Fees assessed under this section shall be collected by the
clerk of the court and remitted to the treasurer of the county where
the offense occurred for deposit in the county general fund, except in
cases in which the offense occurred in a city or town that provides for
its own law enforcement, in which case these amounts shall be remitted
to the treasurer of the city or town for deposit in the general fund of
the city or town. Revenue from the fees must be used for local efforts
to reduce the commercial sale of sex including, but not limited to,
increasing enforcement of commercial sex laws.
(a) At least fifty percent of the revenue from fees imposed under
this section must be spent on prevention, including education programs
for offenders, such as john school, and rehabilitative services for
victims, such as mental health and substance abuse counseling,
parenting skills, training, housing relief, education, vocational
training, drop-in centers, and employment counseling.
(b) Two percent of the revenue from fees imposed under this section
shall be remitted quarterly to the department of commerce, together
with a report detailing the fees assessed, the revenue received, and
how that revenue was spent.
(c) Revenues from these fees are not subject to the distribution
requirements under RCW 3.50.100, 3.62.020, 3.62.040, 10.82.070, or
35.20.220.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement" means an
agreement under RCW 13.40.080 or any written agreement between a person
accused of an offense listed in subsection (1) of this section and a
court, county, or city prosecutor, or designee thereof, whereby the
person agrees to fulfill certain conditions in lieu of prosecution.
(b) "Deferred sentence" means a sentence that will not be carried
out if the defendant meets certain requirements, such as complying with
the conditions of probation.

Sec. 6 RCW 9A.88.140 and 2010 c 289 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Upon an arrest for a suspected violation of patronizing a
prostitute, promoting prostitution in the first degree, promoting
prostitution in the second degree, promoting travel for prostitution,
the arresting law enforcement officer may impound the person's vehicle
if (i) the motor vehicle was used in the commission of the crime; (ii)
the person arrested is the owner of the vehicle or the vehicle is a
rental car as defined in RCW 46.04.465; and (iii) either (A) the person
arrested has previously been convicted of one of the offenses listed in
this subsection or (B) the offense was committed within an area
designated under (b) of this subsection.
(b) A local governing authority may designate areas within which
vehicles are subject to impoundment under this section regardless of
whether the person arrested has previously been convicted of any of the
offenses listed in (a) of this subsection.
(i) The designation must be based on evidence indicating that the
area has a disproportionately higher number of arrests for the offenses
listed in (a) of this subsection as compared to other areas within the
same jurisdiction.
(ii) The local governing authority shall post signs at the
boundaries of the designated area to indicate that the area has been
designated under this subsection.
(2) Upon an arrest for a suspected violation of commercial sexual
abuse of a minor, promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor, or
promoting travel for commercial sexual abuse of a minor, the arresting
law enforcement officer shall impound the person's vehicle if (a) the
motor vehicle was used in the commission of the crime; and (b) the
person arrested is the owner of the vehicle or the vehicle is a rental
car as defined in RCW 46.04.465.
(3) Impoundments performed under this section shall be in
accordance with chapter 46.55 RCW and the impoundment order must
clearly state "prostitution hold."
(4)(a) Prior to redeeming the impounded vehicle, and in addition to
all applicable impoundment, towing, and storage fees paid to the towing
company under chapter 46.55 RCW, the owner of the impounded vehicle
must pay a fine to the impounding agency. The fine shall be five
hundred dollars for the offenses specified in subsection (1) of this
section, or two thousand five hundred dollars for the offenses
specified in subsection (2) of this section. ((The fine shall be
deposited in the prostitution prevention and intervention account
established under RCW 43.63A.740.))
(b) Upon receipt of the fine paid under (a) of this subsection, the
impounding agency shall issue a written receipt to the owner of the
impounded vehicle.
(c) Fines assessed under this section shall be collected by the
clerk of the court and remitted to the treasurer of the county where
the offense occurred for deposit in the county general fund, except in
cases in which the offense occurred in a city or town that provides for
its own law enforcement, in which case these amounts shall be remitted
to the treasurer of the city or town for deposit in the general fund of
the city or town. Revenue from the fines must be used for local
efforts to reduce the commercial sale of sex including, but not limited
to, increasing enforcement of commercial sex laws.
(i) At least fifty percent of the revenue from fines imposed under
this section must be spent on prevention, including education programs
for offenders, such as john school, and rehabilitative services for
victims, such as mental health and substance abuse counseling,
parenting skills, training, housing relief, education, vocational
training, drop-in centers, and employment counseling.
(ii) Two percent of the revenue from fines imposed under this
section shall be remitted quarterly to the department of commerce,
together with a report detailing the fees assessed, the revenue
received, and how that revenue was spent.
(iii) Revenues from these fees are not subject to the distribution
requirements under RCW 3.50.100, 3.62.020, 3.62.040, 10.82.070, or
35.20.220.
(5)(a) In order to redeem a vehicle impounded under this section,
the owner must provide the towing company with the written receipt
issued under subsection (4)(b) of this section.
(b) The written receipt issued under subsection (4)(b) of this
section authorizes the towing company to release the impounded vehicle
upon payment of all impoundment, towing, and storage fees.
(c) A towing company that relies on a forged receipt to release a
vehicle impounded under this section is not liable to the impounding
authority for any unpaid fine under subsection (4)(a) of this section.
(6)(a) In any proceeding under chapter 46.55 RCW to contest the
validity of an impoundment under this section where the claimant
substantially prevails, the claimant is entitled to a full refund of
the impoundment, towing, and storage fees paid under chapter 46.55 RCW
and the five hundred dollar fine paid under subsection (4) of this
section.
(b) If the person is found not guilty at trial for a crime listed
under subsection (1) of this section, the person is entitled to a full
refund of the impoundment, towing, and storage fees paid under chapter
46.55 RCW and the fine paid under subsection (4) of this section.
(c) All refunds made under this section shall be paid by the
impounding agency.
(d) Prior to receiving any refund under this section, the claimant
must provide proof of payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.280 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of commerce shall prepare and submit an annual
report to the legislature on the amount of revenue collected by local
jurisdictions under RCW 9.68A.105, 9A.88.120, or 9A.88.140 and the
expenditure of that revenue.
(2) Any funds remitted to the department of commerce pursuant to
RCW 9.68A.105, 9A.88.120, or 9A.88.140 shall be spent on the
fulfillment of the duties described in subsection (1) of this section.
Any remaining funds may be spent on the administration of grants for
services for victims of the commercial sex trade, consistent with this
chapter.

--- END ---