BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.100 and 2010 c 180 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a child who is
the subject of an action under this chapter, unless a court for good
cause finds the appointment unnecessary. The requirement of a guardian
ad litem may be deemed satisfied if the child is represented by
independent counsel in the proceedings. The court shall attempt to
match a child with special needs with a guardian ad litem who has
specific training or education related to the child's individual needs.
(2) If the court does not have available to it a guardian ad litem
program with a sufficient number of volunteers, the court may appoint
a suitable person to act as guardian ad litem for the child under this
chapter. Another party to the proceeding or the party's employee or
representative shall not be so appointed.
(3) Each guardian ad litem program shall maintain a background
information record for each guardian ad litem in the program. The
background information record shall include, but is not limited to, the
following information:
(a) Level of formal education;
(b) General training related to the guardian ad litem's duties;
(c) Specific training related to issues potentially faced by
children in the dependency system;
(d) Specific training or education related to child disability or
developmental issues;
(e) Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;
(f) Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and the county or
counties of appointment;
(g) The names of any counties in which the person was removed from
a guardian ad litem registry pursuant to a grievance action, and the
name of the court and the cause number of any case in which the court
has removed the person for cause;
(h) Founded allegations of abuse or neglect as defined in RCW
26.44.020;
(i) The results of an examination of state and national criminal
identification data. The examination shall consist of a background
check as allowed through the Washington state criminal records privacy
act under RCW 10.97.050, the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system under RCW 43.43.832 through 43.43.834, and the
federal bureau of investigation. The background check shall be done
through the Washington state patrol criminal identification section and
must include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation
based on the submission of fingerprints; and
(j) Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, for the period
covering ten years prior to the appointment.
The background information record shall be updated annually. As a
condition of appointment, the guardian ad litem's background
information record shall be made available to the court. If the
appointed guardian ad litem is not a member of a guardian ad litem
program a suitable person appointed by the court to act as guardian ad
litem shall provide the background information record to the court.
Upon appointment, the guardian ad litem, or guardian ad litem
program, shall provide the parties or their attorneys with a copy of
the background information record containing the results of the
background check conducted through the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system under RCW 43.43.832 through 43.43.834. The
portion of the background information record containing the results of
the criminal background check and the criminal history from the federal
bureau of investigation shall not be disclosed to the parties or their
attorneys. The background information record shall not include
identifying information that may be used to harm a guardian ad litem,
such as home addresses and home telephone numbers, and for volunteer
guardians ad litem the court may allow the use of maiden names or
pseudonyms as necessary for their safety.
(4) The appointment of the guardian ad litem shall remain in effect
until the court discharges the appointment or no longer has
jurisdiction, whichever comes first. The guardian ad litem may also be
discharged upon entry of an order of guardianship.
(5) A guardian ad litem through counsel, or as otherwise authorized
by the court, shall have the right to present evidence, examine and
cross-examine witnesses, and to be present at all hearings. A guardian
ad litem shall receive copies of all pleadings and other documents
filed or submitted to the court, and notice of all hearings according
to court rules. The guardian ad litem shall receive all notice
contemplated for a parent or other party in all proceedings under this
chapter.
(6)(a) Pursuant to this subsection, the department or supervising
agency and the child's guardian ad litem shall each notify a child of
his or her right to request counsel and shall ask the child whether he
or she wishes to have counsel. The department or supervising agency
and the child's guardian ad litem shall notify the child and make this
inquiry immediately after:
(i) The date of the child's twelfth birthday;
(ii) Assignment of a case involving a child age twelve or older; or
(iii) July 1, 2010, for a child who turned twelve years old before
July 1, 2010.
(b) The department or supervising agency and the child's guardian
ad litem shall repeat the notification and inquiry at least annually
and upon the filing of any motion or petition affecting the child's
placement, services, or familial relationships.
(c) The notification and inquiry is not required if the child has
already been appointed counsel.
(d) The department or supervising agency shall note in the child's
individual service and safety plan, and the guardian ad litem shall
note in his or her report to the court, that the child was notified of
the right to request counsel and indicate the child's position
regarding appointment of counsel.
(e) At the first regularly scheduled hearing after:
(i) The date of the child's twelfth birthday;
(ii) The date that a dependency petition is filed pursuant to this
chapter on a child age twelve or older; or
(iii) July 1, 2010, for a child who turned twelve years old before
July 1, 2010;
the court shall inquire whether the child has received notice of his or
her right to request legal counsel from the department or supervising
agency and the child's guardian ad litem. The court shall make an
additional inquiry at the first regularly scheduled hearing after the
child's fifteenth birthday. No inquiry is necessary if the child has
already been appointed counsel.
(f) If the child requests legal counsel and is age twelve or older,
or if the guardian ad litem or the court determines that the child
needs to be independently represented by counsel, the court may appoint
an attorney to represent the child's position.
(7) For the purposes of child abuse prevention and treatment act
(42 U.S.C. Secs. 5101 et seq.) grants to this state under P.L. 93-247,
or any related state or federal legislation, a person appointed
pursuant to this section shall be deemed a guardian ad litem to
represent the best interests of the minor in proceedings before the
court.
(8) When a court-appointed special advocate or volunteer guardian
ad litem is requested on a case, the program shall give the court the
name of the person it recommends. The program shall attempt to match
a child with special needs with a guardian ad litem who has specific
training or education related to the child's individual needs. The
court shall immediately appoint the person recommended by the program.
(9) If a party in a case reasonably believes the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem is inappropriate or
unqualified, the party may request a review of the appointment by the
program. The program must complete the review within five judicial
days and remove any appointee for good cause. If the party seeking the
review is not satisfied with the outcome of the review, the party may
file a motion with the court for the removal of the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem on the grounds the
advocate or volunteer is inappropriate or unqualified.

--- END ---