BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.100 and 2010 c 180 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a child who is
the subject of an action under this chapter, unless a court for good
cause finds the appointment unnecessary. The requirement of a guardian
ad litem may be deemed satisfied if the child is represented by
independent counsel in the proceedings. The court shall attempt to
match a child with special needs with a guardian ad litem who has
specific training or education related to the child's individual needs.
(2) If the court does not have available to it a guardian ad litem
program with a sufficient number of volunteers, the court may appoint
a suitable person to act as guardian ad litem for the child under this
chapter. Another party to the proceeding or the party's employee or
representative shall not be so appointed.
(3) Each guardian ad litem program shall maintain a background
information record for each guardian ad litem in the program. The
background information record shall include, but is not limited to, the
following information:
(a) Level of formal education;
(b) General training related to the guardian ad litem's duties;
(c) Specific training related to issues potentially faced by
children in the dependency system;
(d) Specific training or education related to child disability or
developmental issues;
(e) Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;
(f) Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and the county or
counties of appointment;
(g) The names of any counties in which the person was removed from
a guardian ad litem registry pursuant to a grievance action, and the
name of the court and the cause number of any case in which the court
has removed the person for cause;
(h) Founded allegations of abuse or neglect as defined in RCW
26.44.020;
(i) The results of an examination of state and national criminal
identification data. The examination shall consist of a background
check as allowed through the Washington state criminal records privacy
act under RCW 10.97.050, the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system under RCW 43.43.832 through 43.43.834, and the
federal bureau of investigation. The background check shall be done
through the Washington state patrol criminal identification section and
must include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation
based on the submission of fingerprints; and
(j) Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, for the period
covering ten years prior to the appointment.
The background information record shall be updated annually. As a
condition of appointment, the guardian ad litem's background
information record shall be made available to the court. If the
appointed guardian ad litem is not a member of a guardian ad litem
program a suitable person appointed by the court to act as guardian ad
litem shall provide the background information record to the court.
Upon appointment, the guardian ad litem, or guardian ad litem
program, shall provide the parties or their attorneys with a copy of
the background information record containing the results of the
background check conducted through the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system under RCW 43.43.832 through 43.43.834. The
portion of the background information record containing the results of
the criminal background check and the criminal history from the federal
bureau of investigation shall not be disclosed to the parties or their
attorneys. The background information record shall not include
identifying information that may be used to harm a guardian ad litem,
such as home addresses and home telephone numbers, and for volunteer
guardians ad litem the court may allow the use of maiden names or
pseudonyms as necessary for their safety.
(4) The appointment of the guardian ad litem shall remain in effect
until the court discharges the appointment or no longer has
jurisdiction, whichever comes first. The guardian ad litem may also be
discharged upon entry of an order of guardianship.
(5) A guardian ad litem through counsel, or as otherwise authorized
by the court, shall have the right to present evidence, examine and
cross-examine witnesses, and to be present at all hearings. A guardian
ad litem shall receive copies of all pleadings and other documents
filed or submitted to the court, and notice of all hearings according
to court rules. The guardian ad litem shall receive all notice
contemplated for a parent or other party in all proceedings under this
chapter.
(6)(a) Pursuant to this subsection, the department or supervising
agency and the child's guardian ad litem shall each notify a child of
his or her right to request counsel and shall ask the child whether he
or she wishes to have counsel. The department or supervising agency
and the child's guardian ad litem shall notify the child and make this
inquiry immediately after:
(i) The date of the child's twelfth birthday;
(ii) Assignment of a case involving a child age twelve or older; or
(iii) July 1, 2010, for a child who turned twelve years old before
July 1, 2010.
(b) The department or supervising agency and the child's guardian
ad litem shall repeat the notification and inquiry at least annually
and upon the filing of any motion or petition affecting the child's
placement, services, or familial relationships.
(c) The notification and inquiry is not required if the child has
already been appointed counsel.
(d) The department or supervising agency shall note in the child's
individual service and safety plan, and the guardian ad litem shall
note in his or her report to the court, that the child was notified of
the right to request counsel and indicate the child's position
regarding appointment of counsel.
(e) At the first regularly scheduled hearing after:
(i) The date of the child's twelfth birthday;
(ii) The date that a dependency petition is filed pursuant to this
chapter on a child age twelve or older; or
(iii) July 1, 2010, for a child who turned twelve years old before
July 1, 2010;
the court shall inquire whether the child has received notice of his or
her right to request legal counsel from the department or supervising
agency and the child's guardian ad litem. The court shall make an
additional inquiry at the first regularly scheduled hearing after the
child's fifteenth birthday. No inquiry is necessary if the child has
already been appointed counsel.
(f) If the child requests legal counsel and is age twelve or older,
or if the guardian ad litem or the court determines that the child
needs to be independently represented by counsel, the court may appoint
an attorney to represent the child's position.
(7) For the purposes of child abuse prevention and treatment act
(42 U.S.C. Secs. 5101 et seq.) grants to this state under P.L. 93-247,
or any related state or federal legislation, a person appointed
pursuant to this section shall be deemed a guardian ad litem to
represent the best interests of the minor in proceedings before the
court.
(8) When a court-appointed special advocate or volunteer guardian
ad litem is requested on a case, the program shall give the court the
name of the person it recommends. The program shall attempt to match
a child with special needs with a guardian ad litem who has specific
training or education related to the child's individual needs. The
court shall immediately appoint the person recommended by the program.
(9) If a party in a case reasonably believes the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem is inappropriate or
unqualified, the party may request a review of the appointment by the
program. The program must complete the review within five judicial
days and remove any appointee for good cause. If the party seeking the
review is not satisfied with the outcome of the review, the party may
file a motion with the court for the removal of the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem on the grounds the
advocate or volunteer is inappropriate or unqualified.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.230 and 2011 c 350 s 2 and 2011 c 173 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following personal information is exempt from public inspection
and copying under this chapter:
(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients;
(2) Personal information((,)) including, but not limited to,
addresses, telephone numbers, personal electronic mail addresses,
social security numbers, emergency contact and date of birth
information for a participant in a public or nonprofit program serving
or pertaining to children, adolescents, or students, including but not
limited to early learning or child care services, parks and recreation
programs, youth development programs, and after-school programs.
Emergency contact information may be provided to appropriate
authorities and medical personnel for the purpose of treating the
individual during an emergency situation;
(3) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;
(4) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would: (a) Be prohibited to such persons
by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, 84.40.340, or any ordinance
authorized under RCW 35.102.145; or (b) violate the taxpayer's right to
privacy or result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer;
(5) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial ((account
numbers)) information as defined in RCW 9.35.005 including social
security numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or
governed by other law;
(6) Personal and financial information related to a small loan or
any system of authorizing a small loan in RCW 31.45.093; and
(7)(a) Documents and related materials and scanned images of
documents and related materials used to prove identity, age,
residential address, social security number, or other personal
information required to apply for a driver's license or identicard.
(b) Information provided under RCW 46.20.111 that indicates that an
applicant declined to register with the selective service system.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.56.240 and 2012 c 88 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following investigative, law enforcement, and crime victim
information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this
chapter:
(1) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative
records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology
agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to
discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is
essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy;
(2) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law
enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the commission, if
disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical safety, or
property. If at the time a complaint is filed the complainant, victim,
or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or nondisclosure, such
desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed with the commission
about any elected official or candidate for public office must be made
in writing and signed by the complainant under oath;
(3) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b);
(4) License applications under RCW 9.41.070; copies of license
applications or information on the applications may be released to law
enforcement or corrections agencies;
(5) Information revealing the identity of child victims of sexual
assault who are under age eighteen. Identifying information ((means))
includes, but is not limited to the child victim's name, address,
location, photograph, and in cases in which the child victim is a
relative or stepchild of the alleged perpetrator, identification of the
relationship between the child and the alleged perpetrator;
(6) Information contained in a local or regionally maintained gang
database as well as the statewide gang database referenced in RCW
43.43.762;
(7) Data from the electronic sales tracking system established in
RCW 69.43.165;
(8) Information submitted to the statewide unified sex offender
notification and registration program under RCW 36.28A.040(6) by a
person for the purpose of receiving notification regarding a registered
sex offender, including the person's name, residential address, and e-mail address; and
(9) Personally identifying information collected by law enforcement
agencies pursuant to local security alarm system programs and vacation
crime watch programs. Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted
so as to prohibit the legal owner of a residence or business from
accessing information regarding his or her residence or business.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.56.330 and 2012 c 68 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to public utilities and
transportation is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission
or attorney general under RCW 80.04.095 that a court has determined are
confidential under RCW 80.04.095;
(2) The residential addresses and residential telephone numbers of
the customers of a public utility contained in the records or lists
held by the public utility of which they are customers, except that
this information may be released to the division of child support or
the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another
state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, for the
establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order;
(3) The names, residential addresses, residential telephone
numbers, and other individually identifiable records held by an agency
in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or other ride-sharing program or
service((; however, these records)). Participant's names, general
locations, and e-mail addresses may be disclosed to other persons who
apply for ride-matching services and who need that information in order
to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share rides;
(4) The personally identifying information of current or former
participants or applicants in a paratransit or other transit service
operated for the benefit of persons with disabilities or elderly
persons;
(5) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transit passes or other fare payment media including, but not
limited to, stored value smart cards and magnetic strip cards, except
that an agency may disclose personally identifying information to a
person, employer, educational institution, or other entity that is
responsible, in whole or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring
or using a transit pass or other fare payment media for the purpose of
preventing fraud((, or to the news media when reporting on public
transportation or public safety)). As used in this subsection,
"personally identifying information" includes acquisition or use
information pertaining to a specific, individual transit pass or fare
payment media.
(a) Information regarding the acquisition or use of transit passes
or fare payment media may be disclosed in aggregate form if the data
does not contain any personally identifying information.
(b) Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies if the request is accompanied by a court order;
(6) Any information obtained by governmental agencies that is
collected by the use of a motor carrier intelligent transportation
system or any comparable information equipment attached to a truck,
tractor, or trailer; however, the information may be given to other
governmental agencies or the owners of the truck, tractor, or trailer
from which the information is obtained. As used in this subsection,
"motor carrier" has the same definition as provided in RCW 81.80.010;
(7) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transponders or other technology to facilitate payment of
tolls. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form as long as
the data does not contain any personally identifying information. For
these purposes aggregate data may include the census tract of the
account holder as long as any individual personally identifying
information is not released. Personally identifying information may be
released to law enforcement agencies only for toll enforcement
purposes. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies for other purposes only if the request is
accompanied by a court order; and
(8) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use a driver's license or identicard that includes a radio
frequency identification chip or similar technology to facilitate
border crossing. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form
as long as the data does not contain any personally identifying
information. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies only for United States customs and border
protection enforcement purposes. Personally identifying information
may be released to law enforcement agencies for other purposes only if
the request is accompanied by a court order.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.148.060 and 2005 c 274 s 341 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All ((examination and proprietary reports and)) information
except for proprietary reports or information obtained by the director
and the director's staff in soliciting bids from insurers and in
monitoring the insurer selected by the director shall ((not)) be made
public or otherwise disclosed to any person, firm, corporation, agency,
association, governmental body, or other entity.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the director
may furnish all or part of examination reports prepared by the director
or by any person, firm, corporation, association, or other entity
preparing the reports on behalf of the director to:
(a) The Washington state insurance commissioner;
(b) A person or organization officially connected with the insurer
as officer, director, attorney, auditor, or independent attorney or
independent auditor; and
(c) The attorney general in his or her role as legal advisor to the
director.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the director
may furnish all or part of the examination or proprietary reports or
information obtained by the director to:
(a) The Washington state insurance commissioner; and
(b) A person, firm, corporation, association, governmental body, or
other entity with whom the director has contracted for services
necessary to perform his or her official duties.
(4) ((Examination reports and)) Proprietary information obtained by
the director and the director's staff ((are)) is not subject to public
disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.
(5) A person who violates any provision of this section is guilty
of a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---