BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature makes the following
findings:
(1) In order to mitigate the negative consequences of greenhouse
gas and particulate air emissions, every state and nation in the world
must do its part to develop clean energy technology.
(2) The sooner that economies of scale are available for the
manufacture and marketing of renewable energy technologies, the sooner
these technologies will become cost-competitive or even less expensive
than traditional, polluting sources of energy.
(3) The clean technology sector of the economy is one that is
growing rapidly, even in a time when other sectors have been stagnant
or in a recession.
(4) In enacting incentives for renewable energy systems, the
legislature intends to attract to Washington a vibrant clean technology
sector.
(5) The tax incentives created in this act can be an important
economic development tool, increasing high-wage employment both east
and west of the Cascade mountains.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature, in modifying the existing
renewable energy investment cost recovery incentive program, to improve
utilization of the incentive by state residents and businesses,
streamline program administration, and incubate the development of
clean energy technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the effectiveness of attempts to
foster job creation and retention are important aspects of setting tax
policy. In order to make policy choices regarding the best use of
limited state resources, the legislature needs to know how tax
incentives are used, and the degree to which incentive programs meet
the legislature's intent.
(2) The legislature intends to achieve the following performance
milestones as a result of the incentives awarded under this act:
(a) Increased utilization of the available tax credits, as
evidenced by:
(i) A one hundred percent increase in the number of solar energy
systems installed and receiving the incentive, from the 2012 baseline;
and
(ii) A one hundred percent increase in the total generating
capacity of installed systems, from the 2012 baseline;
(b) A decrease over time in the levelized cost of the systems
receiving the tax preferences; and
(c) Growth of solar-related employment, as evidenced by:
(i) An increase in the total number and per capita rate of solar-related jobs in Washington;
(ii) Achievement of a top ten national ranking for solar-related
employment and a top nine ranking for per capita solar-related
employment;
(d) An increase in the utilization of, and employment related to,
nonsolar renewable energy systems eligible to receive the incentives
created in this act; and
(e) Leveraging of nonstate funds, as measured by a report of the
total dollar value of tax credits awarded within each county and zip
code, and the total amount of nonstate funds leveraged within each
county and zip code.
(3)(a) The department must collect, through its application and
certification process, data from persons receiving the tax preferences
created in this act as necessary to report on progress toward achieving
the performance milestones listed in subsection (1) of this section.
(b) In compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department must submit an
annual report to the legislature that details the progress achieved in
reaching the outcome specified in subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section.
(4) All recipients of tax credits or incentive payments awarded
under this chapter must provide any data requested for reporting
purposes. Failure to comply may result in the loss of a tax credit
award or incentive payment in the following year.
(5) As part of its 2019 tax preference reviews conducted under
chapter 43.136 RCW, the joint legislative audit and review committee
must assess the performance of the incentives created in this act, with
reference to all of the performance milestones established in this
section.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.16.120 and 2011 c 179 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a) Any individual, business, local governmental entity, not
in the light and power business or in the gas distribution business, or
a participant in a community solar project may apply to the light and
power business serving the situs of the system, each fiscal year
beginning on July 1, 2005, for an investment cost recovery incentive
for each kilowatt-hour from a customer-generated electricity renewable
energy system)) Beginning July 1, 2013, any person, as defined in RCW
82.04.030, may apply to receive a voucher from an agency designated by
the governor entitling the person to receive annual incentive payments
from the light and power business serving the situs of a renewable
energy system for a term of ten years. Throughout this act, "agency
designated by the governor" means any unit of state government that the
governor designates to administer the program created in this chapter.
Eligibility to receive the voucher is limited as follows:
(a) The person applying to receive the voucher must be:
(i) The meter holder, meaning the party responsible to the light
and power business for paying for electricity transmitted to the situs
of an eligible renewable energy system;
(ii) The owner of the renewable energy system; and
(iii) Not a person who is a light and power business.
(b) In the case of a community solar project as defined in RCW
82.16.110(2)(a)(i), the administrator must apply for the investment
cost recovery incentive on behalf of each of the other owners.
(c) In the case of a community solar project as defined in RCW
82.16.110(2)(a)(iii), the company owning the community solar project
must apply for the investment cost recovery incentive on behalf of each
member of the company.
(((2))) (d) In the case of a customer-generated renewable energy
system for which a person has already received payments prior to July
1, 2013, under RCW 82.16.120, a person may apply to receive a voucher
as provided in this act entitling the person to receive incentive
payments until June 30, 2023.
(2) The award of a voucher creates a contractually enforceable
promise on behalf of the state to authorize the light and power
business to receive a credit against the taxes due under this chapter
for an amount equal to the annual incentive payments made under this
section in any fiscal year. A light and power business that chooses to
participate in the voucher program created in this section may cease to
accept vouchers for new systems at any time, but must continue to make
payments pursuant to any existing voucher for its entire term, unless
a court has declared the incentives provided under this section to be
illegal.
(3) Eligibility to receive the incentive payments provided in
subsection (1) of this section is limited as follows:
(a) The person applying to receive the voucher must be the meter
holder, meaning the party responsible to the light and power business
for paying for electricity transmitted to the situs of an eligible
renewable energy system. The meter holder need not occupy the real
property upon which the system is installed; and
(b) An owner of the renewable energy system.
(4) When the meter holder is a residential retail electric
customer, the system must have an electrical generating capacity of not
more than five kilowatts, and when the meter holder is not a
residential retail electric customer, the system must have an
electrical generating capacity of not more than one hundred kilowatts.
(5)(a) Before submitting for the first time the application for the
incentive allowed under ((subsection (4) of)) this section, the
applicant must submit to the department of revenue and to the ((climate
and rural energy development center at the Washington State University,
established under RCW 28B.30.642,)) agency designated by the governor
a certification in a form and manner prescribed by the department that
includes, but is not limited to, the following information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system.
(A) If the applicant is an administrator of a community solar
project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(i), the certification must
also include the name and address of each of the owners of the
community solar project.
(B) If the applicant is a company that owns a community solar
project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(iii), the certification must
also include the name and address of each member of the company;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) That the electricity produced by the applicant meets the
definition of "customer-generated electricity" or is generated by a
system that meets the eligibility requirements set forth in subsection
(3) of this section, and that the renewable energy system produces
electricity with:
(A) Any solar inverters and solar modules manufactured in
Washington state;
(B) A wind generator powered by blades manufactured in Washington
state;
(C) A solar inverter manufactured in Washington state;
(D) A solar module manufactured in Washington state;
(E) A stirling converter manufactured in Washington state; or
(F) Solar or wind equipment manufactured outside of Washington
state;
(iv) That the electricity can be transformed or transmitted for
entry into or operation in parallel with electricity transmission and
distribution systems; ((and))
(v) The date that the renewable energy system received its final
electrical permit from the applicable local jurisdiction;
(vi) The annual electricity consumption at the meter in the
previous calendar year, or an engineering estimate of the projected
annual consumption, if no record of annual consumption at the meter is
available or if electricity consumption at the meter has substantially
changed; and
(vii) A projection of the annual electricity production of the
system in kilowatt-hours.
(b) Within thirty days of receipt of the certification the
((department of revenue)) agency designated by the governor must notify
the applicant by mail, or electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.135,
whether the renewable energy system qualifies for an incentive under
this section. ((The department may consult with the climate and rural
energy development center to determine eligibility for the incentive.))
The agency designated by the governor must either issue the voucher or
inform the applicant of the reason that the application is denied.
System certifications, applications, vouchers, and the information
contained therein are subject to disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(l).
(((3))) (c) The agency designated by the governor is authorized to
assess an application fee to recover its costs of administering the
program established in this section.
(6)(a) The agency designated by the governor must also transmit the
voucher electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.135 to the light and
power business serving the situs of the system.
(b) The voucher must state the first and last day of the ten-year
term, or other term in the case of persons receiving a voucher as
provided in subsection (1)(d) of this section, for which the applicant
has qualified to receive production incentive payments from the light
and power business.
(c) The light and power business, upon receiving the voucher, must
make incentive payments for each kilowatt-hour of electricity
generated.
(d) If, during the ten-year term of the voucher, there is a change
in the meter holder and a new party becomes financially responsible to
the light and power business, the voucher is transferrable to the new
meter holder, provided that the new meter holder is also a person
eligible to receive payments under this section.
(7)(a) By August 1st of each year ((application for the incentive
must be made to the light and power business serving the situs of the
system by certification in a form and manner prescribed by the
department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information)), the agency designated by the governor must receive a
report of the amount of kilowatt-hours generated in the immediately
preceding fiscal year by any system for which a person is receiving
incentive payments pursuant to this section. The report may be
submitted in one of the following ways:
(i) ((The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system.
(A) If the applicant is an administrator of a community solar
project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(i), the application must also
include the name and address of each of the owners of the community
solar project.
(B) If the applicant is a company that owns a community solar
project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(iii), the application must
also include the name and address of each member of the company;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) The date of the notification from the department of revenue
stating that the renewable energy system is eligible for the incentives
under this section; and
(iv) A statement of the amount of kilowatt-hours generated by the
renewable energy system in the prior fiscal year.)) The light and power
business serving the situs of the system may report the amount of
kilowatt-hours generated by the system over the course of the year, as
determined by reading a production meter or any other meter that the
utility determines to be ninety-eight percent accurate; or
(ii) The person receiving incentive payments may submit a statement
in the form of a sworn affidavit reporting the amount of kilowatt-hours
generated by the system over the course of the year.
(b) Within sixty days of receipt of the ((incentive certification))
report required by subsection (7) of this section, the agency
designated by the governor must notify the light and power business
serving the situs of the system ((must notify the applicant in
writing)) whether the incentive payment will be authorized or denied.
The business may consult with the climate and rural energy development
center to determine eligibility for the incentive payment. Incentive
certifications and the information contained therein are subject to
disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(l).
(c)(i) Persons, administrators of community solar projects, and
companies receiving incentive payments must keep and preserve, for a
period of five years, suitable records as may be necessary to determine
the amount of incentive applied for and received. Such records must be
open for examination at any time upon notice by the light and power
business that made the payment or by the department. If upon
examination of any records or from other information obtained by the
business or department it appears that an incentive has been paid in an
amount that exceeds the correct amount of incentive payable, the
business may assess against the person for the amount found to have
been paid in excess of the correct amount of incentive payable and must
add thereto interest on the amount. Interest is assessed in the manner
that the department assesses interest upon delinquent tax under RCW
82.32.050.
(ii) If it appears that the amount of incentive paid is less than
the correct amount of incentive payable the business may authorize
additional payment.
(((4))) (8) Except for community solar projects, the investment
cost recovery incentive may be paid fifteen cents per economic
development kilowatt-hour unless requests exceed the amount authorized
for credit to the participating light and power business. For
community solar projects, the investment cost recovery incentive may be
paid thirty cents per economic development kilowatt-hour unless
requests exceed the amount authorized for credit to the participating
light and power business. For the purposes of this section, the rate
paid for the investment cost recovery incentive may be multiplied by
the following factors:
(a) For ((customer-generated)) electricity produced using solar
modules manufactured in Washington state or a solar stirling converter
manufactured in Washington state, two and four-tenths;
(b) For ((customer-generated)) electricity produced using a solar
or a wind generator equipped with an inverter manufactured in
Washington state, one and two-tenths;
(c) For ((customer-generated)) electricity produced using an
anaerobic digester, or by other solar equipment or using a wind
generator equipped with blades manufactured in Washington state, one;
and
(d) For all other ((customer-generated)) electricity produced by
wind, eight-tenths.
(((5)(a) No individual, household, business, or local governmental
entity is eligible for incentives provided under subsection (4) of this
section for more than five thousand dollars per year.)) (9) On or after
July 1, 2018, a new base rate and multipliers may go into effect. New
rates and multipliers adopted under the authority of this subsection
will be applicable to any vouchers awarded after July 1, 2018. The
rates must be adjusted to reflect decreases in the capital costs of
purchasing and installing a renewable energy system, changes in the
levelized costs of such systems, or other factors that the agency deems
relevant to fulfilling the purpose of incentivizing job growth and the
environmental and economic benefits of renewable energy in the state.
(10)(a) No person is eligible for incentives under this section for
electricity generated in excess of the net kilowatt-hours consumed
annually at the metered location. No person is eligible for incentives
provided under this section for more than twenty-five thousand dollars
per year per eligible renewable energy system.
(b) Except as provided in (c) through (((e))) (d) of this
subsection (((5))) (10), each applicant in a community solar project is
eligible for up to five thousand dollars per year.
(c) Where the applicant is an administrator of a community solar
project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(i), each owner is eligible
for an incentive but only in proportion to the ownership share of the
project, up to five thousand dollars per year.
(d) Where the applicant is a company owning a community solar
project that has applied for an investment cost recovery incentive on
behalf of its members, each member of the company is eligible for an
incentive that would otherwise belong to the company but only in
proportion to each ownership share of the company, up to five thousand
dollars per year. The company itself is not eligible for incentives
under this section.
(((e) In the case of a utility-owned community solar project, each
ratepayer that contributes to the project is eligible for an incentive
in proportion to the contribution, up to five thousand dollars per
year.
(6))) (11) If, at any time before July 1, 2018, requests for the
investment cost recovery incentive exceed fifty percent of the amount
of funds available for credit to the participating light and power
business, the ((incentive payments must be reduced proportionately.
(7) The climate and rural energy development center at Washington
State University energy program may establish guidelines and standards
for technologies that are identified as Washington manufactured and
therefore most beneficial to the state's environment)) agency
designated by the governor must notify the governor and the legislature
and must adjust base rates and multipliers to a level expected to allow
all eligible systems to continue to apply for and receive incentives.
New rates and multipliers adopted under the authority of this
subsection (11) will be applicable to any vouchers awarded after the
new rates and multipliers are adopted.
(((8))) (12) The environmental attributes of the renewable energy
system belong to the applicant, and do not transfer to the state or the
light and power business upon receipt of the investment cost recovery
incentive.
(((9))) (13) No incentive may be paid under this section for
kilowatt-hours generated before July 1, 2005((, or after June 30,
2020)). No new vouchers may be issued after June 30, 2023.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.16.130 and 2010 c 202 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A light and power business ((shall be)) is allowed a credit
against taxes due under this chapter in an amount equal to the
investment cost recovery incentive payments made in any fiscal year
under RCW 82.16.120. The credit shall be taken in a form and manner as
required by the department. ((The credit under this section for the
fiscal year may not exceed one-half percent of the businesses' taxable
power sales due under RCW 82.16.020(1)(b) or one hundred thousand
dollars, whichever is greater.))
(2) Incentive payments to participants in a utility-owned community
solar project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(ii) may only account
for up to twenty-five percent of the total allowable credit. Incentive
payments to participants in a company-owned community solar project as
defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(iii) may only account for up to five
percent of the total allowable credit.
(3) The total credit claimed under this section may not exceed the
tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. Refunds ((shall))
may not be granted in the place of credits. Expenditures not used to
earn a credit in one fiscal year may not be used to earn a credit in
subsequent years.
(((2))) (4) For any light and power business that has claimed
credit for amounts that exceed the correct amount of the incentive
payable under RCW 82.16.120, the amount of tax against which credit was
claimed for the excess payments ((shall be)) is immediately due and
payable. The department ((shall)) must assess interest but not
penalties on the taxes against which the credit was claimed. Interest
((shall be)) is assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise
taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the date the credit was
claimed, and ((shall)) accrues until the taxes against which the credit
was claimed are repaid.
(((3) The right to earn tax credits under this section expires June
30, 2020. Credits may not be claimed after June 30, 2021.)) (5) For
incentive payments made pursuant to RCW 82.16.120, the authority of the
agency designated by the governor to issue a voucher expires June 30,
2023.
(6) The total credits available under this section is the aggregate
of 0.5% of each participating light and power businesses' annual
taxable power sales in the immediately preceding calendar year.
Credits are available on a first-come, first-served basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that allowing utilities to finance and
own renewable energy systems may help achieve the objectives of
increasing the number of renewable energy systems in the state and
incubating the development of the state's clean energy technology
industry. Third-party ownership is also a tool to increase access to
renewable energy systems for those residents and businesses who cannot
leverage sufficient capital to pay the full cost of a renewable energy
system upfront. The legislature intends to make a renewable energy
investment cost recovery incentive tax credit available to renewable
energy systems owned and financed by utilities.
(2) A qualifying utility, as defined in RCW 19.285.030(18), may
claim a credit under this section for electricity generated by a solar
energy system that has a generating capacity of not more than one
hundred kilowatts, is installed on the premises of a residential or
commercial retail electric customer of the qualifying utility in
Washington, and is owned by the qualifying utility.
(3) The credit allowed for solar energy systems owned by a
qualifying utility may not exceed 0.5% of the qualifying utility's
taxable power sales due under RCW 82.16.020(1)(b), or one hundred
thousand dollars, whichever is greater.
(4) The credit that may be claimed by a qualifying utility for
power generated by a solar energy system is equal to the amount of
incentive payment a community solar project with the same power
generation, consumption, and system components would have been eligible
to receive under RCW 82.16.120.
(5) The environmental attributes of the solar energy system belong
to the qualifying utility.
(6) The total credit claimed under this section and RCW 82.16.130
may not exceed the tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter.
Refunds may not be granted in the place of credits. Expenditures not
used to earn a credit in one fiscal year may not be used to earn a
credit in subsequent years.
(7) For any qualifying utility that has claimed credit for amounts
that exceed the correct amount of the incentive payable under RCW
82.16.120, the amount of tax against which credit was claimed for the
excess payments is immediately due and payable. The department must
assess interest but not penalties on the taxes against which the credit
was claimed. Interest is assessed at the rate provided for delinquent
excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW retroactively to the date the
credit was claimed and accrues until the taxes against which the credit
was claimed are repaid.
(8) The legislature intends to achieve the following performance
milestones as a result of the tax preference created in this section:
(a) Increased utilization of available tax credits at a growth rate
of five percent each year for the first five years of the program; and
(b) Improved ability of consumers, regardless of their ability to
pay upfront for the full capital costs of a renewable energy system, to
install renewable energy systems on their real property. This
milestone must be tracked by requiring those applying to receive
incentive payments for a system owned or financed by a third party to
indicate in their application whether they would have had the financial
ability to fully fund the upfront installation costs for a system if
systems leased from third-party owners had not been eligible to receive
the incentive.
(9)(a) In the calendar year preceding the expiration of this
section, the joint legislative audit and review committee must report
to the legislature on the effectiveness of the program in achieving the
objectives described in subsection (8) of this section.
(b) Upon request of the joint legislative audit and review
committee, the department of revenue and other agencies must cooperate
by providing any data or information requested.
(10)(a) The qualifying utility must provide the customer on whose
premises a solar energy system is being installed a contract that
includes, but is not limited to, the following information:
(i) A guarantee of the minimum annual kilowatt-hours that the
system will generate for the entire term of the contract;
(ii) In the case of a lease, a clear payment schedule with a total
amount, inclusive of all fees, costs, and other charges, listed for
each month and for each year of the entire term of the lease agreement;
(iii) An acknowledgment that the utility is responsible for system
installation, repairs, and monitoring for the duration of the
agreement;
(iv) Protections against damage to the customer's property caused
by the system, its installation, and removal, including a clear
statement of whose responsibility it is to pay any costs associated
with restoring the customer's property to its original condition after
removal of the system at the end of the lease term; and
(v) A disclosure of the terms and conditions governing when the
property is sold or transferred.
(b) A qualifying utility must provide the customer a separate
document with an easy to read, nontechnical summary of the provisions
required under (a) of this subsection.
(c) The qualifying utility must compile and make available to the
joint legislative audit and review committee a report of the average
price per kilowatt-hour of electricity generated by the systems
authorized in this section, as compared to the average price per
kilowatt-hour of electricity generated by systems that received or are
receiving the incentive under RCW 82.16.120.
(11) After December 31, 2015, if in compliance with other
applicable law or rule, the agency designated by the governor may
authorize renewable energy systems owned by third parties other than
utilities to qualify for the incentives created under RCW 82.16.120.
Nonutility third-party owners of renewable energy systems may only be
authorized to receive the incentives if, in the agency's determination,
based on objective criteria, such ownership is consistent with the
legislature's objectives as established in section 2 of this act and
subsection (1) of this section. The agency, in making its
determination, must hold meetings with interested parties, and provide
notice and an opportunity for public comment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Upon request by an electrical company, the commission may
approve a tariff allowing the company to recover its costs from
acquiring, installing, operating, and maintaining cost-effective
distributed solar energy systems at the premises of retail electric
customers of the company.
(b) The cost basis for a distributed solar energy system must
include, but may not be limited to:
(i) A fair return on common equity equal to the return that the
commission has authorized for the company's other capital assets;
(ii) The cost of debt incurred for investments made in the
acquisition, installation, operation, and maintenance of distributed
solar energy systems; and
(iii) Any reasonable incentive the company may offer to a retail
electric customer to secure the right to place a distributed solar
energy system on their premises.
(c) Costs incurred by the company to acquire, install, operate, and
maintain a distributed solar energy system must be offset by:
(i) The value of an investment cost recovery incentive payable to
the company under sections 5 and 6 of this act;
(ii) The estimated value of renewable energy credits produced by
distributed solar energy systems owned by the company; and
(iii) The value of any other state and federal tax credits that may
accrue to the company from the production of energy from a distributed
solar energy system.
(d) If the company determines that a customer or class of customers
should contribute a reasonable amount to the electrical utility's cost
of acquiring, installing, operating, and maintaining a distributed
solar energy system in order for the system to be cost-effective, it
may specify the amount of the contribution in its tariff. The
commission may approve or deny the company's request to include a
customer contribution in the tariff, or revise the contribution
requirement to an amount that will not increase financial risk to the
company's shareholders or other customers. The commission may only
deny the request for a customer contribution upon a finding that the
tariff is fair, just, reasonable, and sufficient without the customer
contribution requirement.
(e)(i) Once the company has recovered its costs under the tariff,
the distributed solar energy system is no longer necessary and useful
to the company pursuant to RCW 80.12.020. The tariff must specify the
terms and conditions, including guidelines for establishing a fair
market value, under which a customer may purchase the distributed solar
energy system located at its premises after the company has recovered
its costs under the tariff. Once the company has recovered its costs
under the tariff, it may convey ownership of a distributed solar energy
system without cost to a retail electric customer who has made a
contribution under (d) of this subsection.
(ii) Any payments received by a company from the sale of
distributed solar energy systems must be deposited in a segregated
account to be used by the company to supplement any other measures it
may use under (c) of this subsection to offset costs incurred by the
company to acquire, install, operate, and maintain a distributed solar
energy system.
(2) A distributed solar energy system that has been installed
pursuant to this section is not eligible for net metering under chapter
80.60 RCW while the system is owned by the company.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Cost-effective" means, at the time a distributed solar energy
system is placed in the rate base, the distributed solar energy system
is reasonably expected to generate energy at a total incremental system
cost, per unit of energy delivered to end use, that is less than, or
equal to, the comparable cost from the lowest reasonable cost eligible
renewable resource, as identified in the company's last completed
integrated resource plan under chapter 19.280 RCW, considering:
(i) The value of an investment cost recovery incentive payable to
the company under RCW 82.16.120;
(ii) The estimated value of renewable energy credits produced by
distributed solar energy systems owned by the company;
(iii) The value of any other state and federal tax credits that may
accrue to the company from the production of energy from a distributed
solar energy system; and
(iv) The financial contribution that may be required from a
customer pursuant to subsection (1)(d) of this section.
(b) "Distributed solar energy system" means any device or
combination of devices or elements that relies upon direct sunlight as
an energy source for use in the generation of electricity and has an
electrical generating capacity of not more than five kilowatts, when
the meter holder is a residential retail electric customer, and not
more than one hundred kilowatts, when the meter holder is a commercial
retail electric customer.
(c) "Eligible renewable resource" has the same meaning as defined
under RCW 19.285.030.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---