BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature supports student access to
a variety of educational options, both public and private. However,
state policies regarding the approval of private schools were created
before online learning was possible. Consequently, these policies do
not provide for approval criteria that are sufficiently flexible to
accommodate online learning. While some policy adjustments have been
made to permit public online choices, current law does not provide a
clear process for private schools to obtain state approval to offer
similar learning options.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.195
RCW to read as follows:
(1) If a private school that has been approved under this chapter
by the state board of education seeks approval also to offer and
administer an online school program as defined under RCW 28A.250.010,
including under contract with a third party, the requirements for
minimum instructional hour offerings under RCW 28A.195.010(1) shall be
deemed met for the online school program. A residential dwelling of a
parent, guardian, or custodian shall be deemed an adequate physical
facility for students enrolled in the online school program. The
online school program is not required to be offered for the same grade
levels as the approved private school.
(2) The state board of education may approve an online school
program under this section that meets other applicable requirements
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The private school advisory committee
appointed under RCW 28A.195.050 shall examine issues associated with
state approval of online school programs offered by private schools and
shall consider whether criteria or procedures for approval in addition
to those provided in section 2 of this act should be considered by the
legislature. The committee must submit a report on its deliberations,
with recommendations if necessary, to the education committees of the
legislature by January 10, 2014. In developing recommendations, the
committee shall be mindful of the legislature's intent that private
schools should be subject only to those minimum state controls
necessary to ensure the health and safety of all the students in the
state and to ensure a sufficient basic education to meet usual
graduation requirements.

--- END ---