BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.102 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter expires June 30, 2044.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 39.102.904 (Expiration date -- 2006 c 181)
and 2006 c 181 s 707 are each repealed.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.14.475 and 2010 c 164 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local
government, that has been approved by the board to use local
infrastructure financing may impose a sales and use tax in accordance
with the terms of this chapter and subject to the criteria set forth in
this section. Except as provided in this section, the tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and is collected from those
persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the taxing jurisdiction
of the sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local government.
(2) The tax authorized under subsection (1) of this section is
credited against the state taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.020(1) and
82.12.020 at the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1). The department
must perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the sponsoring
local government or cosponsoring local government at no cost to the
sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local government and must
remit the taxes as provided in RCW 82.14.060.
(3) The aggregate rate of tax imposed by the sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local government, must not exceed the
lesser of:
(a) The rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1) less:
(i) The aggregate rates of all other local sales and use taxes
imposed by any taxing authority on the same taxable events;
(ii) The aggregate rates of all taxes under RCW 82.14.465 and this
section that are authorized to be imposed on the same taxable events
but have not yet been imposed by a sponsoring local government or
cosponsoring local government that has been approved by the department
or the community economic revitalization board to receive a state
contribution under chapter 39.100 or 39.102 RCW; and
(iii) The percentage amount of distributions required under RCW
82.08.020(5) multiplied by the rate of state taxes imposed under RCW
82.08.020(1); and
(b) The rate, as determined by the sponsoring local government, and
any cosponsoring local government, in consultation with the department,
reasonably necessary to receive the state contribution over ten months.
(4) Sponsoring local governments that have been approved before
October 1, 2008, by the community economic revitalization board for a
state contribution must select the rate of tax under this section no
later than September 1, 2009.
(5) The department, upon request, must assist a sponsoring local
government and cosponsoring local government in establishing their tax
rate in accordance with subsection (3) of this section. Once the rate
of tax is selected, it may not be increased.
(6)(a) No tax may be imposed under the authority of this section:
(i) Before July 1st of the second calendar year following the year
approval by the board under RCW 39.102.040 was made; and
(ii) Until a sponsoring local government reports to the board and
the department as required by RCW 39.102.140 that the state has
benefited through the receipt of state excise tax allocation revenues
or state property tax allocation revenues, or both.
(b) The tax imposed under this section expires when all
indebtedness issued under the authority of RCW 39.102.150 is retired
and all other contractual obligations relating to the financing of
public improvements under chapter 39.102 RCW are satisfied, but not
more than twenty-five years after the tax is first imposed.
(7) An ordinance adopted by the legislative authority of a
sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local government imposing
a tax under this section must provide that:
(a) The tax is first imposed on the first day of a fiscal year;
(b) The cumulative amount of tax received by the sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local government, in any fiscal year
may not exceed the amount of the state contribution;
(c) The tax will cease to be distributed for the remainder of any
fiscal year in which either:
(i) The amount of tax received by the sponsoring local government,
and any cosponsoring local government, equals the amount of the state
contribution;
(ii) The amount of revenue from taxes imposed under this section by
all sponsoring and cosponsoring local governments equals the annual
state contribution limit; or
(iii) The amount of tax received by the sponsoring local government
equals the amount of project award granted in the approval notice
described in RCW 39.102.040;
(d) Neither the local excise tax allocation revenues nor the local
property tax allocation revenues may constitute more than eighty
percent of the total local funds as described in RCW 39.102.020(((28)))
(29)(b). This requirement applies beginning January 1st of the fifth
calendar year after the calendar year in which the sponsoring local
government begins allocating local excise tax allocation revenues under
RCW 39.102.110;
(e) The tax must be distributed again, should it cease to be
distributed for any of the reasons provided in (c) of this subsection,
at the beginning of the next fiscal year, subject to the restrictions
in this section; and
(f) Any revenue generated by the tax in excess of the amounts
specified in (c) of this subsection belongs to the state of Washington.
(8) If a county and city cosponsor a revenue development area, the
combined amount of distributions received by both the city and county
may not exceed the state contribution.
(9) The department must determine the amount of tax receipts
distributed to each sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring
local government, imposing sales and use tax under this section and
shall advise a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government when tax
distributions for the fiscal year equal the amount of state
contribution for that fiscal year as provided in subsection (11) of
this section. Determinations by the department of the amount of tax
distributions attributable to each sponsoring or cosponsoring local
government are final and may not be used to challenge the validity of
any tax imposed under this section. The department must remit any tax
receipts in excess of the amounts specified in subsection (7)(c) of
this section to the state treasurer who must deposit the money in the
general fund.
(10) If a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government fails to
comply with RCW 39.102.140, no tax may be distributed in the subsequent
fiscal year until such time as the sponsoring or cosponsoring local
government complies and the department calculates the state
contribution amount for such fiscal year.
(11) Each year, the amount of taxes approved by the department for
distribution to a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government in the
next fiscal year must be equal to the state contribution and may be no
more than the total local funds as described in RCW 39.102.020(((28)))
(29)(b). The department must consider information from reports
described in RCW 39.102.140 when determining the amount of state
contributions for each fiscal year. The department's determination of
the amount of the state contribution is final and conclusive, and may
not be changed once such determination is made and such contribution is
distributed to the sponsoring or cosponsoring local government, unless
the department subsequently determines that local revenue information
contained in a report described in RCW 39.102.140 differs from the
actual dedicated local revenue. If a discrepancy is found, the
department must adjust its determination accordingly. A sponsoring or
cosponsoring local government may not receive, in any fiscal year, more
revenues from taxes imposed under the authority of this section than
the amount approved annually by the department. The department may not
approve the receipt of more distributions of sales and use tax under
this section to a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government than is
authorized under subsection (7) of this section.
(12) The amount of tax distributions received from taxes imposed
under the authority of this section by all sponsoring and cosponsoring
local governments is limited annually to not more than seven million
five hundred thousand dollars.
(13) The definitions in RCW 39.102.020 apply to this section unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(14) If a sponsoring local government is a federally recognized
Indian tribe, the distribution of the sales and use tax authorized
under this section must be authorized through an interlocal agreement
pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW.
(15) Subject to RCW 39.102.195, the tax imposed under the authority
of this section may be applied either to provide for the payment of
debt service on bonds issued under RCW 39.102.150 by the sponsoring
local government or to pay public improvement costs on a pay-as-you-go
basis, or both.
(16) The tax imposed under the authority of this section must cease
to be imposed if the sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local
government ((fails to issue indebtedness under the authority of RCW
39.102.150, and)) fails to commence construction on public
improvements((,)) by June ((30th of the fifth fiscal year in which the
local tax authorized under this section is imposed)) 30, 2017.
(17) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Local sales and use taxes" means sales and use taxes imposed
by cities, counties, public facilities districts, and other local
governments under the authority of this chapter, chapter 67.28 or 67.40
RCW, or any other chapter, and that are credited against the state
sales and use taxes.
(b) "State sales and use taxes" means the tax imposed in RCW
82.08.020(1) and the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 at the rate provided
in RCW 82.08.020(1).
(18) This section expires June 30, 2044.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.102.150 and 2009 c 267 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government that has designated a revenue
development area and instead of paying public improvement costs on a
pay-as-you-go basis has been authorized the use of local infrastructure
financing may incur general indebtedness, including issuing general
obligation bonds, to finance the public improvements and retire the
indebtedness in whole or in part from local excise tax allocation
revenues, local property tax allocation revenues, and sales and use
taxes imposed under the authority of RCW 82.14.475 that it receives,
subject to the following requirements:
(a)(i) The ordinance adopted by the sponsoring local government and
authorizing the use of local infrastructure financing indicates an
intent to incur this indebtedness and the maximum amount of this
indebtedness that is contemplated; and
(ii) The sponsoring local government includes this statement of the
intent in all notices required by RCW 39.102.100; or
(b) The sponsoring local government adopts a resolution, after
opportunity for public comment, that indicates an intent to incur this
indebtedness and the maximum amount of this indebtedness that is
contemplated.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the general
indebtedness incurred under subsection (1) of this section may be
payable from other tax revenues, the full faith and credit of the local
government, and nontax income, revenues, fees, and rents from the
public improvements, as well as contributions, grants, and nontax money
available to the local government for payment of costs of the public
improvements or associated debt service on the general indebtedness.
(b) A sponsoring local government that issues bonds under this
section ((shall)) may not pledge any money received from the state of
Washington for the payment of such bonds, other than the local sales
and use taxes imposed under the authority of RCW 82.14.475 and
collected by the department.
(3) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, a sponsoring local government designating a revenue
development area and authorizing the use of local infrastructure
financing may require the nonpublic participant to provide adequate
security to protect the public investment in the public improvement
within the revenue development area.
(4) Bonds issued under this section ((shall)) must be authorized by
ordinance of the governing body of the sponsoring local government and
may be issued in one or more series and ((shall)) must bear such date
or dates, be payable upon demand or mature at such time or times, bear
interest at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or
denominations, be in such form either coupon or registered as provided
in RCW 39.46.030, carry such conversion or registration privileges,
have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in
such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such
terms of redemption with or without premium, be secured in such manner,
and have such other characteristics, as may be provided by such
ordinance or trust indenture or mortgage issued pursuant thereto.
(5) The sponsoring local government may annually pay into a fund to
be established for the benefit of bonds issued under this section a
fixed proportion or a fixed amount of any local excise tax allocation
revenues and local property tax allocation revenues derived from
property or business activity within the revenue development area
containing the public improvements funded by the bonds, such payment to
continue until all bonds payable from the fund are paid in full. The
local government may also annually pay into the fund established in
this section a fixed proportion or a fixed amount of any revenues
derived from taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.475, such payment to
continue until all bonds payable from the fund are paid in full.
Revenues derived from taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.475 are subject to
the use restriction in RCW 39.102.130.
(6) In case any of the public officials of the sponsoring local
government whose signatures appear on any bonds or any coupons issued
under this chapter ((shall)) cease to be such officials before the
delivery of such bonds, such signatures ((shall)), nevertheless, ((be))
are valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such
officials had remained in office until such delivery. Any provision of
any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued under this
chapter are fully negotiable.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (4) through (6) of this section,
bonds issued under this section may be issued and sold in accordance
with chapter 39.46 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.102.140 and 2009 c 518 s 12 and 2009 c 267 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government shall provide a report to the
board and the department by March 1st of each year. The report shall
contain the following information:
(a) The amount of local excise tax allocation revenues, local
property tax allocation revenues, other revenues from local public
sources, and taxes under RCW 82.14.475 received by the sponsoring local
government, cosponsoring local government, or any participating local
government during the preceding calendar year that were dedicated to
pay the public improvements financed in whole or in part with local
infrastructure financing, and a summary of how these revenues were
expended;
(b) The names of any businesses locating within the revenue
development area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by
the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with
local infrastructure financing;
(c) The total number of permanent jobs created in the revenue
development area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by
the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with
local infrastructure financing;
(d) The average wages and benefits received by all employees of
businesses locating within the revenue development area as a result of
the public improvements undertaken by the sponsoring local government
and financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure financing;
(e) That the sponsoring local government is in compliance with RCW
39.102.070; and
(f) Beginning with the reports due March 1, 2010, the following
must also be included:
(i) A list of public improvements financed on a pay-as-you-go basis
in previous calendar years and by indebtedness issued under this
chapter;
(ii) The date when any indebtedness issued under this chapter is
expected to be retired;
(iii) At least once every three years, updated estimates of state
excise tax allocation revenues, state property tax allocation revenues,
and local excise tax increments, as determined by the sponsoring local
government, that are estimated to have been received by the state, any
participating local government, sponsoring local government, and
cosponsoring local government, since the approval of the project award
under RCW 39.102.040 by the board; and
(iv) Any other information required by the department or the board
to enable the department or the board to fulfill its duties under this
chapter and RCW 82.14.475.
(2) The board shall make a report available to the public and the
legislature by June 1st of each even-numbered year. The report shall
include a list of public improvements undertaken by sponsoring local
governments and financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure
financing and it shall also include a summary of the information
provided to the department by sponsoring local governments under
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The department, upon request, must assist a sponsoring local
government in estimating the amount of state excise tax allocation
revenues and local excise tax increments required in subsection
(1)(f)(iii) of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.102.020 and 2010 c 164 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Annual state contribution limit" means seven million five
hundred thousand dollars statewide per fiscal year.
(2) "Assessed value" means the valuation of taxable real property
as placed on the last completed assessment roll.
(3) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board under
chapter 43.160 RCW.
(4) "Dedicated" means pledged, set aside, allocated, received,
budgeted, or otherwise identified.
(5) "Demonstration project" means one of the following projects:
(a) Bellingham waterfront redevelopment project;
(b) Spokane river district project at Liberty Lake; and
(c) Vancouver riverwest project.
(((5))) (6) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(((6))) (7) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning
July 1st and ending the following June 30th.
(((7))) (8) "Local excise tax allocation revenue" means an amount
of local excise taxes equal to some or all of the sponsoring local
government's local excise tax increment, amounts of local excise taxes
equal to some or all of any participating local government's excise tax
increment as agreed upon in the written agreement under RCW
39.102.080(1), or both, and dedicated to local infrastructure
financing.
(((8))) (9) "Local excise tax increment" means an amount equal to
the estimated annual increase in local excise taxes in each calendar
year following the approval of the revenue development area by the
board from taxable activity within the revenue development area, as set
forth in the application provided to the board under RCW 39.102.040,
and updated in accordance with RCW 39.102.140(1)(f).
(((9))) (10) "Local excise taxes" means local revenues derived from
the imposition of sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030.
(((10))) (11) "Local government" means any city, town, county, port
district, and any federally recognized Indian tribe.
(((11))) (12) "Local infrastructure financing" means the use of
revenues received from local excise tax allocation revenues, local
property tax allocation revenues, other revenues from local public
sources, and revenues received from the local option sales and use tax
authorized in RCW 82.14.475, dedicated to pay either the principal and
interest on bonds authorized under RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public
improvement costs on a pay-as-you-go basis subject to RCW 39.102.195,
or both.
(((12))) (13) "Local property tax allocation revenue" means those
tax revenues derived from the receipt of regular property taxes levied
on the property tax allocation revenue value and used for local
infrastructure financing.
(((13))) (14) "Low-income housing" means residential housing for
low-income persons or families who lack the means which is necessary to
enable them, without financial assistance, to live in decent, safe, and
sanitary dwellings, without overcrowding. For the purposes of this
subsection, "low income" means income that does not exceed eighty
percent of the median family income for the standard metropolitan
statistical area in which the revenue development area is located.
(((14))) (15) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking
legislative action by a local government.
(((15))) (16) "Participating local government" means a local
government having a revenue development area within its geographic
boundaries that has entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring
local government as provided in RCW 39.102.080 to allow the use of all
or some of its local excise tax allocation revenues or other revenues
from local public sources dedicated for local infrastructure financing.
(((16))) (17) "Participating taxing district" means a local
government having a revenue development area within its geographic
boundaries that has entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring
local government as provided in RCW 39.102.080 to allow the use of some
or all of its local property tax allocation revenues or other revenues
from local public sources dedicated for local infrastructure financing.
(((17))) (18) "Property tax allocation revenue base value" means
the assessed value of real property located within a revenue
development area less the property tax allocation revenue value.
(((18))) (19)(a)(i) "Property tax allocation revenue value" means
seventy-five percent of any increase in the assessed value of real
property in a revenue development area resulting from:
(A) The placement of new construction, improvements to property, or
both, on the assessment roll, where the new construction and
improvements are initiated after the revenue development area is
approved by the board;
(B) The cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when such cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as provided in RCW
84.14.020, and the new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements are initiated after the revenue development
area is approved by the board;
(C) The cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when such cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as
provided in RCW 84.26.070, and the rehabilitation is initiated after
the revenue development area is approved by the board.
(ii) Increases in the assessed value of real property in a revenue
development area resulting from (a)(i)(A) through (C) of this
subsection are included in the property tax allocation revenue value in
the initial year. These same amounts are also included in the property
tax allocation revenue value in subsequent years unless the property
becomes exempt from property taxation.
(b) "Property tax allocation revenue value" includes seventy-five
percent of any increase in the assessed value of new construction
consisting of an entire building in the years following the initial
year, unless the building becomes exempt from property taxation.
(c) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, "property tax
allocation revenue value" does not include any increase in the assessed
value of real property after the initial year.
(d) There is no property tax allocation revenue value if the
assessed value of real property in a revenue development area has not
increased as a result of any of the reasons specified in (a)(i)(A)
through (C) of this subsection.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, "initial year" means:
(i) For new construction and improvements to property added to the
assessment roll, the year during which the new construction and
improvements are initially placed on the assessment roll;
(ii) For the cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when such cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW, the year when such cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of levying taxes for
collection in the following year; and
(iii) For the cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when
such cost is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55
RCW, the year when such cost is treated as new construction for
purposes of levying taxes for collection in the following year.
(((19))) (20) "Public improvement costs" means the cost of: (a)
Design, planning, acquisition including land acquisition, site
preparation including land clearing, construction, reconstruction,
rehabilitation, improvement, and installation of public improvements;
(b) demolishing, relocating, maintaining, and operating property
pending construction of public improvements; (c) the local government's
portion of relocating utilities as a result of public improvements; (d)
financing public improvements, including interest during construction,
legal and other professional services, taxes, insurance, principal and
interest costs on general indebtedness issued to finance public
improvements, and any necessary reserves for general indebtedness; (e)
assessments incurred in revaluing real property for the purpose of
determining the property tax allocation revenue base value that are in
excess of costs incurred by the assessor in accordance with the
revaluation plan under chapter 84.41 RCW, and the costs of apportioning
the taxes and complying with this chapter and other applicable law; (f)
administrative expenses and feasibility studies reasonably necessary
and related to these costs; and (g) any of the above-described costs
that may have been incurred before adoption of the ordinance
authorizing the public improvements and the use of local infrastructure
financing to fund the costs of the public improvements.
(((20))) (21) "Public improvements" means:
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the revenue development area
that include:
(i) Street, bridge, and road construction and maintenance,
including highway interchange construction;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements,
including wastewater reuse facilities;
(iii) Sidewalks, traffic controls, and streetlights;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas, including trails; and
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems;
(b) Expenditures for facilities and improvements that support
affordable housing as defined in RCW 43.63A.510.
(((21))) (22) "Real property" has the same meaning as in RCW
84.04.090 and also includes any privately owned improvements located on
publicly owned land that are subject to property taxation.
(((22))) (23) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes
as defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied
by public utility districts specifically for the purpose of making
required payments of principal and interest on general indebtedness;
(b) regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of the
common schools under RCW 84.52.065; and (c) regular property taxes
authorized by RCW 84.55.050 that are limited to a specific purpose.
"Regular property taxes" do not include excess property tax levies that
are exempt from the aggregate limits for junior and senior taxing
districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043.
(((23))) (24) "Relocating a business" means the closing of a
business and the reopening of that business, or the opening of a new
business that engages in the same activities as the previous business,
in a different location within a one-year period, when an individual or
entity has an ownership interest in the business at the time of closure
and at the time of opening or reopening. "Relocating a business" does
not include the closing and reopening of a business in a new location
where the business has been acquired and is under entirely new
ownership at the new location, or the closing and reopening of a
business in a new location as a result of the exercise of the power of
eminent domain.
(((24))) (25) "Revenue development area" means the geographic area
adopted by a sponsoring local government and approved by the board,
from which local excise and property tax allocation revenues are
derived for local infrastructure financing.
(((25))) (26)(a) "Revenues from local public sources" means:
(i) Amounts of local excise tax allocation revenues and local
property tax allocation revenues, dedicated by sponsoring local
governments, participating local governments, and participating taxing
districts, for local infrastructure financing; and
(ii) Any other local revenues, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, including revenues derived from federal and private
sources.
(b) Revenues from local public sources do not include any local
funds derived from state grants, state loans, or any other state moneys
including any local sales and use taxes credited against the state
sales and use taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW.
(((26))) (27) "Small business" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 19.85.020.
(((27))) (28) "Sponsoring local government" means a city, town, or
county, and for the purpose of this chapter a federally recognized
Indian tribe or any combination thereof, that adopts a revenue
development area and applies to the board to use local infrastructure
financing.
(((28))) (29) "State contribution" means the lesser of:
(a) One million dollars;
(b) The total amount of local excise tax allocation revenues, local
property tax allocation revenues, and other revenues from local public
sources, that are dedicated by a sponsoring local government, any
participating local governments, and participating taxing districts, in
the preceding calendar year to the payment of principal and interest on
bonds issued under RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public improvement costs on
a pay-as-you-go basis subject to RCW 39.102.195, or both;
(c) The amount of project award granted by the board in the notice
of approval to use local infrastructure financing under RCW 39.102.040;
or
(d) The highest amount of state excise tax allocation revenues and
state property tax allocation revenues for any one calendar year as
determined by the sponsoring local government and reported to the board
and the department as required by RCW 39.102.140.
(((29))) (30) "State excise tax allocation revenue" means an amount
equal to the annual increase in state excise taxes estimated to be
received by the state in each calendar year following the approval of
the revenue development area by the board, from taxable activity within
the revenue development area as set forth in the application provided
to the board under RCW 39.102.040 and periodically updated and reported
as required in RCW 39.102.140(1)(f).
(((30))) (31) "State excise taxes" means revenues derived from
state retail sales and use taxes under RCW 82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020
at the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1), less the amount of tax
distributions from all local retail sales and use taxes, other than the
local sales and use taxes authorized by RCW 82.14.475 for the
applicable revenue development area, imposed on the same taxable events
that are credited against the state retail sales and use taxes under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.
(((31))) (32) "State property tax allocation revenue" means an
amount equal to the estimated tax revenues derived from the imposition
of property taxes levied by the state for the support of common schools
under RCW 84.52.065 on the property tax allocation revenue value, as
set forth in the application submitted to the board under RCW
39.102.040 and updated annually in the report required under RCW
39.102.140(1)(f).
(((32))) (33) "Taxing district" means a government entity that
levies or has levied for it regular property taxes upon real property
located within a proposed or approved revenue development area.

--- END ---