BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.90.040 and 2006 c 138 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person may seek relief under this chapter by filing a
petition with a court alleging that the person has been the victim of
nonconsensual sexual conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration
committed by the respondent.
(2) A person under eighteen years of age who is sixteen years of
age or older may seek relief under this chapter and is not required to
seek relief by a guardian or next friend.
(3) No guardian or guardian ad litem need be appointed on behalf of
a respondent to an action under this chapter who is under eighteen
years of age if such respondent is sixteen years of age or older.
(4) The court may, if it deems necessary, appoint a guardian ad
litem for a petitioner or respondent who is a party to an action under
this chapter. The appointment shall be at no cost to either party.
(5) Jurisdiction of the courts over proceedings under this chapter
shall be the same as jurisdiction over domestic violence protection
orders under RCW 26.50.020(5).
(6) An action under this chapter shall be filed in the county or
the municipality where the petitioner resides.

Sec. 2 RCW 7.90.050 and 2006 c 138 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon receipt of the petition, the court shall order a hearing which
shall be held not later than fourteen days from the date of the order.
The court may schedule a hearing by telephone pursuant to local court
rule, to reasonably accommodate a disability, or in exceptional
circumstances to protect a petitioner from further nonconsensual sexual
conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration. The court shall require
assurances of the petitioner's identity before conducting a telephonic
hearing. ((Except as provided in RCW 7.90.110,)) Personal service
shall be made upon the respondent not less than five court days prior
to the hearing. If timely personal service cannot be made, the court
shall set a new hearing date and shall either require additional
attempts at obtaining personal service or permit service by publication
as provided in section 6 of this act or service by mail as provided in
section 7 of this act. The court shall not require more than two
attempts at obtaining personal service and shall permit service by
publication or service by mail unless the petitioner requests
additional time to attempt personal service. If the court permits
service by publication or service by mail, the court shall set the
hearing date not later than twenty-four days from the date of the
order. The court may issue an ex parte temporary sexual assault order
pending the hearing as provided in RCW 7.90.110.

Sec. 3 RCW 7.90.120 and 2006 c 138 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) An ex parte temporary sexual assault protection order shall
be effective for a fixed period not to exceed fourteen days. A full
hearing, as provided in this chapter, shall be set for not later than
fourteen days from the issuance of the temporary order or not later
than twenty-four days if service by publication or service by mail is
permitted. If the court permits service by publication or service by
mail, the court shall also reissue the ex parte temporary protection
order not to exceed another twenty-four days from the date of reissuing
the ex parte protection order. Except as provided in RCW 7.90.050, or
section 6 or 7 of this act, the respondent shall be personally served
with a copy of the ex parte temporary sexual assault protection order
along with a copy of the petition and notice of the date set for the
hearing.
(b) Any ex parte temporary order issued under this section shall
contain the date and time of issuance and the expiration date and shall
be entered into a statewide judicial information system by the clerk of
the court within one judicial day after issuance.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section or RCW 7.90.150,
a final sexual assault protection order shall be effective for a fixed
period of time, not to exceed two years.
(3) ((Any ex parte temporary or final sexual assault protection
order may be renewed one or more times, as required. The petitioner
may apply for renewal of the order by filing a petition for renewal at
any time within the three months before the order expires. If the
motion for renewal is uncontested and the petitioner seeks no
modification of the order, the order may be renewed on the basis of the
petitioner's motion or affidavit stating that there has been no
material change in relevant circumstances since entry of the order and
stating the reason for the requested renewal. Renewals may be granted
only in open court.
(4))) Any sexual assault protection order which would expire on a
court holiday shall instead expire at the close of the next court
business day.
(((5))) (4) The practice of dismissing or suspending a criminal
prosecution in exchange for the issuance of a sexual assault protection
order undermines the purposes of this chapter. This section shall not
be construed as encouraging that practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 7.90 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any ex parte temporary or final sexual assault protection order
may be renewed one or more times, as required.
(2) The petitioner may apply for renewal of the order by filing a
motion for renewal at any time within the three months before the order
expires.
(3) If the motion for renewal is uncontested and the petitioner
seeks no modification of the order, the order may be renewed on the
basis of the petitioner's motion or affidavit stating that there has
been no material change in relevant circumstances since entry of the
order and stating the reason for the requested renewal.
(4)(a) If the motion is contested, upon receipt of the motion, the
court shall order that a hearing be held not later than fourteen days
from the date of the order.
(b) The court may schedule a hearing by telephone pursuant to local
court rule, to reasonably accommodate a disability, or in exceptional
circumstances to protect a petitioner from further nonconsensual sexual
conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration. The court shall require
assurances of the petitioner's identity before conducting a telephonic
hearing.
(c) The respondent shall be personally served not less than five
court days prior to the hearing. If timely personal service cannot be
made, the court shall set a new hearing date and shall either require
additional attempts at obtaining personal service or permit service by
publication as provided in section 6 of this act or service by mail as
provided in section 7 of this act. The court shall not require more
than two attempts at obtaining personal service and shall permit
service by publication or service by mail unless the petitioner
requests additional time to attempt personal service. If the court
permits service by publication or service by mail, the court shall set
the hearing date not later than twenty-four days from the date of the
order.
(5) Renewals may be granted only in open court.

Sec. 5 RCW 7.90.140 and 2006 c 138 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An order issued under this chapter shall be personally served
upon the respondent, except as provided in subsection (6) of this
section.
(2) The sheriff of the county or the peace officers of the
municipality in which the respondent resides shall serve the respondent
personally unless the petitioner elects to have the respondent served
by a private party.
(3) If service by a sheriff or municipal peace officer is to be
used, the clerk of the court shall have a copy of any order issued
under this chapter forwarded on or before the next judicial day to the
appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order for service
upon the respondent. Service of an order issued under this chapter
shall take precedence over the service of other documents unless they
are of a similar emergency nature.
(4) If the sheriff or municipal peace officer cannot complete
service upon the respondent within ten days, the sheriff or municipal
peace officer shall notify the petitioner. The petitioner shall
provide information sufficient to permit notification.
(5) Returns of service under this chapter shall be made in
accordance with the applicable court rules.
(6) If an order entered by the court recites that the respondent
appeared in person before the court, the necessity for further service
is waived and proof of service of that order is not necessary.
(7) If the court previously entered an order allowing service of
the notice of hearing and temporary order of protection by publication
under section 6 of this act or service by mail under section 7 of this
act, the court may permit service by publication or service by mail of
the order of protection issued under this chapter. Service by
publication must comply with the requirements of section 6 of this act
and service by mail must comply with the requirements of section 7 of
this act. The court order must state whether the court permitted
service by publication or service by mail.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 7.90 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The court may order service by publication instead of personal
service under the following circumstances:
(a) The sheriff or municipal peace officer files an affidavit
stating that the officer was unable to complete personal service upon
the respondent. The affidavit must describe the number and type of
attempts the officer made to complete service;
(b) The petitioner files an affidavit stating that the petitioner
believes the respondent is hiding from the server to avoid service.
The petitioner's affidavit must state the reasons for the belief that
the respondent is avoiding service;
(c) The server has deposited a copy of the summons, in
substantially the form prescribed in subsection (3) of this section,
notice of hearing, and the ex parte order of protection in the post
office, directed to the respondent at the respondent's last known
address, unless the server states that he or she does not know the
respondent's address; and
(d) The court finds reasonable grounds exist to believe the
respondent is concealing himself or herself to avoid service, and that
further attempts to personally serve the respondent would be futile or
unduly burdensome.
(2) If the court orders service by publication, it shall also
reissue the temporary order of protection not to exceed another twenty-four days from the date of reissuing the ex parte protection order and
order that service by publication be provided.
(3) The publication must be made in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county where the petition was brought and in the
county of the last known address of the respondent once a week for
three consecutive weeks. The newspaper selected must be one of the
three most widely circulated papers in the county. The publication of
summons must not be made until the court orders service by publication
under this section. Service of the summons is considered complete when
the publication has been made for three consecutive weeks. The summons
must be signed by the petitioner. The summons must contain the date of
the first publication, and must require the respondent upon whom
service by publication is desired, to appear and answer the petition on
the date set for the hearing. The summons must also contain a brief
statement of the reason for the petition and a summary of the
provisions under the ex parte order. The summons must be essentially
in the following form:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 7.90 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In circumstances justifying service by publication under
section 6 of this act, if the serving party files an affidavit stating
facts from which the court determines that service by mail is just as
likely to give actual notice as service by publication and that the
serving party is unable to afford the cost of service by publication,
the court may order that service be made by mail. The service must be
made by any person over eighteen years of age, who is competent to be
a witness, other than a party, by mailing copies of the order and other
process to the party to be served at his or her last known address or
any other address determined by the court to be appropriate. Two
copies must be mailed, postage prepaid, one by ordinary first-class
mail and the other by a form of mail requiring a signed receipt showing
when and to whom it was delivered. The envelopes must bear the return
address of the sender.
(2) Proof of service under this section must be consistent with
court rules for civil proceedings.
(3) Service under this section may be used in the same manner and
has the same jurisdictional effect as service by publication for
purposes of this chapter. Service is deemed complete upon the mailing
of the two copies as prescribed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 7.90 RCW
to read as follows:
Following completion of service by publication as provided in
section 6 of this act or service by mail as provided in section 7 of
this act, if the respondent fails to appear at the hearing, the court
may issue an order of protection as provided in RCW 7.90.140. That
order must be served pursuant to RCW 7.90.140 and forwarded to the
appropriate law enforcement agency pursuant to RCW 7.90.160.

Sec. 9 RCW 7.90.170 and 2006 c 138 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon ((application with notice to all parties and after a
hearing)) receipt of a motion to modify the terms of an existing sexual
assault protection order, the court ((may modify the terms of an
existing sexual assault protection order)) shall order that a hearing
be held not later than fourteen days from the date of the order. The
respondent shall be personally served not less than five days before
the hearing. If timely service cannot be made, the court shall set a
new hearing date and shall either require additional attempts at
obtaining personal service or permit service by publication as provided
in section 6 of this act or service by mail as provided in section 7 of
this act. If the court permits service by mail or service by
publication, the court shall set the new hearing date not later than
twenty-four days from the date of the order. If the order expires
because timely service cannot be made, the court shall grant an ex
parte order of protection as provided in RCW 7.90.110. The court may
modify the protection order for another fixed time period or may enter
a permanent order as provided in RCW 7.90.120.
(2) In any situation where an order is terminated or modified
before its expiration date, the clerk of the court shall forward on or
before the next judicial day a true copy of the modified order or the
termination order to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified
in the modified or termination order. Upon receipt of the order, the
law enforcement agency shall promptly enter it in the computer-based
criminal intelligence information system, or if the order is
terminated, remove the order from the computer-based criminal
intelligence information system.

--- END ---