BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.24.160 and 2007 c 146 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 50.04.165, any employing unit for which
services that do not constitute employment as defined in this title are
performed may file with the commissioner a written election that all
such services performed by any distinct class or group of individuals
or by all individuals in its employment in one or more distinct
establishments or places of business shall be deemed to constitute
employment for all the purposes of this title for at least two calendar
years. Upon the written approval of such election by the commissioner,
such services shall be deemed to constitute employment subject to this
title on and after the date stated in the approval. Services covered
under this section shall cease to be deemed employment as of January
1st of any calendar year subsequent to the two-calendar year period,
only if the employing unit files with the commissioner before January
15th of that year a written application for termination of coverage.
Services for which an employing unit may elect coverage include, but
are not limited to, maritime service as described in RCW 50.04.170.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.04.170 and 1949 c 214 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except for services subject to RCW 50.44.010, 50.44.020,
50.44.030, or 50.50.010, the term "employment" ((shall)) includes an
individual's entire service as an officer or member of a crew of an
American vessel wherever performed and whether in intrastate or
interstate or foreign commerce, if the employer maintains within this
state at the beginning of the pay period an operating office from which
the operations of the vessel are ordinarily and regularly supervised,
managed, directed, and controlled.
(b) The term "employment" ((shall)) does not include:
(i) Services performed by an individual on a boat engaged in
catching fish or other forms of aquatic animal life under an
arrangement with the owner or operator of the boat under which:
(A) The individual does not receive any cash remuneration except as
provided in (b)(i)(B) and (C) of this subsection;
(B) The individual receives a share of the boat's, or the boats' in
the case of a fishing operation involving more than one boat, catch of
fish or other forms of aquatic animal life or a share of the proceeds
from the sale of the catch; and
(C) The amount of the individual's share depends on the amount of
the boat's, or the boats' in the case of a fishing operation involving
more than one boat, catch of fish or other forms of aquatic animal
life, but only if the operating crew of the boat, or each boat from
which the individual receives a share in the case of a fishing
operation involving more than one boat, is normally made up of fewer
than ten individuals.
(ii) Services performed as an officer or member of the crew of a
vessel not an American vessel and services on or in connection with an
American vessel under a contract of service which is not entered into
within the United States and during the performance of which the vessel
does not touch at a port of the United States.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "American vessel"((,)) means
any vessel documented or numbered under the laws of the United
States((;)), and includes any vessel which is neither documented or
numbered under the laws of the United States nor documented under the
laws of any foreign country if its crew is employed solely by one or
more citizens or residents of the United States or corporations
organized under the laws of the United States or of any state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---