BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The county treasurer is a Washington
state constitutional officer that serves as the local treasury
authority, which represents the state of Washington, the county and is
the ex officio treasurer for taxing districts which includes, school,
port, fire, library, cemetery, drainage, diking, metropolitan park, and
hospital districts.
(2) The county treasurer is responsible to provide treasury
services by accounting and managing the public's money including:
Receipting moneys; billing, collection, and dispersing of property and
real estate excise taxes, assessments, fees, rates, or charges; cash
management; banking services; debt management; and investing to ensure
cash liquidity for municipal corporations to meet their financial
obligations.
(3) The treasurer shall prepare financial reports related to
treasury management for the county and taxing districts. The
treasurer's responsibility starts at the time moneys are collected by
the treasurer or within one business day when collected by a public
officer or deposited in an approved financial institution from a county
department, junior taxing district, or other public agency as per RCW
43.09.240.
(4) The county treasurer is authorized to provide treasury
management services for a state department or agency or other
municipal corporation not currently proscribed in law by entering
into an intergovernmental service agreement per chapter 39.34 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The county treasurer responsibilities
include:
(1) In order to obtain the necessary initial disclosure
information, coordinate with associated professional providers of
financial advisory, underwriting, and legal services in the preparation
of county official statements for issuing short and long-term debt
obligations;
(2) Account for and facilitate the payment of all bonded
indebtedness for the county and all special districts for which the
county treasurer acts as treasurer;
(3) Determine the current available debt capacity of the county and
its junior taxing districts;
(4) Monitor opportunities to retire or refund county debt;
(5) Monitor initial and postissuance compliance with Title 39 RCW
and all applicable internal revenue service, municipal securities
rulemaking board, and securities and exchange commission rules and
regulations governing the issuance of county debt; and
(6) Coordinate distribution to the electronic municipal market
access system of the municipal securities rulemaking board information
regarding the county's financial condition and affairs at such times
and in the form required by law, regulation, general practice, and
provided in the county's continuing disclosure undertakings with
respect to outstanding county debt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added
to chapter 36.29 RCW.

--- END ---