BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS AND INTENT. The legislature finds
that paid sick and safe leave from employment is critical to the
economic well-being of the state and workers and to public health and
safety. Paid sick and safe leave helps workers maintain their own
health and the health of their families, coworkers, and members of the
public. Paid sick and safe leave also helps give victims of domestic
violence, sexual assault, and stalking the financial independence
necessary to leave abusive situations, achieve safety, and minimize
physical and emotional injuries. The legislature further finds that
paid sick and safe leave helps employers retain trained workers and
operate competitively as well as ensures that workers and their
families retain economic security.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Child," "grandparent," "parent," "parent-in-law," and "spouse"
have the same meanings as in RCW 49.12.265.
(2) "Department" and "director" have the same meanings as in RCW
49.12.005.
(3) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as in RCW 26.50.010.
(4) "Eating or drinking establishment" means a place where food or
beverages, or both, are prepared and sold at retail for immediate
consumption either on or off-premise, but excludes food and beverage
service sites, such as cafeterias, that are accessory to other
activities and primarily serve students, patients, and/or on-site
employees.
(5) "Employee" means any individual employed by an employer,
including individuals employed on a temporary and part-time basis. An
individual performing less than two hundred forty hours of work in the
state in a calendar year is an employee only for purposes of
determining the employer tier. An individual performing services on a
temporary basis and supplied by a temporary service, staffing agency,
or similar entity, absent a contractual agreement stating otherwise, is
an employee of the staffing agency or similar entity for purposes of
sick and safe leave and an employee of the employer contracting with
the staffing agency or similar entity for purposes of determining the
employer tier.
(6)(a) "Employer" has the same meaning as in RCW 49.12.005.
(i) "Tier one employer" means an employer that employs more than
four and fewer than fifty full-time equivalents on average per calendar
week.
(ii) "Tier two employer" means an employer that employs at least
fifty and fewer than two hundred fifty full-time equivalents on average
per calendar week.
(iii) "Tier three employer" means an employer that employs two
hundred fifty or more full-time equivalents on average per calendar
week.
(b) The employer tier for the current year is determined by the
average number of full-time equivalents paid per calendar week during
the preceding year for any and all weeks during which at least one
employee worked for compensation. To determine the number of full-time
equivalents, all compensated hours of all employees shall be counted,
including part-time employment, temporary employment, or employment
through the services of a staffing agency or similar entity. If an
employer did not employ any employees during the previous year, the
employer tier is determined based upon the average number of full-time
equivalents paid per calendar week during the first ninety calendar
days of the current year in which the employer engaged in business.
(7) "Full-time equivalent" means the number of hours worked for
compensation that add up to one full-time employee, based either on an
eight hour day and a five day week or as full-time is defined, in
writing or in practice, by the employer.
(8) "Health care provider" means any person licensed to provide
medical or emergency services and any other person as determined by the
director to be capable of providing documentation under section 5(4) of
this act.
(9) "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.125.030.
(10) "Sick and safe leave" means hours of paid time provided by an
employer for use by an employee for absence from work for the purposes
specified in section 4 of this act.
(11) "Staffing agency" means any person undertaking with or without
compensation to procure opportunities to work or to procure, recruit,
refer, or place individuals with an employer or in employment.
(12) "Stalking" has the same meaning as in RCW 9A.46.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 ACCRUAL OF SICK AND SAFE LEAVE. (1)(a)
Subject to (b) of this subsection and beginning January 1, 2015, an
employee accrues sick and safe leave, which may be used as either sick
leave or safe leave, as follows:
(i) An employee of a tier one or tier two employer must accrue at
least one hour of leave for every forty hours worked.
(ii) An employee of a tier three employer must accrue at least one
hour of leave for every thirty hours worked.
(b) An employer may provide paid sick and safe time in advance of
accrual as permitted front loading as long as the front loading meets
or exceeds the requirements of this chapter for accrual, use, and carry
over of leave.
(2) Sick and safe leave begins to accrue at the commencement of
employment, except that no leave accrues before January 1, 2015.
(3) If an employee is exempt from overtime payment under state and
federal law: (a) The employee is not entitled to accrue leave for
hours worked in excess of forty hours in a work week; and (b) if the
employee's normal work week is less than forty hours, leave accrues
based on the employee's normal work week.
(4) Unused sick and safe leave carries over to the following year,
except that an employer is not required to allow an employee to carry
over sick and safe leave in excess of:
(a) Forty hours for a tier one employer;
(b) Fifty-six hours for a tier two employer; or
(c) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, seventy-two hours
for a tier three employer.
(5)(a) A tier one or tier two employer with a combined or universal
paid leave policy, including but not limited to a paid time off policy,
is not required to provide sick and safe leave in addition to the leave
provided by that policy if:
(i) Paid leave under the policy may be used for the same purposes
and under the same conditions as sick and safe leave may be used under
section 4 of this act;
(ii) Paid leave accrues at a rate of at least one hour of leave for
every forty hours worked;
(iii) Use of paid leave within any year is limited to no less than
the amounts specified for tier one and tier two employers,
respectively, in section 4 of this act; and
(iv) Any accrued but unused paid leave may be carried over to the
following year. However, this section does not require a tier one or
tier two employer to carry over leave in excess of the leave specified
in subsection (4)(a) and (b) of this section.
(b) A tier three employer with a combined or universal paid leave
policy, including but not limited to a paid time off policy, is not
required to provide sick and safe leave in addition to the leave
provided by the policy if:
(i) Available paid leave may be used for the same purposes and
under the same conditions as sick and safe leave may be used under
section 4 of this act;
(ii) Paid leave accrues at a rate of at least one hour of leave for
every thirty hours worked;
(iii) Use of paid leave within any year is limited to no less one
hundred eight hours; and
(iv) Any accrued but unused paid leave may be carried over to the
following year. However, this section does not require a tier three
employer to carry over unused leave in excess of one hundred eight
hours.
(6) If an employee separates from employment and the same employer
rehires the employee within seven months of the separation: (a) The
employer must reinstate previously accrued and unused sick and safe
leave; (b) the employee is entitled to use accrued sick and safe leave
immediately upon reemployment if the employee previously had been
eligible to use the leave; and (c) the employee accrues additional
leave immediately upon reemployment. If an employee separates from
employment and the same employer rehires the employee more than seven
months after the separation, this section does not require the employer
to reinstate accrued sick and safe leave and the employee is considered
to have newly commenced employment for purposes of sick and safe leave.
(7) An employer may loan sick and safe leave to an employee in
advance of accrual of leave by the employee. Any loan of leave is
subject to the terms and conditions of the employer.
(8) This section does not require an employer to provide financial
or other reimbursement for accrued and unused sick and safe leave to
any employee upon the employee's termination, resignation, retirement,
or other separation from employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 USE OF SICK AND SAFE LEAVE. (1) Except as
provided in subsection (6) of this section, an employee may use accrued
sick and safe leave beginning one hundred eighty days after the
commencement of employment with the employer. If an employee separates
from employment and is rehired by the same employer within seven months
of separation, the previous period of employment is counted for
purposes of meeting the one hundred eighty day requirement.
(2) An employer must compensate an employee who uses sick and safe
leave at the same hourly rate and with the same benefits, including
health care benefits, as the employee would have earned during the time
the leave is taken. An employer is not required to compensate an
employee for lost tips or commissions and compensation is required only
for hours that an employee was scheduled to work.
(3) An employee may use sick leave for the following reasons:
(a) An absence resulting from an employee's mental or physical
illness, injury, or health condition; to accommodate the employee's
need for medical diagnosis, care, or treatment of a mental or physical
illness, injury, or health condition; or the employee's need for
preventive medical care; or
(b) To allow the employee to provide care for a child, grandparent,
parent, parent-in-law, or spouse with a mental or physical illness,
injury, or health condition; care for a child, grandparent, parent,
parent-in-law, or spouse who needs medical diagnosis, care, or
treatment of a mental or physical illness, injury, or health condition;
or care for a child, grandparent, parent, parent-in-law, or spouse who
needs preventive medical care.
(4) An employee may use safe leave for the following reasons:
(a) When the employee's place of business has been closed by order
of a public official to limit exposure to an infectious agent,
biological toxin, or hazardous material; or to accommodate the
employee's need to care for a child whose school or place of care has
been closed by order of a public official to limit exposure to an
infectious agent, biological toxin, or hazardous material; or
(b) For any of the reasons identified in RCW 49.76.030.
(5) An employer is not required to allow an employee to use in
excess of the following hours of sick and safe leave in a year:
(a) Forty hours for a tier one employer;
(b) Fifty-six hours for a tier two employer; or
(c) Subject to section 3(5)(b) of this act, seventy-two hours for
a tier three employer.
(6) An employee may not use leave under this section until twenty-four months after the hire date of the employer's first employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 REQUESTS AND DOCUMENTATION. (1) An employer
must provide sick and safe leave upon the request of an employee.
(2) When possible, the request must include the expected duration
of the absence. An employer may require an employee to comply with the
employer's usual and customary notice and procedural requirements for
absences and requesting leave, as long as the requirements do not
interfere with the purposes for which the leave is needed. If the
leave is foreseeable, the employee must: (a) Make a reasonable effort
to schedule the leave in a manner that does not unduly disrupt the
operations of the employer; (b) make the request in writing; and (c)
make the request at least ten days, or as early as possible, in advance
of the leave unless the employer's usual and customary notice
requirements provide for less advance notice. If the leave is
unforeseeable, the employee must provide notice as soon as practicable
and must comply with the employer's usual and customary notice and
procedural requirements for absences as long as the requirements do not
interfere with the purposes for which the leave is needed.
(3) For employees covered by federal or state overtime
requirements, sick and safe leave may be used in hourly increments, or
smaller increments if an employer so designates. For employees exempt
from state and federal overtime requirements, the employer may make
deductions of sick and safe leave in accordance with state and federal
law.
(4) An employer may require reasonable documentation for use of
more than three consecutive days of sick leave. Documentation signed
by a health care provider stating that sick leave is necessary is
reasonable documentation. An employer may not require the
documentation to explain the nature of the illness, injury, or health
condition. If the employer does not offer health insurance to the
employee, the employer and employee must each pay one-half the cost of
any out-of-pocket expense incurred by the employee in obtaining the
documentation requested by the employer. Out-of-pocket expenses are
limited to the costs of services provided by health care providers,
services of health care facilities, testing prescribed by health care
providers, and transportation to the location where the services are
provided. An employee who has declined to participate in the health
insurance offered by the employer is not entitled to reimbursement for
out-of-pocket expenses.
(5) An employer may require verification for use of more than three
consecutive days of safe leave. For leave under section 4(4)(a) of
this act, the employer may require verification of a closure order.
Notice of the closure order in whatever format the employee received
the notice satisfies the verification request. For leave under section
4(4)(b) of this act, the employer may require verification that the
employee or employee's family member is a victim of domestic violence,
sexual assault, or stalking, and that the leave taken was for one of
the purposes under section 4(4)(b) of this act. An employee may
satisfy the verification requirement in the same manner as provided in
RCW 49.76.040(4) and verification does not waive or diminish the
confidential or privileged nature of communications in the same manner
as under RCW 49.76.040(4).
(6) Upon mutual consent of the employee and employer, an employee
may work additional hours or shifts during the same or next pay period
instead of using accrued sick and safe leave for leave taken under this
section. An employer may not require the employee to work additional
shifts or hours. The employer must comply with any applicable laws
regarding overtime pay.
(7) This chapter does not prohibit an employer from establishing a
policy under which employees may: (a) Voluntarily exchange assigned
hours or trade shifts; or (b) donate unused accrued sick and safe leave
to another employee.
(8) If an employee who works in an eating and/or drinking
establishment requests sick or safe leave, the employer may offer the
employee substitute hours or shifts. If the employee accepts the offer
and works the substitute hours or shifts, the employer may deduct from
the employee's accrued sick and safe leave the amount of leave worked
during the substitute period or the amount of the sick and safe leave
request, whichever is smaller. The employer must comply with any
applicable laws regarding overtime pay. An employer is not required to
offer, and an employee is not required to accept, substitute hours or
shifts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RECORDKEEPING. (1)(a) An employer must
provide at the time wages are paid information in writing stating an
updated amount of sick and safe leave available to each employee.
Employers may choose a reasonable system for providing this
information, including but not limited to, listing remaining available
sick and safe leave on each pay stub or providing an online system
where employees can access their own sick and safe leave information.
(b) This section does not require employers to modify their
recordkeeping policies as long as records reasonably indicate accrued
and used sick and safe leave. When an issue arises as to the amount of
accrued sick and safe leave and the employer does not maintain or
retain adequate records or does not allow the department reasonable
access to the records, it is presumed that the employer violated this
chapter.
(2) Employers shall retain records documenting hours worked by
employees and sick and safe leave taken by employees for a period of
three years, and shall allow the department access to such records,
with appropriate notice and at a mutually agreeable time, to
investigate potential violations and to monitor compliance with this
chapter.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, an employer
must maintain the confidentiality of information provided by the
employee or others in support of an employee's request for sick or safe
leave, including health information and the fact the employee or
employee's family member is a victim of domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking, that the employee has requested or taken leave
under this chapter, and any written or oral statement, documentation,
record, or corroborating evidence provided by the employee.
(b) Information provided by an employee may be disclosed by an
employer only if the disclosure is: (i) Requested or consented to by
the employee; (ii) ordered by a court or administrative agency; or
(iii) otherwise required by applicable federal or state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 NOTICE OF RIGHTS. (1) Beginning January 1,
2015, a tier one, tier two, and tier three employer shall give notice
to employees:
(a) That employees are entitled to sick and safe leave;
(b) Of the amount of sick and safe leave and the terms of its use
guaranteed under this chapter;
(c) That retaliation against employees who request or use sick or
safe leave is prohibited; and
(d) That an employee has the right to file a complaint or bring a
civil action if sick or safe leave as required by this chapter is
denied by the employer or the employee is retaliated against for
requesting or taking sick or safe leave.
(2) An employer may comply with this section by providing the
information in subsection (1) of this section in English and in any
language that is the first language spoken by at least five percent of
the employer's workforce: (a) On a notice to each of the employer's
employees; or (b) on a poster displayed in a conspicuous and accessible
place in each establishment where the employer's employees are
employed.
(3) The department must create and make available to employers
posters for use under subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RETALIATION. A tier one, tier two, or tier
three employer may not discharge, threaten to discharge, demote, deny
a promotion to, sanction, discipline, retaliate against, harass, or
otherwise discriminate against an employee with respect to
compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges of employment because
the employee:
(1) Exercised rights under section 4 of this act;
(2) Filed or communicated to the employer an intent to file a
complaint under section 9 or 10 of this act; or
(3) Participated or assisted, as a witness or otherwise, in another
employee's attempt to exercise rights under section 4, 9, or 10 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 ADMINISTRATIVE ENFORCEMENT. (1) The
director may investigate to determine if there has been compliance with
this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter. If the director
determines that a violation has occurred, a hearing must be held in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The director must issue a written
determination including his or her findings after the hearing. The
director may order appropriate relief. The relief may include:
(a) Damages, including back pay, payment of any sick or safe leave
unlawfully withheld, and interest on the damages at the prevailing
rate;
(b) If any sick or safe leave was unlawfully withheld, liquidated
damages of three times the dollar amount of leave withheld, or two
hundred fifty dollars, whichever is greater;
(c) If a violation resulted in other harm to the employee or any
other person, such as discharge from employment, or otherwise violated
the rights of employees or other persons, such as a failure to provide
notice to employees or a prohibited act of retaliation, liquidated
damages of fifty dollars to each employee or person whose rights were
violated for each day or portion of each day that the violation
occurred or continued;
(d) To compensate the department for the costs of investigating or
remedying the violation, not more than fifty dollars for each day or
portion of each day and for each person or employee as to whom the
violation occurred or continued;
(e) Attorneys' fees and costs; and
(f) Equitable relief, including reinstatement.
(2) In addition to any other remedies, if the director finds that
an employer has willfully violated the notice and posting requirements
of section 7 of this act, the director may issue a notice of infraction
and impose a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred twenty-five
dollars for the first violation and two hundred fifty dollars for
subsequent violations.
(3) A judicial appeal from the director's determination may be
taken in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, and an aggrieved employee
who prevails and a person awarded liquidated damages who prevails are
entitled to attorneys' fees and costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 CIVIL ENFORCEMENT. (1) The department and
any person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter, any entity a
member of which is aggrieved by a violation of this chapter, or any
other person or entity acting on behalf of the public health and
welfare may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction
against any person who violates this chapter. The court may order
appropriate relief including the relief specified in section 9 of this
act, except that any person or entity enforcing this chapter on behalf
of the public health and welfare is not entitled to liquidated damages.
In addition, the court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs
to the party bringing the civil action if the party prevails.
(2) Exhaustion of administrative remedies is not required before
filing a civil action.
(3) The remedies in this section are in addition to any common law
or other remedies that may be available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 MORE GENEROUS POLICIES. This chapter
provides minimum requirements pertaining to sick and safe leave and is
not intended to discourage and does not prohibit an employer from
adopting or retaining a sick and safe leave policy more generous than
any policies that comply with the requirements under this chapter, or
as diminishing the obligation of any employer to comply with any
contract, collective bargaining agreement, employment benefit plan, or
other agreement providing more generous sick and safe leave than
required under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 RELATIONSHIP TO OTHER LAWS. This chapter
does not preempt, limit, or otherwise affect the applicability of any
other law, regulation, requirement, policy, or standard that provides
for greater accrual or use by employees of sick or safe leave, whether
paid or unpaid, or that extends other protections to employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 WAIVER. (1) The requirements of this
chapter do not apply to any employees covered by a bona fide collective
bargaining agreement to the extent that the requirements are expressly
waived in the collective bargaining agreement in clear and unambiguous
terms.
(2) Any waiver by an employee of any requirements of this chapter
is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The department may adopt rules to implement
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 14 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---