BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to those general powers and rights deemed
appropriate by the department, retrospective rating plan employers and
groups may assist the department in the processing of claims as
provided in this section. The department retains the final authority
over decisions with respect to any individual claim. Claims
representatives for retrospective rating plan employers and groups may:
(a) Schedule medical examinations and consultations, using only
qualified persons from the department's approved examiner list. No
more than two independent medical examinations for each claim may be
scheduled by the claims representative within any twenty-four month
period. An independent medical examination may be scheduled when the
claim file includes medical reports indicating that an examination may
be necessary for any of the following reasons: Establishing a
diagnosis; outlining a program of treatment; evaluating what, if any,
conditions are related to the claimed industrial injury or occupational
disease; determining whether an industrial injury or occupational
disease has aggravated a preexisting condition; establishing an
impairment rating when the claim file medical reports indicate that the
worker's claim-related condition is at maximum medical improvement;
evaluating whether the industrial injury or occupational disease has
worsened; or evaluating the worker's mental or physical restrictions as
well as the worker's ability to work. The results of any independent
medical examination scheduled under this subsection must be sent by the
examiner or independent medical examination panel directly to the
department for the claimant's claim file. The department must use the
same criteria it applies to department requested examinations to impose
penalties under RCW 51.32.110 for a worker's refusal to submit to a
medical examination or obstruction of an examination; and
(b) Schedule vocational rehabilitation assessments using only
qualified providers approved by the department. Providers must be
selected based on experience with the industry involved. Any
vocational rehabilitation assessment resulting from a referral under
this subsection must be sent by the vocational rehabilitation counselor
directly to the department for the claimant's claim file.
(2) If a dispute arises from the handling of any claim under this
section, the injured worker, or retrospective rating plan employer or
group, may request the department to intervene. When exercising any
authority under this section, a retrospective rating plan employer or
group must inform a worker in writing that the worker may request the
department to intervene at any time.
(3) The department must require the retrospective rating plan
employer or group to notify the department prior to exercising any
authority authorized by this section. Rules adopted under this section
must minimize the department's need to respond and ensure that any
delay in response by the department does not impede the timely
administration of the claim. Providers must bill the department for
their services based on the medical aid rules and fee schedules in
effect at the time of the examination.
(4) Charges incurred by the retrospective rating plan employer or
group for independent medical examinations or vocational rehabilitation
assessments must be charged against the claim.
(5) The department shall establish training requirements by rule
for exercising the authority under this section. At least one claims
representative for each retrospective rating plan employer or group
exercising the authority under this section must have received the
training.
(6)(a) The director may take corrective action, subject to RCW
51.52.050, against a retrospective rating plan employer or group if the
director determines that a claims representative under its direction is
not following proper industrial insurance claims procedures under this
section. Corrective actions taken by the director may include:
(i) A probationary period of time for the claims representative;
(ii) Additional mandatory training for the claims representative;
and
(iii) Monitoring of the activities of the claims representative to
determine progress towards compliance.
The director shall adopt rules defining the corrective actions in
response to final determinations of failure to follow proper
procedures.
(b) If the director determines that compliance has been attained,
no further action may be taken. If compliance has not been attained,
the director may take additional corrective action including
restricting the retrospective rating plan employer or group from
exercising the authority under this section. Restricting the exercise
of authority under this section does not otherwise affect the claim
representative's status or the retrospective rating plan employer's or
group's status in the retrospective rating program.
(7) Retrospective rating plan employers and groups must send to the
claim file maintained by the department any written communication made
under this section with a medical provider or vocational services
provider not otherwise required to be submitted to the claim file.
(8) In addition to rules required to be adopted under this section,
the department may adopt additional rules to implement this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.04.1101 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 37 s 801 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee, in
consultation with the department of labor and industries and the
workers' compensation advisory committee, shall conduct a performance
audit of the workers' compensation claims management system, including
self-insured claims. The joint legislative audit and review committee
may contract with an independent expert in workers' compensation claims
management to assist with the audit.
(2) The audit shall:
(a) Evaluate the extent to which the department: (i) Makes fair
and timely decisions, and resolves complaints and disputes in a timely,
fair, and effective manner; and (ii) communicates with employers and
workers in a timely, responsive, and accurate manner, including
communication about review and appeal rights, and including the use of
plain language and sufficient opportunities for face-to-face meetings;
(b) Determine if current claims management organization and service
delivery models are the most efficient available; analyze organization
and delivery for retrospective rating plan participants as compared to
nonparticipants to identify differences and how those differences
influence retrospective rating plan refunds; and determine whether
current initiatives, including the scheduling authority granted to
retrospective rating plan employers and groups under section 1 of this
act, improve service delivery, meet the needs of current and future
workers and employers, improve public education and outreach, and are
otherwise measurable; and
(c) Make recommendations regarding administrative changes that
should be made to improve efficiency while maintaining high levels of
quality service to help address system costs, and any needed
legislative changes to implement the recommendations.
(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall submit
progress reports by December 1, 2012, and December 1, 2013, and the
results of the audit by June 30, 2015, to the appropriate committees of
the legislature.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2015.

--- END ---