BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that obesity rates
are at epidemic proportions and that action must be taken on many
fronts to improve the health and well-being of our citizens and curb
future health care costs. If left unchecked, the adult obesity rate in
Washington could reach over fifty-five percent by 2030.
(2) The legislature recognizes that it has a role in protecting and
improving the health of its citizens and has already initiated multiple
efforts to promote healthy eating and active living, especially among
the state's most vulnerable populations. In this role, the state
government is generally seen as the educator when in fact it is also an
employer, food and beverage provider, and caregiver. The legislature
finds that in all of these roles, the state government should model its
behavior after contemporary practices for the direct provision and
service of food and beverage. Such policies can make healthier food
and beverages more readily available, affordable, and appealing.
(3) By setting minimum standards for state food provision and
service, the legislature intends to:
(a) Make state government a model for efficient, healthy, and
locally sourced food and beverage provision and service;
(b) Support local and small business producers, distributors, and
processors of healthier foods in Washington state;
(c) Improve the nutritional quality of foods served to tens of
thousands of Washington residents each day, especially to our most
vulnerable populations;
(d) Decrease the health effects and societal impacts of diseases
related to poor nutrition; and
(e) Develop a more productive workforce that strengthens
Washington's economy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) By January 1, 2014, all agencies and
other interested organizations shall adopt and begin implementation of
a food and beverage service policy that establishes standards for the
circumstances identified in this section as applicable to each agency.
The general services administration document, "health and
sustainability guidelines for federal concessions and vending
operations" must be used as a minimum standard for (b)(i) through (iii)
of this subsection and the "dietary guidelines for Americans" as a
minimum standard for (b)(iv) of this subsection. Each agency's policy
must be fully implemented no later than December 13, 2014.
(b) The food and beverage service policy must apply to:
(i) Food and beverages directly provided by state agencies for
their employees and guests at meetings;
(ii) Food and beverages made available to employees of state
agencies and guests in vending machines or through on-site vendors in
all buildings, facilities, and properties that are owned or leased by
the state;
(iii) Food and beverages that are prepared on-site by private
operators and state-operated cafeterias and cafes that are sold to
state employees and the public; and
(iv) Food and beverages that are provided to custodial populations,
including clients, inmates, and patients.
(2) The department of health shall provide written implementation
guidance to all agencies and may provide technical support to assist
agencies implementing food and beverage provision and services policies
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
(3) The department of social and health services and the department
of corrections may identify special populations with particular health
or religious dietary needs that need to be exempt from the requirements
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 By July 1, 2015, the department of health
must submit a report to the legislature summarizing the implementation
of the food and beverage provision and service policy developed under
section 2 of this act, changes needed to food provision and service
practices, any savings and other benefits realized through the policy,
and recommendations for any policy modifications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Nothing in this chapter applies to food
served:
(1) In support of training programs conducted by the Washington
state patrol;
(2) In support of other criminal justice training programs, such as
training for park rangers; or
(3) At the criminal justice training center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---