BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.70.190 and 2011 c 339 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sea cucumber dive fishery license is required to take sea
cucumbers for commercial purposes. A sea cucumber dive fishery license
authorizes the use of only one diver in the water at any time during
sea cucumber harvest operations. If the same vessel has been
designated on two sea cucumber dive fishery licenses, two divers may be
in the water. A natural person may not hold more than two sea cucumber
dive fishery licenses.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
director shall issue no new sea cucumber dive fishery licenses. For
licenses issued for the year 2000 and thereafter, the director shall
renew existing licenses only to a natural person who held the license
at the end of the previous year. If a sea cucumber dive fishery
license is not held by a natural person as of December 31, 1999, it is
not renewable. However, if the license is not held because of
revocation or suspension of licensing privileges, the director shall
renew the license in the name of a natural person at the end of the
revocation or suspension if the license holder applies for renewal of
the license before the end of the year in which the revocation or
suspension ends.
(3) Where a licensee failed to obtain the license during either of
the previous two years because of a license suspension by the director
or the court, the licensee may qualify for a license by establishing
that the person held such a license during the last year in which the
person was eligible.
(4) Surcharges as provided for in this section shall be collected
and deposited into the sea cucumber dive fishery account hereby created
in the custody of the state treasurer. The collections and deposits
must continue, as set forth in (a) and (b) of this subsection, through
license year ((2013)) 2016, or until the number of licenses is reduced
to twenty, whichever occurs first. Only the director or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The sea cucumber
dive fishery account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.
Expenditures from the account shall only be used to retire sea cucumber
licenses until the number of licenses is reduced to twenty, and
thereafter the remaining account funds, excluding excise tax revenue
deposited into the account under RCW 82.27.020, shall ((only)) be
((used for sea cucumber management and enforcement)) equally divided
and returned to the remaining permit holders. The director or the
director's designee shall notify the department of revenue within
thirty days when the number of licenses is reduced to twenty.
(a) A surcharge of one hundred dollars shall be charged with each
sea cucumber dive fishery license renewal for licenses issued in 2000
through ((2013)) 2016, or until the number of licenses is reduced to
twenty, whichever occurs first.
(b) For licenses issued for license years 2000 through ((2013))
2016, or until the number of licenses is reduced to twenty, whichever
occurs first, a surcharge shall be charged on the sea cucumber dive
fishery license for designating an alternate operator. The surcharge
shall be as follows: Five hundred dollars for the first year or each
of the first two consecutive years after 1999 that any alternate
operator is designated and two thousand five hundred dollars each year
thereafter that any alternate operator is designated.
(5) Sea cucumber dive fishery licenses are transferable. For
licenses issued for license years 2000 through ((2013)) 2016, or
whenever the number of licenses is reduced to twenty, whichever occurs
first, there is a surcharge to transfer a sea cucumber dive fishery
license. The surcharge is five hundred dollars for the first transfer
of a license valid for license year 2000 and two thousand five hundred
dollars for any subsequent transfer, occurring in the license years
2000 through ((2013)) 2016, or whenever the number of licenses is
reduced to twenty, whichever occurs first. The application fee to
transfer a sea cucumber dive fishery license is one hundred five
dollars. Notwithstanding this subsection, a one-time transfer exempt
from surcharge applies for a transfer from the natural person licensed
on January 1, 2000, to that person's spouse or child.
(6) If fewer than twenty persons are eligible for sea cucumber dive
fishery licenses, the director may accept applications for new
licenses. The additional licenses may not cause more than twenty
natural persons to be eligible for a sea cucumber dive fishery license.
New licenses issued under this section shall be distributed according
to rules of the department that recover the value of such licensed
privilege.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.27.020 and 2010 c 193 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to all other taxes, licenses, or fees provided by
law there is established an excise tax on the commercial possession of
enhanced food fish as provided in this chapter. The tax is levied upon
and shall be collected from the owner of the enhanced food fish whose
possession constitutes the taxable event. The taxable event is the
first possession in Washington by an owner after the enhanced food fish
has been landed. Processing and handling of enhanced food fish by a
person who is not the owner is not a taxable event to the processor or
handler.
(2) A person in possession of enhanced food fish and liable to this
tax may deduct from the price paid to the person from which the
enhanced food fish (except oysters) are purchased an amount equal to a
tax at one-half the rate levied in this section upon these products.
(3) The measure of the tax is the value of the enhanced food fish
at the point of landing.
(4) The tax shall be equal to the measure of the tax multiplied by
the rates for enhanced food fish as follows:
(a) Chinook, coho, and chum salmon and anadromous game fish: Five
and twenty-five one-hundredths percent;
(b) Pink and sockeye salmon: Three and fifteen one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Other food fish and shellfish, except oysters, sea urchins, and
sea cucumbers: Two and one-tenth percent;
(d) Oysters: Eight one-hundredths of one percent;
(e) Sea urchins: Four and six-tenths percent through December 31,
2013, or until the department of fish and wildlife notifies the
department that the number of sea urchin licenses has been reduced to
twenty licenses, whichever occurs first, and two and one-tenth percent
thereafter; and
(f) Sea cucumbers: Four and six-tenths percent through December
31, ((2013)) 2016, or until the department of fish and wildlife
notifies the department that the number of sea cucumber licenses has
been reduced to twenty licenses, whichever occurs first, and two and
one-tenth percent thereafter.
(5) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (4) of this
section.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.27.070 and 2010 c 193 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
All taxes collected by the department of revenue under this chapter
shall be deposited in the state general fund except for the excise tax
on anadromous game fish, which shall be deposited in the state wildlife
account. From January 1, 2000, to December 31, ((2013)) 2016, or until
the department of fish and wildlife notifies the department that the
license reduction goals of the sea urchin or sea cucumber fishery have
been met, whichever occurs first, twenty-five forty-sixths of the
revenues derived from the excise tax on sea urchins collected under RCW
82.27.020 shall be deposited into the sea urchin dive fishery account
created in RCW 77.70.150, and twenty-five forty-sixths of the revenues
derived from the excise tax on sea cucumbers collected under RCW
82.27.020 shall be deposited into the sea cucumber dive fishery account
created in RCW 77.70.190.

--- END ---