BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.04.015 and 2010 c 35 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires a different meaning.
(1) "Add-on method" means the method of precomputing interest
payable on a loan whereby the interest to be earned is added to the
principal balance and the total plus any charges allowed under this
chapter is stated as the loan amount, without further provision for the
payment of interest except for failure to pay according to loan terms.
The director may adopt by rule a more detailed explanation of the
meaning and use of this method.
(2) "Applicant" means a person applying for a license under this
chapter.
(3) "Borrower" means any person who consults with or retains a
licensee or person subject to this chapter in an effort to obtain, or
who seeks information about obtaining a loan, regardless of whether
that person actually obtains such a loan. "Borrower" includes a person
who consults with or retains a licensee or person subject to this
chapter in an effort to obtain, or who seeks information about
obtaining a residential mortgage loan modification, regardless of
whether that person actually obtains a residential mortgage loan
modification.
(4) "Depository institution" has the same meaning as in section 3
of the federal deposit insurance act on July 26, 2009, and includes
credit unions.
(5) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.
(6) "Federal banking agencies" means the board of governors of the
federal reserve system, comptroller of the currency, director of the
office of thrift supervision, national credit union administration, and
federal deposit insurance corporation.
(7) "Individual servicing a mortgage loan" means a person on behalf
of a lender or servicer licensed by this state, who collects or
receives payments including payments of principal, interest, escrow
amounts, and other amounts due, on existing obligations due and owing
to the licensed lender or servicer for a residential mortgage loan when
the borrower is in default, or in reasonably foreseeable likelihood of
default, working with the borrower and the licensed lender or servicer,
collects data and makes decisions necessary to modify either
temporarily or permanently certain terms of those obligations, or
otherwise finalizing collection through the foreclosure process.
(8) "Insurance" means life insurance, disability insurance,
property insurance, involuntary unemployment insurance, and such other
insurance as may be authorized by the insurance commissioner.
(9) "License" means a single license issued under the authority of
this chapter with respect to a single place of business.
(10) "Licensee" means a person to whom one or more licenses have
been issued.
(11) "Loan" means a sum of money lent at interest or for a fee or
other charge and includes both open-end and closed-end loan
transactions.
(12) "Loan processor or underwriter" means an individual who
performs clerical or support duties as an employee at the direction of
and subject to the supervision and instruction of a person licensed, or
exempt from licensing, under this chapter ((19.146 RCW)).
(13) "Making a loan" means advancing, offering to advance, or
making a commitment to advance funds to a borrower for a loan.
(14) "Mortgage broker" means the same as defined in RCW 19.146.010,
except that for purposes of this chapter, a licensee or person subject
to this chapter cannot receive compensation as both a consumer loan
licensee making the loan and as a consumer loan licensee acting as the
mortgage broker in the same loan transaction.
(15)(a) "Mortgage loan originator" means an individual who for
compensation or gain (i) takes a residential mortgage loan application,
or (ii) offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan.
"Mortgage loan originator" does not include any individual who performs
purely administrative or clerical tasks; and does not include a person
or entity solely involved in extensions of credit relating to timeshare
plans, as that term is defined in section 101(53D) of Title 11, United
States Code. For the purposes of this definition, administrative or
clerical tasks means the receipt, collection, and distribution of
information common for the processing of a loan in the mortgage
industry and communication with a consumer to obtain information
necessary for the processing of a residential mortgage loan.
(b) "Mortgage loan originator" also includes an individual who for
compensation or gain performs residential mortgage loan modification
services or holds himself or herself out as being able to perform
residential mortgage loan modification services.
(c) "Mortgage loan originator" does not include a person or entity
that only performs real estate brokerage activities and is licensed or
registered in accordance with applicable state law, unless the person
or entity is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker, or other
mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such a lender, mortgage
broker, or other mortgage loan originator. For the purposes of chapter
120, Laws of 2009, the term "real estate brokerage activity" means any
activity that involves offering or providing real estate brokerage
services to the public, including:
(i) Acting as a real estate agent or real estate broker for a
buyer, seller, lessor, or lessee of real property;
(ii) Bringing together parties interested in the sale, purchase,
lease, rental, or exchange of real property;
(iii) Negotiating, on behalf of any party, any portion of a
contract relating to the sale, purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of
real property, other than in connection with providing financing with
respect to such a transaction;
(iv) Engaging in any activity for which a person engaged in the
activity is required to be registered or licensed as a real estate
agent or real estate broker under any applicable law; and
(v) Offering to engage in any activity, or act in any capacity,
described in (c)(i) through (iv) of this subsection.
(d) ((This subsection does not apply to an individual servicing a
mortgage loan before July 1, 2011.
(e))) This subsection does not apply to employees of a housing
counseling agency approved by the United States department of housing
and urban development unless the employees of a housing counseling
agency are required under federal law to be individually licensed as
mortgage loan originators.
(16) "Nationwide ((mortgage)) multistate licensing system ((and
registry))" means a ((mortgage)) licensing system developed and
maintained by the conference of state bank supervisors and the American
association of residential mortgage regulators for the licensing and
registration of mortgage loan originators and other licensing types.
(17) "Officer" means an official appointed by the company for the
purpose of making business decisions or corporate decisions.
(18) "Person" includes individuals, partnerships, associations,
limited liability companies, limited liability partnerships, trusts,
corporations, and all other legal entities.
(19) "Principal" means any person who controls, directly or
indirectly through one or more intermediaries, alone or in concert with
others, a ten percent or greater interest in a partnership; company;
association or corporation; or a limited liability company, and the
owner of a sole proprietorship.
(20) "Registered mortgage loan originator" means any individual who
meets the definition of mortgage loan originator and is an employee of
a depository institution; a subsidiary that is owned and controlled by
a depository institution and regulated by a federal banking agency; or
an institution regulated by the farm credit administration and is
registered with, and maintains a unique identifier through, the
nationwide ((mortgage)) multistate licensing system ((and registry)).
(21) "Residential mortgage loan" means any loan primarily for
personal, family, or household use that is secured by a mortgage, deed
of trust, or other equivalent consensual security interest on a
dwelling, as defined in section 103(v) of the truth in lending act, or
residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended to be
constructed a dwelling.
(22) "Residential mortgage loan modification" means a change in one
or more of a residential mortgage loan's terms or conditions. Changes
to a residential mortgage loan's terms or conditions include but are
not limited to forbearances; repayment plans; changes in interest
rates, loan terms, or loan types; capitalizations of arrearages; or
principal reductions.
(23) "Residential mortgage loan modification services" includes
negotiating, attempting to negotiate, arranging, attempting to arrange,
or otherwise offering to perform a residential mortgage loan
modification for compensation or gain. "Residential mortgage loan
modification services" also includes the collection of data for
submission to an entity performing mortgage loan modification services.
(("Residential mortgage loan modification services" do not include
actions by individuals servicing a mortgage loan before July 1, 2011.))
(24) "S.A.F.E. act" means the secure and fair enforcement for
mortgage licensing act of 2008, Title V of the housing and economic
recovery act of 2008 ("HERA"), P.L. 110-289, effective July 30, 2008.
(25) "Senior officer" means an officer of a licensee at the vice
president level or above.
(26) "Service or servicing a loan" means on behalf of the lender or
investor of a residential mortgage loan: (a) Collecting or receiving
payments on existing obligations due and owing to the lender or
investor, including payments of principal, interest, escrow amounts,
and other amounts due; (b) collecting fees due to the servicer; (c)
working with the borrower and the licensed lender or servicer to
collect data and make decisions necessary to modify certain terms of
those obligations either temporarily or permanently; (d) otherwise
finalizing collection through the foreclosure process; or (e) servicing
a reverse mortgage loan.
(27) "Service or servicing a reverse mortgage loan" means, pursuant
to an agreement with the owner of a reverse mortgage loan:
Calculating, collecting, or receiving payments of interest or other
amounts due; administering advances to the borrower; and providing
account statements to the borrower or lender.
(28) "Simple interest method" means the method of computing
interest payable on a loan by applying the annual percentage interest
rate or its periodic equivalent to the unpaid balances of the principal
of the loan outstanding for the time outstanding ((with)).
(a) On a nonresidential loan each payment is applied first to any
unpaid penalties, fees, or charges, then to accumulated interest, and
the remainder of the payment applied to the unpaid balance of the
principal until paid in full. In using such method, interest shall not
be payable in advance nor compounded((, except that on a loan secured
by real estate, a licensee may collect at the time of the loan closing
up to but not exceeding forty-five days of prepaid interest)). The
prohibition on compounding interest does not apply to reverse mortgage
loans made in accordance with the Washington state reverse mortgage
act. The director may adopt by rule a more detailed explanation of the
meaning and use of this method.
(b) On a residential mortgage loan payments are applied as
determined in the security instrument.
(29) "Third-party residential mortgage loan modification services"
means residential mortgage loan modification services offered or
performed by any person other than the owner or servicer of the loan.
(30) "Third-party service provider" means any person other than the
licensee or a mortgage broker who provides goods or services to the
licensee or borrower in connection with the preparation of the
borrower's loan and includes, but is not limited to, credit reporting
agencies, real estate brokers or salespersons, title insurance
companies and agents, appraisers, structural and pest inspectors, or
escrow companies.
(31) "Unique identifier" means a number or other identifier
assigned by protocols established by the nationwide ((mortgage))
multistate licensing system ((and registry)).

Sec. 2 RCW 31.04.025 and 2012 c 17 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each loan made to a resident of this state by a licensee, or
persons subject to this chapter, is subject to the authority and
restrictions of this chapter((, unless such loan is made under the
authority of chapter 63.14 RCW)).
(2) This chapter does not apply to the following:
(a) Any person doing business under, and as permitted by, any law
of this state or of the United States relating to banks, savings banks,
trust companies, savings and loan or building and loan associations, or
credit unions;
(b) Entities making loans under chapter 19.60 RCW (pawnbroking);
(c) Entities conducting transactions under chapter 63.14 RCW
(retail installment sales of goods and services), unless ((the goods
being sold in a retail installment sale consist of open loop prepaid
access (prepaid access as defined in 31 C.F.R. Part 1010.100(ww) and
not closed loop prepaid access as defined in 31 C.F.R. Part
1010.100(kkk)))) credit is extended to purchase merchandise
certificates, coupons, open or closed loop stored value, or other
similar items issued and redeemable by a retail seller other than the
retail seller extending the credit;
(d) Entities making loans under chapter 31.45 RCW (check cashers
and sellers);
(e) Any person making a loan primarily for business, commercial, or
agricultural purposes unless the loan is secured by a lien on the
borrower's primary residence;
(f) Any person making loans made to government or government
agencies or instrumentalities or making loans to organizations as
defined in the federal truth in lending act;
(g) Entities making loans under chapter 43.185 RCW (housing trust
fund);
(h) Entities making loans under programs of the United States
department of agriculture, department of housing and urban development,
or other federal government program that provides funding or access to
funding for single-family housing developments or grants to low-income
individuals for the purchase or repair of single-family housing;
(i) Nonprofit housing organizations making loans, or loans made,
under housing programs that are funded in whole or in part by federal
or state programs if the primary purpose of the programs is to assist
low-income borrowers with purchasing or repairing housing or the
development of housing for low-income Washington state residents;
((and))
(j) Entities making loans which are not residential mortgage loans
under a credit card plan; and
(k) Individuals employed by a licensed residential loan servicing
company, unless so required by federal law or regulation.
(3) The director may, at his or her discretion, waive applicability
of the consumer loan company licensing provisions of this chapter to
other persons, not including individuals subject to the S.A.F.E. act,
making or servicing loans when the director determines it necessary to
facilitate commerce and protect consumers. The director may adopt
rules interpreting this section.
(4) The burden of proving the application for an exemption or
exception from a definition, or a preemption of a provision of this
chapter, is upon the person claiming the exemption, exception, or
preemption.

Sec. 3 RCW 31.04.027 and 2012 c 17 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is a violation of this chapter for a licensee, its officers,
directors, employees, or independent contractors, or any other person
subject to this chapter to:
(1) Directly or indirectly employ any scheme, device, or artifice
to defraud or mislead any borrower, to defraud or mislead any lender,
or to defraud or mislead any person;
(2) Directly or indirectly engage in any unfair or deceptive
practice toward any person;
(3) Directly or indirectly obtain property by fraud or
misrepresentation;
(4) Solicit or enter into a contract with a borrower that provides
in substance that the consumer loan company may earn a fee or
commission through the consumer loan company's best efforts to obtain
a loan even though no loan is actually obtained for the borrower;
(5) Solicit, advertise, or enter into a contract for specific
interest rates, points, or other financing terms unless the terms are
actually available at the time of soliciting, advertising, or
contracting;
(6) Fail to make disclosures to loan applicants as required by RCW
31.04.102 and any other applicable state or federal law;
(7) Make, in any manner, any false or deceptive statement or
representation with regard to the rates, points, or other financing
terms or conditions for a residential mortgage loan or engage in bait
and switch advertising;
(8) Negligently make any false statement or knowingly and willfully
make any omission of material fact in connection with any reports filed
with the department by a licensee or in connection with any
investigation conducted by the department;
(9) Make any payment, directly or indirectly, to any appraiser of
a property, for the purposes of influencing the independent judgment of
the appraiser with respect to the value of the property;
(10) Accept from any borrower at or near the time a loan is made
and in advance of any default an execution of, or induce any borrower
to execute, any instrument of conveyance, not including a mortgage or
deed of trust, to the lender of any ownership interest in the
borrower's primary residence that is the security for the borrower's
loan;
(11) Obtain at the time of closing a release of future damages for
usury or other damages or penalties provided by law or a waiver of the
provisions of this chapter;
(12) Advertise any rate of interest without conspicuously
disclosing the annual percentage rate implied by that rate of interest
((or otherwise fail to comply with any requirement of the truth in
lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Sec. 226,
the real estate settlement procedures act, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 and
regulation X, 24 C.F.R. Sec. 3500, or the equal credit opportunity act,
15 U.S.C. Sec. 1691 and regulation B, Sec. 202.9, 202.11, and 202.12,
or any other applicable state or federal statutes or regulations; or));
(13) Violate any applicable state or federal law relating to the
activities governed by this chapter; or
(14) Make loans from any unlicensed location.

Sec. 4 RCW 31.04.035 and 2010 c 35 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may ((engage in the business of making)) make secured
or unsecured loans of money((,)) or things in action, or extend credit,
((or things in action,)) or ((servicing)) service or modify the terms
or conditions of residential mortgage loans, without first obtaining
and maintaining a license in accordance with this chapter, except those
exempt under RCW 31.04.025.
(2) If a transaction violates subsection (1) of this section, any:
(a) Nonthird-party fees charged in connection with the origination
of the residential mortgage loan must be refunded to the borrower,
excluding interest charges; and
(b) Fees or interest charged in the making of a nonresidential loan
must be refunded to the borrower.

Sec. 5 RCW 31.04.093 and 2012 c 17 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall enforce all laws and rules relating to the
licensing and regulation of licensees and persons subject to this
chapter.
(2) The director may deny applications for licenses for:
(a) Failure of the applicant to demonstrate within its application
for a license that it meets the requirements for licensing in RCW
31.04.045 and 31.04.055;
(b) Violation of an order issued by the director under this chapter
or another chapter administered by the director, including but not
limited to cease and desist orders and temporary cease and desist
orders;
(c) Revocation or suspension of a license to conduct lending or
residential mortgage loan servicing, or to provide settlement services
associated with lending or residential mortgage loan servicing, by this
state, another state, or by the federal government within five years of
the date of submittal of a complete application for a license; or
(d) Filing an incomplete application when that incomplete
application has been filed with the department for sixty or more days,
provided that the director has given notice to the licensee that the
application is incomplete, informed the applicant why the application
is incomplete, and allowed at least twenty days for the applicant to
complete the application.
(3) The director may suspend or revoke a license issued under this
chapter if the director finds that:
(a) The licensee has failed to pay any fee due the state of
Washington, has failed to maintain in effect the bond or permitted
substitute required under this chapter, or has failed to comply with
any specific order or demand of the director lawfully made and directed
to the licensee in accordance with this chapter;
(b) The licensee, either knowingly or without the exercise of due
care, has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted
under this chapter; or
(c) A fact or condition exists that, if it had existed at the time
of the original application for the license, clearly would have allowed
the director to deny the application for the original license. The
director may revoke or suspend only the particular license with respect
to which grounds for revocation or suspension may occur or exist unless
the director finds that the grounds for revocation or suspension are of
general application to all offices or to more than one office operated
by the licensee, in which case, the director may revoke or suspend all
of the licenses issued to the licensee.
(4) The director may impose fines of up to one hundred dollars per
day, per violation, upon the licensee, its employee or loan originator,
or other person subject to this chapter for:
(a) Any violation of this chapter; or
(b) Failure to comply with any order or subpoena issued by the
director under this chapter.
(5) The director may issue an order directing the licensee, its
employee or loan originator, or other person subject to this chapter
to:
(a) Cease and desist from conducting business in a manner that is
injurious to the public or violates any provision of this chapter;
(b) Take such affirmative action as is necessary to comply with
this chapter; or
(c) Make a refund or restitution to a borrower or other person who
is damaged as a result of a violation of this chapter.
(6) The director may issue an order removing from office or
prohibiting from participation in the affairs of any licensee, or both,
any officer, principal, employee or loan originator, or any person
subject to this chapter for:
(a) False statements or omission of material information from an
application for a license that, if known, would have allowed the
director to deny the original application for a license;
(b) Conviction of a gross misdemeanor involving dishonesty or
financial misconduct or a felony;
(c) Suspension or revocation of a license to engage in lending or
residential mortgage loan servicing, or perform a settlement service
related to lending or residential mortgage loan servicing, in this
state or another state;
(d) Failure to comply with any order or subpoena issued under this
chapter;
(e) A violation of RCW 31.04.027, 31.04.102, 31.04.155, or
31.04.221; or
(f) Failure to obtain a license for activity that requires a
license.
(7) Except to the extent prohibited by another statute, the
director may engage in informal settlement of complaints or enforcement
actions including, but not limited to, payment to the department for
purposes of financial literacy and education programs authorized under
RCW 43.320.150. If any person subject to this chapter makes a payment
to the department under this section, the person may not advertise such
payment.
(8) Whenever the director determines that the public is likely to
be substantially injured by delay in issuing a cease and desist order,
the director may immediately issue a temporary cease and desist order.
The order may direct the licensee to discontinue any violation of this
chapter, to take such affirmative action as is necessary to comply with
this chapter, and may include a summary suspension of the licensee's
license and may order the licensee to immediately cease the conduct of
business under this chapter. The order shall become effective at the
time specified in the order. Every temporary cease and desist order
shall include a provision that a hearing will be held upon request to
determine whether the order will become permanent. Such hearing shall
be held within fourteen days of receipt of a request for a hearing
unless otherwise specified in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(9) A licensee may surrender a license by delivering to the
director written notice of surrender, but the surrender does not affect
the licensee's civil or criminal liability, if any, for acts committed
before the surrender, including any administrative action initiated by
the director to suspend or revoke a license, impose fines, compel the
payment of restitution to borrowers or other persons, or exercise any
other authority under this chapter.
(10) The revocation, suspension, or surrender of a license does not
impair or affect the obligation of a preexisting lawful contract
between the licensee and a borrower.
(11) Every license issued under this chapter remains in force and
effect until it has been surrendered, revoked, or suspended in
accordance with this chapter. However, the director may on his or her
own initiative reinstate suspended licenses or issue new licenses to a
licensee whose license or licenses have been revoked if the director
finds that the licensee meets all the requirements of this chapter.
(12) A license issued under this chapter expires upon the
licensee's failure to comply with the annual assessment requirements in
RCW 31.04.085, and the rules. The department must provide notice of
the expiration to the address of record provided by the licensee. On
the 15th day after the department provides notice, if the assessment
remains unpaid, the license expires. The licensee must receive notice
prior to expiration and have the opportunity to stop the expiration as
set forth in rule.

Sec. 6 RCW 31.04.102 and 2009 c 120 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For all loans made by a licensee that are not secured by a lien
on real property, the licensee must make disclosures in compliance with
the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and regulation Z, 12
C.F.R. Part 226, and all other applicable federal laws and regulations.
(2) For all loans made by a licensee that are secured by a lien on
real property, the licensee shall provide to each borrower within three
business days following receipt of a loan application a written
disclosure containing an itemized estimation and explanation of all
fees and costs that the borrower is required to pay in connection with
obtaining a loan from the licensee. A good faith estimate of a fee or
cost shall be provided if the exact amount of the fee or cost is not
available when the disclosure is provided. Disclosure in a form which
complies with the requirements of the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C.
Sec. 1601 and regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Part 226, the real estate
settlement procedures act and regulation X, 24 C.F.R. Sec. 3500, and
all other applicable federal laws and regulations, as now or hereafter
amended, shall be deemed to constitute compliance with this disclosure
requirement. Each licensee shall comply with all other applicable
federal and state laws and regulations.
(3) In addition, for all loans made by the licensee that are
secured by a lien on real property, the licensee must provide to the
borrower an estimate of the annual percentage rate on the loan and a
disclosure of whether or not the loan contains a prepayment penalty
within three days of receipt of a loan application. The annual
percentage rate must be calculated in compliance with the truth in
lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Part 226.
If a licensee provides the borrower with a disclosure in compliance
with the requirements of the truth in lending act within three business
days of receipt of a loan application, then the licensee has complied
with this subsection. If the director determines that the federal
government has required a disclosure that substantially meets the
objectives of this subsection, then the director may make a
determination by rule that compliance with this federal disclosure
requirement constitutes compliance with this subsection.
(4) In addition for all consumer loans made by the licensee that
are secured by a lien on real property, the licensee must ((provide the
borrower with the one-page disclosure summary required in)) comply with
RCW 19.144.020.

Sec. 7 RCW 31.04.105 and 2009 c 120 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every licensee may:
(1) Lend money at a rate that does not exceed twenty-five percent
per annum as determined by the simple interest method of calculating
interest owed;
(2) In connection with the making of a loan, charge the borrower a
nonrefundable, prepaid, loan origination fee not to exceed four percent
of the first twenty thousand dollars and two percent thereafter of the
principal amount of the loan advanced to or for the direct benefit of
the borrower, which fee may be included in the principal balance of the
loan;
(3) Agree with the borrower for the payment of fees to third
parties other than the licensee who provide goods or services to the
licensee in connection with the preparation of the borrower's loan,
including, but not limited to, credit reporting agencies, title
companies, appraisers, structural and pest inspectors, and escrow
companies, when such fees are actually paid by the licensee to a third
party for such services or purposes and may include such fees in the
amount of the loan. However, no charge may be collected unless a loan
is made, except for reasonable fees properly incurred in connection
with the appraisal of property by a qualified, independent,
professional, third-party appraiser selected by the borrower and
approved by the lender or in the absence of borrower selection,
selected by the lender;
(4) In connection with the making of a loan secured by real estate,
when the borrower actually obtains a loan, agree with the borrower to
pay a fee to a mortgage broker that is not owned by the licensee or
under common ownership with the licensee and that performed services in
connection with the origination of the loan. A licensee may not
receive compensation as a mortgage broker in connection with any loan
made by the licensee;
(5) Collect at the time of the loan closing up to but not exceeding
forty-five days of prepaid interest;
(6) Charge and collect a penalty of not more than ten percent of
any installment payment delinquent ten days or more;
(((6))) (7) Collect from the debtor reasonable attorneys' fees,
actual expenses, and costs incurred in connection with the collection
of a delinquent debt, a repossession, or a foreclosure when a debt is
referred for collection to an attorney who is not a salaried employee
of the licensee;
(((7))) (8) Make open-end loans as provided in this chapter;
(((8))) (9) Charge and collect a fee for dishonored checks in an
amount approved by the director; and
(((9))) (10) In accordance with Title 48 RCW, sell insurance
covering real and personal property, covering the life or disability or
both of the borrower, and covering the involuntary unemployment of the
borrower.

Sec. 8 RCW 31.04.155 and 2001 c 81 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
The licensee shall keep and use in the business such books,
accounts, records, papers, documents, files, and other information as
will enable the director to determine whether the licensee is complying
with this chapter and with the rules adopted by the director under this
chapter. The director shall have free access to such books, accounts,
records, papers, documents, files, and other information wherever
located. Every licensee shall preserve the books, accounts, records,
papers, documents, files, and other information relevant to a loan for
at least ((twenty-five months)) three years after making the final
entry on any loan. No licensee or person subject to examination or
investigation under this chapter shall withhold, abstract, remove,
mutilate, destroy, or secrete any books, accounts, records, papers,
documents, files, or other information.
Each licensee shall, on or before the first day of March of each
year, file a report with the director giving such relevant information
as the director may reasonably require concerning the business and
operations of each licensed place of business conducted during the
preceding calendar year. The report must be made under oath and must
be in the form prescribed by the director, who shall make and publish
annually an analysis and recapitulation of the reports. Every licensee
that fails to file a report that is required to be filed by this
chapter within the time required under this chapter is subject to a
penalty of fifty dollars per day for each day's delay. The attorney
general may bring a civil action in the name of the state for recovery
of any such penalty.

Sec. 9 RCW 31.04.221 and 2009 c 120 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
An individual defined as a mortgage loan originator shall not
engage in the business of a mortgage loan originator without first
obtaining and maintaining annually a license under this chapter ((120,
Laws of 2009)). Each licensed mortgage loan originator must register
with and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the nationwide
((mortgage)) multistate licensing system ((and registry)).

Sec. 10 RCW 31.04.290 and 2010 c 35 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A residential mortgage loan servicer must comply with the
following requirements:
(a) The requirements of chapter 19.148 RCW;
(b) Any fee that is assessed by a servicer must be assessed within
forty-five days of the date on which the fee was incurred and must be
explained clearly and conspicuously in a statement mailed to the
borrower at the borrower's last known address no more than thirty days
after assessing the fee;
(c) All amounts received by a servicer on a residential mortgage
loan at the address where the borrower has been instructed to make
payments must be accepted and credited, or treated as credited, within
one business day of the date received, provided that the borrower has
provided sufficient information to credit the account. If a servicer
uses the scheduled method of accounting, any regularly scheduled
payment made prior to the scheduled due date must be credited no later
than the due date. If any payment is received and not credited, or
treated as credited, the borrower must be notified of the disposition
of the payment within ten business days by mail at the borrower's last
known address. The notification must identify the reason the payment
was not credited or treated as credited to the account, as well as any
actions the borrower must take to make the residential mortgage loan
current;
(d) Any servicer that exercises the authority to collect escrow
amounts on a residential mortgage loan held for the borrower for
payment of insurance, taxes, and other charges with respect to the
property shall collect and make all such payments from the escrow
account and ensure that no late penalties are assessed or other
negative consequences result for the borrower;
(e) The servicer shall make reasonable attempts to comply with a
borrower's request for information about the residential mortgage loan
account and to respond to any dispute initiated by the borrower about
the loan account. The servicer:
(i) Must maintain written or electronic records of each written
request for information regarding a dispute or error involving the
borrower's account until the residential mortgage loan is paid in full,
sold, or otherwise satisfied; and
(ii) Must provide a written statement to the borrower within
fifteen business days of receipt of a written request from the
borrower. The borrower's request must include the name and account
number, if any, of the borrower, a statement that the account is or may
be in error, and sufficient detail regarding the information sought by
the borrower to permit the servicer to comply. At a minimum, the
servicer's response to the borrower's request must include the
following information:
(A) Whether the account is current or, if the account is not
current, an explanation of the default and the date the account went
into default;
(B) The current balance due on the residential mortgage loan,
including the principal due, the amount of funds, if any, held in a
suspense account, the amount of the escrow balance known to the
servicer, if any, and whether there are any escrow deficiencies or
shortages known to the servicer;
(C) The identity, address, and other relevant information about the
current holder, owner, or assignee of the residential mortgage loan;
and
(D) The telephone number and mailing address of a servicer
representative with the information and authority to answer questions
and resolve disputes; and
(((iii) May charge a fee for preparing and furnishing the statement
in (e)(ii) of this subsection not exceeding thirty dollars per
statement; and))
(f) Promptly correct any errors and refund any fees assessed to the
borrower resulting from the servicer's error.
(2) In addition to the statement in subsection (1)(e)(ii) of this
section, a borrower may request more detailed information from a
servicer, and the servicer must provide the information within fifteen
business days of receipt of a written request from the borrower. The
request must include the name and account number, if any, of the
borrower, a statement that the account is or may be in error, and
provide sufficient detail to the servicer regarding information sought
by the borrower. If requested by the borrower this statement must
include:
(a) A copy of the original note, or if unavailable, an affidavit of
lost note; and
(b) A statement that identifies and itemizes all fees and charges
assessed under the loan transaction and provides a full payment history
identifying in a clear and conspicuous manner all of the debits,
credits, application of and disbursement of all payments received from
or for the benefit of the borrower, and other activity on the
residential mortgage loan including escrow account activity and
suspense account activity, if any. The period of the account history
shall cover at a minimum the two-year period prior to the date of the
receipt of the request for information. If the servicer has not
serviced the residential mortgage loan for the entire two-year time
period the servicer shall provide the information going back to the
date on which the servicer began servicing the home loan, and identify
the previous servicer, if known. If the servicer claims that any
delinquent or outstanding sums are owed on the home loan prior to the
two-year period or the period during which the servicer has serviced
the residential mortgage loan, the servicer shall provide an account
history beginning with the month that the servicer claims any
outstanding sums are owed on the residential mortgage loan up to the
date of the request for the information. The borrower may request
annually one statement free of charge.

Sec. 11 RCW 31.04.293 and 2010 c 35 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any other requirements under federal or state
law, an advance fee may not be collected for residential mortgage loan
modification services ((unless a)).
(2) A written disclosure summary of all material terms((, in the
format adopted by the department under subsection (2) of this section,
has been)) of the services to be provided must be provided to the
borrower.
(((2))) (3) The department shall adopt by rule a model written
((fee agreement)) disclosure summary, and any other rules necessary to
implement this section. This may include, but is not limited to, usual
and customary fees for residential mortgage loan modification services.

Sec. 12 RCW 31.04.297 and 2010 c 35 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to complying with federal law and all requirements
for loan originators under this chapter, third-party residential
mortgage loan modification services providers must:
(a) Provide a written ((fee)) disclosure summary as described in
RCW 31.04.293 ((before accepting any advance fee));
(b) Not receive ((an)) advance ((fee greater than seven hundred
fifty dollars)) fees;
(c) Not charge total fees in excess of usual and customary charges,
or total fees that are not reasonable in light of the service provided;
and
(d) Immediately inform the borrower in writing if the owner of the
loan requires additional information from the borrower, or if it
becomes apparent that a residential mortgage loan modification is not
possible.
(2) As a condition for providing a loan modification or loan
modification services, third-party residential mortgage loan
modification services providers and individuals servicing a residential
mortgage loan must not require or encourage a borrower to:
(a) Sign a waiver of his or her legal defenses, counterclaims, and
other legal rights against the servicer for future acts;
(b) Sign a waiver of his or her right to contest a future
foreclosure;
(c) Waive his or her right to receive notice before the owner or
servicer of the loan initiates foreclosure proceedings;
(d) Agree to pay charges not enumerated in any agreement between
the borrower and the lender, servicer, or owner of the loan; or
(e) Cease communication with the lender, investor, or loan
servicer.
(3) Failure to comply with subsection (1) of this section is a
violation of RCW 19.144.080.

--- END ---