BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) One student advisory committee may be formed at each four-year
institution of higher education by that institution's recognized
student government organization for the purpose of advising and
assisting the administration of that four-year institution of higher
education on issues that directly affect students' ability to access
and succeed in their educational programs. Issues that the student
advisory committee should consider include:
(a) The institution's annual budget;
(b) Tuition and fee levels;
(c) Financial aid policies;
(d) Long-range budget priorities and allocation planning; and
(e) Admission and enrollment policies.
(2) Members of a student advisory committee may be appointed in a
manner that is consistent with policies adopted by the recognized
student government organizations at each institution. If there is both
an undergraduate and graduate recognized student government
organization at one institution, members of the student advisory
committee may be appointed in a manner consistent with policies adopted
by both organizations.
(3) The administration of each four-year institution of higher
education must: (a) Make readily available all nonconfidential
information, documents, and reports requested by the student advisory
committee and that are necessary for the committee to provide informed
recommendations; and (b) provide the opportunity to present
recommendations to the boards of regents or trustees before final
decisions of the administration that relate to the issues outlined in
subsection (1) of this section.
(4) A student advisory committee must: (a) Make reasonable efforts
to solicit feedback from students regarding the issues outlined in
subsection (1) of this section and matters that are of general interest
and impact students; and (b) take reasonable steps to keep students
informed of deliberations and actions of the student advisory
committee.

--- END ---