BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the rate of
reimbursement for providers of community residential services to
persons with developmental disabilities currently has no established
mechanism to keep pace with inflation. Further, the legislature finds
that rate reductions to providers of community residential services to
persons with developmental disabilities have decreased the gap between
the hourly Washington minimum wage and the entry level hourly wage for
direct support staff.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in fiscal year 2014, and in each fiscal year
thereafter, the benchmark rate, the indirect client
support/administrative rate, and other service rate components for
providers of community residential services to persons with
developmental disabilities must be adjusted by an inflation factor
during the first month of each fiscal year. The inflation factor must
be calculated based on the rate of change in the consumer price index
for urban wage earners and clerical workers, published by the United
States bureau of labor statistics, for the most recent available twelve
month period. The adjustment may not be less than zero percent and may
not exceed four percent.
(2) The benchmark rate for providers of community residential
services to persons with developmental disabilities must be restored to
the June 2009 payment level, prior to four percent in rate reductions.
On July 1, 2013, after the inflation factor adjustment has been
applied, the benchmark rate must be raised by an additional two
percent. On July 1, 2014, after the inflation factor adjustment has
been applied, the benchmark rate must be raised by an additional two
percent.
(3) The department must review the indirect client
support/administrative rate for all providers of community residential
services to persons with developmental disabilities. On July 1, 2013,
any indirect client support/administrative rate from a provider that
falls below the standard rate, as established in this section, must be
raised by the department to the indirect client support/administrative
standard rate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2013, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---