BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) According to the state department of health, suicide is the
second leading cause of death for Washington youth between the ages of
ten and twenty-four. Suicide rates among Washington youth remain
higher than that national average;
(b) Educators are not necessarily trained to address significant
social, emotional, or behavioral issues exhibited by youth. Rather,
best practices guidelines suggest that school districts should form
partnerships with qualified health, mental health, and social services
agencies to provide support; and
(c) Current safe school plans prepared by school districts tend to
focus more on natural disasters and external threats and less on how to
recognize and respond to potential crises among the students inside the
school.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to increase the capacity for
school districts to recognize and respond to youth in need through
additional training, more comprehensive planning, and emphasis on
partnerships between schools and communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) As provided under subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
individuals certified by the professional educator standards board as
a school nurse, school social worker, school psychologist, or school
counselor must complete a training program on youth suicide screening
and referral as a condition of certification. The training program
must be at least three hours in length. The professional educator
standards board must adopt standards for the minimum content of the
training in consultation with the office of the superintendent of
public instruction and the department of health. In developing the
standards, the board must consider training programs listed on the best
practices registry of the American foundation for suicide prevention
and the suicide prevention resource center.
(2) This section applies at the time the following certificates are
first issued if the certificates are issued on or after July 1, 2015,
and at the time the following certificates are renewed if the
certificates are renewed on or after July 1, 2015:
(a) Continuing certificates for school nurses;
(b) Continuing certificates for school social workers;
(c) Continuing and professional certificates for school
psychologists; and
(d) Continuing and professional certificates for school counselors.
(3) A school counselor who holds or submits a school counseling
certificate from the national board for professional teaching standards
or a school psychologist who holds or submits a school psychologist
certificate from the national association of school psychologists in
lieu of a professional certificate must complete the training program
under subsection (1) of this section by July 1, 2015, or within the
five-year period before the certificate is first submitted to the
professional educator standards board, whichever is later, and at least
once every five years thereafter in order to be considered certified by
the professional educator standards board.
(4) The professional educator standards board shall consider the
training program under subsection (1) of this section as approved
continuing education under RCW 28A.415.020 and shall count the training
program toward meeting continuing education requirements for
certification as a school nurse, school social worker, school
psychologist, or school counselor.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.410.035 and 1990 c 90 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To receive initial certification as a teacher in this state
after August 31, 1991, an applicant shall have successfully completed
a course on issues of abuse. The content of the course shall discuss
the identification of physical, emotional, sexual, and substance abuse,
information on the impact of abuse on the behavior and learning
abilities of students, discussion of the responsibilities of a teacher
to report abuse or provide assistance to students who are the victims
of abuse, and methods for teaching students about abuse of all types
and their prevention.
(2) The professional educator standards board shall incorporate
into the content required for the course under this section, knowledge
and skill standards pertaining to recognition, initial screening, and
response to emotional or behavioral distress in students, including but
not limited to indicators of possible substance abuse, violence, and
youth suicide. To receive initial certification after August 31, 2014,
an applicant must have successfully completed a course that includes
the content of this subsection. The board shall consult with the
office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department
of health in developing the standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in the 2014-15 school year, each school district must
adopt a plan for recognition, initial screening, and response to
emotional or behavioral distress in students, including but not limited
to indicators of possible substance abuse, violence, and youth suicide.
The school district must annually provide the plan to all district
staff.
(2) At a minimum the plan must address:
(a) Identification of training opportunities in recognition,
screening, and referral that may be available for staff;
(b) How to use the expertise of district staff who have been
trained in recognition, screening, and referral;
(c) How staff should respond to suspicions, concerns, or warning
signs of emotional or behavioral distress in students;
(d) Identification and development of partnerships with community
organizations and agencies for referral of students to health, mental
health, substance abuse, and social support services, including
development of at least one memorandum of understanding between the
district and such an entity in the community or region;
(e) Protocols and procedures for communication with parents;
(f) How staff should respond to a crisis situation where a student
is in imminent danger to himself or herself or others; and
(g) How the district will provide support to students and staff
after an incident of violence or youth suicide.
(3) The plan under this section may be a separate plan or a
component of another district plan or policy, such as the harassment,
intimidation, and bullying prevention policy under RCW 28A.300.2851 or
the comprehensive safe school plan required under RCW 28A.320.125.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
school safety advisory committee shall develop a model school district
plan for recognition, initial screening, and response to emotional or
behavioral distress in students, including but not limited to
indicators of possible substance abuse, violence, and youth suicide.
The model plan must incorporate research-based best practices,
including practices and protocols used in schools and school districts
in other states. The model plan must be posted by February 1, 2014, on
the school safety center web site, along with relevant resources and
information to support school districts in developing and implementing
the plan required under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.310
RCW to read as follows:
Each educational service district is encouraged to develop and
maintain the capacity to offer training for educators and other school
district staff on youth suicide screening and referral, and on
recognition, initial screening, and response to emotional or behavioral
distress in students, including but not limited to indicators of
possible substance abuse, violence, and youth suicide. An educational
service district may demonstrate capacity by employing staff with
sufficient expertise to offer the training or by contracting with
individuals or organizations to offer the training. Training may be
offered on a fee- for-service basis, or at no cost to school districts
or educators if funds are appropriated specifically for this purpose or
made available through grants or other sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall convene a temporary task force to identify best
practices, model programs, and successful strategies for school
districts to form partnerships with qualified health, mental health,
and social services agencies in the community to coordinate and improve
support for youth in need. The task force shall identify and develop
resource documents to be posted on the school safety center web site,
and submit a report with recommendations to the education committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2013. The task force shall also explore
the potential use of advance online youth emotional health and crisis
response systems that have been developed for use in other countries.
The task force must include the results of the review in its December
1st report. To the maximum extent possible, the office must convene
task force meetings using remote technologies and use other means of
electronic communication to accomplish the objectives of the task force
in a cost-effective manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Nothing in this act is intended to increase
liability for school districts related to suicide or attempted suicide.

--- END ---