BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.540 and 2005 c 437 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except to the extent provided in subsection (3) of this
section, the following minimum terms of total confinement are mandatory
and shall not be varied or modified under RCW 9.94A.535:
(a) An offender convicted of the crime of murder in the first
degree shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than
twenty years.
(b) An offender convicted of the crime of assault in the first
degree or assault of a child in the first degree where the offender
used force or means likely to result in death or intended to kill the
victim shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than
five years.
(c) An offender convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree
shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than five
years.
(d) An offender convicted of the crime of sexually violent predator
escape shall be sentenced to a minimum term of total confinement not
less than sixty months.
(e) An offender convicted of aggravated first degree murder for a
murder that was committed prior to the offender's eighteenth birthday
shall be sentenced as set forth in RCW 10.95.030(3).
(2) During such minimum terms of total confinement, no offender
subject to the provisions of this section is eligible for community
custody, earned release time, furlough, home detention, partial
confinement, work crew, work release, or any other form of early
release authorized under RCW 9.94A.728, or any other form of authorized
leave of absence from the correctional facility while not in the direct
custody of a corrections officer. The provisions of this subsection
shall not apply: (a) In the case of an offender in need of emergency
medical treatment; (b) for the purpose of commitment to an inpatient
treatment facility in the case of an offender convicted of the crime of
rape in the first degree; or (c) for an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(((4))) (3).
(3)(a) Subsection (1)(a) through (d) of this section shall not be
applied in sentencing of juveniles tried as adults pursuant to RCW
13.04.030(1)(e)(i).
(b) This subsection (3) applies only to crimes committed on or
after July 24, 2005.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.6332 and 2010 c 224 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The procedure for imposing sanctions for violations of sentence
conditions or requirements is as follows:
(1) If the offender was sentenced under the drug offender
sentencing alternative, any sanctions shall be imposed by the
department or the court pursuant to RCW 9.94A.660.
(2) If the offender was sentenced under the special sex offender
sentencing alternative, any sanctions shall be imposed by the
department or the court pursuant to RCW 9.94A.670.
(3) If the offender was sentenced under the parenting sentencing
alternative, any sanctions shall be imposed by the department or by the
court pursuant to RCW 9.94A.655.
(4) If a sex offender was sentenced pursuant to RCW 9.94A.507, any
sanctions shall be imposed by the board pursuant to RCW 9.95.435.
(5) If the offender was released pursuant to section 9 of this act,
any sanctions shall be imposed by the board pursuant to RCW 9.95.435.
(6) If the offender was sentenced pursuant to RCW 10.95.030(3), any
sanctions shall be imposed by the board pursuant to RCW 9.95.435.
(7) In any other case, if the offender is being supervised by the
department, any sanctions shall be imposed by the department pursuant
to RCW 9.94A.737. If a probationer is being supervised by the
department pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210, upon
receipt of a violation hearing report from the department, the court
retains any authority that those statutes provide to respond to a
probationer's violation of conditions.
(((6))) (8) If the offender is not being supervised by the
department, any sanctions shall be imposed by the court pursuant to RCW
9.94A.6333.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.729 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The term of the sentence of an offender committed to a
correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by
earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and adopted by the correctional agency having jurisdiction in
which the offender is confined. The earned release time shall be for
good behavior and good performance, as determined by the correctional
agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency shall not credit
the offender with earned release credits in advance of the offender
actually earning the credits.
(b) Any program established pursuant to this section shall allow an
offender to earn early release credits for presentence incarceration.
If an offender is transferred from a county jail to the department, the
administrator of a county jail facility shall certify to the department
the amount of time spent in custody at the facility and the amount of
earned release time. The department may approve a jail certification
from a correctional agency that calculates earned release time based on
the actual amount of confinement time served by the offender before
sentencing when an erroneous calculation of confinement time served by
the offender before sentencing appears on the judgment and sentence.
(2) An offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after
July 23, 1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements
under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good
time credits or earned release time for that portion of his or her
sentence that results from any deadly weapon enhancements.
(3) An offender may earn early release time as follows:
(a) In the case of an offender sentenced pursuant to RCW
10.95.030(3) or section 9 of this act, the aggregate earned release
time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence.
(b) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence.
(((b))) (c) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious
violent offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed
on or after July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned release time may not
exceed ten percent of the sentence.
(((c))) (d) An offender is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time if he or she:
(i) Is not classified as an offender who is at a high risk to
reoffend as provided in subsection (4) of this section;
(ii) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(iii) Has no prior conviction for the offenses listed in (((c)))
(d)(ii) of this subsection;
(iv) Participates in programming or activities as directed by the
offender's individual reentry plan as provided under RCW 72.09.270 to
the extent that such programming or activities are made available by
the department; and
(v) Has not committed a new felony after July 22, 2007, while under
community custody.
(((d))) (e) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release
time exceed one-third of the total sentence.
(4) The department shall perform a risk assessment of each offender
who may qualify for earned early release under subsection (3)(((c)))
(d) of this section utilizing the risk assessment tool recommended by
the Washington state institute for public policy. Subsection
(3)(((c))) (d) of this section does not apply to offenders convicted
after July 1, 2010.
(5)(a) A person who is eligible for earned early release as
provided in this section and who will be supervised by the department
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.501 or 9.94A.5011, shall be transferred to
community custody in lieu of earned release time;
(b) The department shall, as a part of its program for release to
the community in lieu of earned release, require the offender to
propose a release plan that includes an approved residence and living
arrangement. All offenders with community custody terms eligible for
release to community custody in lieu of earned release shall provide an
approved residence and living arrangement prior to release to the
community;
(c) The department may deny transfer to community custody in lieu
of earned release time if the department determines an offender's
release plan, including proposed residence location and living
arrangements, may violate the conditions of the sentence or conditions
of supervision, place the offender at risk to violate the conditions of
the sentence, place the offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk
to victim safety or community safety. The department's authority under
this section is independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence
or statutory provision regarding conditions for community custody;
(d) If the department is unable to approve the offender's release
plan, the department may do one or more of the following:
(i) Transfer an offender to partial confinement in lieu of earned
early release for a period not to exceed three months. The three
months in partial confinement is in addition to that portion of the
offender's term of confinement that may be served in partial
confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728(5);
(ii) Provide rental vouchers to the offender for a period not to
exceed three months if rental assistance will result in an approved
release plan. The voucher must be provided in conjunction with
additional transition support programming or services that enable an
offender to participate in services including, but not limited to,
substance abuse treatment, mental health treatment, sex offender
treatment, educational programming, or employment programming;
(e) For each offender who is the recipient of a rental voucher, the
department shall include, concurrent with the data that the department
otherwise obtains and records, the housing status of the offender for
the duration of the offender's supervision.
(6) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under RCW
9.94A.670(5)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits under this
section.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.95.425 and 2009 c 28 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the board or a community corrections officer of this
state has reason to believe an offender released under RCW 9.95.420,
10.95.030(3), or section 9 of this act has violated a condition of
community custody or the laws of this state, any community corrections
officer may arrest or cause the arrest and detention of the offender
pending a determination by the board whether sanctions should be
imposed or the offender's community custody should be revoked. The
community corrections officer shall report all facts and circumstances
surrounding the alleged violation to the board, with recommendations.
(2) If the board or the department causes the arrest or detention
of an offender for a violation that does not amount to a new crime and
the offender is arrested or detained by local law enforcement or in a
local jail, the board or department, whichever caused the arrest or
detention, shall be financially responsible for local costs. Jail bed
costs shall be allocated at the rate established under RCW 9.94A.740.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.95.430 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 308 are each
amended to read as follows:
Any offender released under RCW 9.95.420, 10.95.030(3), or section
9 of this act who is arrested and detained in physical custody by the
authority of a community corrections officer, or upon the written order
of the board, shall not be released from custody on bail or personal
recognizance, except upon approval of the board and the issuance by the
board of an order reinstating the offender's release on the same or
modified conditions. All chiefs of police, marshals of cities and
towns, sheriffs of counties, and all police, prison, and peace officers
and constables shall execute any such order in the same manner as any
ordinary criminal process.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.95.435 and 2007 c 363 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an offender released by the board or a court under RCW
9.95.420, 10.95.030(3), or section 9 of this act violates any condition
or requirement of community custody, the board may transfer the
offender to a more restrictive confinement status to serve up to the
remaining portion of the sentence, less credit for any period actually
spent in community custody or in detention awaiting disposition of an
alleged violation and subject to the limitations of subsection (2) of
this section.
(2) Following the hearing specified in subsection (3) of this
section, the board may impose sanctions such as work release, home
detention with electronic monitoring, work crew, community restitution,
inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling
sessions, supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any
other sanctions available in the community, or may suspend the release
and sanction up to sixty days' confinement in a local correctional
facility for each violation, or revoke the release to community custody
whenever an offender released by the board or a court under RCW
9.95.420, 10.95.030(3), or section 9 of this act violates any condition
or requirement of community custody.
(3) If an offender released by the board or a court under RCW
9.95.420, 10.95.030(3), or section 9 of this act is accused of
violating any condition or requirement of community custody, he or she
is entitled to a hearing before the board or a designee of the board
prior to the imposition of sanctions. The hearing shall be considered
as offender disciplinary proceedings and shall not be subject to
chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall develop hearing procedures and a
structure of graduated sanctions consistent with the hearing procedures
and graduated sanctions developed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.737. The board
may suspend the offender's release to community custody and confine the
offender in a correctional institution owned, operated by, or operated
under contract with the state prior to the hearing unless the offender
has been arrested and confined for a new criminal offense.
(4) The hearing procedures required under subsection (3) of this
section shall be developed by rule and include the following:
(a) Hearings shall be conducted by members or designees of the
board unless the board enters into an agreement with the department to
use the hearing officers established under RCW 9.94A.737;
(b) The board shall provide the offender with findings and
conclusions which include the evidence relied upon, and the reasons the
particular sanction was imposed. The board shall notify the offender
of the right to appeal the sanction and the right to file a personal
restraint petition under court rules after the final decision of the
board;
(c) The hearing shall be held unless waived by the offender, and
shall be electronically recorded. For offenders not in total
confinement, the hearing shall be held within thirty days of service of
notice of the violation, but not less than twenty-four hours after
notice of the violation. For offenders in total confinement, the
hearing shall be held within thirty days of service of notice of the
violation, but not less than twenty-four hours after notice of the
violation. The board or its designee shall make a determination
whether probable cause exists to believe the violation or violations
occurred. The determination shall be made within forty-eight hours of
receipt of the allegation;
(d) The offender shall have the right to: (i) Be present at the
hearing; (ii) have the assistance of a person qualified to assist the
offender in the hearing, appointed by the presiding hearing officer if
the offender has a language or communications barrier; (iii) testify or
remain silent; (iv) call witnesses and present documentary evidence;
(v) question witnesses who appear and testify; and (vi) be represented
by counsel if revocation of the release to community custody upon a
finding of violation is a probable sanction for the violation. The
board may not revoke the release to community custody of any offender
who was not represented by counsel at the hearing, unless the offender
has waived the right to counsel; and
(e) The sanction shall take effect if affirmed by the presiding
hearing officer.
(5) Within seven days after the presiding hearing officer's
decision, the offender may appeal the decision to the full board or to
a panel of three reviewing examiners designated by the chair of the
board or by the chair's designee. The sanction shall be reversed or
modified if a majority of the panel finds that the sanction was not
reasonably related to any of the following: (a) The crime of
conviction; (b) the violation committed; (c) the offender's risk of
reoffending; or (d) the safety of the community.
(6) For purposes of this section, no finding of a violation of
conditions may be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.95.440 and 2008 c 231 s 45 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the event the board suspends the release status of an offender
released under RCW 9.95.420, 10.95.030(3), or section 9 of this act by
reason of an alleged violation of a condition of release, or pending
disposition of a new criminal charge, the board may nullify the
suspension order and reinstate release under previous conditions or any
new conditions the board determines advisable under RCW 9.94A.704.
Before the board may nullify a suspension order and reinstate release,
it shall determine that the best interests of society and the offender
shall be served by such reinstatement rather than return to
confinement.

Sec. 8 RCW 10.95.030 and 2010 c 94 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
any person convicted of the crime of aggravated first degree murder
shall be sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility of release
or parole. A person sentenced to life imprisonment under this section
shall not have that sentence suspended, deferred, or commuted by any
judicial officer and the indeterminate sentence review board or its
successor may not parole such prisoner nor reduce the period of
confinement in any manner whatsoever including but not limited to any
sort of good-time calculation. The department of social and health
services or its successor or any executive official may not permit such
prisoner to participate in any sort of release or furlough program.
(2) If, pursuant to a special sentencing proceeding held under RCW
10.95.050, the trier of fact finds that there are not sufficient
mitigating circumstances to merit leniency, the sentence shall be
death. In no case, however, shall a person be sentenced to death if
the person had an intellectual disability at the time the crime was
committed, under the definition of intellectual disability set forth in
(a) of this subsection. A diagnosis of intellectual disability shall
be documented by a licensed psychiatrist or licensed psychologist
designated by the court, who is an expert in the diagnosis and
evaluation of intellectual disabilities. The defense must establish an
intellectual disability by a preponderance of the evidence and the
court must make a finding as to the existence of an intellectual
disability.
(a) "Intellectual disability" means the individual has: (i)
Significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning; (ii)
existing concurrently with deficits in adaptive behavior; and (iii)
both significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning and
deficits in adaptive behavior were manifested during the developmental
period.
(b) "General intellectual functioning" means the results obtained
by assessment with one or more of the individually administered general
intelligence tests developed for the purpose of assessing intellectual
functioning.
(c) "Significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning"
means intelligence quotient seventy or below.
(d) "Adaptive behavior" means the effectiveness or degree with
which individuals meet the standards of personal independence and
social responsibility expected for his or her age.
(e) "Developmental period" means the period of time between
conception and the eighteenth birthday.
(3) Any person convicted of the crime of aggravated first degree
murder for an offense committed prior to the person's eighteenth
birthday shall be sentenced to a minimum term of total confinement not
less than twenty years and not more than twenty-five years and a
maximum term of life.
(a) The person shall become eligible for early release upon
expiration of the minimum term. The court shall consider the following
factors in determining the minimum term:
(i) The offender's age at the time of the offense;
(ii) The offender's level of participation in the offense;
(iii) The offender's intellectual capacity;
(iv) The offender's ability to appreciate the risks and
consequences of his or her conduct;
(v) The degree of familial or peer pressure exerted upon the
offender in the commission of the offense;
(vi) The offender's familial and community environment;
(vii) The offender's educational history;
(viii) Any history of trauma in the offender's life;
(ix) The offender's faith and community involvement;
(x) The offender's involvement in the child welfare system;
(xi) The offender's potential for rehabilitation;
(xii) The outcomes of a comprehensive mental health evaluation
conducted by an adolescent mental health professional licensed in the
state of Washington;
(xiii) Any other mitigating factors or circumstances.
(b) A person sentenced under this subsection shall serve the
sentence in a facility or institution operated, or utilized under
contract, by the state. During the minimum term of total confinement,
the person shall not be eligible for community custody, earned release
time, furlough, home detention, partial confinement, work crew, work
release, or any other form of early release authorized under RCW
9.94A.728, or any other form of authorized leave or absence from the
correctional facility while not in the direct custody of a corrections
officer. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply: (i) In
the case of an offender in need of emergency medical treatment; or (ii)
for an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW
9.94A.728(3).
(c) No later than one hundred eighty days prior to the expiration
of the person's minimum term, the sentencing court or the sentencing
court's successor shall conduct, and the offender shall participate in,
a hearing to determine whether the person should be released before
expiration of the maximum term. The court shall consider the following
factors in determining whether release will be granted:
(i) The extent to which issues concerning juvenile brain
development contributed to the offense;
(ii) The offender's age at the time of the offense;
(iii) The offender's intellectual capacity;
(iv) The offender's level of participation in the offense;
(v) The offender's efforts towards rehabilitation, including
participation in and completion of rehabilitation programs while in
prison;
(vi) The offender's participation in and completion of educational
and employment programming while in prison;
(vii) Whether the offender's character deficiencies have been
reformed;
(viii) Any evidence submitted by the offender or the offender's
counsel; and
(ix) Any other mitigating factors or circumstances.
(d) The court shall order the person released, under such
affirmative and other conditions as the court determines appropriate,
unless the court determines by a preponderance of the evidence that,
despite such conditions, it is more likely than not that the person
will commit new violent criminal law violations if released. If the
court does not order the person released, the court shall set a new
minimum term of no more than five additional years.
(e) In a hearing conducted under (c) of this subsection, the court
shall provide opportunities for victims and survivors of victims of any
crimes for which the offender has been convicted to present statements
as set forth in RCW 7.69.032. To facilitate victim and survivor of
victim involvement, county prosecutor's offices shall ensure that any
victim impact statements and known contact information for victims of
record and survivors of victims are forwarded as part of the judgment
and sentence.
(f) In a hearing conducted under (c) of this subsection, the
offender shall be entitled to be represented by an attorney of his or
her choosing at his or her expense, except, upon the presentation of
satisfactory evidence of indigency and the request for the appointment
of an attorney by the offender, the court shall cause the appointment
of an attorney to represent the offender to be paid for at state
expense, and, in addition, the court shall assume all or such other
expenses in the presentation of evidence on behalf of the offender as
it may have authorized. Attorneys for the representation of offenders
at the review hearings shall be appointed by the superior courts for
the counties where the conviction occurred and the attorneys shall be
compensated in such manner and in such amount as shall be fixed in a
schedule of fees adopted by rule of the court.
(g) An offender released by the court pursuant to (d) of this
subsection is subject to the supervision of the department for a term
that shall be determined by the court. The department shall monitor
the offender's compliance with conditions imposed by the court and
promptly report any violations to the court. Any violation of
conditions established or modified by the court are subject to the
provisions of RCW 9.95.425 through 9.95.440.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any person
convicted of one or more crimes committed prior to the person's
eighteenth birthday who received an aggregate sentence of at least
twenty years may petition the sentencing court for early release after
serving no less than twenty years of total confinement, provided the
person has not been convicted for any felony in the five years
immediately prior to filing the petition, the person has not committed
a major violation in the twelve months prior to filing the petition for
early release, and the current sentence was not imposed under RCW
10.95.030 or 9.94A.507.
(2) No later than one hundred eighty days prior to serving at least
twenty years, the sentencing court or the sentencing court's successor
shall conduct, and the offender shall participate in, a hearing to
determine whether the person should be released before expiration of
the maximum term. The court shall consider the following factors in
determining whether release will be granted:
(a) The extent to which issues concerning juvenile brain
development contributed to the offense;
(b) The offender's age at the time of the offense;
(c) The offender's intellectual capacity;
(d) The offender's level of participation in the offense;
(e) The offender's efforts made toward rehabilitation, including
participation in and completion of rehabilitation programs while in
prison;
(f) The offender's participation in and completion of educational
and employment programming while in prison;
(g) Whether the offender's character deficiencies have been
reformed;
(h) Any evidence submitted by the offender or the offender's
counsel; and
(i) Any other mitigating factors or circumstances.
(3) The court shall order the person released, under such
affirmative and other conditions as the court determines appropriate,
unless the court determines by a preponderance of the evidence that,
despite such conditions, it is more likely than not that the person
will commit new violent criminal law violations if released. If the
court does not order the person released, the court shall set a new
minimum term of no more than five additional years.
(4) In a hearing conducted under subsection (2) of this section,
the court shall provide opportunities for victims and survivors of
victims of any crimes the offender has been convicted to present
statements as set forth in RCW 7.69.032. To facilitate victim and
survivor of victim involvement, county prosecutor's offices shall
ensure that any victim impact statements and known contact information
for victims of record and survivors of victims are forwarded as part of
the judgment and sentence.
(5) An offender released by the court is subject to the supervision
of the department for a term that shall be determined by the court.
The term shall not exceed the maximum term of the sentence. The
department shall monitor the offender's compliance with conditions
imposed by the court and promptly report any violations to the court.
Any violation of conditions established or modified by the court are
subject to the provisions of RCW 9.95.425 through 9.95.440.
(6) In a hearing conducted under subsection (2) of this section,
the offender shall be entitled to be represented by an attorney of his
or her choosing at his or her expense, except, upon the presentation of
satisfactory evidence of indigency and the request for the appointment
of an attorney by the offender, the court shall cause the appointment
of an attorney to represent the offender to be paid for at state
expense, and, in addition, the court shall assume all or such other
expenses in the presentation of evidence on behalf of the offender as
it may have authorized. Attorneys for the representation of offenders
at the review hearings shall be appointed by the superior courts for
the counties where the conviction occurred and the attorneys shall be
compensated in such manner and in such amount as shall be fixed in a
schedule of fees adopted by rule of the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 10.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person, who was sentenced prior to June 1, 2013, to a term of
life without the possibility of parole for an offense committed prior
to their eighteenth birthday, shall be returned to the sentencing court
or the sentencing court's successor for the setting of a minimum and
maximum term. In no case may the minimum term be fixed at less than
twenty years or more than twenty-five years. The maximum term is life.
To the extent relevant information is available, the court shall
consider the following factors in determining the minimum term:
(a) The offender's age at the time of the offense;
(b) The offender's level of participation in the offense;
(c) The offender's intellectual capacity;
(d) The offender's ability to appreciate the risks and consequences
of his or her conduct at the time of the offense;
(e) The degree of familial or peer pressure exerted upon the
offender in the commission of the offense;
(f) The offender's familial and community environment at the time
of the offense;
(g) The offender's educational history;
(h) The history of trauma in the offender's life;
(i) The offender's faith and community involvement;
(j) The offender's involvement in the child welfare system;
(k) The offender's potential for rehabilitation;
(l) Any other mitigating factors or circumstances.
Release and supervision of a person will be governed by RCW
10.95.030(3)(g).
(2) The court shall provide an opportunity for victims and
survivors of victims of any crimes for which the offender has been
convicted to present a statement personally or by representation.
(3) The term of confinement the person has served to date shall be
included in calculating the minimum term remaining to be served.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2013.

--- END ---