BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.06.010 and 2010 c 286 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following terms in this chapter shall have the meanings set
forth in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "East Asian medicine" means a health care service utilizing
East Asian medicine diagnosis and treatment to promote health and treat
organic or functional disorders and includes the following:
(a) Acupuncture, including the use of acupuncture needles or
lancets to directly and indirectly stimulate acupuncture points and
meridians;
(b) Use of electrical, mechanical, or magnetic devices to stimulate
acupuncture points and meridians;
(c) Moxibustion;
(d) Acupressure;
(e) Cupping;
(f) Dermal friction technique;
(g) Infra-red;
(h) Sonopuncture;
(i) Laserpuncture;
(j) Point injection therapy (aquapuncture);
(k) Dietary advice and health education based on East Asian medical
theory, including the recommendation and sale of herbs, vitamins,
minerals, and dietary and nutritional supplements;
(l) Breathing, relaxation, and East Asian exercise techniques;
(m) Qi gong;
(n) East Asian massage, reflexology, and Tui na, which is a method
of East Asian bodywork, characterized by the kneading, pressing,
rolling, shaking, and stretching of the body and does not include
spinal manipulation; and
(o) Superficial heat and cold therapies.
(2) "East Asian medicine practitioner" means a person licensed
under this chapter.
(3) "Department" means the department of health.
(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
Nothing in this chapter requires individuals to be licensed as an
East Asian medicine practitioner in order to provide the techniques and
services in subsection (1)(k) through (o) of this section or to sell
herbal products.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.06.140 and 2010 c 286 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Every person licensed under this chapter shall develop a
written plan for consultation, emergency transfer, and referral to
other health care practitioners operating within the scope of their
authorized practices. The written plan shall be submitted with the
initial application for licensure as well as annually thereafter with
the license renewal fee to the department. The department may withhold
licensure or renewal of licensure if the plan fails to meet the
standards contained in rules adopted by the secretary.
(2))) When a person licensed under this chapter sees patients with
potentially serious disorders such as cardiac conditions, acute
abdominal symptoms, and such other conditions, the practitioner shall
immediately request a consultation or recent written diagnosis from a
primary health care provider licensed under chapter 18.71, 18.57,
18.57A, 18.36A, or 18.71A RCW or RCW 18.79.050. In the event that the
patient with the disorder refuses to authorize such consultation or
provide a recent diagnosis from such primary health care provider, East
Asian medical treatments, including acupuncture, may only be continued
after the patient signs a written waiver acknowledging the risks
associated with the failure to pursue treatment from a primary health
care provider. The waiver must also include: (a) An explanation of an
East Asian medicine practitioner's scope of practice, including the
services and techniques East Asian medicine practitioners are
authorized to provide and (b) a statement that the services and
techniques that an East Asian medicine practitioner is authorized to
provide will not resolve the patient's underlying potentially serious
disorder. The requirements of the waiver shall be established by the
secretary in rule.
(((3))) (2) A person violating this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor.

--- END ---