BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter may be known and cited as the
uniform debt management services act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the director of the department of
financial institutions.
(2) "Affiliate":
(a) With respect to an individual, means:
(i) The spouse of the individual;
(ii) A sibling of the individual or the spouse of a sibling;
(iii) An individual or the spouse of an individual who is a lineal
ancestor or lineal descendant of the individual or the individual's
spouse;
(iv) An aunt, uncle, great aunt, great uncle, first cousin, niece,
nephew, grandniece, or grandnephew, whether related by the whole or the
half blood or adoption, or the spouse of any of them; or
(v) Any other individual occupying the residence of the individual;
and
(b) With respect to an entity, means:
(i) A person that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled
by, or is under common control with the entity;
(ii) An officer of, or an individual performing similar functions
with respect to, the entity;
(iii) A director of, or an individual performing similar functions
with respect to, the entity;
(iv) Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to section
32(6) of this act, a person that receives or received more than twenty-five thousand dollars from the entity in either the current year or the
preceding year or a person that owns more than ten percent of, or an
individual who is employed by or is a director of, a person that
receives or received more than twenty-five thousand dollars from the
entity in either the current year or the preceding year;
(v) An officer or director of, or an individual performing similar
functions with respect to, a person described in (b)(i) of this
subsection;
(vi) The spouse of, or an individual occupying the residence of, an
individual described in (b)(i) through (v) of this subsection; or
(vii) An individual who has the relationship specified in (a)(iv)
of this subsection to an individual or the spouse of an individual
described in (b)(i) through (v) of this subsection.
(3) "Agreement" means an agreement between a provider and an
individual for the performance of debt management services.
(4) "Bank" means a financial institution, including a commercial
bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, and
trust company, engaged in the business of banking, chartered under
federal or state law, and regulated by a federal or state banking
regulatory authority.
(5) "Business address" means the physical location of a business,
including the name and number of a street.
(6) "Certified counselor" means an individual certified by a
training program or certifying organization, approved by the
administrator, that authenticates the competence of individuals
providing education and assistance to other individuals in connection
with debt management services in which an agreement contemplates that
creditors will reduce finance charges or fees for late payment,
default, or delinquency.
(7) "Certified debt specialist" means an individual certified by a
training program or certifying organization, approved by the
administrator, that authenticates the competence of individuals
providing education and assistance to other individuals in connection
with debt management services in which an agreement contemplates that
creditors will settle debts for less than the full principal amount of
debt owed.
(8) "Concessions" means assent to repayment of a debt on terms more
favorable to an individual than the terms of the contract between the
individual and a creditor.
(9) "Day" means calendar day.
(10) "Debt management services" means services as an intermediary
between an individual and one or more creditors of the individual for
the purpose of obtaining concessions, but does not include:
(a) Legal services provided in an attorney-client relationship if:
(i) The services are provided by an attorney who:
(A) Is licensed or otherwise authorized to practice law in this
state; and
(B) Provides legal services in representing the individual in the
individual's relationship with a creditor; and
(ii) There is no intermediary between the individual and the
creditor other than the attorney or an individual under the direct
supervision of the attorney;
(b) Accounting services provided in an accountant-client
relationship if:
(i) The services are provided by a certified public accountant who:
(A) Is licensed to provide accounting services in this state; and
(B) Provides accounting services in representing the individual in
the individual's relationship with a creditor; and
(ii) There is no intermediary between the individual and the
creditor other than the accountant or an individual under the direct
supervision of the accountant;
(c) Financial planning services provided in a financial planner-client relationship by a member of a financial planning profession if:
(i) The administrator, by rule, determines that members are:
(A) Licensed by this state;
(B) Subject to a disciplinary mechanism;
(C) Subject to a code of professional responsibility; and
(D) Subject to a continuing education requirement; and
(ii) There is no intermediary between the individual and the
creditor other than the financial planner or an individual under the
direct supervision of the financial planner.
(11) "Entity" means a person other than an individual.
(12) "Good faith" means honesty in fact and the observance of
reasonable standards of fair dealing.
(13) "Lead generator" means a person that, in the regular course of
business, supplies a provider with the name of a potential customer,
directs a communication of an individual to a provider, or otherwise
refers a customer to a provider.
(14) "Person" means an individual, corporation, estate, trust,
statutory trust, business trust, partnership, limited liability
company, association, joint venture, or any other legal or commercial
entity. The term does not include a public corporation, government, or
governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.
(15) "Plan" means a program or strategy in which a provider
furnishes debt management services to an individual and which includes
a schedule of payments to be made by or on behalf of the individual and
used to pay debts owed by the individual.
(16) "Principal amount of the debt" means the amount of a debt at
the time of an agreement.
(17) "Provider" means a person that provides, offers to provide, or
agrees to provide debt management services directly or through others.
(18) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible
medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is
retrievable in perceivable form.
(19) "Settlement fee" means a charge imposed on or paid by an
individual in connection with a creditor's assent to accept in full
satisfaction of a debt an amount less than the principal amount of the
debt.
(20) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a
record:
(a) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
(b) To attach to or logically associate with the record an
electronic sound, symbol, or process.
(21) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any
territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States.
(22) "Third-party account administrator" means an independent
entity that holds or administers a dedicated bank account for fees and
payments to creditors, debt collectors, or providers in connection with
the renegotiation, settlement, reduction, or other alteration of the
terms of payment or other terms of a debt.
(23) "Trust account" means an account held by a provider that is:
(a) Established in an insured bank;
(b) Separate from other accounts of the provider or its designee;
(c) Designated as a trust account or other account designated to
indicate that the money in the account is not the money of the provider
or its designee; and
(d) Used to hold money of one or more individuals for disbursement
to creditors of the individuals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) This chapter does not apply to an
agreement with an individual who the provider has no reason to know
resides in this state at the time of the agreement.
(2) This chapter does not apply to a provider to the extent that
the provider:
(a) Provides or agrees to provide debt management, educational, or
counseling services to an individual who the provider has no reason to
know resides in this state at the time the provider agrees to provide
the services; or
(b) Receives no compensation for debt management services from or
on behalf of the individuals to whom it provides the services or from
their creditors.
(3) This chapter does not apply to the following persons or their
employees when the person or the employee is engaged in the regular
course of the person's business or profession:
(a) A judicial officer, a person acting under an order of a court
or an administrative agency, or an assignee for the benefit of
creditors;
(b) A bank;
(c) A third-party account administrator;
(d) An affiliate, as defined in section 2(2)(b)(i) of this act, of
a bank if the affiliate is regulated by a federal or state banking
regulatory authority; or
(e) A title insurer, escrow company, or other person that provides
bill paying services if the provision of debt management services is
incidental to the bill paying services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (2) of this section, a provider may not provide debt
management services to an individual who it reasonably should know
resides in this state at the time it agrees to provide the services,
unless the provider is registered under this chapter.
(2) If a provider is registered under this chapter, subsection (1)
of this section does not apply to an employee or agent of the provider.
(3) The administrator shall maintain and publicize a list of the
names of all registered providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) An application for registration as a
provider must be in a form prescribed by the administrator.
(2) Subject to adjustment of dollar amounts pursuant to section
32(6) of this act, an application for registration as a provider must
be accompanied by:
(a) The fee established by the administrator;
(b) The bond required by section 13 of this act;
(c) Identification of all trust accounts subject to section 22 of
this act and an irrevocable consent authorizing the administrator to
review and examine the trust accounts;
(d) Evidence of insurance in the amount of two hundred fifty
thousand dollars:
(i) Against the risks of dishonesty, fraud, theft, and other
misconduct on the part of the applicant or a director, employee, or
agent of the applicant;
(ii) Issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in
this state and rated at least an "A" or equivalent by a nationally
recognized rating organization approved by the administrator;
(iii) With a deductible, not exceeding five thousand dollars;
(iv) Payable to the applicant and Washington state for the benefit
of the residents of Washington state, as their interests may appear;
and
(v) Not subject to cancellation by the applicant or the insurer
until sixty days after written notice has been given to the
administrator;
(e) Proof of:
(i) Registration for a master business license with the department
of revenue; and
(ii) Filing with the secretary of state any documents to be filed
for that type of business entity; and
(f) If the applicant is organized as a not-for-profit entity or has
obtained tax-exempt status under the internal revenue code (26 U.S.C.
Sec. 501), evidence of not-for-profit status, or tax-exempt status, or
both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 An application for registration as a
provider must be signed under oath and include:
(1) The applicant's name, principal business address and telephone
number, and all other business addresses in this state, e-mail
addresses, and internet web site addresses;
(2) All names under which the applicant conducts business;
(3) The address of each location in this state at which the
applicant will provide debt management services or a statement that the
applicant will have no such location;
(4) The name and home address of each officer and director of the
applicant and each person that owns at least ten percent of the
applicant;
(5) Identification of every jurisdiction in which, during the five
years immediately preceding the application:
(a) The applicant or any of its officers or directors has been
licensed or registered to provide debt management services; or
(b) Individuals have resided when they received debt management
services from the applicant;
(6) A statement describing, to the extent it is known or should be
known by the applicant, any material civil or criminal judgment or
litigation and any material administrative or enforcement action by a
governmental agency in any jurisdiction against the applicant, any of
its officers, directors, owners, or agents, or any person that is
authorized to have access to the trust account required by section 22
of this act;
(7) The applicant's financial statements, audited by an accountant
licensed under chapter 18.04 RCW, for each of the two years immediately
preceding the application or, if it has not been in operation for the
two years preceding the application, for the period of its existence;
(8) Evidence of accreditation by an independent accrediting
organization approved by the administrator;
(9) Evidence that, no later than twelve months after initial
employment, each of the applicant's counselors becomes certified as a
certified counselor or certified debt specialist;
(10) A description of the three most commonly used educational
programs that the applicant provides or intends to provide to
individuals who reside in this state and a copy of any materials used
or to be used in those programs;
(11) A description of the applicant's financial analysis and
initial budget plan, including any form or electronic model, used to
evaluate the financial condition of individuals;
(12) A copy of each form of agreement that the applicant will use
with individuals who reside in this state;
(13) The schedule of fees and charges that the applicant will use
with individuals who reside in this state;
(14) At the applicant's expense, the results of a criminal records
check, including fingerprints, conducted within the immediately
preceding twelve months, covering every officer of the applicant and
every employee or agent of the applicant who is authorized to have
access to the trust account required by section 22 of this act;
(15) The names and addresses of all employers of each director
during the ten years immediately preceding the application;
(16) A description of any ownership interest of at least ten
percent by a director, owner, or employee of the applicant in:
(a) Any affiliate of the applicant; or
(b) Any entity that provides a product or service to the applicant
or any individual relating to the applicant's debt management services;
(17) A statement of the amount of compensation of the applicant's
five most highly compensated employees for each of the three years
immediately preceding the application or, if it has not been in
operation for the three years preceding the application, for the period
of its existence;
(18) The identity of each director who is an affiliate, as defined
in section 2(2) (a) or (b)(i), (ii), (iv), (v), (vi), or (vii) of this
act, of the applicant; and
(19) Any other information that the administrator reasonably
requires to perform the administrator's duties under section 9 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 An applicant or registered provider shall
notify the administrator no later than ten days after a change in the
information specified in section 5(2) (d) or (f) or 6 (1), (3), (6),
(12), or (13) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Except for the information required by
section 6 (7), (14), and (17) of this act and the addresses required by
section 6(4) of this act, the administrator shall make the information
in an application for registration as a provider available to the
public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Except as otherwise provided in
subsections (2) and (4) of this section, the administrator shall issue
a certificate of registration as a provider to a person that complies
with sections 5 and 6 of this act.
(2) If an applicant has otherwise complied with sections 5 and 6 of
this act, including a timely effort to obtain the information required
by section 6(14) of this act, but the information has not been
received, the administrator may issue a temporary certificate of
registration. The temporary certificate shall expire no later than one
hundred eighty days after issuance.
(3) The administrator may deny registration if:
(a) The application contains information that is materially
erroneous or incomplete;
(b) An officer, director, or owner of the applicant has been
convicted of a crime, or suffered a civil judgment, involving
dishonesty or the violation of state or federal securities laws;
(c) The applicant or any of its officers, directors, or owners has
defaulted in the payment of money collected for others; or
(d) The administrator finds that the financial responsibility,
experience, character, or general fitness of the applicant or its
owners, directors, employees, or agents does not warrant belief that
the business will be operated in compliance with this chapter.
(4) The administrator shall deny registration if with respect to an
applicant that is organized as a not-for-profit entity or has obtained
tax-exempt status under the internal revenue code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501),
the applicant's board of directors is not independent of the
applicant's employees and agents.
(5) Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to section
32(6) of this act, a board of directors is not independent for purposes
of subsection (4) of this section if more than one-fourth of its
members:
(a) Are affiliates of the applicant, as defined in section 2(2) (a)
or (b)(i), (ii), (iv), (v), (vi), or (vii); or
(b) After the date ten years before first becoming a director of
the applicant, were employed by or directors of a person that received
from the applicant more than twenty-five thousand dollars in either the
current year or the preceding year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The administrator shall approve or deny
an initial registration as a provider no later than one hundred twenty
days after an application is filed. In connection with a request
pursuant to section 6(19) of this act for additional information, the
administrator may extend the one hundred twenty-day period for not more
than sixty days. Within seven days after denying an application, the
administrator, in a record, shall inform the applicant of the reasons
for the denial.
(2) If the administrator denies an application for registration as
a provider or does not act on an application within the time prescribed
in subsection (1) of this section, the applicant may appeal and request
a hearing.
(3) Subject to sections 11(4) and 34 of this act, a registration as
a provider is valid for one year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) A provider must obtain a renewal of its
registration annually.
(2) An application for renewal of registration as a provider must
be in a form prescribed by the administrator, signed under oath, and:
(a) Be filed no fewer than thirty and no more than sixty days
before the registration expires;
(b) Be accompanied by the fee established by the administrator and
the bond required by section 13 of this act;
(c) Contain the matter required for initial registration as a
provider by section 6 (8) and (9) of this act, and a financial
statement, audited by an accountant licensed to conduct audits, for the
applicant's fiscal year immediately preceding the application;
(d) Disclose any changes in the information contained in the
applicant's application for registration or its immediately previous
application for renewal, as applicable. If an application is otherwise
complete and the applicant has made a timely effort to obtain the
information required by section 6(14) of this act, but the information
has not been received, the administrator may issue a temporary renewal
of registration. The temporary renewal shall expire no later than one
hundred eighty days after issuance;
(e) Supply evidence of insurance in an amount equal to the larger
of two hundred fifty thousand dollars or the highest daily balance in
the trust account required by section 22 of this act during the six-month period immediately preceding the application:
(i) Against risks of dishonesty, fraud, theft, and other misconduct
on the part of the applicant or a director, employee, or agent of the
applicant;
(ii) Issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in
this state and rated not less than "A" or equivalent by a nationally
recognized rating organization approved by the administrator;
(iii) With a deductible, not exceeding five thousand dollars;
(iv) Payable to the applicant and Washington state for the benefit
of residents of Washington state, as their interests may appear; and
(v) Not subject to cancellation by the applicant or the insurer
until sixty days after written notice has been given to the
administrator;
(f) Disclose the total amount of money received by the applicant
pursuant to plans during the preceding twelve months from or on behalf
of individuals who reside in this state and the total amount of money
distributed to creditors of those individuals during that period;
(g) Disclose, to the best of the applicant's knowledge, the gross
amount of money accumulated during the preceding twelve months pursuant
to plans by or on behalf of individuals who reside in this state and
with whom the applicant has agreements; and
(h) Provide any other information that the administrator reasonably
requires to perform the administrator's duties under this section.
(3) Except for the information required by section 6 (7), (14), and
(17) of this act and the addresses required by section 6(4) of this
act, which are exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW, the
administrator shall make the information in an application for renewal
of registration as a provider available to the public.
(4) If a registered provider files a timely and complete
application for renewal of registration, the registration remains
effective until the administrator, in a record, notifies the applicant
of a denial and states the reasons for the denial.
(5) If the administrator denies an application for renewal of
registration as a provider, the applicant, no later than thirty days
after receiving notice of the denial, may appeal and request a hearing
under chapter 34.05 RCW. Subject to section 34 of this act, while the
appeal is pending the applicant shall continue to provide debt
management services to individuals with whom it has agreements. If the
denial is affirmed, subject to the administrator's order and section 34
of this act, the applicant shall continue to provide debt management
services to individuals with whom it has agreements until, with the
approval of the administrator, it transfers the agreements to another
registered provider or returns to the individuals all unexpended money
that is under the applicant's control.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If a provider holds a license or
certificate of registration in another state authorizing it to provide
debt management services, the provider may submit a copy of that
license or certificate and the application for it instead of an
application in the form prescribed by section 5(1), 6, or 11(2) of this
act. The administrator shall accept the application and the license or
certificate from the other state as an application for registration as
a provider or for renewal of registration as a provider, as
appropriate, in this state if:
(1) The application in the other state contains information
substantially similar to or more comprehensive than that required in an
application submitted in this state;
(2) The applicant provides the information required by section 6
(1), (3), (10), (12), and (13) of this act; and
(3) The applicant, under oath, certifies that the information
contained in the application is current or, to the extent it is not
current, supplements the application to make the information current.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) Except as otherwise provided in section
14 of this act, a provider that is required to be registered under this
chapter shall file a surety bond with the administrator, which must:
(a) Be in effect during the period of registration and for two
years after the provider ceases providing debt management services to
individuals in this state; and
(b) Run to this state for the benefit of this state and of
individuals who reside in this state when they agree to receive debt
management services from the provider, as their interests may appear.
(2) Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to section
32(6) of this act, a surety bond filed under subsection (1) of this
section must:
(a) Be in the amount of fifty thousand dollars or other larger or
smaller amount that the administrator determines is warranted by the
financial condition and business experience of the provider, the
history of the provider in performing debt management services, the
risk to individuals, and any other factor the administrator considers
appropriate;
(b) Be issued by a bonding, surety, or insurance company authorized
to do business in this state and rated not less than "A" by a
nationally recognized rating organization; and
(c) Have payment conditioned on noncompliance of the provider or
its agent with this chapter.
(3) If the principal amount of a surety bond is reduced by payment
of a claim or a judgment, the provider shall immediately notify the
administrator and, no later than thirty days after notice by the
administrator, file a new or additional surety bond in an amount set by
the administrator. The amount of the new or additional bond must be at
least the amount of the bond immediately before payment of the claim or
judgment. If for any reason a surety terminates a bond, the provider
shall immediately file a new surety bond in the amount of fifty
thousand dollars or other amount determined pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section.
(4) The administrator or an individual may obtain satisfaction out
of the surety bond procured pursuant to this section if:
(a) The administrator assesses expenses under section 33(1)(b) of
this act, issues a final order under section 33(1)(b) of this act, or
recovers a final judgment under section 33 (1)(d) or (e) or (4) of this
act; or
(b) An individual recovers a final judgment pursuant to section 35
(1), (2) or (3)(a), (b), or (d) of this act.
(5) If claims against a surety bond exceed or are reasonably
expected to exceed the amount of the bond, the administrator, on the
initiative of the administrator or on petition of the surety, shall,
unless the proceeds are adequate to pay all costs, judgments, and
claims, distribute the proceeds in the following order:
(a) To satisfaction of a final order or judgment under section 33
(1)(b), (d), (e), or (4) of this act;
(b) To final judgments recovered by individuals pursuant to section
35 (1), (2), or (3)(a), (b), or (d) of this act, pro rata;
(c) To claims of individuals established to the satisfaction of the
administrator, pro rata; and
(d) If a final order or judgment is issued under section 33(1) of
this act, to the expenses charged pursuant to section 32(2)(a) of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) Instead of the surety bond required by
section 13 of this act, a provider, with the approval of the
administrator, and in the amount required by section 13(2) of this act,
may deliver to the administrator:
(a) An irrevocable letter of credit, issued or confirmed by a bank
approved by the administrator, payable upon presentation of a
certificate by the administrator stating that the provider or its agent
has not complied with this chapter; or
(b) Bonds or other obligations of the United States or guaranteed
by the United States or bonds or other obligations of this state or a
political subdivision of this state, to be:
(i) Deposited and maintained with a bank approved by the
administrator for this purpose; and
(ii) Delivered by the bank to the administrator on presentation of
a certificate by the administrator stating that the provider or its
agent has not complied with this chapter.
(2) If a provider furnishes a substitute pursuant to subsection (1)
of this section, section 13 (1), (3), (4), and (5) of this act applies
to the substitute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A provider shall act in good faith in all
matters under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A provider that is required to be
registered under this chapter shall maintain a toll-free communication
system, staffed at a level that reasonably permits an individual to
speak to a certified counselor, certified debt specialist, or customer
service representative, as appropriate, during ordinary business hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) Before providing debt management
services, a provider shall give the individual an itemized list of
goods and services and the charges for each. The list must be clear
and conspicuous, be in a record the individual may keep whether or not
the individual assents to an agreement, and describe the goods and
services the provider offers:
(a) Free of additional charge if the individual enters into an
agreement;
(b) For a charge if the individual does not enter into an
agreement; and
(c) For a charge if the individual enters into an agreement, using
the following terminology, as applicable, and format:
Set up fee. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Dollar amount of fee
Monthly service fee. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Dollar amount of fee or method of determining amount
Settlement fee. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Dollar amount of fee or method of determining amount
Goods and services in addition to those provided in connection with
a plan. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Item) Dollar amount or method of determining amount
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Item) Dollar amount or method of determining amount.
(2) A provider may not furnish debt management services unless the
provider, through the services of a certified counselor or certified
debt specialist:
(a) Provides the individual with reasonable education about the
management of personal finance;
(b) Has prepared a financial analysis, including at least the
following matters affecting the individual's financial condition:
(i) Assets;
(ii) Income;
(iii) Debt, including secured debt; and
(iv) Other liabilities; and
(c) If the individual is to make regular, periodic payments:
(i) Has prepared a plan for the individual;
(ii) Has made a determination, based on the provider's analysis of
the information provided by the individual and otherwise available to
it, that the plan is suitable for the individual and the individual
will be able to meet the payment obligations under the plan; and
(iii) Believes that each creditor of the individual listed as a
participating creditor in the plan will accept payment of the
individual's debts as provided in the plan.
(3) Before an individual assents to an agreement to engage in a
plan, a provider shall:
(a) Provide the individual with a copy of the analysis and plan
required by subsection (2) of this section in a record that identifies
the provider and that the individual may keep whether or not the
individual assents to the agreement;
(b) Inform the individual of the availability, at the individual's
option, of assistance by a toll-free communication system or in person
to discuss the financial analysis and plan required by subsection (2)
of this section; and
(c) With respect to all creditors identified by the individual or
otherwise known by the provider to be creditors of the individual,
provide the individual with a list of:
(i) Creditors that the provider expects to participate in the plan
and grant concessions;
(ii) Creditors that the provider expects to participate in the plan
but not grant concessions;
(iii) Creditors that the provider expects not to participate in the
plan; and
(iv) All other creditors.
(4) Before an individual assents to an agreement, the provider
shall inform the individual, in a separate record that the individual
may keep whether or not the individual assents to the agreement:
(a) Of the name and business address of the provider;
(b) That plans are not suitable for all individuals and the
individual may ask the provider about other ways, including bankruptcy,
to deal with indebtedness;
(c) That establishment of a plan may adversely affect the
individual's credit rating or credit scores;
(d) That nonpayment of debt may lead creditors to increase finance
and other charges or undertake collection activity, including
litigation;
(e) Unless it is not true, that the provider may receive
compensation from the creditors of the individual; and
(f) That, unless the individual is insolvent, if a creditor settles
for less than the full amount of the debt, the plan may result in the
creation of taxable income to the individual, even though the
individual does not receive any money.
(5) If a provider may receive payments from an individual's
creditors and the plan contemplates that the individual's creditors
will reduce finance charges or fees for late payment, default, or
delinquency, the provider may comply with subsection (4) of this
section by providing the following disclosure, surrounded by black
lines:

IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR YOU TO CONSIDER

(1) Debt management plans are not right for all individuals, and
you may ask us to provide information about other ways, including
bankruptcy, to deal with your debts.
(2) Using a debt management plan may make it harder for you to
obtain credit.
(3) We may receive compensation for our services from your
creditors.

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Name and business address of provider

(6) If a provider will not receive payments from an individual's
creditors and the plan contemplates that the individual's creditors
will reduce finance charges or fees for late payment, default, or
delinquency, a provider may comply with subsection (4) of this section
by providing the following disclosure, surrounded by black lines:

IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR YOU TO CONSIDER

(1) Debt management plans are not right for all individuals, and
you may ask us to provide information about other ways, including
bankruptcy, to deal with your debts.
(2) Using a debt management plan may make it harder for you to
obtain credit.

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Name and business address of provider

(7) If an agreement contemplates that creditors will settle debts
for less than the full principal amount of debt owed, a provider may
comply with subsection (4) of this section by providing the following
disclosure, surrounded by black lines:

IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR YOU TO CONSIDER

(1) Our program is not right for all individuals, and you may ask
us to provide information about bankruptcy and other ways to deal with
your debts.
(2) Nonpayment of your debts under our program may:
(a) Hurt your credit rating or credit scores;
(b) Lead your creditors to increase finance and other charges; and
(c) Lead your creditors to undertake activity, including lawsuits,
to collect the debts.
(3) Reduction of debt under our program may result in taxable
income to you, even though you will not actually receive any money.

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Name and business address of provider

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) A provider may satisfy the requirements
of sections 17, 19, and 27 of this act by means of the internet or
other electronic means if the provider obtains a consumer's consent in
the manner provided by section 101(c)(1) of the federal act.
(2) The disclosures and materials required by sections 17, 19, and
27 of this act shall be presented in a form that is capable of being
accurately reproduced for later reference.
(3) With respect to disclosure by means of an internet web site,
the disclosure of the information required by section 17(4) of this act
must appear on one or more screens that:
(a) Contain no other information; and
(b) The individual must see before proceeding to assent to
formation of an agreement.
(4) At the time of providing the materials and agreement required
by sections 17 (3) and (4), 19, and 27 of this act, a provider shall
inform the individual that on electronic, telephonic, or written
request, it will send the individual a written copy of the materials,
and shall comply with a request as provided in subsection (5) of this
section.
(5) If a provider is requested, before the expiration of ninety
days after an agreement is completed or terminated, to send a written
copy of the materials required by section 17 (3) and (4), 19, or 27 of
this act, the provider shall send them at no charge no later than three
business days after the request. The provider need not comply with a
request more than once per calendar month or if it reasonably believes
the request is made for purposes of harassment. If a request is made
more than ninety days after an agreement is completed or terminated,
the provider shall send within a reasonable time a written copy of the
materials requested.
(6) A provider that maintains an internet web site shall disclose
on the home page of its web site or on a page that is clearly and
conspicuously connected to the home page by a link that clearly reveals
its contents:
(a) Its name and all names under which it does business;
(b) Its principal business address, telephone number, and e-mail
address, if any; and
(c) The names of its principal officers.
(7) Subject to subsection (8) of this section, if a consumer who
has consented to electronic communication in the manner provided by
section 101 of the federal act withdraws consent as provided in the
federal act, a provider may terminate its agreement with the consumer.
(8) If a provider wishes to terminate an agreement with a consumer
pursuant to subsection (7) of this section, it shall notify the
consumer that it will terminate the agreement unless the consumer, no
later than thirty days after receiving the notification, consents to
electronic communication in the manner provided in section 101(c) of
the federal act. If the consumer consents, the provider may terminate
the agreement only as permitted by section 19(1)(g)(vii) of this act.
(9) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Consumer" means an individual who seeks or obtains goods or
services that are used primarily for personal, family, or household
purposes.
(b) "Federal act" means the electronic signatures in global and
national commerce act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq.).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) An agreement must:
(a) Be in a record;
(b) Be dated and signed by the provider and the individual;
(c) Include the name of the individual and the address where the
individual resides;
(d) Include the name, business address, and telephone number of the
provider;
(e) Disclose the total amount of all known debts;
(f) Be delivered to the individual immediately on formation of the
agreement; and
(g) Disclose:
(i) The services to be provided;
(ii) The amount, or method of determining the amount, of all fees,
individually itemized, to be paid by the individual;
(iii) The schedule of payments to be made by or on behalf of the
individual, including the amount of each payment, the date on which
each payment is due, and an estimate of the date of the final payment;
(iv) If a plan provides for regular periodic payments to creditors:
(A) Each creditor of the individual to which payment will be made,
the amount owed to each creditor, and any concessions the provider
reasonably believes each creditor will offer;
(B) The schedule of expected payments to each creditor, including
the amount of each payment and the date on which it will be made; and
(C) Each creditor that the provider believes will not participate
in the plan and to which the provider will not direct payment;
(v) If a plan contemplates the settlement of the individual's debt
for less than the principal amount of the debt, an estimate of:
(A) The duration of the plan based on all enrolled debts;
(B) The length of time before the individual may reasonably expect
a settlement offer; and
(C) The amount of savings needed to accrue before the individual
may reasonably expect a settlement offer, expressed as both a dollar
amount and percentage, for each enrolled debt;
(vi) How the provider will comply with its obligations under
section 27(1) of this act;
(vii) That the provider may terminate the agreement for good cause,
upon return of unexpended money of the individual;
(viii) That the individual may terminate the agreement at any time
by giving written or electronic notice, and that, if notice of
termination is given, the individual will receive all unexpended money
that the provider or its designee has received from or on behalf of the
individual for payment of a creditor and, except to the extent they
have been earned, the provider's fees;
(ix) That the individual may contact the administrator with any
questions or complaints regarding the provider; and
(x) The address, telephone number, and internet address or web site
of the administrator.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1)(e) of this section, delivery of
an electronic record occurs when it is made available in a format in
which the individual may retrieve, save, and print it and the
individual is notified that it is available.
(3) If the administrator supplies the provider with any information
required under subsection (1)(f)(x) of this section, the provider may
comply with that requirement only by disclosing the information
supplied by the administrator.
(4) An agreement must provide that:
(a) The individual authorizes any bank in which the provider or its
agent has established a trust account to disclose to the administrator
any financial records relating to the trust account; and
(b) The provider will notify the individual no later than five days
after learning of a creditor's final decision to reject or withdraw
from a plan and that this notice will include:
(i) The identity of the creditor; and
(ii) The right of the individual to modify or terminate the
agreement.
(5) An agreement may confer on a provider a power of attorney to
settle the individual's debt for no more than fifty percent of the
principal amount of the debt. An agreement may not confer a power of
attorney to settle a debt for more than fifty percent of that amount,
but may confer a power of attorney to negotiate with creditors of the
individual on behalf of the individual. An agreement must provide that
the provider will obtain the assent of the individual after a creditor
has assented to a settlement for more than fifty percent of the
principal amount of the debt.
(6) An agreement may not:
(a) Provide for application of the law of any jurisdiction other
than the United States and this state;
(b) Except as permitted by section 2 of the federal arbitration act
(9 U.S.C. Sec. 2) or chapter 7.04A RCW, contain a provision that
modifies or limits otherwise available forums or procedural rights,
including the right to trial by jury, that are generally available to
the individual under law other than this chapter;
(c) Contain a provision that restricts the individual's remedies
under this chapter or law other than this chapter; or
(d) Contain a provision that:
(i) Limits or releases the liability of any person for not
performing the agreement or for violating this chapter; or
(ii) Indemnifies any person for liability arising under the
agreement or this chapter.
(7) A provision in an agreement which violates subsection (4), (5),
or (6) of this section is void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1) An individual who is a party to an
agreement may terminate the agreement at any time, without penalty or
obligation, by giving the provider notice in a record.
(2) A provider may terminate an agreement if an individual who is
a party to the agreement fails for sixty days to make a payment or
deposit required by the agreement or if other good cause exists.
(3) If an agreement is terminated:
(a) The provider, no later than seven business days after the
termination, shall pay the individual who is a party to the agreement
all money the provider or its designee received from or on behalf of
the individual, other than:
(i) An amount properly disbursed to a creditor; and
(ii) Fees earned pursuant to section 23 of this act; and
(b) Any power of attorney granted by the individual to the provider
is revoked.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Unless the administrator, by rule, provides
otherwise, the disclosures and documents required by this chapter must
be in English. If a provider communicates with an individual primarily
in a language other than English, the provider shall furnish a
translation in the other language of the disclosures and documents
required by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 (1) All money paid to a provider by or on
behalf of an individual for distribution to creditors pursuant to an
agreement is held in trust. No later than two business days after
receipt, the provider shall deposit the money in a trust account
established for the benefit of individuals to whom the provider is
furnishing debt management services.
(2) A provider whose agreement contemplates the settlement of an
individual's debt for less than the principal amount of the debt may
request or require the individual to place money in an account to be
used to pay a creditor or the provider's fees, or both, if:
(a) The money is held in an insured account at a bank;
(b) The individual owns the money held in the account and is paid
any interest accrued on the account;
(c) The entity administering the account is not the provider or an
affiliate of the provider, unless the affiliate is described in section
2(2)(b)(iv) of this act;
(d) The entity administering the account does not give or accept
any money or other compensation in exchange for a referral of business
involving debt management services; and
(e) The individual may terminate the agreement at any time without
penalty and on termination must receive all money in the account, other
than money earned by the provider in compliance with this section.
(3) If an agreement contemplates the reduction of finance charges
or fees for late payment, default, or delinquency and the provider
complies with subsection (1) of this section, the provider may request
or require the individual to make payment to be used for both
distribution to creditors and payment of the provider's fees.
(4) Money held in trust by a provider is not property of the
provider or its designee. The money is not available to creditors of
the provider or designee, except an individual from whom or on whose
behalf the provider received money, to the extent that the money has
not been disbursed to creditors of the individual.
(5) A provider shall:
(a) Maintain separate records of account for each individual to
whom the provider is furnishing debt management services;
(b) Disburse money paid by or on behalf of the individual to
creditors of the individual as disclosed in the agreement, except that:
(i) The provider may delay payment to the extent that a payment by
the individual is not final; and
(ii) If a plan provides for regular periodic payments to creditors,
the disbursement must comply with the due dates established by each
creditor; and
(c) Promptly correct any payments that are not made or that are
misdirected as a result of an error by the provider or other person in
control of the trust account and reimburse the individual for any costs
or fees imposed by a creditor as a result of the failure to pay or
misdirection.
(6) A provider may not commingle money in a trust account
established for the benefit of individuals to whom the provider is
furnishing debt management services with money of other persons.
(7) A trust account must at all times have a cash balance equal to
the sum of the balances of each individual's account.
(8) If a provider has established a trust account pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section, the provider shall reconcile the trust
account at least once a month. The reconciliation must compare the
cash balance in the trust account with the sum of the balances in each
individual's account. If the provider or its designee has more than
one trust account, each trust account must be individually reconciled.
(9) If a provider discovers, or has a reasonable suspicion of,
embezzlement or other unlawful appropriation of money held in trust,
the provider shall immediately notify the administrator by a method
approved by the administrator. Unless the administrator by rule
provides otherwise, no later than five days thereafter, the provider
shall give notice to the administrator describing the remedial action
taken or to be taken.
(10) If an individual terminates an agreement or it becomes
reasonably apparent to a provider that a plan has failed, the provider
shall refund promptly to the individual all money paid by or on behalf
of the individual which has not been paid to creditors, less fees that
are payable to the provider under section 23 of this act.
(11) Before relocating a trust account from one bank to another, a
provider shall inform the administrator of the name, business address,
and telephone number of the new bank. As soon as practicable, the
provider shall inform the administrator of the account number of the
trust account at the new bank.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 (1) A provider may not impose directly or
indirectly a fee or other charge on an individual or receive money from
or on behalf of an individual for debt management services except as
permitted by this section.
(2) A provider may not impose charges or receive payment for debt
management services until the provider and the individual have signed
an agreement that complies with sections 19 and 28 of this act.
(3) If an individual assents to an agreement, a provider may not
impose a fee or other charge for educational, counseling, or similar
services, except as otherwise provided in this section and section
28(4) of this act. The administrator may authorize a provider to
charge a fee based on the nature and extent of the services furnished
by the provider.
(4) Subject to adjustment of dollar amounts pursuant to section
32(6) of this act, the following rules apply:
(a) Except to the extent permitted by section 22 of this act, a
provider may not request or receive any compensation from or on behalf
of an individual unless:
(i) The provider has secured the assent of the individual and at
least one creditor of the individual to a concession; and
(ii) The individual has made a payment toward satisfying the debt
as part of a plan.
(b) The provider's fee for debt management services must be
reasonable. The total fee for debt management services, including, but
not limited to, any fee charged by a bank or a third-party account
administrator, may not exceed fifteen percent of the total debt
disclosed in the agreement.
(c) If the provider's compensation is received in installments:
(i) Each installment must be made simultaneously with the
individual's installment payments to the creditor; and
(ii) An installment of the compensation may not be a greater
percentage of the provider's total compensation for settlement of the
debt than the simultaneous payment to the creditor is of the entire
settlement amount for the debt.
(d) The provider may make an initial charge of up to twenty-five
dollars which shall be considered part of the total fee. If an initial
charge is made, no additional fee may be retained which will bring the
total fee retained to date to more than fifteen percent of the total
payments made to date.
(e) If an individual does not assent to an agreement, a provider
may receive for educational and counseling services it provides to the
individual a fee not exceeding one hundred dollars or, with the
approval of the administrator, a larger fee. The administrator may
approve a fee larger than one hundred dollars if the nature and extent
of the educational and counseling services warrant the larger fee.
(f) No fee whatsoever shall be applied against rent and utility
payments for housing.
(5) If, before the expiration of ninety days after the completion
or termination of educational or counseling services, an individual
assents to an agreement, the provider shall refund to the individual
any fee paid pursuant to subsection (4)(f) of this section.
(6) Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to section
32(6) of this section, if a payment to a provider by an individual
under this chapter is dishonored, a provider may impose a reasonable
charge on the individual, not to exceed the lesser of twenty-five
dollars and the amount permitted by law other than this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A provider may not solicit a voluntary
contribution from an individual or an affiliate of the individual for
any service provided to the individual. A provider may accept
voluntary contributions from an individual but, until thirty days after
completion or termination of a plan, the aggregate amount of money
received from or on behalf of the individual may not exceed the total
amount the provider may charge the individual under section 23 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 (1) If a provider imposes a fee or other
charge or receives money or other payments not authorized by section 23
or 24 of this act, the individual may void the agreement and recover as
provided in section 35 of this act.
(2) If a provider is not registered as required by this chapter
when an individual assents to an agreement, the agreement is voidable
by the individual.
(3) If an individual voids an agreement under subsection (2) of
this section, the provider does not have a claim against the individual
for breach of contract or for restitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 For each individual for whom a provider
provides debt management services, the provider shall maintain records
for five years after the final payment made by the individual. The
provider shall produce a copy of the records to the individual within
a reasonable time after a request for the records. The provider may
use electronic or other means of storage of the records.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 (1) A provider shall provide the accounting
required by subsection (2) of this section:
(a) On cancellation or termination of an agreement; and
(b) Before cancellation or termination of any agreement:
(i) At least once each month; and
(ii) No later than five business days after a request by an
individual, but the provider need not comply with more than one request
in any calendar month.
(2) A provider, in a record, shall provide each individual for whom
it has established a plan an accounting of the following information:
(a) The amount in an account containing money paid by or on behalf
of the individual for fees or distribution to a creditor, or both, as
of the date one month before the date of the accounting;
(b) The amount paid into the account since the last report;
(c) The amounts and dates of disbursement made on the individual's
behalf, or by the individual on the direction of the provider, since
the last report, to each creditor listed in the plan;
(d) The amounts deducted, as fees or otherwise, from the amount
paid into the account since the last report;
(e) If, since the last report, a creditor has agreed to accept as
payment in full an amount less than the principal amount of the debt
owed by the individual:
(i) The total amount and terms of the settlement;
(ii) The amount of the debt when the individual assented to the
plan;
(iii) The amount of the debt when the creditor agreed to the
settlement; and
(iv) The calculation of a settlement fee; and
(f) The amount in the account as of the date of the accounting.
(3) If an agreement contemplates that a creditor will settle a debt
for less than the principal amount of the debt and the provider
delegates performance of its duties under this section to another
person, the provider may provide the information required by subsection
(2)(e) of this section in a record separate from the record containing
the other information required by subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 (1) A provider may not, directly or
indirectly:
(a) Include a secured debt in a plan, except as authorized by law
other than this chapter;
(b) Misappropriate or misapply money held in trust;
(c) Settle a debt on behalf of an individual for more than fifty
percent of the principal amount of the debt owed a creditor, unless the
individual assents to the settlement after the creditor has assented;
(d) Take a power of attorney that authorizes it to settle a debt,
unless the power of attorney expressly limits the provider's authority
to settle debts for not more than fifty percent of the principal amount
of the debt owed a creditor;
(e) Exercise or attempt to exercise a power of attorney after an
individual has terminated an agreement;
(f) Initiate a transfer from an individual's account at a bank or
with another person unless the transfer is:
(i) A return of money to the individual; or
(ii) Before termination of an agreement, properly authorized by the
agreement and this chapter, and for:
(A) Payment to one or more creditors pursuant to an agreement; or
(B) Payment of a fee;
(g) Offer a gift or bonus, premium, reward, or other compensation
to an individual for executing an agreement;
(h) Offer, pay, or give a gift or bonus, premium, reward, or other
compensation to a lead generator or other person for referring a
prospective customer, if the person making the referral:
(i) Has a financial interest in the outcome of debt management
services provided to the customer, unless neither the provider nor the
person making the referral communicates to the prospective customer the
identity of the source of the referral; or
(ii) Compensates its employees on the basis of a formula that
incorporates the number of individuals the employee refers to the
provider;
(i) Receive a bonus, commission, or other benefit for referring an
individual to a person;
(j) Structure a plan in a manner that would result in a negative
amortization of any of an individual's debts, unless a creditor that is
owed a negatively amortizing debt agrees to refund or waive the finance
charge upon payment of the principal amount of the debt;
(k) Compensate its employees on the basis of a formula that
incorporates the number of individuals the employee induces to enter
into agreements;
(l) Settle a debt or lead an individual to believe that a payment
to a creditor is in settlement of a debt to the creditor unless, at the
time of settlement, the individual receives a certification by the
creditor that the payment is in full settlement of the debt or is part
of a settlement plan, the terms of which are included in the
certification, that, if completed according to its terms, will satisfy
the debt;
(m) Make a representation that:
(i) The provider will furnish money to pay bills or prevent
attachments;
(ii) Payment of a certain amount will permit satisfaction of a
certain amount or range of indebtedness; or
(iii) Participation in a plan will or may prevent litigation,
garnishment, attachment, repossession, foreclosure, eviction, or loss
of employment;
(n) Misrepresent that it is authorized or competent to furnish
legal advice or perform legal services;
(o) Represent in its agreements, disclosures required by this
chapter, advertisements, or internet web site that it is a:
(i) Not-for-profit entity unless it is organized and properly
operating as a not-for-profit entity under the law of the state in
which it was formed; or
(ii) Tax-exempt entity unless it has received certification of tax-exempt status from the internal revenue service and is properly
operating as a not-for-profit entity under the law of the state in
which it was formed;
(p) Take a confession of judgment or power of attorney to confess
judgment against an individual; or
(q) Employ an unfair, unconscionable, or deceptive act or practice,
including the knowing omission of any material information.
(2) If a provider furnishes debt management services to an
individual, the provider may not, directly or indirectly:
(a) Purchase a debt or obligation of the individual;
(b) Receive from or on behalf of the individual:
(i) A promissory note or other negotiable instrument other than a
check or a demand draft; or
(ii) A postdated check or demand draft;
(c) Lend money or provide credit to the individual, except as a
deferral of a settlement fee at no additional expense to the
individual;
(d) Obtain a mortgage or other security interest from any person in
connection with the services provided to the individual;
(e) Except as permitted by federal law, disclose the identity or
identifying information of the individual or the identity of the
individual's creditors, except to:
(i) The administrator, on proper demand;
(ii) A creditor of the individual, to the extent necessary to
secure the cooperation of the creditor in a plan; or
(iii) The extent necessary to administer the plan;
(f) Except as otherwise provided in section 23 of this act, provide
the individual less than the full benefit of a compromise of a debt
arranged by the provider;
(g) Charge the individual for or provide credit or other insurance,
coupons for goods or services, membership in a club, access to
computers or the internet, or any other matter not directly related to
debt management services or educational services concerning personal
finance; or
(h) Furnish legal advice or perform legal services, unless the
person furnishing that advice to or performing those services for the
individual is licensed to practice law.
(3) This section does not authorize any person to engage in the
practice of law.
(4) A provider may not receive a gift or bonus, premium, reward, or
other compensation, directly or indirectly, for advising, arranging, or
assisting an individual in connection with obtaining, an extension of
credit or other service from a lender or service provider, except for
educational or counseling services required in connection with a
government-sponsored program or authorized under section 23(4)(e) of
this act.
(5) Unless a person supplies goods, services, or facilities
generally and supplies them to the provider at a cost no greater than
the cost the person generally charges to others, a provider may not
purchase goods, services, or facilities from the person if an employee
or a person that the provider should reasonably know is an affiliate of
the provider:
(a) Owns more than ten percent of the person; or
(b) Is an employee or affiliate of the person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 No later than thirty days after a provider
has been served with notice of a civil action for violation of this
chapter by or on behalf of an individual who resides in this state at
either the time of an agreement or the time the notice is served, the
provider shall notify the administrator in a record that it has been
sued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 (1) If a provider whose agreements
contemplate that creditors will reduce finance charges or fees for late
payment, default, or delinquency advertises debt management services,
it shall disclose, in an easily comprehensible manner, that using a
debt management plan may make it harder for the individual to obtain
credit.
(2) If a provider whose agreements contemplate that creditors will
settle for less than the full principal amount of debt advertises debt
management services, it shall disclose, in an easily comprehensible
manner, the information specified in section 17(4) (c) and (d) of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 (1) If a provider delegates any of its
duties or obligations under an agreement or this chapter to another
person, including an independent contractor, the provider is liable for
conduct of the person which, if done by the provider, would violate the
agreement or this chapter.
(2) A lead generator or other person that provides services to or
for a provider may not engage in an unfair, unconscionable, or
deceptive act or practice, including the knowing omission of any
material information, with respect to an individual who the lead
generator or other person has reason to believe is or may become a
customer of the provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 (1) The administrator may act on its own
initiative or in response to complaints and may receive complaints,
take action to obtain voluntary compliance with this chapter, refer
cases to the attorney general, and seek or provide remedies as provided
in this chapter.
(2) The administrator may investigate and examine, in this state or
elsewhere, by subpoena or otherwise, the activities, books, accounts,
and records of a person that provides or offers to provide debt
management services, or a person to which a provider has delegated its
obligations under an agreement or this chapter, to determine compliance
with this chapter. Information that identifies individuals who have
agreements with the provider shall not be disclosed to the public. In
connection with the investigation, the administrator may:
(a) Charge the person the reasonable expenses necessarily incurred
to conduct the examination;
(b) Require or permit a person to file a statement under oath as to
all the facts and circumstances of a matter to be investigated; and
(c) Seek a court order authorizing seizure from a bank at which the
person maintains an account contemplated by section 22 of this act, any
or all money, books, records, accounts, and other property of the
provider that is in the control of the bank and relates to individuals
who reside in this state.
(3) The administrator may adopt rules to implement the provisions
of this chapter in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) The administrator may enter into cooperative arrangements with
any other federal or state agency having authority over providers and
may exchange with any of those agencies information about a provider,
including information obtained during an examination of the provider.
(5) The administrator, by rule, shall establish reasonable fees to
be paid by providers for the expense of administering this chapter.
(6) The administrator, by rule, shall adopt dollar amounts instead
of those specified in sections 2, 5, 9, 13, 23, 33, and 35 of this act
to reflect inflation, as measured by the United States bureau of labor
statistics consumer price index for all urban consumers or, if that
index is not available, another index adopted by rule by the
administrator. The administrator shall adopt a base year and adjust
the dollar amounts, effective July 1st of each year, if the change in
the index from the base year, as of December 31st of the preceding
year, is at least ten percent. The dollar amount must be rounded to
the nearest one hundred dollars, except that the amounts in section 23
of this act must be rounded to the nearest dollar.
(7) The administrator shall notify registered providers of any
change in dollar amounts made pursuant to subsection (6) of this
section and make that information available to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 (1) The administrator may enforce this
chapter and rules adopted under this chapter by taking one or more of
the following actions:
(a) Ordering a provider, lead generator, person administering an
account pursuant to section 22(2) of this act, or a director, employee,
or other agent of a provider, lead generator, person administering an
account pursuant to section 22(2) of this act, to cease and desist from
any violations;
(b) Ordering a provider, lead generator, person administering an
account pursuant to section 22(2) of this act, or a person that has
caused a violation to correct the violation, including making
restitution of money or property to a person aggrieved by a violation;
(c) Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to section
32(6) of this act, imposing on a provider, lead generator, person
administering an account pursuant to section 22(2) of this act, or
other person that violates or causes a violation a civil penalty not
exceeding ten thousand dollars for each violation;
(d) Prosecuting a civil action to:
(i) Enforce an order; or
(ii) Obtain restitution or other equitable relief, or both;
(e) Intervening in an action brought under section 35 of this act.
(2) Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to section
32(6) of this act, if a person violates or knowingly authorizes,
directs, or aids in the violation of a final order issued under
subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section, the administrator may impose
a civil penalty not exceeding twenty thousand dollars for each
violation.
(3) The administrator may maintain an action to enforce this
chapter in any county.
(4) The administrator may recover the reasonable costs of enforcing
this chapter under subsections (1) through (3) of this section,
including attorneys' fees based on the hours reasonably expended and
the hourly rates for attorneys of comparable experience in the
community.
(5) In determining the amount of a civil penalty to impose under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the administrator shall consider
the seriousness of the violation, the good faith of the violator, any
previous violations by the violator, the deleterious effect of the
violation on the public, the net worth of the violator, and any other
factor the administrator considers relevant to the determination of the
civil penalty.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 (1) The administrator may suspend, revoke,
or deny renewal of a provider's registration if:
(a) A fact or condition exists that, if it had existed when the
registrant applied for registration as a provider, would have been a
reason for denying registration;
(b) The provider has committed a material violation of this chapter
or a rule or order of the administrator under this chapter;
(c) The provider is insolvent;
(d) The provider, an employee or affiliate of the provider, a lead
generator for the provider, a person administering an account for the
provider pursuant to section 22(2) of this act, or a person to which
the provider has delegated its obligations under an agreement or this
chapter has refused to permit the administrator to make an examination
authorized by this chapter, failed to comply with section 32(2)(b) of
this act within fifteen days of request, or made a material
misrepresentation or omission in complying with section 32(2)(b) of
this act; or
(e) The provider has not responded within a reasonable time and in
an appropriate manner to communications from the administrator.
(2) If a provider does not comply with section 22(8) of this act,
or if the administrator otherwise finds that the public health or
safety or general welfare requires emergency action, the administrator
may order a summary suspension of the provider's registration,
effective on the date specified in the order.
(3) If the administrator suspends, revokes, or denies renewal of
the registration of a provider, the administrator may seek a court
order authorizing seizure of any or all of the money in a trust account
required by section 22 of this act, books, records, accounts, and other
property of the provider which are located in this state.
(4) If the administrator suspends or revokes a provider's
registration, the provider may appeal and request a hearing under
chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "insolvent" means:
(a) Having generally ceased to pay debts in the ordinary course of
business other than as a result of good faith dispute;
(b) Being unable to pay debts as they become due; or
(c) Being insolvent within the meaning of the federal bankruptcy
law (11 U.S.C. Sec. 101 et seq.).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 (1) If an individual voids an agreement
pursuant to section 25(2) of this act, the individual may recover in a
civil action all money paid or deposited by or on behalf of the
individual pursuant to the agreement, except amounts paid to creditors,
in addition to the recovery under subsection (3)(c) and (d) of this
section.
(2) If an individual voids an agreement pursuant to section 25(1)
of this act, the individual may recover in a civil action three times
the total amount of the fees, charges, money, and payments made by the
individual to the provider, in addition to the recovery under
subsection (3)(d) of this section.
(3) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, an individual with
respect to whom a provider violates this chapter may recover in a civil
action from the provider and any person that caused the violation:
(a) Compensatory damages for injury, including noneconomic injury,
caused by the violation;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section
and subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to section
32(6) of this act, with respect to a violation of section 17, 19, 20,
21, 22, 23, 24, 27, or 28 (1), (2), or (4) of this act, the greater of
the amount recoverable under subsection (1) of this section or five
thousand dollars;
(c) Punitive damages; and
(d) Reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.
(4) In a class action, except for a violation of section 28(1)(f)
of this act, the minimum damages provided in subsection (3)(b) of this
section do not apply.
(5) A provider is not liable under this section for a violation of
this chapter if the provider proves that the violation was not
intentional and resulted from a good faith error notwithstanding the
maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid the error. An
error of legal judgment with respect to a provider's obligations under
this chapter is not a good faith error. If, in connection with a
violation, the provider has received more money than authorized by an
agreement or this chapter, the defense provided by this subsection is
not available unless the provider refunds the excess no later than two
business days after learning of the violation.
(6) The administrator shall assist an individual in enforcing a
judgment against the surety bond or other security provided under
section 13 or 14 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 If an act or practice of a provider
violates both this chapter and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade
or commerce for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW, an individual may not recover under both for the
same act or practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 (1) An action or proceeding brought
pursuant to section 33 (1), (2), or (3) of this act must be commenced
no later than four years after the conduct that is the basis of the
administrator's complaint.
(2) An action brought pursuant to section 35 of this act must be
commenced no later than two years after the latest of:
(a) The individual's last transmission of money to a provider;
(b) The individual's last transmission of money to a creditor at
the direction of the provider;
(c) The provider's last disbursement to a creditor of the
individual;
(d) The provider's last accounting to the individual pursuant to
section 27(1) of this act;
(e) The date on which the individual discovered or reasonably
should have discovered the facts giving rise to the individual's claim;
or
(f) Termination of actions or proceedings by the administrator with
respect to a violation of this chapter.
(3) The period prescribed in subsection (2)(e) of this section is
tolled during any period during which the provider or, if different,
the defendant has materially and willfully misrepresented information
required by this chapter to be disclosed to the individual, if the
information so misrepresented is material to the establishment of the
liability of the defendant under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 In applying and construing this chapter,
consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the
law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 This chapter modifies, limits, and
supersedes the electronic signatures in global and national commerce
act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq.) but does not modify, limit, or
supersede section 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c)) or
authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in
section 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 Transactions entered into before the
effective date of this section and the rights, duties, and interests
resulting from them may be completed, terminated, or enforced as
required or permitted by a law amended, repealed, or modified by this
act as though the amendment, repeal, or modification had not occurred.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 18.28.010 (Definitions) and 2012 c 56 s 1, 1999 c 151 s
101, 1979 c 156 s 1, 1970 ex.s. c 97 s 1, & 1967 c 201 s 1;
(2) RCW 18.28.080 (Fees for debt adjusting services -- Limitations--Requirements) and 2012 c 56 s 2, 1999 c 151 s 102, 1979 c 156 s 4, 1967
ex.s. c 141 s 2, & 1967 c 201 s 8;
(3) RCW 18.28.090 (Excess charges -- Contract void -- Return of
payments) and 1999 c 151 s 103 & 1967 c 201 s 9;
(4) RCW 18.28.100 (Contract requirements) and 1999 c 151 s 104,
1979 c 156 s 5, & 1967 c 201 s 10;
(5) RCW 18.28.110 (Debt adjuster -- Functions required to be
performed) and 1999 c 151 s 105, 1979 c 156 s 6, & 1967 c 201 s 11;
(6) RCW 18.28.120 (Debt adjuster -- Prohibited acts) and 1999 c 151
s 106 & 1967 c 201 s 12;
(7) RCW 18.28.130 (Legal services -- Rendering or obtaining -- Using
name of attorney -- Prohibited) and 1999 c 151 s 107 & 1967 c 201 s 13;
(8) RCW 18.28.140 (Assignment of wages not prohibited) and 1999 c
151 s 108 & 1967 c 201 s 14;
(9) RCW 18.28.150 (Trust account for payments by debtor--Disbursements) and 1999 c 151 s 109, 1979 c 156 s 8, & 1967 c 201 s 15;
(10) RCW 18.28.165 (Investigations) and 1999 c 151 s 110 & 1979 c
156 s 7;
(11) RCW 18.28.180 (Administrative procedure act to govern
administration) and 1967 c 201 s 18;
(12) RCW 18.28.185 (Violations -- Unfair practice under chapter 19.86
RCW) and 1979 c 156 s 10;
(13) RCW 18.28.190 (Violations -- Penalty) and 1999 c 151 s 111 &
1967 c 201 s 19;
(14) RCW 18.28.200 (Violations -- Injunctions) and 1967 c 201 s 20;
(15) RCW 18.28.210 (Violations -- Assurance of discontinuance--Effect) and 2011 c 336 s 476 & 1967 c 201 s 21;
(16) RCW 18.28.220 (Violation of injunction -- Civil penalty) and
1967 c 201 s 22;
(17) RCW 18.28.900 (Saving prior contracts) and 1967 c 201 s 23;
and
(18) RCW 18.28.910 (Severability -- 1967 c 201) and 1967 c 201 s 24.

Sec. 42 RCW 18.100.140 and 2012 c 10 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall authorize a director, officer,
shareholder, agent, or employee of a corporation organized under this
chapter, or a corporation itself organized under this chapter, to do or
perform any act which would be illegal, unethical, or unauthorized
conduct under the provisions of the following acts: (1) Physicians and
surgeons, chapter 18.71 RCW; (2) anti-rebating act, chapter 19.68 RCW;
(3) state bar act, chapter 2.48 RCW; (4) professional accounting act,
chapter 18.04 RCW; (5) professional architects act, chapter 18.08 RCW;
(6) professional auctioneers act, chapter 18.11 RCW; (7)
cosmetologists, barbers, and manicurists, chapter 18.16 RCW; (8)
assisted living facilities act, chapter 18.20 RCW; (9) podiatric
medicine and surgery, chapter 18.22 RCW; (10) chiropractic act, chapter
18.25 RCW; (11) registration of contractors, chapter 18.27 RCW; (12)
((debt adjusting act, chapter 18.28 RCW)) uniform debt management
services act, chapter 18.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 49
of this act); (13) dental hygienist act, chapter 18.29 RCW; (14)
dentistry, chapter 18.32 RCW; (15) dispensing opticians, chapter 18.34
RCW; (16) naturopathic physicians, chapter 18.36A RCW; (17) embalmers
and funeral directors, chapter 18.39 RCW; (18) engineers and land
surveyors, chapter 18.43 RCW; (19) escrow agents registration act,
chapter 18.44 RCW; (20) birthing centers, chapter 18.46 RCW; (21)
midwifery, chapter 18.50 RCW; (22) nursing homes, chapter 18.51 RCW;
(23) optometry, chapter 18.53 RCW; (24) osteopathic physicians and
surgeons, chapter 18.57 RCW; (25) pharmacists, chapter 18.64 RCW; (26)
physical therapy, chapter 18.74 RCW; (27) registered nurses, advanced
registered nurse practitioners, and practical nurses, chapter 18.79
RCW; (28) psychologists, chapter 18.83 RCW; (29) real estate brokers
and salespersons, chapter 18.85 RCW; (30) veterinarians, chapter 18.92
RCW.

Sec. 43 RCW 18.118.020 and 1987 c 514 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions contained in this section shall apply throughout
this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant group" includes any business professional group or
organization, any individual, or any other interested party which
proposes that any business professional group not presently regulated
be regulated or which proposes legislation to substantially increase
the scope of practice or the level of regulation of the profession.
(2) "Business professions" means those business occupations or
professions which are not health professions under chapter 18.120 RCW
and includes, in addition to real estate brokers and salespersons under
chapter 18.85 RCW, the following professions and occupations:
Accountancy under chapter 18.04 RCW; architects under chapter 18.08
RCW; auctioneering under chapter 18.11 RCW; cosmetologists, barbers,
and manicurists under chapter 18.16 RCW; contractors under chapter
18.27 RCW; ((debt adjusting under chapter 18.28 RCW)) debt management
under chapter 18.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 49 of this
act); engineers and surveyors under chapter 18.43 RCW; escrow agents
under chapter 18.44 RCW; landscape architects under chapter 18.96 RCW;
water well construction under chapter 18.104 RCW; plumbers under
chapter 18.106 RCW; and art dealers under chapter 18.110 RCW.
(3) "Certificate" and "certification" mean a voluntary process by
which a statutory regulatory entity grants recognition to an individual
who (a) has met certain prerequisite qualifications specified by that
regulatory entity, and (b) may assume or use "certified" in the title
or designation to perform prescribed professional tasks.
(4) "Grandfather clause" means a provision in a regulatory statute
applicable to practitioners actively engaged in the regulated
profession prior to the effective date of the regulatory statute which
exempts the practitioners from meeting the prerequisite qualifications
set forth in the regulatory statute to perform prescribed occupational
tasks.
(5) "Inspection" means the periodic examination of practitioners by
a state agency in order to ascertain whether the practitioners'
occupation is being carried out in a fashion consistent with the public
health, safety, and welfare.
(6) "Legislative committees of reference" means the standing
legislative committees designated by the respective rules committees of
the senate and house of representatives to consider proposed
legislation to regulate business professions not previously regulated.
(7) "License", "licensing", and "licensure" mean permission to
engage in a business profession which would otherwise be unlawful in
the state in the absence of the permission. A license is granted to
those individuals who meet prerequisite qualifications to perform
prescribed professional tasks and for the use of a particular title.
(8) "Professional license" means an individual, nontransferable
authorization to carry on an activity based on qualifications which
include: (a) Graduation from an accredited or approved program, and
(b) acceptable performance on a qualifying examination or series of
examinations.
(9) "Practitioner" means an individual who (a) has achieved
knowledge and skill by practice, and (b) is actively engaged in a
specified business profession.
(10) "Public member" means an individual who is not, and never was,
a member of the business profession being regulated or the spouse of a
member, or an individual who does not have and never has had a material
financial interest in either the rendering of the business professional
service being regulated or an activity directly related to the
profession being regulated.
(11) "Registration" means the formal notification which, prior to
rendering services, a practitioner shall submit to a state agency
setting forth the name and address of the practitioner; the location,
nature and operation of the business activity to be practiced; and, if
required by the regulatory entity, a description of the service to be
provided.
(12) "Regulatory entity" means any board, commission, agency,
division, or other unit or subunit of state government which regulates
one or more professions, occupations, industries, businesses, or other
endeavors in this state.
(13) "State agency" includes every state office, department, board,
commission, regulatory entity, and agency of the state, and, where
provided by law, programs and activities involving less than the full
responsibility of a state agency.

Sec. 44 RCW 19.230.350 and 2012 c 56 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A third-party account administrator must be licensed as a money
transmitter under this chapter and comply with the following additional
requirements:
(a) A debtor's funds must be held in an account at an insured
financial institution;
(b) A debtor owns the funds held in the account and must be paid
accrued interest on the account, if any;
(c) A third-party account administrator may not be owned or
controlled by, or in any way affiliated with, a ((debt adjuster))
provider of debt management services;
(d) A third-party account administrator may not give or accept any
money or other compensation in exchange for referrals of business
involving a ((debt adjuster)) provider of debt management services;
(e) A debtor may withdraw from the service provided by a third-party account administrator at any time without penalty and must
receive all funds in the account, other than funds earned by a ((debt
adjuster)) provider of debt management services in compliance with
chapter ((18.28)) 18.-- RCW (the new chapter created by section 49 of
this act), within seven business days of the debtor's request; and
(f) A contract between a third-party account administrator and a
debtor must disclose in precise terms the rate and amount of all
charges and fees. In addition, the contract must include a statement
that is substantially similar to the following: "Under the
((Washington Debt Adjusting)) Uniform Debt Management Services Act, the
total fees you are charged for debt ((adjusting)) management services
may not exceed fifteen percent of the total amount of debt you listed
on your ((contract)) agreement with the debt ((adjuster)) management
services provider. This includes fees charged by a debt ((adjuster))
management services provider, a third-party account administrator, and
a ((financial institution)) bank." The disclosures required by this
subsection (1)(f) must be on the front page of the contract and must be
in at least twelve-point type.
(2) The legislature finds and declares that any violation of this
section substantially affects the public interest and is an unfair and
deceptive act or practice and (([an])) an unfair method of competition
in the conduct of trade or commerce as set forth in RCW 19.86.020. In
addition to all remedies available in chapter 19.86 RCW, a person
injured by a violation of this section may bring a civil action to
recover the actual damages proximately caused by a violation of this
section, or one thousand dollars, whichever is greater.
(3) For purposes of this section and RCW 19.230.360:
(a) (("Debt adjuster" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
18.28.010)) "Debt management services" has the same meaning as in
section 2 of this act;
(b) "Provider" has the same meaning as in section 2 of this act;
(c) "Third-party account administrator" means an independent entity
that holds or administers a dedicated bank account for fees and
payments to creditors, debt collectors, ((debt adjusters, or debt
adjusting agencies)) or providers in connection with the renegotiation,
settlement, reduction, or other alteration of the terms of payment or
other terms of a debt. "Third-party account administrator" does not
include an entity that is otherwise exempt from this chapter under RCW
19.230.020.

Sec. 45 RCW 19.230.360 and 2012 c 56 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A third-party account administrator shall maintain the
following records for at least five years:
(a) All contracts the third-party account administrator has entered
into with debtors and ((debt adjusters)) providers of debt management
services;
(b) Account statements identifying and itemizing deposits,
transfers, disbursements, and fees; and
(c) Any other records required in rule by the director.
(2) All records maintained by the third-party account administrator
are open to inspection by the director or the director's designee.

Sec. 46 RCW 42.56.230 and 2011 c 350 s 2 and 2011 c 173 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following personal information is exempt from public inspection
and copying under this chapter:
(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients;
(2) Personal information((,)) including, but not limited to,
addresses, telephone numbers, personal electronic mail addresses,
social security numbers, emergency contact and date of birth
information for a participant in a public or nonprofit program serving
or pertaining to children, adolescents, or students, including but not
limited to early learning or child care services, parks and recreation
programs, youth development programs, and after-school programs.
Emergency contact information may be provided to appropriate
authorities and medical personnel for the purpose of treating the
individual during an emergency situation;
(3) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;
(4) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would: (a) Be prohibited to such persons
by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, 84.40.340, or any ordinance
authorized under RCW 35.102.145; or (b) violate the taxpayer's right to
privacy or result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer;
(5) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by
other law;
(6) Personal and financial information related to a small loan or
any system of authorizing a small loan in RCW 31.45.093; ((and))
(7)(a) Documents and related materials and scanned images of
documents and related materials used to prove identity, age,
residential address, social security number, or other personal
information required to apply for a driver's license or identicard.
(b) Information provided under RCW 46.20.111 that indicates that an
applicant declined to register with the selective service system; and
(8) Information obtained by the department of financial
institutions that identifies individuals who have agreements with
providers of debt management services, as provided in section 32(2) of
this act, as well as addresses obtained by the department of financial
institutions under section 6(4) of this act.

Sec. 47 RCW 42.56.270 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.325, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and
43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(b) Internal control documents, independent auditors' reports and
financial statements, and supporting documents: (i) Of house-banked
social card game licensees required by the gambling commission pursuant
to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW; or (ii) submitted by tribes
with an approved tribal/state compact for class III gaming;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
commerce:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce pursuant to RCW
43.330.050(8); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce or the office of the
governor in connection with the siting, recruitment, expansion,
retention, or relocation of that person's business and until a siting
decision is made, identifying information of any person supplying
information under this subsection and the locations being considered
for siting, relocation, or expansion of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of commerce based on
information as described in (a)(i) of this subsection, any work product
is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of commerce from a person connected with siting,
recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's
business, information described in (a)(ii) of this subsection will be
available to the public under this chapter;
(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained
by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter
70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information;
(15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to
the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or
19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does
not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel
licensees;
(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;
(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless
permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or
operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit;
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to
RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;
(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and
services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under
RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
providers of this information;
(19) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328
that can be identified to a particular business;
(20) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained
by the University of Washington, other than information the university
is required to disclose under RCW 28B.20.150, when the information
relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such
information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in
loss to the University of Washington consolidated endowment fund or to
result in private loss to the providers of this information; ((and))
(21) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by innovate Washington in
applications for, or delivery of, grants and loans under chapter 43.333
RCW, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably
be expected to result in private loss to the providers of this
information; and
(22) Information submitted to the department of financial
institutions under section 6 (7), (14), and (17) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 48 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 49 Sections 1 through 39 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 50 This act takes effect October 1, 2013.

--- END ---