BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that persons
convicted and imprisoned for crimes they did not commit have been
uniquely victimized. Having suffered tremendous injustice by being
stripped of their lives and liberty, they are forced to endure
imprisonment and are later stigmatized as felons. A majority of those
wrongly convicted in Washington state have no remedy available under
the law for the destruction of their personal lives resulting from
errors in our criminal justice system. The legislature intends to
provide an avenue for those who have been wrongly convicted in
Washington state to redress the lost years of their lives, and help to
address the unique challenges faced by the wrongly convicted after
exoneration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Any person convicted in superior court
and subsequently imprisoned for one or more felonies of which he or she
is actually innocent may file a claim for compensation against the
state.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, a person is:
(a) "Actually innocent" of a felony if he or she did not engage in
any illegal conduct alleged in the charging documents; and
(b) "Wrongly convicted" if he or she was charged, convicted, and
imprisoned for one or more felonies of which he or she is actually
innocent.
(3)(a) If the person entitled to file a claim under subsection (1)
of this section is incapacitated and incapable of filing the claim, or
if he or she is a minor, or is a nonresident of the state, the claim
may be filed on behalf of the claimant by an authorized agent.
(b) A claim filed under this chapter survives to the personal
representative of the claimant as provided in RCW 4.20.046.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) All claims under this chapter must be
filed in superior court. The venue for such actions is governed by RCW
4.12.020.
(2) Service of the summons and complaint is governed by RCW
4.28.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) In order to file an actionable claim for
compensation under this act, the claimant must establish by documentary
evidence that:
(a) The claimant has been convicted of one or more felonies in
superior court and subsequently sentenced to a term of imprisonment,
and has served all or part of the sentence;
(b)(i) The claimant is not currently incarcerated for any offense;
and
(ii) During the period of confinement for which the claimant is
seeking compensation, the claimant was not serving a term of
imprisonment or a concurrent sentence for any crime other than the
felony or felonies that are the basis for the claim;
(c)(i) The claimant has been pardoned on grounds consistent with
innocence for the felony or felonies that are the basis for the claim;
or
(ii) The claimant's judgment of conviction was reversed or vacated
and the charging document dismissed on the basis of significant new
exculpatory information or, if a new trial was ordered pursuant to the
presentation of significant new exculpatory information, either the
claimant was found not guilty at the new trial or the claimant was not
retried and the charging document dismissed; and
(d) The claim is not time barred by section 9 of this act.
(2) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, the claimant shall state facts in sufficient detail for the
finder of fact to determine that:
(a) The claimant did not engage in any illegal conduct alleged in
the charging documents; and
(b) The claimant did not commit or suborn perjury, or fabricate
evidence to cause or bring about the conviction. A guilty plea to a
crime the claimant did not commit, or a confession that is later
determined by a court to be false, does not automatically constitute
perjury or fabricated evidence under this subsection.
(3) Convictions vacated, overturned, or subject to resentencing
pursuant to In re: Personal Detention of Andress, 147 Wn.2d 602 (2002)
may not serve as the basis for a claim under this chapter unless the
claimant otherwise satisfies the qualifying criteria set forth in
section 2 of this act and this section.
(4) The claimant shall verify the claim unless he or she is
incapacitated, in which case the personal representative or agent
filing on behalf of the claimant shall verify the claim.
(5) If the attorney general concedes that the claimant was wrongly
convicted, the court shall award compensation as provided in section 6
of this act.
(6)(a) If the attorney general does not concede that the claimant
was wrongly convicted and the court finds after reading the claim that
the claimant does not meet the filing criteria set forth in this
section, it may dismiss the claim, either on its own motion or on the
motion of the attorney general.
(b) If the court dismisses the claim, the court shall set forth the
reasons for its decision in written findings of fact and conclusions of
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Any party is entitled to the rights of
appeal afforded parties in a civil action following a decision on such
motions. In the case of dismissal of a claim, review of the superior
court action is de novo.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) In order to obtain a judgment in his or
her favor, the claimant must show by clear and convincing evidence
that:
(a) The claimant was convicted of one or more felonies in superior
court and subsequently sentenced to a term of imprisonment, and has
served all or any part of the sentence;
(b)(i) The claimant is not currently incarcerated for any offense;
and
(ii) During the period of confinement for which the claimant is
seeking compensation, the claimant was not serving a term of
imprisonment or a concurrent sentence for any conviction other than
those that are the basis for the claim;
(c)(i) The claimant has been pardoned on grounds consistent with
innocence for the felony or felonies that are the basis for the claim;
or
(ii) The claimant's judgment of conviction was reversed or vacated
and the charging document dismissed on the basis of significant new
exculpatory information or, if a new trial was ordered pursuant to the
presentation of significant new exculpatory information, either the
claimant was found not guilty at the new trial or the claimant was not
retried and the charging document dismissed;
(d) The claimant did not engage in any illegal conduct alleged in
the charging documents; and
(e) The claimant did not commit or suborn perjury, or fabricate
evidence to cause or bring about his or her conviction. A guilty plea
to a crime the claimant did not commit, or a confession that is later
determined by a court to be false, does not automatically constitute
perjury or fabricated evidence under this subsection.
(2) Any pardon or proclamation issued to the claimant must be
certified by the officer having lawful custody of the pardon or
proclamation, and be affixed with the seal of the office of the
governor, or with the official certificate of such officer before it
may be offered as evidence.
(3) In exercising its discretion regarding the weight and
admissibility of evidence, the court shall give due consideration to
difficulties of proof caused by the passage of time or by release of
evidence pursuant to a plea, the death or unavailability of witnesses,
the destruction of evidence, or other factors not caused by the
parties.
(4) The claimant may not be compensated for any period of time in
which he or she was serving a term of imprisonment or a concurrent
sentence for any conviction other than the felony or felonies that are
the basis for the claim.
(5) If the jury or, in the case where the right to a jury is
waived, the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the
claimant was wrongly convicted, the court shall order the state to pay
the actually innocent claimant the following compensation award, as
adjusted for partial years served and to account for inflation from the
effective date of this section:
(a) Fifty thousand dollars for each year of actual confinement
including time spent awaiting trial and an additional fifty thousand
dollars for each year served under a sentence of death pursuant to
chapter 10.95 RCW;
(b) Twenty-five thousand dollars for each year served on parole,
community custody, or as a registered sex offender pursuant only to the
felony or felonies which are grounds for the claim;
(c) Compensation for child support payments owed by the claimant
that became due and interest on child support arrearages that accrued
while the claimant was in custody on the felony or felonies that are
grounds for the compensation claim. The funds must be paid on the
claimant's behalf in a lump sum payment to the department of social and
health services for disbursement under Title 26 RCW;
(d) Reimbursement for all restitution, assessments, fees, court
costs, and all other sums paid by the claimant as required by pretrial
orders and the judgment and sentence; and
(e) Attorneys' fees for successfully bringing the wrongful
conviction claim calculated at ten percent of the monetary damages
awarded under subsection (5)(a) and (b) of this section, plus expenses.
However, attorneys' fees and expenses may not exceed seventy-five
thousand dollars. These fees may not be deducted from the compensation
award due to the claimant and counsel is not entitled to receive
additional fees from the client related to the claim. The court may
not award any attorneys' fees to the claimant if the claimant fails to
prove he or she was wrongly convicted.
(6) The compensation award may not include any punitive damages.
(7) The court may not offset the compensation award by any expenses
incurred by the state, the county, or any political subdivision of the
state including, but not limited to, expenses incurred to secure the
claimant's custody, or to feed, clothe, or provide medical services for
the claimant. The court may not offset against the compensation award
the value of any services or reduction in fees for services to be
provided to the claimant as part of the award under this section.
(8) The compensation award is not income for tax purposes, except
attorneys' fees awarded under subsection (5)(e) of this section.
(9)(a) Upon finding that the claimant was wrongly convicted, the
court shall seal the claimant's record of conviction.
(b) Upon request of the claimant, the court may order the
claimant's record of conviction vacated if the record has not already
been vacated, expunged, or destroyed under court rules. The
requirements for vacating records under RCW 9.94A.640 do not apply.
(10) Upon request of the claimant, the court shall refer the
claimant to the department of corrections or the department of social
and health services for access to reentry services, if available,
including but not limited to the community-based transition programs
and long-term support programs for education, mentoring, life skills
training, assessment, job skills development, mental health and
substance abuse treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) On or after the effective date of this
section, when a court grants judicial relief, such as reversal and
vacation of a person's conviction, consistent with the criteria
established in section 4 of this act, the court shall provide to the
claimant a copy of sections 2 through 11 of this act at the time the
relief is granted.
(2) The clemency and pardons board or the indeterminate sentence
review board, whichever is applicable, upon issuance of a pardon by the
governor on grounds consistent with innocence on or after the effective
date of this section, shall provide a copy of sections 2 through 11 of
this act to the individual pardoned.
(3) If an individual entitled to receive the information required
under this section shows that he or she was not provided with the
information, he or she has an additional twelve months, beyond the
statute of limitations under section 9 of this act, to bring a claim
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Nothing in this chapter precludes any
existing remedy available to the claimant related to his or her
wrongful conviction and imprisonment.
(2) If a claimant is awarded compensation under this act and
receives a tort award related to his or her wrongful conviction and
incarceration, the claimant shall reimburse the state for the lesser
of:
(a) The amount of the compensation award, excluding the portion
awarded pursuant to section 6(5) (c) through (e) of this act; or
(b) The amount received by the claimant under the tort award.
(3) A release dismissal agreement, plea agreement, or any similar
agreement whereby a prosecutor's office or an agent acting on its
behalf agrees to take or refrain from certain action if the accused
individual agrees to forgo legal action against the county, the state
of Washington, or any political subdivision, is admissible and should
be evaluated in light of all the evidence. However, any such agreement
is not dispositive of the question of whether the claimant was wrongly
convicted or entitled to compensation under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Except as provided in section 7 of this act,
an action for compensation under this chapter must be commenced within
three years after the grant of a pardon, the grant of judicial relief
and satisfaction of other conditions described in section 2 of this
act, or release from custody, whichever is later; provided, however,
that any action by the state challenging or appealing the grant of
judicial relief or release from custody tolls the three-year period.
Any persons meeting the criteria set forth in section 2 of this act who
was wrongly convicted before the effective date of this section may
commence an action under this chapter within three years after the
effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions in subsection (2) of this section and
the limitations in RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
and the community colleges, shall waive all tuition and fees for the
following persons:
(a) A wrongly convicted person; and
(b) Any child or stepchild of a wrongly convicted person who was
born or became the stepchild of, or was adopted by, the wrongly
convicted person before compensation is awarded under section 6 of this
act.
(2) The following conditions apply to waivers under subsection (1)
of this section:
(a) A wrongly convicted person must be a Washington domiciliary to
be eligible for the tuition waiver.
(b) A child must be a Washington domiciliary ages seventeen through
twenty-six years to be eligible for the tuition waiver. A child's
marital status does not affect eligibility.
(c) Each recipient's continued participation is subject to the
school's satisfactory progress policy.
(d) Tuition waivers for graduate students are not required for
those who qualify under subsection (1) of this section but are
encouraged.
(e) Recipients who receive a waiver under subsection (1) of this
section may attend full time or part time. Total credits earned using
the waiver may not exceed two hundred quarter credits, or the
equivalent of semester credits.
(3) Private vocational schools and private higher education
institutions are encouraged to provide waivers consistent with the
terms of this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Child" means a biological child, stepchild, or adopted child
who was born of, became the stepchild of, or was adopted by a wrongly
convicted person before compensation is awarded under section 6 of this
act.
(b) "Fees" includes all assessments for costs incurred as a
condition to a student's full participation in coursework and related
activities at an institution of higher education.
(c) "Washington domiciliary" means a person whose true, fixed, and
permanent house and place of habitation is the state of Washington. In
ascertaining whether a wrongly convicted person or child is domiciled
in the state of Washington, public institutions of higher education
shall, to the fullest extent possible, rely upon the standards provided
in RCW 28B.15.013.
(d) "Wrongly convicted person" means a Washington domiciliary who
was awarded damages under section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
When a court refers a person to the department under section 6 of
this act as part of the person's award in a wrongful conviction claim,
the department shall provide reasonable access to existing reentry
programs and services. Nothing in this section requires the department
to establish new reentry programs or services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 4 RCW.

--- END ---