BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.230.180 and 1980 c 96 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the board of directors of a school district provides access to
the campus and the student information directory to persons or groups
which make students aware of occupational or educational options, the
board shall provide access ((on the same basis)) to official recruiting
representatives of the job corps, peace corps, and AmeriCorps, and to
official recruiting representatives of the military forces of the state
and the United States for the purpose of informing students of
educational and career opportunities available in the military, which
must be equal to and no less than access provided to other
postsecondary occupational or educational representatives. As used in
this section, "access" includes, but is not limited to, the number of
days provided and the type of presentation space.

--- END ---