BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For individual and small group rate filings with an effective
date on or after January 1, 2015, submitted by a nonprofit health
carrier for either the individual or small group markets, the
commissioner must review the carrier's surplus levels as an element in
determining the reasonableness of the proposed rate.
(2) In reviewing the surplus, the commissioner must take into
consideration the capital facility needs for carriers maintaining and
operating hospital and clinical facilities.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, this
section does not affect the rate review authority granted to the
commissioner by this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---