BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.09.015 and 2008 c 6 s 1044 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In any proceeding under this chapter, other than a proceeding
under subsection (2) of this section, the matter may be set for
mediation of the contested issues before or concurrent with the setting
of the matter for hearing. The purpose of the mediation proceeding
shall be to reduce acrimony which may exist between the parties ((and
to develop an agreement assuring the child's close and continuing
contact with both parents after the marriage or the domestic
partnership is dissolved)). The mediator shall use his or her best
efforts to effect a settlement of the dispute.
(((2)(a) Each superior court may make available a mediator. The
court shall use the most cost-effective mediation services that are
readily available unless there is good cause to access alternative
providers. The mediator may be a member of the professional staff of
a family court or mental health services agency, or may be any other
person or agency designated by the court. In order to provide
mediation services, the court is not required to institute a family
court.
(b))) (2)(a) In any proceeding involving issues relating to
residential time or other matters governed by a parenting plan, the
matter ((may)) must be ((set)) scheduled for mediation of the contested
issues ((before or concurrent with the setting of the matter for
hearing)) within sixty to ninety days after service and filing of
responsive pleadings is completed. The purpose of the mediation
proceeding shall be to reduce acrimony which may exist between the
parties and to develop an agreement assuring the child's close and
continuing contact with both parents after the marriage or the domestic
partnership is dissolved. The mediator shall use his or her best
efforts to effect a settlement of the dispute.
(b) Each superior court shall establish a program and rules to
provide for early mediation of cases involving issues relating to
residential time or other matters governed by a parenting plan. Such
rules must address:
(i) The number and length of mediation sessions, which in no case
may be less than one mediation session, and additional sessions as are
deemed appropriate by the mediator or the parties. Each mediation
session must last approximately two to three hours unless mediated
issues are resolved prior to that time;
(ii) Mandatory expertise and training for mediators;
(iii) Limitation of the mediation program to issues relating to
residential time or other matters governed by a parenting plan;
(iv) Standards for determining which issues should be referred to
mediation and timelines for mediation to be concluded; and
(v) Excusal from mediation if the court determines that an
impediment to mediation exists, including family violence, mental or
cognitive impairment, alcohol abuse or chemical dependency, or other
circumstances that may render mediation inappropriate or that would
unreasonably interfere with the mediation process.
(3)(a) Each superior court may make available a mediator. The
court shall use the most cost-effective mediation services that are
readily available unless there is good cause to access alternative
providers. The mediator may be a member of the professional staff of
a family court or mental health services agency, or may be any other
person or agency designated by the court. In order to provide
mediation services, the court is not required to institute a family
court.
(b) Counties may, and to the extent state funding is provided
therefor counties shall, provide both predecree and postdecree
mediation at reduced or waived fee to the parties within one year of
the filing of the dissolution petition.
(((3))) (4)(a) Mediation proceedings under this chapter shall be
governed in all respects by chapter 7.07 RCW, except as follows:
(i) Mediation communications in postdecree mediations mandated by
a parenting plan are admissible in subsequent proceedings for the
limited purpose of proving:
(A) Abuse, neglect, abandonment, exploitation, or unlawful
harassment as defined in RCW 9A.46.020(1), of a child;
(B) Abuse or unlawful harassment as defined in RCW 9A.46.020(1), of
a family or household member as defined in RCW 26.50.010(2); or
(C) That a parent used or frustrated the dispute resolution process
without good reason for purposes of RCW 26.09.184(4)(d).
(ii) If a postdecree mediation-arbitration proceeding is required
pursuant to a parenting plan and the same person acts as both mediator
and arbitrator, mediation communications in the mediation phase of such
a proceeding may be admitted during the arbitration phase, and shall be
admissible in the judicial review of such a proceeding under RCW
26.09.184(4)(e) to the extent necessary for such review to be
effective.
(b) None of the exceptions under (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection
shall subject a mediator to compulsory process to testify except by
court order for good cause shown, taking into consideration the need
for the mediator's testimony and the interest in the mediator
maintaining an appearance of impartiality. If a mediation
communication is not privileged under (a)(i) of this subsection or that
portion of (a)(ii) of this subsection pertaining to judicial review,
only the portion of the communication necessary for the application of
the exception may be admitted, and such admission of evidence shall not
render any other mediation communication discoverable or admissible
except as may be provided in chapter 7.07 RCW.
(((4))) (5) The mediator shall assess the needs and interests of
the child or children involved in the controversy and may interview the
child or children if the mediator deems such interview appropriate or
necessary.
(((5))) (6) Any agreement reached by the parties as a result of
mediation shall be reported to the court and to counsel for the parties
by the mediator on the day set for mediation or any time thereafter
designated by the court.

--- END ---