BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.48.017 and 2010 c 8 s 14011 are each amended to
read as follows:
If a self-insurer unreasonably delays or refuses to pay benefits as
they become due there shall be paid by the self-insurer upon order of
the director an additional amount equal to five hundred dollars or
twenty-five percent of the amount then due, whichever is greater, which
shall ((accrue for the benefit of the claimant and shall)) be paid to
((him or her)) the claimant along with the benefits which may be
assessed under this title. For the purposes of this section, benefits
means any compensation, services, payments, or entitlements due the
claimant under this title, including time loss compensation and medical
services. The director shall issue an order determining whether there
was an unreasonable delay or refusal to pay benefits within thirty days
upon the request of the claimant. Such an order shall conform to the
requirements of RCW 51.52.050.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.52.120 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 37 s 304 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except for claim resolution structured settlement agreements,
it shall be unlawful for an attorney engaged in the representation of
any worker or beneficiary to charge for services in the department any
fee in excess of a reasonable fee, of not more than thirty percent of
the increase in the award secured by the attorney's services. Such
reasonable fee shall be fixed by the director or the director's
designee for services performed by an attorney for such worker or
beneficiary, if written application therefor is made by the attorney,
worker, or beneficiary within one year from the date the final decision
and order of the department is communicated to the party making the
application.
(2) If, on appeal to the board, the order, decision, or award of
the department is reversed or modified and additional relief is granted
to a worker or beneficiary, or in cases where a party other than the
worker or beneficiary is the appealing party and the worker's or
beneficiary's right to relief is sustained by the board, the board
shall fix a reasonable fee for the services of his or her attorney in
proceedings before the board if written application therefor is made by
the attorney, worker, or beneficiary within one year from the date the
final decision and order of the board is communicated to the party
making the application. In fixing the amount of such attorney's fee,
the board shall take into consideration the fee allowed, if any, by the
director, for services before the department, and the board may review
the fee fixed by the director. Any attorney's fee set by the
department or the board may be reviewed by the superior court upon
application of such attorney, worker, or beneficiary. The department
or self-insured employer, as the case may be, shall be served a copy of
the application and shall be entitled to appear and take part in the
proceedings. Where the board, pursuant to this section, fixes the
attorney's fee, it shall be unlawful for an attorney to charge or
receive any fee for services before the board in excess of that fee
fixed by the board.
(3) For claim resolution structured settlement agreements, fees for
attorney services are limited to fifteen percent of the total amount to
be paid to the worker after the agreement becomes final. The board
will also decide on any disputes as to attorneys' fees for services
related to claim resolution structured settlement agreements consistent
with the procedures in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) If, on appeal to the board from a decision or order of the
department denying the reopening of a claim previously resolved with a
structured settlement agreement, denying treatment or payment for
treatment, or segregating a medical condition or conditions as
unrelated to the claim, the decision is reversed or modified and the
relief sought by the claimant is fully or partially awarded, a
reasonable fee for the services of the worker's attorney shall be fixed
by the board, and the board shall order reimbursement for all
reasonable costs of litigation, including but not limited to fees of
the medical and other witnesses. In cases of self-insured employers,
the attorney fees fixed by the board and the costs set by the board
shall be payable directly by the self-insured employer. In all other
cases, the fees and costs shall be paid by the department out of the
administrative fund.
(5) In an appeal to the board involving the presumption established
under RCW 51.32.185, the attorney's fee shall be payable as set forth
under RCW 51.32.185.
(((5))) (6) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to all claims open after
January 1, 2014.

--- END ---