BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.08 RCW
to read as follows:
"Third-party administrator" means any entity that contracts to
administer workers' compensation claims for self-insured employers
qualified under RCW 51.14.020 and certified pursuant to RCW 51.14.030,
or provides claims administration, monitoring, or review for any
employer, and is considered to be an employer representative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.08 RCW
to read as follows:
"Claims management entity" means any individual designated by a
self-insured employer qualified under RCW 51.14.020 and certified
pursuant to RCW 51.14.030 to administer workers' compensation claims
including self-administered organizations and third-party
administrators, or provides claims administration, monitoring, or
review for any employer, and is considered to be an employer
representative.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.08.173 and 1983 c 174 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Self-insurer" or "self-insured employer" means an employer or
group of employers which has been authorized under this title to carry
its own liability to its employees covered by this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to all claims open after
January 1, 2014.

--- END ---