BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the inability to
purchase hearing aids adversely affects hearing-impaired people of all
ages and impacts the employment and educational opportunities of
hearing-impaired children and adults in Washington state by limiting
communication options. To provide these individuals with equal
opportunity and protect the well-being of the population, the
legislature intends to establish insurance coverage provisions for
hearing aids.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
All state purchased health care that provides coverage for
prostheses must include coverage for hearing aids. For coverage to
apply, the hearing aids must be recommended by the patient's physician,
an advanced registered nurse practitioner as authorized by the nursing
care quality assurance commission under chapter 18.79 RCW, or a
physician assistant under chapter 18.71A or 18.57A RCW.
This section does not prevent the application of standard health
plan provisions applicable to prosthesis benefits, such as deductibles,
copayments, medical necessity, quantity limitations, or
preauthorizations. This section does not limit the authority of the
state health care authority to negotiate rates and contract with
specific providers for the delivery of prostheses. The replacement of
hearing aids is limited as follows: Up to one thousand dollars, as
adjusted for inflation annually by the implicit price deflator as
published annually by the federal bureau of labor statistics, every
three years for an adult; full cost every two years for children ages
two through eighteen; and full cost no more than three times a year for
infants and toddlers until age two. This section does not apply to
medicare supplement policies or supplemental contracts covering a
specified disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW
to read as follows:
An insurer that offers to any individual a health benefit plan that
provides coverage for prostheses must include coverage for hearing
aids. For coverage to apply, the hearing aids must be recommended by
the patient's physician, an advanced registered nurse practitioner as
authorized by the nursing care quality assurance commission under
chapter 18.79 RCW, or a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A or
18.57A RCW.
This section does not prevent the application of standard health
plan provisions applicable to prosthesis benefits, such as deductibles,
copayments, medical necessity, quantity limitations, or
preauthorizations. This section does not limit the authority of a
carrier to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the
delivery of prostheses. The replacement of hearing aids is limited as
follows: Up to one thousand dollars, as adjusted for inflation
annually by the implicit price deflator as published annually by the
federal bureau of labor statistics, every three years for an adult;
full cost every two years for children ages two through eighteen; and
full cost no more than three times a year for infants and toddlers
until age two. This section does not apply to medicare supplement
policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or
other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A group insurance contract or blanket disability insurance contract
that provides coverage for prostheses must include coverage for hearing
aids. For coverage to apply, the hearing aids must be recommended by
the patient's physician, and advanced registered nurse practitioner as
authorized by the nursing care quality assurance commission under
chapter 18.79 RCW, or a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A or
18.57A RCW.
This section does not prevent the application of standard health
plan provisions applicable to prosthesis benefits, such as deductibles,
copayments, medical necessity, quantity limitations, or
preauthorizations. This section does not limit the authority of a
carrier to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the
delivery of prostheses. The replacement of hearing aids is limited as
follows: Up to one thousand dollars, as adjusted for inflation
annually by the implicit price deflator as published annually by the
federal bureau of labor statistics, every three years for an adult;
full cost every two years for children ages two through eighteen; and
full cost no more than three times a year for infants and toddlers
until age two. This section does not apply to medicare supplement
policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or
other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
A health care service contractor that provides coverage for
prostheses must include coverage for hearing aids. For coverage to
apply, the hearing aids must be recommended by the patient's physician,
an advanced registered nurse practitioner as authorized by the nursing
care quality assurance commission under chapter 18.79 RCW, or a
physician assistant under chapter 18.71A or 18.57A RCW.
This section does not prevent the application of standard health
plan provisions applicable to prosthesis benefits, such as deductibles,
copayments, medical necessity, quantity limitations, or
preauthorizations. This section does not limit the authority of the
carrier to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the
delivery of prostheses. The replacement of hearing aids is limited as
follows: Up to one thousand dollars, as adjusted for inflation
annually by the implicit price deflator as published annually by the
federal bureau of labor statistics, every three years for an adult;
full cost every two years for children ages two through eighteen; and
full cost no more than three times a year for infants and toddlers
until age two. This section does not apply to medicare supplement
policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or
other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
A health maintenance organization that provides coverage for
prostheses must include coverage for hearing aids. For coverage to
apply, the hearing aids must be recommended by the patient's physician,
an advanced registered nurse practitioner as authorized by the nursing
care quality assurance commission under chapter 18.79 RCW, or a
physician assistant under chapter 18.71A or 18.57A RCW.
This section does not prevent the application of standard health
plan provisions applicable to prosthesis benefits, such as deductibles,
copayments, medical necessity, quantity limitations, or
preauthorizations. This section does not limit the authority of the
carrier to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the
delivery of prostheses. The replacement of hearing aids is limited as
follows: Up to one thousand dollars, as adjusted for inflation
annually by the implicit price deflator as published annually by the
federal bureau of labor statistics, every three years for an adult;
full cost every two years for children ages two through eighteen; and
full cost no more than three times a year for infants and toddlers
until age two. This section does not apply to medicare supplement
policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or
other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---