BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.08 RCW
to read as follows:
A "claim file" means all documents and information regarding the
claim or claimant that is under the control of the department, self-insurer, third-party administrator, claims management entity, or self-insurer's representative, as applicable. "Claim file" includes
information maintained in an electronic format. "Claim file" includes,
but is not limited to, the following: Electronic and other
correspondence sent or received, medical treatment records, medical
examination reports, records reviews, vocational reports, vocational
records, job analyses, all self-insurer forms, investigation requests,
investigation reports, claim notes, phone logs, claim costs, requests
for benefits, and benefit payment documents and information. This
section shall be liberally interpreted to include all records and
information available in administering the claim.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When issuing a payment to an injured worker or beneficiary, the
self-insurer shall simultaneously provide written notice identifying
the specific type of benefit being paid or other specific purpose of
the payment.
(2) When issuing payments of temporary total disability benefits as
provided in RCW 51.32.090, the self-insurer shall provide written
notice to the injured worker of the time period the payment covers, the
daily rate of the payment, and the department claim number under which
the benefits are being paid. Any change in the rate of temporary total
disability benefits shall be accompanied by written notice of the
change and the reason for the change.
(3) When issuing payments of temporary partial disability benefits
as provided in RCW 51.32.090, the self-insurer shall provide written
notice to the injured worker of the time period the payment covers, the
full manner in which the payment was calculated, and the department
claim number under which the benefits are being paid. Any change in
the value of the worker's earning power at the time of injury utilized
to calculate temporary partial disability benefits shall be accompanied
by written notice regarding the change and the reason for the change.
(4) Failure of a self-insurer to comply with this section subjects
the self-insurer to a penalty under RCW 51.48.080. The director shall
issue an order determining whether a violation has occurred within
thirty days of a request by an injured worker.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.14.110 and 2005 c 145 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every self-insurer shall maintain a record of all payments ((of
compensation)) made under this title((.)) to workers, beneficiaries,
medical providers, and other persons or entities. Every self-insurer
shall also maintain a record of all requests for benefits or other
payments submitted pursuant to this title. This information is part of
the claim file.
(2) In the event of a disputed claim, an audit by the department,
or a request by the department, the self-insurer shall ((furnish to the
director all information the self-insurer has in its possession as to
any disputed claim, upon forms approved by the director.
(2))) provide the requested element of the employee's claim file to
the department within fifteen days of receipt of the dispute, notice of
audit, or department request.
(3)(a) The department shall establish an electronic reporting
system for the submission to the department of specified self-insurance
claims data to more effectively monitor the performance of self-insurers and to obtain claims information in an efficient manner.
(b) Self-insurers shall submit claims data electronically in the
format and frequency prescribed by the department.
(c) Electronic submittal to the department of specified claims data
is required to maintain self-insurance certification. The department
shall establish an escalating schedule of penalties for noncompliance
with this requirement, up to and including withdrawal of self-insurance
certification.
(d) Claims data reported to the department electronically by
individual self-insurers are confidential in accordance with RCW
51.16.070 and 51.28.070. The department may publish, for statistical
purposes, aggregated claims data that contain no personal identifiers.
(((3))) (4) The department shall adopt rules to administer this
section.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.32.055 and 2004 c 65 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) One purpose of this title is to restore the injured worker as
nearly as possible to the condition of self-support as an able-bodied
worker. Benefits for permanent disability shall be determined under
the director's supervision, except as otherwise authorized in
subsection (9) of this section, only after the injured worker's
condition becomes fixed.
(2) All determinations of permanent disabilities shall be made by
the department, except as otherwise authorized in subsection (9) of
this section. Either the worker, employer, or self-insurer may make a
request or the inquiry may be initiated by the director or, as
authorized in subsection (9) of this section, by the self-insurer on
the director or the self-insurer's own motion. Determinations shall be
required in every instance where permanent disability is likely to be
present. All medical reports and other pertinent information in the
possession of or under the control of the employer or, if the self-insurer has made a request to the department, in the possession of or
under the control of the self-insurer shall be forwarded to the
director with the request.
(3) A request for determination of permanent disability shall be
examined by the department or, if authorized in subsection (9) of this
section, the self-insurer, and the department shall issue an order in
accordance with RCW 51.52.050 or, in the case of a self-insured
employer, the self-insurer may: (a) Enter a written order,
communicated to the worker and the department self-insurance section in
accordance with subsection (9) of this section, or (b) request the
department to issue an order in accordance with RCW 51.52.050.
(4) The department or, in cases authorized in subsection (9) of
this section, the self-insurer may require that the worker present
himself or herself for a special medical examination by a physician or
physicians selected by the department, and the department or, in cases
authorized in subsection (9) of this section, the self-insurer may
require that the worker present himself or herself for a personal
interview. The costs of the examination or interview, including
payment of any reasonable travel expenses, shall be paid by the
department or self-insurer, as the case may be.
(5) The director may establish a medical bureau within the
department to perform medical examinations under this section.
Physicians hired or retained for this purpose shall be grounded in
industrial medicine and in the assessment of industrial physical
impairment. Self-insurers shall bear a proportionate share of the cost
of the medical bureau in a manner to be determined by the department.
(6) Where a dispute arises from the handling of any claim before
the condition of the injured worker becomes fixed, the worker,
employer, or self-insurer may request the department to resolve the
dispute or the director may initiate an inquiry on his or her own
motion. In any claim where the injured worker's condition has become
fixed, the worker may request the department issue an order containing
a permanent disability determination. In these cases, the department
shall proceed as provided in this section and an order shall issue
within sixty days of receipt of the request and in accordance with RCW
51.52.050.
(7)(a) If a claim (i) is accepted by a self-insurer after June 30,
1986, and before August 1, 1997, (ii) involves only medical treatment
and the payment of temporary disability compensation under RCW
51.32.090 or only the payment of temporary disability compensation
under RCW 51.32.090, (iii) at the time medical treatment is concluded
does not involve permanent disability, (iv) is one with respect to
which the department has not intervened under subsection (6) of this
section, and (v) the injured worker has returned to work with the self-insured employer of record, whether at the worker's previous job or at
a job that has comparable wages and benefits, the claim may be closed
by the self-insurer, subject to reporting of claims to the department
in a manner prescribed by department rules adopted under chapter 34.05
RCW.
(b) All determinations of permanent disability for claims accepted
under this subsection (7) by self-insurers shall be made by the self-insured section of the department under subsections (1) through (4) of
this section.
(c) Upon closure of a claim under (a) of this subsection, the self-insurer shall enter a written order, communicated to the worker and the
department self-insurance section, which contains the following
statement clearly set forth in bold face type: "This order constitutes
notification that your claim is being closed with medical benefits and
temporary disability compensation only as provided, and with the
condition you have returned to work with the self-insured employer. If
for any reason you disagree with the conditions or duration of your
return to work or the medical benefits or the temporary disability
compensation that has been provided, you must protest in writing to the
department of labor and industries, self-insurance section, within
sixty days of the date you received this order."
(8)(a) If a claim (i) is accepted by a self-insurer after June 30,
1990, and before August 1, 1997, (ii) involves only medical treatment,
(iii) does not involve payment of temporary disability compensation
under RCW 51.32.090, and (iv) at the time medical treatment is
concluded does not involve permanent disability, the claim may be
closed by the self-insurer, subject to reporting of claims to the
department in a manner prescribed by department rules adopted under
chapter 34.05 RCW. Upon closure of a claim, the self-insurer shall
enter a written order, communicated to the worker, which contains the
following statement clearly set forth in bold-face type: "This order
constitutes notification that your claim is being closed with medical
benefits only, as provided. If for any reason you disagree with this
closure, you must protest in writing to the Department of Labor and
Industries, Olympia, within 60 days of the date you received this
order. The department will then review your claim and enter a further
determinative order."
(b) All determinations of permanent disability for claims accepted
under this subsection (8) by self-insurers shall be made by the self-insured section of the department under subsections (1) through (4) of
this section.
(9)(a) If a claim: (i) Is accepted by a self-insurer after July
31, 1997; (ii)(A) involves only medical treatment, or medical treatment
and the payment of temporary disability compensation under RCW
51.32.090, and a determination of permanent partial disability, if
applicable, has been made by the self-insurer as authorized in this
subsection; or (B) involves only the payment of temporary disability
compensation under RCW 51.32.090 and a determination of permanent
partial disability, if applicable, has been made by the self-insurer as
authorized in this subsection; (iii) is one with respect to which the
department has not intervened under subsection (6) of this section; and
(iv) concerns an injured worker who has returned to work with the self-insured employer of record, whether at the worker's previous job or at
a job that has comparable wages and benefits, the claim may be closed
by the self-insurer, subject to reporting of claims to the department
in a manner prescribed by department rules adopted under chapter 34.05
RCW.
(b) If a physician or licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner submits a report to the self-insurer that concludes that
the worker's condition is fixed and stable and supports payment of a
permanent partial disability award, and if within fourteen days from
the date the self-insurer mailed the report to the attending or
treating physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner,
the worker's attending or treating physician or licensed advanced
registered nurse practitioner disagrees in writing that the worker's
condition is fixed and stable, the self-insurer must get a supplemental
medical opinion from a provider on the department's approved examiner's
list before closing the claim. In the alternative, the self-insurer
may forward the claim to the department, which must review the claim
and enter a final order as provided for in RCW 51.52.050.
(c) Upon closure of a claim under this subsection (9), the self-insurer shall enter a written order, communicated to the worker and the
department self-insurance section, which contains the following
statement clearly set forth in bold-face type: "This order constitutes
notification that your claim is being closed with such medical benefits
and temporary disability compensation as provided to date and with such
award for permanent partial disability, if any, as set forth below, and
with the condition that you have returned to work with the self-insured
employer. If for any reason you disagree with the conditions or
duration of your return to work or the medical benefits, temporary
disability compensation provided, or permanent partial disability that
has been awarded, you must protest in writing to the Department of
Labor and Industries, Self-Insurance Section, within sixty days of the
date you received this order. If you do not protest this order to the
department, this order will become final."
(d) All determinations of permanent partial disability for claims
accepted by self-insurers under this subsection (9) may be made by the
self-insurer or the self-insurer may request a determination by the
self-insured section of the department. All determinations shall be
made under subsections (1) through (4) of this section.
(10) If the department receives a protest of an order issued by a
self-insurer under subsections (7) through (9) of this section, the
self-insurer's closure order must be held in abeyance. The department
shall review the claim closure action and enter a further determinative
order as provided for in RCW 51.52.050. If no protest is timely filed,
the closing order issued by the self-insurer shall become final and
shall have the same force and effect as a department order that has
become final under RCW 51.52.050.
(11) If within two years of claim closure under subsections (7)
through (9) of this section, the department determines that the self-insurer has made payment of benefits because of clerical error, mistake
of identity, or innocent misrepresentation or the department discovers
a violation of the conditions of claim closure, the department may
require the self-insurer to correct the benefits paid or payable. This
subsection (11) does not limit in any way the application of RCW
51.32.240.
(12) For the purposes of this section, "comparable wages and
benefits" means wages and benefits that are at least ninety-five
percent of the wages and benefits received by the worker at the time of
injury.

Sec. 5 RCW 51.32.195 and 1987 c 290 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
On any industrial injury claim where ((the)) a self-insured
employer or injured worker has requested a determination by the
department, the self-insurer must submit ((all medical reports and any
other specified information not previously submitted)) the claim file
to the department. If the self-insured employer requests a
determination by the department, it shall submit the claim file with
its request. If the injured worker requests a determination by the
department, the self-insured employer shall submit the claim file to
the department within fifteen working days of receiving notice of the
worker's request. When the department requests information from a
self-insurer by certified mail, the self-insurer shall submit ((all
information in its possession concerning a claim)) the claim file or
other information within ((ten)) fifteen working days from the date of
receipt of such certified notice.

Sec. 6 RCW 51.32.240 and 2011 c 290 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Whenever any payment of benefits under this title is made
because of clerical error, mistake of identity, innocent
misrepresentation by or on behalf of the recipient thereof mistakenly
acted upon, or any other circumstance of a similar nature, all not
induced by willful misrepresentation, the recipient thereof shall repay
it and recoupment may be made from any future payments due to the
recipient on any claim with the state fund or self-insurer, as the case
may be. The department or self-insurer, as the case may be, must make
claim for such repayment or recoupment within one year of the making of
any such payment or it will be deemed any claim therefor has been
waived.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this
section, the department may only assess an overpayment of benefits
because of adjudicator error when the order upon which the overpayment
is based is not yet final as provided in RCW 51.52.050 and 51.52.060.
"Adjudicator error" includes the failure to consider information in the
claim file, failure to secure adequate information, or an error in
judgment.
(c) The director, pursuant to rules adopted in accordance with the
procedures provided in the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW, may exercise his or her discretion to waive, in whole or in part,
the amount of any such timely claim where the recovery would be against
equity and good conscience.
(2) Whenever the department or self-insurer fails to pay benefits
because of clerical error, mistake of identity, or innocent
misrepresentation, all not induced by recipient willful
misrepresentation, the recipient may request an adjustment of benefits
to be paid from the state fund or by the self-insurer, as the case may
be, subject to the following:
(a) The recipient must request an adjustment in benefits within one
year from the date of the incorrect payment or it will be deemed any
claim therefore has been waived.
(b) The recipient may not seek an adjustment of benefits because of
adjudicator error. Adjustments due to adjudicator error are addressed
by the filing of a written request for reconsideration with the
department of labor and industries or an appeal with the board of
industrial insurance appeals within sixty days from the date the order
is communicated as provided in RCW 51.52.050. "Adjudicator error"
includes the failure to consider information in the claim file, failure
to secure adequate information, or an error in judgment.
(3) Whenever the department issues an order rejecting a claim for
benefits paid pursuant to RCW 51.32.190 or 51.32.210, after payment for
temporary disability benefits has been paid by a self-insurer pursuant
to RCW 51.32.190(3) or by the department pursuant to RCW 51.32.210, the
recipient thereof shall repay such benefits and recoupment may be made
from any future payments due to the recipient on any claim with the
state fund or self-insurer, as the case may be. The director, under
rules adopted in accordance with the procedures provided in the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, may exercise
discretion to waive, in whole or in part, the amount of any such
payments where the recovery would be against equity and good
conscience.
(4) Whenever any payment of benefits under this title has been made
pursuant to an adjudication by the department or by order of the board
or any court and timely appeal therefrom has been made where the final
decision is that any such payment was made pursuant to an erroneous
adjudication, the recipient thereof shall repay it and recoupment may
be made from any future payments due to the recipient on any claim
whether state fund or self-insured.
(a) The director, pursuant to rules adopted in accordance with the
procedures provided in the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW, may exercise discretion to waive, in whole or in part, the amount
of any such payments where the recovery would be against equity and
good conscience. However, if the director waives in whole or in part
any such payments due a self-insurer, the self-insurer shall be
reimbursed the amount waived from the self-insured employer overpayment
reimbursement fund.
(b) The department shall collect information regarding self-insured
claim overpayments resulting from final decisions of the board and the
courts, and recoup such overpayments on behalf of the self-insurer from
any open, new, or reopened state fund or self-insured claims. The
department shall forward the amounts collected to the self-insurer to
whom the payment is owed. The department may provide information as
needed to any self-insurers from whom payments may be collected on
behalf of the department or another self-insurer. Notwithstanding RCW
51.32.040, any self-insurer requested by the department to forward
payments to the department pursuant to this subsection shall pay the
department directly. The department shall credit the amounts recovered
to the appropriate fund, or forward amounts collected to the
appropriate self-insurer, as the case may be.
(c) If a self-insurer is not fully reimbursed within twenty-four
months of the first attempt at recovery through the collection process
pursuant to this subsection and by means of processes pursuant to
subsection (6) of this section, the self-insurer shall be reimbursed
for the remainder of the amount due from the self-insured employer
overpayment reimbursement fund.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, "recipient" does not include
health service providers whose treatment or services were authorized by
the department or self-insurer.
(e) The department or self-insurer shall first attempt recovery of
overpayments for health services from any entity that provided health
insurance to the worker to the extent that the health insurance entity
would have provided health insurance benefits but for workers'
compensation coverage.
(5)(a) Whenever any payment of benefits under this title has been
induced by willful misrepresentation the recipient thereof shall repay
any such payment together with a penalty of fifty percent of the total
of any such payments and the amount of such total sum may be recouped
from any future payments due to the recipient on any claim with the
state fund or self-insurer against whom the willful misrepresentation
was committed, as the case may be, and the amount of such penalty shall
be placed in the supplemental pension fund. Such repayment or
recoupment must be demanded or ordered within three years of the
discovery of the willful misrepresentation.
(b) For purposes of this subsection (5), it is willful
misrepresentation for a person to obtain payments or other benefits
under this title in an amount greater than that to which the person
otherwise would be entitled. Willful misrepresentation includes:
(i) Willful false statement; or
(ii) Willful misrepresentation, omission, or concealment of any
material fact.
(c) For purposes of this subsection (5), "willful" means a
conscious or deliberate false statement, misrepresentation, omission,
or concealment of a material fact with the specific intent of
obtaining, continuing, or increasing benefits under this title.
(d) For purposes of this subsection (5), failure to disclose a
work-type activity must be willful in order for a misrepresentation to
have occurred.
(e) For purposes of this subsection (5), a material fact is one
which would result in additional, increased, or continued benefits,
including but not limited to facts about physical restrictions, or
work-type activities which either result in wages or income or would be
reasonably expected to do so. Wages or income include the receipt of
any goods or services. For a work-type activity to be reasonably
expected to result in wages or income, a pattern of repeated activity
must exist. For those activities that would reasonably be expected to
result in wages or produce income, but for which actual wage or income
information cannot be reasonably determined, the department shall
impute wages pursuant to RCW 51.08.178(4).
(6) The worker, beneficiary, or other person affected thereby shall
have the right to contest an order assessing an overpayment pursuant to
this section in the same manner and to the same extent as provided
under RCW 51.52.050 and 51.52.060. In the event such an order becomes
final under chapter 51.52 RCW and notwithstanding the provisions of
subsections (1) through (5) of this section, the director, director's
designee, or self-insurer may file with the clerk in any county within
the state a warrant in the amount of the sum representing the unpaid
overpayment and/or penalty plus interest accruing from the date the
order became final. The clerk of the county in which the warrant is
filed shall immediately designate a superior court cause number for
such warrant and the clerk shall cause to be entered in the judgment
docket under the superior court cause number assigned to the warrant,
the name of the worker, beneficiary, or other person mentioned in the
warrant, the amount of the unpaid overpayment and/or penalty plus
interest accrued, and the date the warrant was filed. The amount of
the warrant as docketed shall become a lien upon the title to and
interest in all real and personal property of the worker, beneficiary,
or other person against whom the warrant is issued, the same as a
judgment in a civil case docketed in the office of such clerk. The
sheriff shall then proceed in the same manner and with like effect as
prescribed by law with respect to execution or other process issued
against rights or property upon judgment in the superior court. Such
warrant so docketed shall be sufficient to support the issuance of
writs of garnishment in favor of the department or self-insurer in the
manner provided by law in the case of judgment, wholly or partially
unsatisfied. The clerk of the court shall be entitled to a filing fee
under RCW 36.18.012(10), which shall be added to the amount of the
warrant. A copy of such warrant shall be mailed to the worker,
beneficiary, or other person within three days of filing with the
clerk.
The director, director's designee, or self-insurer may issue to any
person, firm, corporation, municipal corporation, political subdivision
of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state, a notice to
withhold and deliver property of any kind if there is reason to believe
that there is in the possession of such person, firm, corporation,
municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, public
corporation, or agency of the state, property that is due, owing, or
belonging to any worker, beneficiary, or other person upon whom a
warrant has been served for payments due the department or self-insurer. The notice and order to withhold and deliver shall be served
by a method for which receipt can be confirmed or tracked accompanied
by an affidavit of service by mailing or served by the sheriff of the
county, or by the sheriff's deputy, or by any authorized representative
of the director, director's designee, or self-insurer. Any person,
firm, corporation, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the
state, public corporation, or agency of the state upon whom service has
been made shall answer the notice within twenty days exclusive of the
day of service, under oath and in writing, and shall make true answers
to the matters inquired or in the notice and order to withhold and
deliver. In the event there is in the possession of the party named
and served with such notice and order, any property that may be subject
to the claim of the department or self-insurer, such property shall be
delivered forthwith to the director, the director's authorized
representative, or self-insurer upon demand. If the party served and
named in the notice and order fails to answer the notice and order
within the time prescribed in this section, the court may, after the
time to answer such order has expired, render judgment by default
against the party named in the notice for the full amount, plus costs,
claimed by the director, director's designee, or self-insurer in the
notice. In the event that a notice to withhold and deliver is served
upon an employer and the property found to be subject thereto is wages,
the employer may assert in the answer all exemptions provided for by
chapter 6.27 RCW to which the wage earner may be entitled.
This subsection shall only apply to orders assessing an overpayment
which are issued on or after July 28, 1991: PROVIDED, That this
subsection shall apply retroactively to all orders assessing an
overpayment resulting from fraud, civil or criminal.
(7) Orders assessing an overpayment which are issued on or after
July 28, 1991, shall include a conspicuous notice of the collection
methods available to the department or self-insurer.
(8) An order that adjusts a compensation rate or that may affect
benefits, including medical, that have been paid on a claim, must
specifically itemize each overpayment that may result. The order must
include the manner in which the overpayment will be calculated. If the
information is not identified in the order, any subsequent overpayment
based on the deficient order is deemed waived. Such an order is
subject to RCW 51.52.050. This subsection does not apply to
overpayments issued pursuant to RCW 51.32.220.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act applies to all claims open after
January 1, 2014.

--- END ---