BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that it is in the
public interest of the citizens of Washington to encourage the recovery
and reuse of materials, such as metals, that replace the output of
mining and other extractive industries.
(2) The legislature further finds that it is desirable to reduce
the volume of the solid waste stream and resulting burdens on
municipalities.
(3) The legislature further finds that ensuring the proper handling
and recycling of used small rechargeable batteries prevents the release
of certain toxic materials into the environment and removes from the
waste stream certain materials that may present safety concerns if
mishandled.
(4) The legislature further finds that it is important to ensure
that all entities supplying small rechargeable batteries to users in
Washington, whether as stand-alone units or as easily removable
components of products, bear the same battery stewardship obligations.
(5) The legislature further finds that addressing certain existing
and future barriers to implementation of voluntary industry programs to
collect and recycle used small rechargeable batteries will facilitate
these interests.
(6) The legislature further finds that the opportunity exists for
the state of Washington to encourage the continuation of existing
private mechanisms that ensure the proper stewardship of used small
rechargeable batteries, while avoiding any burden on the state for
enforcement responsibilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Battery pack" means an assembly of small rechargeable
batteries, together weighing less than eleven pounds, that are packed
in a container that has a single positive and negative connection.
(2) "Bona fide used small rechargeable battery stewardship program"
or "bona fide program" means a program for the collection,
transportation, recycling, and disposal of used small rechargeable
batteries that meets the criteria set forth in section 5 of this act.
(3) "Easily removable" means readily detachable by a consumer with
the use of common household tools or without the use of tools.
(4) "Manage" means to run or direct the functioning of a bona fide
used small rechargeable battery stewardship program, other than as a
retailer or as a franchisor on behalf of its franchisees, on behalf of
more than one marketer or manufacturer.
(5) "Manager" means a person who conducts activities described in
the definition of manage in this section.
(6) "Manufacture or market" means to perform one of the following
acts, other than as a retailer:
(a) Manufacture, or arrange for the manufacturing of, small
rechargeable batteries or portable rechargeable products sold, offered
for sale, or distributed in Washington under a brand name owned or
licensed by the manufacturer or the person who arranges for
manufacturing;
(b) Package, or arrange for the packaging of, small rechargeable
batteries or portable rechargeable products sold, offered for sale, or
distributed in Washington under a brand name owned or licensed by the
packager or the person who arranges for packaging;
(c) Import into the United States small rechargeable batteries or
portable rechargeable products sold, offered for sale, or distributed
in Washington under a brand name owned or licensed by the importer or
the person who arranges for the importation; or
(d) Otherwise make available to wholesalers or retailers in
Washington small rechargeable batteries either as replacement batteries
or as easily removable components in portable rechargeable products.
(7) "Manufacturer or marketer" means every person who conducts
activities described in the definition of manufacture or market in this
section.
(8) "Nonenrolled battery" means a small rechargeable battery that
is not manufactured or marketed by any person who self-operates,
manages, or participates in a bona fide used small rechargeable battery
stewardship program.
(9) "Participate" means to appoint a manager to act as a
representative to administer a bona fide used small rechargeable
battery stewardship program on one's behalf and to have that
appointment accepted by the manager of the bona fide program.
(10) "Person" means a sole proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, nonprofit corporation or organization, limited liability
company, firm, association, cooperative, or other legal entity located
within or outside Washington.
(11) "Portable rechargeable product" means a product, other than a
medical device as defined in RCW 19.210.010, that is packaged with, or
contains, one or more easily removable small rechargeable batteries at
the time it is sold or offered for sale.
(12) "Retailer" means every person who sells or offers to sell
small rechargeable batteries or portable rechargeable products at
retail through any means including, but not limited to, remote
offerings such as sales outlets, catalogs, or the internet. The term
retailer does not include a person who engages solely in wholesale
transactions with a distributor or manufacturer.
(13) "Self-operate" means to run or direct the functioning of a
bona fide used small rechargeable battery stewardship program as a
retailer or franchisor on behalf of oneself or one's franchisees.
(14) "Self-operator" means a retailer or franchisor who conducts
activities described in the definition of self-operate in this section.
(15) "Small rechargeable battery" means:
(a)(i) Except as described in (b) of this subsection, one or more
voltaic or galvanic cells, together weighing less than eleven pounds,
that are electrically connected to produce electric energy and are
designed to be recharged; or
(ii) Except as described in (b) of this subsection, a battery pack.
(b) "Small rechargeable battery" does not include:
(i) A battery that is not easily removable or is not intended or
designed to be removed from the product, other than by the
manufacturer;
(ii) A battery that contains electrolyte as a free liquid; or
(iii) A battery or battery pack that employs lead acid technology,
unless the battery or battery pack:
(A) Is sealed;
(B) Contains no liquid electrolyte; and
(C) Is intended by its manufacturer or marketer to power a handheld
device or to provide uninterrupted backup electrical power protection
for stationary consumer products or stationary office equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as authorized by subsection (2)
of this section, a person may not sell or make available to a
wholesaler or retailer for sale in Washington a nonenrolled battery,
whether as a replacement battery or as a component of a portable
rechargeable product.
(2) This section does not apply to the activities of a
telecommunications provider for equipment marketed under a brand it
owns that contains small rechargeable batteries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The self-operator or manager of a bona
fide used small rechargeable battery stewardship program that incurs
costs, including incremental administrative and other costs, in excess
of three thousand dollars to collect, transport, and reclaim
nonenrolled batteries collected in Washington may bring a civil action
or actions to recover costs, damages, and fees, as specified in this
section, from any manufacturer or marketer who sold in Washington or
made available to a wholesaler or retailer for sale in Washington those
nonenrolled batteries.
(2) An action under this section may be brought against one or more
defendants.
(3) It is a defense to liability under this section that another
manufacturer or marketer of the allegedly nonenrolled battery self-operates, manages, or participates in a bona fide program.
(4)(a) In any action under this section, the self-operator or
manager may recover from the manufacturer or marketer of nonenrolled
batteries the costs the self-operator or manager incurred in
collecting, handling, recycling, or properly disposing of nonenrolled
batteries that are reasonably identified as having been manufactured or
marketed by the defendant manufacturer or marketer.
(b) In addition to the costs identified in (a) of this subsection,
the self-operator or manager may also recover an amount of damages
equal to no more than three times the costs identified in (a) of this
subsection, plus attorneys' fees and costs of litigation.
(5) An action under this section to recover the costs specified in
this section may be brought in any superior or district court in the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A program for the collection,
transportation, recycling, and disposal of used small rechargeable
batteries is a bona fide used small rechargeable battery stewardship
program for purposes of this chapter if it is either:
(a) A self-operated program that meets the requirements of
subsection (2) of this section and collects used small rechargeable
batteries regardless of brand at all retail locations in Washington at
which the retailer or franchisees sell small rechargeable batteries or
portable rechargeable products; or
(b) A program managed on behalf of more than one participating
manufacturer or marketer that meets the requirements of subsections (2)
and (3) of this section.
(2) All bona fide programs must meet the following operational
conditions:
(a) All used small rechargeable batteries collected by the bona
fide program are handled by the program self-operator or manager in
compliance with all applicable laws and rules and transported only to
lawfully permitted facilities for reclamation of battery constituents;
(b) All contracts with service providers entered into by the bona
fide program self-operator or manager require compliance with all
applicable laws and rules;
(c) All return acceptance, recycling, and other handling services,
including postcollection transportation, are provided free of charge to
consumers;
(d) Education and outreach activities are provided by the bona fide
program to maximize collections and safety, including the offering of
signage to retailers indicating the retailer's support of the bona fide
program and providing instructions and materials to protect collected
used batteries from short circuits;
(e) The bona fide program is open to the public:
(i) For a self-operated program, during all hours the retailer or
franchisor does business; or
(ii) For a program managed on behalf of more than one participating
manufacturer or marketer, during all hours that collection locations
normally do business; and
(f) The following information is provided on the internet:
(i) The name, address, and contact information for its self-operator or manager;
(ii) A description of the methods used to collect, transport, and
account for all used small rechargeable batteries collected that
includes the identification of all sorting and reclamation facilities
to be used through final disposition for sorting and reclamation of all
used small rechargeable batteries collected;
(iii) Identification of locations served by the bona fide program
where Washington residents may take used small rechargeable batteries
and information on what restrictions, if any, will be imposed on the
number of used small rechargeable batteries that may be returned;
(iv) A description of the mechanism by which the bona fide program
will handle inquiries from consumers;
(v) Information regarding education and outreach activities;
(vi) An invitation for consumers to provide comments on the
adequacy and convenience of the bona fide program and instructions on
how to do so;
(vii) A description of material changes to the bona fide program
from previous program activities; and
(viii) An annual report, current as to no later than April 1st of
each year, that identifies:
(A) The bona fide program's funding and recycling success,
including any increase in total batteries collected each year, the cost
of the bona fide program per pound of batteries collected, and the cost
of the bona fide program per Washington resident;
(B) The bona fide program's collections by county and battery
chemistry;
(C) The bona fide program's educational and outreach activities;
(D) The mechanisms employed and the entities involved in the final
disposition of collected materials; and
(E) The methods used to collect, transport, and account for all
used small rechargeable batteries collected, including the
identification of all sorting and reclamation facilities used.
(3) If the bona fide program is not a self-operated program, it
must also meet the following additional operational conditions:
(a) Provide at least one used small rechargeable battery collection
site in each county of the state and in each city or town with a
population greater than ten thousand, which may be the same as the
location in a county;
(b) Include retailer collection of used small rechargeable
batteries regardless of brand at multiple locations;
(c) Provide for the collection of used small rechargeable batteries
regardless of brand from governmental collection facilities;
(d) Include on its internet site:
(i) A collection site locator to assist consumers in finding the
nearest collection site;
(ii) Identification of all small rechargeable battery manufacturers
and marketers that currently are participating in the bona fide
program; and
(iii) Information on how small rechargeable battery manufacturers
and marketers and consumers may seek technical assistance from the bona
fide program; and
(e) Include in its annual report required by subsection
(2)(f)(viii) of this section an independently audited financial
statement, including a breakdown of bona fide program expenses such as
collection, recycling, education, and overhead, unless the bona fide
program is part of a program that also operates in jurisdictions
outside of Washington, in which case funding information and audited
financial statements need not be reported on a Washington-specific
basis, but average bona fide program-wide costs of collection and
overhead must be clearly stated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This chapter is void if a federal law, or a
combination of federal laws, takes effect that establishes a national
program for the collection and recycling of both used nonrechargeable
batteries and used small rechargeable batteries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Nothing in this chapter alters or limits the
authority of the utilities and transportation commission to regulate
collection of solid waste, including curbside collection of residential
recyclable materials, nor does this chapter alter or limit the
authority of a city or town to provide such services itself or by
contract under RCW 81.77.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---