BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 3.58 RCW
to read as follows:
Counties shall provide security to district courts in order to:
(1) Promote the safety and security of all court facilities and
proceedings;
(2) Ensure access to court proceedings as guaranteed by Article 1,
section 10 of the Washington state Constitution; and
(3) Assist judges in carrying out their respective constitutional
and statutory duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 3.50 RCW
to read as follows:
Cities shall provide security to municipal courts in order to:
(1) Promote the safety and security of all court facilities and
proceedings;
(2) Ensure access to court proceedings as guaranteed by Article 1,
section 10 of the Washington state Constitution; and
(3) Assist judges in carrying out their respective constitutional
and statutory duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Cities shall provide security to municipal courts in order to:
(1) Promote the safety and security of all court facilities and
proceedings;
(2) Ensure access to court proceedings as guaranteed by Article 1,
section 10 of the Washington state Constitution; and
(3) Assist judicial officers in carrying out their respective
constitutional and statutory duties.

Sec. 4 RCW 3.58.050 and 1984 c 258 s 38 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county legislative authority shall furnish all necessary
facilities for the district courts, including suitable secure
((courtrooms)) courthouses, furniture, books, stationery, postage,
office equipment, heat, light and telephone and may lease or construct
courtrooms and offices for such purpose. The county legislative
authority shall not be required to furnish courtroom space in any place
other than as provided in the districting plan.

Sec. 5 RCW 3.50.080 and 1984 c 258 s 111 are each amended to read
as follows:
Salaries of municipal court judges shall be fixed by ordinance.
All costs of operating the municipal court, including but not limited
to salaries of judges and court employees, courthouse security,
dockets, books of records, forms, furnishings, and supplies, shall be
paid wholly out of the funds of the city or town. The city shall
provide a suitable place for holding court and pay all expenses of
maintaining it.
All employees of the municipal court shall, for all purposes, be
deemed employees of the city or town. They shall be appointed by and
serve at the pleasure of the court.

Sec. 6 RCW 35.20.120 and 1987 c 202 s 196 are each amended to
read as follows:
All blanks, books, papers, stationery and furniture necessary for
the transaction of business and the keeping of records of the court,
and courthouse security shall be furnished at the expense of the city,
except those expenses incidental to the operation of the court in
matters brought before the court because of concurrent jurisdiction
with the district court, which expense shall be borne by the county and
paid out of the county treasury. All other expenses on account of such
court which may be authorized by the city council or the county
commissioners and which are not specifically mentioned in this chapter,
shall be paid respectively out of the city treasury and county
treasury.

--- END ---