BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city or town that exercises its authority under chapter 7.48
RCW, RCW 35.22.280, 35.23.440, or 35.27.410, or other applicable law to
abate a nuisance must provide prior notice to the property owner that
abatement is pending and a special assessment may be levied on the
property for the expense of abatement. The notice must be sent by
regular mail.
(2) A city or town that exercises its authority under chapter 7.48
RCW, RCW 35.22.280, 35.23.440, or 35.27.410, or other applicable law to
declare a nuisance, abate a nuisance, or impose fines or costs upon
persons who create, continue, or maintain a nuisance may levy a special
assessment on the land or premises where the nuisance is situated to
reimburse the city or town for the expense of abatement. A city or
town must, before levying a special assessment, notify the property
owner and any identifiable mortgage holder that a special assessment
will be levied on the property and the amount of the special
assessment. The notice must be sent by regular mail.
(3) The special assessment authorized by this section constitutes
a lien against the property and is of equal rank with state, county,
and municipal taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city that exercises its authority under chapter 7.48 RCW or
other applicable law to abate a nuisance must provide prior notice to
the property owner that abatement is pending and a special assessment
may be levied on the property for the expense of abatement. The notice
must be sent by regular mail.
(2) A city that exercises its authority under chapter 7.48 RCW or
other applicable law to declare a nuisance, abate a nuisance, or impose
fines or costs upon persons who create, continue, or maintain a
nuisance may levy a special assessment on the land or premises where
the nuisance is situated to reimburse the city for the expense of
abatement. A city must, before levying a special assessment, notify
the property owner and any identifiable mortgage holder that a special
assessment will be levied on the property and the amount of the special
assessment. The notice must be sent by regular mail.
(3) The special assessment authorized by this section constitutes
a lien against the property and is of equal rank with state, county,
and municipal taxes.

--- END ---