BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee must conduct an analysis of the state's expenditures for
advertising, marketing, and related activities. The analysis must
include: (a) An estimate of expenditures by state agencies; (b) a
review of whether agencies have made efforts to measure the
effectiveness of these activities; and (c) identification of potential
measures for evaluating performance through a review of other public
and private entities' efforts at evaluating the effectiveness of
advertising, marketing, and related expenditures. For the purposes of
this section, marketing includes expenditures for public relations
events, promotional items and activities, and public service
announcements, but not expenditures to create and maintain agency web
sites.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2014.

--- END ---