BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.442 and 2012 c 181 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning January 1, 2014, each of the following
professionals certified or licensed under Title 18 RCW shall, at least
once every six years, complete ((a)) training ((program)) in suicide
assessment, treatment, and management that is approved, in rule, by the
relevant disciplining authority:
(i) An adviser or counselor certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(ii) A chemical dependency professional licensed under chapter
18.205 RCW;
(iii) A marriage and family therapist licensed under chapter 18.225
RCW;
(iv) A mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(v) An occupational therapy practitioner licensed under chapter
18.59 RCW;
(vi) A psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW; and
(vii) An advanced social worker or independent clinical social
worker licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW.
(b) The requirements in (a) of this subsection apply to a person
holding a retired active license for one of the professions in (a) of
this subsection.
(c) The training required by this subsection must be at least six
hours in length, unless a disciplinary authority has determined, under
subsection (8)(b) of this section, that training that includes only
screening and referral elements is appropriate for the profession in
question, in which case the training must be at least three hours in
length.
(2)(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection, a
professional listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section must complete
the first training required by this section during the first full
continuing education reporting period after ((June 7, 2012)) January 1,
2014, or the first full continuing education reporting period after
initial licensure or certification, whichever occurs later.
(ii) A professional listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section
applying for initial licensure on or after ((June 7, 2012)) January 1,
2014, may delay completion of the first training required by this
section for six years after initial licensure if he or she can
demonstrate successful completion of ((a six-hour)) the training
((program in suicide assessment, treatment, and management that:
(A) Was completed)) required in subsection (1) of this section no
more than six years prior to the application for initial licensure((;
and
(B) Is listed on the best practices registry of the American
foundation for suicide prevention and the suicide prevention resource
center)).
(3) The hours spent completing ((a)) training ((program)) in
suicide assessment, treatment, and management under this section count
toward meeting any applicable continuing education or continuing
competency requirements for each profession.
(4)(a) A disciplining authority may, by rule, specify minimum
training and experience that is sufficient to exempt a professional
from the training requirements in subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The board of occupational therapy practice may exempt an
occupational ((therapists)) therapy practitioner from the training
requirements of subsection (1) of this section ((by specialty,)) if the
((specialty in question)) occupational therapy practitioner has only
brief or limited patient contact.
(5)(a) The secretary and the disciplining authorities shall work
collaboratively to develop a model list of training programs in suicide
assessment, treatment, and management.
(b) When developing the model list, the secretary and the
disciplining authorities shall:
(i) Consider suicide assessment, treatment, and management training
programs of at least six hours in length listed on the best practices
registry of the American foundation for suicide prevention and the
suicide prevention resource center; and
(ii) Consult with public and private institutions of higher
education, experts in suicide assessment, treatment, and management,
and affected professional associations.
(c) The secretary and the disciplining authorities shall report the
model list of training programs to the appropriate committees of the
legislature no later than December 15, 2013.
(6) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to expand or limit
the scope of practice of any profession regulated under chapter 18.130
RCW.
(7) The secretary and the disciplining authorities affected by this
section shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.
(8) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Disciplining authority" has the same meaning as in RCW
18.130.020.
(b) "Training ((program)) in suicide assessment, treatment, and
management" means ((an)) empirically supported training ((program))
approved by the appropriate disciplining authority that contains the
following elements: Suicide assessment, including screening and
referral, suicide treatment, and suicide management. However, the
disciplining authority may approve ((a)) training ((program)) that
((excludes one of the elements if the element is inappropriate))
includes only screening and referral elements if appropriate for the
profession in question based on the profession's scope of practice.
((A training program that includes only screening and referral elements
shall be at least three hours in length. All other training programs
approved under this section shall be at least six hours in length.))
The board of occupational therapy may also approve training that
includes only screening and referral elements if appropriate for
occupational therapy practitioners based on practice setting.
(9) A state or local government employee is exempt from the
requirements of this section if he or she receives a total of at least
six hours of training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management
from his or her employer every six years. For purposes of this
subsection, the training may be provided in one six-hour block or may
be spread among shorter training sessions at the employer's discretion.
(10) An employee of a community mental health agency licensed under
chapter 71.24 RCW or a chemical dependency program certified under
chapter 70.96A RCW is exempt from the requirements of this section if
he or she receives a total of at least six hours of training in suicide
assessment, treatment, and management from his or her employer every
six years. For purposes of this subsection, the training may be
provided in one six-hour block or may be spread among shorter training
sessions at the employer's discretion.

--- END ---