BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some health
insurers require hundreds of different paper forms for prior
authorization for health care services, creating administrative waste
and inefficiency in the health care delivery system. According to
recent studies, insurer administrative tasks cost billions of dollars
annually, and limit patients' timely access to lifesaving treatments
and medications. The legislature is committed to patient protection,
access to health care services, and eliminating administrative waste.
Thus, it is the intent of the legislature that the process for the
prior authorization of health care services should be standardized by
requiring all payors to utilize one form which shall be available in
paper, online, and electronic formats.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.165 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A payor or any entity acting for a payor under contract, when
requiring prior authorization for a health care service or benefit,
must use and accept only the prior authorization forms or data fields
designated for the specific types of services and benefits developed
under subsection (4) of this section.
(2) A payor or any entity acting for a payor under contract must
respond to a request for prior authorization within two business days
after receiving a completed prior authorization request from a health
care provider on a form or data fields developed under subsection (4)
of this section.
(3) If a payor or any entity acting for a payor under contract
fails to use or accept the required prior authorization form or data
fields after six months from the date of release, or fails to respond
within two business days to a request for prior authorization after
receiving a completed prior authorization request from a health care
provider on a form or data field developed under subsection (4) of this
section, the prior authorization request shall be deemed accepted.
(4) The office of the insurance commissioner must develop and
implement uniform prior authorization forms or data fields for
different health care services and benefits.
(a) The forms and data fields must apply to health care services
and benefits including, but not limited to:
(i) Provider office visits;
(ii) Prescription drug benefits;
(iii) Imaging and other diagnostic testing; and
(iv) Laboratory testing;
(b) All forms and data fields must be developed in consultation
with health care providers licensed under chapter 18.71, 18.57, or
18.64 RCW who are board certified in the specialty to which the forms
or data fields apply and have been actively practicing in that
specialty for a minimum of five years; and
(c) All forms and data fields must be developed and released by the
office of the insurance commissioner by July 1, 2014.
(5) The prior authorization forms developed under subsection (4) of
this section must:
(a) Not exceed two pages;
(b) Be made electronically available; and
(c) Be capable of being electronically accepted by the payor after
being completed.
(6) The office of the insurance commissioner, in developing the
forms and data fields, must:
(a) Seek input from interested stakeholders and seek to use forms
and data fields that have been mutually agreed upon by payors and
providers;
(b) Ensure that the forms are consistent with existing prior
authorization forms established by the federal centers for medicare and
medicaid services; and
(c) Consider other national standards pertaining to electronic
prior authorization.
(7) All payors and any entities acting for a payor under contract
must use the uniform forms or data fields designated by the office of
the insurance commissioner for the specific type of service, and every
payor or any entity acting for a payor under contract must accept the
form as sufficient to request prior authorization for the health care
service or benefit by January 1, 2015.
(8) Nothing in this section:
(a) Prohibits a payor or any entity acting for a payor under
contract from using a prior authorization methodology that uses an
internet web page, internet web page portal, or similar electronic,
internet, and web-based system in lieu of a paper form, provided that
it is consistent with the paper form, developed pursuant to subsection
(4) of this section; and
(b) Limits a health plan from requiring prior authorization for
services.

--- END ---