BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.130.050 and 2008 c 134 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 18.130.062, the disciplining authority
has the following authority:
(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind such rules as are deemed necessary
to carry out this chapter;
(2) To investigate all complaints or reports of unprofessional
conduct as defined in this chapter;
(3) To hold hearings as provided in this chapter;
(4) To issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any
investigation, consideration of an application for license, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;
(5) To take or cause depositions to be taken and use other
discovery procedures as needed in any investigation, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;
(6) To compel attendance of witnesses at hearings;
(7) In the course of investigating a complaint or report of
unprofessional conduct, to conduct practice reviews and to issue
citations and assess fines for failure to produce documents, records,
or other items in accordance with RCW 18.130.230;
(8) To take emergency action ordering summary suspension of a
license, or restriction or limitation of the license holder's practice
pending proceedings by the disciplining authority. Within fourteen
days of a request by the affected license holder, the disciplining
authority must provide a show cause hearing in accordance with the
requirements of RCW 18.130.135. Consistent with RCW 18.130.370, a
disciplining authority shall issue a summary suspension of the license
or temporary practice permit of a license holder prohibited from
practicing a health care profession in another state, federal, or
foreign jurisdiction because of an act of unprofessional conduct that
is substantially equivalent to an act of unprofessional conduct
prohibited by this chapter or any of the chapters specified in RCW
18.130.040. The summary suspension remains in effect until proceedings
by the Washington disciplining authority have been completed;
(9) To conduct show cause hearings in accordance with RCW
18.130.062 or 18.130.135 to review an action taken by the disciplining
authority to suspend a license or restrict or limit a license holder's
practice pending proceedings by the disciplining authority;
(10) To use a presiding officer as authorized in RCW 18.130.095(3)
or the office of administrative hearings as authorized in chapter 34.12
RCW to conduct hearings. ((The)) Disciplining ((authority))
authorities identified in RCW 18.130.040(2) shall make the final
decision regarding disposition of the license unless the disciplining
authority elects to delegate in writing the final decision to the
presiding officer. Disciplining authorities identified in RCW
18.130.040(2)(b) may not delegate the final decision regarding
disposition of the license or imposition of sanctions to a presiding
officer in any case pertaining to standards of practice or where
clinical expertise is necessary, including deciding any motion that
results in dismissal of any allegation contained in the statement of
charges. Presiding officers acting on behalf of the secretary shall
enter initial orders. The secretary may, by rule, provide that initial
orders in specified classes of cases may become final without further
agency action unless, within a specified time period:
(a) The secretary upon his or her own motion determines that the
initial order should be reviewed; or
(b) A party to the proceedings files a petition for administrative
review of the initial order;
(11) To use individual members of the boards to direct
investigations and to authorize the issuance of a citation under
subsection (7) of this section. However, the member of the board shall
not subsequently participate in the hearing of the case;
(12) To enter into contracts for professional services determined
to be necessary for adequate enforcement of this chapter;
(13) To contract with license holders or other persons or
organizations to provide services necessary for the monitoring and
supervision of license holders who are placed on probation, whose
professional activities are restricted, or who are for any authorized
purpose subject to monitoring by the disciplining authority;
(14) To adopt standards of professional conduct or practice;
(15) To grant or deny license applications, and in the event of a
finding of unprofessional conduct by an applicant or license holder, to
impose any sanction against a license applicant or license holder
provided by this chapter. After January 1, 2009, all sanctions must be
issued in accordance with RCW 18.130.390;
(16) To restrict or place conditions on the practice of new
licensees in order to protect the public and promote the safety of and
confidence in the health care system;
(17) To designate individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and
statements of charges;
(18) To establish panels consisting of three or more members of the
board to perform any duty or authority within the board's jurisdiction
under this chapter;
(19) To review and audit the records of licensed health facilities'
or services' quality assurance committee decisions in which a license
holder's practice privilege or employment is terminated or restricted.
Each health facility or service shall produce and make accessible to
the disciplining authority the appropriate records and otherwise
facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall not be
subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action
pursuant to RCW 70.41.200(3).

Sec. 2 RCW 18.130.095 and 2008 c 134 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The secretary, in consultation with the disciplining
authorities, shall develop uniform procedural rules to respond to
public inquiries concerning complaints and their disposition, active
investigations, statement of charges, findings of fact, and final
orders involving a license holder, applicant, or unlicensed person.
The uniform procedural rules adopted under this subsection apply to all
adjudicative proceedings conducted under this chapter and shall include
provisions for establishing time periods for initial assessment,
investigation, charging, discovery, settlement, and adjudication of
complaints, and shall include enforcement provisions for violations of
the specific time periods by the department, the disciplining
authority, and the respondent. A license holder must be notified upon
receipt of a complaint, except when the notification would impede an
effective investigation. At the earliest point of time the license
holder must be allowed to submit a written statement about that
complaint, which statement must be included in the file. Complaints
filed after July 27, 1997, are exempt from public disclosure under
chapter 42.56 RCW until the complaint has been initially assessed and
determined to warrant an investigation by the disciplining authority.
Complaints determined not to warrant an investigation by the
disciplining authority are no longer considered complaints, but must
remain in the records and tracking system of the department.
Information about complaints that did not warrant an investigation,
including the existence of the complaint, may be released only upon
receipt of a written public disclosure request or pursuant to an
interagency agreement as provided in (b) of this subsection.
Complaints determined to warrant no cause for action after
investigation are subject to public disclosure, must include an
explanation of the determination to close the complaint, and must
remain in the records and tracking system of the department.
(b) The secretary, on behalf of the disciplining authorities, shall
enter into interagency agreements for the exchange of records, which
may include complaints filed but not yet assessed, with other state
agencies if access to the records will assist those agencies in meeting
their federal or state statutory responsibilities. Records obtained by
state agencies under the interagency agreements are subject to the
limitations on disclosure contained in (a) of this subsection.
(2) The uniform procedures for conducting investigations shall
provide that prior to taking a written statement:
(a) For violation of this chapter, the investigator shall inform
such person, in writing of: (i) The nature of the complaint; (ii) that
the person may consult with legal counsel at his or her expense prior
to making a statement; and (iii) that any statement that the person
makes may be used in an adjudicative proceeding conducted under this
chapter; and
(b) From a witness or potential witness in an investigation under
this chapter, the investigator shall inform the person, in writing,
that the statement may be released to the license holder, applicant, or
unlicensed person under investigation if a statement of charges is
issued.
(3) Only upon the authorization of a disciplining authority
identified in RCW 18.130.040(2)(b), the secretary, or his or her
designee, may serve as the presiding officer for any disciplinary
proceedings of the disciplining authority authorized under this
chapter. The presiding officer shall not vote on or make any final
decision in cases pertaining to standards of practice or where clinical
expertise is necessary. All functions performed by the presiding
officer shall be subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The secretary, in
consultation with the disciplining authorities, shall adopt procedures
for implementing this subsection.
(4) Upon delegation from the secretary, a presiding officer may
conduct disciplinary proceedings for professions identified in RCW
18.130.040(2)(a). All functions performed by the presiding officer are
subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. Decisions of the presiding officer are
initial decisions subject to review by the secretary. The secretary
shall adopt procedures for implementing this subsection.
(5) The uniform procedural rules shall be adopted by all
disciplining authorities listed in RCW 18.130.040(2), and shall be used
for all adjudicative proceedings conducted under this chapter, as
defined by chapter 34.05 RCW. The uniform procedural rules shall
address the use of a presiding officer authorized in subsections (3)
and (4) of this section to determine and issue decisions on all legal
issues and motions arising during adjudicative proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In all adjudicative proceedings before the secretary or the
department, the secretary may delegate initial decision-making
authority to a presiding officer. The presiding officer shall enter an
initial order pursuant to RCW 34.05.461 subject to the review of the
secretary or his or her designee. Pursuant to RCW 34.05.464, the
secretary may, by rule, provide that initial orders in specified
classes of cases may become final without further agency action unless,
within a specified time period:
(1) The secretary upon his or her own motion determines that the
initial order should be reviewed; or
(2) A party to the proceedings files a petition for administrative
review of the initial order.

Sec. 4 RCW 34.05.425 and 1989 c 175 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in the
discretion of the agency head, the presiding officer in an
administrative hearing shall be:
(a) The agency head or one or more members of the agency head;
(b) If the agency has statutory authority to do so, a person other
than the agency head or an administrative law judge designated by the
agency head to make the final decision and enter the final order;
((or))
(c) One or more administrative law judges assigned by the office of
administrative hearings in accordance with chapter 34.12 RCW; or
(d) A person or persons designated by the secretary of health
pursuant to section 3 of this act.
(2) An agency expressly exempted under RCW 34.12.020(4) or other
statute from the provisions of chapter 34.12 RCW or an institution of
higher education shall designate a presiding officer as provided by
rules adopted by the agency.
(3) Any individual serving or designated to serve alone or with
others as presiding officer is subject to disqualification for bias,
prejudice, interest, or any other cause provided in this chapter or for
which a judge is disqualified.
(4) Any party may petition for the disqualification of an
individual promptly after receipt of notice indicating that the
individual will preside or, if later, promptly upon discovering facts
establishing grounds for disqualification.
(5) The individual whose disqualification is requested shall
determine whether to grant the petition, stating facts and reasons for
the determination.
(6) When the presiding officer is an administrative law judge, the
provisions of this section regarding disqualification for cause are in
addition to the motion of prejudice available under RCW 34.12.050.
(7) If a substitute is required for an individual who becomes
unavailable as a result of disqualification or any other reason, the
substitute must be appointed by the appropriate appointing authority.
(8) Any action taken by a duly appointed substitute for an
unavailable individual is as effective as if taken by the unavailable
individual.

Sec. 5 RCW 34.12.040 and 1981 c 67 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except pursuant to section 3 of this act, whenever a state agency
conducts a hearing which is not presided over by officials of the
agency who are to render the final decision, the hearing shall be
conducted by an administrative law judge assigned under this chapter.
In assigning administrative law judges, the chief administrative law
judge shall wherever practical (1) use personnel having expertise in
the field or subject matter of the hearing, and (2) assign
administrative law judges primarily to the hearings of particular
agencies on a long-term basis.

--- END ---