BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Drug manufacturer" means a facility licensed by the board of
pharmacy under chapter 18.64 RCW that engages in the manufacture of
drugs or devices.
(3) "Drug wholesaler" means a facility licensed by the board of
pharmacy under chapter 18.64 RCW that buys drugs or devices for resale
and distribution to corporations, individuals, or entities other than
consumers.
(4) "Medical facility" means a hospital, pharmacy, nursing home,
boarding home, adult family home, or medical clinic where the
prescription drugs are under the control of a practitioner.
(5) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government,
governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial
entity.
(6) "Pharmacist" means a person licensed by the board of pharmacy
under chapter 18.64 RCW to practice pharmacy.
(7) "Pharmacy" means a facility licensed by the board of pharmacy
under chapter 18.64 RCW in which the practice of pharmacy is conducted.
(8) "Practitioner" has the same meaning as in RCW 69.41.010.
(9) "Prescribing practitioner" means a person authorized to issue
orders or prescriptions for legend drugs as listed in RCW 69.41.030.
(10) "Prescription drugs" has the same meaning as "legend drugs" as
defined in RCW 69.41.010. The term includes cancer drugs and
antirejection drugs. The term does not include controlled substances.
(11) "Supplies" means the supplies necessary to administer
prescription drugs that are donated under the prescription drug
redistribution program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Any practitioner, pharmacist, medical
facility, drug manufacturer, or drug wholesaler may donate prescription
drugs and supplies to a pharmacy for redistribution without
compensation or the expectation of compensation to individuals who meet
the prioritization criteria established in section 4 of this act.
Donations of prescription drugs and supplies may be made on the
premises of a pharmacy that elects to participate in the provisions of
this chapter. A pharmacy that receives prescription drugs or supplies
may distribute the prescription drugs or supplies to another pharmacy,
pharmacist, or prescribing practitioner for use pursuant to the
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 To be eligible for the immunity in section
7 of this act, a person distributing donated prescription drugs under
this chapter must:
(1) Meet all requirements in section 5 of this act and any
applicable rules related to the return or exchange of prescription
drugs or supplies adopted by the board of pharmacy;
(2) Maintain records of any prescription drugs and supplies donated
to the pharmacy and subsequently dispensed by the pharmacy; and
(3) Identify itself to the public as participating in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Pharmacies, pharmacists, and prescribing
practitioners that elect to dispense donated prescription drugs and
supplies under this chapter shall give priority to individuals who are
uninsured and at or below two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level. If an uninsured and low-income individual has not been
identified as in need of available prescription drugs and supplies,
those prescription drugs and supplies may be dispensed to other
individuals expressing need.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Prescription drugs or supplies may be
accepted and dispensed under this chapter if all of the following
conditions are met:
(a) The prescription drug is in:
(i) Its original sealed and tamper-evident packaging; or
(ii) An opened package if it contains single unit doses that remain
intact;
(b) The prescription drug bears an expiration date that is more
than six months after the date the prescription drug was donated;
(c) The prescription drug or supplies are inspected before the
prescription drug or supplies are dispensed by a pharmacist employed by
or under contract with the pharmacy, and the pharmacist determines that
the prescription drug or supplies are not adulterated or misbranded;
(d) The prescription drug or supplies are prescribed by a
practitioner for use by an eligible individual and are dispensed by a
pharmacist; and
(e) Any other safety precautions established by the department have
been satisfied.
(2)(a) If a person who donates prescription drugs or supplies to a
pharmacy under this chapter receives a notice that the donated
prescription drugs or supplies have been recalled, the person shall
notify the pharmacy of the recall.
(b) If a pharmacy that receives and distributes donated
prescription drugs to another pharmacy, pharmacist, or prescribing
practitioner under this chapter receives notice that the donated
prescription drugs or supplies have been recalled, the pharmacy shall
notify the other pharmacy, pharmacist, or prescribing practitioner of
the recall.
(c) If a person collecting or distributing donated prescription
drugs or supplies under this chapter receives a recall notice from the
drug manufacturer or the federal food and drug administration for
donated prescription drugs or supplies, the person shall immediately
remove all recalled medications from stock and comply with the
instructions in the recall notice.
(3) Prescription drugs and supplies donated under this chapter may
not be resold.
(4) Prescription drugs and supplies dispensed under this chapter
shall not be eligible for reimbursement of the prescription drug or any
related dispensing fees by any public or private health care payer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department must adopt rules
establishing forms and procedures to reasonably verify eligibility and
prioritize patients seeking to receive donated prescription drugs and
supplies. A patient's eligibility may be determined by a form signed
by the patient certifying that the patient is uninsured and at or below
two hundred percent of the federal poverty level.
(2) The department may establish any other rules necessary to
implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A drug manufacturer acting in good faith
may not, in the absence of a finding of gross negligence, be subject to
criminal prosecution or liability in tort or other civil action, for
injury, death, or loss to person or property for matters relating to
the donation, acceptance, or dispensing of a drug manufactured by the
drug manufacturer that is donated by any person under the program
including, but not limited to, liability for failure to transfer or
communicate product or consumer information or the expiration date of
the donated prescription drug.
(2) Any person or entity, other than a drug manufacturer subject to
subsection (1) of this section, acting in good faith in donating,
accepting, or distributing prescription drugs under this chapter is
immune from criminal prosecution, professional discipline, or civil
liability of any kind for any injury, death, or loss to any person or
property relating to such activities other than acts or omissions
constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
(3) The immunity provided under subsection (1) of this section does
not absolve a drug manufacturer of a criminal or civil liability that
would have existed but for the donation, nor does such donation
increase the liability of the drug manufacturer in such an action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Access to prescription drugs and supplies
under this chapter is subject to availability. Nothing in this chapter
establishes an entitlement to receive prescription drugs and supplies
through the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Nothing in this chapter restricts the use of
samples by a practitioner during the course of the practitioner's
duties at a medical facility or pharmacy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Nothing in this chapter authorizes the
resale of prescription drugs by any person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 69 RCW.

--- END ---