BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 2.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may not be elected or appointed to the office of judge
of the superior court unless he or she is a qualified voter in a county
served by that superior court.
(2) Superior court judges who have been elected or appointed as of
the effective date of this section may serve the remainder of their
current term of office, regardless of their status as a qualified voter
in a county served by the superior court for which they were elected or
appointed.

--- END ---