BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.24.020 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 23 s 14 are each
amended to read as follows:
The commissioner may compromise any claim for contributions,
interest, or penalties due and owing from an employer, and any amount
owed by an individual because of benefit overpayments((, whether
reduced to judgment or otherwise,)) existing or arising under this
title in any case where collection of the full ((claim, in the case of
contributions, interest, or penalties, would result in the insolvency
of the employing unit or individual from whom such contributions,
interest, or penalties are claimed, and any case where collection of
the full amount of benefit overpayments made to an individual)) amount
due and owing, whether reduced to judgment or otherwise, would be
against equity and good conscience.
Whenever a compromise is made by the commissioner in the case of a
claim for contributions, interest, or penalties, whether reduced to
judgment or otherwise, there shall be placed on file in the office of
the unemployment compensation division a statement of the amount of
contributions, interest, and penalties imposed by law and claimed due,
attorneys' fees and costs, if any, a complete record of the compromise
agreement, and the amount actually paid in accordance with the terms of
the compromise agreement. Whenever a compromise is made by the
commissioner in the case of a claim of a benefit overpayment, whether
reduced to judgment or otherwise, there shall be placed on file in the
office of the unemployment compensation division a statement of the
amount of the benefit overpayment, attorneys' fees and costs, if any,
a complete record of the compromise agreement, and the amount actually
paid in accordance with the terms of the compromise agreement.
If any such compromise is accepted by the commissioner, within such
time as may be stated in the compromise or agreed to, such compromise
shall be final and conclusive and except upon showing of fraud or
malfeasance or misrepresentation of a material fact the case shall not
be reopened as to the matters agreed upon. In any suit, action, or
proceeding, such agreement or any determination, collection, payment,
adjustment, refund, or credit made in accordance therewith shall not be
annulled, modified, set aside, or disregarded.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 1 of this act takes effect January
1, 2013.

--- END ---