BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.
(1) "Non-United States insurer" means an insurer organized under
the laws of a foreign country. It also means an "alien insurer," which
is defined in RCW 48.05.010.
(2) "United States branch" means the business unit through which
business is transacted within the United States by a non-United States
insurer and the assets and liabilities of the insurer within the United
States pertaining to such business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This chapter and RCW 48.05.090(1)(b) apply
to a United States branch using this state as a state of entry to
transact insurance in the United States. The United States branch is
also subject to all state laws applicable to an insurer domiciled in
this state unless otherwise provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A non-United States insurer may use this
state as a state of entry to transact insurance in the United States
through a United States branch by:
(a) Qualifying as an insurer licensed to do business in this state;
and
(b) Establishing a trust account, pursuant to a trust agreement
approved by the commissioner with a United States bank approved by the
commissioner, in an amount at least equal to the minimum capital and
surplus or authorized control level risk-based capital, whichever is
greater, required to be maintained by a domestic insurer licensed to do
the same kind of insurance.
(2) Before authorizing the entry through this state of a United
States branch of any non-United States insurer, the commissioner shall
require the non-United States insurer, in addition to the requirements
of section 5 of this act and any other requirement of the insurance
code to submit:
(a) A copy of its charter and bylaws, if any, currently in force,
and such other documents necessary to show the kinds of business that
it is empowered to do in its domiciliary jurisdiction, attested to as
accurate and complete by the insurance supervisory official in its home
jurisdiction, and a full statement, subscribed and affirmed as true
under the penalties of perjury by two officers or equivalent
responsible representatives in such manner as the commissioner
prescribes, of its financial conditions as of the close of its latest
fiscal year, showing its assets, liabilities, income disbursements,
business transacted and other facts required to be shown in its annual
statement, as reported to the insurance supervisory official in its
home jurisdiction; an English language translation, as necessary, of
any of the documents required in this section; and
(b) To an examination of the insurer's affairs at its principal
office within the United States. However, the commissioner may instead
accept a report of the insurance supervisory official of the insurer's
home jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The assets in the trust account are known as
"trusteed assets" and must at all times be in an amount equal to the
United States branch's reserves and other liabilities plus the minimum
capital and surplus or authorized control level risk-based capital,
whichever is greater, required to be maintained by a domestic insurer
licensed to do the same kind of insurance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The deed of trust and all amendments
thereto must be authenticated in the form and manner as the
commissioner prescribes and are not effective unless approved by the
commissioner upon a finding that:
(a) A deed of trust or its amendments are sufficient in form and in
conformity with law;
(b) The trustee or trustees are eligible as such; and
(c) The deed of trust is adequate to protect the interests of the
beneficiaries of the trust.
(2) If at any time the commissioner finds, after reasonable notice
and hearing, that the requisites for the approval no longer exist, the
commissioner may withdraw approval.
(3) The commissioner may from time to time approve modifications
of, or variations in any deed of trust, which in the commissioner's
judgment are not prejudicial to the interests of the people of this
state or the United States policyholders and creditors of the United
States branch.
(4)(a) The deed of trust must contain provisions that:
(i) Vest legal title to trusteed assets in the trustees, and their
successors lawfully appointed;
(ii) Require that all assets deposited in the trust must be
continuously kept within the United States;
(iii) Provide for substitution of a new trustee or trustees in case
of a vacancy by death, resignation or otherwise, subject to the
approval of the commissioner;
(iv) Require that the trustee or trustees shall continuously
maintain a record at all times sufficient to identify the assets of
such a fund;
(v) Require that the trusteed assets must consist of cash and/or
investments eligible for investment of the funds of domestic insurers
and accrued interest thereon if collectable by the trustee;
(vi) Require that the trust must be for the exclusive benefit,
security, and protection of the policyholders, or policyholders and
creditors, of the United States branch in the United States and that it
must be maintained as long as there is outstanding any liability of the
non-United States insurer arising out of its insurance transactions in
the United States; and
(vii) Provide, in substance, that no withdrawals of assets, other
than income as specified in (b) of this subsection may be made or
permitted by the trustee or trustees without the approval of the
commissioner except to:
(A) Make deposits required by law in any state for the security or
benefit of all policyholders, or policyholders and creditors, of the
United States branch in the United States;
(B) Substitute other assets permitted by law and at least equal in
value and quality to those withdrawn, upon the specific written
direction of the United States manager when duly empowered and acting
pursuant to either general or specific written authority previously
given or delegated by the board of directors; or
(C) Transfer such assets to an official liquidator or rehabilitator
pursuant to an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
(b) The deed of trust may provide that income, earnings, dividends,
or interest accumulations of the assets of the fund may be paid over to
the United States manager of the United States branch upon request,
provided that the total trusteed assets are not less than the amount
required to be maintained pursuant to section 4 of this act.
(5) Upon withdrawal of trusteed assets deposited in another state
in which the insurer is authorized to do business, it is sufficient if
the deed of trust requires similar written approval of the insurance
supervising official of that state in lieu of approval of the
commissioner provided that the total trusteed assets are not then less
than the amount required to be maintained pursuant to section 4 of this
act. In all such cases, the United States branch shall notify the
commissioner in writing of the nature and extent of the withdrawal.
(6) The commissioner may from time to time:
(a) Make examinations of the trusteed assets of any authorized
United States branch at the insurer's expense; and
(b) Require the trustee or trustees to file a statement, in the
form the commissioner prescribes, certifying the assets of the trust
fund and the amounts thereof.
(7) Refusal or neglect of any trustee to comply with the
requirements of this section is ground for the revocation of the
insurer's license or the liquidation of its United States branch.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) In addition to other requirements of
this chapter, every authorized United States branch must, not later
than the first day of March in each year and the fifteenth day of the
second month after the end of each of the first three calendar year
quarters, file with the national association of insurance
commissioners:
(a) Annual and quarterly statements of the business transacted
within the United States and the assets held by or for it within the
United States for the protection of policyholders and creditors within
the United States, and of the liabilities incurred against such assets.
The forms must not contain any statement in regard to its assets and
business elsewhere. The statements must be in the same format required
of an insurer domiciled in the United States branch's state of entry
state and licensed to write the same kinds of insurance; and
(b) A statement of trusteed surplus, in such form as the
commissioner prescribes, as of the end of the same period covered by
the statement filed pursuant to this subsection. The aggregate value
of the insurer's general state deposits and trusteed assets deposited
with a trustee in compliance with section 5 of this act, plus accrued
investment income thereon where such interest is collected by the
states for trustees, less the aggregate net amount of all of its
reserves and other liabilities in the United States as determined in
accordance with this section are known as its "trusteed surplus" in the
United States. In determining the net amount of the United States
branch's liabilities in the United States to be reported in the
statement of trusteed surplus, the United States branch shall make
adjustments to total liabilities reported on the accompanying annual or
quarterly statement as follows:
(i) Add back liabilities used to offset admitted assets reported in
the accompanying quarterly or annual statement; and
(ii) Deduct:
(A) Unearned premiums on agent's balances or uncollected premiums
not more than ninety days past due;
(B) Reinsurance on losses with authorized insurers, less unpaid
reinsurance premiums;
(C) Reinsurance recoverables on paid losses from unauthorized
insurers that are included as an asset in the annual statement, but
only to the extent a liability for such unauthorized recoverables is
included in the liabilities report in the trusteed surplus statement;
(D) Special state deposits held for the exclusive benefit of
policyholders, or policyholders and creditors, of any particular state
not exceeding net liabilities reports for that state;
(E) Secured accrued retrospective premiums;
(F) If a life insurer:
(I) The amount of its policy loans to policyholders within the
United States, not exceeding the amount of legal reserve required on
each such policy; and
(II) The net amount of uncollected and deferred premiums; and
(G) Any other nontrusteed asset which the commissioner determines
secures liabilities in a substantially similar manner; and
(c) Any additional information that the commissioner requires
relating to the total business or assets, or any portion thereof, of
the non-United States insurer.
(2) The annual statement and trusteed surplus statement must be
signed and verified by the United States manager, attorney-in-fact, or
a duly empowered assistant United States manager, of the United States
branch. The items of securities and other property held under trust
deeds must be certified in the trusteed surplus statement by the United
States trustee or trustees.
(3) Every report on examination of a United States branch must
include a trusteed surplus statement as of the date of examination in
addition to the general statement of the financial condition of the
United States branch.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Before issuing any new or renewal
license to any United States branch, the commissioner may require
satisfactory proof, either in the non-United States insurer's charter
or by an agreement evidenced by a duly certified resolution of its
board of directors, or otherwise as the commissioner requires, that the
insurer will not engage in any insurance business in contravention of
this section or not authorized by its charter.
(2) The commissioner must issue a renewal license to any United
States branch if satisfied, by such proof as required, that the insurer
is not delinquent with respect to any requirement imposed by this
chapter and that its continuance in business in this state will not be
hazardous or prejudicial to the best interests of the people of this
state.
(3) A United States branch must not be licensed to do in this state
any kind of insurance business, or any combination of kinds of
insurance business, that are not permitted to be done by domestic
insurers licensed under this chapter. A United States branch must not
be authorized to do any insurance business in this state if it does
anywhere within the United States any kind of business other than an
insurance business and the business necessarily or properly incidental
to the kind or kinds of insurance business that it is authorized to do
in this state.
(4) Except as otherwise specifically provided, a United States
branch, entering through this state or another state, may not be or
continue to be authorized to do an insurance business in this state if
it fails to comply substantially with any requirement or limitation of
this chapter, applicable to similar domestic insurers organized after
the effective date of this section, that in the judgment of the
commissioner is reasonably necessary to protect the interest of the
policyholders.
(5) A United States branch that does outside of this state any kind
or combination of kinds of insurance business not permitted to be done
in this state by similar domestic insurers organized after the
effective date of this section, may not be or continue to be authorized
to do an insurance business in this state, unless in the judgment of
the commissioner the doing of such kind or combination of kinds of
insurance business will not be prejudicial to the best interests of the
people of this state.
(6) A United States branch may not be or continue to be authorized
to do an insurance business in this state if it fails to keep full and
correct entries of its transactions, that must at all times be open to
the inspection of persons invested by law with the rights of inspection
and be maintained in its principal office within this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Whenever it appears to the commissioner from
any annual or quarterly statement or trusteed surplus statement or any
other report that a United States branch's trusteed surplus is reduced
below minimum capital and surplus or the authorized control level risk-based capital, whichever is greater, required to be maintained by a
domestic insurer licensed to transact the same kinds of insurance, the
commissioner may proceed against the insurer pursuant to chapter 48.31
RCW as an insurer whose condition is such that its further transaction
of business in the United States will be hazardous to its
policyholders, its creditors, or the public in the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 All trusts of trusteed assets created before
January 1, 2015, must be continued under the instruments creating those
trusts. If the commissioner determines that the instruments are
inconsistent with this chapter, the insurer must correct those
inconsistencies within six months of the commissioner's determination.

Sec. 10 RCW 48.05.090 and 1949 c 190 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An alien insurer ((shall)) must not be authorized to transact
insurance in this state unless it maintains within the United States
assets in amount not less than its outstanding liabilities arising out
of its insurance transactions in the United States, nor unless it
maintains a trust deposit in an amount not less than the required
reserves under its policies resulting from such transactions (after
deducting, in the case of a life insurer, the amount of outstanding
policy loans on such policies) plus assets equal to the larger of the
following sums:
(a) The largest amount of deposit required under this title to be
made in this state by any type of domestic insurer transacting like
kinds of insurance; or
(b) ((Two hundred thousand dollars.)) The minimum capital and
surplus or the authorized control level risk-based capital, whichever
is greater, required to be maintained by a domestic insurer licensed to
transact the same kinds of insurance. Except an alien insurer, until
December 31, 2017, using a state of entry other than this state that is
authorized in this state prior to the effective date of this section is
permitted to maintain only the trust deposit required by its state of
entry as long as it remains continuously authorized in this state.
(2) The trust deposit ((shall)) must be for the security of all
policyholders or policyholders and obligees of the insurer in the
United States. It ((shall)) must not be subject to diminution below
the amount currently determined in accordance with subsection (1) of
this section so long as the insurer has outstanding any liabilities
arising out of its business transacted in the United States.
(3) The trust deposit ((shall)) must be maintained with public
depositaries or trust institutions within the United States approved by
the commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 48.35.010 (Application -- Definition) and 1991 c 268 s 1;
(2) RCW 48.35.020 (Deposit required -- Amount) and 1991 c 268 s 2;
(3) RCW 48.35.030 (Deposit required -- Duration) and 1991 c 268 s 4;
(4) RCW 48.35.040 (Trusts created before May 17, 1991) and 1991 c
268 s 3;
(5) RCW 48.35.050 (Alien insurer -- State authorization required) and
1991 c 268 s 6;
(6) RCW 48.35.060 (Trusteed assets -- Creation -- Commissioner's
approval of trust agreement) and 1991 c 268 s 5;
(7) RCW 48.35.070 (Trust agreement -- Amendment) and 1991 c 268 s 7;
(8) RCW 48.35.080 (Trust agreement -- Withdrawal of commissioner's
approval) and 1991 c 268 s 8;
(9) RCW 48.35.090 (Trust agreement -- Vesting of trusteed assets) and
1991 c 268 s 9;
(10) RCW 48.35.100 (Trusteed assets -- Trustee's records) and 1991 c
268 s 10;
(11) RCW 48.35.110 (Trusteed assets -- Trustee's statements--Commissioner's approval) and 1991 c 268 s 11;
(12) RCW 48.35.120 (Trusteed assets -- Examination -- Commissioner's
approval of assignment or transfer) and 1991 c 268 s 12;
(13) RCW 48.35.130 (Trusteed assets -- Commissioner's approval of
withdrawals) and 1991 c 268 s 13;
(14) RCW 48.35.140 (Trusteed assets -- Substitution of trustee) and
1991 c 268 s 14;
(15) RCW 48.35.150 (Trusteed assets -- Compensation and expenses of
trustees) and 1991 c 268 s 15;
(16) RCW 48.35.160 (United States manager -- Mexican or Canadian
insurers) and 1991 c 268 s 16;
(17) RCW 48.35.170 (Domestication of alien insurer -- Commissioner's
approval) and 1991 c 268 s 17;
(18) RCW 48.35.180 (Domestication agreement -- Necessary
authorization) and 1991 c 268 s 18;
(19) RCW 48.35.190 (Domestication agreement -- Commissioner's
approval of corporate proceedings) and 1991 c 268 s 19; and
(20) RCW 48.35.200 (Domestication -- When effective -- Deposits--Transfer of assets) and 1991 c 268 s 20.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 9 of this act are each
added to chapter 48.35 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act takes effect January 1, 2015.

--- END ---