BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.02.050 and 2011 c 298 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The legislature hereby directs the full participation by the
following agencies)) Each of the following agencies must fully
participate in the implementation of this chapter:
(1) Department of agriculture;
(2) Secretary of state;
(3) Department of social and health services;
(4) Department of revenue;
(5) Department of fish and wildlife;
(6) Employment security department;
(7) Department of labor and industries;
(8) ((Department of commerce;
(9))) Liquor control board;
(((10))) (9) Department of health;
(((11))) (10) Department of licensing;
(((12) Parks and recreation commission;
(13))) (11) Utilities and transportation commission; ((and
(14))) (12) Board of accountancy;
(13) Department of archaeology and historic preservation;
(14) Department of early learning;
(15) Department of ecology;
(16) Department of financial institutions;
(17) Department of transportation;
(18) Gambling commission;
(19) Horse racing commission;
(20) Office of the insurance commissioner;
(21) State lottery;
(22) Student achievement council;
(23) Washington state patrol;
(24) Workforce training and education coordinating board; and
(25) Other agencies as determined by the governor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Each agency required to fully participate in the
implementation of this chapter under RCW 19.02.050 must provide the
department with the name of the agency's coordinator for the purposes
of implementing the requirements of this section. Using a format
designated by the department, each agency must provide the department
with the following information:
(i) A listing of each business license issued by the agency;
(ii) A description of the persons and specific activities for which
the license is required;
(iii) The time period for which the license is issued and any
issuance, renewal, or reissuance requirements; and
(iv) Other information the department determines necessary to
implement this section, including links to the licensing information,
application, and instructions on the agency's web site, if available.
(b) An agency that issues licenses in accordance with (i) national
or federal mandates, requirements, or standards; or (ii) educational
standards and an examination, may alternatively comply with this
chapter by providing the department with a link to its licensing web
site, summary information about the licensing requirements or standards
in a format or formats designated by the department, and a designated
agency contact.
(2) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, each agency, by November 1st of each year, beginning November
1, 2013, must provide the department with certification on a form
designated by the department that all business licensing information
submitted by the agency is complete and up-to-date. If an agency has
not submitted all the business licensing information required under
this section, the agency must instead submit a progress report and
explanation to the department.
(3) The department must compile the information submitted by each
agency, and submit an aggregate report to the governor and the economic
development committees of the legislature by January 1st of each year,
beginning January 1, 2014.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.02.030 and 2011 c 298 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is located within the department a business license
center.
(2) The duties of the center include:
(a) Developing and administering a computerized one-stop master
license system capable of storing, retrieving, and exchanging license
information with due regard to privacy statutes, as well as issuing and
renewing master licenses in an efficient manner;
(b) Providing a license information service detailing requirements
to establish or engage in business in this state;
(c) Providing for staggered master license renewal dates;
(d) Identifying types of licenses appropriate for inclusion in the
master license system;
(e) Recommending in reports to the governor and the legislature the
elimination, consolidation, or other modification of duplicative,
ineffective, or inefficient licensing or inspection requirements; and
(f) Incorporating licenses into the master license system. Both
the regulatory agency legally authorized to issue the license and the
department must agree that the license will be issued through the
master license system in order for the license to be incorporated.
(3) The department may adopt under chapter 34.05 RCW such rules as
may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

--- END ---