BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 69.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any city, code city, town, or county may, through its local
legislative authority, choose to regulate genetically modified
organisms consistent with this section. It is within the jurisdiction
of the local legislative authority to determine the parameters of
regulation, which may include the production, use, advertising, sale,
distribution, storage, transportation, formulation, packaging,
labeling, certification, registration, propagation, cultivation,
raising, or growing of genetically modified organisms consistent with
the provisions of this section. Nothing in this section requires a
city, code city, town, or county to regulate genetically modified
organisms.
(2) A city, code city, town, or county that chooses to regulate
genetically modified organisms may define genetically modified
organisms in a way other than as defined in subsection (5) of this
section and may exempt certain activities from regulation.
(3) A city, code city, town, or county that chooses to regulate
genetically modified organisms may establish the terms of violation and
penalties for violation.
(4) Nothing in this section authorizes or empowers a city, code
city, town, or county from adopting or enforcing an ordinance or other
local policy that is less stringent than any laws of statewide
applicability in existence at the time when the local policy is adopted
or that is adopted for statewide applicability after the local
adoption.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Genetically modified" means an organism, with the exception of
human beings, in which genetic material has been altered in a way that
does not occur naturally either by mating or natural recombination, or
both.
(b) "Organisms" means any biological entity capable of replication
or transferring genetic material.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Any city or town ordinance regarding genetically modified
organisms, as those terms are defined in section 1 of this act, must be
consistent with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Any code city ordinance regarding genetically modified organisms,
as those terms are defined in section 1 of this act, must be consistent
with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Any county ordinance regarding genetically modified organisms, as
those terms are defined in section 1 of this act, must be consistent
with section 1 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 69.04.730 and 1947 c 25 s 91 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except for regulations under section 1 of this act, the authority
to ((promulgate regulations)) adopt rules for the efficient enforcement
of this chapter is hereby vested in the director: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That the director shall designate the Washington state board of
pharmacy to carry out all the provisions of this chapter pertaining to
drugs and cosmetics, with authority to ((promulgate regulations)) adopt
rules for the efficient enforcement thereof.

Sec. 6 RCW 69.04.761 and 1963 c 198 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except for regulations under section 1 of this act, the director
shall hold a public hearing upon a proposal to ((promulgate)) adopt any
new or amended ((regulation)) rule under this chapter. The procedure
to be followed concerning such hearings shall comply in all respects
with chapter 34.05 RCW (administrative procedure act) as now enacted or
hereafter amended.

Sec. 7 RCW 69.04.880 and 1991 c 162 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except for violations of section 1 of this act, whenever the
director finds that a person has committed a violation of a provision
of this chapter, the director may impose upon and collect from the
violator a civil penalty not exceeding one thousand dollars per
violation per day. Each and every such violation shall be a separate
and distinct offense. Imposition of the civil penalty shall be subject
to a hearing in conformance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

--- END ---