BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.42 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to provide cities and towns
with the local option to permit static digital outdoor advertising
signs along state highways. The legislature finds that, in addition to
providing advertising, static digital outdoor advertising signs can
enhance the state's emergency messaging capabilities and expand the
state's missing person computerized network without any cost to the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.42 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to preempt any local
ordinances or restrictions relating to Type 4 and 5 outdoor advertising
signs. Additionally, nothing in this chapter may be construed as
prohibiting any municipality from imposing stricter limitations than
those set forth in this chapter. Prior to the issuance of a state
permit for a Type 4 or 5 digital outdoor advertising sign, the
applicant must provide evidence of approval or pending approval from
the local municipality with proper jurisdiction.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.42.062 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 271 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
Signs within six hundred and sixty feet of the nearest edge of the
right-of-way which are visible from the main traveled way of the
primary system within commercial and industrial areas and whose size,
lighting, and spacing are consistent with the customary use of property
for the effective display of outdoor advertising as set forth in this
section may be erected and maintained: PROVIDED, That this section
shall not serve to restrict type 3 signs located along any portion of
the primary system within an incorporated city or town or within any
commercial or industrial area.
(1) General: Signs shall not be erected or maintained which (a)
imitate or resemble any official traffic sign, signal, or device; (b)
are erected or maintained upon trees or painted or drawn upon rocks or
other natural features and which are structurally unsafe or in
disrepair; or (c) have any visible moving parts.
(2) Size of signs:
(a) The maximum area for any one sign shall be six hundred seventy-two square feet with a maximum height of twenty-five feet and maximum
length of fifty feet inclusive of any border and trim but excluding the
base or apron, supports and other structural members: PROVIDED, That
cut-outs and extensions may add up to twenty percent of additional sign
area.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, double-faced, back-to-back, or V-type signs shall be considered as two signs.
(c) Signs which exceed three hundred twenty-five square feet in
area may not be double-faced (abutting and facing the same direction).
(3) Spacing of signs:
(a) Signs may not be located in such a manner as to obscure, or
otherwise physically interfere with the effectiveness of an official
traffic sign, signal, or device, obstruct or physically interfere with
the driver's view of approaching, merging, or intersecting traffic.
(b) On limited access highways established pursuant to chapter
47.52 RCW no two signs shall be spaced less than one thousand feet
apart, and no sign may be located within three thousand feet of the
center of an interchange, a safety rest area, or information center, or
within one thousand feet of an intersection at grade. Double-faced
signs shall be prohibited. Not more than a total of five sign
structures shall be permitted on both sides of the highway per mile.
(c) On noncontrolled access highways inside the boundaries of
incorporated cities and towns not more than a total of four sign
structures on both sides of the highway within a space of six hundred
sixty feet shall be permitted with a minimum of one hundred feet
between sign structures. In no event, however, shall more than four
sign structures be permitted between platted intersecting streets or
highways. On noncontrolled access highways outside the boundaries of
incorporated cities and towns minimum spacing between sign structures
on each side of the highway shall be five hundred feet.
(d) For the purposes of this subsection, a back-to-back sign and a
V-type sign shall be considered one sign structure.
(e) Official signs, and signs advertising activities conducted on
the property on which they are located shall not be considered in
determining compliance with the above spacing requirements. The
minimum space between structures shall be measured along the nearest
edge of the pavement between points directly opposite the signs along
each side of the highway and shall apply to signs located on the same
side of the highway.
(4) Lighting: Signs may be illuminated, subject to the following
restrictions:
(a) Signs which contain, include, or are illuminated by any
flashing, intermittent, or moving light or lights are prohibited,
except those giving public service information such as time, date,
temperature, weather, or similar information.
(b) Signs which are not effectively shielded as to prevent beams or
rays of light from being directed at any portion of the traveled ways
of the highway and which are of such intensity or brilliance as to
cause glare or to impair the vision of the driver of any motor vehicle,
or which otherwise interfere with any driver's operation of a motor
vehicle are prohibited.
(c) No sign shall be so illuminated that it interferes with the
effectiveness of, or obscures an official traffic sign, device, or
signal.
(d) All such lighting shall be subject to any other provisions
relating to lighting of signs presently applicable to all highways
under the jurisdiction of the state.
(e) Type 4 and 5 digital outdoor advertising signs visible to state
highways and located within incorporated cities and towns are not
considered as utilizing flashing, intermittent, or moving light as long
as they only contain static messages. Each static message may not
include flashing, scintillating lighting, variation of light intensity,
or the appearance of movement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.42 RCW
to read as follows:
By December 31, 2013, the department must adopt rules establishing
standards for the allowable brightness, size, and change of copy for
digital outdoor advertising signs. A Type 4 or 5 digital outdoor
advertising sign visible to a state highway may not be installed until
the department adopts such rules. The adopted rules relating to change
of copy and size must be consistent with standards adopted in WAC 468-66-030(2)(b) and 468-66-050(5).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 47.42 RCW
to read as follows:
Owners of digital outdoor advertising signs visible to state
highways and located within incorporated cities and towns are required
to coordinate with law enforcement and emergency management authorities
to display, when appropriate, regional emergency information important
to the traveling public including, but not limited to, amber alerts,
blue alerts, Washington state missing person alerts, and emergency
management information. State agencies may contract with owners and
vendors of digital outdoor advertising signs to expand the state's
missing person computerized network and emergency messaging system.
The contracts must be on a voluntary basis and may not include
compensation. This section does not imply that any state agency is
required to pay, or in any way compensate, vendors of digital outdoor
advertising signs for missing person notices, emergency messaging, or
broadcasts.

--- END ---