BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.71.050 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 307 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each applicant ((who has graduated from a school of medicine
located in any state, territory, or possession of the United States,
the District of Columbia, or the Dominion of Canada,)) shall file an
application for licensure with the commission on a form prepared by the
secretary with the approval of the commission or another commission-approved method. Each applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to
the commission of the following:
(a) That the applicant has attended and graduated from a school of
medicine approved by the commission. The commission must adopt by rule
the list of commission-approved medical schools;
(b) Except as provided in section 3 of this act, that the applicant
has successfully completed ((two years of)) a postgraduate medical
training ((in a)) program acceptable to the commission((, provided that
applicants graduating before July 28, 1985, may complete only one year
of postgraduate medical training)). The commission must define by rule
the requirements for commission-approved postgraduate medical training
programs;
(c) That the applicant has successfully completed the exam
requirements set forth by the commission by rule;
(d) That the applicant, if a graduate of a medical school outside
of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Dominion of
Canada, has completed the certification process with the educational
commission for foreign medical graduates;
(e) That the applicant has the ability to read, write, speak,
understand, and be understood in the English language at a level
acceptable for performing competent medical care in all practice
settings;
(((c))) (f) That the applicant is of good moral character; and
(((d))) (g) That the applicant is physically and mentally capable
of safely carrying on the practice of medicine. The commission may
require any applicant to submit to such examination or examinations as
it deems necessary to determine an applicant's physical and/or mental
capability to safely practice medicine.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the
commission from requiring such additional information from applicants
as it deems necessary. The issuance and denial of licenses are subject
to chapter 18.130 RCW, the Uniform Disciplinary Act.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.71.055 and 1996 c 178 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission may approve any school of medicine which is located
in any state, territory, or possession of the United States, the
District of Columbia, ((or in)) the Dominion of Canada, or other
country provided that it:
(1) Requires collegiate instruction which includes courses deemed
by the commission to be prerequisites to medical education;
(2) Provides adequate instruction in the following subjects:
Anatomy, biochemistry, microbiology and immunology, pathology,
pharmacology, physiology, anaesthesiology, dermatology, gynecology,
internal medicine, neurology, obstetrics, ophthalmology, orthopedic
surgery, otolaryngology, pediatrics, physical medicine and
rehabilitation, preventive medicine and public health, psychiatry,
radiology, surgery, and urology, and such other subjects determined by
the commission;
(3) Provides clinical instruction in hospital wards and outpatient
clinics under guidance.
Approval may be withdrawn by the commission at any time a medical
school ceases to comply with one or more of the requirements of this
section.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the
commission to approve a school of osteopathic medicine and surgery, or
osteopathic medicine, for purposes of qualifying an applicant to be
licensed under this chapter by direct licensure, reciprocity, or
otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission may grant a license to an applicant upon a finding
by the commission that, based on the applicant's exceptional education,
training, and practice credentials, the applicant's practice in the
state would benefit the public welfare. Individually considered
applicants must submit an application as described in this chapter and
undergo the same background check processes required of all other
applicants for licensure. The commission shall adopt rules regarding
qualifications that may be considered exceptional.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.71.095 and 2001 c 114 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission may, without examination, issue a limited license to
persons who possess the qualifications set forth herein:
(1) The commission may, upon the written request of the secretary
of the department of social and health services or the secretary of
corrections, issue a limited license to practice medicine in this state
to persons who have been accepted for employment by the department of
social and health services or the department of corrections as
physicians; who are licensed to practice medicine in another state of
the United States or in the country of Canada or any province or
territory thereof; and who meet all of the qualifications for licensure
set forth in RCW 18.71.050.
Such license shall permit the holder thereof to practice medicine
only in connection with patients, residents, or inmates of the state
institutions under the control and supervision of the secretary of the
department of social and health services or the department of
corrections.
(2) The commission may issue a limited license to practice medicine
in this state to persons who have been accepted for employment by a
county or city health department as physicians; who are licensed to
practice medicine in another state of the United States or in the
country of Canada or any province or territory thereof; and who meet
all of the qualifications for licensure set forth in RCW 18.71.050.
Such license shall permit the holder thereof to practice medicine
only in connection with his or her duties in employment with the city
or county health department.
(3) Upon receipt of a completed application showing that the
applicant meets all of the requirements for licensure set forth in RCW
18.71.050 except for completion of ((two years of)) an approved
postgraduate medical training program, and that the applicant has been
appointed as a resident physician in a program of postgraduate
((clinical)) medical training in this state approved by the commission,
the commission may issue a limited license to a resident physician.
Such license shall permit the resident physician to practice medicine
only in connection with his or her duties as a resident physician and
shall not authorize the physician to engage in any other form of
practice. Each resident physician shall practice medicine only under
the supervision and control of a physician licensed in this state, but
such supervision and control shall not be construed to necessarily
require the personal presence of the supervising physician at the place
where services are rendered. After completing a minimum of twenty-four
months of postgraduate medical training, the holder of a limited
resident license may practice outside of the scope of the residency
appointment, otherwise known as moonlighting, if the following
conditions are met:
(a)(i) The license holder has received approval from the
postgraduate medical training program; and
(ii) The approval is filed with the commission by the license
holder at the time of appointment.
(b) The commission must be notified if the postgraduate medical
training program revokes the approval for any reason.
(4)(a) Upon nomination by the dean of the school of medicine at the
University of Washington or the chief executive officer of a hospital
or other appropriate health care facility licensed in the state of
Washington, the commission may issue a limited license to a physician
applicant invited to serve as a teaching-research member of the
institution's instructional staff if the sponsoring institution and the
applicant give evidence that he or she has graduated from a recognized
medical school and has been licensed or otherwise privileged to
practice medicine at his or her location of origin. Such license shall
permit the recipient to practice medicine only within the confines of
the instructional program specified in the application and shall
terminate whenever the holder ceases to be involved in that program, or
at the end of one year, whichever is earlier. Upon request of the
applicant and the institutional authority, the license may be renewed.
The holder of a teaching-research license under this subsection (4)(a)
is eligible for full licensure if the following conditions are met:
(i) If the applicant has not graduated from a school of medicine
located in any state, territory, or possession of the United States,
the District of Columbia, or the Dominion of Canada, the applicant must
satisfactorily pass the certification process by the educational
commission for foreign medical graduates;
(ii) The applicant has successfully completed the exam requirements
set forth by the commission by rule;
(iii) The applicant has the ability to read, write, speak,
understand, and be understood in the English language at a level
acceptable for performing competent medical care in all practice
settings;
(iv) The applicant has continuously held a position of associate
professor or higher at a recognized Washington state medical school for
no less than three years; and
(v) The applicant has had no disciplinary action taken in the
previous five years.
(b) Upon nomination by the dean of the school of medicine of the
University of Washington or the chief executive officer of any hospital
or appropriate health care facility licensed in the state of
Washington, the commission may issue a limited license to an applicant
selected by the sponsoring institution to be enrolled in one of its
designated departmental or divisional fellowship programs provided that
the applicant shall have graduated from a recognized medical school and
has been granted a license or other appropriate certificate to practice
medicine in the location of the applicant's origin. Such license shall
permit the holder only to practice medicine within the confines of the
fellowship program to which he or she has been appointed and, upon the
request of the applicant and the sponsoring institution, the license
may be renewed by the commission ((for no more than a total of two
years)).
All persons licensed under this section shall be subject to the
jurisdiction of the commission to the same extent as other members of
the medical profession, in accordance with this chapter and chapter
18.130 RCW.
Persons applying for licensure and renewing licenses pursuant to
this section shall comply with administrative procedures,
administrative requirements, and fees determined as provided in RCW
43.70.250 and 43.70.280. Any person who obtains a limited license
pursuant to this section may apply for licensure under this chapter,
but shall submit a new application form and comply with all other
licensing requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 18.71.051 (Application -- Eligibility
requirements -- Foreign graduates) and 2011 c 138 s 1, 1994 sp.s. c 9 s
308, 1991 c 3 s 162, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 171 s 16 are each repealed.

--- END ---