BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.126.010 and 2012 c 2 s 212 (Initiative Measure No.
1183) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that both suppliers and wholesale
distributors of malt beverages ((and spirits)) are interested in the
goal of best serving the public interest through the fair, efficient,
and competitive distribution of such beverages. The legislature
encourages them to achieve this goal by:
(a) Assuring the wholesale distributor's freedom to manage the
business enterprise, including the wholesale distributor's right to
independently establish its selling prices; and
(b) Assuring the supplier and the public of service from wholesale
distributors who will devote their best competitive efforts and
resources to sales and distribution of the supplier's products which
the wholesale distributor has been granted the right to sell and
distribute.
(2) This chapter governs the relationship between suppliers of malt
beverages ((and spirits)) and their wholesale distributors to the full
extent consistent with the Constitution and laws of this state and of
the United States.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.126.020 and 2012 c 2 s 213 (Initiative Measure No.
1183) are each amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agreement of distributorship" means any contract, agreement,
commercial relationship, license, association, or any other
arrangement, for a definite or indefinite period, between a supplier
and distributor.
(2) "Authorized representative" has the same meaning as "authorized
representative" as defined in RCW 66.04.010.
(3) "Brand" means any word, name, group of letters, symbol, or
combination thereof, including the name of the distiller or brewer if
the distiller's or brewer's name is also a significant part of the
product name, adopted and used by a supplier to identify ((specific
spirits or)) a specific malt beverage product and to distinguish that
product from other ((spirits or)) malt beverages produced by that
supplier or other suppliers.
(4) "Distributor" means any person, including but not limited to a
component of a supplier's distribution system constituted as an
independent business, importing or causing to be imported into this
state, or purchasing or causing to be purchased within this state, any
((spirits or)) malt beverages for sale or resale to retailers licensed
under the laws of this state, regardless of whether the business of
such person is conducted under the terms of any agreement with a
distiller or malt beverage manufacturer.
(5) "Importer" means any distributor importing ((spirits or)) beer
into this state for sale to retailer accounts or for sale to other
distributors designated as "subjobbers" for resale.
(6) "Malt beverage manufacturer" means every brewer, fermenter,
processor, bottler, or packager of malt beverages located within or
outside this state, or any other person, whether located within or
outside this state, who enters into an agreement of distributorship for
the resale of malt beverages in this state with any wholesale
distributor doing business in the state of Washington.
(7) "Person" means any natural person, corporation, partnership,
trust, agency, or other entity, as well as any individual officers,
directors, or other persons in active control of the activities of such
entity.
(8) (("Spirits manufacturer" means every distiller, processor,
bottler, or packager of spirits located within or outside this state,
or any other person, whether located within or outside this state, who
enters into an agreement of distributorship for the resale of spirits
in this state with any wholesale distributor doing business in the
state of Washington.
(9))) "Successor distributor" means any distributor who enters into
an agreement, whether oral or written, to distribute a brand of
((spirits or)) malt beverages after the supplier with whom such
agreement is made or the person from whom that supplier acquired the
right to manufacture or distribute the brand has terminated, canceled,
or failed to renew an agreement of distributorship, whether oral or
written, with another distributor to distribute that same brand of
((spirits or)) malt beverages.
(((10))) (9) "Supplier" means any ((spirits or)) malt beverage
manufacturer or importer who enters into or is a party to any agreement
of distributorship with a wholesale distributor. "Supplier" does not
include: (a) Any ((distiller licensed under RCW 66.24.140 or 66.24.145
and producing less than sixty thousand proof gallons of spirits
annually or any)) brewery or microbrewery licensed under RCW 66.24.240
and producing less than two hundred thousand barrels of malt liquor
annually; (b) any brewer or manufacturer of malt liquor producing less
than two hundred thousand barrels of malt liquor annually and holding
a certificate of approval issued under RCW 66.24.270; or (c) any
authorized representative of distillers or malt liquor manufacturers
who holds an appointment from one or more distillers or malt liquor
manufacturers which, in the aggregate, produce less than two hundred
thousand barrels of malt liquor ((or sixty thousand proof gallons of
spirits)).
(((11))) (10) "Terminated distribution rights" means distribution
rights with respect to a brand of malt beverages which are lost by a
terminated distributor as a result of termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal of an agreement of distributorship for that brand.
(((12))) (11) "Terminated distributor" means a distributor whose
agreement of distributorship with respect to a brand of ((spirits or))
malt beverages, whether oral or written, has been terminated, canceled,
or not renewed.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.126.040 and 2012 c 2 s 214 (Initiative Measure No.
1183) are each amended to read as follows:
Wholesale distributors are entitled to the following protections
which are deemed to be incorporated into every agreement of
distributorship:
(1) Agreements between wholesale distributors and suppliers must be
in writing;
(2) A supplier must give the wholesale distributor at least sixty
days prior written notice of the supplier's intent to cancel or
otherwise terminate the agreement, unless such termination is based on
a reason set forth in RCW 19.126.030(5) or results from a supplier
acquiring the right to manufacture or distribute a particular brand and
electing to have that brand handled by a different distributor. The
notice must state all the reasons for the intended termination or
cancellation. Upon receipt of notice, the wholesale distributor has
sixty days in which to rectify any claimed deficiency. If the
deficiency is rectified within this sixty-day period, the proposed
termination or cancellation is null and void and without legal effect;
(3) The wholesale distributor may sell or transfer its business, or
any portion thereof, including the agreement, to successors in interest
upon prior approval of the transfer by the supplier. No supplier may
unreasonably withhold or delay its approval of any transfer, including
wholesaler's rights and obligations under the terms of the agreement,
if the person or persons to be substituted meet reasonable standards
imposed by the supplier;
(4) If an agreement of distributorship is terminated, canceled, or
not renewed for any reason other than for cause, failure to live up to
the terms and conditions of the agreement, or a reason set forth in RCW
19.126.030(5), the wholesale distributor is entitled to compensation
from the successor distributor for the laid-in cost of inventory and
for the fair market value of the terminated distribution rights. For
purposes of this section, termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of
a distributor's right to distribute a particular brand constitutes
termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of an agreement of
distributorship whether or not the distributor retains the right to
continue distribution of other brands for the supplier. In the case of
terminated distribution rights resulting from a supplier acquiring the
right to manufacture or distribute a particular brand and electing to
have that brand handled by a different distributor, the affected
distribution rights will not transfer until such time as the
compensation to be paid to the terminated distributor has been finally
determined by agreement or arbitration;
(5) When a terminated distributor is entitled to compensation under
subsection (4) of this section, a successor distributor must compensate
the terminated distributor for the fair market value of the terminated
distributor's rights to distribute the brand, less any amount paid to
the terminated distributor by a supplier or other person with respect
to the terminated distribution rights for the brand. If the terminated
distributor's distribution rights to a brand of ((spirits or)) malt
beverages are divided among two or more successor distributors, each
successor distributor must compensate the terminated distributor for
the fair market value of the distribution rights assumed by that
successor distributor, less any amount paid to the terminated
distributor by a supplier or other person with respect to the
terminated distribution rights assumed by the successor distributor.
A terminated distributor may not receive total compensation under this
subsection that exceeds the fair market value of the terminated
distributor's distribution rights with respect to the affected brand.
Nothing in this section may be construed to require any supplier or
other third person to make any payment to a terminated distributor;
(6) For purposes of this section, the "fair market value" of
distribution rights as to a particular brand means the amount that a
willing buyer would pay and a willing seller would accept for such
distribution rights when neither is acting under compulsion and both
have knowledge of all facts material to the transaction. "Fair market
value" is determined as of the date on which the distribution rights
are to be transferred in accordance with subsection (4) of this
section;
(7) In the event the terminated distributor and the successor
distributor do not agree on the fair market value of the affected
distribution rights within thirty days after the terminated distributor
is given notice of termination, the matter must be submitted to binding
arbitration. Unless the parties agree otherwise, such arbitration must
be conducted in accordance with the American arbitration association
commercial arbitration rules with each party to bear its own costs and
attorneys' fees;
(8) Unless the parties otherwise agree, or the arbitrator for good
cause shown orders otherwise, an arbitration conducted pursuant to
subsection (7) of this section must proceed as follows: (a) The notice
of intent to arbitrate must be served within forty days after the
terminated distributor receives notice of terminated distribution
rights; (b) the arbitration must be conducted within ninety days after
service of the notice of intent to arbitrate; and (c) the arbitrator or
arbitrators must issue an order within thirty days after completion of
the arbitration;
(9) In the event of a material change in the terms of an agreement
of distribution, the revised agreement must be considered a new
agreement for purposes of determining the law applicable to the
agreement after the date of the material change, whether or not the
agreement of distribution is or purports to be a continuing agreement
and without regard to the process by which the material change is
effected.

--- END ---