BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington voting rights act of 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "At-large method of election" means any of the following
methods of electing members of the governing body of a political
subdivision:
(a) One in which the voters of the entire jurisdiction elect the
members to the governing body;
(b) One in which the candidates are required to reside within given
areas of the jurisdiction and the voters of the entire jurisdiction
elect the members to the governing body; or
(c) One that combines the criteria in (a) and (b) of this
subsection.
(2) "District-based elections" means a method of electing members
to the governing body of a political subdivision in which the candidate
must reside within an election district that is a divisible part of the
political subdivision and is elected only by voters residing within
that election district.
(3) "Polarized voting" means voting in which there is a difference
in the choice of candidates or other electoral choices that are
preferred by voters in a protected class, and in the choice of
candidates and electoral choices that are preferred by voters in the
rest of the electorate. A plaintiff may establish and a court may find
that elections are characterized by polarized voting based on relevant
and admissible evidence.
(4) "Political subdivision" means any county, city, town, school
district, fire protection district, port district, or public utility
district.
(5) "Protected class" means a class of voters who are members of a
race, color, or language minority group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) At-large elections and district-based
elections may not be imposed or applied in a manner that denies a
protected class an equal opportunity to elect candidates of its choice
or an equal opportunity to influence the outcome of an election.
(2) An at-large election district or a district-based election
district is in violation of this section, when it is shown that:
(a) The elections in the political subdivision exhibit polarized
voting; and
(b) Members of a protected class do not have an equal opportunity
to elect candidates of their choice or an equal opportunity to
influence the outcome of an election.
(3) The fact that members of a protected class are not
geographically compact or concentrated to constitute a majority in a
proposed or existing district-based election district shall not
preclude a finding of polarized voting that results in an unequal
opportunity for a protected class to elect candidates of their choice
or influence the outcome of an election.
(4) In determining whether there is polarized voting under this
section, the court shall analyze elections for members of the governing
body of the political subdivision or elections incorporating other
electoral choices by the voters of the political subdivision.
(5) The court shall determine whether polarized voting has occurred
by examining results of elections in which at least one candidate is a
member of a protected class or elections involving ballot measures, or
other electoral choices that affect the rights and privileges of
members of a protected class who are voters of the political
subdivision that is the subject of an action filed pursuant to this
chapter. Only elections conducted prior to the filing of an action
pursuant to this chapter shall be used to establish or rebut the
existence of polarized voting that results in an unequal opportunity
for a protected class to elect candidates of their choice or influence
the outcome of an election.
(6) The election of candidates who are members of a protected class
and who were elected prior to the filing of an action pursuant to this
chapter shall not preclude a finding of polarized voting that results
in an unequal opportunity for a protected class to elect candidates of
their choice or influence the outcome of an election.
(7) Members of different protected classes may file an action
jointly pursuant to this chapter if they demonstrate that their
combined voting preferences as a group are different from the rest of
the electorate and demonstrate that there is polarized voting that
results in an unequal opportunity for these protected classes to elect
candidates of their choice or influence the outcome of an election.
(8) In an action filed pursuant to this section, the trial court
shall set a trial to be held no later than one hundred eighty days
after the filing of a complaint, and shall set a discovery and motions
calendar accordingly.
(9) Proof of intent on the part of the voters or elected officials
to discriminate against a protected class is not required.
(10) For purposes of any applicable statute of limitations, a cause
of action under this section arises every time there is an election
pursuant to an at-large method of election or a district-based election
district that is the subject of an action pursuant to this section.
(11) The plaintiff's constitutional right to the secrecy of the
plaintiff's vote is preserved and is not waived by the filing of an
action pursuant to this section, and is not subject to discovery.
(12) In seeking a temporary restraining order or a preliminary
injunction, a plaintiff shall not be required to post a bond or any
other security in order to secure such equitable relief.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A political subdivision that conducts an at-large or district-based method of election pursuant to state, county,
or local law, is authorized to change its electoral system, including
implementing a district-based election system to remedy a potential
violation of section 3 of this act. If a political subdivision invokes
its authority under this section to implement a district-based election
system, the districts shall be drawn in a manner consistent with
section 5 of this act.
(1) If a political subdivision invokes its authority under this
section to implement a district-based election system, the political
subdivision must district its governmental unit within forty-five days.
Thereafter, it is the responsibility of each political subdivision with
a governing body comprised of single-member districts to periodically
redistrict its governmental unit, based on population information from
the most recent federal decennial census.
(2) Within forty-five days after receipt of federal decennial
census information applicable to a specific local area, the commission
established in RCW 44.05.030 shall forward the census information to
each political subdivision that has invoked its authority under this
section to implement a district-based election system, or that is
charged with redistricting under section 5 of this act.
(3) No later than eight months after its receipt of federal
decennial census data, the governing body of the political subdivision
that invokes its authority under this section to implement a district-based election system, or that is charged with redistricting under
section 5 of this act, shall prepare a plan for redistricting its
districts.
(4) The plan shall be consistent with the following criteria:
(a) Each district shall be as nearly equal in population as
possible to each and every other such district comprising the political
subdivision.
(b) Each district shall be as compact as possible.
(c) Each district shall consist of geographically contiguous area.
(d) To the extent feasible, the district boundaries shall coincide
with existing recognized natural boundaries and shall, to the extent
possible, preserve existing communities of related and mutual interest.
(e) During the adoption of its plan, the political subdivision
shall ensure that full and reasonable public notice of its actions is
provided. The political subdivision shall hold at least one public
hearing on the redistricting plan at least one week before adoption of
the plan.
(f) District boundaries may not be drawn or maintained in a manner
that denies an equal opportunity of a protected class to elect
candidates of its choice or an equal opportunity to influence the
outcome of an election.
(5) After invoking its authority under this section, the political
subdivision shall order new elections to be scheduled at the next date
authorized by state law for conducting elections. All of the positions
that were elected pursuant to the previous electoral system and have at
least two years remaining in their terms of office shall be subject to
new elections in order to continue their term of office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Upon a finding of a violation of section
3 of this act, the court shall implement appropriate remedies,
including the imposition of a district-based election system, that are
tailored to remedy the violation. The court may direct the affected
jurisdiction to draw or redraw district boundaries or appoint an
individual or panel to draw or redraw district lines. The proposed
districts must be approved by the court prior to their implementation.
(2) When tailoring a remedy consisting of district-based elections,
the court shall implement a district-based election district that is
geographically compact. The fact that members of a protected class do
not constitute a numerical majority within a proposed district-based
election district shall not preclude the implementation of such a
district-based election district. If, in tailoring a remedy, the court
orders the implementation of a district-based election district where
the members of the protected class are not a numerical majority, the
court shall do so in a manner that provides the protected class an
equal opportunity to elect candidates of their choice or an equal
opportunity to influence the outcome of an election.
(3) In tailoring a remedy after a finding of a violation of section
3 of this act:
(a) If the next date authorized by state law for conducting
elections occurs ninety days or more after the court's ruling, the
court shall order new elections, conducted pursuant to the remedy, to
be scheduled at the next date authorized by state law for conducting
elections. If a special filing period is required, the county auditor
shall establish a five-day filing period at the earliest possible date.
(b) If the next election date occurs less than ninety days after
the court's ruling, the next election will occur as scheduled and
organized.
(c) All of the positions that were elected pursuant to the at-large
or district-based election system that was the subject of the action
filed pursuant to this chapter and have at least two years remaining in
their terms of office, including those elected pursuant to (b) of this
subsection, shall be subject to new elections, pursuant to the remedy
implemented under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) State laws or local ordinances requiring cities, towns,
counties, and school districts to conduct district-based elections in
a primary and at-large elections in the general election do not apply
in jurisdictions that implement district-based elections pursuant to
section 4 of this act, or in jurisdictions that are required to
implement district-based elections, pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, where district-based elections is defined in section 2(2) of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) In any action to enforce this chapter,
the court shall allow the prevailing plaintiff or plaintiffs, other
than the state or political subdivision thereof, reasonable attorneys'
fees, all nonattorney fee costs as defined by RCW 4.84.010, and all
reasonable expert witness fees.
(2) Prevailing defendants shall not recover an award of fees or
costs except pursuant to RCW 4.84.185.
(3) A plaintiff shall be deemed to be a prevailing party for
purposes of this section if the political subdivision that is the
subject of an action filed pursuant to this chapter adopts or
implements an election system, such as a district-based election
system, after the action is filed that is different from the at-large
or district-based election system that is the subject of the action
filed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Any voter who is a member of a protected
class and who resides in a political subdivision where a violation of
section 3 of this act is alleged may file an action in the superior
court of the county in which the political subdivision is located. If
the action is against a county, the action may be filed in the superior
court of such county, or in the superior court of either of the two
nearest judicial districts as determined pursuant to RCW 36.01.050(2).
There is no requirement that an action filed pursuant to this chapter
be filed as a class action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Prior to filing an action pursuant to this
act, a plaintiff shall first notify the political subdivision that the
plaintiff intends to challenge the political subdivision's electoral
system under this act. If the political subdivision does not invoke
its authority under section 4 of this act within forty-five days after
receiving notice, a plaintiff may file an action under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The provisions of this act are not
applicable to cities and towns with populations under one thousand or
to school districts with K-12 full-time equivalent enrollments of less
than two hundred fifty.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28A.343
RCW to read as follows:
The school board of directors may authorize a change to a district-based election as defined in section 2(2) of this act, such districts
to be drawn in a manner consistent with sections 4 and 5 of this act.
The school board of directors shall order new elections to be scheduled
at the next date authorized by state law for conducting elections. The
staggering of directors' terms shall be accomplished as provided in RCW
28A.343.030 and 28A.343.620 through 28A.343.650.

Sec. 11 RCW 36.32.020 and 1982 c 226 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board of county commissioners of each county shall divide their
county into three commissioner districts so that each district shall
comprise as nearly as possible one-third of the population of the
county: PROVIDED, That the territory comprised in any voting precincts
of such districts shall remain compact, and shall not be divided by the
lines of said districts.
However, the commissioners of any county composed entirely of
islands and with a population of less than thirty-five thousand may
divide their county into three commissioner districts without regard to
population, except that if any single island is included in more than
one district, the districts on such island shall comprise, as nearly as
possible, equal populations.
Except where necessary to comply with a court order issued pursuant
to sections 3 and 5 of this act, the lines of the districts shall not
be changed ((oftener)) more often than once in four years and only when
a full board of commissioners is present. The districts shall be
designated as districts numbered one, two and three.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislative authority of a city or town may authorize a change
to its electoral system, including the implementation of a district-based election system as defined in section 2(2) of this act, to remedy
a potential violation of section 3 of this act. If the legislative
authority of a city or town invokes its authority under this section to
implement a district-based election system, the districts shall be
drawn in a manner consistent with sections 4 and 5 of this act. The
legislative authority of a city or town shall order new elections to be
scheduled at the next date authorized by state law for conducting
elections. All of the positions that were elected pursuant to the
previous method of election and have at least two years remaining in
their terms of office shall be subject to new elections in order to
continue their terms of office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21
RCW to read as follows:
The legislative authority of a code city or town may authorize a
change to its electoral system, including the implementation of a
district-based election system as defined in section 2(2) of this act,
to remedy a potential violation of section 3 of this act. If the
legislative authority of a code city or town invokes its authority
under this section to implement a district-based election system, the
districts shall be drawn in a manner consistent with sections 4 and 5
of this act. The legislative authority of a code city or town shall
order new elections to be scheduled at the next date authorized by
state law for conducting elections. All of the positions that were
elected pursuant to the previous method of election and have at least
two years remaining in their terms of office shall be subject to new
elections in order to continue their terms of office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 52.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Where the board of fire commissioners of a fire protection district
exercises its authority pursuant to RCW 52.14.013 to create
commissioner districts, such districts shall be drawn in a manner
consistent with section 3(1) of this act.

Sec. 15 RCW 54.12.010 and 2004 c 113 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A public utility district that is created as provided in RCW
54.08.010 shall be a municipal corporation of the state of Washington,
and the name of such public utility district shall be Public Utility
District No. . . . . of . . . . . . County.
The powers of the public utility district shall be exercised
through a commission consisting of three members in three commissioner
districts, and five members in five commissioner districts.
(1) If the public utility district is countywide and the county has
three county legislative authority districts, then, at the first
election of commissioners and until any change is made in the
boundaries of public utility district commissioner districts, one
public utility district commissioner shall be chosen from each of the
three county legislative authority districts.
(2) If the public utility district comprises only a portion of the
county, with boundaries established in accordance with chapter 54.08
RCW, or if the public utility district is countywide and the county
does not have three county legislative authority districts, three
public utility district commissioner districts, numbered consecutively,
each with approximately equal population and following precinct lines,
as far as practicable, shall be described in the petition for the
formation of the public utility district, subject to appropriate change
by the county legislative authority if and when it changes the
boundaries of the proposed public utility district. One commissioner
shall be elected as a commissioner of each of the public utility
district commissioner districts.
(3) Only a registered voter who resides in a commissioner district
may be a candidate for, or hold office as, a commissioner of the
commissioner district. Only voters of a commissioner district may vote
at a primary to nominate candidates for a commissioner of the
commissioner district. Voters of the entire public utility district
may vote at a general election to elect a person as a commissioner of
the commissioner district.
(4) The term of office of each public utility district commissioner
other than the commissioners at large shall be six years, and the term
of each commissioner at large shall be four years. Each term shall be
computed in accordance with RCW 29A.20.040 following the commissioner's
election. All public utility district commissioners shall hold office
until their successors shall have been elected and have qualified and
assume office in accordance with RCW 29A.20.040.
(5) A vacancy in the office of public utility district commissioner
shall occur as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW or by nonattendance at
meetings of the public utility district commission for a period of
sixty days unless excused by the public utility district commission.
Vacancies on a board of public utility district commissioners shall be
filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW.
(6) The boundaries of the public utility district commissioner
districts may be changed only by the public utility district commission
or by a court order issued pursuant to section 5 of this act, and shall
be examined every ten years to determine substantial equality of
population in accordance with chapter 29A.76 RCW. Except as provided
in this section, section 5 of this act, or RCW 54.04.039, the
boundaries shall not be changed oftener than once in four years.
Boundaries may only be changed when all members of the commission are
present. Whenever territory is added to a public utility district
under RCW 54.04.035, or added or withdrawn under RCW 54.04.039, the
boundaries of the public utility commissioner districts shall be
changed to include the additional or exclude the withdrawn territory.
Unless the boundaries are changed pursuant to RCW 54.04.039, the
proposed change of the boundaries of the public utility district
commissioner district must be made by resolution and after public
hearing. Notice of the time of the public hearing shall be published
for two weeks before the hearing. Upon a referendum petition signed by
ten percent of the qualified voters of the public utility district
being filed with the county auditor, the county legislative authority
shall submit the proposed change of boundaries to the voters of the
public utility district for their approval or rejection. The petition
must be filed within ninety days after the adoption of resolution of
the proposed action. The validity of the petition is governed by the
provisions of chapter 54.08 RCW.

Sec. 16 RCW 29A.76.010 and 2011 c 349 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the responsibility of each county, municipal corporation,
and special purpose district with a governing body comprised of
internal director, council, or commissioner districts not based on
statutorily required land ownership criteria to periodically redistrict
its governmental unit, based on population information from the most
recent federal decennial census.
(2) Within forty-five days after receipt of federal decennial
census information applicable to a specific local area, the commission
established in RCW 44.05.030 shall forward the census information to
each municipal corporation, county, and district charged with
redistricting under this section.
(3) No later than eight months after its receipt of federal
decennial census data, the governing body of the municipal corporation,
county, or district shall prepare a plan for redistricting its internal
or director districts.
(4) The plan shall be consistent with the following criteria:
(a) Each internal director, council, or commissioner district shall
be as nearly equal in population as possible to each and every other
such district comprising the municipal corporation, county, or special
purpose district.
(b) Each district shall be as compact as possible.
(c) Each district shall consist of geographically contiguous area.
(d) Population data may not be used for purposes of favoring or
disfavoring any racial group or political party, except to the extent
necessary to ensure compliance with this act.
(e) To the extent feasible and if not inconsistent with the basic
enabling legislation for the municipal corporation, county, or
district, the district boundaries shall coincide with existing
recognized natural boundaries and shall, to the extent possible,
preserve existing communities of related and mutual interest.
(5) During the adoption of its plan, the municipal corporation,
county, or district shall ensure that full and reasonable public notice
of its actions is provided. The municipal corporation, county, or
district shall hold at least one public hearing on the redistricting
plan at least one week before adoption of the plan.
(6)(a) Any registered voter residing in an area affected by the
redistricting plan may request review of the adopted local plan by the
superior court of the county in which he or she resides, within fifteen
days of the plan's adoption. Any request for review must specify the
reason or reasons alleged why the local plan is not consistent with the
applicable redistricting criteria. The municipal corporation, county,
or district may be joined as respondent. The superior court shall
thereupon review the challenged plan for compliance with the applicable
redistricting criteria set out in subsection (4) of this section.
(b) If the superior court finds the plan to be consistent with the
requirements of this section, the plan shall take effect immediately.
(c) If the superior court determines the plan does not meet the
requirements of this section, in whole or in part, it shall remand the
plan for further or corrective action within a specified and reasonable
time period.
(d) If the superior court finds that any request for review is
frivolous or has been filed solely for purposes of harassment or delay,
it may impose appropriate sanctions on the party requesting review,
including payment of attorneys' fees and costs to the respondent
municipal corporation, county, or district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 29A RCW.

--- END ---