BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Washington
state horse park authority is a unique public-private partnership for
providing equestrian recreational opportunities. Because the authority
is a statutorily created nonprofit corporation, its growth as an
organization requires statutory authorization. The legislature finds
that expanding membership of the authority's board will: Allow
additional board representation for the geographic and sports
discipline diversity of equestrian interests; add relevant business
experience to the board; and avoid duplicating efforts of other
organizations.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.30.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 32 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A nonprofit corporation may be formed under the nonprofit
corporation provisions of chapter 24.03 RCW to carry out the purposes
of this chapter. Except as provided in RCW 79A.30.040, the corporation
shall have all the powers and be subject to the same restrictions as
are permitted or prescribed to nonprofit corporations and shall
exercise those powers only for carrying out the purposes of this
chapter and those purposes necessarily implied therefrom. The
nonprofit corporation shall be known as the Washington state horse park
authority. The articles of incorporation shall provide that it is the
responsibility of the authority to develop, promote, operate, manage,
and maintain the Washington state horse park. The articles of
incorporation shall provide for appointment of directors and other
conduct of business consistent with the requirements of this chapter.
(2)(a) The articles of incorporation shall provide for ((a seven-))
an eleven-member board of directors for the authority, all appointed by
the commission. Board members shall serve three-year terms, except
that two of the original appointees shall serve one-year terms, and two
of the original appointees shall serve two-year terms. Of the board
members appointed pursuant to this act, one shall serve an initial one-year term, one shall serve an initial two-year term, and two shall
serve an initial term of three years. A board member may serve
consecutive terms.
(b) The articles of incorporation shall provide that the commission
appoint board members as follows:
(i) One board member shall represent the interests of the
commission;
(ii) One board member shall represent the interests of the county
in which the park is located. In making this appointment, the
commission shall solicit recommendations from the county legislative
authority; and
(iii) ((Five)) Nine board members shall represent the geographic
and sports discipline diversity of equestrian interests in the state,
and at least ((one)) three of these members shall have business
experience relevant to the organization of horse shows or operation of
a horse show facility. In making these appointments, the commission
shall solicit recommendations from a variety of active horse-related
organizations in the state.
(3) The articles of incorporation shall include a policy that
provides for the preferential use of a specific area of the horse park
facilities at nominal cost for horse groups associated with youth
groups and individuals with disabilities.
(4) The commission shall make appointments to fill board vacancies
for positions authorized under subsection (2) of this section, upon
additional solicitation of recommendations from the board of directors.
(5) The board of directors shall perform their duties in the best
interests of the authority, consistent with the standards applicable to
directors of nonprofit corporations under RCW 24.03.127.

--- END ---