BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 60.28.011 and 2011 c 231 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, public
improvement contracts ((shall)) must provide, and public bodies
((shall)) must reserve, a contract retainage not to exceed five percent
of the moneys earned by the contractor as a trust fund for the
protection and payment of: (i) The claims of any person arising under
the contract; and (ii) the state with respect to taxes, increases, and
penalties imposed pursuant to Titles 50, 51, and 82 RCW which may be
due from such contractor.
(b) Public improvement contracts ((involving the construction,
alteration, repair, or improvement of any highway, road, or street))
funded in whole or in part by federal transportation funds ((shall))
must rely upon the contract bond as referred to in chapter 39.08 RCW
for the protection and payment of: (i) The claims of any person or
persons arising under the contract to the extent such claims are
provided for in RCW 39.08.010; and (ii) the state with respect to taxes
((imposed pursuant to)), increases, and penalties incurred on the
public improvement project under Titles 50, 51, and 82 RCW which may be
due. The contract bond must remain in full force and effect until, at
a minimum, all claims filed in compliance with chapter 39.08 RCW are
resolved.
(2) Every person performing labor or furnishing supplies toward the
completion of a public improvement contract ((shall have)) has a lien
upon moneys reserved by a public body under the provisions of a public
improvement contract. However, the notice of the lien of the claimant
((shall)) must be given within forty-five days of completion of the
contract work, and in the manner provided in RCW 39.08.030.
(3) The contractor at any time may request the contract retainage
be reduced to one hundred percent of the value of the work remaining on
the project.
(a) After completion of all contract work other than landscaping,
the contractor may request that the public body release and pay in full
the amounts retained during the performance of the contract, and sixty
days thereafter the public body must release and pay in full the
amounts retained (other than continuing retention of five percent of
the moneys earned for landscaping) subject to the provisions of
chapters 39.12 and 60.28 RCW.
(b) Sixty days after completion of all contract work the public
body must release and pay in full the amounts retained during the
performance of the contract subject to the provisions of chapters 39.12
and 60.28 RCW.
(4) The moneys reserved by a public body under the provisions of a
public improvement contract, at the option of the contractor, ((shall))
must be:
(a) Retained in a fund by the public body;
(b) Deposited by the public body in an interest bearing account in
a bank, mutual savings bank, or savings and loan association. Interest
on moneys reserved by a public body under the provision of a public
improvement contract ((shall)) must be paid to the contractor;
(c) Placed in escrow with a bank or trust company by the public
body. When the moneys reserved are placed in escrow, the public body
((shall)) must issue a check representing the sum of the moneys
reserved payable to the bank or trust company and the contractor
jointly. This check ((shall)) must be converted into bonds and
securities chosen by the contractor and approved by the public body and
the bonds and securities ((shall)) must be held in escrow. Interest on
the bonds and securities ((shall)) must be paid to the contractor as
the interest accrues.
(5) The contractor or subcontractor may withhold payment of not
more than five percent from the moneys earned by any subcontractor or
sub-subcontractor or supplier contracted with by the contractor to
provide labor, materials, or equipment to the public project. Whenever
the contractor or subcontractor reserves funds earned by a
subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier, the contractor or
subcontractor ((shall)) must pay interest to the subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier at a rate equal to that received by the
contractor or subcontractor from reserved funds.
(6) A contractor may submit a bond for all or any portion of the
contract retainage in a form acceptable to the public body and from a
bonding company meeting standards established by the public body. The
public body ((shall)) must accept a bond meeting these requirements
unless the public body can demonstrate good cause for refusing to
accept it. This bond and any proceeds therefrom are subject to all
claims and liens and in the same manner and priority as set forth for
retained percentages in this chapter. The public body ((shall)) must
release the bonded portion of the retained funds to the contractor
within thirty days of accepting the bond from the contractor. Whenever
a public body accepts a bond in lieu of retained funds from a
contractor, the contractor ((shall)) must accept like bonds from any
subcontractors or suppliers from which the contractor has retained
funds. The contractor ((shall)) must then release the funds retained
from the subcontractor or supplier to the subcontractor or supplier
within thirty days of accepting the bond from the subcontractor or
supplier.
(7) If the public body administering a contract, after a
substantial portion of the work has been completed, finds that an
unreasonable delay will occur in the completion of the remaining
portion of the contract for any reason not the result of a breach
thereof, it may, if the contractor agrees, delete from the contract the
remaining work and accept as final the improvement at the stage of
completion then attained and make payment in proportion to the amount
of the work accomplished and in this case any amounts retained and
accumulated under this section ((shall)) must be held for a period of
sixty days following the completion. In the event that the work is
terminated before final completion as provided in this section, the
public body may thereafter enter into a new contract with the same
contractor to perform the remaining work or improvement for an amount
equal to or less than the cost of the remaining work as was provided
for in the original contract without advertisement or bid. The
provisions of this chapter are exclusive and ((shall)) supersede all
provisions and regulations in conflict herewith.
(8) Whenever the department of transportation has contracted for
the construction of two or more ferry vessels, sixty days after
completion of all contract work on each ferry vessel, the department
must release and pay in full the amounts retained in connection with
the construction of the vessel subject to the provisions of RCW
60.28.021 and chapter 39.12 RCW. However, the department of
transportation may at its discretion condition the release of funds
retained in connection with the completed ferry upon the contractor
delivering a good and sufficient bond with two or more sureties, or
with a surety company, in the amount of the retained funds to be
released to the contractor, conditioned that no taxes ((shall)) may be
certified or claims filed for work on the ferry after a period of sixty
days following completion of the ferry; and if taxes are certified or
claims filed, recovery may be had on the bond by the department of
revenue, the employment security department, the department of labor
and industries, and the material suppliers and laborers filing claims.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section,
reservation by a public body for any purpose from the moneys earned by
a contractor by fulfilling its responsibilities under public
improvement contracts is prohibited.
(10) Contracts on projects funded in whole or in part by farmers
home administration and subject to farmers home administration
regulations are not subject to subsections (1) through (9) of this
section.
(11) This subsection applies only to a public body that has
contracted for the construction of a facility using the general
contractor/construction manager procedure, as defined under RCW
39.10.210. If the work performed by a subcontractor on the project has
been completed within the first half of the time provided in the
general contractor/construction manager contract for completing the
work, the public body may accept the completion of the subcontract.
The public body must give public notice of this acceptance. After a
forty-five day period for giving notice of liens, and compliance with
the retainage release procedures in RCW 60.28.021, the public body may
release that portion of the retained funds associated with the
subcontract. Claims against the retained funds after the forty-five
day period are not valid.
(12) ((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The
definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Contract retainage" means an amount reserved by a public body
from the moneys earned by a person under a public improvement contract.
(b) "Person" means a person or persons, mechanic, subcontractor, or
materialperson who performs labor or provides materials for a public
improvement contract, and any other person who supplies the person with
provisions or supplies for the carrying on of a public improvement
contract.
(c) "Public body" means the state, or a county, city, town,
district, board, or other public body.
(d) "Public improvement contract" means a contract for public
improvements or work, other than for professional services, or a work
order as defined in RCW 39.10.210.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.08.010 and 2007 c 218 s 88 and 2007 c 210 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Whenever any board, council, commission, trustees, or body
acting for the state or any county or municipality or any public body
((shall)) must contract with any person or corporation to do any work
for the state, county, or municipality, or other public body, city,
town, or district, such board, council, commission, trustees, or body
((shall)) must require the person or persons with whom such contract is
made to make, execute, and deliver to such board, council, commission,
trustees, or body a good and sufficient bond, with a surety company as
surety, conditioned that such person or persons ((shall)) must:
(i) Faithfully perform all the provisions of such contract ((and));
(ii) Pay all laborers, mechanics, and subcontractors and material
suppliers, and all persons who supply such person or persons, or
subcontractors, with provisions and supplies for the carrying on of
such work((, which)); and
(iii) Pay the taxes, increases, and penalties incurred on the
project under Titles 50, 51, and 82 RCW on: (A) Projects referred to
in RCW 60.28.011(1)(b); and/or (B) projects for which the bond is
conditioned on the payment of such taxes, increases, and penalties.
(b) The bond, in cases of cities and towns, ((shall)) must be filed
with the clerk or comptroller thereof, and any person or persons
performing such services or furnishing material to any subcontractor
((shall have)) has the same right under the provisions of such bond as
if such work, services, or material was furnished to the original
contractor((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)).
(2) The provisions of RCW 39.08.010 through 39.08.030 ((shall)) do
not apply to any money loaned or advanced to any such contractor,
subcontractor, or other person in the performance of any such work((:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
(3) On contracts of thirty-five thousand dollars or less, at the
option of the contractor the respective public entity may, in lieu of
the bond, retain fifty percent of the contract amount for a period of
thirty days after date of final acceptance, or until receipt of all
necessary releases from the department of revenue, the employment
security department, and the department of labor and industries and
settlement of any liens filed under chapter 60.28 RCW, whichever is
later((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
(4) For contracts of one hundred thousand dollars or less, the
public entity may accept a full payment and performance bond from an
individual surety or sureties((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
(5) The surety must agree to be bound by the laws of the state of
Washington and subjected to the jurisdiction of the state of
Washington.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.08.030 and 2009 c 473 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The bond mentioned in RCW 39.08.010 ((shall)) must be in an
amount equal to the full contract price agreed to be paid for such work
or improvement, except under subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
and ((shall)) must be to the state of Washington, except as otherwise
provided in RCW 39.08.100, and except in cases of cities and towns, in
which cases such municipalities may by general ordinance fix and
determine the amount of such bond and to whom such bond ((shall run:
PROVIDED,)) runs. However, the same ((shall)) may not be for a less
amount than twenty-five percent of the contract price of any such
improvement, and may designate that the same ((shall be)) is payable to
such city, and not to the state of Washington, and all such persons
mentioned in RCW 39.08.010 ((shall)) have a right of action in his,
her, or their own name or names on such bond for work done by such
laborers or mechanics, and for materials furnished or provisions and
goods supplied and furnished in the prosecution of such work, or the
making of such improvements, and the state has a right of action for
the collection of taxes, increases, and penalties specified in RCW
39.08.010: PROVIDED, That, except for the state with respect to claims
for taxes, increases, and penalties specified in RCW 39.08.010, such
persons ((shall)) do not have any right of action on such bond for any
sum whatever, unless within thirty days from and after the completion
of the contract with an acceptance of the work by the affirmative
action of the board, council, commission, trustees, officer, or body
acting for the state, county or municipality, or other public body,
city, town or district, the laborer, mechanic or subcontractor, or
material supplier, or person claiming to have supplied materials,
provisions or goods for the prosecution of such work, or the making of
such improvement, ((shall)) must present to and file with such board,
council, commission, trustees or body acting for the state, county or
municipality, or other public body, city, town or district, a notice in
writing in substance as follows:

(b) Such notice ((shall)) must be signed by the person or
corporation making the claim or giving the notice, and ((said)) the
notice, after being presented and filed, ((shall be)) is a public
record open to inspection by any person, and in any suit or action
brought against such surety or sureties by any such person or
corporation to recover for any of the items ((hereinbefore)) specified
in this section, the claimant ((shall be)) is entitled to recover in
addition to all other costs, attorney's fees in such sum as the court
((shall)) adjudges reasonable((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no)).
However, attorney's fees ((shall be)) are not allowed in any suit or
action brought or instituted before the expiration of thirty days
following the date of filing of the notice ((hereinbefore mentioned:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That)) as provided in this section. However, any
city may avail itself of the provisions of RCW 39.08.010 through
39.08.030, notwithstanding any charter provisions in conflict
((herewith: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)) with this section. Moreover,
any city or town may impose any other or further conditions and
obligations in such bond as may be deemed necessary for its proper
protection in the fulfillment of the terms of the contract secured
thereby, and not in conflict ((herewith)) with this section. The
thirty-day notice requirement under this subsection does not apply to
claims made by the state for taxes, increases, and penalties specified
in RCW 39.08.010.
(2) Under the job order contracting procedure described in RCW
39.10.420, bonds will be in an amount not less than the dollar value of
all open work orders.
(3)(a) On highway construction contracts administered by the
department of transportation with an estimated contract price of two
hundred fifty million dollars or more, the department may authorize
bonds in an amount less than the full contract price of the project.
If a bond less than the full contract price is authorized by the
department, the bond must be in the form of a performance bond and a
separate payment bond. The department ((shall)) must fix the amount of
the performance bond on a contract-by-contract basis to adequately
protect one hundred percent of the state's exposure to loss. The
amount of the performance bond must not be less than two hundred fifty
million dollars. The payment bond must be in an amount fixed by the
department but must not be less than the amount of the performance
bond. The secretary of transportation must approve each performance
bond and payment bond authorized to be less than the full contract
price of a project. Before the secretary may approve any bond
authorized to be less than the full contract price of a project, the
office of financial management ((shall)) must review and approve the
analysis supporting the amount of the bond set by the department to
ensure that one hundred percent of the state's exposure to loss is
adequately protected. All the requirements of this chapter apply
respectively to the individual performance and payment bonds. The
performance bond is solely for the protection of the department. The
payment bond is solely for: (i) The protection of laborers, mechanics,
subcontractors, and suppliers mentioned in RCW 39.08.010; and (ii) the
state, with respect to the taxes specified in RCW 39.08.010.
(b) The department ((shall)) must develop risk assessment
guidelines and gain approval of these guidelines from the office of
financial management before implementing (a) of this subsection. The
guidelines must include a clear process for how the department measures
the state's exposure to loss and how the performance bond amount,
determined under (a) of this subsection, adequately protects one
hundred percent of the state's exposure to loss.
(c) The department ((shall)) must report to the house of
representatives and senate transportation committees by December 1,
2012: Each project where the department authorized bonds that were
less than the full contract price; the difference between the project
amount and the bond requirements; the number of bidders on the project;
and other information that documents the effects of the reduced bond
amounts on the project.
(4) Where retainage is not withheld pursuant to RCW
60.28.011(1)(b), upon final acceptance of the public works project, the
state, county, municipality, or other public body must within thirty
days notify the department of revenue, the employment security
department, and the department of labor and industries of the
completion of contracts over thirty-five thousand dollars.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.08.030 and 2007 c 218 s 89 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The bond mentioned in RCW 39.08.010 ((shall)) must be in an
amount equal to the full contract price agreed to be paid for such work
or improvement, except under subsection (2) of this section, and
((shall)) must be to the state of Washington, except as otherwise
provided in RCW 39.08.100, and except in cases of cities and towns, in
which cases such municipalities may by general ordinance fix and
determine the amount of such bond and to whom such bond ((shall run:
PROVIDED,)) runs. However, the same ((shall)) may not be for a less
amount than twenty-five percent of the contract price of any such
improvement, and may designate that the same ((shall)) must be payable
to such city, and not to the state of Washington, and all such persons
mentioned in RCW 39.08.010 ((shall)) have a right of action in his,
her, or their own name or names on such bond for work done by such
laborers or mechanics, and for materials furnished or provisions and
goods supplied and furnished in the prosecution of such work, or the
making of such improvements, and the state has a right of action for
the collection of taxes, increases, and penalties specified in RCW
39.08.010: PROVIDED, That, except for the state with respect to claims
for taxes, increases, and penalties specified in RCW 39.08.010, such
persons ((shall)) do not have any right of action on such bond for any
sum whatever, unless within thirty days from and after the completion
of the contract with an acceptance of the work by the affirmative
action of the board, council, commission, trustees, officer, or body
acting for the state, county or municipality, or other public body,
city, town or district, the laborer, mechanic or subcontractor, or
material supplier, or person claiming to have supplied materials,
provisions or goods for the prosecution of such work, or the making of
such improvement, ((shall)) must present to and file with such board,
council, commission, trustees or body acting for the state, county or
municipality, or other public body, city, town or district, a notice in
writing in substance as follows:

(b) Such notice ((shall)) must be signed by the person or
corporation making the claim or giving the notice, and ((said)) the
notice, after being presented and filed, ((shall be)) is a public
record open to inspection by any person, and in any suit or action
brought against such surety or sureties by any such person or
corporation to recover for any of the items ((hereinbefore)) specified
in this section, the claimant ((shall be)) is entitled to recover in
addition to all other costs, attorney's fees in such sum as the court
((shall)) adjudges reasonable((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no)).
However, attorney's fees ((shall be)) are not allowed in any suit or
action brought or instituted before the expiration of thirty days
following the date of filing of the notice ((hereinbefore mentioned:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That)) as provided in this section. However, any
city may avail itself of the provisions of RCW 39.08.010 through
39.08.030, notwithstanding any charter provisions in conflict
((herewith: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)) with this section. Moreover,
any city or town may impose any other or further conditions and
obligations in such bond as may be deemed necessary for its proper
protection in the fulfillment of the terms of the contract secured
thereby, and not in conflict ((herewith)) with this section. The
thirty-day notice requirement under this subsection does not apply to
claims made by the state for taxes, increases, and penalties specified
in RCW 39.08.010.
(2) Under the job order contracting procedure described in RCW
((39.10.130)) 39.10.420, bonds will be in an amount not less than the
dollar value of all open work orders.
(3) Where retainage is not withheld pursuant to RCW
60.28.011(1)(b), upon final acceptance of the public works project, the
state, county, municipality, or other public body must within thirty
days notify the department of revenue, the employment security
department, and the department of labor and industries of the
completion of contracts over thirty-five thousand dollars.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.12.040 and 2012 c 129 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, before
payment is made by or on behalf of the state, or any county,
municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws, of any sum
or sums due on account of a public works contract, it ((shall be)) is
the duty of the officer or person charged with the custody and
disbursement of public funds to require the contractor and each and
every subcontractor from the contractor or a subcontractor to submit to
such officer a "Statement of Intent to Pay Prevailing Wages". For a
contract in excess of ten thousand dollars, the statement of intent to
pay prevailing wages ((shall)) must include:
(((a))) (i) The contractor's registration certificate number; and
(((b))) (ii) The prevailing rate of wage for each classification of
workers entitled to prevailing wages under RCW 39.12.020 and the
estimated number of workers in each classification.
(b) Each statement of intent to pay prevailing wages must be
approved by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries before it is submitted to the disbursing officer. Unless
otherwise authorized by the department of labor and industries, each
voucher claim submitted by a contractor for payment on a project
estimate ((shall)) must state that the prevailing wages have been paid
in accordance with the prefiled statement or statements of intent to
pay prevailing wages on file with the public agency. Following the
final acceptance of a public works project, it ((shall be)) is the duty
of the officer charged with the disbursement of public funds, to
require the contractor and each and every subcontractor from the
contractor or a subcontractor to submit to such officer an (("))
affidavit of wages paid((")) before the funds retained according to the
provisions of RCW 60.28.011 are released to the contractor. On a
public works project where no retainage is withheld pursuant to RCW
60.28.011(1)(b), the affidavit of wages paid must be submitted to the
state, county, municipality, or other public body charged with the duty
of disbursing or authorizing disbursement of public funds prior to
final acceptance of the public works project. If a subcontractor
performing work on a public works project fails to submit an
(("))affidavit of wages paid((")) form, the contractor or subcontractor
with whom the subcontractor had a contractual relationship for the
project may file the forms on behalf of the nonresponsive
subcontractor. Affidavit forms may only be filed on behalf of a
nonresponsive subcontractor who has ceased operations or failed to file
as required by this section. ((Filings made on behalf of a
subcontractor may not be accepted sooner than thirty-one days after the
acceptance date of the public works project and)) The contractor filing
the affidavit must accept responsibility for payment of prevailing
wages unpaid by the subcontractor on the project pursuant to RCW
39.12.020 and 39.12.065. Intentionally filing a false affidavit on
behalf of a subcontractor subjects the filer to the same penalties as
are provided in RCW 39.12.050. Each affidavit of wages paid must be
certified by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries before it is submitted to the disbursing officer.
(2) As an alternate to the procedures provided for in subsection
(1) of this section, for public works projects of two thousand five
hundred dollars or less and for projects where the limited public works
process under RCW 39.04.155(3) is followed:
(a) An awarding agency may authorize the contractor or
subcontractor to submit the statement of intent to pay prevailing wages
directly to the officer or person charged with the custody or
disbursement of public funds in the awarding agency without approval by
the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries.
The awarding agency ((shall)) must retain such statement of intent to
pay prevailing wages for a period of not less than three years.
(b) Upon final acceptance of the public works project, the awarding
agency ((shall)) must require the contractor or subcontractor to submit
an affidavit of wages paid. Upon receipt of the affidavit of wages
paid, the awarding agency may pay the contractor or subcontractor in
full, including funds that would otherwise be retained according to the
provisions of RCW 60.28.011. Within thirty days of receipt of the
affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency ((shall)) must submit the
affidavit of wages paid to the industrial statistician of the
department of labor and industries for approval.
(c) A statement of intent to pay prevailing wages and an affidavit
of wages paid ((shall)) must be on forms approved by the department of
labor and industries.
(d) In the event of a wage claim and a finding for the claimant by
the department of labor and industries where the awarding agency has
used the alternative process provided for in this subsection (2) ((of
this section)), the awarding agency ((shall)) must pay the wages due
directly to the claimant. If the contractor or subcontractor did not
pay the wages stated in the affidavit of wages paid, the awarding
agency may take action at law to seek reimbursement from the contractor
or subcontractor of wages paid to the claimant, and may prohibit the
contractor or subcontractor from bidding on any public works contract
of the awarding agency for up to one year.
(e) Nothing in this section ((shall)) may be interpreted to allow
an awarding agency to subdivide any public works project of more than
two thousand five hundred dollars for the purpose of circumventing the
procedures required by subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.04.082 and 1967 c 108 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in ((this act the term)) chapter 108, Laws of 1967, "urban
public transportation system" ((shall)) means a system for the public
transportation of persons or property by buses, streetcars, trains,
electric trolley coaches, other public transit vehicles, or any
combination thereof operating in or through predominantly urban areas
and owned and operated by the state, any public agency, any city or
county or any municipal corporation of the state, including all
structures, facilities, vehicles and other property rights and interest
forming a part of such a system.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.28.140 and 1991 c 322 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
When in the opinion of the governing authorities representing the
department and any public agency, instrumentality, municipal
corporation, or political subdivision of the state of Washington, any
highway, road, ((or)) street, or urban public transportation system
will be benefited or improved by constructing, reconstructing,
locating, relocating, laying out, repairing, surveying, altering,
improving, or maintaining, or by the establishment adjacent to, under,
upon, within, or above any portion of any such highway, road, ((or))
street ((of an)), or urban public transportation system, by either the
department or any public agency, instrumentality, municipal
corporation, or political subdivision of the state, and it is in the
public interest to do so, the authorities may enter into cooperative
agreements wherein either agrees to perform the work and furnish the
materials necessary and pay the cost thereof, including necessary
engineering assistance, which costs and expenses ((shall)) must be
reimbursed by the party whose responsibility it was to do or perform
the work or improvement in the first instance. The work may be done by
either day labor or contract, and the cooperative agreement between the
parties ((shall)) must provide for the method of reimbursement. In the
case of some special benefit or improvement to a state highway derived
from any project that assists in preventing or minimizing flood damages
as defined in RCW 86.16.120 or from the construction of any public
works project, including any urban public transportation system, the
department may contribute to the cost thereof by making direct payment
to the particular state department, agency, instrumentality, municipal
corporation, or political subdivision on the basis of benefits
received, but such payment ((shall)) may be made only after a
cooperative agreement has been entered into for a specified amount or
on an actual cost basis prior to the commencement of the particular
public works project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 47.28 RCW
to read as follows:
When the department plans to administer a contract to engineer or
construct a project; or oversee or perform work for another public
agency, instrumentality, municipal corporation, or political
subdivision; and the public agency, instrumentality, municipal
corporation, or political subdivision plans to administer a contract to
engineer or construct a project; or oversee or perform work, for the
department, the department may waive application of its indirect costs
by entering into a reciprocal agreement with the public agency,
instrumentality, municipal corporation, or political subdivision in
which each party agrees to waive indirect costs related to a project or
work that will be performed by the party for the other party's benefit.
The reciprocal agreement must specify the project or work to be
performed by each party and may be for a maximum term of ten years,
unless amended by the parties. Each party's obligation for
reimbursement of indirect costs under RCW 47.28.140, 39.34.130, and
43.09.210 is deemed to be satisfied by the execution of a reciprocal
agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 3 of this act expires June 30, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 4 of this act takes effect June 30,
2016.

--- END ---