BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that laws enacted
in 2007, 2010, and 2011 provide a framework for a statewide dropout
prevention, intervention, and reengagement system that focuses on local
partnerships between schools, families, and communities, as well as
state-level collaboration among multiple agencies and organizations.
However, support for the system continues to rely primarily on
temporary grants. There is a need to continue to develop ongoing
programs and sustainable funding sources, as well as the local and
regional capacity to deliver services. There is also a need to ensure
that the various program initiatives operate in a coordinated fashion.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to take steps to enhance the
current dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement system by
clarifying the laws pertaining to the statewide system and the state-level work group charged with overseeing the system and providing
specific additional support for some of the highest need students,
including those who have already dropped out of school and those who
are enrolled in chronically low-performing schools.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.175.025 and 2007 c 408 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this purpose,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall ((create
a grant program and)) award grants to local partnerships of schools,
families, and communities to ((begin the phase in of a statewide
comprehensive)) design and implement a K-12 dropout prevention,
intervention, and ((retrieval)) reengagement system as defined in RCW
28A.175.074. ((This program)) For purposes of RCW 28A.175.025 through
28A.175.075, these grants shall be known as ((the)) building bridges
((program)) grants.
(((1) For purposes of RCW 28A.175.025 through 28A.175.075, a
"building bridges program" means a local partnership of schools,
families, and communities that provides all of the following programs
or activities:
(a) A system that identifies individual students at risk of
dropping out from middle through high school based on local predictive
data, including state assessment data starting in the fourth grade, and
provides timely interventions for such students and for dropouts,
including a plan for educational success as already required by the
student learning plan as defined under RCW 28A.655.061. Students
identified shall include foster care youth, youth involved in the
juvenile justice system, and students receiving special education
services under chapter 28A.155 RCW;
(b) Coaches or mentors for students as necessary;
(c) Staff responsible for coordination of community partners that
provide a seamless continuum of academic and nonacademic support in
schools and communities;
(d) Retrieval or reentry activities; and
(e) Alternative educational programming, including, but not limited
to, career and technical education exploratory and preparatory programs
and online learning opportunities.
(2) One of the grants awarded under this section shall be for a
two-year demonstration project focusing on providing fifth through
twelfth grade students with a program that utilizes technology and is
integrated with state standards, basic academics, cross-cultural
exposures, and age-appropriate preemployment training. The project
shall:
(a) Establish programs in two western Washington and one eastern
Washington urban areas;
(b) Identify at-risk students in each of the distinct communities
and populations and implement strategies to close the achievement gap;
(c) Collect and report data on participant characteristics and
outcomes of the project, including the characteristics and outcomes
specified under RCW 28A.175.035(1)(e); and
(d) Submit a report to the legislature by December 1, 2009.))

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.175.035 and 2011 c 288 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Identify criteria for building bridges grants and evaluate
proposals for funding in consultation with the workforce training and
education coordinating board;
(b) Develop and monitor requirements for grant recipients to:
(i) Use a dropout early warning and intervention system to identify
students who ((both fail the Washington assessment of student learning
and drop)) are at risk for academic failure and use data systems to
identify youth who have already dropped out of school;
(ii) Identify their own strengths and gaps in services provided to
youth;
(iii) Set their own local goals for program outcomes;
(iv) Use research-based and emerging best practices that lead to
positive outcomes in implementing ((the building bridges)) a local
program; and
(v) Coordinate an outreach campaign to bring public and private
organizations together and to provide information about ((the))
building bridges ((program)) grants to the local community;
(c) In setting the requirements under (b) of this subsection,
encourage creativity and provide for flexibility in implementing
((the)) a local program using the building bridges ((program)) grants;
(d) Identify and disseminate successful practices;
(e) Develop requirements for grant recipients to collect and report
data, including, but not limited to:
(i) The number of and demographics of students served including,
but not limited to, information regarding a student's race and
ethnicity, a student's household income, a student's housing status,
whether a student is a foster youth or youth involved in the juvenile
justice system, whether a student is disabled, and the primary language
spoken at a student's home;
(ii) ((Washington assessment of student learning)) Scores on the
statewide student assessment;
(iii) Dropout rates;
(iv) On-time graduation rates;
(v) Extended graduation rates;
(vi) Credentials obtained;
(vii) Absenteeism rates;
(viii) Truancy rates; and
(ix) Credit retrieval; and
(f) Contract with a third party to evaluate the infrastructure and
implementation of the partnership including the leveraging of outside
resources that relate to the goal of the partnership. The third-party
contractor shall also evaluate the performance and effectiveness of the
partnerships relative to the type of entity, as identified in RCW
28A.175.045, serving as the lead agency for the partnership((; and
(g) Report to the legislature by December 1, 2008)).
(2) In performing its duties under this section, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction is encouraged to consult with the
work group ((identified)) established in RCW 28A.175.075.
(3) In selecting recipients for grant funds appropriated under RCW
28A.175.135, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall use a streamlined and expedited application and review process
for those programs that have already proven to be successful in dropout
prevention.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.175.045 and 2007 c 408 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
In awarding ((the grants under RCW 28A.175.025)) building bridges
grants, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
prioritize schools or districts with dropout rates above the statewide
average and shall attempt to award ((building bridges program)) grants
to different geographic regions of the state. Eligible recipients
shall be one of the following entities acting as a lead agency for the
local partnership: A school district, a tribal school, an area
workforce development council, an educational service district, an
accredited institution of higher education, a vocational skills center,
a federally recognized tribe, a community organization, or a nonprofit
501(c)(3) corporation. If the recipient is not a school district, at
least one school district must be identified within the partnership.
The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that grants are
distributed proportionately between school districts and other
recipients. This requirement may be waived if the superintendent of
public instruction finds that the quality of the programs or
applications from these entities does not warrant the awarding of the
grants proportionately.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.175.055 and 2007 c 408 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
To be eligible for a building bridges grant ((under RCW
28A.175.025)), grant applicants shall:
(1) Build or demonstrate a commitment to building a broad-based
partnership of schools, families, and community members to provide an
effective and efficient ((building bridges program)) K-12 dropout
prevention, intervention, and reengagement system. The partnership
shall consider an effective model for school-community partnerships and
include local membership from, but not limited to, school districts,
tribal schools, secondary career and technical education programs,
skill centers that serve the local community, an educational service
district, the area workforce development council, accredited
institutions of higher education, tribes or other cultural
organizations, the parent teacher association, the juvenile court,
prosecutors and defenders, the local health department, health care
agencies, public transportation agencies, local division
representatives of the department of social and health services,
businesses, city or county government agencies, civic organizations,
and appropriate youth-serving community-based organizations.
Interested parents and students shall be actively included whenever
possible;
(2) Demonstrate how the grant will enhance any dropout prevention
and intervention programs and services already in place in the
district;
(3) Provide a twenty-five percent match that may include in-kind
resources from within the partnership;
(4) Track and report data required by the grant; and
(5) Describe how the dropout prevention, intervention, and
((retrieval)) reengagement system will be sustained after initial
funding, including roles of each of the partners.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.175.074 and 2010 c 243 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout ((section 3,
chapter 243, Laws of 2010 and RCW 28A.175.075)) this chapter unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) (("Critical community members" means representatives in the
local community from among the following agencies and organizations:
Student/parent organizations, parents and families, local government,
law enforcement, juvenile corrections, any tribal organization in the
local school district, the local health district, nonprofit and social
service organizations serving youth, and faith organizations.
(2))) "Dropout early warning and intervention ((data)) system"
means a systemic approach to identify students at risk of dropping out
and an intervention process to link identified students to the
appropriate services and support, relying on a student information
system that provides the necessary data ((needed to conduct a universal
screening to identify students at risk of dropping out, catalog student
interventions, and monitor student progress towards graduation)) in an
easily interpreted format.
(2) "Graduation coach" means an individual, working in consultation
with counselors and other school staff as provided in the model policy
on graduation coaches developed by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction in 2012, who is assigned to identify and provide
intervention services to students who have dropped out or are at risk
of academic failure or of not graduating on time through the following
activities:
(a) Monitoring and advising on individual student progress toward
graduation;
(b) Providing student support services and case management;
(c) Motivating students to focus on a graduation plan;
(d) Encouraging family and community engagement;
(e) Connecting families and students with appropriate school and
community resources;
(f) Securing supplemental academic services for students;
(g) Implementing schoolwide dropout prevention programs and
interventions; and
(h) Analyzing data to identify at-risk students.
(3) "K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement
system" means a system that provides all of the following functions:
(a) Engaging in school improvement planning specifically focused on
improving high school graduation rates and other indicators correlated
to being on track for graduation, including goal-setting and action
planning, based on a comprehensive assessment of strengths and
challenges;
(b) Providing prevention activities including, but not limited to,
emotionally and physically safe school environments, implementation of
a comprehensive system of learning support with tiered intervention,
social-emotional and behavioral skills development, expanded
opportunities for students to develop sustained and meaningful
relationships with caring adults, a comprehensive guidance and
counseling model facilitated by certified school counselors or other
qualified staff, core academic instruction, frequent feedback on
student progress, and career and technical education exploratory and
preparatory programs;
(c) Identifying vulnerable students based on a dropout early
warning and intervention ((data)) system;
(d) Providing timely academic and nonacademic group and individual
interventions for vulnerable students based on ((a)) the specific
challenges and assets of each child by using a tiered intervention
system such as the response to intervention model, ((including))
planning and sharing ((of)) information at critical academic
transitions, using intervention resources from the school system and
the broader community, and assessing the effectiveness of each
intervention provided;
(e) Providing graduation coaches, school success coaches, mentors,
certified school counselors, ((and/or)) or case managers for vulnerable
students identified as needing a more intensive one-on-one adult
relationship;
(f) Establishing and providing staff, such as family and community
engagement coordinators as described under section 10 of this act, to
coordinate a ((school/family/community)) school, family, and community
partnership that assists in building ((a K-12 dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement)) the system;
(g) Providing retrieval or reentry activities; ((and))
(h) Providing alternative educational programming including, but
not limited to, credit retrieval and online learning opportunities; and
(i) Designing and providing wraparound services to support
vulnerable students.
(4) (("School/family/community partnership" means a partnership
between a school or schools, families, and the community, that engages
critical community members in a formal, structured partnership with
local school districts in a coordinated effort to provide comprehensive
support services and improve outcomes for vulnerable youth.)) "School
success coach" means an individual, working in consultation with
counselors and other school staff, who is assigned to identify and
provide early intervention services for students using similar
strategies as a graduation coach, but targeted toward elementary and
middle school students to facilitate their continued enrollment,
engagement, and progress in school.
(5) "Vulnerable students" means students who are in foster care,
involved in the juvenile justice system, receiving special education
services under chapter 28A.155 RCW, recent immigrants, homeless,
emotionally traumatized, or are facing behavioral health issues, and
students deemed at-risk of school failure as identified by a dropout
early warning data system or other assessment.
(6) "Wraparound services" means a team-based approach to delivering
dropout prevention and intervention services that is based on the needs
and strengths of students and their families; uses an array of
community and regional resources; addresses academic, social,
emotional, health, and economic issues as needed; and is culturally
competent and outcome-based.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.175.075 and 2013 c 23 s 46 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
establish a state-level ((building bridges)) work group that includes
K-12 and state agencies that work with youth who have dropped out or
are at risk of dropping out of school, to be known as the graduation:
a team effort (GATE) work group. The purpose of the GATE work group is
to establish a common vision and agenda for helping all students reach
high school graduation. The following agencies shall appoint
representatives to the work group: The office of the superintendent of
public instruction, the workforce training and education coordinating
board, the department of early learning, the employment security
department, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
department of health, the community mobilization office, and the
children's services and behavioral health and recovery divisions of the
department of social and health services. The work group should also
consist of one representative from each of the following agencies and
organizations: A statewide organization representing career and
technical education programs including skill centers; the juvenile
courts or the office of juvenile justice, or both; the Washington
association of prosecuting attorneys; the Washington state office of
public defense; accredited institutions of higher education; the
educational service districts; the area workforce development councils;
parent and educator associations; educational opportunity gap oversight
and accountability committee; office of the education ombuds; local
school districts; agencies or organizations that provide services to
special education students; community organizations serving youth;
federally recognized tribes and urban tribal centers; ((each of the
major political caucuses of the senate and house of representatives;))
and the minority commissions. Other agencies, organizations, or
individuals may be invited to participate in the work group.
(2) ((To assist and enhance the work of the building bridges
programs established in RCW 28A.175.025, the state-level)) The GATE
work group shall:
(a) Build on the materials and work accomplished by the building
bridges work group first established in 2007;
(b) Align the objectives and operation of individual dropout
prevention, intervention, and reengagement programs and initiatives,
including but not limited to the various programs established under
this chapter;
(c) Convene working subgroups as needed to support development of
a statewide K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement
system;
(d) Identify and make recommendations to the legislature for the
reduction of fiscal, legal, and regulatory barriers that prevent
coordination of program resources across agencies at the state and
local level;
(((b))) (e) Develop and track performance measures and benchmarks
for each partner agency or organization across the state including
performance measures and benchmarks based on student characteristics
and outcomes specified in RCW 28A.175.035(1)(e); and
(((c))) (f) Identify and disseminate research-based and emerging
best practices regarding prevention, intervention, and ((retrieval))
reengagement programs.
(3)(((a) The work group shall report to the quality education
council, appropriate committees of the legislature, and the governor on
an annual basis beginning December 1, 2007, with proposed strategies
for building K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement
systems in local communities throughout the state including, but not
limited to, recommendations for implementing emerging best practices,
needed additional resources, and eliminating barriers.
(b) By September 15, 2010, the work group shall report on:
(i) A recommended state goal and annual state targets for the
percentage of students graduating from high school;
(ii) A recommended state goal and annual state targets for the
percentage of youth who have dropped out of school who should be
reengaged in education and be college and work ready;
(iii) Recommended funding for supporting career guidance and the
planning and implementation of K-12 dropout prevention, intervention,
and reengagement systems in school districts and a plan for phasing the
funding into the program of basic education, beginning in the 2011-2013
biennium; and
(iv) A plan for phasing in the expansion of the current school
improvement planning program to include state-funded, dropout-focused
school improvement technical assistance for school districts in
significant need of improvement regarding high school graduation
rates.)) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
submit a biennial report to the education committees of the legislature
by December 1st of each odd-numbered year that includes activities
undertaken and measurable indicators of progress toward achieving a
statewide K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement
system.
(4) State agencies in the ((building bridges)) GATE work group
shall work together, wherever feasible, on the following activities to
support ((school/family/community)) partnerships of schools, families,
and communities engaged in building K-12 dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement systems:
(a) Providing opportunities for coordination and flexibility of
program eligibility and funding criteria;
(b) Providing joint funding;
(c) Developing protocols and templates for model agreements on
sharing records and data;
(d) Providing joint professional development opportunities that
provide knowledge and training on:
(i) Research-based and promising practices;
(ii) The availability of programs and services for vulnerable
youth; and
(iii) Cultural competence.
(((5) The building bridges work group shall make recommendations to
the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2010, on a state-level
and regional infrastructure for coordinating services for vulnerable
youth. Recommendations must address the following issues:
(a) Whether to adopt an official conceptual approach or framework
for all entities working with vulnerable youth that can support
coordinated planning and evaluation;
(b) The creation of a performance-based management system,
including outcomes, indicators, and performance measures relating to
vulnerable youth and programs serving them, including accountability
for the dropout issue;
(c) The development of regional and/or county-level multipartner
youth consortia with a specific charge to assist school districts and
local communities in building K-12 comprehensive dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement systems;
(d) The development of integrated or school-based one-stop shopping
for services that would:
(i) Provide individualized attention to the neediest youth and
prioritized access to services for students identified by a dropout
early warning and intervention data system;
(ii) Establish protocols for coordinating data and services,
including getting data release at time of intake and common assessment
and referral processes; and
(iii) Build a system of single case managers across agencies;
(e) Launching a statewide media campaign on increasing the high
school graduation rate; and
(f) Developing a statewide database of available services for
vulnerable youth.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop
and make available a dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement
system assessment tool to support school, family, and community
partnerships in designing and implementing a local system. The
assessment tool must have the capacity to identify school and community
strengths and gaps in services, and evaluate the effectiveness of
existing strategies to prevent and reengage dropouts. Existing
community needs assessments, such as the community health improvement
plan or other plans, may also be used to provide data for identifying
strengths and gaps related to the dropout prevention, intervention, and
reengagement system.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the GATE work group and within available funds, shall
continue development of a comprehensive and customizable dropout early
warning and intervention system for use by school districts and school,
family, and community partnerships.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish
a program to provide graduation coaches to high schools that are
struggling to improve their high school graduation rates and school
success coaches to selected elementary and middle schools whose
students enroll in these high schools.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
rank order all public high schools in the state based on a combination
of factors, including but not limited to graduation rates, dropout
rates, attendance, suspension and expulsion rates, results from dropout
early warning and intervention system data, teen pregnancy rates in the
surrounding county, and evidence that the high school and the
elementary and middle schools whose students enroll in the high school
are ready to support and benefit from graduation coaches and school
success coaches. The office shall place a significant priority on
graduation rates as a ranking factor.
(3) Each year the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall allocate funds to support one graduation coach per
five hundred students enrolled in grades nine through twelve in a high
school and one school success coach per five hundred students enrolled
in grades kindergarten through eight in selected elementary and middle
schools whose students enroll in the high school. Funds shall be
allocated starting with the lowest-ranking schools until all available
funds have been allocated. The office must fully fund the allocation
of coaches in an eligible high school and the selected elementary and
middle schools before allocating funds for the next group of schools on
the ranked order list. The allocation amount per coach shall be based
on the school district's allocation for salaries as calculated under
RCW 28A.150.410 for certificated instructional staff, plus fringe
benefits as established in the omnibus appropriations act.
(4) A school district receiving funds under this section must use
the funds to assign individuals to the schools that generated the funds
to conduct the activities of a graduation coach or a school success
coach as defined under RCW 28A.175.074. Schools may use the funds to
assign employees to serve as coaches or may create partnerships and
contracts with community-based organizations to assign individuals from
the community to serve as coaches. The recipient schools must also use
the dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement system
assessment tool developed under section 8 of this act to design
additional dropout prevention and intervention strategies for those
schools.
(5) To the extent funds are available, recipient schools are
eligible to receive funds under this section for three consecutive
years or until the schools no longer qualify for the allocation based
on their ranking, whichever is longer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that research studies have found a
positive relationship between family and community engagement in
students' education and improved attendance, behavior, social skills,
and academic achievement. This relationship holds across families of
all economic, racial, ethnic, and educational backgrounds and for
students of all ages.
(2) Using funds allocated under RCW 28A.150.260 and from other
available sources, school districts are encouraged to assign family and
community engagement coordinators to schools. Examples of activities
conducted by family and community engagement coordinators may include,
but are not limited to:
(a) Developing school, family, and community partnerships to
deliver academic and nonacademic wraparound services for students and
build a comprehensive K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and
reengagement system as described under RCW 28A.175.074;
(b) Encouraging and facilitating family engagement in student
learning, both at home and at school;
(c) Creating opportunities for expanded communication and dialogue
with families that includes outreach, input, responsiveness, and
collaboration;
(d) Engaging in culturally competent outreach and partnership with
diverse families and communities;
(e) Serving as the school or district liaison for community-based
activities such as mentors, before and after-school programs, family
education, and health and social services; and
(f) Coordinating services delivered by community-based
organizations and local agencies to assure that services are focused on
priorities identified by the school based on student needs.

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of
state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school
districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic
education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as
follows:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a
basic education instructional allocation for each common school
district.
(2) The distribution formula under this section shall be for
allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under chapter
28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and
regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use
basic education instructional funds to implement a particular
instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires
school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student
ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay
for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this
section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning
period.
(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been
adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a
school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic
education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing
and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support
instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high,
middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section.
The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not
constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or
structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical
schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of
a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students
using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours
of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the
intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted
from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average
full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the
district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school
to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further
adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small
schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are
defined as follows:
(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;
(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight;
and
(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
six.
(4)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers
needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one
teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following
general education average class size of full-time equivalent students
per teacher:

General education
average
class size
Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23
Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium and beginning with schools with
the highest percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price
meals in the prior school year, the general education average class
size for grades K-3 shall be reduced until the average class size
funded under this subsection (4) is no more than 17.0 full-time
equivalent students per teacher beginning in the 2017-18 school year.
(c) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high
school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom teachers
based on the following number of full-time equivalent students per
teacher in career and technical education:

Career and technical
education average
class size
Approved career and technical education offered at
the middle school and high school level . . . . . . . . . . . . 26.57
Skill center programs meeting the standards established
by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction . . . . . . . . . . . . 22.76

(d) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum
specify:
(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than
fifty percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price
meals; and
(ii) A specialty average class size for laboratory science,
advanced placement, and international baccalaureate courses.
(5) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition
to classroom teachers:

Elementary
School Middle
School High
School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level
administrators . . . . . . . . . . . .
1.253
1.353
1.880

Teacher librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology,
and media to support school library media programs . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.663
0.519
0.523

Health and social services:

School nurses . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.076 0.060 0.096

Social workers . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.042 0.006 0.015

Psychologists . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.017 0.002 0.007

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach and graduation
advising . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.493
1.116
1.909

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional
services provided by classified employees . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.936
0.700
0.652

Office support and other noninstructional aides . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.012 2.325 3.269

Custodians . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.657 1.942 2.965

Classified staff providing student and staff safety . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.079 0.092 0.141

((Parent involvement)) Family and community engagement coordinators . . . . . . . . . . . . ((0.00))
0.0825 0.00 0.00

(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to
provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as
follows:

Staff per 1,000
K-12 students
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.628
Facilities, maintenance, and grounds . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.813
Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.332

(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district
to support certificated and classified staffing of central
administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under
subsections (4)(a) and (b) and (5) of this section and (a) of this
subsection.
(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to
school districts for career and technical education and skill center
administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified
in the omnibus appropriations act.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the minimum
allocation for each school district shall include allocations per
annual average full-time equivalent student for the following
materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted for inflation
from the 2008-09 school year:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $54.43
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $147.90
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $58.44
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $124.07
Instructional professional development for certified and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $9.04
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $73.27
Security and central office . . . . . . . . . . . . $50.76

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium, the minimum allocation for
maintenance, supplies, and operating costs shall be increased as
specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The following
allocations, adjusted for inflation from the 2007-08 school year, are
provided in the 2015-16 school year, after which the allocations shall
be adjusted annually for inflation as specified in the omnibus
appropriations act:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $113.80
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $309.21
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $122.17
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $259.39
Instructional professional development for certificated and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $18.89
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $153.18
Security and central office administration . . . . . . . . . . . . $106.12

(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this
section, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based
on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:
(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students
in grades seven through twelve;
(b) Laboratory science courses for students in grades nine through
twelve;
(c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades nine through twelve offered in a high school; and
(d) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades eleven and twelve offered through a skill center.
(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this
section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs
and services:
(a) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
underachieving students through the learning assistance program under
RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the
district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for
free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum
allocation for the program shall provide for each level of prototypical
school resources to provide, on a statewide average, 1.5156 hours per
week in extra instruction with a class size of fifteen learning
assistance program students per teacher.
(b) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students
whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be
based on the head count number of students in each school who are
eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction
program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum
allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide
resources to provide, on a statewide average, 4.7780 hours per week in
extra instruction with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction
program students per teacher. Notwithstanding other provisions of this
subsection (10), the actual per-student allocation may be scaled to
provide a larger allocation for students needing more intensive
intervention and a commensurate reduced allocation for students needing
less intensive intervention, as detailed in the omnibus appropriations
act.
(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for
highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030,
allocations shall be based on two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school district's full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs
shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590
hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen highly capable program
students per teacher.
(11) The allocations under subsections (4)(a) and (b), (5), (6),
and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW
28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental
instructional resources for students with disabilities.
(12)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high
schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this
section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are
eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such
students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the
omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and
reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.
(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4),
(7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter
28A.700 RCW.
(13) Allocations for students enrolled in dropout reengagement
programs as defined by RCW 28A.175.105 and approved under rules adopted
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under RCW
28A.175.115, shall be calculated as 1.22 times the statewide annual
average of the allocations otherwise generated under this section for
a full-time equivalent general education high school student or a full-time equivalent career and technical education high school student,
depending on the courses in which the students in dropout reengagement
programs are enrolled.
(14)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds
shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.
(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect.
(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each
month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall
be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional
hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the
present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review
of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the
common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 28A.310
RCW to read as follows:
Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose, a
corps of intervention specialists shall be located at educational
service districts, as determined by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, to assist schools and school districts in
developing responses to intervention models; positive behavioral
interventions and support systems; compassionate schools models;
strategies to improve school climate and prevent harassment,
intimidation, and bullying; and other research-based approaches to
providing early intervention and support for students.

Sec. 13 RCW 28A.175.145 and 2011 c 288 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose or otherwise
available in the account established in RCW 28A.175.155, beginning in
the 2011-12 school year and each year thereafter, a high school that
demonstrates improvement in its dropout prevention score compared to
the baseline school year as calculated under RCW 28A.175.140 may
receive a PASS program award as provided under this section. The
legislature intends to recognize and reward continuous improvement by
using a baseline year for calculating eligibility for PASS program
awards so that a high school retains previously earned award funds from
one year to the next unless its performance declines.
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
determine the amount of PASS program awards based on appropriated funds
and eligible high schools. The intent of the legislature is to provide
an award to each eligible high school commensurate with the degree of
improvement in the high school's dropout prevention score and the size
of the high school. The office must establish a minimum award amount.
If funds available for PASS program awards are not sufficient to
provide an award to each eligible high school, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall establish objective criteria
to prioritize awards based on eligible high schools with the greatest
need for additional dropout prevention and intervention services. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall encourage and
may require a high school receiving a PASS program award to demonstrate
an amount of community matching funds or an amount of in-kind community
services to support dropout prevention and intervention.
(c) Ninety percent of an award under this section must be allocated
to the eligible high school to be used for dropout prevention
activities in the school as specified in subsection (2) of this
section. The principal of the high school shall determine the use of
funds after consultation with parents and certificated and classified
staff of the school.
(d) Ten percent of an award under this section must be allocated to
the school district in which the eligible high school is located to be
used for dropout prevention activities as specified in subsection (2)
of this section in the high school or in other schools in the district.
(e) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may
withhold distribution of award funds under this section to an otherwise
eligible high school or school district if the superintendent of public
instruction issues a finding that the school or school district has
willfully manipulated the dropout prevention indicators under RCW
28A.175.140, for example by expelling, suspending, transferring, or
refusing to enroll students at risk of dropping out of school or at
risk of low achievement.
(2) High schools and school districts may use PASS program award
funds for any programs or activities that support the development of a
dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement system as described
in RCW 28A.175.074, offered directly by the school or school district
or under contract with education agencies or community-based
organizations, including but not limited to educational service
districts, workforce development councils, and boys and girls clubs.
Such programs or activities may include but are not limited to the
following:
(a) Strategies to close the achievement gap for disadvantaged
students and minority students;
(b) Use of graduation coaches as defined in RCW ((28A.175.150))
28A.175.074;
(c) Opportunity internship activities under RCW 28C.18.164;
(d) Dropout reengagement programs provided by community-based
organizations or community and technical colleges;
(e) Comprehensive guidance and planning programs as defined under
RCW 28A.600.045, including but not limited to the navigation 101
program;
(f) Reduced class sizes, extended school day, extended school year,
and tutoring programs for students identified as at risk of dropping
out of school, including instruction to assist these students in
meeting graduation requirements in mathematics and science;
(g) Outreach and counseling targeted to students identified as at
risk of dropping out of school, or who have dropped out of school, to
encourage them to consider learning alternatives such as
preapprenticeship programs, skill centers, running start, technical
high schools, and other options for completing a high school diploma;
(h) Preapprenticeship programs or running start for the trades
initiatives under RCW 49.04.190;
(i) Mentoring programs for students;
(j) Development and use of dropout early warning data systems;
(k) Counseling, resource and referral services, and intervention
programs to address social, behavioral, and health factors associated
with dropping out of school;
(l) Implementing programs for in-school suspension or other
strategies to avoid excluding middle and high school students from the
school whenever possible;
(m) Parent engagement activities such as home visits and off-campus
parent support group meetings related to dropout prevention and
reengagement; and
(n) Early learning programs for prekindergarten students.
(3) High schools and school districts are encouraged to implement
dropout prevention and reengagement strategies in a comprehensive and
systematic manner, using strategic planning, school improvement plans,
evaluation and feedback, and response to intervention tools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 RCW 28A.175.150 (PASS program -- Graduation
coach) and 2011 c 288 s 6 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Section 11 of this act takes effect
September 1, 2014.

--- END ---