BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.32.215 and 1998 c 311 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
((If any)) (1) The department may, by order, revoke the certificate
of registration of a taxpayer for any of the following reasons:
(a) A warrant issued under this chapter is not paid within thirty
days after it has been filed with the clerk of the superior court((, or
if any));
(b) The taxpayer is delinquent, for three consecutive reporting
periods, in the transmission to the department ((of revenue of retail
sales tax collected by the taxpayer, the department of revenue may, by
order, revoke the certificate of registration of the taxpayer against
whom the warrant was issued, and, if the order is entered, a copy
thereof shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the main entrance to
the taxpayer's place of business and shall remain posted until such
time as the warrant has been paid. Any certificate so revoked shall
not be reinstated, nor shall)) of retail sales tax collected by the
taxpayer; or
(c)(i)(A) The taxpayer was convicted of violating RCW 82.32.290(4)
and continues to engage in business without fully complying with RCW
82.32.290(4)(b) (i) through (iii); or
(B) A person convicted of violating RCW 82.32.290(4) is an owner,
officer, director, partner, trustee, member, or manager of the
taxpayer, and the person and taxpayer have not fully complied with RCW
82.32.290(4)(b) (i) through (iii).
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), the terms
"manager," "member," and "officer" mean the same as defined in RCW
82.32.145.
(2) If the department enters a final order revoking a taxpayer's
certificate of registration, a copy of the order must, if practicable,
be posted in a conspicuous place at the main entrance to the taxpayer's
place of business. The department may also post a final order revoking
a taxpayer's certificate of registration in any public facility, such
as a courthouse or post office, as may be allowed by the public entity
that owns or occupies the facility. A final order posted at the
taxpayer's place of business must remain posted until such time as the
taxpayer is eligible to have its certificate of registration reinstated
as provided in subsection (3) of this section or has abandoned the
premises. A taxpayer will not be deemed to have abandoned the premises
if the taxpayer or any person with an ownership interest in the
taxpayer continues to operate a substantially similar type of business
under a different legal entity at the same location.
(3) Any certificate revoked under subsection (1) of this section
may not be reinstated, nor may a new certificate of registration be
issued to the taxpayer, until:
(a) The amount due on the warrant has been paid, or provisions for
payment satisfactory to the department ((of revenue)) have been
entered, and until the taxpayer has deposited with the department ((of
revenue such)) security for payment of any taxes, increases, and
penalties, due or which may become due in an amount and under such
terms and conditions as the department of revenue may require, but the
amount of the security ((shall)) may not be greater than one-half the
estimated average annual liability of the taxpayer; or
(b) The taxpayer and, if applicable, the owner, officer, director,
partner, trustee, member, or manager of the taxpayer who was convicted
of violating RCW 82.32.290(4) are in full compliance with RCW
82.32.290(4)(b) (i) through (iii), if the certificate of registration
was revoked under the provisions of subsection (1)(c) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.32.290 and 2010 c 112 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) It ((shall be)) is unlawful:
(i) For any person to engage in business without having obtained a
certificate of registration as provided in this chapter;
(ii) For the president, vice president, secretary, treasurer, or
other officer of any company to cause or permit the company to engage
in business without having obtained a certificate of registration as
provided in this chapter;
(iii) For any person to tear down or remove any order or notice
posted by the department in violation of this chapter;
(iv) For any person to aid or abet another in any attempt to evade
the payment of any tax or any part thereof;
(v) For any purchaser to fraudulently sign or furnish to a seller
documentation authorized under RCW 82.04.470 without intent to resell
the property purchased or with intent to otherwise use the property in
a manner inconsistent with the claimed wholesale purchase; or
(vi) For any person to fail or refuse to permit the examination of
any book, paper, account, record, or other data by the department or
its duly authorized agent; or to fail or refuse to permit the
inspection or appraisal of any property by the department or its duly
authorized agent; or to refuse to offer testimony or produce any record
as required.
(b) Any person violating any of the provisions of this subsection
(1) ((shall be)) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor in accordance with
chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2)(a) It ((shall be)) is unlawful:
(i) For any person to engage in business after revocation of a
certificate of registration unless the person's certification of
registration has been reinstated;
(ii) For the president, vice president, secretary, treasurer, or
other officer of any company to cause or permit the company to engage
in business after revocation of a certificate of registration unless
the company's certificate of registration has been reinstated; or
(iii) For any person to make any false or fraudulent return or
false statement in any return, with intent to defraud the state or
evade the payment of any tax or part thereof.
(b) Any person violating any of the provisions of this subsection
(2) ((shall be)) is guilty of a class C felony in accordance with
chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(3) In addition to the foregoing penalties, any person who
knowingly swears to or verifies any false or fraudulent return, or any
return containing any false or fraudulent statement with the intent
aforesaid, ((shall be)) is guilty of the offense of perjury in the
second degree; and any company for which a false return, or a return
containing a false statement, as aforesaid, is made, ((shall)) must be
punished, upon conviction thereof, by a fine of not more than one
thousand dollars.
(4)(a) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly sell, purchase,
install, transfer, manufacture, create, design, update, repair, use,
possess, or otherwise make available, in this state, any automated
sales suppression device or phantom-ware. However, it is not unlawful
for persons to possess or use automated sales suppression devices or
phantom-ware as authorized in section 3(6) of this act.
(b) It is unlawful for any person who has been convicted of
violating this section to engage in business, or participate in any
business as an owner, officer, director, partner, trustee, member, or
manager of the business, unless:
(i) All taxes, penalties, and interest lawfully due are paid;
(ii) The person pays in full all penalties and fines imposed on the
person for violating this section; and
(iii) The person, if the person is engaging in business subject to
tax under this title, or the business in which the person participates,
enters into a written agreement with the department for the electronic
monitoring of the business's sales, by a method acceptable to the
department, for five years at the business's expense.
(c)(i) Any person violating the provisions of this subsection,
including material breach of the monitoring agreement under (b)(iii) of
this subsection, is guilty of a class C felony in accordance with
chapter 9A.20 RCW and, as applicable, (c)(ii) of this subsection.
(ii) Any person violating the provisions of this subsection by
furnishing an automated sales suppression device or phantom-ware to
another person or by updating or repairing another person's automated
sales suppression device or phantom-ware is, in addition to the
punishments prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, subject to a mandatory
fine fixed by the court in an amount equal to the greater of ten
thousand dollars, the defendant's gain from the commission of the
crime, or the state's loss from the commission of the crime. For
purposes of this subsection (4)(c)(ii), "loss" means the total of all
taxes, penalties, and interest certified by the department to be due,
as of the date of sentencing, as a result of any violation of the
provisions of this subsection by a person using the automated sales
suppression device or phantom-ware obtained from, or updated or
repaired by, the defendant, which results in the defendant's conviction
for violating the provisions of this subsection.
(d) For the purposes of this subsection (4), the terms "manager,"
"member," and "officer" have the same meaning as in RCW 82.32.145.
(e) The definitions in section 3 of this act apply to this
subsection (4).
(5) All penalties or punishments provided in this section ((shall
be)) are in addition to all other penalties provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Automated sales suppression devices, phantom-ware,
electronic cash registers or point of sale systems used with automated
sales suppression devices or phantom-ware, and any property
constituting proceeds traceable to any violation of RCW 82.32.290(4)
are considered contraband and are subject to seizure and forfeiture.
(b) Property subject to forfeiture under (a) of this subsection (1)
may be seized by any agent of the department authorized to assess or
collect taxes, or law enforcement officer of this state, upon process
issued by any superior court or district court having jurisdiction over
the property. Seizure without process may be made if:
(i) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search
warrant; or
(ii) The department or the law enforcement officer has probable
cause to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used
in violation of RCW 82.32.290(4) and exigent circumstances exist making
procurement of a search warrant impracticable.
(2) Forfeiture authorized by this section is deemed to have
commenced by the seizure. Notice of seizure must be given to the
department if the seizure is made by a law enforcement officer without
the presence of any agent of the department. The department must cause
notice of the seizure and intended forfeiture to be served on the owner
of the property seized, if known, and on any other person known by the
department to have a right or interest in the seized property. Such
service must be made within fifteen days following the seizure or the
department's receipt of notification of the seizure. The notice may be
served by any method authorized by law or court rule, by certified mail
with return receipt requested, or electronically in accordance with RCW
82.32.135. Service by certified mail or electronic means is deemed
complete upon mailing the notice, electronically sending the notice, or
electronically notifying the person or persons entitled to the notice
that the notice is available to be accessed by the person or persons,
within the fifteen-day period following the seizure or the department's
receipt of notification of the seizure.
(3) If no person notifies the department in writing of the person's
claim of lawful ownership or right to lawful possession of the item or
items seized within thirty days of the date of service of the notice of
seizure and intended forfeiture, the item or items seized are deemed
forfeited.
(4)(a) If any person notifies the department, in writing, of the
person's claim of lawful ownership or lawful right to possession of the
item or items seized within thirty days of the date of service of the
notice of seizure and intended forfeiture, the person or persons must
be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to the claim. The
hearing must be before the director or the director's designee. A
hearing and any administrative or judicial review is governed by
chapter 34.05 RCW. The burden of proof by a preponderance of the
evidence is upon the person claiming to be the lawful owner or the
person claiming to have the lawful right to possession of the item or
items seized.
(b) The department must return the item or items to the claimant as
soon as possible upon a determination that the claimant is the present
lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession of the item or items
seized.
(5) When property is sought to be forfeited on the ground that it
constitutes proceeds traceable to a violation of RCW 82.32.290(4), the
department must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the
property constitutes proceeds traceable to a violation of RCW
82.32.290(4).
(6)(a) When property forfeited under this section, other than
proceeds traceable to a violation of RCW 82.32.290(4), is no longer
required for evidentiary purposes, the department may:
(i) Destroy or have the property destroyed;
(ii) Retain the property for training or other official purposes;
or
(iii) Loan or give the property to any law enforcement or tax
administration agency of any state, political subdivision or municipal
corporation of a state, or the United States for training or other
official purposes. For purposes of this subsection (6)(a)(iii),
"state" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.462.
(b) When proceeds traceable to a violation of RCW 82.32.290(4)
forfeited under this section are no longer required for evidentiary
purposes, they must be deposited into the general fund.
(7) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section:
(a) "Automated sales suppression device" means a software program
that falsifies the electronic records of electronic cash registers or
other point of sale systems, including transaction data and transaction
reports. The term includes the software program, any device that
carries the software program, or an internet link to the software
program.
(b) "Electronic cash register" means a device that keeps a register
or supporting documents through the means of an electronic device or
computer system designed to record transaction data for the purpose of
computing, compiling, or processing sales transaction data in whatever
manner.
(c) "Phantom-ware" means a programming option that is hidden,
preinstalled, or installed-at-a-later-time in the operating system of
an electronic cash register or other point of sale device, or hardwired
into the electronic cash register or other point of sale device, and
that can be used to create a virtual second till or may eliminate or
manipulate transaction reports that may or may not be preserved in
digital formats to represent the true or manipulated record of
transactions in the electronic cash register or other point of sale
device.
(d) "Transaction data" means information about sales transactions,
including items purchased by a customer, the price for each item, a
taxability determination for each item, a segregated tax amount for
each of the taxed items, the amount of cash or credit tendered, the net
amount returned to the customer in change, the date and time of the
purchase, the name, address, and identification number of the vendor,
and the receipt or invoice number of the transaction.
(e) "Transaction reports" means a report that includes information
associated with sales transactions, taxes collected, media totals, and
discount voids at an electronic cash register that can be printed on
cash register tape at the end of a day or shift, or a report
documenting every action at an electronic cash register or other point
of sale device and that is stored electronically.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
When the department has good reason to believe that any property
subject to seizure and forfeiture under section 3 of this act is being
used or maintained in this state in violation of RCW 82.32.290(4)(a),
the department may make affidavit of facts describing the place or
thing to be searched before any judge of any superior or district court
in this state. The judge may issue a search warrant directed to a law
enforcement officer or agent of the department authorized under section
3 of this act to seize contraband, commanding him or her to diligently
search any place or thing as designated in the affidavit and search
warrant, and to seize such suspected contraband and hold it until
disposed of as provided by section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---