BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The continuum of care for the juvenile rehabilitation
administration has been stretched to the limit since the closure of
Indian Ridge youth camp in 1999, Mission Creek youth camp in 2001, and
Maple Lane school in 2011.
(2) Closing the last remaining medium security, step-down facility
in the department would seriously impede capacity to safely deliver
effective rehabilitative services.
(3) In a period of fiscal restraint, understandable consideration
has been made to achieve savings by closing a maximum security
institution and consolidating the population in the bed space of
remaining close security facilities. Further shrinking of the
institutional continuum would require mixing incompatible
subpopulations, resulting in genuine safety and security risks.
(4) Furthermore, it would not be in the interest of the state to
place youth who are appropriate for youth camp placement in an
unnecessarily restrictive setting, such as an institution.
(5) Unless the services and environment in a close security
facility support and match the developmental, treatment, and security
needs of the young people currently being served in a medium security
facility, there is genuine potential some will be harmed rather than
helped.
(6) The legislature hereby recognizes and concurs with the findings
of the juvenile rehabilitation administration strategic plan: 2009-2013, "It would serve nobody's best interests to place youth who are
appropriate for youth camp placement in an unnecessarily restrictive
setting like an institution. A "bed" is not just a bed. It is a
facility placement for a young person. Unless the services and
environment in a facility support and match the developmental,
treatment, and security needs of the young people being served, there
is genuine potential some will be harmed rather than helped..."
(7) The legislature also recognizes that, "It is mission critical
that JRA retain a continuum of care capable of responding to the
complicated developmental, management, and treatment needs of this
population."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall maintain a medium security forestry camp
at the Naselle youth camp to fulfill the department's obligation to
provide education, treatment, and job training to juvenile offenders
who are assessed per RCW 72.05.420 as posing more than a minimum risk
to public safety in the least restrictive continuum of care. Juvenile
offenders sentenced for treatment shall be placed at the Naselle youth
camp, which shall offer a program that includes education; treatment
options to include sex offender, aggression reduction, and chemical
dependency; job training; and community-based work experience. This
program for juvenile offenders serving a term of confinement under the
supervision of the department is exempt from the licensing requirements
of chapter 74.15 RCW.
(2) The medium security youth camp for juvenile offenders shall be
a structured and regimented model emphasizing the building up of an
offender's self-esteem, confidence, and discipline. The sentence for
treatment program shall provide participants with basic education,
vocational training, work-based learning, work experience, work ethic
skills, conflict resolution counseling, substance abuse intervention as
assessed, including chemical dependency treatment, anger management
counseling, and victim awareness.
(3) The department shall develop standards for the safe and
effective operation of the sentence for treatment program, for
successful program completion by the offender, and for the continued
aftercare supervision of offenders who have successfully completed the
program, including assistance with housing and job placement if needed.
(4) Admission to the sentence for treatment program is voluntary.
If the court determines that the offender is eligible for the sentence
for treatment program, the court shall order the department to place
the offender directly in the medium security youth camp where the
department shall evaluate the offender and provide the court with
recommended educational attainment, treatment, and length and type of
work experience needed by the offender. Length of satisfactory work
experience established by the court shall not exceed the length of time
needed to complete educational attainment and treatment minus the time
needed for assessment, orientation, and time off from work needed to
meet treatment requirements. Time accrued as unsatisfactory work
performance shall extend the sentence for treatment an equal number of
days up to the youth's maximum sentence. No juvenile who is assessed
as a high risk offender or suffers from any mental or physical problems
that could endanger his or her health or drastically affect his or her
performance in the program shall be retained in the sentence for
treatment program.
(5) If the activities of the juvenile offender while in the
juvenile offender youth camp are so disruptive to the sentence for
treatment program, as determined by the secretary according to
standards developed by the department, which results in the removal of
the juvenile offender from the youth camp, the secretary shall require
that the offender serve the entire remainder of his or her disposition,
less the amount of time already served in the sentence for treatment
program.
(6) If the offender cannot complete the sentence for treatment
program due to medical problems the court may amend the sentence for
treatment or the original disposition shall be imposed.
(7) All offenders who successfully complete the sentence for
treatment program shall spend the remainder of his or her disposition
on parole in a juvenile rehabilitation administration intensive
aftercare program in the local community. Violations of the conditions
of parole are subject to sanctions specified in RCW 13.40.210. The
aftercare program shall provide for the needs of the offender based on
his or her progress in the aftercare program as indicated by ongoing
assessment of those needs and progress. The aftercare program shall
monitor postprogram juvenile offenders and assist them to successfully
reintegrate into the community. In addition, the aftercare program
shall develop a process for closely monitoring and assessing public
safety risks, and be designed and funded by the department.
(8) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Naselle youth camp" or "youth camp" means the medium security
forestry camp that accepts juvenile offenders of a minimum or medium
security risk.
(b) "Sentence for treatment" means an alternative sentencing option
offered at the discretion of the court which carries a comprehensive
mandate of certain educational attainment, successful completion of
specialized treatment such as anger management, substance abuse,
chemical dependency or sex offender treatment, and/or vocational
experience for a particular juvenile offender. Upon successful
completion of the specified treatment, attainment of the prescribed
educational, and vocational achievement, the extent of the standard
disposition remaining is served by the offender on an intensive
supervision program administered by the administration.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.40.0357 and 2012 c 177 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:

DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

JUVENILE
DISPOSITION
OFFENSE
CATEGORY DESCRIPTION (RCW CITATION) JUVENILE DISPOSITION
CATEGORY FOR
ATTEMPT, BAILJUMP,
CONSPIRACY, OR
SOLICITATION

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Arson and Malicious Mischief

A Arson 1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson 2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus
(9.40.100) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus with
Intent to Commit Arson (9.40.105) E

A Possession of Incendiary Device (9.40.120)
B+

Assault and Other Crimes Involving
Physical Harm

A Assault 1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault 2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault 3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault 4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless Endangerment (9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting Suicide Attempt (9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion (9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary and Trespass

B+ Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential Burglary (9A.52.025) C

B Burglary 2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools (Possession of) (9A.52.060) E

D Criminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Mineral Trespass (78.44.330) C

C Vehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption of Alcohol
(66.44.270) E

C Illegally Obtaining Legend Drug
(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery, Possession of Legend Drug
with Intent to Sell (69.41.030(2)(a)) D+

E Possession of Legend Drug
(69.41.030(2)(b)) E

B+ Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or
Flunitrazepam Sale (69.50.401(2) (a) or
(b)) B+

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Nonnarcotic Sale (69.50.401(2)(c)) C

E Possession of Marihuana <40 grams
(69.50.4014) E

C Fraudulently Obtaining Controlled
Substance (69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of Controlled Substance for Profit
(69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or
Flunitrazepam Counterfeit Substances
(69.50.4011(2) (a) or (b)) B

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Nonnarcotic Counterfeit Substances
(69.50.4011(2) (c), (d), or (e)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance
(69.50.4013) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance
(69.50.4012)
C

Firearms and Weapons

B Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of Stolen Firearm (9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded Pistol Without Permit
(9.41.050) E

C Possession of Firearms by Minor (<18)
(9.41.040(2)(a)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of Dangerous Weapon
(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating Another Person by use of
Weapon (9.41.270)
E

Homicide

A+ Murder 1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder 2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap 1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful Imprisonment (9A.40.040)
D+

Obstructing Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a Law Enforcement Officer
(9A.76.020) E

E Resisting Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing Contraband 1 (9A.76.140) C

C Introducing Contraband 2 (9A.76.150) D

E Introducing Contraband 3 (9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a Public Servant (9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a Witness (9A.72.110)
C+

Public Disturbance

C+ Riot with Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(b)) D+

D+ Riot Without Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(a)) E

E Failure to Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape 1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape 2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape 3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest 1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest 2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent Exposure (Victim <14)
(9A.88.010) E

E Indecent Exposure (Victim 14 or over)
(9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting Prostitution 1 (9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting Prostitution 2 (9A.88.080) D+

E O & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

C Failure to Register as a Sex Offender (
9A.44.132)
D

Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and Forgery

B Theft 1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft 2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft 3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft of Livestock 1 and 2 (9A.56.080 and
9A.56.083) C

C Forgery (9A.60.020) D

A Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery 2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion 1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion 2 (9A.56.130) D+

C Identity Theft 1 (9.35.020(2)) D

D Identity Theft 2 (9.35.020(3)) E

D Improperly Obtaining Financial Information
(9.35.010) E

B Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (9A.56.068) C

B Possession of Stolen Property 1
(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of Stolen Property 2
(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of Stolen Property 3
(9A.56.170) E

B Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission
1 (9A.56.070) C

C Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission
2 (9A.56.075) D

B Theft of a Motor Vehicle (9A.56.065) C

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E Driving Without a License (46.20.005) E

B+ Hit and Run - Death (46.52.020(4)(a)) C+

C Hit and Run - Injury (46.52.020(4)(b)) D

D Hit and Run-Attended (46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and Run-Unattended (46.52.010) E

C Vehicular Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to Elude Pursuing Police
Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While Under the Influence
(46.61.502 and 46.61.504) E

B+ Felony Driving While Under the Influence
(46.61.502(6)) B

B+ Felony Physical Control of a Vehicle While
Under the Influence (46.61.504(6))
B

Other

B Animal Cruelty 1 (16.52.205) C

B Bomb Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape 11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape 21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape 3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene, Harassing, Etc., Phone Calls
(9.61.230) E

A Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
A Felony B+

B Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
B Felony C

C Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
C Felony D

D Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Gross
Misdemeanor E

E Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult
Misdemeanor E

V Violation of Order of Restitution,
Community Supervision, or Confinement
(13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C offenses
and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks
confinement
2nd escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks
confinement
3rd and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month
period - 12 weeks confinement

2If the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order,
it may impose a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDS

This schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may
select sentencing option A, B, C, D, E, or RCW 13.40.167.

OPTION A
JUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID
STANDARD RANGE

A+ 180 weeks to age 21 for all category A+ offenses

A 103-129 weeks for all category A offenses

A- 15-36 weeks
Except 30-40 weeks
for 15 to 17 year olds 52-65 weeks 80-100 weeks 103-129 weeks 103-129 weeks

CURRENT B+ 15-36 weeks 15-36 weeks 52-65 weeks 80-100 weeks 103-129 weeks

OFFENSE B LS LS 15-36 weeks 15-36 weeks 52-65 weeks

CATEGORY C+ LS LS LS 15-36 weeks 15-36 weeks

C LS LS LS LS 15-36 weeks

D+ LS LS LS LS LS

D LS LS LS LS LS

E LS LS LS LS LS

PRIOR
ADJUDICATIONS 0 1 2 3 4 or more

NOTE: References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of
confinement. "LS" means "local sanctions" as defined in RCW 13.40.020.
(1) The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category.
The current offense category is determined by the offense of
adjudication.
(2) The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior
adjudications included in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior
felony adjudication shall count as one point. Each prior violation,
misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall count as 1/4
point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.
(3) The standard range disposition for each offense is determined
by the intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications
and the row defined by the current offense category.
(4) RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for
more than one offense.
(5) A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an
offense category of E. However, a disposition for a violation shall
not include confinement.

OR

OPTION B
SUSPENDED DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

(1) If the offender is subject to a standard range disposition
involving confinement by the department, the court may impose the
standard range and suspend the disposition on condition that the
offender comply with one or more local sanctions and any educational or
treatment requirement. The treatment programs provided to the offender
must be either research-based best practice programs as identified by
the Washington state institute for public policy or the joint
legislative audit and review committee, or for chemical dependency
treatment programs or services, they must be evidence-based or
research-based best practice programs. For the purposes of this
subsection:
(a) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had
multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations
demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for the
population; and
(b) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some
research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the
standard of evidence-based practices.
(2) If the offender fails to comply with the suspended disposition,
the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or may revoke
the suspended disposition and order the disposition's execution.
(3) An offender is ineligible for the suspended disposition option
under this section if the offender is:
(a) Adjudicated of an A+ offense;
(b) Fourteen years of age or older and is adjudicated of one or
more of the following offenses:
(i) A class A offense, or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation
to commit a class A offense;
(ii) Manslaughter in the first degree (RCW 9A.32.060); or
(iii) Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021), extortion in
the first degree (RCW 9A.56.120), kidnapping in the second degree (RCW
9A.40.030), robbery in the second degree (RCW 9A.56.210), residential
burglary (RCW 9A.52.025), burglary in the second degree (RCW
9A.52.030), drive-by shooting (RCW 9A.36.045), vehicular homicide (RCW
46.61.520), hit and run death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a)), intimidating a
witness (RCW 9A.72.110), violation of the uniform controlled substances
act (RCW 69.50.401 (2)(a) and (b)), or manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070),
when the offense includes infliction of bodily harm upon another or
when during the commission or immediate withdrawal from the offense the
respondent was armed with a deadly weapon;
(c) Ordered to serve a disposition for a firearm violation under
RCW 13.40.193; or
(d) Adjudicated of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

OR

OPTION C
CHEMICAL DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition
of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not
committed an A- or B+ offense, the court may impose a disposition under
RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION D
MANIFEST INJUSTICE

If the court determines that a disposition under option A, B, or C
would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a
disposition outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).

OR

OPTION E
SENTENCE FOR TREATMENT

If the juvenile offender is subject to a disposition of more than
15 weeks and is not deemed to require confinement in a close security
facility by the department, the court may impose a sentence for
treatment as established in section 2 of this act.

--- END ---