BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that every
individual in the state has a fundamental right to a healthful
environment, and a right to the pursuit of commonplace activities such
as breathing, drinking, eating, working, and recreating without risking
their health as a result of environmental degradation. There are
vulnerable communities throughout the state that bear a
disproportionate burden of pollution problems. Residents of these
communities face higher rates of cancer and other life-threatening
public health problems. All residents of the state, regardless of
race, color, culture, national origin, or income level, have a right to
participate meaningfully and receive fair treatment during the
implementation and enforcement of environmental laws, rules, and
policies. The improvement of environmental law and policy decision-making processes helps state agencies meet their responsibility to
adhere to Title VI of the federal civil rights act of 1964. These
important objectives and responsibilities are satisfied by the passage
of this act.
(2) Pursuant to the policy declared in this section, and consistent
with federal executive order 12898, state agencies shall, to the extent
practical, make achieving environmental justice part of their mission
by identifying and addressing, as appropriate, the disproportionately
high and adverse human health or environmental effects of their
programs, policies, and activities on minority populations and low-income populations in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70.94.030.
(2) "Community dialogue process" means the process described in
sections 5 and 6 of this act.
(3) "Community organization" means a group composed of residents of
a highly impacted community recognized by the city, county, or the
department as a group that has:
(a) Collectively indicated a concern regarding the environmental or
public health of the highly impacted community;
(b) A history of work with, or a plan to involve, targeted
populations within the community; and
(c) Designated at least one person to serve as a point of contact
for the group.
(4) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(5) "Environmental permit" means a permit issued by the department
under chapter 90.48, 70.105, 70.105D RCW or sources permitted under RCW
70.94.161 as well as major and synthetic minor sources permitted under
RCW 70.94.151. "Environmental permit" includes industrial storm water
permits, sand and gravel permits, and permits issued to concentrated
animal feeding operations, but does not include individual coverage
under other general permits issued pursuant to the federal clean water
act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq. or general permits issued pursuant to
the federal court of appeals decision in Headwaters, Inc. v. Talent
Irrigation District, 243 F.3rd 526 (9th Cir. 2001).
(6) "Good neighbor agreement" means an agreement or contract
between a community organization and person in a highly impacted
community seeking an environmental permit or the approval of a clean-up
plan or remedial action.
(7) "Highly impacted community" means a community that the
department has determined is likely to bear a disproportionate burden
of public health risks from environmental pollution.
(8) "Person" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 90.48.020.
(9) "Potentially liable person" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 70.105D.020.
(10) "Supplemental environmental project" means an environmentally
beneficial project that a person agrees to undertake in settlement of
an enforcement action, but which the person is not otherwise obligated
to perform.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department must identify and
maintain a list of highly impacted communities in this state.
(2)(a) In identifying highly impacted communities, the department
shall include, at minimum, United States census tracts that meet the
following criteria: (i) A census tract that has an unemployment rate
that is twenty percent above the state average for the immediately
previous three years; and (ii) a census tract that has a median
household income that is less than seventy-five percent of the state
median household income for the previous three years.
(b) In determining whether a community is a highly impacted
community under this section, the department may also, to the maximum
extent practicable, use existing tools such as the federal
environmental protection agency's EJVIEW mapping tool. In addition,
the department may develop additional processes for the purpose of
identifying highly impacted communities. The department may consider,
at a minimum, the following factors in its determination of whether a
community is a highly impacted community:
(i) The community's public health impacts, such as asthma or risk
of cancer deaths;
(ii) The community's cultural practices; and
(iii) The percentage of community residents who are minorities,
foreign born, or who lack proficiency in the English language.
(3) In determining whether a community is a highly impacted
community under this section, the department may rely on existing
scientific or public health data, including public health data compiled
by the department of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) If requested by a community
organization, the department or authority shall, to the extent
feasible, provide notification no later than fifteen days after the
department initiates the review of an environmental permit application
for completeness or is otherwise first formally notified of a person's
intent to renew or apply for a permit issued or reissued under RCW
70.94.161, 70.105.130, or 90.48.160 for a facility or multiple
facilities located within a highly impacted community or multiple
highly impacted communities. This subsection is not intended to create
a duplication of existing notification requirements previously
developed by rule by the department. If the existing notification
requirements developed by rule establish substantially similar, or
earlier or more frequent requirements for notification than the
standards specified in this section, the department may utilize those
existing notification procedures.
(2) If requested by a community organization, the department shall,
to the extent feasible, provide notification no later than fifteen days
prior to the anticipated completion of a draft remedial investigation
and feasibility study required by the department under RCW 70.105D.030
regarding a property located within a highly impacted community.
(3) The department shall maintain a list of community organizations
and persons who have requested to receive notification of environmental
permitting activities in highly impacted communities and shall use the
list to provide notification in accordance with subsections (1) and (2)
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1)(a)(i) No later than thirty days after
the department or authority's completion of a review of an
environmental permit application for completeness under RCW 70.94.161,
70.105.130, or 90.48.160, the department or authority shall determine
whether the permit, if approved, would be issued to a facility
operating within a highly impacted community. Upon a determination
that a permit application is complete, the department shall provide
notice to a highly impacted community that has requested notification
under section 4 of this act. The notice shall include: (A) The
determination of the permit application's completeness; (B) an
explanation of the community dialogue process; and (C) the process by
which the department will decide if it plans to require a community
dialogue process. If the department or authority determines that the
facility is located within a highly impacted community, the department
may require the permit applicant to enter into a community dialogue
process as outlined in section 6 of this act.
(ii) In deciding whether to require a community dialogue process,
the department shall, at a minimum, consider the following factors:
(A) Whether the normal public comment process will adequately
incorporate the concerns of the highly impacted community; (B) the
likelihood that a community dialogue process will lead to a productive
dialog among the parties; and (C) the likelihood that a community
dialogue process will reduce conflict among the parties.
(b) The department may not require a facility with multiple
environmental permits to participate in more than one community
dialogue process within a five-year period. The community dialogue
process for a facility holding multiple permits may simultaneously
address the multiple permits held by the facility. If the department
anticipates that it will require a facility holding multiple
environmental permits to enter into a community dialogue process, the
department should attempt to initiate the community dialogue process
during the permitting process of a permit with a substantial public
health impact on the highly impacted community.
(2) No later than ninety days prior to the anticipated issuance of
a draft clean-up plan under RCW 70.105D.030, the department may
determine whether the proposed clean-up action is located within a
highly impacted community. If the department determines that the site
is located within a highly impacted community, the department may
require a potentially liable person to enter into a community dialogue
process as outlined in section 6 of this act. In deciding whether to
require a community dialogue process, the department shall, at a
minimum, consider the following factors: (a) Whether the normal public
comment process will adequately incorporate the concerns of the highly
impacted community; (b) the likelihood that a community dialogue
process will lead to a productive dialog among the parties; and (c) the
likelihood that a community dialogue process will reduce conflict among
the parties.
(3) If multiple community organizations within the same highly
impacted community or adjacent highly impacted communities have
requested notification pursuant to section 4 of this act with respect
to a facility or site, the department may authorize the permit
applicant or potentially liable person to enter into a community
dialogue process with multiple community organizations as outlined in
section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A community dialogue process required by
the department or authority under section 5 of this act must, at a
minimum, include at least one community dialogue meeting conducted or
facilitated by a neutral professional mediator, chosen by mutual
consent of the community organization or organizations and the
environmental permit applicant, project proponent, or potentially
liable person, and hired by the department using moneys from the state
and local toxics control accounts in RCW 70.105D.070(5)(b).
(2)(a) At the end of the community dialogue process, the mediator
must prepare a report for the department that identifies both
unresolved issues and areas of agreement between the community
organization or organizations and the environmental permit applicant,
project proponent, or potentially liable person.
(b) If the parties involved so choose, the permit applicant,
project proponent, or potentially liable person may enter into a good
neighbor agreement with the community organization or organizations.
(c) A good neighbor agreement is a private contract between the
parties and the department or local government authorities may not be
party to a good neighbor agreement. The department or local government
authority does not have authority to enforce the terms of a good
neighbor agreement nor may the department incorporate the good neighbor
agreement as a part of a permit or order.
(d) The requirements of this section and section 5 of this act may
not delay or extend the department's issuance of a permit or adoption
of a clean-up plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 In deciding whether to approve a permit
application affected by this chapter or in selecting a final clean-up
plan under RCW 70.105D.030, the department or authority may consider
the contents of the final report described in section 6(2)(a) of this
act or the contents of any final good neighbor agreement described in
section 6(2)(b) of this act, or both. In considering the contents of
a good neighbor agreement or mediation report under this section, the
department shall treat these documents as a formal public comment on
the permit under chapter 34.05 RCW, and may incorporate provisions of
the document as appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) This section applies to the settlement,
registered with a judicial or quasi-judicial body, of an enforcement
action based upon a violation of a permit issued under chapter 70.94,
70.105, or 90.48 RCW or a violation of an order under RCW 70.105D.050.
In conjunction with the settlement of an enforcement action, the
department may require a person whose activity negatively affects
public health in a highly impacted community to contribute in-kind
services or otherwise fund a supplemental environmental project under
the following circumstances:
(a) A supplemental environmental project may include projects to
protect human health, prevent pollution, reduce pollution, protect or
restore natural or man-made environments, assessments or audits of
environmental quality or pollution prevention, efforts to promote
environmental compliance, or emergency preparedness efforts.
(b) A supplemental environmental project authorized by the
department must:
(i)(A) Take place within the same highly impacted community in
which the violation occurred; or
(B) Primarily benefit the highly impacted community in which the
violation occurred, and
(ii)(A) Be designed to reduce the likelihood that similar
violations will occur in the future;
(B) Reduce the adverse impact to public health or the environment
to which the violation at issue contributes within the highly impacted
community; or
(C) Reduce the overall risk to public health or the environment
potentially affected by the violation at issue;
(iii) Be of a scope and type defined in the signed settlement
agreement between the department and the person in violation of an
environmental permit or department order; and
(iv) Include deadlines and quantifiable performance metrics for the
achievement of intermediate deliverables or objectives towards the
completion of the supplemental environmental project.
(2)(a) If the department requires a person to perform or fund a
supplemental environmental project in conjunction with the settlement
of an enforcement action related to the violation of an environmental
permit or department order, the department or authority shall also
recover a monetary penalty in accordance with RCW 70.94.430, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.105.085, or 70.105.090 or chapter 90.48 RCW.
(b) In determining the monetary amount to be recovered in the
settlement, in addition to the current factors considered in
determining the amounts of a penalty under RCW 70.94.430, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.105.085, or 70.105.090 or chapter 90.48 RCW, the
department or authority shall consider:
(i) The cost to the person of the supplemental environmental
project; and
(ii) The environmental or public health benefits anticipated to
accrue from the supplemental environmental project.
(3) To the maximum extent practicable, the department shall seek
the input of the highly impacted community in the development of a
proposed supplemental environmental project. After the department has
decided to consider the inclusion of a supplemental environmental
project in conjunction with the settlement of an enforcement action,
the department shall, to the maximum extent practicable, seek to
provide information to the highly impacted community regarding:
(a) The proposed supplemental environmental project; and
(b) The process the department plans to follow in making a final
determination regarding the details of the supplemental environmental
project.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.94.161 and 2008 c 14 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of ecology, or board of an authority, shall require
renewable permits for the operation of air contaminant sources subject
to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) Permits shall be issued for a term of five years. A permit may
be modified or amended during its term at the request of the permittee,
or for any reason allowed by the federal clean air act. The rules
adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall include rules
for permit amendments and modifications. The terms and conditions of
a permit shall remain in effect after the permit itself expires if the
permittee submits a timely and complete application for permit renewal.
(2)(a) Rules establishing the elements for a statewide operating
permit program and the process for permit application and renewal
consistent with federal requirements shall be established by the
department by January 1, 1993. The rules shall provide that every
proposed permit must be reviewed prior to issuance by a professional
engineer or staff under the direct supervision of a professional
engineer in the employ of the permitting authority. The permit program
established by these rules shall be administered by the department and
delegated local air authorities. Rules developed under this subsection
shall not preclude a delegated local air authority from including in a
permit its own more stringent emission standards and operating
restrictions.
(b) The board of any local air pollution control authority may
apply to the department of ecology for a delegation order authorizing
the local authority to administer the operating permit program for
sources under that authority's jurisdiction. The department shall, by
order, approve such delegation, if the department finds that the local
authority has the technical and financial resources, to discharge the
responsibilities of a permitting authority under the federal clean air
act. A delegation request shall include adequate information about the
local authority's resources to enable the department to make the
findings required by this subsection. However, any delegation order
issued under this subsection shall take effect ninety days after the
environmental protection agency authorizes the local authority to issue
operating permits under the federal clean air act.
(c) Except for the authority granted the energy facility site
evaluation council to issue permits for the new construction,
reconstruction, or enlargement or operation of new energy facilities
under chapter 80.50 RCW, the department may exercise the authority, as
delegated by the environmental protection agency, to administer Title
IV of the federal clean air act as amended and to delegate such
administration to local authorities as applicable pursuant to (b) of
this subsection.
(3) In establishing technical standards, defined in RCW 70.94.030,
the permitting authority shall consider and, if found to be
appropriate, give credit for waste reduction within the process.
(4) Operating permits shall apply to all sources (a) where required
by the federal clean air act, and (b) for any source that may cause or
contribute to air pollution in such quantity as to create a threat to
the public health or welfare. Subsection (b) of this subsection is not
intended to apply to small businesses except when both of the following
limitations are satisfied: (i) The source is in an area exceeding or
threatening to exceed federal or state air quality standards; and (ii)
the department provides a reasonable justification that requiring a
source to have a permit is necessary to meet a federal or state air
quality standard, or to prevent exceeding a standard in an area
threatening to exceed the standard. For purposes of this subsection
"areas threatening to exceed air quality standards" shall mean areas
projected by the department to exceed such standards within five years.
Prior to identifying threatened areas the department shall hold a
public hearing or hearings within the proposed areas.
(5) Sources operated by government agencies are not exempt under
this section.
(6) Within one hundred eighty days after the United States
environmental protection agency approves the state operating permit
program, a person required to have a permit shall submit to the
permitting authority a compliance plan and permit application, signed
by a responsible official, certifying the accuracy of the information
submitted. Until permits are issued, existing sources shall be allowed
to operate under presently applicable standards and conditions provided
that such sources submit complete and timely permit applications.
(7)(a) All draft permits shall be subject to public notice and
comment. The rules adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section
shall specify procedures for public notice and comment. Such
procedures shall provide the permitting agency with an opportunity to
respond to comments received from interested parties prior to the time
that the proposed permit is submitted to the environmental protection
agency for review pursuant to section 505(a) of the federal clean air
act. In the event that the environmental protection agency objects to
a proposed permit pursuant to section 505(b) of the federal clean air
act, the permitting authority shall not issue the permit, unless the
permittee consents to the changes required by the environmental
protection agency.
(b) If the department or board of an authority determines that a
permit application pertains to a facility located in a highly impacted
community as defined in section 2 of this act, the department or
authority may require the permit applicant to initiate the procedures
described in sections 5 and 6 of this act.
(8) The procedures contained in chapter 43.21B RCW shall apply to
permit appeals. The pollution control hearings board may stay the
effectiveness of any permit issued under this section during the
pendency of an appeal filed by the permittee, if the permittee
demonstrates that compliance with the permit during the pendency of the
appeal would require significant expenditures that would not be
necessary in the event that the permittee prevailed on the merits of
the appeal.
(9) After the effective date of any permit program promulgated
under this section, it shall be unlawful for any person to: (a)
Operate a permitted source in violation of any requirement of a permit
issued under this section; or (b) fail to submit a permit application
at the time required by rules adopted under subsection (2) of this
section.
(10) Each air operating permit shall state the origin of and
specific legal authority for each requirement included therein. Every
requirement in an operating permit shall be based upon the most
stringent of the following requirements:
(a) The federal clean air act and rules implementing that act,
including provision of the approved state implementation plan;
(b) This chapter and rules adopted thereunder;
(c) In permits issued by a local air pollution control authority,
the requirements of any order or regulation adopted by that authority;
(d) Chapter 70.98 RCW and rules adopted thereunder; and
(e) Chapter 80.50 RCW and rules adopted thereunder.
(11) Consistent with the provisions of the federal clean air act,
the permitting authority may issue general permits covering categories
of permitted sources, and temporary permits authorizing emissions from
similar operations at multiple temporary locations.
(12) Permit program sources within the territorial jurisdiction of
an authority delegated the operating permit program shall file their
permit applications with that authority, except that permit
applications for sources regulated on a statewide basis pursuant to RCW
70.94.395 shall be filed with the department. Permit program sources
outside the territorial jurisdiction of a delegated authority shall
file their applications with the department. Permit program sources
subject to chapter 80.50 RCW shall, irrespective of their location,
file their applications with the energy facility site evaluation
council.
(13) When issuing operating permits to coal-fired electric
generating plants, the permitting authority shall establish
requirements consistent with Title IV of the federal clean air act.
(14)(a) The department and the local air authorities are authorized
to assess and to collect, and each source emitting one hundred tons or
more per year of a regulated pollutant shall pay an interim assessment
to fund the development of the operating permit program during fiscal
year 1994.
(b) The department shall conduct a workload analysis and prepare an
operating permit program development budget for fiscal year 1994. The
department shall allocate among all sources emitting one hundred tons
or more per year of a regulated pollutant during calendar year 1992 the
costs identified in its program development budget according to a
three-tiered model, with each of the three tiers being equally
weighted, based upon:
(i) The number of sources;
(ii) The complexity of sources; and
(iii) The size of sources, as measured by the quantity of each
regulated pollutant emitted by the source.
(c) Each local authority and the department shall collect from
sources under their respective jurisdictions the interim fee determined
by the department and shall remit the fee to the department.
(d) Each local authority may, in addition, allocate its fiscal year
1994 operating permit program development costs among the sources under
its jurisdiction emitting one hundred tons or more per year of a
regulated pollutant during calendar year 1992 and may collect an
interim fee from these sources. A fee assessed pursuant to this
subsection (14)(d) shall be collected at the same time as the fee
assessed pursuant to (c) of this subsection.
(e) The fees assessed to a source under this subsection shall be
limited to the first seven thousand five hundred tons for each
regulated pollutant per year.
(15)(a) The department shall determine the persons liable for the
fee imposed by subsection (14) of this section, compute the fee, and
provide by November 1, 1993, the identity of the fee payer with the
computation of the fee to each local authority and to the department of
revenue for collection. The department of revenue shall collect the
fee computed by the department from the fee payers under the
jurisdiction of the department. The administrative, collection, and
penalty provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW shall apply to the collection
of the fee by the department of revenue. The department shall provide
technical assistance to the department of revenue for decisions made by
the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 82.32.160 and 82.32.170. All
interim fees collected by the department of revenue on behalf of the
department and all interim fees collected by local authorities on
behalf of the department shall be deposited in the air operating permit
account. The interim fees collected by the local air authorities to
cover their permit program development costs under subsection (14)(d)
of this section shall be deposited in the dedicated accounts of their
respective treasuries.
(b) All fees identified in this section shall be due and payable on
March 1, 1994, except that the local air pollution control authorities
may adopt by rule an earlier date on which fees are to be due and
payable. The section 5, chapter 252, Laws of 1993 amendments to RCW
70.94.161 do not have the effect of terminating, or in any way
modifying, any liability, civil or criminal, incurred pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 70.94.161 (15) and (17) as they existed prior to July
25, 1993.
(16) For sources or source categories not required to obtain
permits under subsection (4) of this section, the department or local
authority may establish by rule control technology requirements. If
control technology rule revisions are made by the department or local
authority under this subsection, the department or local authority
shall consider the remaining useful life of control equipment
previously installed on existing sources before requiring technology
changes. The department or any local air authority may issue a general
permit, as authorized under the federal clean air act, for such
sources.
(17) Emissions of greenhouse gases as defined in RCW 70.235.010
must be reported as required by RCW 70.94.151. The reporting
provisions of RCW 70.94.151 shall not apply to any other emissions from
any permit program source after the effective date of United States
environmental protection agency approval of the state operating permit
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
Prior to issuing an individual wastewater permit under RCW
90.48.160, if the department determines that the permit application
pertains to a facility in a highly impacted community as defined in
section 2 of this act, the department may require the permit applicant
to initiate the procedures described in sections 5 and 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 70.105
RCW to read as follows:
Prior to issuing a permit for the treatment, storage, or disposal
of dangerous wastes pursuant to RCW 70.105.130, if the department
determines that the permit application pertains to a facility in a
highly impacted community as defined in section 2 of this act, the
department may require the permit applicant to initiate the procedures
described in sections 5 and 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 70.105D
RCW to read as follows:
Prior to the anticipated issuance of a draft clean-up plan
authorized pursuant to this chapter and located in a highly impacted
community as defined in section 2 of this act, the department may
require a potentially liable person to initiate the procedures
described in sections 5 and 6 of this act.

Sec. 13 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 920 and 2012 2nd
sp.s. c 2 s 6005 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship;
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management
priorities of RCW 70.105.150;
(xiii) During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, shoreline
update technical assistance;
(xiv) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, multijurisdictional
permitting teams;
(xv) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, actions for reducing
public exposure to toxic air pollution, and actions taken through the
family forest fish passage program to correct barriers to fish passage
on privately owned small forest lands; and
(xvi) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the department of
ecology's water quality, shorelands and environmental assessment,
hazardous waste, waste to resources, nuclear waste, and air quality
programs.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority:
(i) Remedial actions;
(ii) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(iii) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(iv) Funds for a program to assist in the assessment and cleanup of
sites of methamphetamine production, but not to be used for the initial
containment of such sites, consistent with the responsibilities and
intent of RCW 69.50.511; and
(v) Cleanup and disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or
derelict vessels, defined for the purposes of this section as vessels
that have little or no value and either have no identified owner or
have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean up and
dispose of the vessel, that pose a threat to human health or the
environment.
(b) Funds for plans and programs shall be allocated consistent with
the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters
70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW, except that any applicant that
is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, along with any
project that is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget
Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310, shall, except as conditioned by
RCW 70.105D.120, receive priority for any available funding for any
grant or funding programs or sources that use a competitive bidding
process. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account
may also be used for grants to local governments to retrofit public
sector diesel equipment and for storm water planning and implementation
activities.
(c) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department shall
partner with local communities and liable parties for cleanups. The
department is authorized to use the following additional strategies in
order to ensure a healthful environment for future generations:
(i) The director may alter grant-matching requirements to create
incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the
following conditions exists:
(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship
imposed by the clean-up liability;
(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development,
public recreational, or habitat restoration opportunities that would
not otherwise occur; or
(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and
redevelopment of vacant, orphaned, or abandoned property under RCW
70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;
(ii) The use of outside contracts to conduct necessary studies;
(iii) The purchase of remedial action cost-cap insurance, when
necessary to expedite multiparty clean-up efforts.
(d) To facilitate and expedite cleanups using funds from the local
toxics control account, during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium the
director may establish grant-funded accounts to hold and disperse local
toxics control account funds and funds from local governments to be
used for remedial actions.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) ((Except during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium,)) (a) One
percent of the moneys deposited into the state and local toxics control
accounts shall be allocated only for public participation grants to
persons who may be adversely affected by a release or threatened
release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest
organizations. The primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate
the participation by persons and organizations in the investigation and
remedying of releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances
and to implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management
priorities.
(b) In addition to the one percent of moneys allocated for public
participation grants in (a) of this subsection, one-half of one percent
of the moneys deposited into the state and local toxics control
accounts must be allocated to facilitate the participation of community
organizations in the processes described in sections 5 and 6 of this
act relating to the issuance of environmental permits and the adoption
of clean-up plans in highly impacted communities.
(c) No grant authorized under this section may exceed sixty
thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys appropriated
for public participation from either account which are not expended at
the close of any biennium shall revert to the state toxics control
account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation, or, after January 1,
2010, for projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound,
funded in a competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the
action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW
90.71.310.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(8) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the local toxics control account to the state toxics
control account such amounts as reflect excess fund balance in the
account.
(9) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control
account may also be used for local government shoreline update grants
and actions for reducing public exposure to toxic air pollution;
funding to local governments for flood levee improvements; and grants
to local governments for brownfield redevelopment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
In determining the amount of a penalty assessed under this chapter,
the department or authority must consider the cost of a supplemental
environmental project performed by the person under section 8(2) of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 70.105
RCW to read as follows:
In determining the amount of a penalty assessed under this chapter,
the department must consider the cost of a supplemental environmental
project performed by the person under section 8(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
In determining the amount of a penalty assessed under this chapter,
the department must consider the cost of a supplemental environmental
project performed by the person under section 8(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A
RCW to read as follows:
Upon request, the department may, whenever practicable and
appropriate, provide interpreters for hearings or meetings, and
interpret or translate crucial public documents, summaries of crucial
public documents, and notices relevant to environmental permitting
processes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A
RCW to read as follows:
Pursuant to the policy declared in section 1 of this act, and
consistent with federal executive order 12898, the department shall, to
the extent practical, make achieving environmental justice part of its
mission by identifying and addressing, as appropriate,
disproportionately high and adverse human health or environmental
effects of its programs, policies, and activities on minority
populations and low-income populations in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 43.23 RCW
to read as follows:
Pursuant to the policy declared in section 1 of this act, and
consistent with federal executive order 12898, the department shall, to
the extent practical, make achieving environmental justice part of its
mission by identifying and addressing, as appropriate,
disproportionately high and adverse human health or environmental
effects of its programs, policies, and activities on minority
populations and low-income populations in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
to read as follows:
Pursuant to the policy declared in section 1 of this act, and
consistent with federal executive order 12898, the department shall, to
the extent practical, make achieving environmental justice part of its
mission by identifying and addressing, as appropriate,
disproportionately high and adverse human health or environmental
effects of its programs, policies, and activities on minority
populations and low-income populations in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
Pursuant to the policy declared in section 1 of this act, and
consistent with federal executive order 12898, the department of
commerce shall, to the extent practical, make achieving environmental
justice part of its mission by identifying and addressing, as
appropriate, disproportionately high and adverse human health or
environmental effects of its programs, policies, and activities on
minority populations and low-income populations in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 43.300
RCW to read as follows:
Pursuant to the policy declared in section 1 of this act, and
consistent with federal executive order 12898, the department shall, to
the extent practical, make achieving environmental justice part of its
mission by identifying and addressing, as appropriate,
disproportionately high and adverse human health or environmental
effects of its programs, policies, and activities on minority
populations and low-income populations in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Pursuant to the policy declared in section 1 of this act, and
consistent with federal executive order 12898, the department shall, to
the extent practical, make achieving environmental justice part of its
mission by identifying and addressing, as appropriate,
disproportionately high and adverse human health or environmental
effects of its programs, policies, and activities on minority
populations and low-income populations in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 The department may adopt rules as necessary
to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Sections 1 through 8 and 24 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---