BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes the
increasing diversity of Washington state agriculture, the growing
number of smaller farms, and the important contributions that all farms
make to the state's economy and the state's ability to produce food,
fiber, and forest crops locally.
(2) The legislature intends, through the study and report required
in section 2 of this act, to evaluate:
(a) The ongoing viability of small farms and the impact the open
space program has on small farms;
(b) The potential modification to the existing income thresholds
for small farms; and
(c) The fiscal impact and other consequences of extending current
use valuation to home sites for smaller farms.
(3) It is the legislature's further intent to adopt legislation
during the 2015 session substantially conforming to the recommendations
embodied in the report required under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The state conservation commission and
office of farmland preservation, in coordination with the department of
revenue, must conduct a study and prepare a report to the legislature,
by December 1, 2014, as provided in this section. The primary
objectives of the study are to evaluate and make recommendations on
improving the viability of small farms under the current use program
and extending current use valuation for home sites for small farms.
The commission's report must also include recommendations for updated
program eligibility requirements, if appropriate. The commission must
develop its recommendations consistent with the following goals:
(a) To promote current use assessment practices in accord with the
legislature's intent in RCW 84.34.010, which maintain, preserve,
conserve, and otherwise continue in existence adequate open space lands
for the production of food, fiber, and forest crops;
(b) To ensure the current use farm and agricultural program for
small farm operations benefits these bona fide small farm operations
without subsidizing unintended parties; and
(c) To evaluate whether the current income thresholds for farming
operations less than twenty acres should be updated.
(2) The report must include proposed draft legislation to
accomplish the commission's recommendation. The report may also
include an evaluation of the economic impact of farming and
agricultural production on the state's overall economy, with particular
focus on small scale agricultural production using a food and
agriculture hub approach.
(3) In preparing the report, the state conservation commission and
office of farmland preservation must form and consult with an
agricultural current use stakeholder group, including representatives
of statewide farm associations, the Washington State University
cooperative extension program, small and large farm advocates, county
officials including county assessors and county commissioners, other
academic institutions, and the agriculture and fiscal committees of the
legislature. Nonpartisan legislative staff on the appropriate fiscal
committees must provide assistance in researching and compiling data
used in the preparation of the report.

--- END ---