BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of ecology must initiate
a process to enable water right holders to change the current status of
water rights that are currently being put to a different place of use
than is indicated on the associated water right certificate when that
change was done prior to formal approval being granted by the
department of ecology and only if the following conditions are met:
(a) The water right is located in water resource inventory area 01
as identified in WAC 173-500-040 as it existed on the effective date of
this section;
(b) The water right holder has implemented a change from overhead
irrigation technology to microirrigation technology prior to January 1,
2000;
(c) The water right holder has beneficially used the water right
for irrigation purposes using microirrigation technology since
implementing the change;
(d) After implementing the change, but before the effective date of
this section, the water right holder filed a water right change
application but has not yet received approval for that change from the
department of ecology; and
(e) The water right holder submits the following to the department
of ecology:
(i) Information indicating the nature and extent of the changes,
including the date or dates on which the actual changes in water use
occurred, water use before and after the changes, the points of
diversion or withdrawal and place of use both before and after the
changes, and any improvements in water use efficiency or reductions in
direct impact on instream resources; and
(ii) Payment for the appropriate fee under RCW 90.03.470(3).
(2) The department may accept as evidence under this section crop
receipts, seed receipts, harvest-related receipts, aerial and other
photographs showing land in agricultural production or showing
irrigation facilities, irrigation equipment receipts, metering records,
or any other form of data acceptable to the department.
(3)(a) If the department of ecology finds that the water right
holder satisfies the requirements of this section, the department shall
complete any analyses required by RCW 90.03.380 and amend the
appropriate water right certificates to reflect the current place of
use following the requirements of RCW 90.03.380 and the results of the
analysis, except that the department shall use the time period prior to
the implementation of the associated change to determine beneficial and
consumptive use of the water right.
(b) In updating the appropriate certificates, the department of
ecology must reflect on the certificate the amount of water
beneficially used by the applicant in the five years prior to the
effective date of this section.
(4) An applicant to participate in the process authorized by this
section must, if requested by the department of ecology, utilize the
coordinated cost-reimbursement process created under RCW 90.03.265.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2016.

--- END ---