BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares the
following:
(1) Development of new technology that through the use of
computers, sensors, and other systems permits a motor vehicle to
operate without the active control and continuous monitoring of a human
operator is actively under way. Motor vehicles with this technology,
referred to as autonomous vehicles, offer significant potential safety,
mobility, and commercial benefits for individuals and businesses in the
state and elsewhere;
(2) Autonomous vehicles have been operated safely on public roads
in other states in recent years by companies developing and testing
this technology;
(3) The state of Washington, which presently does not prohibit or
specifically regulate the operation of autonomous vehicles, desires to
encourage the current and future development, testing, and operation of
autonomous vehicles on the public roads of the state. The state also
seeks to avoid interrupting these activities while at the same time
creating appropriate rules intended to ensure that the testing and
operation of autonomous vehicles in the state are conducted in a safe
manner; and
(4) Toward that end, it is appropriate to authorize the
establishment of specific safety requirements for the testing and
operation of autonomous vehicles, and to require that future testing
and operation of autonomous vehicles in the state comply with those
requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) An autonomous vehicle may be operated on
the public roads of this state if the manufacturer of the autonomous
vehicle certifies, in a manner to be determined by the state patrol,
that the vehicle meets all of the safety standards and performance
requirements adopted by the state patrol to ensure the safe operation
of the vehicle.
(2) A manufacturer of an autonomous vehicle may operate the vehicle
for testing purposes on the public roads of this state if the
manufacturer and the vehicle to be tested meet the testing safety
requirements adopted by the state patrol.
(3) For purposes of this section and section 3 of this act:
(a) "Autonomous vehicle" means a motor vehicle that uses computers,
sensors, and other technology and devices to enable the vehicle to
safely operate without the active control and continuous monitoring of
a human operator. "Autonomous vehicle" does not include a vehicle
equipped with one or more crash avoidance systems, including, but not
limited to, electronic blind spot assistance, automated emergency
braking systems, park assist, adaptive cruise control, lane keep
assist, lane departure warning, traffic jam and queuing assist, or
other similar systems that enhance safety or provide driver assistance,
but are not capable, collectively or singularly, of driving the vehicle
without the active control and continuous monitoring of a human
operator.
(b) "Manufacturer of an autonomous vehicle" means the person that
manufactures the autonomous vehicle as an originally completed vehicle
or, in the case of a vehicle not originally equipped with autonomous
technology, the person that modifies the vehicle to convert it to an
autonomous vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The state patrol shall adopt rules to
implement this chapter. The rules must include, but not be limited to,
the following:
(1) A licensed driver must operate an autonomous vehicle at all
times during its operation;
(2) An autonomous vehicle must comply with the federal motor
vehicle safety standards;
(3) A licensed driver is legally responsible for the autonomous
vehicle for traffic infractions and criminal offenses in the same
manner as a driver of a nonautonomous vehicle;
(4) A commercial vehicle may not be an autonomous vehicle; and
(5) An autonomous vehicle must be a single vehicle only and be
restricted from towing operations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This chapter does not prohibit the operation
and testing of autonomous vehicles on the public roads of this state on
or before the adoption of rules by the state patrol pursuant to section
3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 46 RCW.

--- END ---