BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Many cities have planned under the growth management act,
chapter 36.70A RCW, and designated and zoned lands for industrial and
manufacturing use;
(2) The industrial and manufacturing industries provide family
living wage jobs;
(3) In the current economic climate the creation of additional
family living wage jobs is essential;
(4) It is critical that Washington state promote its continued
strength in the fields of aerospace, technology, biomedical, and other
industries that will provide family wage job growth; and
(5) Planning for industrial and manufacturing use is inadequate to
attract new industry and manufacturing and an incentive should be
created to stimulate the development of new industrial and
manufacturing uses in the existing inventory of lands zoned for
industrial and manufacturing use in targeted urban areas through a tax
incentive as provided by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 It is the purpose of this chapter to
encourage new manufacturing and industrial uses on undeveloped or
underutilized lands zoned for industrial and manufacturing uses in
targeted urban areas, thereby increasing employment opportunities for
family living wage jobs. Cities that plan under the growth management
act meeting the criteria of this chapter where the governing authority
of the affected city has found there is insufficient family living wage
jobs for its wage earning population may designate a portion of the
city's industrial and manufacturing zoned and undeveloped land to
receive an ad valorem tax exemption for the value of new construction
of industrial/manufacturing facilities within the designated area. The
goal of the exemption is to create a minimum of one family living wage
job for each thirty-two thousand dollars of improvement valuation
exempted under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "City" means: (a) A city with a population of at least fifty
thousand; or (b) the largest city or town, if there is no city or town
with a population of at least fifty thousand, located in a county
planning under the growth management act.
(2) "Family living wage job" means a job with a wage that is
sufficient for raising a family. A family living wage job must have an
average wage of eighteen dollars an hour or more, working two thousand
eighty hours per year on the subject site, as adjusted annually for
inflation by the consumer price index. The family living wage may be
increased by the local authority based on regional factors and wage
conditions.
(3) "Governing authority" means the local legislative authority of
a city having jurisdiction over the property for which an exemption may
be applied for under this chapter.
(4) "Growth management act" means chapter 36.70A RCW.
(5) "Industrial/manufacturing facilities" means building
improvements that are ten thousand square feet or larger, representing
a minimum improvement valuation of eight hundred thousand dollars for
uses categorized as "division D: manufacturing" by the United States
department of labor in the occupation safety and health
administration's standard industrial classification manual.
(6) "Lands zoned for industrial and manufacturing uses" means lands
in a city zoned as of January 1, 2012, for an industrial or
manufacturing use consistent with the city's comprehensive plan where
the lands are designated for industry.
(7) "Owner" means the property owner of record.
(8) "Targeted area" means an area of undeveloped lands zoned for
industrial and manufacturing uses in the city that is located within or
contiguous to an innovation partnership zone, foreign trade zone, or
EB-5 regional center, and designated for possible exemption under the
provisions of this chapter.
(9) "Undeveloped or underutilized" means that there are no existing
building improvements on the property or portions of the property
targeted for new or expanded industrial or manufacturing uses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1)(a) The value of new construction of
industrial/manufacturing facilities qualifying under this chapter is
exempt from property taxation under this title, as provided in this
section. The value of new construction of industrial/manufacturing
facilities is exempt from taxation for properties for which an
application for a certificate of tax exemption is submitted under this
chapter before December 31, 2018. The value is exempt under this
section for ten successive years beginning January 1st of the year
immediately following the calendar year of issuance of the certificate.
(b) The exemption provided in this section does not include the
value of land or nonindustrial/manufacturing-related improvements not
qualifying under this chapter.
(2) The exemption provided in this section is in addition to any
other exemptions, deferrals, credits, grants, or other tax incentives
provided by law.
(3) This chapter does not apply to state levies or increases in
assessed valuation made by the assessor on nonqualifying portions of
buildings and value of land nor to increases made by lawful order of a
county board of equalization, the department of revenue, or a county,
to a class of property throughout the county or specific area of the
county to achieve the uniformity of assessment or appraisal required by
law.
(4) This exemption does not apply to any county property tax unless
the governing body of the county adopts a resolution and notifies the
governing authority of its intent to allow the property to be exempted
from county property taxes.
(5) At the conclusion of the exemption period, the new
industrial/manufacturing facilities cost must be considered as new
construction for the purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 An owner of property making application
under this chapter must meet the following requirements:
(1) The new construction of industrial/manufacturing facilities
must be located on land zoned for industrial and manufacturing uses,
undeveloped or underutilized, and as provided in section 6 of this act,
designated by the city as a targeted area;
(2) The new construction of industrial/manufacturing facilities
must meet all construction and development regulations of the city;
(3) The new construction of industrial/manufacturing facilities
must be completed within three years from the date of approval of the
application; and
(4) The applicant must enter into a contract with the city approved
by the governing authority, or an administrative official or commission
authorized by the governing authority, under which the applicant has
agreed to the implementation of the development on terms and conditions
satisfactory to the governing authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The following criteria must be met
before an area may be designated as a targeted area:
(a) The area must be lands zoned for industrial and manufacturing
uses; and
(b) The city must have determined that the targeting of the area,
as evaluated by the governing authority, will assist in the new
construction of industrial/manufacturing facilities that will provide
employment for family living wage jobs.
(2) For the purpose of designating a targeted area, the governing
authority may adopt a resolution of intention to so designate an area
as generally described in the resolution. The resolution must state
the time and place of a hearing to be held by the governing authority
to consider the designation of the area and may include such other
information pertaining to the designation of the area as the governing
authority determines to be appropriate to apprise the public of the
action intended.
(3) The governing authority must give notice of a hearing held
under this chapter by publication of the notice once each week for two
consecutive weeks, not less than seven days, nor more than thirty days
before the date of the hearing in a paper having a general circulation
in the city where the proposed targeted area is located. The notice
must state the time, date, place, and purpose of the hearing and
generally identify the area proposed to be designated as a targeted
area.
(4) Following the hearing or a continuance of the hearing, and
subject to the limit on targeted areas, the governing authority may
designate all or a portion of the area described in the resolution of
intent as a targeted area if it finds, in its sole discretion, that the
criteria in subsection (1) of this section have been met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 An owner of property seeking an exemption
under this chapter must complete the following procedures:
(1) The owner must apply to the city on forms adopted by the
governing authority. The application must contain the following:
(a) Information setting forth the grounds supporting the requested
exemption including information indicated on the application form or in
the guidelines;
(b) A description of the project and site plan, and other
information requested;
(c) A statement of the expected number of new family living wage
jobs to be created; and
(d) A statement that the applicant is aware of the potential tax
liability involved when the property ceases to be eligible for the
incentive provided under this chapter;
(2) The applicant must verify the application by oath or
affirmation; and
(3) The application must be accompanied by the application fee, if
any, required under this chapter. The governing authority may permit
the applicant to revise an application before final action by the
governing authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The duly authorized administrative official
or committee of the city may approve the application if it finds that:
(1) A minimum of twenty-five new family living wage jobs will be
created on the subject site as a result of new construction of
manufacturing/industrial facilities within one year of building
occupancy;
(2) The proposed project is, or will be, at the time of completion,
in conformance with all local plans and regulations that apply at the
time the application is approved; and
(3) The criteria of this chapter have been satisfied.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The city governing authority or its
authorized representative must approve or deny an application filed
under this chapter within ninety days after receipt of the application.
(2) If the application is approved, the city must issue the owner
of the property a conditional certificate of acceptance of tax
exemption. The certificate must contain a statement by a duly
authorized administrative official of the governing authority that the
property has complied with the required criteria of this chapter.
(3) If the application is denied by the city, the city must state
in writing the reasons for denial and send the notice to the applicant
at the applicant's last known address within ten days of the denial.
(4) Upon denial by the city, an applicant may appeal the denial to
the city's governing authority within thirty days after receipt of the
denial. The appeal before the city's governing authority must be based
upon the record made before the city with the burden of proof on the
applicant to show that there was no substantial evidence to support the
city's decision. The decision of the city in denying or approving the
application is final.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The governing authority may establish an
application fee. This fee may not exceed an amount determined to be
required to cover the cost to be incurred by the governing authority
and the assessor in administering this chapter. The application fee
must be paid at the time the application for limited exemption is
filed. If the application is approved, the governing authority of the
city must pay the application fee to the county assessor for deposit in
the county current expense fund, after first deducting that portion of
the fee attributable to its own administrative costs in processing the
application. If the application is denied, the city's governing
authority may retain that portion of the application fee attributable
to its own administrative costs and refund the balance to the
applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) Upon completion of the new construction
of a manufacturing/industrial facility for which an application for an
exemption under this chapter has been approved and issued a certificate
of occupancy, the owner must file with the city the following:
(a) A description of the work that has been completed and a
statement that the new construction on the owner's property qualify the
property for a partial exemption under this chapter;
(b) A statement of the new family living wage jobs to be offered as
a result of the new construction of manufacturing/industrial
facilities; and
(c) A statement that the work has been completed within three years
of the issuance of the conditional certificate of tax exemption.
(2) Within thirty days after receipt of the statements required
under subsection (1) of this section, the city must determine whether
the work completed and the jobs to be offered are consistent with the
application and the contract approved by the city and whether the
application is qualified for a tax exemption under this chapter.
(3) If the criteria of this chapter have been satisfied and the
owner's property is qualified for a tax exemption under this chapter,
the city must file the certificate of tax exemption with the county
assessor within ten days of the expiration of the thirty-day period
provided under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The city must notify the applicant that a certificate of tax
exemption is denied if the city determines that:
(a) The work was not completed within three years of the
application date;
(b) The work was not constructed consistent with the application or
other applicable requirements;
(c) The jobs to be offered are not consistent with the application
and criteria of this chapter; or
(d) The owner's property is otherwise not qualified for an
exemption under this chapter.
(5) If the city finds that the work was not completed within the
required time period due to circumstances beyond the control of the
owner and that the owner has been acting and could reasonably be
expected to act in good faith and with due diligence, the governing
authority or the city official authorized by the governing authority
may extend the deadline for completion of the work for a period not to
exceed twenty-four consecutive months.
(6) The city's governing authority may enact an ordinance to
provide a process for an owner to appeal a decision by the city that
the owner is not entitled to a certificate of tax exemption to the
city. The owner may appeal a decision by the city to deny a
certificate of tax exemption in superior court under RCW 34.05.510
through 34.05.598, if the appeal is filed within thirty days of
notification by the city to the owner of the exemption denial.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) Thirty days after the anniversary of
the date of the certificate of tax exemption and each year for the tax
exemption period, the owner of the new industrial/manufacturing
facilities must file with a designated authorized representative of the
city an annual report indicating the following:
(a) A statement of the family living wage jobs at the facility as
of the anniversary date including the number of family living wage jobs
and corresponding annual wages for each position;
(b) A certification by the owner that the property has not changed
use;
(c) A description of changes or improvements constructed after
issuance of the certificate of tax exemption; and
(d) Any additional information requested by the city.
(2) A city that issues a certificate of tax exemption under this
chapter must report annually by December 31st of each year, beginning
in 2013, to the department of commerce. The report must include the
following information:
(a) The number of tax exemption certificates granted;
(b) The total number and type of new manufacturing/industrial
facilities constructed;
(c) The number of family living wage jobs resulting from the new
manufacturing/industrial facilities and corresponding annual wages for
each position; and
(d) The value of the tax exemption for each project receiving a tax
exemption and the total value of tax exemptions granted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) If the value of improvements have been
exempted under this chapter, the improvements continue to be exempted
for the applicable period under this chapter so long as they are not
converted to another use and continue to satisfy all applicable
conditions including, but not limited to, zoning, land use, building,
and family wage job creation.
(2) If an owner voluntarily opts to discontinue compliance with the
requirements of this chapter, the owner must notify the assessor within
sixty days of the change in use or intended discontinuance.
(3) If, after a certificate of tax exemption has been filed with
the county assessor, the city discovers that a portion of the property
is changed or will be changed to disqualify the owner for exemption
eligibility under this chapter, the tax exemption must be canceled and
the following occurs:
(a) Additional real property tax must be imposed on the value of
the nonqualifying improvements in the amount that would be imposed if
an exemption had not been available under this chapter, plus a penalty
equal to twenty percent of the additional value. This additional tax
is calculated based upon the difference between the property tax paid
and the property tax that would have been paid if it had included the
value of the nonqualifying improvements dated back to the date that the
improvements were converted to a nonqualifying use;
(b) The tax must include interest upon the amounts of the
additional tax at the same statutory rate charged on delinquent
property taxes from the dates on which the additional tax could have
been paid without penalty if the improvements had been assessed at a
value without regard to this chapter; and
(c) The additional tax owed together with interest and penalty
becomes a lien on the property and attaches at the time the property or
portion of the property is removed from the qualifying use under this
chapter or the amenities no longer meet the applicable requirements for
exemption under this chapter. A lien under this section has priority
to, and must be fully paid and satisfied before, a recognizance,
mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with
which the property may become charged or liable. The lien may be
foreclosed upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and in
the same manner provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent
real property taxes. An additional tax unpaid on its due date is
delinquent. From the date of delinquency until paid, interest must be
charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent property taxes.
(4) Upon a determination that a tax exemption is to be terminated
for a reason stated in this section, the city's governing authority
must notify the record owner of the property as shown by the tax rolls
by mail, return receipt requested, of the determination to terminate
the exemption. The owner may appeal the determination to the city,
within thirty days by filing a notice of appeal with the city, which
notice must specify the factual and legal basis on which the
determination of termination is alleged to be erroneous. At an appeal
hearing, all affected parties may be heard and all competent evidence
received. After the hearing, the deciding body or officer must either
affirm, modify, or repeal the decision of termination of exemption
based on the evidence received. An aggrieved party may appeal the
decision of the deciding body or officer to the superior court as
provided in RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.
(5) Upon determination by the city to terminate an exemption, the
county officials having possession of the assessment and tax rolls must
correct the rolls in the manner provided for omitted property under RCW
84.40.080. The county assessor must make such a valuation of the
property and improvements as is necessary to permit the correction of
the rolls. The value of the new industrial/manufacturing facilities
added to the rolls is considered new construction for the purposes of
chapter 84.40 RCW. The owner may appeal the valuation to the county
board of equalization as provided in chapter 84.40 RCW. If there has
been a failure to comply with this chapter, the property must be listed
as an omitted assessment for assessment years beginning January 1st of
the calendar year in which the noncompliance first occurred, but the
listing as an omitted assessment may not be for a period more than
three calendar years preceding the year in which the failure to comply
was discovered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 13 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 84 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
The joint legislative audit and review committee must report to the
legislature and the governor on the use, value, economic impact, and
employment impact of the property tax exemption for the value of new
construction of industrial/manufacturing facilities created under this
chapter. The joint legislative audit and review committee must also
include in its report the degree to which the exemption met its stated
goal. The report must be submitted to the legislature by December 31,
2018, and must include information for all values granted an exemption
between July 1, 2013, and December 31, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---