BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that additional
flexibility is needed for mercury light manufacturers to comply with
the requirements of chapter 70.275 RCW in order to provide a
sustainable funding mechanism and provide effective state protections
to producer-operated product stewardship programs as contemplated under
chapter 70.275 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.275.020 and 2010 c 130 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Brand" means a name, symbol, word, or mark that identifies a
product, rather than its components, and attributes the product to the
owner of the brand as the producer.
(2) "Collection" or "collect" means, except for persons involved in
mail-back programs:
(a) The activity of accumulating any amount of mercury-containing
lights at a location other than the location where the lights are used
by covered entities, and includes curbside collection activities,
household hazardous waste facilities, and other registered drop-off
locations; and
(b) The activity of transporting mercury-containing lights in the
state, where the transporter is not a generator of unwanted mercury-containing lights, to a location for purposes of accumulation.
(3) "Covered entities" means:
(a) A single-family or a multifamily household generator and
persons that deliver no more than fifteen mercury-containing lights to
registered collectors for a product stewardship program during a
ninety-day period; and
(b) A single-family or a multifamily household generator and
persons that utilize a registered residential curbside collection
program or a mail-back program for collection of mercury-containing
lights and that discards no more than fifteen mercury-containing lights
into those programs during a ninety-day period.
(4) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(5) "Final disposition" means the point beyond which no further
processing takes place and materials from mercury-containing lights
have been transformed for direct use as a feedstock in producing new
products, or disposed of or managed in permitted facilities.
(6) "Hazardous substances" or "hazardous materials" means those
substances or materials identified by rules adopted under chapter
70.105 RCW.
(7) "Mail-back program" means the use of a prepaid postage
container with mercury vapor barrier packaging that is used for the
collection and recycling of mercury-containing lights from covered
entities as part of a product stewardship program and is transported by
the United States postal service or a common carrier.
(8) "Mercury-containing lights" means lamps, bulbs, tubes, or other
devices that contain mercury and provide functional illumination in
homes, businesses, and outdoor stationary fixtures.
(9) "Mercury vapor barrier packaging" means sealable containers
that are specifically designed for the storage, handling, and transport
of mercury-containing lights in order to prevent the escape of mercury
into the environment by volatilization or any other means, and that
meet the requirements for transporting by the United States postal
service or a common carrier.
(10) "Orphan product" means a mercury-containing light that lacks
a producer's brand, or for which the producer is no longer in business
and has no successor in interest, or that bears a brand for which the
department cannot identify an owner.
(11) "Person" means a sole proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, nonprofit corporation or organization, limited liability
company, firm, association, cooperative, or other legal entity located
within or outside Washington state.
(12) "Processing" means recovering materials from unwanted products
for use as feedstock in new products. Processing must occur at
permitted facilities.
(13) "Producer" means a person that:
(a) Has or had legal ownership of the brand, brand name, or cobrand
of a mercury-containing light sold in or into Washington state((,
except for persons whose primary business is retail sales));
(b) Imports or has imported mercury-containing lights branded by a
producer that meets the requirements of (a) of this subsection and
where that producer has no physical presence in the United States;
(c) If (a) and (b) of this subsection do not apply, makes or made
an unbranded mercury-containing light that is sold or has been sold in
or into Washington state; or
(d)(i) Sells or sold at wholesale or retail a mercury-containing
light; (ii) does not have legal ownership of the brand; and (iii)
elects to fulfill the responsibilities of the producer for that
product.
(14) "Product stewardship" means a requirement for a producer of
mercury-containing lights to manage and reduce adverse safety, health,
and environmental impacts of the product throughout its life cycle,
including financing and providing for the collection, transporting,
reusing, recycling, processing, and final disposition of their
products.
(15) "Product stewardship plan" or "plan" means a detailed plan
describing the manner in which a product stewardship program will be
implemented.
(16) "Product stewardship program" or "program" means the methods,
systems, and services financed and provided by producers of mercury-containing lights generated by covered entities that addresses product
stewardship and includes collecting, transporting, reusing, recycling,
processing, and final disposition of unwanted mercury-containing
lights, including a fair share of orphan products.
(17) "Recovery" means the collection and transportation of unwanted
mercury-containing lights under this chapter.
(18)(a) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing unwanted
products into usable or marketable materials for use other than
landfill disposal or incineration.
(b) "Recycling" does not include energy recovery or energy
generation by means of combusting unwanted products with or without
other waste.
(19) "Reporting period" means the period commencing January 1st and
ending December 31st in the same calendar year.
(20) "Residuals" means nonrecyclable materials left over from
processing an unwanted product.
(21) "Retailer" means a person who offers mercury-containing lights
for sale at retail through any means including, but not limited to,
remote offerings such as sales outlets, catalogs, or the internet, but
does not include a sale that is a wholesale transaction with a
distributor or a retailer.
(22)(a) "Reuse" means a change in ownership of a mercury-containing
light or its components, parts, packaging, or shipping materials for
use in the same manner and purpose for which it was originally
purchased, or for use again, as in shipping materials, by the generator
of the shipping materials.
(b) "Reuse" does not include dismantling of products for the
purpose of recycling.
(23) "Stakeholder" means a person who may have an interest in or be
affected by a product stewardship program.
(24) "Stewardship organization" means an organization designated by
a producer or group of producers to act as an agent on behalf of each
producer to operate a product stewardship program.
(25) "Unwanted product" means a mercury-containing light no longer
wanted by its owner or that has been abandoned, discarded, or is
intended to be discarded by its owner.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.275.030 and 2010 c 130 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every producer of mercury-containing lights sold in or into
Washington state for residential use must ((fully finance and))
individually or jointly with other producers participate in a product
stewardship program approved by the department for that product((,
including the department's costs for administering and enforcing this
chapter)). Approved product stewardship plans must be financed in a
manner prescribed by RCW 70.275.050 and must include the department's
administration and enforcement costs as provided in RCW 70.275.050(1).
(2) ((Every producer must:
(a) Participate in)) A product stewardship program ((approved by
the department and operated by a product stewardship organization
contracted by the department. All producers must finance and
participate in the plan operated by the product stewardship
organization, unless the producer obtains department approval for an
independent plan as described in (b) of this subsection; or
(b) Finance and operate, either individually or jointly with other
producers, a product stewardship program approved by the department.
(3) A producer, group of producers, or product stewardship
organization funded by producers)) must pay all administrative and
operational costs associated with ((their)) the program ((or
programs)), except for the collection costs associated with curbside
and mail-back collection programs. For curbside and mail-back
programs, a producer, group of producers, or product stewardship
organization shall finance the costs of transporting mercury-containing
lights from accumulation points and for processing mercury-containing
lights collected by curbside and mail-back programs. For collection
locations, including household hazardous waste facilities, charities,
retailers, government recycling sites, or other suitable locations, a
producer, group of producers, or product stewardship organization shall
finance the costs of collection, transportation, and processing of
mercury-containing lights collected at the collection locations.
(((4))) (3) Product stewardship programs shall collect unwanted
mercury-containing lights delivered from covered entities for reuse,
recycling, processing, or final disposition, and not charge a fee when
lights are dropped off or delivered into the program.
(((5))) (4) Product stewardship programs shall provide, at a
minimum, no cost services in all cities in the state with populations
greater than ten thousand and all counties of the state on an ongoing,
year-round basis.
(((6))) (5) All product stewardship programs operated under
approved plans must recover their fair share of unwanted covered
products as determined by the department.
(((7))) (6) The department or its designee may inspect, audit, or
review audits of processing and disposal facilities used to fulfill the
requirements of a product stewardship program.
(((8))) (7) No product stewardship program required under this
chapter may use federal or state prison labor for processing unwanted
products.
(((9))) (8) Product stewardship programs for mercury-containing
lights must be fully implemented by January 1, ((2013)) 2014.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.275.040 and 2010 c 130 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A producer, group of producers, or ((product)) stewardship
((program)) organization submitting a proposed product stewardship plan
under RCW 70.275.030(((2)(b))) must submit that plan by ((January))
June 1st of the year prior to the planned implementation.
(2) The department shall establish rules for plan content. Plans
must include but are not limited to:
(a) All necessary information to inform the department about the
((plan operator)) stewardship organization and participating producers
and their brands;
(b) The management and organization of the product stewardship
program that will oversee the collection, transportation, and
processing services;
(c) The identity of collection, transportation, and processing
service providers, including a description of the consideration given
to existing residential curbside collection infrastructure and mail-back systems as an appropriate collection mechanism;
(d) How the product stewardship program will seek to use businesses
within the state, including transportation services, retailers,
collection sites and services, existing curbside collection services,
existing mail-back services, and processing facilities;
(e) A description of how the public will be informed about the
recycling program, including provisions providing consumers with
information describing collection opportunities for postconsumer
household mercury-containing lights and information promoting waste
prevention and recycling. The information must also make consumers
aware that funding for mercury-containing light recycling programs in
the state has been added to the purchase price of all household
mercury-containing lights sold in this state;
(f) A description of the proposed financing system required under
RCW 70.275.050, including: (i) The determination of the recommended
environmental handling charge, taking into consideration each of the
factors provided in RCW 70.275.050(3) (a) through (e); and (ii) the
mechanism by which the environmental handling charge must be collected
and remitted by a stewardship organization as provided in RCW
70.275.050(2);
(g) How mercury and other hazardous substances will be handled for
collection through final disposition;
(h) A public review and comment process; and
(i) Any other information deemed necessary by the department to
ensure an effective mercury light product stewardship program that is
in compliance with all applicable laws and rules.
(3) All plans submitted to the department must be made available
for public review on the department's web site and at the department's
headquarters.
(4) At least two years from the start of the product stewardship
program and once every four years thereafter, a producer, group of
producers, or product stewardship organization operating a product
stewardship program must update its product stewardship plan and submit
the updated plan to the department for review and approval according to
rules adopted by the department.
(5) Each product stewardship program shall submit an annual report
to the department describing the results of implementing their plan for
the prior year. The department may adopt rules for reporting
requirements. All reports submitted to the department must be made
available for public review on the department's web site and at the
department's headquarters.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.275.050 and 2010 c 130 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((All producers that sell mercury-containing lights in or into
the state of Washington are responsible for financing the mercury-containing light recycling program required by RCW 70.275.030.
(2) Each producer shall pay fifteen thousand dollars to the
department to contract for a product stewardship program to be operated
by a product stewardship organization. The department shall retain
five thousand dollars of the fifteen thousand dollars for
administration and enforcement costs.
(3) A producer or producers participating in an independent plan,
as permitted under RCW 70.275.030(2)(b), must pay the full cost of
operation. Each producer participating in an approved independent plan
shall pay an annual fee of five thousand dollars to the department for
administration and enforcement costs.)) Each producer shall pay an
annual fee of up to five thousand dollars to the stewardship
organization for the department's administration and enforcement costs
as part of the financing of a product stewardship program. The
stewardship organization shall consult with the department as to the
projected amount of the department's administration and enforcement
costs in connection with determining the amount of the annual fee to be
included in the product stewardship program financing. By April 1st of
each year, a stewardship organization shall remit to the department the
aggregate amount of the annual fees paid by producers to the
stewardship organization for this purpose.
(2) A product stewardship program's administrative and operating
costs must be financed by an environmental handling charge to be paid
by consumers purchasing household mercury-containing lights at retail.
The recommended environmental handling charge to be paid by retail
purchasers may, but is not required to, vary by the type of mercury-containing light. The stewardship organization shall consult with
qualified recyclers and producers in connection with the determination
of its recommendations. The stewardship organization shall collect the
environmental handling charge either: (a) Directly from producers who
shall add the charge to the cost of the household mercury-containing
light paid by their customers in the state; or (b) from retailers who
elect to pay the amount of the environmental handling charge collected
from retail purchasers of household mercury-containing lights and add
the charge to the retail price of the household mercury-containing
light. The payments must be accompanied by a return in the form as
provided in the approved product stewardship plan.
(3) No later than ninety days after the producers' or stewardship
organization's recommended annual fee is submitted under subsection (1)
of this section, the department shall determine the amount of the
environmental handling charge to be paid by retail purchasers of
household mercury-containing lights in the state for each household
mercury-containing light purchased from a retailer, after reviewing the
product stewardship plan, consulting with the producers, any
stewardship organization, and qualified recyclers, taking into
consideration: (a) The anticipated number of household mercury-containing lights sold to covered entities in the state at retail
during the calendar year; (b) the number of spent household mercury-containing lights delivered from covered entities expected to be
recycled during the calendar year; (c) the cost of collecting,
transporting, and recycling spent household mercury-containing lights
delivered from covered entities to collection locations identified in
RCW 70.275.030(2); (d) the administrative costs of the stewardship
organization; (e) the cost of recycling program elements described
under RCW 70.275.040(2)(e); and (f) a prudent reserve not to exceed
fifteen percent.
(4) By August 1, 2015, and no more frequently than once per year
and no less frequently than once every two years thereafter, the
department shall review the environmental handling charge established
under subsection (3) of this section and make any adjustments to the
environmental handling charge to ensure that there are sufficient
revenues to fund the cost of the program. Adjustments to the
environmental handling charge that are made on or before August 1st
apply to the calendar year beginning the following January 1st. The
department shall base an adjustment of the environmental handling
charge on both of the following factors: (a) The sufficiency, and any
surplus, of revenues in the product stewardship programs account
created in RCW 70.275.130 to fund the transportation and recycling of
spent household mercury-containing lights that are projected to be
recycled in the state; and (b) the sufficiency of revenues in the
product stewardship programs account for the stewardship organization
to administer the program, plus a prudent reserve not to exceed fifteen
percent of that amount.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.275.120 and 2010 c 130 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
((All producers shall pay the department annual fees to cover the
cost of administering and enforcing this chapter. The department may
prioritize the work to implement this chapter if fees are not adequate
to fund all costs of the program.)) (1) It is the intent of the
legislature that a producer, group of producers, or a stewardship
organization preparing, submitting, and implementing a spent household
mercury-containing light cost-reimbursement program pursuant to this
chapter, as well as distributors or retailers, are granted immunity,
individually and jointly, from federal and state antitrust laws for the
limited purpose of establishing, implementing, and complying with the
requirements of this chapter. It is further the intent of the
legislature that the activities of the producer, group of producers,
stewardship organization, and the distributors or retailers that
implement and comply with the provisions of this chapter may not be
considered to be in restraint of trade, a conspiracy, or combination
thereof, or any other unlawful activity in violation of any provisions
of federal or state antitrust laws.
(2) The department shall actively supervise the conduct of the
stewardship organization, the producers of mercury-containing lights,
distributors, and retailers in connection with their conduct authorized
by this chapter. The department may require the producers, the
stewardship organization, distributors, or retailers to take those
actions that the department considers necessary to ensure that the
stewardship organization is not engaging in conduct that is not
authorized under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The product stewardship program for the disposal of mercury-containing lights under chapter 70.275 RCW is terminated on January 1,
2024, as provided in section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed, effective
January 1, 2025:
(1) RCW 70.275.010 (Findings -- Purpose) and 2010 c 130 s 1;
(2) RCW 70.275.020 (Definitions) and 2013 c ... s 2 (section 2 of
this act) and 2010 c 130 s 2;
(3) RCW 70.275.030 (Product stewardship program) and 2013 c ... s
3 (section 3 of this act) & 2010 c 130 s 3;
(4) RCW 70.275.040 (Submission of proposed product stewardship
plans -- Department to establish rules -- Public review -- Plan update--Annual report) and 2013 c ... s 4 (section 4 of this act) & 2010 c 130
s 4;
(5) RCW 70.275.050 (Financing the mercury-containing light
recycling program) and 2013 c ... s 5 (section 5 of this act) & 2010 c
130 s 5;
(6) RCW 70.275.060 (Collection and management of mercury) and 2010
c 130 s 6;
(7) RCW 70.275.070 (Collectors of unwanted mercury-containing
lights -- Duties) and 2010 c 130 s 7;
(8) RCW 70.275.080 (Requirement to recycle end-of-life mercury-containing lights) and 2010 c 130 s 8;
(9) RCW 70.275.090 (Producers must participate in an approved
product stewardship program) and 2010 c 130 s 9;
(10) RCW 70.275.100 (Written warning -- Penalty -- Appeal) and 2010 c
130 s 10;
(11) RCW 70.275.110 (Department's web site to list producers
participating in product stewardship plan -- Required participation in a
product stewardship plan -- Written warning -- Penalty -- Rules -- Exemptions)
and 2010 c 130 s 11;
(12) RCW 70.275.120 (Producers must pay annual fees) and 2013 c ...
s 6 (section 6 of this act) & 2010 c 130 s 12;
(13) RCW 70.275.130 (Product stewardship programs account) and 2010
c 130 s 13;
(14) RCW 70.275.140 (Adoption of rules -- Report to the legislature--Invitation to entities to comment on issues -- Estimate of statewide
recycling rate for mercury-containing lights -- Mercury vapor barrier
packaging) and 2010 c 130 s 14;
(15) RCW 70.275.150 (Application of chapter to the Washington
utilities and transportation commission) and 2010 c 130 s 15;
(16) RCW 70.275.160 (Application of chapter to entities regulated
under chapter 70.105 RCW) and 2010 c 130 s 16;
(17) RCW 70.275.900 (Chapter liberally construed) and 2010 c 130 s
17; and
(18) RCW 70.275.901 (Severability -- 2010 c 130) and 2010 c 130 s 21.

--- END ---