BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.44.0915 and 2012 c 86 s 804 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the department
of transportation, with respect to state highways maintained within
port district property, may, at the request of a port commission, make
and enter into agreements with port districts and adjacent
jurisdictions or agencies of the districts, for the purpose of
identifying, managing, and maintaining short heavy haul industrial
corridors within port district property for the movement of overweight
sealed containers used in international trade.
(b) The department of transportation shall designate that portion
of state route number 97 from the Canadian border to milepost 331.12 as
a heavy haul industrial corridor for the movement of overweight
vehicles to and from the Oroville railhead. The department may issue
special permits to vehicles operating in the heavy haul industrial
corridor to carry weight in excess of weight limits established in RCW
46.44.041, but not to exceed a gross vehicle weight of 139,994 pounds.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section, the
department may issue special permits to vehicles operating in a heavy
haul industrial corridor to carry weight in excess of weight limits
established in RCW 46.44.041. However, the excess weight on a single
axle, tandem axle, or any axle group must not exceed that allowed by
RCW 46.44.091 (1) and (2), weight per tire must not exceed six hundred
pounds per inch width of tire, and gross vehicle weight must not exceed
one hundred five thousand five hundred pounds.
(3) The entity operating or hiring vehicles under subsection (1)(b)
of this section or moving overweight sealed containers used in
international trade must pay a fee for each special permit of one
hundred dollars per month or one thousand dollars annually, beginning
from the date of issue, for all movements under the special permit made
on state highways within a heavy haul industrial corridor. Within a
port district property, under no circumstances are the for hire
carriers or rail customers responsible for the purchase or cost of the
permits. All funds collected, except the amount retained by authorized
agents of the department under RCW 46.44.096, must be forwarded to the
state treasurer and deposited in the motor vehicle fund.
(4) For purposes of this section, an overweight sealed container
used in international trade, including its contents, is considered
nondivisible when transported within a heavy haul industrial corridor
defined by the department.
(5) Any agreement entered into by the department as authorized
under this section with a port district adjacent to Puget Sound and
located within a county that has a population of more than seven
hundred thousand, but less than one million, must limit the
applicability of any established heavy haul corridor to that portion of
state route no. 509 beginning at milepost 0.25 in the vicinity of East
'D' Street and ending at milepost ((3.88)) 5.7 in the vicinity of
((Taylor)) Norpoint Way Northeast. ((For the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, the limit for any established heavy haul corridor established
pursuant to this subsection (5) must be within that portion of state
route number 509 beginning at milepost 0.25 in the vicinity of East 'D'
Street and ending at milepost 5.7 in the vicinity of Norpoint Way
Northeast.))
(6) The department of transportation may adopt reasonable rules to
implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---