BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
recognize the application of telemedicine as a reimbursable service by
which an individual receives medical services from a health care
provider without in person contact with the provider. It is also the
intent of the legislature to reduce the compliance requirements on
hospitals when granting privileges or associations to telemedicine
physicians.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A health plan offered to employees and their covered dependents
under this chapter issued or renewed on or after the effective date of
this section shall reimburse a provider for a health care service
provided to a covered person through telemedicine if:
(a) The plan provides coverage of the health care service when
provided in-person by the provider; and
(b) The health care service is medically necessary.
(2) An originating site for a telemedicine health care service
subject to subsection (1) of this section includes a:
(a) Hospital;
(b) Rural health clinic;
(c) Federally qualified health center;
(d) Physician's or other health care provider's office;
(e) Community mental health center;
(f) Skilled nursing facility; or
(g) Renal dialysis center, except an independent renal dialysis
center.
(3) Any originating site under subsection (2) of this section may
charge a facility fee for infrastructure and preparation of the
patient. Reimbursement must be subject to a negotiated agreement
between the originating site and the health plan. A distant site or
any other site not identified in subsection (2) of this section may not
charge a facility fee.
(4) The plan may not distinguish between originating sites that are
rural and urban in providing the coverage required in subsection (1) of
this section.
(5) The plan may subject coverage of a telemedicine health service
under subsection (1) of this section to all terms and conditions of the
plan, including, but not limited to, utilization review, prior
authorization, deductible, copayment, or coinsurance requirements that
are applicable to coverage of a comparable health care service provided
in-person.
(6) This section does not require the plan to reimburse:
(a) An originating site for professional fees;
(b) A provider for a health care service that is not a covered
benefit under the plan; or
(c) An originating site or health care provider when the site or
provider is not a contracted provider under the plan.
(7) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distant site" means the site at which a physician or other
licensed provider, delivering a professional service, is physically
located at the time the service is provided through telemedicine;
(b) "Health care service" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005;
(c) "Originating site" means the physical location of a patient
receiving health care services through telemedicine;
(d) "Provider" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005; and
(e) "Telemedicine" means the delivery of health care services
through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting
real-time communication between the patient at the originating site and
the provider, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.
For purposes of this section only, "telemedicine" does not include the
use of audio- only telephone, facsimile, or electronic mail.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For health plans issued or renewed on or after the effective
date of this section, a health carrier shall reimburse a provider for
a health care service provided to a covered person through telemedicine
if:
(a) The plan provides coverage of the health care service when
provided in-person by the provider; and
(b) The health care service is medically necessary.
(2) An originating site for a telemedicine health care service
subject to subsection (1) of this section includes a:
(a) Hospital;
(b) Rural health clinic;
(c) Federally qualified health center;
(d) Physician's or other health care provider's office;
(e) Community mental health center;
(f) Skilled nursing facility; or
(g) Renal dialysis center, except an independent renal dialysis
center.
(3) Any originating site under subsection (2) of this section may
charge a facility fee for infrastructure and preparation of the
patient. Reimbursement must be subject to a negotiated agreement
between the originating site and the health carrier. A distant site or
any other site not identified in subsection (2) of this section may not
charge a facility fee.
(4) A health carrier may not distinguish between originating sites
that are rural and urban in providing the coverage required in
subsection (1) of this section.
(5) A health carrier may subject coverage of a telemedicine health
service under subsection (1) of this section to all terms and
conditions of the plan in which the covered person is enrolled,
including, but not limited to, utilization review, prior authorization,
deductible, copayment, or coinsurance requirements that are applicable
to coverage of a comparable health care service provided in-person.
(6) This section does not require a health carrier to reimburse:
(a) An originating site for professional fees;
(b) A provider for a health care service that is not a covered
benefit under the plan; or
(c) An originating site or health care provider when the site or
provider is not a contracted provider under the plan.
(7) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distant site" means the site at which a physician or other
licensed provider, delivering a professional service, is physically
located at the time the service is provided through telemedicine;
(b) "Health care service" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005;
(c) "Originating site" means the physical location of a patient
receiving health care services through telemedicine;
(d) "Provider" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005; and
(e) "Telemedicine" means the delivery of health care services
through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting
real-time communication between the patient at the originating site and
the provider, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.
For purposes of this section only, "telemedicine" does not include the
use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, or electronic mail.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon initiation or renewal of a contract with the Washington
state health care authority to administer a medicaid managed care plan,
a managed health care system shall reimburse a provider for a health
care service provided to a covered person through telemedicine if:
(a) The medicaid managed care plan in which the covered person is
enrolled provides coverage of the health care service when provided in-person by the provider; and
(b) The health care service is medically necessary.
(2) An originating site for a telemedicine health care service
subject to subsection (1) of this section includes a:
(a) Hospital;
(b) Rural health clinic;
(c) Federally qualified health center;
(d) Physician's or other health care provider's office;
(e) Community mental health center;
(f) Skilled nursing facility; or
(g) Renal dialysis center, except an independent renal dialysis
center.
(3) Any originating site under subsection (2) of this section may
charge a facility fee for infrastructure and preparation of the
patient. Reimbursement must be subject to a negotiated agreement
between the originating site and the managed health care system. A
distant site or any other site not identified in subsection (2) of this
section may not charge a facility fee.
(4) A managed health care system may not distinguish between
originating sites that are rural and urban in providing the coverage
required in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) A managed health care system may subject coverage of a
telemedicine health service under subsection (1) of this section to all
terms and conditions of the plan in which the covered person is
enrolled, including, but not limited to, utilization review, prior
authorization, deductible, copayment, or coinsurance requirements that
are applicable to coverage of a comparable health care service provided
in-person.
(6) This section does not require a managed health care system to
reimburse:
(a) An originating site for professional fees;
(b) A provider for a health care service that is not a covered
benefit under the plan; or
(c) An originating site or health care provider when the site or
provider is not a contracted provider under the plan.
(7) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distant site" means the site at which a physician or other
licensed provider, delivering a professional service, is physically
located at the time the service is provided through telemedicine;
(b) "Health care service" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005;
(c) "Managed health care system" means any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care
service contractors, health maintenance organizations, health insuring
organizations, or any combination thereof, that provides directly or by
contract health care services covered under this chapter and rendered
by licensed providers, on a prepaid capitated basis and that meets the
requirements of section 1903(m)(1)(A) of Title XIX of the federal
social security act or federal demonstration waivers granted under
section 1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act;
(d) "Originating site" means the physical location of a patient
receiving health care services through telemedicine;
(e) "Provider" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005; and
(f) "Telemedicine" means the delivery of health care services
through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting
real-time communication between the patient at the originating site and
the provider, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.
For purposes of this section only, "telemedicine" does not include the
use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, or electronic mail.
(8) To measure the impact on access to care for underserved
communities and costs to the state and the medicaid managed health care
system for reimbursement of telemedicine services, the Washington state
health care authority, using existing data and resources, shall provide
a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature no later than December 31, 2018.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.41.020 and 2010 c 94 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the following
terms, whenever used in this chapter, shall be deemed to have the
following meanings:
(1) "Department" means the Washington state department of health.
(2) "Emergency care to victims of sexual assault" means medical
examinations, procedures, and services provided by a hospital emergency
room to a victim of sexual assault following an alleged sexual assault.
(3) "Emergency contraception" means any health care treatment
approved by the food and drug administration that prevents pregnancy,
including but not limited to administering two increased doses of
certain oral contraceptive pills within seventy-two hours of sexual
contact.
(4) "Hospital" means any institution, place, building, or agency
which provides accommodations, facilities and services over a
continuous period of twenty-four hours or more, for observation,
diagnosis, or care, of two or more individuals not related to the
operator who are suffering from illness, injury, deformity, or
abnormality, or from any other condition for which obstetrical,
medical, or surgical services would be appropriate for care or
diagnosis. "Hospital" as used in this chapter does not include hotels,
or similar places furnishing only food and lodging, or simply
domiciliary care; nor does it include clinics, or physician's offices
where patients are not regularly kept as bed patients for twenty-four
hours or more; nor does it include nursing homes, as defined and which
come within the scope of chapter 18.51 RCW; nor does it include
birthing centers, which come within the scope of chapter 18.46 RCW; nor
does it include psychiatric hospitals, which come within the scope of
chapter 71.12 RCW; nor any other hospital, or institution specifically
intended for use in the diagnosis and care of those suffering from
mental illness, intellectual disability, convulsive disorders, or other
abnormal mental condition. Furthermore, nothing in this chapter or the
rules adopted pursuant thereto shall be construed as authorizing the
supervision, regulation, or control of the remedial care or treatment
of residents or patients in any hospital conducted for those who rely
primarily upon treatment by prayer or spiritual means in accordance
with the creed or tenets of any well recognized church or religious
denominations.
(5) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal
successor thereof.
(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(7) "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.125.030.
(8) "Victim of sexual assault" means a person who alleges or is
alleged to have been sexually assaulted and who presents as a patient.
(9) "Distant site" means the site at which a physician or other
licensed provider, delivering a professional service, is physically
located at the time the service is provided through telemedicine.
(10) "Originating site" means the physical location of a patient
receiving health care services through telemedicine.
(11) "Telemedicine" means the delivery of health care services
through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting
real-time communication between the patient at the originating site and
the provider, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.
"Telemedicine" does not include the use of audio-only telephone,
facsimile, or electronic mail.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.41.230 and 2013 c 301 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, prior to
granting or renewing clinical privileges or association of any
physician or hiring a physician, a hospital or facility approved
pursuant to this chapter shall request from the physician and the
physician shall provide the following information:
(a) The name of any hospital or facility with or at which the
physician had or has any association, employment, privileges, or
practice during the prior five years: PROVIDED, That the hospital may
request additional information going back further than five years, and
the physician shall use his or her best efforts to comply with such a
request for additional information;
(b) Whether the physician has ever been or is in the process of
being denied, revoked, terminated, suspended, restricted, reduced,
limited, sanctioned, placed on probation, monitored, or not renewed for
any professional activity listed in (b)(i) through (x) of this
subsection, or has ever voluntarily or involuntarily relinquished,
withdrawn, or failed to proceed with an application for any
professional activity listed in (b)(i) through (x) of this subsection
in order to avoid an adverse action or to preclude an investigation or
while under investigation relating to professional competence or
conduct:
(i) License to practice any profession in any jurisdiction;
(ii) Other professional registration or certification in any
jurisdiction;
(iii) Specialty or subspecialty board certification;
(iv) Membership on any hospital medical staff;
(v) Clinical privileges at any facility, including hospitals,
ambulatory surgical centers, or skilled nursing facilities;
(vi) Medicare, medicaid, the food and drug administration, the
national institute of health (office of human research protection),
governmental, national, or international regulatory agency, or any
public program;
(vii) Professional society membership or fellowship;
(viii) Participation or membership in a health maintenance
organization, preferred provider organization, independent practice
association, physician-hospital organization, or other entity;
(ix) Academic appointment;
(x) Authority to prescribe controlled substances (drug enforcement
agency or other authority);
(c) Any pending professional medical misconduct proceedings or any
pending medical malpractice actions in this state or another state, the
substance of the allegations in the proceedings or actions, and any
additional information concerning the proceedings or actions as the
physician deems appropriate;
(d) The substance of the findings in the actions or proceedings and
any additional information concerning the actions or proceedings as the
physician deems appropriate;
(e) A waiver by the physician of any confidentiality provisions
concerning the information required to be provided to hospitals
pursuant to this subsection; and
(f) A verification by the physician that the information provided
by the physician is accurate and complete.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, prior to
granting privileges or association to any physician or hiring a
physician, a hospital or facility approved pursuant to this chapter
shall request from any hospital with or at which the physician had or
has privileges, was associated, or was employed, during the preceding
five years, the following information concerning the physician:
(a) Any pending professional medical misconduct proceedings or any
pending medical malpractice actions, in this state or another state;
(b) Any judgment or settlement of a medical malpractice action and
any finding of professional misconduct in this state or another state
by a licensing or disciplinary board; and
(c) Any information required to be reported by hospitals pursuant
to RCW 18.71.0195.
(3) In lieu of the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, when granting or renewing privileges or association of any
physician providing telemedicine services, an originating site hospital
may rely on a distant site hospital's decision to grant or renew
clinical privileges or association of the physician if the originating
site hospital obtains reasonable assurances, through a written
agreement with the distant site hospital, that all of the following
provisions are met:
(a) The distant site hospital providing the telemedicine services
is a medicare participating hospital;
(b) Any physician providing telemedicine services at the distant
site hospital will be fully privileged to provide such services by the
distant site hospital;
(c) Any physician providing telemedicine services will hold and
maintain a valid license to perform such services issued or recognized
by the state of Washington; and
(d) With respect to any distant site physician who holds current
privileges at the originating site hospital whose patients are
receiving the telemedicine services, the originating site hospital has
evidence of an internal review of the distant site physician's
performance of these privileges and sends the distant site hospital
such performance information for use in the periodic appraisal of the
distant site physician. At a minimum, this information must include
all adverse events, as defined in RCW 70.56.010, that result from the
telemedicine services provided by the distant site physician to the
originating site hospital's patients and all complaints the originating
site hospital has received about the distant site physician.
(4) The medical quality assurance commission shall be advised
within thirty days of the name of any physician denied staff
privileges, association, or employment on the basis of adverse findings
under subsection (1) of this section.
(((4))) (5) A hospital or facility that receives a request for
information from another hospital or facility pursuant to subsections
(1) ((and (2))) through (3) of this section shall provide such
information concerning the physician in question to the extent such
information is known to the hospital or facility receiving such a
request, including the reasons for suspension, termination, or
curtailment of employment or privileges at the hospital or facility.
A hospital, facility, or other person providing such information in
good faith is not liable in any civil action for the release of such
information.
(((5))) (6) Information and documents, including complaints and
incident reports, created specifically for, and collected, and
maintained by a quality improvement committee are not subject to
discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no
person who was in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who
participated in the creation, collection, or maintenance of information
or documents specifically for the committee shall be permitted or
required to testify in any civil action as to the content of such
proceedings or the documents and information prepared specifically for
the committee. This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil
action, the discovery of the identity of persons involved in the
medical care that is the basis of the civil action whose involvement
was independent of any quality improvement activity; (b) in any civil
action, the testimony of any person concerning the facts which form the
basis for the institution of such proceedings of which the person had
personal knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in
any civil action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or
revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges,
introduction into evidence information collected and maintained by
quality improvement committees regarding such health care provider; (d)
in any civil action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were
terminated or restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed,
if any and the reasons for the restrictions; or (e) in any civil
action, discovery and introduction into evidence of the patient's
medical records required by regulation of the department of health to
be made regarding the care and treatment received.
(((6))) (7) Hospitals shall be granted access to information held
by the medical quality assurance commission and the board of
osteopathic medicine and surgery pertinent to decisions of the hospital
regarding credentialing and recredentialing of practitioners.
(((7))) (8) Violation of this section shall not be considered
negligence per se.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The medical quality assurance commission,
the nursing care quality assurance commission, and the board of
osteopathic medicine and surgery shall inform the health committees of
the legislature on recommended or adopted criteria under which health
care providers from outside of Washington state would be permitted to
deliver telemedicine services to Washington state residents that will
ensure the quality of services delivered and the safety of those
patients receiving those services. By December 1, 2014, the board and
commissions shall provide an update to the appropriate committees of
the legislature on the progress of these efforts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act take effect
January 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The legislature encourages health plans to
adopt the requirements of sections 2 through 4 of this act prior to
January 1, 2016. Therefore, nothing in this act prohibits a plan from
adopting the requirements of sections 2 through 4 of this act prior to
January 1, 2016.

--- END ---