BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.240 and 2012 c 88 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following investigative, law enforcement, and crime victim
information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this
chapter:
(1) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative
records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology
agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to
discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is
essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy;
(2) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law
enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the commission, if
disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical safety, or
property. If at the time a complaint is filed the complainant, victim,
or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or nondisclosure, such
desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed with the commission
about any elected official or candidate for public office must be made
in writing and signed by the complainant under oath;
(3) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b);
(4) License applications under RCW 9.41.070; copies of license
applications or information on the applications may be released to law
enforcement or corrections agencies;
(5) Information revealing the identity of child victims of sexual
assault who are under age eighteen. Identifying information means the
child victim's name, address, location, photograph, and in cases in
which the child victim is a relative or stepchild of the alleged
perpetrator, identification of the relationship between the child and
the alleged perpetrator;
(6) The statewide gang database referenced in RCW 43.43.762;
(7) Data from the electronic sales tracking system established in
RCW 69.43.165;
(8) Information submitted to the statewide unified sex offender
notification and registration program under RCW 36.28A.040(6) by a
person for the purpose of receiving notification regarding a registered
sex offender, including the person's name, residential address, and e-mail address; ((and))
(9) Personally identifying information collected by law enforcement
agencies pursuant to local security alarm system programs and vacation
crime watch programs. Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted
so as to prohibit the legal owner of a residence or business from
accessing information regarding his or her residence or business;
(10) Victim impact statements as defined or described in Article I,
section 35 of the state Constitution and RCW 7.69.020 and 7.69.030; and
(11) Documents and other materials provided by the attorney for the
defendant, or by the defendant when acting pro se, to the prosecuting
attorney, including but not limited to, documents and other materials
provided during communications or discussions described under RCW
9.94A.421 or 9.94A.460, proceedings under RCW 9.94A.660, 9.94A.655,
9.94A.670, or 10.95.040 through 10.95.060, or similar exchanges or
communications described in court rules.

--- END ---