BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the
superintendent of public instruction was authorized to align the state
essential academic learning requirements for mathematics, reading,
writing, and communication with the common set of standards for
students in grades kindergarten through twelve, known as the common
core state standards, which were initiated by the governors and chief
school officers of forty-five states, including Washington. The
legislature further finds that Washington has joined one of two
multistate consortia using a federal grant to develop new English
language arts and mathematics assessments in grades three through eight
and grade eleven that are, among other factors, aligned with the common
core state standards and intended to demonstrate a student's career and
college readiness. The legislature further finds that the assessments
are required to be ready for use by the 2014-15 school year.
The legislature intends to reduce the overall costs of the state
assessment system by implementing the eleventh grade English language
arts and mathematics assessments being developed by a multistate
consortium in which Washington is participating, maximize use of the
consortium assessments by developing a tenth grade high school English
language arts assessment and modifying the algebra I and geometry end-of-course assessment to be used only during the transition to the
consortium-developed assessments, and reduce to three the number of
assessments that will be required for students to graduate beginning
with the class of 2019.
The legislature further intends that the eleventh grade consortium-developed assessments have two different student performance standards:
One for the purposes of high school graduation that will be established
by the state board of education and one that is intended to demonstrate
a student's career and college readiness.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 22 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the statewide student assessment, opportunities for a
student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which the
student was not successful, and, if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or more objective
alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of
state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for
each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the statewide student
assessment for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained ((by most students at about the
age of sixteen,)) and is evidence that the students have successfully
met the state standard in the content areas included in the
certificate. With the exception of students satisfying the provisions
of RCW 28A.155.045 or 28A.655.0611, acquisition of the certificate is
required for graduation from a public high school but is not the only
requirement for graduation.
(3)(a) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008 through the
graduating class of 2015, with the exception of students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who meets the state standards
on the reading, writing, and mathematics ((content areas of the)) high
school statewide student assessment shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement. The mathematics assessment shall be the end-of-course assessment for the first year of high school mathematics that
assesses the standards common to algebra I and integrated mathematics
I or the end-of-course assessment for the second year of high school
mathematics that assesses standards common to geometry and integrated
mathematics II.
(b) As the state transitions from reading and writing assessments
to an English language arts assessment and from end-of-course
assessments to a comprehensive assessment for high school mathematics,
a student in a graduating class of 2016 through 2018 shall earn a
certificate of academic achievement if the student meets the state
standard as follows:
(i) Students in the graduating class of 2016 may use the results
from:
(A) The reading and writing assessment or the English language arts
assessment developed with the multistate consortium; and
(B) The end-of-course assessment for the first year of high school
mathematics, the end-of-course assessment for the second year of high
school mathematics, or the comprehensive mathematics assessment
developed with the multistate consortium.
(ii) Students in the graduating classes of 2017 and 2018 may use
the results from:
(A) The tenth grade English language arts assessment developed by
the superintendent of public instruction using resources from the
multistate consortium or the English language arts assessment developed
with the multistate consortium; and
(B) The end-of-course assessment for the first year of high school
mathematics, the end-of-course assessment for the second year of high
school mathematics, or the comprehensive mathematics assessment
developed with the multistate consortium.
(c) Beginning with the graduating class of 2019, a student who
meets the state standards on the high school English language arts
assessment developed with the multistate consortium and the
comprehensive mathematics assessment developed with the multistate
consortium shall earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(d) If a student does not successfully meet the state standards in
one or more content areas required for the certificate of academic
achievement, then the student may retake the assessment in the content
area ((up to four times)) at least twice a year at no cost to the
student. If the student successfully meets the state standards on a
retake of the assessment then the student shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement. Once objective alternative assessments are
authorized pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, a student may
use the objective alternative assessments to demonstrate that the
student successfully meets the state standards for that content area if
the student has taken the statewide student assessment at least once.
If the student successfully meets the state standards on the objective
alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement.
(4) Beginning with the graduating class of 2015, a student must
meet the state standards in science in addition to the other content
areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the statewide
student assessment, a retake, or the objective alternative assessments
in order to earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) School districts must make available to students the following
options:
(a) To retake the statewide student assessment ((up to four times))
at least twice a year in the content areas in which the student did not
meet the state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school;
or
(b) To retake the statewide student assessment ((up to four times))
at least twice a year in the content areas in which the student did not
meet the state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school
completion program at a community or technical college. The
superintendent of public instruction and the state board for community
and technical colleges shall jointly identify means by which students
in these programs can be assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year
shall be available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process for students' scores,
for students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic
standards. The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable
in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate
on the statewide student assessment and be objective in its
determination of student achievement of the state standards. Before
any objective alternative assessments in addition to those authorized
in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a student to
demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in a content
area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall formally
approve the use of any objective alternative assessments through the
omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution.
(b)(i) A student's score on the mathematics, reading or English, or
writing portion of the SAT or the ACT may be used as an objective
alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a
student has met or exceeded the state standards for the certificate of
academic achievement. The state board of education shall identify the
scores students must achieve on the relevant portion of the SAT or ACT
to meet or exceed the state standard in the relevant content area on
the statewide student assessment. A student's score on the science
portion of the ACT or the science subject area tests of the SAT may be
used as an objective alternative assessment under this section as soon
as the state board of education determines that sufficient data is
available to identify reliable equivalent scores for the science
content area of the statewide student assessment. After the first
scores are established, the state board may increase but not decrease
the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state standards.
(ii) A student who scores at least a three on the grading scale of
one to five for selected AP examinations may use the score as an
objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating
that a student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate
of academic achievement. A score of three on the AP examinations in
calculus or statistics may be used as an alternative assessment for the
mathematics portion of the statewide student assessment. A score of
three on the AP examinations in English language and composition may be
used as an alternative assessment for the writing portion of the
statewide student assessment; and for the English language arts portion
of the assessment developed with the multistate consortium, once
established in the 2014-15 school year. A score of three on the AP
examinations in English literature and composition, macroeconomics,
microeconomics, psychology, United States history, world history,
United States government and politics, or comparative government and
politics may be used as an alternative assessment for the reading
portion of the statewide student assessment; and for the English
language arts portion of the assessment developed with the multistate
consortium, once established in the 2014-15 school year. A score of
three on the AP examination in biology, physics, chemistry, or
environmental science may be used as an alternative assessment for the
science portion of the statewide student assessment.
(iii) A student who scores at least a four on selected externally
administered international baccalaureate (IB) examinations may use the
score as an objective alternative assessment under this section for
demonstrating that the student has met or exceeded state standards for
the certificate of academic achievement. A score of four on the higher
level IB examinations for any of the IB English language and literature
courses or for any of the IB individuals and societies courses may be
used as an alternative assessment for the reading, writing, or English
language arts portions of the statewide student assessment. A score of
four on the higher level IB examinations for any of the IB mathematics
courses may be used as an alternative assessment for the mathematics
portion of the statewide student assessment. A score of four on the
higher level IB examinations for IB biology, chemistry, or physics may
be used as an alternative assessment for the science portion of the
statewide student assessment.
(11) ((By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and
senate education committees shall obtain information and conclusions
from recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(12))) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for and notify students and their parents or legal guardians as
provided in this subsection. Student learning plans are required for
eighth grade students who were not successful on any or all of the
content areas of the state assessment during the previous school year
or who may not be on track to graduate due to credit deficiencies or
absences. The parent or legal guardian shall be notified about the
information in the student learning plan, preferably through a parent
conference and at least annually. To the extent feasible, schools
serving English language learner students and their parents shall
translate the plan into the primary language of the family. The plan
shall include the following information as applicable:
(a) The student's results on the state assessment;
(b) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the
score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;
(c) Any credit deficiencies;
(d) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;
(e) The student's progress toward meeting state and local
graduation requirements;
(f) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken
by the student to meet state academic standards and stay on track for
graduation;
(g) Remediation strategies and alternative education options
available to students, including informing students of the option to
continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve or until
the age of twenty-one;
(h) The alternative assessment options available to students under
this section and RCW 28A.655.065;
(i) School district programs, high school courses, and career and
technical education options available for students to meet graduation
requirements; and
(j) Available programs offered through skill centers or community
and technical colleges, including the college high school diploma
options under RCW 28B.50.535.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.066 and 2011 c 25 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall develop statewide end-of-course assessments for high school mathematics that measure student
achievement of the state mathematics standards. The superintendent
shall take steps to ensure that the language of the assessments is
responsive to a diverse student population. The assessments shall be
implemented statewide in the 2010-11 school year.
(b) The superintendent shall develop end-of-course assessments for
the first year of high school mathematics that include the standards
common to algebra I and integrated mathematics I and for the second
year of high school mathematics that include the standards common to
geometry and integrated mathematics II. The assessments under this
subsection (1)(b) shall be used to demonstrate that a student meets the
state standard on the mathematics content area of the high school
((Washington)) statewide student assessment ((of student learning)) for
purposes of RCW 28A.655.061.
(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall also develop
subtests for the end-of-course assessments that measure standards for
the first two years of high school mathematics that are unique to
algebra I, integrated mathematics I, geometry, and integrated
mathematics II. The results of the subtests shall be reported at the
student, teacher, school, and district level.
(2) ((For the graduating classes of 2013 and 2014 and for purposes
of the certificate of academic achievement under RCW 28A.655.061, a
student may use: (a) Results from the end-of-course assessment for the
first year of high school mathematics or the results from the end-of-course assessment for the second year of high school mathematics; or
(b) results from a high school mathematics retake assessment.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2015 and for purposes of
the certificate of academic achievement under RCW 28A.655.061, the
mathematics content area of the Washington assessment of student
learning shall be assessed using the end-of- course assessment for the
first year of high school mathematics plus the end-of-course assessment
for the second year of high school mathematics, or results from a high
school mathematics retake assessment for the end-of-course assessments
in which the student did not meet the standard.
(4))) All of the objective alternative assessments available to
students under RCW 28A.655.061 and 28A.655.065 shall be available to
any student who has taken ((the sequence of)) an end-of-course
assessment((s)) once but does not meet the state mathematics standard
on ((the sequence of)) an end-of-course assessment((s)).
(((5))) (3) The superintendent of public instruction shall report
at least annually or more often if necessary to keep the education
committees of the legislature informed on each step of the development
and implementation process under this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.655.068 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 22 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in the 2011-12 school year, the statewide high school
assessment in science shall be an end-of-course assessment for biology
that measures the state standards for life sciences, in addition to
systems, inquiry, and application as they pertain to life sciences.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction may develop or
adopt science end-of-course assessments ((in)) or a comprehensive
science assessment that includes subjects in addition to biology for
purposes of RCW 28A.655.061, when so directed by the legislature. The
legislature intends to transition from a biology end-of-course
assessment to a more comprehensive science assessment in a manner
consistent with the way in which the state transitioned to an English
language arts assessment and a comprehensive mathematics assessment.
The legislature further intends that the transition will include at
least two years of using the student assessment results from either the
biology end-of-course assessment or the more comprehensive assessment
in order to provide students with reasonable opportunities to
demonstrate high school competencies while being mindful of the
increasing rigor of the new assessment.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop or adopt
a science assessment in accordance with RCW 28A.655.070(10) that is not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(c) Before the next subsequent school year after the legislature
directs the superintendent to develop or adopt a new science
assessment, the superintendent of public instruction shall review the
objective alternative assessments for the science assessment and make
recommendations to the legislature regarding additional objective
alternatives, if any.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction may participate with
consortia of multiple states as common student learning standards and
assessments in science are developed. The superintendent of public
instruction, in consultation with the state board of education, may
modify the essential academic learning requirements and statewide
student assessments in science, including the high school assessment,
according to the multistate common student learning standards and
assessments as long as the education committees of the legislature have
opportunities for review before the modifications are adopted, as
provided under RCW 28A.655.070.
(4) The statewide high school assessment under this section shall
be used to demonstrate that a student meets the state standards in the
science content area of the statewide student assessment for purposes
of RCW 28A.655.061.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.655.070 and 2008 c 163 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
essential academic learning requirements that identify the knowledge
and skills all public school students need to know and be able to do
based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, develop student
assessments, and implement the accountability recommendations and
requests regarding assistance, rewards, and recognition of the state
board of education.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Periodically revise the essential academic learning
requirements, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW
28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. To the
maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four
and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the essential
academic learning requirements; and
(b) Review and prioritize the essential academic learning
requirements and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the
grade level content expectations to be assessed on the ((Washington))
statewide student assessment ((of student learning)) and used for state
or federal accountability purposes. The review, prioritization, and
identification shall result in more focus and targeting with an
emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade level content
expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level content
expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence of
expectations and performances that are logical, build with increasing
depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and
reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within seven
working days, shall post on its web site any grade level content
expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in constructing
the ((Washington)) statewide student assessment ((of student
learning)).
(3)(a) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall maintain and continue to
develop and revise a statewide academic assessment system in the
content areas of reading, writing, mathematics, and science for use in
the elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if
each student has mastered the essential academic learning requirements
identified in subsection (1) of this section. School districts shall
administer the assessments under guidelines adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction. The academic assessment system
may include a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.
(b) Effective with the 2009 administration of the Washington
assessment of student learning and continuing with the statewide
student assessment, the superintendent shall redesign the assessment in
the content areas of reading, mathematics, and science in all grades
except high school by shortening test administration and reducing the
number of short answer and extended response questions.
(c) By the 2014-15 school year, the superintendent of public
instruction, in consultation with the state board of education, shall
modify the statewide student assessment system to transition to
assessments developed with a multistate consortium, as provided in this
subsection:
(i) The assessments developed with a multistate consortium to
assess student proficiency in English language arts and mathematics
shall be administered beginning in the 2014-15 school year. The
reading and writing assessments shall not be administered by the
superintendent of public instruction or schools after the 2013-14
school year.
(ii) The high school assessments in English language arts and
mathematics in (c)(i) of this subsection shall be used for the purposes
of earning a certificate of academic achievement for high school
graduation under the timeline established in RCW 28A.655.061 and for
assessing student career and college readiness.
(iii) During the transition period specified in RCW 28A.655.061,
the superintendent of public instruction shall use test items and other
resources from the consortium assessment to develop and administer a
tenth grade high school English language arts assessment, an end-of-course mathematics assessment to assess the standards common to algebra
I and integrated mathematics I, and an end-of-course mathematics
assessment to assess the standards common to geometry and integrated
mathematics II.
(4) If the superintendent proposes any modification to the
essential academic learning requirements or the statewide assessments,
then the superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
to review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential
academic learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.
(5) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results
under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate
instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational
support for students who have not mastered the essential academic
learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development.
(6) By September 2007, the results for reading and mathematics
shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to
determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content
areas from one school year to the next.
(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide
educational support to individual students, the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance
information as possible within the constraints of the assessment
system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school
districts:
(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may
provide additional achievement information for individual students; and
(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to
evaluate the academic status of individual students. The tools shall
be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and
easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily
shared with parents and students.
(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall
integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.
(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall
be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly
related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(11) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of special education students when developing the
assessments under this section.
(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments
under this section.
(13) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's web site
lists of resources and model assessments in social studies, the arts,
and health and fitness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 By December 1, 2013, the superintendent of
public instruction shall report to the education committees of the
house of representatives and the senate on the process that was used by
the superintendent, the multistate consortium in which Washington is
participating, and by other states, to prevent bias in the state
assessments and assure fairness to students who take the assessments.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.305.130 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 6 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
The purpose of the state board of education is to provide advocacy
and strategic oversight of public education; implement a standards-based accountability framework that creates a unified system of
increasing levels of support for schools in order to improve student
academic achievement; provide leadership in the creation of a system
that personalizes education for each student and respects diverse
cultures, abilities, and learning styles; and promote achievement of
the goals of RCW 28A.150.210. In addition to any other powers and
duties as provided by law, the state board of education shall:
(1) Hold regularly scheduled meetings at such time and place within
the state as the board shall determine and may hold such special
meetings as may be deemed necessary for the transaction of public
business;
(2) Form committees as necessary to effectively and efficiently
conduct the work of the board;
(3) Seek advice from the public and interested parties regarding
the work of the board;
(4) For purposes of statewide accountability:
(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading,
writing, science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level, once
assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and
technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical
education programs; and student attendance, as the board deems
appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent
with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and
shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the
federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the
requirements of the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998,
each as amended. The goals may be established for all students,
economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient
students, students with disabilities, and students from
disproportionately academically underachieving racial and ethnic
backgrounds. The board may establish school and school district goals
addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction goals for
students in grades seven through twelve. The board shall adopt the
goals by rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the board
shall present the goal to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment
in a time frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory
action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by the
legislature;
(b)(i) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet
the standard on the statewide student assessment and, for high school
students, to obtain a certificate of academic achievement. The board
shall also determine student scores that identify levels of student
performance below and beyond the standard. The board shall consider
the incorporation of the standard error of measurement into the
decision regarding the award of the certificates. The board shall set
such performance standards and levels in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and after consideration of any
recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that
may be established for this purpose.
(ii) By the end of the 2014-15 school year, establish the scores
students must achieve to meet the standard and earn a certificate of
academic achievement on the tenth grade English language arts
assessment and the end-of-course mathematics assessments developed in
accordance with RCW 28A.655.070 to be used as the state transitions to
high school assessments developed with a multistate consortium.
(iii) By the end of the 2014-15 school year, establish the scores
students must achieve to meet the standard and earn a certificate of
academic achievement on the high school English language arts
assessment and the comprehensive mathematics assessment developed with
a multistate consortium in accordance with RCW 28A.655.070. To
determine the appropriate score, the state board shall review the
transition experience of Washington students to the consortium-developed assessments, examine the student scores used in other states
that are administering the consortium-developed assessments, and review
the scores in other states that require passage of an eleventh grade
assessment as a high school graduation requirement. The scores
established by the state board of education for the purposes of earning
a certificate of academic achievement and graduation from high school
may be different from the scores used for the purpose of determining a
student's career and college readiness.
(iv) The legislature shall be advised of the initial performance
standards for the high school statewide student assessment. Any
changes recommended by the board in the performance standards for the
high school assessment shall be presented to the education committees
of the house of representatives and the senate by November 30th of the
school year in which the changes will take place to permit the
legislature to take statutory action before the changes are implemented
if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature. The legislature
shall be advised of the initial performance standards and any changes
made to the elementary level performance standards and the middle
school level performance standards. The board must provide an
explanation of and rationale for all initial performance standards and
any changes, for all grade levels of the statewide student assessment.
If the board changes the performance standards for any grade level or
subject, the superintendent of public instruction must recalculate the
results from the previous ten years of administering that assessment
regarding students below, meeting, and beyond the state standard, to
the extent that this data is available, and post a comparison of the
original and recalculated results on the superintendent's web site;
(c) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure
fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially
with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique
populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of
public instruction of any improvements needed to the system; and
(d) Include in the biennial report required under RCW 28A.305.035,
information on the progress that has been made in achieving goals
adopted by the board;
(5) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and
procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all
private schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to
the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a
program for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve.
However, no private school may be approved that operates a kindergarten
program only and no private school shall be placed upon the list of
accredited schools so long as secret societies are knowingly allowed to
exist among its students by school officials;
(6) Articulate with the institutions of higher education, workforce
representatives, and early learning policymakers and providers to
coordinate and unify the work of the public school system;
(7) Hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to
reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
administrative purposes. Any other personnel of the board shall be
appointed as provided by RCW 28A.300.020. The board may delegate to
the executive director by resolution such duties as deemed necessary to
efficiently carry on the business of the board including, but not
limited to, the authority to employ necessary personnel and the
authority to enter into, amend, and terminate contracts on behalf of
the board. The executive director, administrative assistant, and all
but one of the other personnel of the board are exempt from civil
service, together with other staff as now or hereafter designated as
exempt in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW; and
(8) Adopt a seal that shall be kept in the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) At the beginning of each school year, school districts must
notify parents and guardians of enrolled students from eighth through
twelfth grade about each student assessment required by the state, the
minimum state-level graduation requirements, and any additional school
district graduation requirements. The information may be provided when
the student is enrolled, contained in the student or parent handbook,
or posted on the school district's web site. The notification must
include the following:
(a) When each assessment will be administered;
(b) Which assessments will be required for graduation and what
options students have to meet graduation requirements if they do not
pass a given assessment;
(c) Whether the results of the assessment will be used for program
placement or grade-level advancement;
(d) When the assessment results will be released to parents or
guardians and whether there will be an opportunity for parents and
teachers to discuss strategic adjustments; and
(e) Whether the assessment is required by the school district,
state, federal government, or more than one of these entities.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide information to the school districts to enable the districts to
provide the information to the parents and guardians in accordance with
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.655.185 and 2005 c 495 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature, through the creation of
the apple award, to honor and reward students in Washington's public
elementary schools who have shown significant improvement in their
school's results on the ((Washington)) statewide student assessment
((of student learning)).
(2) The apple award program is created to honor and reward public
elementary schools that have the greatest combined average increase in
the percentage of students meeting the fourth grade reading,
mathematics, and writing standards on the ((Washington)) statewide
student assessment ((of student learning)) each school year. Beginning
in the 2014-15 school year, the award shall be based on the percentage
of students meeting the fourth grade English language arts and
mathematics standards. The program shall be administered by the
((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction.
(3) Within the amounts appropriated for this purpose, each school
that receives an apple award shall be provided with a twenty-five
thousand dollar grant to be used for capital construction purposes that
have been selected by students in the school and approved by the
district's school directors. The funds may be used exclusively for
capital construction projects on school property or on other public
property in the community, city, or county in which the school is
located.

Sec. 10 RCW 28B.105.010 and 2007 c 214 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The GET ready for math and science scholarship program is
established. The purpose of the program is to provide scholarships to
students who achieve level four on the mathematics or science portions
of the ((tenth grade Washington)) high school statewide student
assessment ((of student learning)) or achieve a score in the math
section of the SAT or the math section of the ACT that is above the
ninety-fifth percentile, major in a mathematics, science, or related
field in college, and commit to working in mathematics, science, or a
related field for at least three years in Washington following
completion of their bachelor's degree. The program shall be
administered by the nonprofit organization selected as the private
partner in the public-private partnership.
(2) The total annual amount of each GET ready for math and science
scholarship may vary, but shall not exceed the annual cost of resident
undergraduate tuition fees and mandatory fees at the University of
Washington. An eligible recipient may receive a GET ready for math and
science scholarship for up to one hundred eighty quarter credits, or
the semester equivalent, or for up to five years, whichever comes
first.
(3) Scholarships shall be awarded only to the extent that state
funds and private matching funds are available for that purpose in the
GET ready for math and science (([scholarship])) scholarship account
established in RCW 28B.105.110.

Sec. 11 RCW 28B.105.030 and 2007 c 214 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An eligible student is a student who:
(a) Is eligible for resident tuition and fee rates as defined in
RCW 28B.15.012;
(b) Achieved level four on the mathematics or science portion of
the ((tenth grade Washington)) high school statewide student assessment
((of student learning)) or achieved a score in the math section of the
SAT or the math section of the ACT that is above the ninety-fifth
percentile;
(c) Has a family income at or below one hundred twenty-five percent
of the state median family income at the time the student applies for
a GET ready for math and science scholarship and for up to the two
previous years;
(d) Has declared an intention to complete a qualified program or
qualified major or has entered a qualified program or declared a
qualified major at an institution of higher education;
(e) Has declared an intention to work in a mathematics, science, or
related field in Washington for at least three years immediately
following completion of a bachelor's degree or higher degree.
(2) An eligible recipient is an eligible student who:
(a) Has been awarded a scholarship in accordance with the selection
criteria and process established by the ((board)) student achievement
council and the program administrator;
(b) Enrolls at an institution of higher education within one year
of graduating from high school;
(c) Maintains satisfactory academic progress, as defined by the
institution of higher education where the student is enrolled;
(d) Takes at least one college-level mathematics or science course
each term since enrolling in an institution of higher education; and
(e) Enters a qualified program or qualified major no later than the
end of the first term in which the student has junior level standing.

Sec. 12 RCW 28B.105.060 and 2007 c 214 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:
(1) Notify elementary, middle, junior high, high school, and school
district staff and administrators, and the children's administration of
the department of social and health services about the GET ready for
math and science scholarship program using methods in place for
communicating with schools and school districts; and
(2) Provide data showing the race, ethnicity, income, and other
available demographic information of students who achieve level four
((of)) on the math and science ((Washington)) high school statewide
student assessment ((of student learning in the tenth grade.)); compare
those data with comparable information on the ((tenth grade)) student
population as a whole((.)); and submit a report with the analysis to
the committees responsible for education and higher education in the
legislature on December 1st of even-numbered years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 RCW 28A.655.066 (Statewide end-of-course
assessments for high school mathematics -- Use for Washington assessment
of student learning), as now existing or hereafter amended, and 2013
2nd sp. s. c . . . s 3 (section 3 of this act), 2011 c 25 s 2, 2009 c
310 s 3, & 2008 c 163 s 3 are each repealed, effective September 1,
2019.

--- END ---