BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that significant
state investments have been and will be made to support a continuum of
learning from prekindergarten through third grade, including through
early learning programs, statewide implementation of full-day
kindergarten, and reduced class sizes in grades kindergarten through
three. These investments reflect the importance of providing young
children with the best possible opportunities to develop foundational
knowledge and skills, particularly in the critical area of English
language arts. The investments also reflect the legislature's
recognition that early intervention represents the best hope of
eliminating the educational opportunity gap among groups of students.
(2) The legislature also finds that such investments and the
state's commitment to prekindergarten through third grade learning
warrant an accountability mechanism to ensure positive student
outcomes. School districts should be required to notify parents or
guardians about the availability of educational options to provide
intensive instructional supports and services if student performance in
English language arts continues to fall below grade level after
completion of third grade. Furthermore, statewide implementation of
aligned curriculum, instruction, and assessments associated with the
common core state standards, along with expanded use of the state
kindergarten readiness assessment for early identification of students
needing assistance, provide a timely opportunity to initiate this
accountability mechanism.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section and sections 3 through 6 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(a) "Basic" means a score on the statewide student assessment at a
level two in a four-level scoring system.
(b) "Below basic" means a score on the statewide student assessment
at a level one in a four-level scoring system.
(c) "Not meet the state standard" means a score on the statewide
student assessment at either a level one or a level two in a four-level
scoring system.
(d) "Section 504 plan" means a plan for providing accommodations to
enable students with disabilities to access educational services as
required under section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of 1973,
as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794).
(2) When the policy in this subsection takes effect as provided in
section 7 of this act, a student who receives a score of below basic on
the third grade statewide student assessment in English language arts
may not be promoted to fourth grade unless the student meets one of the
good cause exemptions under section 3 of this act, or unless the
student's parent or guardian does not concur with the retention of the
student in third grade.
(3) Beginning in the 2013-14 school year, a school district must
provide intensive instructional supports and services as required under
section 4 of this act for any student who did not meet the state
standard on the third grade statewide student assessment in English
language arts in the previous school year.
(4) If a student does not have a score in English language arts on
the third grade statewide student assessment, the policies regarding
promotion and instructional support under this section and section 4 of
this act are required if the district determines, using district or
classroom-based diagnostic assessments or another standardized
assessment, that the student's performance is equivalent to basic or
below basic in English language arts.
(5) A school district must provide written notification to the
parent or guardian of a student who does not meet the state standard on
the third grade statewide student assessment in English language arts.
The notification must provide information about the promotion policies
under this section and the options for intensive instructional supports
and services described under section 4 of this act. The district must
consult with the student's parent or guardian about the forms of
instructional supports and services the parent or guardian prefers and
the forms recommended by the student's teachers and principal. If the
student is subject to the promotion policies under this section, the
district must seek the concurrence of the parent or guardian to retain
the student in third grade and have complied with each of the
provisions in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A school district may exempt the following students from the
performance standard for promotion to fourth grade required under
section 2 of this act:
(a) Students who participate in the statewide student assessment
system through an alternate assessment designed for students with
significant cognitive disabilities;
(b) Students with disabilities whose individualized education
program includes specially designed instruction in English language
arts, and whose individualized education program team determines that
retention in third grade is not an appropriate educational placement;
(c) Students who are English language learners who have been
enrolled in the transitional bilingual instructional program under
chapter 28A.180 RCW for two or fewer years; and
(d) Students who have previously been retained in the same grade
and who have received supplemental instruction and remediation for at
least two years.
(2) School districts must exempt a student from the performance
standard for promotion to fourth grade required under section 2 of this
act if the student's parent or guardian does not concur with the
retention of the student in third grade.
(3) School districts must adopt a policy for the mid-year promotion
to fourth grade of a student who is retained in third grade under
section 2 of this act if the district determines the student is
demonstrating sufficient progress to be likely to achieve at least a
score of basic on the fourth grade statewide student assessment in
English language arts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in the 2013-14 school year, a school district must,
at a minimum, provide one or more of the following educational options
for any student who did not meet the state standard on the third grade
statewide assessment in English language arts in the previous school
year:
(a) The opportunity to assign the student to a different classroom
or school within the district;
(b) An evaluation of the student to determine if an individualized
education program or a section 504 plan should be developed or revised,
and then implementation of that program or plan;
(c) Provision of intensive, research-based supplemental instruction
in English language arts, which may include supplemental tutoring,
small group instruction, reduced teacher-to-student ratios, extended
learning opportunities through an extended school day or school year,
or other research-based strategies intended to assist the student in
reaching the state standard in English language arts;
(d) Use of diagnostic assessments to identify specific skills where
the student needs assistance and other formative assessments to monitor
student progress during the school year; or
(e) Retention of the student in third grade as provided under
section 2 of this act.
(2) To implement the instructional supports and services required
under this section and section 5 of this act, school districts may use
state funds provided for basic education through general apportionment
or the learning assistance program, state and federal funds for the
transitional bilingual instructional program for students eligible for
and enrolled in the program, state and federal funds for special
education for students with disabilities, federal funds from Title I of
the elementary and secondary education act, or any other state,
federal, local, or private funds available generally or specifically to
support student learning in English language arts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
Before seeking the concurrence of a parent or guardian to retain a
student in third grade as provided under section 2 of this act, a
school district must have complied with the following provisions:
(1)(a) The school district must assess whether a student:
(i) Has a disability, even if the disability is not at a level of
severity that requires development of a section 504 plan or an
individualized education program;
(ii) Has a form of dyslexia or other learning disability; or
(iii) Is an English language learner whose language proficiency is
impeding the student's reading, even if the student does not qualify
for the transitional bilingual instruction program.
(b) The results of the assessments under this subsection (1) must
be communicated in writing and in person with the parent or guardian of
the student. The district must also make recommendations regarding
appropriate intensive instructional supports and services that could be
provided for the student.
(2) The school district must provide appropriate intensive
instructional supports and services for the student that are specific
to that student's learning needs for at least five months.
(3) The school district must inform the parent or guardian in
writing and in person that research indicates that retention may
increase the likelihood of a student dropping out of school, may result
in permanent emotional harm to the student, and often does not improve
student performance. The school district must also inform the parent
or guardian that the student is eligible to receive the other intensive
instructional supports and services outlined in section 4 of this act
as an alternative to retention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The requirement under section 2(2) of this act that school
districts may not promote certain students to fourth grade based on
their performance on the third grade statewide student assessment in
English language arts, subject to the other provisions of sections 2
through 5 of this act, takes effect in the school year when the first
cohort of third grade students has had an opportunity to enroll in
statewide, state-funded all-day kindergarten as provided under RCW
28A.150.315 and to enroll in kindergarten through third grade classes
where the state allocations for class size have been as provided under
RCW 28A.150.260(4)(b).
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
provide notice of the effective date of the requirement under section
2(2) of this act to school districts, the chief clerk of the house of
representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code
reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The office of the superintendent of
public instruction must identify a range of research-based, intensive
instructional supports and services designed to enable a student who is
not reading at grade level by the end of second grade to reach grade-level reading proficiency by the end of third grade, including meeting
the state standard on the statewide student assessment in English
language arts. The instructional supports and services must address
such contributing factors as dyslexia, language impediments,
environmental and social emotional factors, and any form of learning
disability regardless of whether the disability is at a level of
severity that requires development of a section 504 plan or an
individualized education program.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
submit a report to the education committees of the legislature by
December 31, 2013, outlining the range of research-based, intensive
instructional supports and services identified under this section,
along with an estimate of the number of students in grades kindergarten
through third grade who would benefit from these services and the
estimated cost to provide them.

--- END ---