BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington state freedom of travel act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A public servant acting under color of
his or her office or employment commits an offense of official
oppression if he or she:
(a) Intentionally subjects another person to mistreatment or to
arrest, detention, search, seizure, dispossession, assessment, or lien
that he or she knows is unlawful;
(b) Intentionally denies or impedes another person in the exercise
or enjoyment of any right, privilege, power, or immunity that he or she
knows is unlawful;
(c) Intentionally subjects another person to harassment, as defined
in RCW 9A.46.020, or sexual harassment; or
(d) As part of a determination of whether to grant another person
access to a public accessible venue or form of transportation,
intentionally and without probable cause:
(i) Touches the breast, buttock, anus, or sexual organ of the other
person, including touching through clothing;
(ii) Removes a child younger than eighteen years of age from the
physical custody or control of a parent or guardian of the child, or of
a person who has been given authority or permission by a parent or
guardian of the child to have physical custody or control of the child;
(iii) Intentionally causes physical contact with another when he or
she knows or should reasonably believe that the other will regard the
contact as offensive or provocative; or
(iv) Harasses, delays, coerces, threatens, intimidates, or
effectively denies or conditions access to the other person because of
the other person's refusal to consent to (a), (b), or (c) of this
subsection.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Public servant" includes:
(i) An officer, official, employee, or agent of:
(A) The United States or a branch, department, or agency of the
United States; or
(B) A person acting under contract with a branch, department, or
agency of the United States to manage, supervise, administer, or
otherwise provide or participate in the provision of a safety,
security, or law enforcement service activity; and
(ii) Any other person acting under color of federal law.
(b) "Sexual harassment" means unwelcome sexual advances, requests
for sexual favors, or other verbal or physical conduct of a sexual
nature, submission to which is made a term or condition of a person's
exercise or enjoyment of any right, privilege, power, or immunity,
either explicitly or implicitly.
(3) A person who commits the offense of official oppression by a
public servant is guilty of a class C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) This section applies only to a
prosecution of an offense under section 2(1)(d)(iv) of this act in
which the defendant was, at the time of the alleged offense, a public
servant as defined in section 2(2)(a) of this act.
(2) If the United States, the defendant, or the defendant's
employer challenges the validity of section 2(1)(d)(iv) of this act on
grounds of unconstitutionality, preemption, or sovereign immunity, the
attorney general of this state, with the consent of the appropriate
prosecuting attorney, shall take any actions necessary on behalf of the
state to defend the validity. The attorney general may make any legal
arguments the attorney general considers in good faith and after due
diligence, to be appropriate to defend the validity of this act,
including that this act constitutes a valid exercise of:
(a) The state's police powers;
(b) The liberty interests of the people secured by the United
States Constitution;
(c) The rights and powers reserved to the states by the ninth and
tenth amendments to the United States Constitution; or
(d) The liberty interests of the people secured by the Washington
state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act shall be construed, as a matter of
state law, to be enforceable up to but no further than the maximum
possible extent consistent with federal constitutional requirements,
even if that construction is not readily apparent, as such
constructions are authorized only to the extent necessary to save the
statute from judicial invalidation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 and 3 of this act are each added
to chapter 42.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---