BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 10.77.145 (Authorization to leave facility where person is
confined prohibited -- Exceptions -- Approval by secretary -- Notification to
county or city law enforcement agency) and 2010 c 262 s 1; and
(2) 2010 c 262 s 2.

--- END ---