BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.20.010 and 2012 c 2 s 109 (Initiative Measure No.
1183) are each amended to read as follows:
Upon application in the prescribed form being made to any employee
authorized by the board to issue permits, accompanied by payment of the
prescribed fee, and upon the employee being satisfied that the
applicant should be granted a permit under this title, the employee
must issue to the applicant under such regulations and at such fee as
may be prescribed by the board a permit of the class applied for, as
follows:
(1) Where the application is for a special permit by a physician or
dentist, or by any person in charge of an institution regularly
conducted as a hospital or sanitorium for the care of persons in ill
health, or as a home devoted exclusively to the care of aged people, a
special liquor purchase permit, except that the governor may waive the
requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection
pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);
(2) Where the application is for a special permit by a person
engaged within the state in mechanical or manufacturing business or in
scientific pursuits requiring alcohol for use therein, or by any
private individual, a special permit to purchase alcohol for the
purpose named in the permit, except that the governor may waive the
requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection
pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);
(3) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor
at a banquet, at a specified date and place, a special permit to
purchase liquor for consumption at such banquet, to such applicants as
may be fixed by the board;
(4) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor
on the premises of a business not licensed under this title, a special
permit to purchase liquor for consumption thereon for such periods of
time and to such applicants as may be fixed by the board;
(5) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer
to import or purchase within the state alcohol, malt, and other
materials containing alcohol to be used in the manufacture of liquor,
or other products, a special permit;
(6) Where the application is for a special permit by a person
operating a drug store to purchase liquor at retail prices only, to be
thereafter sold by such person on the prescription of a physician, a
special liquor purchase permit, except that the governor may waive the
requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection
pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);
(7) Where the application is for a special permit by an authorized
representative of a military installation operated by or for any of the
armed forces within the geographical boundaries of the state of
Washington, a special permit to purchase liquor for use on such
military installation;
(8) Where the application is for a special permit by a vendor that
manufactures or sells a product which cannot be effectively presented
to potential buyers without serving it with liquor or by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at a convention of
a trade association composed of licensees of the board, when the said
liquor is served in a hospitality room or from a booth in a board-approved suppliers' display room at the convention, and when the liquor
so served is for consumption in the said hospitality room or display
room during the convention, anything in this title to the contrary
notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a
spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the
taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
(9) Where the application is for a special permit by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
donate liquor for a reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner for
delegates and guests at a convention of a trade association composed of
licensees of the board, when the liquor so donated is for consumption
at the said reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner during the
convention, anything in this title to the contrary notwithstanding.
Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a spirits retailer or
distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the taxes imposed by RCW
66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
(10) Where the application is for a special permit by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
donate and/or serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at an
international trade fair, show, or exposition held under the auspices
of a federal, state, or local governmental entity or organized and
promoted by a nonprofit organization, anything in this title to the
contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased
from a liquor spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is
subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
(11) Where the application is for an annual special permit by a
person operating a bed and breakfast lodging facility to donate or
serve wine or beer without charge to overnight guests of the facility
if the wine or beer is for consumption on the premises of the facility.
"Bed and breakfast lodging facility," as used in this subsection, means
a facility offering from one to eight lodging units and breakfast to
travelers and guests;
(12) Where the application is for a special permit to allow
students who are enrolled in a viticulture or enology degree program
and who are under twenty-one years of age to taste wine for educational
purposes. Such permits must be issued in accordance with section 2 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The board, in consultation with the Washington viticulture and
enology education consortium, must develop rules for the issuance and
monitoring of permits authorized under RCW 66.20.010(12) by January 1,
2014. The rules must include the following provisions:
(1) The application must be from an accredited college, university,
community college, area vocational technical institute, or private
vocational school;
(2) The persons under twenty-one years of age, who are permitted to
taste under this permit, must be enrolled as a student in a required or
elective class that is part of a viticulture or enology degree program;
(3) Students under twenty-one years of age may taste but not ingest
the wine for the purpose of educational training as part of the class
curriculum during regularly scheduled course meeting times;
(4) The service and tasting of wine must be directly supervised by
a faculty or staff member who is twenty-one years of age or older and
is employed by the accredited college, university, community college,
area vocational technical institute, or private vocational school
offering the viticulture or enology degree program;
(5) The students who taste wine served under this permit may not
purchase the wine; and
(6) The tastings must be conducted in accordance with RCW
66.28.160.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.44.270 and 1998 c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to sell, give, or otherwise
supply liquor to any person under the age of twenty-one years or permit
any person under that age to consume liquor on his or her premises or
on any premises under his or her control. For the purposes of this
subsection, "premises" includes real property, houses, buildings, and
other structures, and motor vehicles and watercraft. A violation of
this subsection is a gross misdemeanor punishable as provided for in
chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2)(a) It is unlawful for any person under the age of twenty-one
years to possess, consume, or otherwise acquire any liquor. A
violation of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor punishable as
provided for in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(b) It is unlawful for a person under the age of twenty-one years
to be in a public place, or to be in a motor vehicle in a public place,
while exhibiting the effects of having consumed liquor. For purposes
of this subsection, exhibiting the effects of having consumed liquor
means that a person has the odor of liquor on his or her breath and
either: (i) Is in possession of or close proximity to a container that
has or recently had liquor in it; or (ii) by speech, manner,
appearance, behavior, lack of coordination, or otherwise, exhibits that
he or she is under the influence of liquor. This subsection (2)(b)
does not apply if the person is in the presence of a parent or guardian
or has consumed or is consuming liquor under circumstances described in
subsection (4) or (5) of this section.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2)(a) of this section do not apply to
liquor given or permitted to be given to a person under the age of
twenty-one years by a parent or guardian and consumed in the presence
of the parent or guardian. This subsection ((shall)) does not
authorize consumption or possession of liquor by a person under the age
of twenty-one years on any premises licensed under chapter 66.24 RCW.
(4) This section does not apply to liquor given for medicinal
purposes to a person under the age of twenty-one years by a parent,
guardian, physician, or dentist.
(5) This section does not apply to liquor given to a person under
the age of twenty-one years when such liquor is being used in
connection with religious services and the amount consumed is the
minimal amount necessary for the religious service.
(6) This section does not apply to wine provided to students under
twenty-one years of age in accordance with a special permit issued
under RCW 66.20.010(12).
(7) Conviction or forfeiture of bail for a violation of this
section by a person under the age of twenty-one years at the time of
such conviction or forfeiture ((shall not be a disqualification of))
does not disqualify that person to acquire a license to sell or
dispense any liquor after that person has attained the age of twenty-one years.

--- END ---