BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employee may be placed on administrative reassignment if the
employee's manager determines that administrative reassignment is
necessary to ensure a full, thorough, and impartial investigation of a
workplace complaint.
(2) The manager must notify the agency governing officer or
officers and the agency human resources director in writing of the
administrative reassignment and the reasons for the reassignment. If
the governing officer is responsible to the governor, the manager must
also notify the state human resources director.
(3) An administrative reassignment may last up to fifteen calendar
days. The fifteen-day reassignment may be extended in thirty-day
increments upon a determination that additional time is needed to
complete the investigation of the workplace complaint. If the
governing officer of the agency is responsible to the governor, the
governor must approve the extension. If the governing officer of the
agency is responsible to a statewide elected official, that official
must approve the extension. In all other cases, the governing officer
or officers of the agency must approve the extension.
(4) Before extending the administrative reassignment, the officer
responsible for approving the extension must receive an update on the
investigation, the reason additional time is needed to complete the
investigation, and an estimated time of completion. The governing
officer or designee must notify the agency human resources director of
any extensions. If the governing officer is responsible to the
governor, the governing officer or designee must also notify the state
human resources director of any extension.
(5) When the administrative reassignment ends, the agency governing
officer or designee must document the results of the investigation,
whether the employee returned to work, and the date of any disciplinary
action administered pursuant to the investigation.
(6) Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Agency" means an office, department, board, commission, or
other separate unit or division, however designated, of the state
government and all personnel thereof; it includes any unit of state
government established by law, the executive officer or members of
which are either elected or appointed, upon which the statutes confer
powers and impose duties in connection with operations of either a
governmental or proprietary nature.
(b) "Administrative reassignment" means assigning an employee to
work at home pending an investigation of a workplace disruption. An
employee on administrative reassignment will continue to earn the usual
pay and accrue benefits throughout the duration of the administrative
reassignment.
(c) "Employee" includes all employees of the state, whether or not
covered by civil service; elected and appointed officials of the
executive branch of government, including full-time members of boards,
commissions, or committees; justices of the supreme court and judges of
the court of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state
legislature.
(d) "Governing officer" means the person, or combination of persons
such as a commission, board, or council, by law empowered to operate
the agency who is responsible either to (i) no other public officer or
(ii) the governor.
(e) "Manager" means a state employee who is responsible for
administering one or more policies or programs of an agency or agency
subdivision and has the authority to make personnel administration
decisions, including the ability to appoint or employ an employee.
(f) "Workplace disruption" means any disturbance, complaint,
disagreement, or other personnel matter involving one or more employees
that, at the discretion of the employee's manager, warrants the
reassignment of the employee from the workplace to the employee's home
pending an investigation of the disruption.

--- END ---