BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall include information regarding employees'
rights related to union membership and dues in any workplace poster
required to be posted by this chapter or the rules adopted under this
chapter.
(2) The public employment relations commission shall develop
language to educate and advise employees regarding their rights related
to union membership and dues. The language must include, at a minimum,
information related to nonassociation rights and agency fees. No later
than ninety days after the effective date of this section and annually
thereafter, the public employment relations commission shall transmit
the language developed under this subsection to the department for
inclusion in the workplace poster.
(3) This section does not require the department to reprint a
required workplace poster in advance of the established printing
schedule.

--- END ---