BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.10.210 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6014 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Alternative public works contracting procedure" means the
design-build, general contractor/construction manager, and job order
contracting procedures authorized in RCW 39.10.300, 39.10.340, and
39.10.420, respectively.
(2) "Board" means the capital projects advisory review board.
(3) "Certified public body" means a public body certified to use
design-build or general contractor/construction manager contracting
procedures, or both, under RCW 39.10.270.
(4) "Committee," unless otherwise noted, means the project review
committee.
(5) "Design-build procedure" means a contract between a public body
and another party in which the party agrees to both design and build
the facility, portion of the facility, or other item specified in the
contract.
(6) "Disadvantaged business enterprise" means any business entity
certified with the office of minority and women's business enterprises
under chapter 39.19 RCW.
(7) "General contractor/construction manager" means a firm with
which a public body has selected ((and negotiated a maximum allowable
construction cost)) to provide services during the design phase and
negotiated a maximum allowable construction cost to act as construction
manager and general contractor during the construction phase.
(((7))) (8) "Job order contract" means a contract in which the
contractor agrees to a fixed period, indefinite quantity delivery order
contract which provides for the use of negotiated, definitive work
orders for public works as defined in RCW 39.04.010.
(((8))) (9) "Job order contractor" means a registered or licensed
contractor awarded a job order contract.
(((9))) (10) "Maximum allowable construction cost" means the
maximum cost of the work to construct the project including a
percentage for risk contingency, negotiated support services, and
approved change orders.
(((10))) (11) "Negotiated support services" means items a general
contractor would normally manage or perform on a construction project
including, but not limited to surveying, hoisting, safety enforcement,
provision of toilet facilities, temporary heat, cleanup, and trash
removal, and that are negotiated as part of the maximum allowable
construction cost.
(((11))) (12) "Percent fee" means the percentage amount to be
earned by the general contractor/construction manager as overhead and
profit.
(((12))) (13) "Public body" means any general or special purpose
government in the state of Washington, including but not limited to
state agencies, institutions of higher education, counties, cities,
towns, ports, school districts, and special purpose districts((,
provided that for the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the definition of
public body for this chapter does not include public bodies funded in
section 1012, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. if alternative
requirements or procedures of federal law or regulations are
authorized)).
(((13))) (14) "Public works project" means any work for a public
body within the definition of "public work" in RCW 39.04.010.
(((14))) (15) "Small business entity" means a small business as
defined in RCW 39.26.010.
(16) "Total contract cost" means the fixed amount for the detailed
specified general conditions work, the negotiated maximum allowable
construction cost, and the percent fee on the negotiated maximum
allowable construction cost.
(((15))) (17) "Total project cost" means the cost of the project
less financing and land acquisition costs.
(((16))) (18) "Unit price book" means a book containing specific
prices, based on generally accepted industry standards and information,
where available, for various items of work to be performed by the job
order contractor. The prices may include: All the costs of materials;
labor; equipment; overhead, including bonding costs; and profit for
performing the items of work. The unit prices for labor must be at the
rates in effect at the time the individual work order is issued.
(((17))) (19) "Work order" means an order issued for a definite
scope of work to be performed pursuant to a job order contract.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.10.220 and 2007 c 494 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board is created in the department of ((general
administration)) enterprise services to provide an evaluation of public
capital projects construction processes, including the impact of
contracting methods on project outcomes, and to advise the legislature
on policies related to public works delivery methods.
(2) Members of the board are appointed as follows:
(a) ((The board shall consist of the following members appointed by
the governor:)) Two representatives from construction general
contracting; one representative from the architectural profession; one
representative from the engineering profession; two representatives
from construction specialty subcontracting; two representatives from
construction trades labor organizations; one representative from the
office of minority and women's business enterprises; one representative
from a higher education institution; one representative from the
department of ((general administration)) enterprise services; one
individual representing Washington cities; two representatives from
private industry; and one representative of a domestic insurer
authorized to write surety bonds for contractors in Washington state,
each appointed by the governor. All appointed members must be
knowledgeable about public works contracting procedures. If a vacancy
occurs, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term;
(b) ((Three members shall be positions representing different local
public owners, selected by the association of Washington cities,)) One
member representing counties, selected by the Washington state
association of counties((, and the Washington public ports association,
respectively.));
(c) ((One member shall be a representative from the public hospital
districts, selected by the association of Washington public hospital
districts.
(d))) One member representing public ports, selected by the
Washington public ports association;
(d) One member representing public hospital districts, selected by
the association of Washington public hospital districts;
(e) One member ((shall be a representative from)) representing
school districts, selected by the Washington state school directors'
association((.)); and
(((e) The board shall include)) (f) Two members of the house of
representatives, one from each major caucus, appointed by the speaker
of the house of representatives, and two members of the senate, one
from each major caucus, appointed by the president of the senate.
Legislative members are nonvoting.
(3) Members selected under subsection (2)(a) of this section shall
serve for terms of four years, with the terms expiring on June 30th on
the fourth year of the term.
(4) The board chair is selected from among the appointed members by
the majority vote of the voting members.
(5) Legislative members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members of
the board, project review committee members, and ((subcommittee))
committee chairs shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) ((If a vacancy occurs of the appointive members of the board,
the governor shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term.)) Vacancies
are filled in the same manner as appointed. Members of the board may
be removed for malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific
written charges by the governor, under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(7) The board shall meet as often as necessary.
(8) Board members are expected to consistently attend board
meetings. The chair of the board may ask the governor to remove any
member who misses more than two meetings in any calendar year without
cause.
(9) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services shall provide staff support as may be required for the proper
discharge of the function of the board.
(10) The board may establish ((subcommittees)) committees as it
desires and may invite nonmembers of the board to serve as committee
members.
(11) The board shall encourage participation from persons and
entities not represented on the board.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.10.230 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
The board has the following powers and duties:
(1) Develop and recommend to the legislature policies to further
enhance the quality, efficiency, and accountability of capital
construction projects through the use of traditional and alternative
delivery methods in Washington, and make recommendations regarding
expansion, continuation, elimination, or modification of the
alternative public works contracting methods;
(2) Evaluate the use of existing contracting procedures and the
potential future use of other alternative contracting procedures
including competitive negotiation contracts;
(3) Submit recommendations to the appropriate committees of the
legislature evaluating alternative contracting procedures that are not
authorized under this chapter;
(4) Appoint members of ((the)) committees; and
(5) Develop and administer questionnaires designed to provide
quantitative and qualitative data on alternative public works
contracting procedures on which evaluations are based.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.10.240 and 2007 c 494 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall establish a project review committee to review
and approve public works projects using the design-build and general
contractor/construction manager contracting procedures authorized in
RCW 39.10.300 and 39.10.340 and to certify public bodies as provided in
RCW 39.10.270.
(2) The board shall, by a majority vote of the board, appoint
persons to the committee who are knowledgeable in the use of the
design-build and general contractor/construction manager contracting
procedures. Appointments must represent a balance among the industries
and public owners on the board listed in RCW 39.10.220.
(a) ((When making initial appointments to the committee, the board
shall consider for appointment former members of the school district
project review board and the public hospital district project review
board.
(b))) Each member of the committee shall be appointed for a term of
three years. However, for initial appointments, the board shall
stagger the appointment of committee members so that the first members
are appointed to serve terms of one, two, or three years from the date
of appointment. Appointees may be reappointed to serve more than one
term.
(((c))) (b) The committee shall, by a majority vote, elect a chair
and vice chair for the committee.
(((d))) (c) The committee chair may select a person or persons on
a temporary basis as a nonvoting member if project specific expertise
is needed to assist in a review.
(3) The chair of the committee, in consultation with the vice
chair, may appoint one or more panels of at least six committee members
to carry out the duties of the committee. Each panel shall have
balanced representation of the private and public sector
representatives serving on the committee.
(4) Any member of the committee directly or indirectly affiliated
with a submittal before the committee must recuse himself or herself
from the committee consideration of that submittal.
(5) Any person who sits on the committee or panel is not precluded
from subsequently bidding on or participating in projects that have
been reviewed by the committee.
(6) The committee shall meet as often as necessary to ensure that
certification and approvals are completed in a timely manner.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.10.250 and 2009 c 75 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The committee shall:
(1) Certify, or ((recertify)) renew certification for, public
bodies ((for a period of three years)) to use ((the)) design-build or
general contractor/construction manager contracting procedures, or
both((, contracting procedures for projects with a total project cost
of ten million dollars or more));
(2) Review and approve the use of the design-build or general
contractor/construction manager contracting procedures on a project by
project basis for public bodies that are not certified under RCW
39.10.270;
(3) ((Review and approve the use of the general
contractor/construction manager contracting procedure by certified
public bodies for projects with a total project cost under ten million
dollars;
(4))) Review and approve not more than ((ten)) fifteen projects
using the design-build contracting procedure by ((certified and))
noncertified public bodies for projects that have a total project cost
between two million and ten million dollars. Projects must meet the
criteria in RCW 39.10.300(1). Where possible, the committee shall
approve projects among multiple public bodies. ((In June 2010)) At
least annually, the committee shall report to the board regarding the
committee's review procedure of these projects and its recommendations
for further use; and
(((5))) (4) Review and approve not more than two design-build
demonstration projects that include procurement of operations and
maintenance services for a period longer than three years.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.10.260 and 2007 c 494 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The committee shall hold regular public meetings to carry out
its duties as described in RCW 39.10.250. Committee meetings are
subject to chapter 42.30 RCW.
(2) The committee shall publish notice of its public meetings at
least twenty days before the meeting in a legal newspaper circulated in
the area where the public body seeking certification is located, or
where each of the proposed projects under consideration will be
constructed. All meeting notices must be posted on the committee's web
site.
(3) The meeting notice must identify the public body that is
seeking certification or project approval, and where applicable, a
description of projects to be considered at the meeting. The notice
must indicate when, where, and how the public may present comments
regarding the committee's certification of a public body or approval of
a project. Information submitted by a public body to be reviewed at
the meeting shall be available on the committee's web site at the time
the notice is published.
(4) The committee must allow for public comment on the
appropriateness of certification of a public body or on the
appropriateness of the use of the proposed contracting procedure and
the qualifications of a public body to use the contracting procedure.
The committee shall receive and record both written and oral comments
at the public ((hearing)) meeting.

Sec. 7 RCW 39.10.270 and 2009 c 75 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public body may apply for certification to use the design-build or general contractor/construction manager contracting procedure,
or both. Once certified, a public body may use the contracting
procedure for which it is certified on individual projects ((with a
total project cost over ten million dollars)) without seeking committee
approval((. The certification period is)) for a period of three years.
Public bodies certified to use the design-build procedure are limited
to no more than five projects with a total project cost between two and
ten million dollars during the certification period. A public body
seeking certification must submit to the committee an application in a
format and manner as prescribed by the committee. The application must
include a description of the public body's qualifications, its capital
plan during the certification period, and its intended use of
alternative contracting procedures.
(2) A public body seeking certification for the design-build
procedure must demonstrate successful management of at least one
design-build project within the previous five years. A public body
seeking certification for the general contractor/construction manager
procedure must demonstrate successful management of at least one
general contractor/construction manager project within the previous
five years.
(3) To certify a public body, the committee shall determine that
the public body:
(a) Has the necessary experience and qualifications to determine
which projects are appropriate for using alternative contracting
procedures;
(b) Has the necessary experience and qualifications to carry out
the alternative contracting procedure including, but not limited to:
(i) Project delivery knowledge and experience; (ii) personnel with
appropriate construction experience; (iii) a management plan and
rationale for its alternative public works projects; (iv) demonstrated
success in managing public works projects; (v) the ability to properly
manage its capital facilities plan including, but not limited to,
appropriate project planning and budgeting experience; and (vi) the
ability to meet requirements of this chapter; and
(c) Has resolved any audit findings on previous public works
projects in a manner satisfactory to the committee.
(4) The committee shall, if practicable, make its determination at
the public meeting during which an application for certification is
reviewed. Public comments must be considered before a determination is
made. Within ten business days of the public meeting, the committee
shall provide a written determination to the public body, and make its
determination available to the public on the committee's web site.
(5) The committee may revoke any public body's certification upon
a finding, after a public hearing, that its use of design-build or
general contractor/construction manager contracting procedures no
longer serves the public interest.
(6) The committee may renew the certification of a public body for
((one)) additional three-year periods. The public body must submit an
application for recertification at least three months before the
initial certification expires. The application shall include updated
information on the public body's ((capital plan for the next three
years, its intended use of the procedures)) experience and current
staffing with the procedure it is applying to renew, and any other
information requested in advance by the committee. The committee must
review the application for recertification at a meeting held before
expiration of the applicant's initial certification period. A public
body must reapply for certification under the process described in
subsection (1) of this section once the period of recertification
expires.
(7) Certified public bodies must submit project data information as
required in RCW 39.10.320 and 39.10.350.

Sec. 8 RCW 39.10.280 and 2007 c 494 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A public body not certified under RCW 39.10.270 must apply for
approval from the committee to use the design-build or general
contractor/construction manager contracting procedure on a project. A
public body seeking approval must submit to the committee an
application in a format and manner as prescribed by the committee. The
application must include a description of the public body's
qualifications, a description of the project, and its intended use of
alternative contracting procedures.
(2) To approve a proposed project, the committee shall determine
that:
(a) The alternative contracting procedure will provide a
substantial fiscal benefit or the use of the traditional method of
awarding contracts in lump sum to the low responsive bidder is not
practical for meeting desired quality standards or delivery schedules;
(b) The proposed project meets the requirements for using the
alternative contracting procedure as described in RCW 39.10.300 or
39.10.340;
(c) The public body has the necessary experience or qualified team
to carry out the alternative contracting procedure including, but not
limited to: (i) Project delivery knowledge and experience; (ii)
sufficient personnel with construction experience to administer the
contract; (iii) a written management plan that shows clear and logical
lines of authority; (iv) the necessary and appropriate funding and time
to properly manage the job and complete the project; (v) continuity of
project management team, including personnel with experience managing
projects of similar scope and size to the project being proposed; and
(vi) necessary and appropriate construction budget;
(d) For design-build projects, ((construction)) public body
personnel ((independent of the design-build team)) or consultants are
knowledgeable in the design-build process and are able to oversee and
administer the contract; and
(e) The public body has resolved any audit findings related to
previous public works projects in a manner satisfactory to the
committee.
(3) The committee shall, if practicable, make its determination at
the public meeting during which a submittal is reviewed. Public
comments must be considered before a determination is made.
(4) Within ten business days after the public meeting, the
committee shall provide a written determination to the public body, and
make its determination available to the public on the committee's web
site. If the committee fails to make a written determination within
ten business days of the public meeting, the request of the public body
to use the alternative contracting procedure on the requested project
shall be deemed approved.
(5) ((The requirements of subsection (1) of this section also apply
to certified public bodies seeking to use the general
contractor/construction manager contracting procedure on projects with
a total project cost of less than ten million dollars.
(6))) Failure of the committee to meet within sixty calendar days
of a public body's application to use an alternative contracting
procedure on a project shall be deemed an approval of the application.

Sec. 9 RCW 39.10.300 and 2009 c 75 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the ((process)) requirements in RCW 39.10.250,
39.10.270, or 39.10.280, public bodies may utilize the design-build
procedure for public works projects in which the total project cost is
over ten million dollars and where:
(a) The ((design and construction activities, technologies, or
schedule to be used are highly specialized and a design-build approach
is critical in developing the construction methodology or implementing
the proposed technology)) construction activities are highly
specialized and a design-build approach is critical in developing the
construction methodology; or
(b) The ((project design is repetitive in nature and is an
incidental part of the installation or construction)) projects selected
provide opportunity for greater innovation or efficiencies between the
designer and the builder; or
(c) ((Regular interaction with and feedback from facilities users
and operators during design is not critical to an effective facility
design.)) Significant savings in project delivery time would be
realized.
(2) Subject to the process in RCW 39.10.270 or 39.10.280, public
bodies may use the design-build procedure for parking garages,
regardless of cost.
(3) The design-build procedure may be used for the construction or
erection of portable facilities as defined in WAC 392-343-018,
preengineered metal buildings, or not more than ten prefabricated
modular buildings per installation site, regardless of cost and is not
subject to approval by the committee.
(4) Except for utility projects and approved demonstration
projects, the design-build procedure may not be used to procure
operations and maintenance services for a period longer than three
years. State agency projects that propose to use the design-build-operate-maintain procedure shall submit cost estimates for the
construction portion of the project consistent with the office of
financial management's capital budget requirements. Operations and
maintenance costs must be shown separately and must not be included as
part of the capital budget request.
(5) Subject to the process in RCW 39.10.280, public bodies may use
the design-build procedure for public works projects in which the total
project cost is between two million and ten million dollars and that
meet one of the criteria in subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c) of this
section.
(6) Subject to the process in RCW 39.10.280, a public body may seek
committee approval for a design-build demonstration project that
includes procurement of operations and maintenance services for a
period longer than three years.

Sec. 10 RCW 39.10.320 and 2007 c 494 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A public body utilizing the design-build contracting procedure
shall provide ((for)):
(a) Reasonable budget contingencies totaling not less than five
percent of the anticipated contract value;
(b) ((Employment of)) Staff or consultants with expertise and prior
experience in the management of comparable projects;
(c) Contract documents that include alternative dispute resolution
procedures to be attempted prior to the initiation of litigation;
(d) Submission of project information, as required by the board;
((and))
(e) Contract documents that require the contractor, subcontractors,
and designers to submit project information required by the board; and
(f) Contract documents that include the life-cycle cost model to be
used in the submittal if required by the public body.
(2) A public body utilizing the design-build contracting procedure
may provide incentive payments to contractors for early completion,
cost savings, or other goals if such payments are identified in the
request for proposals.

Sec. 11 RCW 39.10.330 and 2009 c 75 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Contracts for design-build services shall be awarded through a
competitive process using public solicitation of proposals for design-build services. The public body shall publish at least once in a legal
newspaper of general circulation published in, or as near as possible
to, that part of the county in which the public work will be done, a
notice of its request for qualifications from proposers for design-build services, and the availability and location of the request for
proposal documents. The request for qualifications documents shall
include:
(a) A general description of the project that provides sufficient
information for proposers to submit qualifications;
(b) The reasons for using the design-build procedure;
(c) A description of the qualifications to be required of the
proposer including, but not limited to, submission of the proposer's
accident prevention program;
(d) A description of the process the public body will use to
evaluate qualifications and finalists' proposals, including evaluation
factors and the relative weight of factors and any specific forms to be
used by the proposers;
(i) Evaluation factors for request for qualifications shall
include, but not be limited to, technical qualifications, such as
specialized experience and technical competence; capability to perform;
past performance of the proposers' team, including the architect-engineer and construction members; and other appropriate factors.
Evaluation factors may also include: (A) The proposer's past
performance in utilization of small business entities; (B)
disadvantaged business enterprises; and (C) the proposer's past
performance using life-cycle or energy performance design-build goals.
Cost or price-related factors are not permitted in the request for
qualifications phase;
(ii) Evaluation factors for finalists' proposals shall include, but
not be limited to, the factors listed in (d)(i) of this subsection, as
well as technical approach design concept; ((proposal price;)) ability
of professional personnel; past performance on similar projects;
ability to meet time and budget requirements; ability to provide a
performance and payment bond for the project; recent, current, and
projected workloads of the firm; ((and)) location; and cost or price-related factors that may include operating costs. The public body may
also consider: (A) A proposer's outreach plan to include small
business entities and disadvantaged business enterprises as
subcontractor and suppliers for the project; and (B) life-cycle costs
including utility and other operating costs that will benefit from an
energy performance design-build contract. Alternatively, if the public
body determines that all finalists will be capable of producing a
design that adequately meets project requirements, the public body may
award the contract to the firm that submits the responsive proposal
with the lowest price;
(e) Protest procedures including time limits for filing a protest,
which in no event may limit the time to file a protest to fewer than
four business days from the date the proposer was notified of the
selection decision;
(f) The form of the contract to be awarded;
(((f))) (g) The ((amount)) honorarium to be paid to finalists
submitting responsive proposals and who are not awarded a design-build
contract;
(((g))) (h) The schedule for the procurement process and the
project; and
(((h))) (i) Other information relevant to the project.
(2) The public body shall establish an evaluation committee to
evaluate the responses to the request for qualifications based solely
on the factors, weighting, and process identified in the request for
qualifications and any addenda issued by the public body. Based on the
evaluation committee's findings, the public body shall select not more
than five responsive and responsible finalists to submit proposals.
The public body may, in its sole discretion, reject all proposals and
shall provide its reasons for rejection in writing to all proposers.
(3) The public body must notify all proposers of the finalists
selected to move to the next phase of the selection process. The
process may not proceed to the next phase until two business days after
all proposers are notified of the committee's selection decision. At
the request of a proposer not selected as a finalist, the public body
must provide the requesting proposer with a scoring summary of the
evaluation factors for its proposal. Proposers filing a protest on the
selection of the finalists must file the protest in accordance with the
published protest procedures. The selection process may not advance to
the next phase of selection until two business days after the final
protest decision is transmitted to the protestor.
(4) Upon selection of the finalists, the public body shall issue a
request for proposals to the finalists, which shall provide the
following information:
(a) A detailed description of the project including programmatic,
performance, and technical requirements and specifications; functional
and operational elements; minimum and maximum net and gross areas of
any building; and, at the discretion of the public body, preliminary
engineering and architectural drawings; and
(b) The target budget for the design-build portion of the project.
(((4))) (5) The public body shall establish an evaluation committee
to evaluate the proposals submitted by the finalists. Design-build
contracts shall be awarded using the procedures in (a) or (b) of this
subsection. The public body must identify in the request for
qualifications which procedure will be used.
(a) The finalists' proposals shall be evaluated and scored based
solely on the factors, weighting, and process identified in the initial
request for qualifications and in any addenda published by the public
body. Public bodies may request best and final proposals from
finalists. The public body ((shall)) may initiate negotiations with
the firm submitting the highest scored proposal. If the public body is
unable to execute a contract with the firm submitting the highest
scored proposal, negotiations with that firm may be suspended or
terminated and the public body may proceed to negotiate with the next
highest scored firm. Public bodies shall continue in accordance with
this procedure until a contract agreement is reached or the selection
process is terminated.
(b) If the public body determines that all finalists are capable of
producing a design that adequately meets project requirements, the
public body may award the contract to the firm that submits the
responsive proposal with the lowest price.
(((5))) (6) The public body shall notify all finalists of the
selection decision and make a selection summary of the final proposals
available to all proposers within two business days of such
notification. If the public body receives a timely written protest
from a finalist firm, the public body may not execute a contract until
two business days after the final protest decision is transmitted to
the protestor. The protestor must submit its protest in accordance
with the published protest procedures.
(7) The firm awarded the contract shall provide a performance and
payment bond for the contracted amount.
(8) The public body shall provide appropriate honorarium payments
to finalists submitting responsive proposals that are not awarded a
design-build contract. Honorarium payments shall be sufficient to
generate meaningful competition among potential proposers on design-build projects. In determining the amount of the honorarium, the
public body shall consider the level of effort required to meet the
selection criteria.

Sec. 12 RCW 39.10.340 and 2007 c 494 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the process in RCW 39.10.270 or 39.10.280, public bodies
may utilize the general contractor/construction manager procedure for
public works projects where at least one of the following is met:
(1) Implementation of the project involves complex scheduling,
phasing, or coordination;
(2) The project involves construction at an occupied facility which
must continue to operate during construction;
(3) The involvement of the general contractor/construction manager
during the design stage is critical to the success of the project;
(4) The project encompasses a complex or technical work
environment; or
(5) The project requires specialized work on a building that has
historic significance.

Sec. 13 RCW 39.10.360 and 2009 c 75 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Public bodies should select general contractor/construction
managers early in the life of public works projects, and in most
situations no later than the completion of schematic design.
(2) Contracts for the services of a general contractor/
construction manager under this section shall be awarded through a
competitive process requiring the public solicitation of proposals for
general contractor/construction manager services. The public
solicitation of proposals shall include:
(a) A description of the project, including programmatic,
performance, and technical requirements and specifications when
available;
(b) The reasons for using the general contractor/construction
manager procedure;
(c) A description of the qualifications to be required of the firm,
including submission of the firm's accident prevention program;
(d) A description of the process the public body will use to
evaluate qualifications and proposals, including evaluation factors
((and)), the relative weight of factors, and protest procedures
including time limits for filing a protest, which in no event may limit
the time to file a protest to fewer than four business days from the
date the proposer was notified of the selection decision;
(e) The form of the contract, including any contract for
preconstruction services, to be awarded;
(f) The estimated maximum allowable construction cost; and
(g) The bid instructions to be used by the general contractor/
construction manager finalists.
(3)(a) Evaluation factors for selection of the general
contractor/construction manager shall include, but not be limited to:
(((a))) (i) Ability of the firm's professional personnel;
(((b))) (ii) The firm's past performance in negotiated and complex
projects;
(((c))) (iii) The firm's ability to meet time and budget
requirements;
(((d))) (iv) The scope of work the firm proposes to self-perform
and its ability to perform that work;
(((e))) (v) The firm's proximity to the project location;
(((f))) (vi) Recent, current, and projected workloads of the firm;
and
(((g))) (vii) The firm's approach to executing the project.
(b) An agency may also consider the firm's outreach plan to include
small business entities and disadvantaged business enterprises, and the
firm's past performance in the utilization of such firms as an
evaluation factor.
(4) A public body shall establish a committee to evaluate the
proposals. After the committee has selected the most qualified
finalists, at the time specified by the public body, these finalists
shall submit final proposals, including sealed bids for the percent fee
on the estimated maximum allowable construction cost and the fixed
amount for the general conditions work specified in the request for
proposal. The public body shall establish a time and place for the
opening of sealed bids for the percent fee on the estimated maximum
allowable construction cost and the fixed amount for the general
conditions work specified in the request for proposal. At the time and
place named, these bids must be publicly opened and read and the public
body shall make all previous scoring available to the public. The
public body shall select the firm submitting the highest scored final
proposal using the evaluation factors and the relative weight of
factors published in the public solicitation of proposals. A public
body shall not evaluate or disqualify a proposal based on the terms of
a collective bargaining agreement.
(5) The public body shall notify all finalists of the selection
decision and make a selection summary of the final proposals available
to all proposers within two business days of such notification. If the
public body receives a timely written protest from a proposer, the
public body may not execute a contract until two business days after
the final protest decision is transmitted to the protestor. The
protestor must submit its protest in accordance with the published
protest procedures.
(6) Public bodies may contract with the selected firm to provide
services during the design phase that may include life-cycle cost
design considerations, value engineering, scheduling, cost estimating,
constructability, alternative construction options for cost savings,
and sequencing of work, and to act as the construction manager and
general contractor during the construction phase.

Sec. 14 RCW 39.10.380 and 2007 c 494 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All subcontract work and equipment and material purchases shall
be competitively bid with public bid openings. Subcontract bid
packages and equipment and materials purchases shall be awarded to the
responsible bidder submitting the lowest responsive bid. In preparing
subcontract bid packages, the general contractor/construction manager
shall not be required to violate or waive terms of a collective
bargaining agreement.
(2) All subcontract bid packages in which bidder eligibility was
not determined in advance shall include the specific objective criteria
that will be used by the general contractor/construction manager and
the public body to evaluate bidder responsibility. If the lowest
bidder submitting a responsive bid is determined by the general
contractor/construction manager and the public body not to be
responsible, the general contractor/construction manager and the public
body must provide written documentation to that bidder explaining their
intent to reject the bidder as not responsible and afford the bidder
the opportunity to establish that it is a responsible bidder.
Responsibility shall be determined in accordance with criteria listed
in the bid documents. Protests concerning bidder responsibility
determination by the general contractor/construction manager and the
public body shall be in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.
(3) All subcontractors who bid work over three hundred thousand
dollars shall post a bid bond. All subcontractors who are awarded a
contract over three hundred thousand dollars shall provide a
performance and payment bond for the contract amount. All other
subcontractors shall provide a performance and payment bond if required
by the general contractor/construction manager.
(4) If the general contractor/construction manager receives a
written protest from a subcontractor bidder or an equipment or material
supplier, the general contractor/construction manager shall not execute
a contract for the subcontract bid package or equipment or material
purchase order with anyone other than the protesting bidder without
first providing at least two full business days' written notice to all
bidders of the intent to execute a contract for the subcontract bid
package. The protesting bidder must submit written notice of its
protest no later than two full business days following the bid opening.
Intermediate Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays are not counted.
(5) A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a
contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or
subsequent call for bids is made for the project.
(6) The general contractor/construction manager may negotiate with
the lowest responsible and responsive bidder to negotiate an adjustment
to the lowest bid or proposal price based upon agreed changes to the
contract plans and specifications under the following conditions:
(a) All responsive bids or proposal prices exceed the available
funds((, as certified by an appropriate fiscal officer));
(b) The apparent low responsive bid or proposal does not exceed the
available funds by the greater of one hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars or two percent for projects valued over ten million dollars;
and
(c) The negotiated adjustment will bring the bid or proposal price
within the amount of available funds.
(7) If the negotiation is unsuccessful, the subcontract work or
equipment or material purchases must be rebid.
(8) The general contractor/construction manager must provide a
written explanation if all bids are rejected.

Sec. 15 RCW 39.10.385 and 2010 c 163 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As an alternative to the subcontractor selection process outlined
in RCW 39.10.380, a general contractor/construction manager may, with
the approval of the public body, select ((a)) mechanical
subcontractors, ((an)) electrical subcontractors, or both, using the
process outlined in this section. This alternative selection process
may only be used when the anticipated value of the subcontract will
exceed three million dollars. When using the alternative selection
process, the general contractor/construction manager should select the
subcontractor early in the life of the public works project.
(1) In order to use this alternative selection process, the general
contractor/construction manager and the public body must determine that
it is in the best interest of the public. In making this determination
the general contractor/construction manager and the public body must:
(a) Publish a notice of intent to use this alternative selection
process in a legal newspaper published in or as near as possible to
that part of the county where the public work will be constructed.
Notice must be published at least fourteen calendar days before
conducting a public hearing. The notice must include the date, time,
and location of the hearing; a statement justifying the basis and need
for the alternative selection process; ((and)) how interested parties
may, prior to the hearing, obtain the evaluation criteria and
applicable weight given to each criteria that will be used for
evaluation; and protest procedures including time limits for filing a
protest, which may in no event, limit the time to file a protest to
fewer than four business days from the date the proposer was notified
of the selection decision;
(b) Conduct a hearing and provide an opportunity for any interested
party to submit written and verbal comments regarding the justification
for using this selection process, the evaluation criteria, ((and))
weights for each criteria, and protest procedures;
(c) After the public hearing, consider the written and verbal
comments received and determine if using this alternative selection
process is in the best interests of the public; and
(d) Issue a written final determination to all interested parties.
All protests of the decision to use the alternative selection process
must be in writing and submitted to the public body within seven
calendar days of the final determination. Any modifications to the
criteria ((and)), weights, and protest procedures based on comments
received during the public hearing process must be included in the
final determination.
(2) Contracts for the services of a subcontractor under this
section must be awarded through a competitive process requiring a
public solicitation of proposals. Notice of the public solicitation of
proposals must be provided to the office of minority and women's
business enterprises. The public solicitation of proposals must
include:
(a) A description of the project, including programmatic,
performance, and technical requirements and specifications when
available;
(b) The reasons for using the alternative selection process;
(c) A description of the minimum qualifications required of the
firm;
(d) A description of the process used to evaluate qualifications
and proposals, including evaluation factors and the relative weight of
factors;
(e) Protest procedures;
(f) The form of the contract, including any contract for
preconstruction services, to be awarded;
(((f))) (g) The estimated maximum allowable subcontract cost; and
(((g))) (h) The bid instructions to be used by the finalists.
(3) Evaluation factors for selection of the subcontractor must
include, but not be limited to:
(a) Ability of the firm's professional personnel;
(b) The firm's past performance on similar projects;
(c) The firm's ability to meet time and budget requirements;
(d) The scope of work the firm proposes to perform with its own
forces and its ability to perform that work;
(e) The firm's plan for outreach to minority and women-owned
businesses;
(f) The firm's proximity to the project location;
(g) The firm's capacity to successfully complete the project;
(h) The firm's approach to executing the project;
(i) The firm's approach to safety on the project;
(j) The firm's safety history; and
(k) If the firm is selected as one of the most qualified finalists,
the firm's fee and cost proposal.
(4) The general contractor/construction manager shall establish a
committee to evaluate the proposals. At least one representative from
the public body shall serve on the committee. Final proposals,
including sealed bids for the percent fee on the estimated maximum
allowable subcontract cost, and the fixed amount for the subcontract
general conditions work specified in the request for proposal, will be
requested from the most qualified firms.
(5) The general contractor/construction manager must notify all
proposers of the most qualified firms that will move to the next phase
of the selection process. The process may not proceed to the next
phase until two business days after all proposers are notified of the
committee's selection decision. At the request of a proposer, the
general contractor/construction manager must provide the requesting
proposer with a scoring summary of the evaluation factors for its
proposal. Proposers filing a protest on the selection of the most
qualified finalists must file the protest with the public body in
accordance with the published protest procedures. The selection
process may not advance to the next phase of selection until two
business days after the final protest decision issued by the public
body is transmitted to the protestor.
(6) The general contractor/construction manager and the public body
shall select the firm submitting the highest scored final proposal
using the evaluation factors and the relative weight of factors
identified in the solicitation of proposals. The scoring of the
nonprice factors must be made available at the opening of the fee and
cost proposals. The general contractor/construction manager shall
notify all proposers of the selection decision and make a selection
summary of the final proposals, which shall be available to all
proposers within two business days of such notification. The general
contractor/construction manager may not evaluate or disqualify a
proposal based on the terms of a collective bargaining agreement.
(((5))) (7) If the public body receives a timely written protest
from a "most qualified firm," the general contractor/construction
manager may not execute a contract for the protested subcontract work
until two business days after the final protest decision issued by the
public body is transmitted to the protestor. The protestor must submit
its protest in accordance with the published protest procedures.
(8) If the general contractor/construction manager is unable to
negotiate a satisfactory maximum allowable subcontract cost with the
firm selected deemed by public body and the general
contractor/construction manager to be fair, reasonable, and within the
available funds, negotiations with that firm must be formally
terminated and the general contractor/construction manager may
negotiate with the next highest scored firm until an agreement is
reached or the process is terminated.
(((6) If the general contractor/construction manager receives a
written protest from a bidder, it may not execute a contract for the
subject work with anyone other than the protesting bidder, without
first providing at least two full business days' written notice to all
bidders of the intent to execute a contract for the subcontract bid
package. The protesting bidder must submit written notice to the
general contractor/construction manager of its protest no later than
two full business days following the bid opening.
(7))) (9) With the approval of the public body, the general
contractor/construction manager may contract with the selected firm to
provide preconstruction services during the design phase that may
include life-cycle cost design considerations, value engineering,
scheduling, cost estimating, constructability, alternative construction
options for cost savings, and sequencing of work; and to act as the
mechanical or electrical subcontractor during the construction phase.
(((8))) (10) The maximum allowable subcontract cost must be used to
establish a total subcontract cost for purposes of a performance and
payment bond. Total subcontract cost means the fixed amount for the
detailed specified general conditions work, the negotiated maximum
allowable subcontract cost, and the percent fee on the negotiated
maximum allowable subcontract cost. Maximum allowable subcontract cost
means the maximum cost to complete the work specified for the
subcontract, including the estimated cost of work to be performed by
the subcontractor's own forces, a percentage for risk contingency,
negotiated support services, and approved change orders. The maximum
allowable subcontract cost must be negotiated between the general
contractor/construction manager and the selected firm when the
construction documents and specifications are at least ninety percent
complete. Final agreement on the maximum allowable subcontract cost is
subject to the approval of the public body.
(((9))) (11) If the work of the mechanical contractor or electrical
contractor is completed for less than the maximum allowable subcontract
cost, any savings not otherwise negotiated as part of an incentive
clause becomes part of the risk contingency included in the general
contractor/construction manager's maximum allowable construction cost.
If the work of the mechanical contractor or the electrical contractor
is completed for more than the maximum allowable subcontract cost, the
additional cost is the responsibility of that subcontractor. An
independent audit, paid for by the public body, must be conducted
((upon completion of the contract)) to confirm the proper accrual of
costs as outlined in the contract.
(((10))) (12) A mechanical or electrical contractor selected under
this section may perform work with its own forces. In the event it
elects to subcontract some of its work, it must select a subcontractor
utilizing the procedure outlined in RCW 39.10.380.

Sec. 16 RCW 39.10.390 and 2007 c 494 s 306 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this section, bidding on subcontract work
or for the supply of equipment or materials by the general
contractor/construction manager or its subsidiaries is prohibited.
(2) The general contractor/construction manager, or its
subsidiaries, may bid on subcontract work or for the supply of
equipment or materials if:
(a) The work within the subcontract bid package or equipment or
materials is customarily performed or supplied by the general
contractor/construction manager;
(b) The bid opening is managed by the public body and is in
compliance with RCW 39.10.380; and
(c) Notification of the general contractor/construction manager's
intention to bid is included in the public solicitation of bids for the
bid package or for the equipment or materials.
(3) In no event may the general contractor/construction manager or
its subsidiaries ((purchase equipment or materials for assignment to
subcontract bid package bidders for installation or warranty)) assign
warranty responsibility or the terms of its contract or purchase order
with vendors for equipment or material purchases to subcontract bid
package bidders or subcontractors who have been awarded a contract.
The value of subcontract work performed and equipment and materials
supplied by the general contractor/construction manager may not exceed
thirty percent of the negotiated maximum allowable construction cost.
Negotiated support services performed by the general
contractor/construction manager shall not be considered subcontract
work for purposes of this subsection.

Sec. 17 RCW 39.10.400 and 2007 c 494 s 307 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If determination of subcontractor eligibility prior to seeking
bids is in the best interest of the project and critical to the
successful completion of a subcontract bid package, the general
contractor/construction manager and the public body may determine
subcontractor eligibility to bid. The general contractor/construction
manager and the public body must:
(a) Conduct a hearing and provide an opportunity for any interested
party to submit written and verbal comments regarding the justification
for conducting bidder eligibility, the evaluation criteria, and weights
for each criteria and subcriteria;
(b) Publish a notice of intent to evaluate and determine bidder
eligibility in a legal newspaper published in or as near as possible to
that part of the county where the public work will be constructed at
least fourteen calendar days before conducting a public hearing;
(c) Ensure the public hearing notice includes the date, time, and
location of the hearing, a statement justifying the basis and need for
performing eligibility analysis before bid opening, and how interested
parties may, at least five days before the hearing, obtain the specific
eligibility criteria and applicable weights given to each criteria and
subcriteria that will be used during evaluation;
(d) After the public hearing, consider written and verbal comments
received and determine if establishing bidder eligibility in advance of
seeking bids is in the best interests of the project and critical to
the successful completion of a subcontract bid package; and
(e) Issue a written final determination to all interested parties.
All protests of the decision to establish bidder eligibility before
issuing a subcontractor bid package must be filed with the superior
court within seven calendar days of the final determination. Any
modifications to the eligibility criteria and weights shall be based on
comments received during the public hearing process and shall be
included in the final determination.
(2) Determinations of bidder eligibility shall be in accordance
with the evaluation criteria and weights for each criteria established
in the final determination and shall be provided to interested persons
upon request. Any potential bidder determined not to meet eligibility
criteria must be afforded ((the)) one opportunity to establish its
eligibility. Protests concerning bidder eligibility determinations
shall be in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 18 RCW 39.10.420 and 2012 c 102 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following public bodies of the state of Washington are
authorized to award job order contracts and use the job order
contracting procedure:
(a) The department of enterprise services;
(b) The state universities, regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College;
(c) Sound transit (central Puget Sound regional transit authority);
(d) Every city with a population greater than seventy thousand and
any public authority chartered by such city under RCW 35.21.730 through
35.21.755;
(e) Every county with a population greater than four hundred fifty
thousand;
(f) Every port district with total revenues greater than fifteen
million dollars per year;
(g) Every public utility district with revenues from energy sales
greater than twenty-three million dollars per year;
(h) Every school district; and
(i) The state ferry system.
(2)(a) The department of enterprise services may issue job order
contract work orders for Washington state parks department projects.
(b) The department of enterprise services, the University of
Washington, and Washington State University may issue job order
contract work orders for the state regional universities and The
Evergreen State College.
(3) Public bodies may use a job order contract for public works
projects when a determination is made that the use of job order
contracts will benefit the public by providing an effective means of
reducing the total lead-time and cost for the construction of public
works projects for repair and renovation required at public facilities
through the use of unit price books and work orders by eliminating
time-consuming, costly aspects of the traditional public works process,
which require separate contracting actions for each small project.

Sec. 19 RCW 39.10.440 and 2007 c 494 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The maximum total dollar amount that may be awarded under a job
order contract is four million dollars per year for a maximum of three
years. The maximum total dollar amount that may be awarded under a job
order contract for counties with a population of more than one million
is six million dollars per year for a maximum of three years.
(2) Job order contracts may be executed for an initial contract
term of not to exceed two years, with the option of extending or
renewing the job order contract for one year. All extensions or
renewals must be priced as provided in the request for proposals. The
extension or renewal must be mutually agreed to by the public body and
the job order contractor.
(3) A public body may have no more than two job order contracts in
effect at any one time, with the exception of the department of
((general administration)) enterprise services, which may have four job
order contracts in effect at any one time.
(4) At least ninety percent of work contained in a job order
contract must be subcontracted to entities other than the job order
contractor. The job order contractor must distribute contracts as
equitably as possible among qualified and available subcontractors
including minority and woman-owned subcontractors to the extent
permitted by law.
(5) The job order contractor shall publish notification of intent
to perform public works projects at the beginning of each contract year
in a statewide publication and in a legal newspaper of general
circulation in every county in which the public works projects are
anticipated.
(6) Job order contractors shall pay prevailing wages for all work
that would otherwise be subject to the requirements of chapter 39.12
RCW. Prevailing wages for all work performed pursuant to each work
order must be the rates in effect at the time the individual work order
is issued.
(7) If, in the initial contract term, the public body, at no fault
of the job order contractor, fails to issue the minimum amount of work
orders stated in the public request for proposals, the public body
shall pay the contractor an amount equal to the difference between the
minimum work order amount and the actual total of the work orders
issued multiplied by an appropriate percentage for overhead and profit
contained in the contract award coefficient for services as specified
in the request for proposals. This is the contractor's sole remedy.
(8) All job order contracts awarded under this section must be
signed before July 1, 2013; however the job order contract may be
extended or renewed as provided for in this section.
(9) Public bodies may amend job order contracts awarded prior to
July 1, 2007, in accordance with this chapter.

Sec. 20 RCW 39.10.490 and 2007 c 494 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
The alternative public works contracting procedures authorized
under this chapter are limited to public works contracts signed before
July 1, ((2013)) 2021. Methods of public works contracting authorized
under this chapter shall remain in full force and effect until
completion of contracts signed before July 1, ((2013)) 2021.

Sec. 21 RCW 43.131.407 and 2007 c 494 s 506 are each amended to
read as follows:
The alternative (([public])) public works contracting procedures
under chapter 39.10 RCW shall be terminated June 30, ((2013)) 2021, as
provided in RCW 43.131.408.

Sec. 22 RCW 43.131.408 and 2012 c 102 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, ((2014)) 2022:
(1) RCW 39.10.200 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 2, 2007 c 494 s 1, &
1994 c 132 s 1;
(2) RCW 39.10.210 and 2013 c ... s 1 (section 1 of this act), 2010
1st sp.s. c 36 s 6014, 2007 c 494 s 101, & 2005 c 469 s 3;
(3) RCW 39.10.220 and 2013 c ... s 2 (section 2 of this act), 2007
c 494 s 102, & 2005 c 377 s 1;
(4) RCW 39.10.230 and 2013 c ... s 3 (section 3 of this act), 2010
1st sp.s. c 21 s 3, 2009 c 75 s 1, 2007 c 494 s 103, & 2005 c 377 s 2;
(5) RCW 39.10.240 and 2013 c ... s 4 (section 4 of this act) & 2007
c 494 s 104;
(6) RCW 39.10.250 and 2013 c ... s 5 (section 5 of this act), 2009
c 75 s 2, & 2007 c 494 s 105;
(7) RCW 39.10.260 and 2013 c ... s 6 (section 6 of this act) & 2007
c 494 s 106;
(8) RCW 39.10.270 and 2013 c ... s 7 (section 7 of this act), 2009
c 75 s 3, & 2007 c 494 s 107;
(9) RCW 39.10.280 and 2013 c ... s 8 (section 8 of this act) & 2007
c 494 s 108;
(10) RCW 39.10.290 and 2007 c 494 s 109;
(11) RCW 39.10.300 and 2013 c ... s 9 (section 9 of this act), 2009
c 75 s 4, & 2007 c 494 s 201;
(12) RCW 39.10.320 and 2013 c ... s 10 (section 10 of this act),
2007 c 494 s 203, & 1994 c 132 s 7;
(13) RCW 39.10.330 and 2013 c ... s 11 (section 11 of this act),
2009 c 75 s 5, & 2007 c 494 s 204;
(14) RCW 39.10.340 and 2013 c ... s 12 (section 12 of this act) &
2007 c 494 s 301;
(15) RCW 39.10.350 and 2007 c 494 s 302;
(16) RCW 39.10.360 and 2013 c ... s 13 (section 13 of this act),
2009 c 75 s 6, & 2007 c 494 s 303;
(17) RCW 39.10.370 and 2007 c 494 s 304;
(18) RCW 39.10.380 and 2013 c ... s 14 (section 14 of this act) &
2007 c 494 s 305;
(19) RCW 39.10.385 and 2013 c ... s 15 (section 15 of this act) &
2010 c 163 s 1;
(20) RCW 39.10.390 and 2013 c ... s 16 (section 16 of this act) &
2007 c 494 s 306;
(21) RCW 39.10.400 and 2013 c ... s 17 (section 17 of this act) &
2007 c 494 s 307;
(22) RCW 39.10.410 and 2007 c 494 s 308;
(23) RCW 39.10.420 and 2013 c ... s 18 (section 18 of this act),
2012 c 102 s 1, 2009 c 75 s 7, 2007 c 494 s 401, & 2003 c 301 s 1;
(24) RCW 39.10.430 and 2007 c 494 s 402;
(25) RCW 39.10.440 and 2013 c ... s 19 (section 19 of this act) &
2007 c 494 s 403;
(26) RCW 39.10.450 and 2012 c 102 s 2 & 2007 c 494 s 404;
(27) RCW 39.10.460 and 2012 c 102 s 3 & 2007 c 494 s 405;
(28) RCW 39.10.470 and 2005 c 274 s 275 & 1994 c 132 s 10;
(29) RCW 39.10.480 and 1994 c 132 s 9;
(30) RCW 39.10.490 and 2013 c ... s 20 (section 20 of this act),
2007 c 494 s 501, & 2001 c 328 s 5;
(31) ((RCW 39.10.500 and 2007 c 494 s 502;
(32) RCW 39.10.510 and 2007 c 494 s 503;
(33))) RCW 39.10.900 and 1994 c 132 s 13;
(((34))) (32) RCW 39.10.901 and 1994 c 132 s 14;
(((35))) (33) RCW 39.10.903 and 2007 c 494 s 510;
(((36))) (34) RCW 39.10.904 and 2007 c 494 s 512; and
(((37))) (35) RCW 39.10.905 and 2007 c 494 s 513.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 39.10.500 (Exemptions) and 2007 c 494 s 502; and
(2) RCW 39.10.510 (Previously advertised projects) and 2007 c 494
s 503.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 43.131
RCW to read as follows:
(1) If the sunset review process in RCW 43.131.010 through
43.131.150 expires before June 30, 2021, the joint legislative audit
and review committee must conduct a program and fiscal review of the
alternative public works contracting procedures authorized in chapter
39.10 RCW. The review must be completed by June 30, 2021, and findings
reported to the office of financial management and any affected
entities. The report must be prepared in the manner set forth in RCW
44.28.071 and 44.28.075.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Section 24 of this act takes effect upon
the expiration of RCW 43.131.051.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 Sections 1 through 23 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect June 30, 2013.

--- END ---