BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Through such initiatives as grants for high-demand career and
technical education programs and participation in the Microsoft IT
academy, the state has previously supported K-12 computer science
education;
(b) However, even though there were nearly sixty-five thousand
student enrollments in high school computer science courses in the
2011-12 school year, more than half of those enrollments were in
beginning or exploratory courses. Fewer than twelve hundred students
enrolled in AP computer science courses;
(c) National studies of K-12 computer science education indicate
that, in part because computer science is not treated as an academic
subject, students may not perceive advanced computer science as
relevant to their future academic or career success;
(d) Public institutions of higher education have expanded capacity
to grant certificates and degrees in computer science and related
fields in response to high employer demand and high student demand.
Additional expansion and improvement will be dependent on new
resources, updated equipment, and the availability of expert faculty;
(e) Information technology job vacancies exist at all levels of
training and education and across all industries that are critical to
Washington's economy; and
(f) Strategies are needed to support additional opportunities for
Washington students to have careers in the innovative, technology-based
or technology-enhanced industries located in our state.
(2) Therefore the legislature intends to take additional steps to
improve and expand access to computer science education, particularly
in advanced courses that could prepare students for careers in the
field.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.097 and 2008 c 170 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each high school or school district board of directors shall
adopt course equivalencies for career and technical high school courses
offered to students in high schools and skill centers. A career and
technical course equivalency may be for whole or partial credit. Each
school district board of directors shall develop a course equivalency
approval procedure. Boards of directors must approve AP computer
science courses as equivalent to high school mathematics or science,
and must denote on a student's transcript that AP computer science
qualifies as a math-based quantitative course for students who take the
course in their senior year. In order for a board to approve AP
computer science as equivalent to high school mathematics, the student
must be concurrently enrolled in or have successfully completed algebra
II.
(2) Career and technical courses determined to be equivalent to
academic core courses, in full or in part, by the high school or school
district shall be accepted as meeting core requirements, including
graduation requirements, if the courses are recorded on the student's
transcript using the equivalent academic high school department
designation and title. Full or partial credit shall be recorded as
appropriate. The high school or school district shall also issue and
keep record of course completion certificates that demonstrate that the
career and technical courses were successfully completed as needed for
industry certification, college credit, or preapprenticeship, as
applicable. The certificate shall be either part of the student's high
school and beyond plan or the student's culminating project, as
determined by the student. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop and make available electronic samples of
certificates of course completion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for the purpose of
this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall allocate, on a competitive basis, grants to school districts to
increase the capacity of high schools to offer AP computer science
courses. In making grant allocations, the office must give priority to
rural school districts, school districts with limited local access to
technology-based industries, high schools with substantial enrollment
of low-income students, and high schools that do not offer AP computer
science courses.
(2) School districts may apply to receive either or both of the
following grants:
(a) A grant to establish partnerships with technology businesses,
business organizations, or other nonprofit organizations to support
computer science professionals from private industry serving on a
voluntary basis as coinstructors along with a certificated teacher for
AP computer science courses. The computer science professional may
coinstruct the course from a remote location using synchronous video
technology. Grant recipients must work with a provider of in-service
training to create a complimentary professional development opportunity
that qualifies for clock hours of continuing education under RCW
28A.415.020, for the classroom teacher to increase his or her
instructional knowledge and skills in advanced computer science. In
making grant awards, the office must take steps to assure that the
funds are used to increase the number of AP courses coinstructed by
computer science professionals and are not used to supplant funding for
courses coinstructed under partnerships established before the
effective date of this section; or
(b) A grant to purchase or upgrade technology and curriculum needed
for AP computer science, as well as provide opportunities for
professional development and training for classroom teachers to have
the requisite knowledge and skills to teach an AP computer science
course. In making grant awards, the office must take steps to assure
that the funds are used to increase the number of AP computer science
courses available and are not used to supplant funding for courses
offered before the effective date of this section.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop an evaluation and reporting component for the grants awarded
under this section, to include input data such as increases in the
number of AP computer science courses and course enrollments, as well
as outcome data such as scores on AP computer science exams,
postsecondary follow-up for participating students, and indicators of
teacher professional development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The workforce training and education
coordinating board shall convene and provide staff support for a
computer science professional shortage task force as provided in this
section. The task force must include representatives from technology
businesses and business organizations; state education agencies
including the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the
Washington student achievement council, and the state board for
community and technical colleges; education providers such as school
districts, skill centers, public and private colleges and universities,
and technical schools; and computer science teachers and faculty.
(2) The purpose of the task force is to develop a strategic plan
with specific short and longer-term strategies to increase the number
of graduates from high schools, community and technical colleges, and
four-year colleges and universities who are prepared to enter the
workforce or continue their education in computer science.
(3) The task force must consider at least the following issues:
(a) The status and potential for improvement of computer science
education at the secondary and postsecondary level, including issues of
capacity and barriers for increased numbers of students to enroll in
advanced courses;
(b) Strategies to increase access to and success in computer
science education and careers for disadvantaged students and students
living in rural communities;
(c) Strategic opportunities for public and private investment in
increasing computer science education, including employer coinvestment
options; and
(d) Opportunities for collaboration among education providers,
public agencies, and businesses at the local, regional, and state
level.
(4) The task force must submit a report with recommendations to the
education, higher education, and labor and workforce committees of the
legislature by December 15, 2013, and submit annual status reports each
December 15th thereafter until 2016.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2017.

--- END ---