BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An entity that in the course of business makes a payment to a
construction service provider of six hundred dollars or more in a
taxable year for performing construction services shall report the
payment to the department and the construction service provider in a
manner prescribed by the department. The requirement to report
payments under this section begins with payments made in the 2014
taxable year.
(2) The report must be transmitted by the entity to the department
and the construction service provider on or before January 31st
following the taxable year the payment was made. The report must
include:
(a) The entity's name, address, and unified business identification
number;
(b) The construction service provider's name, address, and unified
business identification number; and
(c) The total amount the entity paid to the construction service
provider in the taxable year, including payments for services and for
any materials and equipment that were provided along with services.
(3)(a) The department shall transmit the report to the commissioner
of the employment security department no later than the first day of
the month following the calendar quarter the report was received. The
department may share the report, upon request, with any other local,
state, or federal government agency.
(b) Except as provided in (a) of this subsection, reports filed
under this section are confidential and exempt from public disclosure
under chapter 42.56 RCW, other than to public employees in the
performance of their official duties.
(4)(a) If the director determines that an entity has failed to file
a report or has filed an incomplete report, he or she may assess a
monetary penalty of not less than two hundred dollars and not more than
one thousand dollars per report. If the director determines that an
entity has knowingly failed to file a report or knowingly filed an
incomplete, false, or misleading report, he or she may assess a
monetary penalty of not less than one thousand dollars and not more
than five thousand dollars per report. An entity that is assessed a
penalty under this subsection shall not be permitted to bid, or have a
bid considered, on any public works contract until the penalty has been
paid in full. Penalties assessed under this subsection shall be
deposited in the general fund.
(b) An entity found to have violated this section shall, in
addition to any other penalties, be subject to the penalties in RCW
39.12.055.
(5) The requirements of this section do not apply to an entity that
does not regularly contract for construction services, as defined by
the department.
(6) The department may adopt rules to implement and enforce this
section.
(7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Construction services" includes the erection, excavation,
installation, alteration, addition, modification, repair, improvement,
demolition, deconstruction, dismantling, or removal of all or any part
of a building, structure, dock, wharf, surface, or subsurface on or
attached to any real property.
(b) "Construction service provider" means a general contractor or
specialty contractor, as defined in RCW 18.27.010, that provides
construction services regardless of whether the general contractor or
specialty contractor is registered under chapter 18.27 RCW.
(c) "Entity" includes a sole proprietor, partnership, corporation,
limited liability company, trust, association, financial institution,
governmental entity, other than the federal government, and any other
individual or group, engaged in a trade, occupation, enterprise,
governmental function, or similar activity in this state.
(d) "Payment" does not include wages paid by the entity to an
employee.
(8) Funding to implement this section must come from the public
works administration account.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.12.055 and 2009 c 197 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A contractor shall not be allowed to bid on any public works
contract for one year from the date of a final determination that the
contractor has committed any combination of two of the following
violations or infractions within a five-year period:
(1) Violated RCW 51.48.020(1) ((or)), 51.48.103, or section 1 of
this act;
(2) Committed an infraction or violation under chapter 18.27 RCW
for performing work as an unregistered contractor; or
(3) Determined to be out of compliance by the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council for working apprentices out of
ratio, without appropriate supervision, or outside their approved work
processes as outlined in their standards of apprenticeship under
chapter 49.04 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Reports filed with the department of labor and industries under
section 1 of this act are exempt from public disclosure under this
chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.12.080 and 2006 c 230 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The public works administration account is created in the state
treasury. The department of labor and industries shall deposit in the
account all moneys received from fees or civil penalties collected
under RCW 39.12.050, 39.12.065, and 39.12.070. Appropriations from the
account may be made only for the purposes of administration of this
chapter, including, but not limited to, the performance of adequate
wage surveys, and for the investigation and enforcement of all alleged
violations of this chapter as provided for in this chapter and chapters
49.48 and 49.52 RCW, and to implement the payment reporting
requirements under section 1 of this act.

--- END ---