BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.36.170 and 2005 c 2 s 6 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) For any office for which a primary was held, only the names
of the top two candidates will appear on the general election ballot;
the name of the candidate who received the greatest number of votes
will appear first and the candidate who received the next greatest
number of votes will appear second. No candidate's name may be printed
on the subsequent general election ballot unless he or she receives at
least one percent of the total votes cast for that office at the
preceding primary, if a primary was conducted. On the ballot at the
general election for an office for which no primary was held, the names
of the candidates shall be listed in the order determined under RCW
((29A.36.130)) 29A.36.131.
(((2) For the office of justice of the supreme court, judge of the
court of appeals, judge of the superior court, or state superintendent
of public instruction, if a candidate in a contested primary receives
a majority of all the votes cast for that office or position, only the
name of that candidate may be printed for that position on the ballot
at the general election.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 29A.36.171 (Nonpartisan candidates
qualified for general election) and 2004 c 271 s 170 are each repealed.

--- END ---