BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many state
requirements, while well-intentioned, do not necessarily fit the unique
circumstances of the diverse array of school districts in the state.
Washington state has a strong tradition of local control in the public
school system, and the legislature should trust the judgment of and
provide authority to locally elected officials wherever feasible.
Therefore, the legislature intends to provide a process for school
district boards of directors to waive certain state education
requirements when the local board determines it is necessary to do so.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Any school district board of directors may, as provided in this
section, waive the requirements of state statutes under this title or
administrative rules adopted under those statutes.
(2) To waive state requirements under this section, a school
district board of directors must:
(a) Hold a public hearing on the statutes or rules proposed to be
waived;
(b) Adopt a resolution that specifies the statutes or rules to be
waived, the duration of the waiver, the problem or barrier that will be
alleviated as a result of each waiver, and the expected administrative
or operational efficiency or improvement in student learning as a
result of each waiver; and
(c) Transmit a copy of the adopted resolution to the state board of
education, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and
the office of the state auditor.
(3) A school district board of directors may waive state
requirements under this section for a period not to exceed two school
years, at which time the board of directors may adopt new waivers under
the procedures specified in this section.
(4) Statutes or administrative rules pertaining to the following
state requirements may not be waived under this section:
(a) To hire, manage, and discharge any school employee in
accordance with the terms of the relevant state law and rules and the
local collective bargaining agreement, including chapters 41.56, 41.58,
and 41.59 RCW; including employing certificated instructional staff as
required in RCW 28A.410.025; and including educator evaluation
requirements under RCW 28A.405.100;
(b) To comply with the employee record check requirements in RCW
28A.400.303;
(c) To adhere to the state and federal health, safety, parents' and
students' rights, civil rights, special education, privacy, and
nondiscrimination laws, rules, and regulations;
(d) To participate in free and reduced priced meal programs to the
extent required by law;
(e) To provide the program of basic education required under RCW
28A.150.200 and 28A.150.220 as it applies to schools and school
districts, and administer the statewide assessments required under
chapter 28A.655 RCW to assess whether a student has met the state
standards;
(f) To adhere to statutes or rules associated with determining a
school district's eligibility for disbursements of state funds,
including capital funds, through state funding formulas;
(g) To adhere to laws or rules pertaining to bonded indebtedness;
(h) To meet the terms of the performance goals and reporting
requirements under RCW 28A.655.100 and 28A.655.110;
(i) To comply with state and federal student accountability
requirements;
(j) To annually adopt and file the district budget and financial
statements;
(k) To be subject to financial examinations and audits as
determined by the state auditor and the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, including audits for legal and fiscal compliance;
(l) To follow the requirements of chapter 28A.500 RCW for local
effort assistance;
(m) To adhere to the requirements for the election of school
district directors as provided in chapter 28A.343 RCW and the
requirements for school district boundaries and organization as
provided under chapter 28A.315 RCW;
(n) To adhere to the provisions of the interstate compact on
educational opportunity for military children; and
(o) To comply with state laws and administrative rules pertaining
to alternative learning experience programs.
(5) By August 1, 2013, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the professional educator standards board, and the state
board of education shall jointly publish a list of each of the statutes
under this title and administrative rules adopted under those statutes
that may be waived under this section. The list shall be updated by
August 1st of each year thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.160
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.165
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.170
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28A.180
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 28A.185
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28A.190
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 28A.193
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 28A.194
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 28A.215
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 28A.220
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 28A.225
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 28A.235
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 28A.245
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 28A.250
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 28A.325
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 28A.335
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 A new section is added to chapter 28A.340
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 A new section is added to chapter 28A.345
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 A new section is added to chapter 28A.605
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 A new section is added to chapter 28A.620
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 A new section is added to chapter 28A.623
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 A new section is added to chapter 28A.625
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 A new section is added to chapter 28A.635
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 A new section is added to chapter 28A.650
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 A new section is added to chapter 28A.700
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER--GENERAL PROVISIONS. To the extent and for
the period of time that a school district board of directors exercises
its waiver authority under section 2 of this act, that school district
is not subject to the requirements of this chapter and any related
rules that have been waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---