BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state board
of education is directed to establish an accountability index for
schools and districts that is "fair, consistent, and transparent."
However, the legislature further finds that transparency is an elusive
quality, and that the public would best be served by an accountability
index that is clear, plain, and uses the commonly understood
terminology of a letter A through F grading system to indicate the
performance of schools and school districts.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.657.110 and 2010 c 235 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall continue to refine the
development of an accountability framework that creates a unified
system of support for challenged schools, that aligns with basic
education, increases the level of support based upon the magnitude of
need, and uses data for decisions.
(2) The state board of education shall develop an accountability
index to identify schools and school districts for recognition, for
continuous improvement, and for additional state support. The index
shall be based on criteria that are fair, consistent, and transparent.
Performance shall be measured using multiple outcomes and indicators
including, but not limited to, graduation rates and results from
statewide assessments. The index shall be developed in such a way as
to be easily understood by both employees within the schools and school
districts, as well as parents and community members. The index must
identify five categories of schools and school districts, which must be
labeled using a letter A through F grading system based on relative
performance on the criteria used in the index. It is the legislature's
intent that the index provide feedback to schools and school districts
to self-assess their progress, and enable the identification of schools
with ((exemplary student)) A-level performance and those that need
assistance to overcome challenges in order to achieve ((exemplary
student)) A-level performance.
(3) The state board of education, in cooperation with the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, shall annually recognize
schools ((for exemplary)) with A-level performance as measured on the
state board of education accountability index. The state board of
education shall have ongoing collaboration with the ((achievement))
educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee
regarding the measures used to measure the closing of the achievement
gaps and the recognition provided to the school districts for closing
the achievement gaps.
(4) In coordination with the superintendent of public instruction,
the state board of education shall seek approval from the United States
department of education for use of the accountability index and the
state system of support, assistance, and intervention, to replace the
federal accountability system under P.L. 107-110, the no child left
behind act of 2001. The state system of support, assistance, and
intervention must be designed to reflect the five categories of schools
and school districts in the A through F letter grading system.
(5) The state board of education shall work with the education data
center established within the office of financial management and the
technical working group established in section 112, chapter 548, Laws
of 2009 to determine the feasibility of using the prototypical funding
allocation model as not only a tool for allocating resources to schools
and school districts but also as a tool for schools and school
districts to report to the state legislature and the state board of
education on how the state resources received are being used.

--- END ---