BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.64.280 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 20 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The marine employees' commission, created in RCW 41.58.065,
shall adjust all complaints, grievances, and disputes between labor and
management arising out of the operation of the ferry system as provided
in RCW 47.64.150.
(2) All unfair labor practice complaints, questions concerning
representation, and unit clarifications must be filed with the public
employment relations commission and processed in accordance with the
commission's rules adopted under RCW 41.58.050, except that the marine
employees' commission shall act in place of the public employment
relations commission only for appeals.
(((3) This section expires June 30, 2013.))

--- END ---