BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that transparency in
parking rates that support airport parking is critical for parking
consumers to understand what the airport parking rates are and what the
total parking charge will be, with all taxes and fees clearly
identified, when returning to claim their vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A public or private airport parking facility's parking rates
must be assessed based on a twenty-four hour day. Any parking charges
assessed that exceed one or more days, yet are less than another
twenty-four hour period, may be assessed on an hourly basis up to the
amount normally assessed for a twenty-four hour period. In addition,
for stays less than twenty-four hours, an hourly rate may be assessed
up to the amount assessed for a twenty-four hour period.
(2) The maximum standard parking rate for a public or private
airport parking facility and all taxes, fees, and surcharges must be
identified and posted at the entrance to the parking facility, or at
another prominent location at the parking facility, and on the parking
facility's web site.
(3) A public or private airport parking facility must use due
diligence in ensuring that total transparency is achieved when
communicating to a parking consumer what the total parking charge will
be when the person claims his or her vehicle from the parking facility.

--- END ---