BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.73.065 and 2012 c 152 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, taxes,
fees, charges, and tolls may not be imposed by a district without
approval of a majority of the voters in the district voting on a
proposition at a general or special election. The proposition must
include a specific description of: (a) The transportation improvement
or improvements proposed by the district; (b) any rebate program
proposed to be established under RCW 36.73.067; and (c) the proposed
taxes, fees, charges, and the range of tolls imposed by the district to
raise revenue to fund the improvement or improvements or rebate
program, as applicable.
(2) Voter approval under this section must be accorded substantial
weight regarding the validity of a transportation improvement as
defined in RCW 36.73.015.
(3) A district may not increase any taxes, fees, charges, or range
of tolls imposed or change a rebate program under this chapter once the
taxes, fees, charges, tolls, or rebate program takes effect, unless
authorized by the district voters pursuant to RCW 36.73.160.
(4)(a) A district that includes all the territory within the
boundaries of the jurisdiction, or jurisdictions, establishing the
district may impose by a majority vote of the governing board of the
district the following fees and charges:
(i) Up to ((twenty)) forty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized in
RCW 82.80.140; or
(ii) A fee or charge in accordance with RCW 36.73.120.
(b) The vehicle fee authorized in (a) of this subsection may only
be imposed for a passenger-only ferry transportation improvement if the
vehicle fee is first approved by a majority of the voters within the
jurisdiction of the district.
(c)(i) A district solely comprised of a city or cities shall not
impose the fees or charges identified in (a) of this subsection within
one hundred eighty days after July 22, 2007, unless the county in which
the city or cities reside, by resolution, declares that it will not
impose the fees or charges identified in (a) of this subsection within
the one hundred eighty-day period; or
(ii) A district solely comprised of a city or cities identified in
RCW 36.73.020(6)(b) may not impose the fees or charges until after May
22, 2008, unless the county in which the city or cities reside, by
resolution, declares that it will not impose the fees or charges
identified in (a) of this subsection through May 22, 2008.
(5) If the interlocal agreement in RCW 82.80.140(2)(a) cannot be
reached, a district that includes only the unincorporated territory of
a county may impose by a majority vote of the governing body of the
district up to ((twenty)) forty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized
in RCW 82.80.140.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.80.140 and 2010 c 161 s 917 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions of RCW 36.73.065, a transportation
benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW may fix and impose an annual
vehicle fee, not to exceed one hundred dollars per vehicle registered
in the district, for each vehicle subject to vehicle license fees under
RCW 46.17.350(1) (a), (c), (d), (e), (g), (h), (j), or (n) through (q)
and for each vehicle subject to gross weight license fees under RCW
46.17.355 with a scale weight of six thousand pounds or less.
(2)(a) A district that includes all the territory within the
boundaries of the jurisdiction, or jurisdictions, establishing the
district may impose by a majority vote of the governing board of the
district up to ((twenty)) forty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized
in subsection (1) of this section. If the district is countywide, the
revenues of the fee shall be distributed to each city within the county
by interlocal agreement. The interlocal agreement is effective when
approved by the county and sixty percent of the cities representing
seventy-five percent of the population of the cities within the county
in which the countywide fee is collected.
(b) A district may not impose a fee under this subsection (2):
(i) For a passenger-only ferry transportation improvement unless
the vehicle fee is first approved by a majority of the voters within
the jurisdiction of the district; or
(ii) That, if combined with the fees previously imposed by another
district within its boundaries under RCW 36.73.065(4)(a)(i), exceeds
((twenty)) forty dollars.
If a district imposes or increases a fee under this subsection (2)
that, if combined with the fees previously imposed by another district
within its boundaries, exceeds ((twenty)) forty dollars, the district
shall provide a credit for the previously imposed fees so that the
combined vehicle fee does not exceed ((twenty)) forty dollars.
(3) The department of licensing shall administer and collect the
fee. The department shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed one percent of the fees collected, for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The department
shall remit remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer.
The state treasurer shall distribute the proceeds to the district on a
monthly basis.
(4) No fee under this section may be collected until six months
after approval under RCW 36.73.065.
(5) The vehicle fee under this section applies only when renewing
a vehicle registration, and is effective upon the registration renewal
date as provided by the department of licensing.
(6) The following vehicles are exempt from the fee under this
section:
(a) Campers, as defined in RCW 46.04.085;
(b) Farm tractors or farm vehicles, as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and
46.04.181;
(c) Mopeds, as defined in RCW 46.04.304;
(d) Off-road and nonhighway vehicles, as defined in RCW 46.04.365;
(e) Private use single-axle trailer, as defined in RCW 46.04.422;
(f) Snowmobiles, as defined in RCW 46.04.546; and
(g) Vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW and the
international registration plan.

--- END ---