BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.26.220 and 2006 c 200 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter to the
contrary, any)) (a) The initial imposition of a benefit charge
authorized by this chapter ((is not effective unless a proposition to
impose the benefit charge is approved by a)) must be approved by sixty
percent ((majority)) of the voters of the regional fire protection
service authority voting at a general election or at a special election
called by the authority for that purpose((, held within the
authority)). ((A)) Ballot ((measure that contains)) measures
containing an authorization to impose benefit charges ((and)) that
((is)) are approved by the voters pursuant to RCW 52.26.060 ((meets))
satisfy the proposition approval requirement of this section.
(b) An election held ((under this section)) for the initial
imposition of a benefit charge must be held not more than twelve months
prior to the date on which the first charge is to be assessed.
(c) A benefit charge approved at an election expires in six
((years)) or fewer years as authorized by the voters, unless
subsequently reapproved by the voters.
(2) ((The)) Ballot measures calling for the initial imposition of
a benefit charge must be submitted so as to enable ((the)) voters
favoring the authorization of ((a regional fire protection service
authority)) benefit charges to vote "Yes" and those opposed to vote
"No." The ballot question is as follows:

"Shall . . . . . . the regional fire protection service
authority composed of (insert the participating fire protection
jurisdictions) . . . . . be authorized to impose benefit
charges each year for . . . . (insert number of years not to
exceed six) years, not to exceed an amount equal to sixty
percent of its operating budget, and be prohibited from
imposing an additional property tax under RCW 52.26.140(1)(c)?

YES NO
□ □"

(3) ((Authorities renewing the benefit charge may elect to use the
following alternative ballot)) (a) The continued imposition of benefit
charges authorized by this chapter must be approved by a majority of
the voters of the regional fire protection service authority voting at
a general election or at a special election called by the authority for
that purpose.
(b) Ballot measures calling for the continued imposition of benefit
charges must be submitted so as to enable voters favoring the continued
imposition of benefit charges to vote "Yes" and those opposed to vote
"No." The ballot question must be substantially in the following form:

"Shall . . . . . the regional fire protection service authority
composed of (insert the participating fire protection
jurisdictions) . . . . . . be authorized to continue voter-authorized benefit charges each year for . . . . (insert number
of years not to exceed six) years, not to exceed an amount
equal to sixty percent of its operating budget, and be
prohibited from imposing an additional property tax under RCW
52.26.140(1)(c)?

YES NO
□ □"

Sec. 2 RCW 52.26.230 and 2004 c 129 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Not fewer than ten days nor more than six months before the
election at which the proposition to impose the benefit charge is
submitted as provided in this chapter, the governing board of the
regional fire protection service authority, or the planning committee
if the benefit charge is proposed as part of the initial formation of
the authority, shall hold a public hearing specifically setting forth
its proposal to impose benefit charges for the support of its legally
authorized activities that will maintain or improve the services
afforded in the authority. A report of the public hearing shall be
filed with the county treasurer of each county in which the property is
located and be available for public inspection.
(2) Prior to November 15th of each year the governing board of the
authority shall hold a public hearing to review and establish the
regional fire protection service authority benefit charges for the
subsequent year.
(3) All resolutions imposing or changing the benefit charges must
be filed with the county treasurer or treasurers of each county in
which the property is located, together with the record of each public
hearing, before November 30th immediately preceding the year in which
the benefit charges are to be collected on behalf of the authority.
(4) After the benefit charges have been established, the owners of
the property subject to the charge must be notified of the amount of
the charge.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.55.092 and 1998 c 16 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The regular property tax levy for each taxing district other than
the state may be set at the amount which would be allowed otherwise
under this chapter if the regular property tax levy for the district
for taxes due in prior years beginning with 1986 had been set at the
full amount allowed under this chapter including any levy authorized
under RCW 52.16.160 or 52.26.140(1)(c) that would have been imposed but
for the limitation in RCW 52.18.065 or 52.26.240, applicable upon
imposition of the benefit charge under chapter 52.18 RCW or RCW
52.26.180.
The purpose of this section is to remove the incentive for a taxing
district to maintain its tax levy at the maximum level permitted under
this chapter, and to protect the future levy capacity of a taxing
district that reduces its tax levy below the level that it otherwise
could impose under this chapter, by removing the adverse consequences
to future levy capacities resulting from such levy reductions.

--- END ---