BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.18.050 and 1998 c 16 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Any)) The initial imposition of a benefit charge authorized
by this chapter shall not be effective unless a proposition to impose
the benefit charge is approved by a sixty percent majority of the
voters of the district voting at a general election or at a special
election called by the district for that purpose, held within the fire
protection district. An election held pursuant to this section for the
initial imposition of a benefit charge shall be held not more than
twelve months prior to the date on which the first such charge is to be
assessed: PROVIDED, That ((a)) an initial or reapproved benefit charge
approved at an election shall not remain in effect for a period of more
than six years nor more than the number of years authorized by the
voters if fewer than six years unless subsequently reapproved by the
voters.
(2) The ballot measure calling for the initial imposition of a
benefit charge shall be submitted so as to enable ((the)) voters
favoring the authorization of a fire protection district benefit charge
to vote "Yes" and those opposed thereto to vote "No," and the ballot
shall be:

"Shall . . . . . . county fire protection district No. . . . .
be authorized to impose benefit charges each year for . . . .
(insert number of years not to exceed six) years, not to exceed
an amount equal to sixty percent of its operating budget, and
be prohibited from imposing an additional property tax under
RCW 52.16.160?

YES NO

□ □"

(3) ((Districts renewing the benefit charge may elect to use the
following alternative ballot)) (a) The continued imposition of a
benefit charge authorized by this chapter must be approved by a
majority of the voters of the district voting at a general election or
at a special election called by the district for that purpose, held
within the fire protection district.
(b) Ballot measures calling for the continued imposition of a
benefit charge must be submitted so as to enable voters favoring the
continued imposition of a benefit charge to vote "Yes" and those
opposed to vote "No." The ballot question must be substantially in the
following form:

"Shall . . . . . . county fire protection district No. . . . .
be authorized to continue voter-authorized benefit charges each
year for . . . . (insert number of years not to exceed six)
years, not to exceed an amount equal to sixty percent of its
operating budget, and be prohibited from imposing an additional
property tax under RCW 52.16.160?

YES NO

□ □"

--- END ---