BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.32.730 and 2010 c 106 s 229 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (5) through (8) of this
section, for purposes of collecting or paying sales or use taxes to the
appropriate jurisdictions, all sales at retail ((shall be)) are sourced
in accordance with this subsection and subsections (2) through (4) of
this section.
(a) When tangible personal property, an extended warranty, a
digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or other service
defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 is received by the
purchaser at a business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to
that business location.
(b) When the tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital
good, digital code, digital automated service, or other service defined
as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 is not received by the purchaser
at a business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to the
location where receipt by the purchaser or the purchaser's donee,
designated as such by the purchaser, occurs, including the location
indicated by instructions for delivery to the purchaser or donee, known
to the seller.
(c) When (a) and (b) of this subsection do not apply, the sale is
sourced to the location indicated by an address for the purchaser that
is available from the business records of the seller that are
maintained in the ordinary course of the seller's business when use of
this address does not constitute bad faith.
(d) When (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection do not apply, the
sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the
purchaser obtained during the consummation of the sale, including the
address of a purchaser's payment instrument, if no other address is
available, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith.
(e) When (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection do not apply,
including the circumstance where the seller is without sufficient
information to apply those provisions, then the location ((shall be))
is determined by the address from which tangible personal property was
shipped, from which the digital good or digital code or the computer
software delivered electronically was first available for transmission
by the seller, or from which the extended warranty or digital automated
service or other service defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050
was provided, disregarding for these purposes any location that merely
provided the digital transfer of the product sold.
(2) The lease or rental of tangible personal property, other than
property identified in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, ((shall
be)) is sourced as provided in this subsection.
(a) For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic
payments, the first periodic payment is sourced the same as a retail
sale in accordance with subsection (1) of this section. Periodic
payments made subsequent to the first payment are sourced to the
primary property location for each period covered by the payment. The
primary property location ((shall be)) is as indicated by an address
for the property provided by the lessee that is available to the lessor
from its records maintained in the ordinary course of business, when
use of this address does not constitute bad faith. The property
location is not altered by intermittent use at different locations,
such as use of business property that accompanies employees on business
trips and service calls.
(b) For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic
payments, the payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
(c) This subsection (2) does not affect the imposition or
computation of sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump
sum or accelerated basis, or on the acquisition of property for lease.
(3) The lease or rental of motor vehicles, trailers, semitrailers,
or aircraft that do not qualify as transportation equipment ((shall
be)) is sourced as provided in this subsection.
(a) For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic
payments, each periodic payment is sourced to the primary property
location. The primary property location is as indicated by an address
for the property provided by the lessee that is available to the lessor
from its records maintained in the ordinary course of business, when
use of this address does not constitute bad faith. This location is
not altered by intermittent use at different locations.
(b) For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic
payments, the payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
(c) This subsection does not affect the imposition or computation
of sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump sum or
accelerated basis, or on the acquisition of property for lease.
(4) The retail sale, including lease or rental, of transportation
equipment ((shall be)) is sourced the same as a retail sale in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
(5) This subsection applies to direct mail transactions not
governed by subsection (6) of this section.
(a) This subsection (5)(a) applies to sales of advertising and
promotional direct mail.
(i) A purchaser of advertising and promotional direct mail may
provide the seller with either:
(A) A direct pay permit;
(B) A streamlined sales and use tax agreement certificate of
exemption claiming direct mail (or other written statement approved,
authorized, or accepted by the department); or
(C) Information showing the jurisdictions to which the advertising
and promotional direct mail is to be delivered to recipients.
(ii) If the purchaser provides the permit, certificate, or
statement referred to in (a)(i)(A) or (B) of this subsection (5), the
seller, in the absence of bad faith, is relieved of all obligations to
collect, pay, or remit any tax on any transaction involving advertising
and promotional direct mail to which the permit, certificate, or
statement applies. The purchaser must source the sale to the
jurisdictions to which the advertising and promotional direct mail is
to be delivered to the recipients and must report and pay any
applicable tax due.
(iii) If the purchaser provides the seller information showing the
jurisdictions to which the advertising and promotional direct mail is
to be delivered to recipients, the seller must source the sale to the
jurisdictions to which the advertising and promotional direct mail is
to be delivered and must collect and remit the applicable tax. In the
absence of bad faith, the seller is relieved of any further obligation
to collect any additional tax on the sale of advertising and
promotional direct mail where the seller has sourced the sale according
to the delivery information provided by the purchaser.
(iv) If the purchaser does not provide the seller with any of the
items listed in (a)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection (5), the sale
must be sourced according to subsection (1)(e) of this section.
(b) This subsection (5)(b) applies to sales of other direct mail.
(i) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (5)(b), sales
of other direct mail are sourced in accordance with subsection (1)(c)
of this section.
(ii) A purchaser of other direct mail may provide the seller with
either:
(A) A direct pay permit; or
(B) A streamlined sales and use tax agreement certificate of
exemption claiming direct mail (or other written statement approved,
authorized, or accepted by the department).
(iii) If the purchaser provides the permit, certificate, or
statement referred to in (b)(ii)(A) or (B) of this subsection (5), the
seller, in the absence of bad faith, is relieved of all obligations to
collect, pay, or remit any tax on any transaction involving other
direct mail to which the permit, certificate, or statement applies.
Notwithstanding (b)(i) of this subsection (5), the sale must be sourced
to the jurisdictions to which the other direct mail is to be delivered
to the recipients, and the purchaser must report and pay any applicable
tax due.
(6)(a) This subsection applies only with respect to transactions in
which direct mail is delivered or distributed from a location within
this state to a location within this state.
(b) If the purchaser of direct mail provides the seller with a
direct pay permit or a streamlined sales and use tax agreement
certificate of exemption claiming direct mail (or other written
statement approved, authorized, or accepted by the department), the
seller, in the absence of bad faith, is relieved of all obligations to
collect, pay, or remit the applicable tax on any transaction involving
direct mail to which the permit, certificate, or statement applies.
The purchaser must report and pay any applicable tax due. A
streamlined sales and use tax agreement certificate of exemption
claiming direct mail will remain in effect for all future sales of
direct mail by the seller to the purchaser until it is revoked in
writing.
(c)(i) Except as provided in (b), (c)(ii), and (c)(iii) of this
subsection (6), the seller must collect the tax according to subsection
(1)(e) of this section.
(ii) To the extent the seller knows that a portion of the sale of
direct mail will be delivered or distributed to locations in another
state, the seller must collect the tax on that portion according to
subsection (5) of this section.
(iii) Notwithstanding (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection (6), a
seller may elect to use the provisions of subsection (5) of this
section to source all sales of advertising and promotional direct mail.
(7) The following are sourced to the location at or from which
delivery is made to the consumer:
(a) A retail sale of watercraft;
(b) A retail sale of a modular home, manufactured home, or mobile
home;
(c) A retail sale, excluding the lease and rental, of a motor
vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or aircraft, that do not qualify as
transportation equipment; and
(d) Florist sales. In the case of a sale in which one florist
takes an order from a customer and then communicates that order to
another florist who delivers the items purchased to the place
designated by the customer, the location at or from which the delivery
is made to the consumer is deemed to be the location of the florist
originally taking the order.
(8)(a) A retail sale of the providing of telecommunications
services, as that term is defined in RCW 82.04.065, is sourced in
accordance with RCW 82.32.520.
(b) A retail sale of the providing of ancillary services, as that
term is defined in RCW 82.04.065, is sourced to the customer's place of
primary use of the telecommunications services in respect to which the
ancillary services are associated with or incidental to. The
definitions of "customer" and "place of primary use" in RCW 82.32.520
apply to this subsection (8)(b).
(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Advertising and promotional direct mail" means printed
material that meets the definition of direct mail, the primary purpose
of which is to attract public attention to a product, person, business,
or organization, or to attempt to sell, popularize, or secure financial
support for a product, person, business, or organization. As used in
this subsection (9)(a), the word "product" means tangible personal
property, a product transferred electronically, or a service.
(b) "Delivered electronically" means delivered to the purchaser by
means other than tangible storage media.
(c) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed
by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or
to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the
direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed
directly to the recipients. "Direct mail" includes tangible personal
property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct
mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed
material. "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed
material delivered to a single address.
(d)(i) "Other direct mail" means any direct mail that is not
advertising and promotional direct mail, regardless of whether
advertising and promotional direct mail is included in the same
mailing. The term includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Transactional direct mail that contains personal information
specific to the addressee including, but not limited to, invoices,
bills, statements of account, and payroll advices;
(B) Any legally required mailings including, but not limited to,
privacy notices, tax reports, and stockholder reports; and
(C) Other nonpromotional direct mail delivered to existing or
former shareholders, customers, employees, or agents including, but not
limited to, newsletters and informational pieces.
(ii) Other direct mail does not include the development of billing
information or the provision of any data processing service that is
more than incidental.
(e) "Florist sales" means the retail sale of tangible personal
property by a florist. For purposes of this subsection (9)(e),
"florist" means a person ((whose primary)) with at least twenty-five
percent of its business activity ((is)) related to the retail sale of
fresh cut flowers, potted ornamental plants, floral arrangements,
floral bouquets, wreaths, or any similar products, used for decorative
and not landscaping purposes, and the person derives a portion of its
gross income of the business by delivering floral products ordered by
a customer through another company.
(f) "Receive" and "receipt" mean taking possession of tangible
personal property, making first use of digital automated services or
other services, or taking possession or making first use of digital
goods or digital codes, whichever comes first. "Receive" and "receipt"
do not include possession by a shipping company on behalf of the
purchaser.
(g) "Transportation equipment" means:
(i) Locomotives and railcars that are used for the carriage of
persons or property in interstate commerce;
(ii) Trucks and truck tractors with a gross vehicle weight rating
of ten thousand one pounds or greater, trailers, semitrailers, or
passenger buses that are:
(A) Registered through the international registration plan; and
(B) Operated under authority of a carrier authorized and
certificated by the United States department of transportation or
another federal authority to engage in the carriage of persons or
property in interstate commerce;
(iii) Aircraft that are operated by air carriers authorized and
certificated by the United States department of transportation or
another federal or foreign authority to engage in the carriage of
persons or property in interstate or foreign commerce; or
(iv) Containers designed for use on and component parts attached or
secured on the items described in (g)(i) through (iii) of this
subsection.
(10) In those instances where there is no obligation on the part of
a seller to collect or remit this state's sales or use tax, the use of
tangible personal property, digital good, digital code, or of a digital
automated service or other service, subject to use tax, is sourced to
the place of first use in this state. The definition of use in RCW
82.12.010 applies to this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---