BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this
chapter applies to the state with respect to employees covered by
chapter 41.06 RCW working for the department of corrections, except
confidential employees as defined in RCW 41.80.005, members of the
Washington management service, and internal auditors.
(2) This chapter governs the collective bargaining relationship
between the state and employees working for the department of
corrections, as described in subsection (1) of this section, except as
follows:
(a) The state shall be represented by the governor or the
governor's designee who is appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW.
(b) A bargaining unit of employees within the department of
corrections existing on the effective date of this section is an
appropriate unit unless the unit does not meet the requirements of RCW
41.56.060.
(c) The exclusive bargaining representative or representatives
certified to represent the bargaining units existing at the department
of corrections on the effective date of this section shall continue as
the exclusive bargaining representative without the necessity of an
election.
(d) If an exclusive bargaining representative represents more than
one bargaining unit within the department of corrections, the exclusive
bargaining representative shall negotiate with the governor or the
governor's designee one master collective bargaining agreement on
behalf of all the employees in bargaining units that the exclusive
bargaining representative represents within the department of
corrections.
(e) Notwithstanding the definition of collective bargaining in RCW
41.56.030, the scope of collective bargaining between the
representatives of the employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative is the same as the scope of collective bargaining
described in RCW 41.80.020. The employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative shall not bargain over matters pertaining to management
rights established in RCW 41.80.040.
(f) The governor or the governor's designee and one coalition of
all the exclusive bargaining representatives subject to this section
and chapter 41.80 RCW shall conduct negotiations regarding the number
of names to be certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and
the dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee for health care
benefits as described in RCW 41.80.020.
(3) The governor or the governor's designee shall periodically
consult with the joint committee on employment relations created in RCW
41.80.010(5) regarding appropriations necessary to implement the
compensation and fringe benefit provisions in a collective bargaining
agreement and, upon completion of negotiations, advise the committee on
the elements of the agreement and on any legislation necessary to
implement the agreement.
(4) The governor shall submit a request for funds necessary to
implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions in the
collective bargaining agreement or interest arbitration award, or for
legislation necessary to implement the agreement or award. Requests
for funds necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit
provisions of bargaining agreements or interest arbitration awards
shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless such
requests:
(a) Have been submitted to the director of financial management by
October 1st before the legislative session at which the requests are to
be considered; and
(b) Have been certified by the director of financial management as
being feasible financially for the state.
(5) The legislature shall approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds as a whole. The legislature shall not consider a
request for funds to implement a collective bargaining agreement or
interest arbitration award unless the request is transmitted to the
legislature as part of the governor's budget document submitted under
RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060. If the legislature rejects or fails to
act on the submission, the agreement or award may be reopened for the
sole purpose of renegotiating the funds necessary to implement the
agreement.
(6) If, after the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of an
agreement or award are approved by the legislature, a significant
revenue shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as
declared by proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the
legislature, both parties shall immediately enter into collective
bargaining for a mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.
(7) After the expiration date of a collective bargaining agreement
negotiated under this chapter, all of the terms and conditions
specified in the collective bargaining agreement remain in effect until
the effective date of a subsequently negotiated agreement, not to
exceed one year from the expiration date stated in the agreement.
Thereafter, the employer may unilaterally implement according to law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the classes of employees listed in RCW
41.56.030(13), the provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.452 and
41.56.470, 41.56.480, and 41.56.490 also apply to the employees of the
state working for the department of corrections as described in section
1(1) of this act, subject to the following:
(1) Within ten working days after the first Monday in September of
every odd-numbered year, the governor or the governor's designee and
the bargaining representative for the appropriate bargaining unit shall
attempt to agree on an interest arbitration panel consisting of three
members to be used if the parties are not successful in negotiating a
comprehensive collective bargaining agreement. Each party shall name
one person to serve as its arbitrator on the arbitration panel. The
two members so appointed shall meet within seven days following the
appointment of the later appointed member to attempt to choose a third
member to act as the neutral chair of the arbitration panel. Upon the
failure of the arbitrators to select a neutral chair within seven days,
the two appointed members shall use one of the two following options in
the appointment of the third member, who shall act as chair of the
panel: (a) By mutual consent, the two appointed members may jointly
request the commission to, and the commission shall, appoint a third
member within two days of such a request. Costs of each party's
appointee shall be borne by each party respectively; other costs of the
arbitration proceedings shall be borne by the commission; or (b) either
party may apply to the commission, the federal mediation and
conciliation service, or the American arbitration association to
provide a list of five qualified arbitrators from which the neutral
chair shall be chosen. Each party shall pay the fees and expenses of
its arbitrator, and the fees and expenses of the neutral chair shall be
shared equally between the parties. Immediately upon selecting an
interest arbitration panel, the parties shall cooperate to reserve
dates with the arbitration panel for potential arbitration between
August 1st and September 15th of the following even-numbered year. The
parties shall also prepare a schedule of at least five negotiation
dates for the following year, absent an agreement to the contrary. The
parties shall execute a written agreement before November 1st of each
odd-numbered year setting forth the names of the members of the
arbitration panel and the dates reserved for bargaining and
arbitration. This subsection imposes minimum obligations only and is
not intended to define or limit a party's full, good faith bargaining
obligation under other sections of this chapter.
(2) The mediator or arbitration panel may consider only matters
that are subject to bargaining under section 1 of this act, and may not
consider the number of names to be certified for vacancies, promotional
preferences, and the dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee
for health care benefits.
(3) In making its determination, the arbitration panel shall be
mindful of the legislative purpose enumerated in RCW 41.56.430 and, as
additional standards or guidelines to aid it in reaching a decision,
shall take into consideration the following factors:
(a) The financial ability of the department of corrections to pay
for the compensation and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining
agreement;
(b) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(c) Stipulations of the parties;
(d) Comparison of the hours and conditions of employment of
personnel involved in the proceedings with the hours and conditions of
employment of like personnel of like state government employers of
similar size in the western United States;
(e) The ability of the state to retain employees working for the
department of corrections;
(f) The overall compensation presently received by employees of the
department of corrections, including direct wage compensation,
vacations, holidays and other paid excused time, pensions, insurance
benefits, and all other direct or indirect monetary benefits received;
(g) Changes in any of the factors listed in this subsection during
the pendency of the proceedings; and
(h) Such other factors, not confined to those listed in this
subsection, which are normally or traditionally taken into
consideration in the determination of matters that are subject to
bargaining under section 1 of this act and mediation or arbitration
under this section.
(4) The decision of an arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the funds
necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions
of the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, is not binding on
the state or the department of corrections.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.80.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 939 and 2011 1st
sp.s. c 43 s 445 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the matters
subject to bargaining include wages, hours, and other terms and
conditions of employment, and the negotiation of any question arising
under a collective bargaining agreement.
(2) The employer is not required to bargain over matters pertaining
to:
(a) Health care benefits or other employee insurance benefits,
except as required in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Any retirement system or retirement benefit; or
(c) Rules of the human resources director, the director of
enterprise services, or the Washington personnel resources board
adopted under RCW 41.06.157.
(3) Matters subject to bargaining include the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits. However,
except as provided otherwise in this subsection for institutions of
higher education, negotiations regarding the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits shall be
conducted between the employer and one coalition of all the exclusive
bargaining representatives subject to this chapter and all the
exclusive bargaining representatives subject to section 1 of this act.
The exclusive bargaining representatives for employees that are subject
to chapter 47.64 RCW shall bargain the dollar amount expended on behalf
of each employee for health care benefits with the employer as part of
the coalition under this subsection. Any such provision agreed to by
the employer and the coalition shall be included in all master
collective bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties. For
institutions of higher education, promotional preferences and the
number of names to be certified for vacancies shall be bargained under
the provisions of RCW 41.80.010(4). For agreements covering the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, any agreement between the employer and the
coalition regarding the dollar amount expended on behalf of each
employee for health care benefits is a separate agreement and shall not
be included in the master collective bargaining agreements negotiated
by the parties.
(4) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not agree to any proposal that would prevent the implementation of
approved affirmative action plans or that would be inconsistent with
the comparable worth agreement that provided the basis for the salary
changes implemented beginning with the 1983-1985 biennium to achieve
comparable worth.
(5) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not bargain over matters pertaining to management rights established in
RCW 41.80.040.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a conflict
exists between an executive order, administrative rule, or agency
policy relating to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment
and a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter,
the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A provision of a
collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the terms of a
statute is invalid and unenforceable.
(7) This section does not prohibit bargaining that affects
contracts authorized by RCW 41.06.142.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Collective bargaining negotiations between the state and
bargaining units of employees working for the department of corrections
under this chapter shall commence no later than July 1, 2014. A
collective bargaining agreement between the state and any bargaining
unit of employees working for the department of corrections entered
into under this chapter shall not be effective prior to July 1, 2015.
(2) Any collective bargaining agreement between the state and any
bargaining unit of employees working for the department of corrections
entered into under chapter 41.80 RCW before July 1, 2014, that expires
after July 1, 2014, shall, unless a superseding agreement complying
with this chapter is negotiated by the parties, remain in full force
during its duration, but the agreement may not be renewed or extended
beyond July 1, 2015. If an agreement under this chapter cannot be
reached by July 1, 2015, the terms and conditions of any collective
bargaining agreement negotiated under chapter 41.80 RCW shall remain in
effect until the effective date of an agreement under this chapter, not
to exceed one year from the expiration date stated in the agreement.
Thereafter, the employer may unilaterally implement according to law.
(3) The duration of any collective bargaining agreement between the
state and bargaining units of employees working for the department of
corrections under this chapter shall not exceed one fiscal biennium.

--- END ---