BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.28.010 and 2012 c 56 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the
following words and phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter shall
have the following meanings:
(1) "Debt adjuster," which includes any person known as a debt
pooler, debt manager, debt consolidator, debt prorater, or credit
counselor, is any person engaging in or holding himself or herself out
as engaging in the business of debt adjusting for compensation. The
term shall not include:
(a) Attorneys-at-law licensed in Washington, escrow agents,
accountants, broker-dealers in securities, or investment advisors in
securities, while performing services solely incidental to the practice
of their professions;
(b) Any person, partnership, association, or corporation doing
business under and as permitted by any law of this state or of the
United States relating to banks, consumer finance businesses, consumer
loan companies, trust companies, mutual savings banks, savings and loan
associations, building and loan associations, credit unions, crop
credit associations, development credit corporations, industrial
development corporations, title insurance companies, insurance
companies, or third-party account administrators;
(c) Persons who, as employees on a regular salary or wage of an
employer not engaged in ((the business of)) debt adjusting, perform
credit services for their employer;
(d) Public officers while acting in their official capacities and
persons acting under court order;
(e) Any person while performing services incidental to the
dissolution, winding up or liquidation of a partnership, corporation,
or other business enterprise((;
(f) Nonprofit organizations dealing exclusively with debts owing
from commercial enterprises to business creditors;
(g) Nonprofit organizations engaged in debt adjusting and which do
not assess against the debtor a service charge in excess of fifteen
dollars per month)).
(2) "Debt adjusting" means the managing, counseling, settling,
adjusting, prorating, or liquidating of the indebtedness of a debtor,
or receiving funds for the purpose of distributing said funds among
creditors in payment or partial payment of obligations of a debtor.
(3) "Debt adjusting agency" is any partnership, corporation, or
association engaging in or holding itself out as engaging in the
business of debt adjusting.
(4) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department of financial
institutions.
(6) "Financial institution" means any person doing business under
the laws of any state or the United States relating to commercial
banks, bank holding companies, savings banks, savings and loan
associations, trust companies, or credit unions.
(((5))) (7) "Third-party account administrator" means an
independent entity that holds or administers a dedicated bank account
for fees and payments to creditors, debt collectors, debt adjusters, or
debt adjusting agencies in connection with the renegotiation,
settlement, reduction, or other alteration of the terms of payment or
other terms of a debt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No person or entity may provide or attempt to provide debt
adjusting services except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) A nonprofit social service agency or a nonprofit consumer
credit counseling agency may provide debt adjusting services if the
agency is licensed by the department under this chapter.
(3) An application for the issuance or renewal of a debt adjuster
license must, at a minimum, include the following information:
(a) The name, business address, and telephone number of the
applicant;
(b) The names under which the applicant will do business;
(c) If the applicant is not a corporation that is domiciled in this
state, the name and contact information for the applicant's agent for
service of process in this state;
(d) The name, address, and contact information for any individual
or any corporation, partnership, or other business entity that owns ten
percent or more of the applicant;
(e) Proof that the applicant is organized as a nonprofit social
service agency or a nonprofit consumer credit counseling agency; and
(f) Any other relevant information required by the department.
(4) Applications for licensure must be made to the department on
forms approved by the director. A license is valid for one year and
must be renewed on or before the expiration date.
(5) The appropriate fees must accompany all applications for
original licensure and renewal.
(6) Each applicant shall file and maintain a surety bond, approved
by the director, executed by the applicant as obligor and by a surety
company authorized to do a surety business in this state as surety,
whose liability as the surety may not exceed in the aggregate the penal
sum of the bond. The director shall establish the penal sum of the
bond by rule. The bond must run to the state of Washington as obligee
for the use and benefit of the state and of any person or persons who
may have a cause of action against the obligor under this chapter. The
bond must be conditioned that: (a) The obligor will faithfully conform
to and abide by this chapter and all the rules adopted under this
chapter; and (b) the bond will pay to the state and any person or
persons having a cause of action against the obligor all moneys that
may become due and owing to the state and those persons under and by
virtue of this chapter.
(7) An applicant whose application is denied may appeal under
chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.28.080 and 2012 c 56 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By contract a debt adjuster may charge a reasonable fee for
debt adjusting services. The total fee for debt adjusting services,
including, but not limited to, any fee charged by a financial
institution or a third-party account administrator, may not exceed
fifteen ((percent of the total debt listed by the debtor on the
contract. The fee retained by the debt adjuster from any one payment
made by or on behalf of the debtor may not exceed fifteen percent of
the payment. The debt adjuster may make an initial charge of up to
twenty-five dollars which shall be considered part of the total fee.
If an initial charge is made, no additional fee may be retained which
will bring the total fee retained to date to more than fifteen percent
of the total payments made to date)) dollars per month. No fee
whatsoever shall be applied against rent and utility payments for
housing.
((In the event of cancellation or default on performance of the
contract by the debtor prior to its successful completion, the debt
adjuster may collect in addition to fees previously received, six
percent of that portion of the remaining indebtedness listed on said
contract which was due when the contract was entered into, but not to
exceed twenty-five dollars.))
(2) A debt adjuster shall not be entitled to retain any fee until
notifying all creditors listed by the debtor that the debtor has
engaged the debt adjuster in a program of debt adjusting.
(3) The department ((of financial institutions)) has authority to
enforce compliance with this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.28.090 and 1999 c 151 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a debt adjuster contracts for, receives or makes any charge
in excess of the maximums permitted by this chapter, except as the
result of an accidental and bona fide error, the debt adjuster's
contract with the debtor shall be void and the debt adjuster shall
return to the debtor the amount of all payments received from the
debtor or on the debtor's behalf and not distributed to creditors.
(2) If a person or entity performs debt adjusting services in
violation of this chapter, the contract with the debtor is void, and
the person or entity shall return to the debtor the amount of all
payments received from the debtor or on the debtor's behalf.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.28.110 and 1999 c 151 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every debt adjuster shall perform the following functions:
(1) Make a permanent record of all payments by debtors, or on the
debtors' behalf, and of all disbursements to creditors of such debtors,
and shall keep and maintain in this state all such records, and all
payments not distributed to creditors. No person shall intentionally
make any false entry in any such record, or intentionally mutilate,
destroy or otherwise dispose of any such record. Such records shall at
all times be open for inspection by the department and the attorney
general or the attorney general's authorized agent, and shall be
preserved as original records or by microfilm or other methods of
duplication for at least six years after making the final entry
therein.
(2) Deliver a completed copy of the contract between the debt
adjuster and a debtor to the debtor immediately after the debtor
executes the contract, and sign the debtor's copy of such contract.
(3) Unless paid by check or money order, deliver a receipt to a
debtor for each payment within five days after receipt of such payment.
(4) ((Distribute to the creditors of the debtor at least once each
forty days after receipt of payment during the term of the contract at
least eighty-five percent of each payment received from the debtor.
(5))) At least once every month render an accounting to the debtor
which shall indicate the total amount received from or on behalf of the
debtor, the total amount paid to each creditor, the total amount which
any creditor has agreed to accept as payment in full on any debt owed
the creditor by the debtor, the amount of charges deducted, and any
amount held in trust. The debt adjuster shall in addition render such
an account to a debtor within ten days after written demand.
(((6))) (5) Notify the debtor, in writing, within five days of
notification to the debt adjuster by a creditor that the creditor
refuses to accept payment pursuant to the contract between the debt
adjuster and the debtor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 18.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director may require a debt adjuster to file an annual
report containing information regarding the debt adjusting services
provided in the preceding calendar year. The department shall
determine by rule the information to be provided in the annual report.
The report must be submitted under oath and in the form and within the
time specified by the director.
(2) Each debt adjuster shall have its financial records relating to
debt adjusting services audited annually by a certified public
accountant. The audit must be filed with the director.
(3) After reviewing the annual report and audit filed under this
section, the director may cause an examination of the debt adjuster to
be made, the actual expense of which must be paid by the debt adjuster.
(4) The debt adjuster shall make a copy of the annual report and
audit available for public inspection at each of the debt adjuster's
locations.
(5) The director shall compile the information provided in all
annual reports filed under this section and make those results
available to the public. This information may be published only in
composite form. A debt adjuster's annual report must remain
confidential and exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.28.150 and 1999 c 151 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any payment received by a debt adjuster from or on behalf of a
debtor shall be held in trust by the debt adjuster from the moment it
is received. The debt adjuster shall not commingle such payment with
the debt adjuster's own property or funds, but shall maintain a
separate trust account and deposit in such account all such payments
received. All disbursements whether to the debtor or to the creditors
of the debtor, or to the debt adjuster, shall be made from such
account.
(2) In the event that the debtor cancels or defaults on the
contract between the debtor and the debt adjuster, the debt adjuster
shall close out the debtor's trust account in the following manner:
(a) The debt adjuster may take from the account that amount
necessary to satisfy any fees((, other than any cancellation or default
fee,)) authorized by this chapter.
(b) After deducting the fees provided in subsection (2)(a) of this
section, the debt adjuster shall distribute the remaining amount in the
account to the creditors of the debtor. The distribution shall be made
within five days of the demand therefor by the debtor, but if the
debtor fails to make the demand, then the debt adjuster shall make the
distribution within thirty days of the date of cancellation or default.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 18.28 RCW
to read as follows:
The director may conduct disciplinary proceedings, impose
sanctions, and assess fines in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW for:
(1) Providing debt adjusting services without obtaining a license
under this chapter;
(2) Contracting for, receiving, or making any charge in excess of
the maximums permitted by this chapter, except as the result of an
accidental and bona fide error; and
(3) Violating any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted
under it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 18.28 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may adopt rules to:
(1) Administer and enforce this chapter; and
(2) Establish reasonable fees to be paid by debt adjusters for the
expense of administering this chapter. The fees must be set at a
sufficient level to defray the costs of administering this chapter.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.28.165 and 1999 c 151 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of discovering violations of this chapter or
securing information lawfully required under this chapter, the
department and the office of the attorney general may at any time:
Investigate the debt adjusting business and examine the books,
accounts, records, and files used; have free access to the offices and
places of business, books, accounts, papers, records, files, safes, and
vaults of debt adjusters; and require the attendance of and examine
under oath all persons whomsoever whose testimony might be required
relative to such debt adjusting business or to the subject matter of
any examination, investigation, or hearing.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.28.190 and 1999 c 151 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or aids or
abets such violation, or any rule lawfully adopted under this chapter
or any order made under this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is
subject to a civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars and
not more than two thousand five hundred dollars for each violation.
This penalty is in addition to any other remedies provided under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The provisions of this act do not
invalidate or make unlawful contracts between debt adjusters and
debtors executed prior to the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---