BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79.10 RCW
to read as follows:
The closure of any state lands, including any roads, maintained by
the department shall not restrict access by any member of a federally
recognized tribe to any open and unclaimed lands where the tribe has a
treaty or other federally recognized right to hunt, unless the closure
is necessary for the protection of public safety in an emergency.

--- END ---