BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95N.140 and 2006 c 183 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By March 1st of the second program year and each program year
thereafter, the authority and each authorized party shall file with the
department an annual report for the preceding program year.
(2) The annual report must include the following information:
(a) The total weight in pounds of each type of covered electronic
products collected and recycled, by county, during the preceding
program year including documentation verifying collection and
processing of that material. The total weight in pounds includes
orphan products. The report must also indicate and document the weight
in pounds received from each nonprofit charitable organization
primarily engaged in the business of reuse and resale used by the plan.
The report must document the weight in pounds that were received in
large quantities from small businesses, small governments, charities
and school districts as described in RCW 70.95N.090(5);
(b) The collection services provided in each county and for each
city with a population over ten thousand including a list of all
collection sites and services operating in the state in the prior
program year and the parties who operated them;
(c)(i) A list of processors used, the weight of covered electronic
products processed by each direct processor, and a description of the
processes and methods used to recycle the covered electronic products
including a description of the processing and facility locations. The
report must also include a list of subcontractors who further processed
or recycled unwanted covered electronic products((,)) or electronic
components, ((or electronic scrap described in section 26(1) of this
act,)) including facility locations.
(ii) An estimate of the weight of each type of material recovered
as a result of the processing of recycled covered electronic products.
Recovered materials catalogued under this subsection must include, at
a minimum: Cathode ray tube glass, circuit boards, batteries, mercury-containing devices, plastics, and metals.
(iii) An estimate of the percentage, by weight, of all collected
products that ultimately are reused, recycled, or end up as residual
waste that is disposed of in another manner;
(d) ((Other documentation as established under section 26(3) of
this act;
(e))) Educational and promotional efforts that were undertaken;
(((f))) (e) The results of sampling and sorting as required in RCW
70.95N.110, including a list of the brand names of covered electronic
products by product type, the number of covered electronic products by
product type, the weight of covered electronic products that are
identified for each brand name or that lack a manufacturer's brand, and
the total weight of the sample by product type;
(((g))) (f) The list of manufacturers that are participating in the
standard plan; ((and
(h))) (g) A description of program revenues and costs, including:
(i) The total cost of the program; and (ii) the average cost of the
program per pound of covered electronic product collected;
(h) A detailed accounting of the following costs of the program:
(i) Program delivery, including: (A) Education and promotional
efforts; (B) collection; (C) transportation; and (D) processing and
labor; and (ii) program administration;
(i) A description of the methods used by the program to collect,
transport, recycle, and process covered electronic products; and
(j) Any other information deemed necessary by the department.
(3) The department shall review each report within ninety days of
its submission and shall notify the authority or authorized party of
any need for additional information or documentation, or any deficiency
in its program.
(4) All reports submitted to the department must be available to
the general public through the internet. Proprietary information
submitted to the department under this chapter is exempt from public
disclosure under RCW 42.56.270.

--- END ---