BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.523 and 2001 c 191 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "PACE" means the program of all-inclusive care for the elderly,
a managed care medicare/medicaid program authorized under sections
1894, 1905(a), and 1934 of the social security act and administered by
the department.
(b) "PACE program agreement" means an agreement between a PACE
organization, the health care financing administration, and the
department.
(2) A PACE program may operate in the state only in accordance with
a PACE program agreement with the department.
(3) A PACE program shall at the time of entering into the initial
PACE program agreement, and at each renewal thereof, demonstrate cash
reserves to cover expenses in the event of insolvency.
(a) The cash reserves at a minimum shall equal the sum of:
(i) One month's total capitation revenue; and
(ii) One month's average payment to subcontractors.
(b) The program may demonstrate cash reserves to cover expenses of
insolvency with one or more of the following: Reasonable and
sufficient net worth, insolvency insurance, or parental guarantees.
(4) A PACE program must provide full disclosure regarding the terms
of enrollment and the option to disenroll at any time to all persons
who seek to participate or who are participants in the program.
(5) The department must establish rules to authorize long-term care
clients enrolled in a PACE program to elect to continue their
enrollment in a PACE program regardless of improved status related to
functional criteria for nursing facility level of care, consistent with
42 C.F.R. Sec. 460.160(b) (2013).
(6) The department must develop and implement a coordinated plan to
provide education about PACE program site operations under this
section. The plan must include:
(a) A strategy to assure that case managers and other staff with
responsibilities related to eligibility determinations discuss the
option and potential benefits of participating in a PACE program with
all eligible long-term care clients;
(b) Requirements that all clients eligible for placement in the
community options program entry system waiver program that are age
fifty-five or over and reside in a PACE service area be referred to the
PACE provider for evaluation. The department's plan must assure that
referrals are conducted in a manner that is consistent with federal
requirements of Title XIX of the federal social security act; and
(c) Requirements for additional and ongoing training for case
managers and other staff with responsibilities related to eligibility
determinations in those counties in which a PACE program is operating.
The training must include instruction in recognizing the benefits of
continued enrollment in a PACE program for those clients who have
experienced improved status related to functional criteria for nursing
facility level of care.
(7) The department must identify a private entity that operates
PACE program sites in Washington to provide the training required under
subsection (6) of this section at no cost to the state.

--- END ---