BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The wolf interaction conflict account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. Prior to the end of each biennium, the
department must transfer to the wolf interaction conflict account the
balance of unexpended state funds authorized to be used for livestock
claims and assessment costs under section 2 of this act and
appropriated for mitigation, claims, and assessment costs for injury to
or loss of livestock submitted under RCW 77.36.100.
(b) The wolf interaction conflict account may also accept any
grants, gifts, or donations to the state for the purposes of providing
compensation for livestock damage caused by wolves and any
appropriations or fund transfers made by the legislature. The
department may accept money or personal property for the account from
persons under conditions requiring the property or money to be used
consistent with the intent of this section. All revenues provided to
the department from the sales of Washington's wolves license plates, as
defined in section 6 of this act, must also be deposited into the wolf
interaction conflict account.
(c) Expenditures from the wolf interaction conflict account may be
used only for the mitigation, prevention, assessment, and payment of
livestock losses consistent with this chapter. However, revenues from
Washington's wolves license plates may only be spent consistent with
RCW 46.68.425. Only the director or the director's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.
(2)(a) The department must maintain a list of claims submitted
under RCW 77.36.100, organized chronologically by the date wolf
predation is confirmed, for injury or loss of livestock due to wolf
predation that have not been fully paid by the department. As funding
becomes available to the department under this section, section 2 of
this act, or any other source, the department must pay claims in the
chronologic order they appear on the list. The department must
maintain, and is authorized to pay, claims that appear on the list due
to a wildlife interaction that occurred in a previous fiscal biennium.
(b) The payment of a claim included on the list maintained by the
department under this section is conditional on the availability of
specific funding for this purpose and is not a guarantee of
reimbursement.
(3) Payments on claims from the wolf interaction conflict account
are not subject to the limitations provided in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may pay up to fifty thousand dollars per fiscal
year from the state wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170 for
claims and assessment costs for injury or loss of livestock due to wolf
predation submitted under RCW 77.36.100.
(2) The department may accept and expend money from other sources
to address losses or damage to livestock or other property.
(3) Prior to the end of any biennium in which the department
expends fewer state funds from the biennial appropriation to the state
wildlife account than is authorized under subsection (1) of this
section, under the specific authority provided in this section, the
unexpended amount must be transferred to the wolf interaction conflict
account created in section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.36.100 and 2009 c 333 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as limited by RCW 77.36.070 ((and)), 77.36.080, and
section 2 of this act, the department shall offer to distribute money
appropriated to pay claims to the owner of commercial crops for damage
caused by wild deer or elk or to the owners of commercial livestock
that has been killed by bears, wolves, or cougars, or injured by bears,
wolves, or cougars to such a degree that the market value of the
commercial livestock has been diminished. Payments for claims for
damage to commercial livestock are not subject to the limitations of
RCW 77.36.070 and 77.36.080, but may not, except as provided in
sections 1 and 2 of this act, exceed the total amount specifically
appropriated therefor.
(b) Owners of commercial crops or commercial livestock are only
eligible for a claim under this subsection if:
(i) The owner satisfies the definition of "eligible farmer" in RCW
82.08.855;
(ii) The conditions of RCW 77.36.110 have been satisfied; and
(iii) The damage caused to the commercial crop or commercial
livestock satisfies the criteria for damage established by the
commission under this subsection.
(c) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria that
clarifies the damage to commercial crops and commercial livestock
qualifying for compensation under this subsection. An owner of a
commercial crop or commercial livestock must satisfy the criteria prior
to receiving compensation under this subsection. The criteria for
damage adopted under this subsection must include, but not be limited
to, a required minimum economic loss to the owner of the commercial
crop or commercial livestock, which may not be set at a value of less
than five hundred dollars.
(2)(a) The department may offer to provide noncash compensation
only to offset wildlife interactions to a person who applies to the
department for compensation for damage to property other than
commercial crops or commercial livestock that is the result of a
mammalian or avian species of wildlife on a case-specific basis if the
conditions of RCW 77.36.110 have been satisfied and if the damage
satisfies the criteria for damage established by the commission under
this subsection.
(b) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria for
damage to property other than a commercial crop or commercial livestock
that is damaged by wildlife and may be eligible for compensation under
this subsection, including criteria for filing a claim for compensation
under this subsection.
(3)(a) To prevent or offset wildlife interactions, the department
may offer materials or services to a person who applies to the
department for assistance in providing mitigating actions designed to
reduce wildlife interactions if the actions are designed to address
damage that satisfies the criteria for damage established by the
commission under this subsection.
(b) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria for
mitigating actions designed to address wildlife interactions that may
be eligible for materials and services under this section, including
criteria for submitting an application under this section.
(4) An owner who files a claim under this section may appeal the
decision of the department pursuant to rules adopted by the commission
if the claim:
(a) Is denied; or
(b) Is disputed by the owner and the owner disagrees with the
amount of compensation determined by the department.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.36.130 and 2009 c 333 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section and as limited by
RCW 77.36.100, 77.36.070, ((and)) 77.36.080, and section 2 of this act,
the cash compensation portion of each claim by the department under
this chapter is limited to the lesser of:
(a) The value of the damage to the property by wildlife reduced by
the amount of compensation provided to the claimant by any nonprofit
organizations that provide compensation to private property owners due
to financial losses caused by wildlife interactions, except that,
subject to appropriation to pay compensation for damage to commercial
livestock, the value of ((killed or injured)) commercial livestock
killed or injured by a wildlife species other than the gray wolf may be
no more than two hundred dollars per sheep, one thousand five hundred
dollars per head of cattle, and one thousand five hundred dollars per
horse; or
(b) Ten thousand dollars.
(2) The value of livestock killed or injured by a gray wolf is to
be set at the market value of the lost livestock.
(3) The department may offer to pay a claim for an amount in excess
of ten thousand dollars to the owners of commercial crops or commercial
livestock filing a claim under RCW 77.36.100 only if the outcome of an
appeal filed by the claimant under RCW 77.36.100 determines a payment
higher than ten thousand dollars.
(((3))) (4) All payments of claims by the department under this
chapter must be paid to the owner of the damaged property and may not
be assigned to a third party.
(((4))) (5) The burden of proving all property damage, including
damage to commercial crops and commercial livestock, belongs to the
claimant.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.18.200 and 2012 c 65 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Special license plate series reviewed and approved by the
department:
(a) May be issued in lieu of standard issue or personalized license
plates for vehicles required to display one and two license plates
unless otherwise specified;
(b) Must be issued under terms and conditions established by the
department;
(c) Must not be issued for vehicles registered under chapter 46.87
RCW; and
(d) Must display a symbol or artwork approved by the department.
(2) The department approves and shall issue the following special
license plates:

LICENSE PLATE DESCRIPTION, SYMBOL, OR ARTWORK

4-H Displays the "4-H" logo.

Armed forces collection Recognizes the contribution of veterans, active duty
military personnel, reservists, and members of the national
guard, and includes six separate designs, each containing a
symbol representing a different branch of the armed forces
to include army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard,
and national guard.

Endangered wildlife Displays a symbol or artwork, approved by the special
license plate review board and the legislature.

Gonzaga University alumni association Recognizes the Gonzaga University alumni association.

Helping kids speak Recognizes an organization that supports programs that
provide no-cost speech pathology programs to children.

Keep kids safe Recognizes efforts to prevent child abuse and neglect.

Law enforcement memorial Honors law enforcement officers in Washington killed in
the line of duty.

Music matters Displays the "Music Matters" logo.

Professional firefighters and paramedics Recognizes professional firefighters and paramedics who
are members of the Washington state council of
firefighters.

Share the road
Recognizes an organization that promotes bicycle safety
and awareness education.

Ski & ride Washington Recognizes the Washington snowsports industry.

State flower Recognizes the Washington state flower.

Volunteer firefighters Recognizes volunteer firefighters.

Washington lighthouses Recognizes an organization that supports selected
Washington state lighthouses and provides environmental
education programs.

Washington state parks Recognizes Washington state parks as premier destinations
of uncommon quality that preserve significant natural,
cultural, historical, and recreational resources.

Washington's national park fund Builds awareness of Washington's national parks and
supports priority park programs and projects in
Washington's national parks, such as enhancing visitor
experience, promoting volunteerism, engaging
communities, and providing educational opportunities
related to Washington's national parks.

Washington's wolves Recognizes Washington's wolf population and their special
management needs.

Washington's wildlife collection Recognizes Washington's wildlife.

We love our pets Recognizes an organization that assists local member
agencies of the federation of animal welfare and control
agencies to promote and perform spay/neuter surgery on
Washington state pets to reduce pet overpopulation.

Wild on Washington Symbolizes wildlife viewing in Washington state.

(3) Applicants for initial and renewal professional firefighters
and paramedics special license plates must show proof eligibility by
providing a certificate of current membership from the Washington state
council of firefighters.
(4) Applicants for initial volunteer firefighters special license
plates must (a) have been a volunteer firefighter for at least ten
years or be a volunteer firefighter for one or more years and (b) have
documentation of service from the district of the appropriate fire
service. If the volunteer firefighter leaves firefighting service
before ten years of service have been completed, the volunteer
firefighter shall surrender the license plates to the department on the
registration renewal date. If the volunteer firefighter stays in
service for at least ten years and then leaves, the license plate may
be retained by the former volunteer firefighter and as long as the
license plate is retained for use the person will continue to pay the
future registration renewals. A qualifying volunteer firefighter may
have no more than one set of license plates per vehicle, and a maximum
of two sets per applicant, for their personal vehicles. If the
volunteer firefighter is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
a felony, the license plates must be surrendered upon conviction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Washington's wolves license plates" means special license plates
issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display a symbol or artwork of a wolf.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.17.220 and 2012 c 65 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application for a vehicle registration in chapter 46.16A RCW, the
holder of a special license plate shall pay the appropriate special
license plate fee as listed in this section.

PLATE TYPE INITIAL FEE RENEWAL FEE DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) 4-H $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(b) Amateur radio license $ 5.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(c) Armed forces $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(d) Baseball stadium $ 40.00 $ 30.00 Subsection (2) of this
section

(e) Collector vehicle $ 35.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(f) Collegiate $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.430

(g) Endangered wildlife $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(h) Gonzaga University
alumni association $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(i) Helping kids speak $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(j) Horseless carriage $ 35.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(k) Keep kids safe $ 45.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(l) Law enforcement
memorial $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(m) Military affiliate radio
system $ 5.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(n) Music matters $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(o) Professional firefighters
and paramedics $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(p) Ride share $ 25.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(q) Share the road $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(r) Ski & ride Washington $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(s) Square dancer $ 40.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(t) State flower $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(u) Volunteer firefighters $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(v) Washington lighthouses $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(w) Washington state parks $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(x) Washington's national
parks $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(y) Washington's wolves $40.00 $30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(z) Washington's wildlife
collection $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(((z))) (aa) We love our pets $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(((aa))) (bb) Wild on
Washington $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(2) After deducting administration and collection expenses for the
sale of baseball stadium license plates, the remaining proceeds must be
distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.68.425 and 2011 c 171 s 88 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Collect special license plate fees established under RCW
46.17.220;
(b) Deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars for initial issue
and two dollars for renewal issue for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it; and
(c) Remit the remaining proceeds to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report.
(2) The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle fund until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the special license plate.
Upon determination by the department that the state has been
reimbursed, the state treasurer shall credit the remaining special
license plate fees to the following accounts by special license plate
type:

SPECIAL LICENSE PLATE TYPE ACCOUNT CONDITIONS FOR USE OF FUNDS

Armed forces RCW 43.60A.140 N/A

Endangered wildlife RCW 77.12.170 Must be used only for the department of
fish and wildlife's endangered wildlife
program activities

Keep kids safe RCW 43.121.100 ((As specified in RCW 43.121.050)) N/A

Washington state parks RCW 79A.05.059 Provide public educational opportunities
and enhancement of Washington state
parks

Washington's wolves Section 1 of this act Dedicated to the department of fish and
wildlife's preventative wolf management
efforts

Washington's wildlife collection RCW 77.12.170 Only for the department of fish and
wildlife's game species management
activities

Wild on Washington RCW 77.12.170 Dedicated to the department of fish and
wildlife's watchable wildlife activities, as
defined in RCW 77.32.560

Sec. 9 RCW 46.18.060 and 2012 c 65 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department must review and either approve or reject special
license plate applications submitted by sponsoring organizations.
(2) Duties of the department include, but are not limited to, the
following:
(a) Review and approve the annual financial reports submitted by
sponsoring organizations with active special license plate series and
present those annual financial reports to the joint transportation
committee;
(b) Report annually to the joint transportation committee on the
special license plate applications that were considered by the
department;
(c) Issue approval and rejection notification letters to sponsoring
organizations, the executive committee of the joint transportation
committee, and the legislative sponsors identified in each application.
The letters must be issued within seven days of making a determination
on the status of an application; and
(d) Review annually the number of plates sold for each special
license plate series created after January 1, 2003. The department may
submit a recommendation to discontinue a special plate series to the
executive committee of the joint transportation committee.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 46.18.245, in order to assess the
effects and impact of the proliferation of special license plates, the
legislature declares a temporary moratorium on the issuance of any
additional plates until July 1, 2013. During this period of time, the
department is prohibited from accepting, reviewing, processing, or
approving any applications. Additionally, a special license plate may
not be enacted by the legislature during the moratorium, unless the
proposed license plate has been approved by the former special license
plate review board before February 15, 2005.
(4) The limitations under subsection (3) of this section do not
apply to the following special license plates:
(a) 4-H license plates created under RCW 46.18.200;
(b) Music Matters license plates created under RCW 46.18.200;
(c) State flower license plates created under RCW 46.18.200;
(d) Volunteer firefighter license plates created under RCW
46.18.200;
(e) Washington's wolves license plates created under RCW 46.18.200.

--- END ---