BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.32.780 and 2010 c 112 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Taxpayers seeking to obtain a new reseller permit or to
renew or reinstate a reseller permit, other than taxpayers subject to
the provisions of RCW 82.32.783, must apply to the department in a form
and manner prescribed by the department and pay to the department a fee
in the amount of twenty-five dollars. The department must use its best
efforts to rule on applications within sixty days of receiving a
complete application. If the department fails to rule on an
application within sixty days of receiving a complete application, the
taxpayer may either request a review as provided in subsection (6) of
this section or resubmit the application. The fee imposed in this
subsection does not apply to applications resubmitted to the department
when the fee was paid with the original application, and the department
failed to rule on the original application within sixty days of
receiving it. Nothing in this subsection may be construed as
preventing the department from ruling on an application more than sixty
days after the department received the application.
(b) An application must be denied if:
(i) The department determines that, based on the nature of the
applicant's business, the applicant is not entitled to make purchases
at wholesale or is otherwise prohibited from using a reseller permit;
(ii) The application contains any material misstatement; ((or))
(iii) The application is incomplete; or
(iv) The application is not accompanied by the twenty-five dollar
fee required by this subsection. However, if the department denies an
application under this subsection (1)(b)(iv), the department must
reconsider and rule on the taxpayer's original application upon receipt
of the twenty-five dollar fee required by this subsection.
(c) The department may also deny an application if it determines
that denial would be in the best interest of collecting taxes due under
this title.
(d) The department's decision to approve or deny an application may
be based on tax returns previously filed with the department by the
applicant, a current or previous examination of the applicant's books
and records by the department, information provided by the applicant in
the master application and the reseller permit application, and other
information available to the department.
(e) The department must refuse to accept an application to renew a
reseller permit that is received more than ninety days before the
expiration of the reseller permit.
(f) The department may waive or cancel the fee required by this
subsection for good cause as determined by the department. For
purposes of this subsection, "good cause" does not include the
department's denial of an application under this section or financial
hardship.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the department
may issue or renew a reseller permit ((for a taxpayer that has not
applied for the permit or renewal of the permit)) to a taxpayer without
requiring the taxpayer to submit an application if: (a) It appears to
the department's satisfaction, based on the nature of the taxpayer's
business activities and any other information available to the
department, that the taxpayer is entitled to make purchases at
wholesale; and
(b) The taxpayer has paid the twenty-five dollar fee imposed in
subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, reseller
permits issued, renewed, or reinstated under this section will be valid
for a period of forty-eight months from the date of issuance, renewal,
or reinstatement.
(b)(i) A reseller permit is valid for a period of twenty-four
months and may be renewed for the period prescribed in (a) of this
subsection (3) if the permit is issued to a taxpayer who:
(A) Is not registered with the department under RCW 82.32.030;
(B) Has been registered with the department under RCW 82.32.030 for
a continuous period of less than one year as of the date that the
department received the taxpayer's application for a reseller permit;
(C) Was on nonreporting status as authorized under RCW 82.32.045(4)
at the time that the department received the taxpayer's application for
a reseller permit or to renew or reinstate a reseller permit;
(D) Has filed tax returns reporting no business activity for
purposes of sales and business and occupation taxes for the twelve-month period immediately preceding the date that the department
received the taxpayer's application for a reseller permit or to renew
or reinstate a reseller permit; or
(E) Has failed to file tax returns covering any part of the twelve-month period immediately preceding the department's receipt of the
taxpayer's application for a reseller permit or to renew or reinstate
a reseller permit.
(ii) The provisions of this subsection (3)(b) do not apply to
reseller permits issued to any business owned by a federally recognized
Indian tribe or by an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian
tribe, if the business does not engage in any business activity that
subjects the business to any tax imposed by the state under chapter
82.04 RCW. Permits issued to such businesses are valid for the period
provided in (a) of this subsection (3).
(iii) Nothing in this subsection (3)(b) may be construed as
affecting the department's right to deny a taxpayer's application for
a reseller permit or to renew or reinstate a reseller permit as
provided in subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section.
(c) A reseller permit is no longer valid if the permit holder's
certificate of registration is revoked, the permit holder's tax
reporting account is closed by the department, or the permit holder
otherwise ceases to engage in business.
(d) The department may provide by rule for a uniform expiration
date for reseller permits issued, renewed, or reinstated under this
section, if the department determines that a uniform expiration date
for reseller permits will improve administrative efficiency for the
department. If the department adopts a uniform expiration date by
rule, the department may extend or shorten the twenty-four or forty-eight month period provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection for a
period not to exceed six months as necessary to conform the reseller
permit to the uniform expiration date.
(4)(a) The department may revoke a taxpayer's reseller permit for
any of the following reasons:
(i) The taxpayer used or allowed or caused its reseller permit to
be used to purchase any item or service without payment of sales tax,
but the taxpayer or other purchaser was not entitled to use the
reseller permit for the purchase;
(ii) The department issued the reseller permit to the taxpayer in
error;
(iii) The department determines that the taxpayer is no longer
entitled to make purchases at wholesale; ((or))
(iv) The department determines that revocation of the reseller
permit would be in the best interest of collecting taxes due under this
title; or
(v) The taxpayer's payment of the twenty-five dollar fee for the
reseller permit was dishonored and remains unpaid. If the taxpayer has
an available credit on its tax reporting account, the department may
apply all or a portion of the credit to the unpaid reseller permit fee
without regard to any direction from the taxpayer.
(b) The notice of revocation must be in writing and is effective on
the date specified in the revocation notice. The notice must also
advise the taxpayer of its right to a review by the department.
(c) The department may refuse to reinstate a reseller permit
revoked under (a)(i) of this subsection until all taxes, penalties, and
interest due on any improperly purchased item or service have been paid
in full. In the event a taxpayer whose reseller permit has been
revoked under this subsection reorganizes, the new business resulting
from the reorganization is not entitled to a reseller permit until all
taxes, penalties, and interest due on any improperly purchased item or
service have been paid in full.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, "reorganize" or
"reorganization" means: (i) The transfer, however effected, of a
majority of the assets of one business to another business where any of
the persons having an interest in the ownership or management in the
former business maintain an ownership or management interest in the new
business, either directly or indirectly; (ii) a mere change in identity
or form of ownership, however effected; or (iii) the new business is a
mere continuation of the former business based on significant shared
features such as owners, personnel, assets, or general business
activity.
(5) The department may provide the public with access to reseller
permit numbers on its web site, including the name of the permit
holder, the status of the reseller permit, the expiration date of the
permit, and any other information that is disclosable under RCW
82.32.330(3)(((l))) (k).
(6) The department must provide by rule for the review of the
department's decision to deny, revoke, or refuse to reinstate a
reseller permit or the department's failure to rule on an application
within the time prescribed in subsection (1)(a) of this section. Such
review must be consistent with the requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(7) As part of its continuing efforts to educate taxpayers on their
sales and use tax responsibilities, the department will educate
taxpayers on the appropriate use of a reseller permit or other
documentation authorized under RCW 82.04.470 and the consequences of
misusing such permits or other documentation.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.32.783 and 2010 c 112 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Contractors seeking a new reseller permit or to renew or
reinstate a reseller permit must apply to the department in a form and
manner prescribed by the department and pay to the department a fee in
the amount of twenty-five dollars.
(b) As part of the application, the contractor must report the
total combined dollar amount of all purchases of materials and labor
during the preceding twenty-four months for retail construction
activity, wholesale construction activity, speculative building, public
road construction, and government contracting. If the contractor was
not engaged in business as a contractor during the preceding twenty-four months, the contractor may provide an estimate of the dollar
amount of purchases of materials and labor for retail construction
activity, wholesale construction activity, speculative building, public
road construction, and government contracting during the twelve-month
or twenty-four month period for which the reseller permit will be
valid. The contractor must also report the percentage of its total
dollar amount of actual or, if applicable, estimated material and labor
purchases that was for retail and wholesale construction activity
performed by the applicant.
(c) The department must use its best efforts to rule on
applications within sixty days of receiving a complete application. If
the department fails to rule on an application within sixty days of
receiving a complete application, the taxpayer may either request a
review as provided in subsection (6) of this section or resubmit the
application. The fee imposed in this subsection does not apply to
applications resubmitted to the department when the fee was paid with
the original application, and the department failed to rule on the
original application within sixty days of receiving it. Nothing in
this subsection may be construed as preventing the department from
ruling on an application more than sixty days after the department
received the application.
(d)(i) An application must be denied if:
(A) The department determines that the applicant is not entitled to
make purchases at wholesale or is otherwise prohibited from using a
reseller permit;
(B) The application contains any material misstatement;
(C) The application is incomplete; ((or))
(D) The application is not accompanied by the twenty-five dollar
fee required by this subsection. However, if the department denies an
application under this subsection (1)(d)(i)(D), the department must
reconsider and rule on the taxpayer's original application upon receipt
of the twenty-five dollar fee required by this subsection; or
(E) Less than twenty-five percent of the taxpayer's total dollar
amount of actual or, if applicable, estimated material and labor
purchases as reported on the application is for retail and wholesale
construction activity performed by the applicant. However, the
department may approve an application not meeting the criteria in this
subsection (1)(d)(i)(((D))) (E) if the department is satisfied that
approval is unlikely to jeopardize collection of the taxes due under
this title.
(ii) The department may also deny an application if the department
determines that denial would be in the best interest of collecting
taxes due under this title.
(iii) The department's decision to approve or deny an application
may be based on tax returns previously filed with the department by the
applicant, a current or previous examination of the applicant's books
and records by the department, information provided by the applicant in
the master application and the reseller permit application, and other
information available to the department.
(e) The department must refuse to accept an application to renew a
reseller permit that is received more than ninety days before the
expiration of the reseller permit.
(f) The department may waive or cancel the fee required by this
subsection for good cause as determined by the department. For
purposes of this subsection, "good cause" does not include the
department's denial of an application under this section or financial
hardship.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the department
may issue or renew a reseller permit ((for a contractor that has not
applied for the permit or renewal of the permit)) to a contractor
without requiring the contractor to submit an application if:
(a) The department is satisfied that the contractor is entitled to
make purchases at wholesale and that issuing or renewing the reseller
permit is unlikely to jeopardize collection of sales taxes due under
this title based on criteria established by the department by rule.
Such criteria may include but is not limited to whether the taxpayer
has a previous history of misusing resale certificates or reseller
permits or there is any other indication that issuing or renewing the
reseller permit would jeopardize collection of sales taxes due from the
contractor; and
(b) The contractor has paid the twenty-five dollar fee imposed in
subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection:
(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection, until June
30, 2013, reseller permits issued, renewed, or reinstated under this
section will be valid for a period of twelve months from the date of
issuance, renewal, or reinstatement; and
(ii) Beginning July 1, 2013, reseller permits issued, renewed, or
reinstated under this section will be valid for a period of twenty-four
months from the date of issuance, renewal, or reinstatement. However,
the department may issue, renew, or reinstate permits for a period of
twenty-four months beginning July 1, 2011, if the department is
satisfied in the same manner as set forth in subsection (2) of this
section.
(b)(i) A reseller permit is no longer valid if the permit holder's
certificate of registration is revoked, the permit holder's tax
reporting account is closed by the department, or the permit holder
otherwise ceases to engage in business.
(ii) The department may provide by rule for a uniform expiration
date for reseller permits issued, renewed, or reinstated under this
section, if the department determines that a uniform expiration date
for reseller permits will improve administrative efficiency for the
department. If the department adopts a uniform expiration date by
rule, the department may extend or shorten the twelve or twenty-four
month period provided in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection for a
period not to exceed six months as necessary to conform the reseller
permit to the uniform expiration date.
(4)(a) The department may revoke a contractor's reseller permit for
any of the following reasons:
(i) The contractor used or allowed or caused its reseller permit to
be used to purchase any item or service without payment of sales tax,
but the contractor or other purchaser was not entitled to use the
reseller permit for the purchase;
(ii) The department issued the reseller permit to the contractor in
error;
(iii) The department determines that the contractor is no longer
entitled to make purchases at wholesale; ((or))
(iv) The department determines that revocation of the reseller
permit would be in the best interest of collecting taxes due under this
title; or
(v) The contractor's payment of the twenty-five dollar fee for the
reseller permit was dishonored and remains unpaid. If the contractor
has an available credit on its tax reporting account, the department
may apply all or a portion of the credit to the unpaid reseller permit
fee without regard to any direction from the contractor.
(b) The notice of revocation must be in writing and is effective on
the date specified in the revocation notice. The notice must also
advise the contractor of its right to a review by the department.
(c) The department may refuse to reinstate a reseller permit
revoked under (a)(i) of this subsection until all taxes, penalties, and
interest due on any improperly purchased item or service have been paid
in full. In the event a contractor whose reseller permit has been
revoked under this subsection reorganizes, the new business resulting
from the reorganization is not entitled to a reseller permit until all
taxes, penalties, and interest due on any improperly purchased item or
service have been paid in full.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, "reorganize" or
"reorganization" means: (i) The transfer, however effected, of a
majority of the assets of one business to another business where any of
the persons having an interest in the ownership or management in the
former business maintain an ownership or management interest in the new
business, either directly or indirectly; (ii) a mere change in identity
or form of ownership, however effected; or (iii) the new business is a
mere continuation of the former business based on significant shared
features such as owners, personnel, assets, or general business
activity.
(5) The department may provide the public with access to reseller
permit numbers on its web site, including the name of the permit
holder, the status of the reseller permit, the expiration date of the
permit, and any other information that is disclosable under RCW
82.32.330(3)(((l))) (k).
(6) The department must provide by rule for the review of the
department's decision to deny, revoke, or refuse to reinstate a
reseller permit or the department's failure to rule on an application
within the time prescribed in subsection (1)(a) of this section. Such
review must be consistent with the requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(7) As part of its continuing efforts to educate taxpayers on their
sales and use tax responsibilities, the department will educate
taxpayers on the appropriate use of a reseller permit or other
documentation authorized under RCW 82.04.470 and the consequences of
misusing such permits or other documentation.
(8) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Contractor" means a person whose primary business activity is
as a contractor as defined in RCW 18.27.010 or an electrical contractor
as defined in RCW 19.28.006.
(b) "Government contracting" means the activity described in RCW
82.04.190(6).
(c) "Public road construction" means the activity described in RCW
82.04.190(3).
(d) "Retail construction activity" means any activity defined as a
retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2) (b) or (c).
(e) "Speculative building" means the activities of a speculative
builder as the term "speculative builder" is defined by rule of the
department.
(f) "Wholesale construction activity" means labor and services
rendered for persons who are not consumers in respect to real property,
if such labor and services are expressly defined as a retail sale by
RCW 82.04.050 when rendered to or for consumers. For purposes of this
subsection (8)(f), "consumer" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.190.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---