BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.155 and 2012 c 39 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If the department determines that a taxpayer is more than
thirty days delinquent in reporting or remitting ((spirits)) any taxes
on a tax return or assessed by the department, including any applicable
penalties and interest on such taxes, the department may request that
the liquor control board take any or all of the following actions:
Suspend the taxpayer's ((spirits)) liquor license or licenses and
refuse to renew any existing ((spirits)) liquor license held by the
taxpayer or issue any new ((spirits)) liquor license to the taxpayer.
The department must provide written notice to the affected taxpayer of
the department's request to the liquor control board.
(b) Before the department may make a request to the liquor control
board as authorized in (a) of this subsection (1), the department must
have provided the taxpayer with at least seven calendar days prior
written notice. This notice must inform the taxpayer that the
department intends to request that the liquor control board suspend the
taxpayer's ((spirits)) liquor license or licenses and refuse to renew
any existing license of the taxpayer or issue any new ((spirits))
liquor license to the taxpayer unless, within seven calendar days of
the date of the notice, the taxpayer submits any unfiled tax returns
for reporting ((spirits)) taxes and remits full payment of its
outstanding ((spirits)) tax liability, including any applicable
penalties and interest on such taxes, to the department or negotiates
payment arrangements for the unpaid ((spirits)) taxes and any
applicable penalties and interest. The notice required by this
subsection (1)(b) must include information listing any unfiled tax
returns; the amount of unpaid ((spirits)) taxes, including any
applicable penalties and interest; who to contact to inquire about
payment arrangements; and that the taxpayer may seek administrative
review by the department of the notice, and the deadline for seeking
such review. Nothing in this subsection (1)(b) requires the department
to enter into any payment arrangement proposed by a taxpayer if the
department determines that the taxpayer's proposal is not satisfactory.
(c) The department may not make a request to the liquor control
board under (a) of this subsection (((1)(a) of this section relating to
any spirits taxes that)) as long as all unpaid taxes are the subject of
pending administrative review by the department.
(2) A taxpayer's right to administrative review of the notice
required in subsection (1)(b) of this section:
(a) May be conducted under any rule adopted pursuant to RCW
82.01.060(4) or as a brief adjudicative proceeding under RCW 34.05.485
through 34.05.494; and
(b) Does not include the right to challenge the amount of any
((spirits)) taxes assessed by the department if the taxpayer previously
sought or could have sought administrative review of the assessment as
provided in RCW 82.32.160.
(3) The notices required by this section may be provided
electronically in accordance with RCW 82.32.135.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) "((Spirits)) Liquor license" has the same meaning as in RCW
66.24.010(3)(c); and
(b) "((Spirits)) Taxes" means the taxes ((imposed in RCW
82.08.150)) to which this chapter applies.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.32.080 and 2012 c 39 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When authorized by the department, payment of the tax may be
made by uncertified check under such rules as the department
prescribes, but, if a check so received is not paid by the bank on
which it is drawn, the taxpayer, by whom such check is tendered, will
remain liable for payment of the tax and for all legal penalties and
interest, the same as if such check had not been tendered.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, payment of
the tax must be made by electronic funds transfer, as defined in RCW
82.32.085. As an alternative to electronic funds transfer, the
department may authorize other forms of electronic payment, such as
payment by credit card. All taxes administered by this chapter are
subject to this requirement, except that the department may exclude any
taxes not reported on the combined excise tax return or any successor
return from the electronic payment requirement in this subsection.
(b) The department may waive the electronic payment requirement in
this subsection for any taxpayer or class of taxpayers, for good cause
or for whom the department has assigned a reporting frequency that is
less than quarterly. In the discretion of the department, a waiver
under this subsection may be made temporary or permanent, and may be
made on the department's own motion.
(c) The department is authorized to accept payment of taxes by
electronic funds transfer or other acceptable forms of electronic
payment from taxpayers that are not subject to the mandatory electronic
payment requirements in this subsection.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, returns
must be filed electronically using the department's online tax filing
service or other method of electronic reporting as the department may
authorize.
(b) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
this subsection for any taxpayer or class of taxpayers, for good cause
or for whom the department has assigned a reporting frequency that is
less than quarterly. In the discretion of the department, a waiver
under this subsection may be made temporary or permanent, and may be
made on the department's own motion.
(c) The department is authorized to allow electronic filing of
returns from taxpayers that are not subject to the mandatory electronic
filing requirements in this subsection.
(4)(a)(i) The department, for good cause shown, may extend the time
for making and filing any return, and may grant such reasonable
additional time within which to make and file returns as it may deem
proper, but any permanent extension granting the taxpayer a reporting
date without penalty more than ten days beyond the due date, and any
extension in excess of thirty days must be conditional on deposit with
the department of an amount to be determined by the department which is
approximately equal to the estimated tax liability for the reporting
period or periods for which the extension is granted. In the case of
a permanent extension or a temporary extension of more than thirty days
the deposit must be deposited within the state treasury with other tax
funds and a credit recorded to the taxpayer's account which may be
applied to taxpayer's liability upon cancellation of the permanent
extension or upon reporting of the tax liability where an extension of
more than thirty days has been granted.
(ii) The department must review the requirement for deposit at
least annually and may require a change in the amount of the deposit
required when it believes that such amount does not approximate the tax
liability for the reporting period or periods for which the extension
is granted.
(b) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer
affected by the emergency, may extend the time for making or filing any
return as the department deems proper. The department may not require
any deposit as a condition for granting an extension under this
subsection (4)(b).
(5)(((a))) The department must keep full and accurate records of
all funds received and disbursed by it. Subject to the provisions of
RCW 82.32.105, 82.32.052, and 82.32.350, the department must apply the
payment of the taxpayer in the following order, without regard to any
direction of the taxpayer: (((i))) (a) Interest; (((ii))) (b)
penalties; (((iii))) (c) fees; (((iv))) (d) other nontax amounts;
(((v))) and (e) taxes((, except spirits taxes; and (vi) spirits taxes.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "spirits taxes" has the same
meaning as in RCW 82.08.155)).
(6) The department may refuse to accept any return that is not
accompanied by a remittance of the tax shown to be due thereon or that
is not filed electronically as required in this section. When such
return is not accepted, the taxpayer is deemed to have failed or
refused to file a return and is subject to the procedures provided in
RCW 82.32.100 and to the penalties provided in RCW 82.32.090. The
above authority to refuse to accept a return may not apply when a
return is timely filed electronically and a timely payment has been
made by electronic funds transfer or other form of electronic payment
as authorized by the department.
(7) Except for returns and remittances required to be transmitted
to the department electronically under this section and except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, a return or remittance that is
transmitted to the department by United States mail is deemed filed or
received on the date shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped
upon the envelope containing it. A return or remittance that is
transmitted to the department electronically is deemed filed or
received according to procedures set forth by the department.
(8)(a) For purposes of subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
"good cause" means the inability of a taxpayer to comply with the
requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section because:
(i) The taxpayer does not have the equipment or software necessary
to enable the taxpayer to comply with subsection (2) or (3) of this
section;
(ii) The equipment or software necessary to enable the taxpayer to
comply with subsection (2) or (3) of this section is not functioning
properly;
(iii) The taxpayer does not have access to the internet using the
taxpayer's own equipment;
(iv) The taxpayer does not have a bank account or a credit card;
(v) The taxpayer's bank is unable to send or receive electronic
funds transfer transactions; or
(vi) Some other circumstance or condition exists that, in the
department's judgment, prevents the taxpayer from complying with the
requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(b) "Good cause" also includes any circumstance that, in the
department's judgment, supports the efficient or effective
administration of the tax laws of this state, including providing
relief from the requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section
to any taxpayer that is voluntarily collecting and remitting this
state's sales or use taxes on sales to Washington customers but has no
legal requirement to be registered with the department.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.03.190 and 2012 c 39 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any
person having received notice of a denial of a petition or a notice of
determination made under RCW 82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.34.110, or
82.49.060 may appeal by filing in accordance with RCW 1.12.070 a notice
of appeal with the board of tax appeals within thirty days after the
mailing of the notice of such denial or determination. In the notice
of appeal the taxpayer must set forth the amount of the tax which the
taxpayer contends should be reduced or refunded and the reasons for
such reduction or refund, in accordance with rules of practice and
procedure prescribed by the board. However, if the notice of appeal
relates to an application made to the department under chapter 82.34
RCW, the taxpayer must set forth the amount to which the taxpayer
claims the credit or exemption should apply, and the grounds for such
contention, in accordance with rules of practice and procedure
prescribed by the board. The board must transmit a copy of the notice
of appeal to the department and all other named parties within thirty
days of its receipt by the board. If the taxpayer intends that the
hearing before the board be held pursuant to the administrative
procedure act (chapter 34.05 RCW), the notice of appeal must also so
state. In the event that the notice of appeal does not so state, the
department may, within thirty days from the date of its receipt of the
notice of appeal, file with the board notice of its intention that the
hearing be held pursuant to the administrative procedure act.
(2) No person may file a notice of appeal with the board of tax
appeals to contest the amount of ((spirits)) taxes assessed ((or
asserted to be due)) by the department of revenue unless the person has
first paid the full amount of ((the contested spirits taxes. For
purposes of this subsection, "spirits taxes" has the same meaning as in
RCW 82.08.155)) all taxes assessed against the taxpayer by the
department.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.24.010 and 2012 c 39 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every license must be issued in the name of the applicant, and
the holder thereof may not allow any other person to use the license.
(2) For the purpose of considering any application for a license,
or the renewal of a license, the board may cause an inspection of the
premises to be made, and may inquire into all matters in connection
with the construction and operation of the premises. For the purpose
of reviewing any application for a license and for considering the
denial, suspension, revocation, or renewal or denial thereof, of any
license, the liquor control board may consider any prior criminal
conduct of the applicant including an administrative violation history
record with the board and a criminal history record information check.
The board may submit the criminal history record information check to
the Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the
federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search
their records for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or
individuals who filled out the forms. The board must require
fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record
information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation.
The provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of chapter 9.96A RCW do not apply to
such cases. Subject to the provisions of this section, the board may,
in its discretion, grant or deny the renewal or license applied for.
Denial may be based on, without limitation, the existence of chronic
illegal activity documented in objections submitted pursuant to
subsections (8)(d) and (12) of this section. Authority to approve an
uncontested or unopposed license may be granted by the board to any
staff member the board designates in writing. Conditions for granting
such authority must be adopted by rule. No retail license of any kind
may be issued to:
(a) A person doing business as a sole proprietor who has not
resided in the state for at least one month prior to receiving a
license, except in cases of licenses issued to dining places on
railroads, boats, or aircraft;
(b) A copartnership, unless all of the members thereof are
qualified to obtain a license, as provided in this section;
(c) A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager or
agent, unless such manager or agent possesses the same qualifications
required of the licensee;
(d) A corporation or a limited liability company, unless it was
created under the laws of the state of Washington or holds a
certificate of authority to transact business in the state of
Washington.
(3)(a) The board may, in its discretion, subject to the provisions
of RCW 66.08.150, suspend or cancel any license; and all rights of the
licensee to keep or sell liquor thereunder must be suspended or
terminated, as the case may be.
(b) The board must immediately suspend the license or certificate
of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the
department of social and health services as a person who is not in
compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet
all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension,
reissuance of the license or certificate is automatic upon the board's
receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health
services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.
(c) Upon written notification by the department of revenue in
accordance with RCW 82.08.155 (as recodified by this act) that a person
is more than thirty days delinquent in reporting or remitting
((spirits)) taxes to the department, the board must, as applicable,
suspend all ((spirits)) liquor licenses held by that person((. The
board must also)) and refuse to renew any existing ((spirits)) liquor
license of, or issue any new ((spirits)) liquor license to, the person
or any other applicant controlled directly or indirectly by that
person. The board may not reinstate a person's ((spirits)) liquor
license or renew or issue a new ((spirits)) liquor license to that
person, or an applicant controlled directly or indirectly by that
person, until such time as the department of revenue notifies the board
that the person is current in reporting and remitting ((spirits)) taxes
or that the department consents to the reinstatement or renewal of the
person's ((spirits)) liquor license or the issuance of a new
((spirits)) liquor license to the person. For purposes of this
section: (i) (("Spirits license" means any license issued by the board
under the authority of this chapter that authorizes the licensee to
sell spirits; and (ii) "spirits taxes" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.155)) "Liquor license" means any license, permit, certificate, or
other authorization issued or approved by the board under the authority
of this chapter that authorizes the sale of spirits, wine, or beer; and
(ii) "taxes" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.155 (as recodified by
this act).
(d) The board may request the appointment of administrative law
judges under chapter 34.12 RCW who must have power to administer oaths,
issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of
papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony, examine witnesses,
and to receive testimony in any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or
proceeding in any part of the state, under such rules and regulations
as the board may adopt.
(e) Witnesses are allowed fees and mileage each way to and from any
such inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding at the rate
authorized by RCW 34.05.446. Fees need not be paid in advance of
appearance of witnesses to testify or to produce books, records, or
other legal evidence.
(f) In case of disobedience of any person to comply with the order
of the board or a subpoena issued by the board, or any of its members,
or administrative law judges, or on the refusal of a witness to testify
to any matter regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated,
the judge of the superior court of the county in which the person
resides, on application of any member of the board or administrative
law judge, must compel obedience by contempt proceedings, as in the
case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from said
court or a refusal to testify therein.
(4) Upon receipt of notice of the suspension or cancellation of a
license, the licensee must forthwith deliver up the license to the
board. Where the license has been suspended only, the board must
return the license to the licensee at the expiration or termination of
the period of suspension. The board must notify all vendors in the
city or place where the licensee has its premises of the suspension or
cancellation of the license; and no employee may allow or cause any
liquor to be delivered to or for any person at the premises of that
licensee.
(5)(a) At the time of the original issuance of a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license, the board must prorate the license fee charged
to the new licensee according to the number of calendar quarters, or
portion thereof, remaining until the first renewal of that license is
required.
(b) Unless sooner canceled, every license issued by the board must
expire at midnight of the thirtieth day of June of the fiscal year for
which it was issued. However, if the board deems it feasible and
desirable to do so, it may establish, by rule pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW, a system for staggering the annual renewal dates for any and all
licenses authorized by this chapter. If such a system of staggered
annual renewal dates is established by the board, the license fees
provided by this chapter must be appropriately prorated during the
first year that the system is in effect.
(6) Every license issued under this section is subject to all
conditions and restrictions imposed by this title or by rules adopted
by the board. All conditions and restrictions imposed by the board in
the issuance of an individual license may be listed on the face of the
individual license along with the trade name, address, and expiration
date. Conditions and restrictions imposed by the board may also be
included in official correspondence separate from the license. All
((spirits)) liquor licenses are subject to the condition that the
((spirits)) liquor license holder must report and remit to the
department of revenue all ((spirits)) taxes by the date due.
(7) Every licensee must post and keep posted its license, or
licenses, and any additional correspondence containing conditions and
restrictions imposed by the board in a conspicuous place on the
premises.
(8)(a) Unless (b) of this subsection applies, before the board
issues a new or renewal license to an applicant it must give notice of
such application to the chief executive officer of the incorporated
city or town, if the application is for a license within an
incorporated city or town, or to the county legislative authority, if
the application is for a license outside the boundaries of incorporated
cities or towns.
(b) If the application for a special occasion license is for an
event held during a county, district, or area fair as defined by RCW
15.76.120, and the county, district, or area fair is located on
property owned by the county but located within an incorporated city or
town, the county legislative authority must be the entity notified by
the board under (a) of this subsection. The board must send a
duplicate notice to the incorporated city or town within which the fair
is located.
(c) The incorporated city or town through the official or employee
selected by it, or the county legislative authority or the official or
employee selected by it, has the right to file with the board within
twenty days after the date of transmittal of such notice for
applications, or at least thirty days prior to the expiration date for
renewals, written objections against the applicant or against the
premises for which the new or renewal license is asked. The board may
extend the time period for submitting written objections.
(d) The written objections must include a statement of all facts
upon which such objections are based, and in case written objections
are filed, the city or town or county legislative authority may request
and the liquor control board may in its discretion hold a hearing
subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If the board
makes an initial decision to deny a license or renewal based on the
written objections of an incorporated city or town or county
legislative authority, the applicant may request a hearing subject to
the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If such a hearing is held
at the request of the applicant, liquor control board representatives
must present and defend the board's initial decision to deny a license
or renewal.
(e) Upon the granting of a license under this title the board must
send written notification to the chief executive officer of the
incorporated city or town in which the license is granted, or to the
county legislative authority if the license is granted outside the
boundaries of incorporated cities or towns. When the license is for a
special occasion license for an event held during a county, district,
or area fair as defined by RCW 15.76.120, and the county, district, or
area fair is located on county-owned property but located within an
incorporated city or town, the written notification must be sent to
both the incorporated city or town and the county legislative
authority.
(9)(a) Before the board issues any license to any applicant, it
shall give (i) due consideration to the location of the business to be
conducted under such license with respect to the proximity of churches,
schools, and public institutions and (ii) written notice, with receipt
verification, of the application to public institutions identified by
the board as appropriate to receive such notice, churches, and schools
within five hundred feet of the premises to be licensed. The board may
not issue a liquor license for either on-premises or off-premises
consumption covering any premises not now licensed, if such premises
are within five hundred feet of the premises of any tax-supported
public elementary or secondary school measured along the most direct
route over or across established public walks, streets, or other public
passageway from the main entrance of the school to the nearest public
entrance of the premises proposed for license, and if, after receipt by
the school of the notice as provided in this subsection, the board
receives written objection, within twenty days after receiving such
notice, from an official representative or representatives of the
school within five hundred feet of said proposed licensed premises,
indicating to the board that there is an objection to the issuance of
such license because of proximity to a school. The board may extend
the time period for submitting objections. For the purpose of this
section, "church" means a building erected for and used exclusively for
religious worship and schooling or other activity in connection
therewith. For the purpose of this section, "public institution" means
institutions of higher education, parks, community centers, libraries,
and transit centers.
(b) No liquor license may be issued or reissued by the board to any
motor sports facility or licensee operating within the motor sports
facility unless the motor sports facility enforces a program reasonably
calculated to prevent alcohol or alcoholic beverages not purchased
within the facility from entering the facility and such program is
approved by local law enforcement agencies.
(c) It is the intent under this subsection (9) that a retail
license may not be issued by the board where doing so would, in the
judgment of the board, adversely affect a private school meeting the
requirements for private schools under Title 28A RCW, which school is
within five hundred feet of the proposed licensee. The board must
fully consider and give substantial weight to objections filed by
private schools. If a license is issued despite the proximity of a
private school, the board must state in a letter addressed to the
private school the board's reasons for issuing the license.
(10) The restrictions set forth in subsection (9) of this section
do not prohibit the board from authorizing the assumption of existing
licenses now located within the restricted area by other persons or
licenses or relocations of existing licensed premises within the
restricted area. In no case may the licensed premises be moved closer
to a church or school than it was before the assumption or relocation.
(11)(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the board, in its
discretion, from issuing a temporary retail or distributor license to
an applicant to operate the retail or distributor premises during the
period the application for the license is pending. The board may
establish a fee for a temporary license by rule.
(b) A temporary license issued by the board under this section must
be for a period not to exceed sixty days. A temporary license may be
extended at the discretion of the board for additional periods of sixty
days upon payment of an additional fee and upon compliance with all
conditions required in this section.
(c) Refusal by the board to issue or extend a temporary license
shall not entitle the applicant to request a hearing. A temporary
license may be canceled or suspended summarily at any time if the board
determines that good cause for cancellation or suspension exists. RCW
66.08.130 applies to temporary licenses.
(d) Application for a temporary license must be on such form as the
board shall prescribe. If an application for a temporary license is
withdrawn before issuance or is refused by the board, the fee which
accompanied such application must be refunded in full.
(12) In determining whether to grant or deny a license or renewal
of any license, the board must give substantial weight to objections
from an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority based
upon chronic illegal activity associated with the applicant's
operations of the premises proposed to be licensed or the applicant's
operation of any other licensed premises, or the conduct of the
applicant's patrons inside or outside the licensed premises. "Chronic
illegal activity" means (a) a pervasive pattern of activity that
threatens the public health, safety, and welfare of the city, town, or
county including, but not limited to, open container violations,
assaults, disturbances, disorderly conduct, or other criminal law
violations, or as documented in crime statistics, police reports,
emergency medical response data, calls for service, field data, or
similar records of a law enforcement agency for the city, town, county,
or any other municipal corporation or any state agency; or (b) an
unreasonably high number of citations for violations of RCW 46.61.502
associated with the applicant's or licensee's operation of any licensed
premises as indicated by the reported statements given to law
enforcement upon arrest.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.08.150 and 2012 c 39 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The action, order, or decision of the board as to any denial of an
application for the reissuance of a permit or license or as to any
revocation, suspension, or modification of any permit or license must
be an adjudicative proceeding and subject to the applicable provisions
of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(1) An opportunity for a hearing may be provided an applicant for
the reissuance of a permit or license prior to the disposition of the
application, and if no such opportunity for a prior hearing is provided
then an opportunity for a hearing to reconsider the application must be
provided the applicant.
(2) An opportunity for a hearing must be provided a permittee or
licensee prior to a revocation or modification of any permit or license
and, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, prior to the
suspension of any permit or license.
(3) No hearing may be required until demanded by the applicant,
permittee, or licensee.
(4) The board may summarily suspend a license or permit for a
period of up to one hundred eighty days without a prior hearing if it
finds that public health, safety, or welfare imperatively require
emergency action, and it incorporates a finding to that effect in its
order. Proceedings for revocation or other action must be promptly
instituted and determined. An administrative law judge may extend the
summary suspension period for up to one calendar year in the event the
proceedings for revocation or other action cannot be completed during
the initial one hundred eighty day period due to actions by the
licensee or permittee. The board's enforcement division must complete
a preliminary staff investigation of the violation before requesting an
emergency suspension by the board.
(5) The issues that may be considered at a hearing to contest a
suspension of a license or the denial of an application for a new
license or renewal of an existing license, under RCW 66.24.010(3)(c),
do not include the right to challenge the amount of any ((spirits))
taxes assessed against the licensee or applicant by the department of
revenue. For purposes of this subsection, "((spirits)) taxes" has the
same meaning as in RCW 82.08.155 (as recodified by this act).

Sec. 6 RCW 34.05.422 and 2012 c 39 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise provided by law: (a) Applications for rate
changes and uncontested applications for licenses may, in the agency's
discretion, be conducted as adjudicative proceedings; (b) applications
for licenses that are contested by a person having standing to contest
under the law and review of denials of applications for licenses or
rate changes must be conducted as adjudicative proceedings; and (c) an
agency may not revoke, suspend, or modify a license unless the agency
gives notice of an opportunity for an appropriate adjudicative
proceeding in accordance with this chapter or other statute.
(2) An agency with authority to grant or deny a professional or
occupational license must notify an applicant for a new or renewal
license not later than twenty days prior to the date of the examination
required for that license of any grounds for denial of the license
which are based on specific information disclosed in the application
submitted to the agency. The agency must notify the applicant either
that the license is denied or that the decision to grant or deny the
license will be made at a future date. If the agency fails to give the
notification prior to the examination and the applicant is denied
licensure, the examination fee must be refunded to the applicant. If
the applicant takes the examination, the agency must notify the
applicant of the result.
(3) When a licensee has made timely and sufficient application for
the renewal of a license or a new license with reference to any
activity of a continuing nature, an existing full, temporary, or
provisional license does not expire until the application has been
finally determined by the agency, and, in case the application is
denied or the terms of the new license limited, until the last day for
seeking review of the agency order or a later date fixed by order of
the reviewing court.
(4) If the agency finds that public health, safety, or welfare
imperatively requires emergency action, and incorporates a finding to
that effect in its order, summary suspension of a license may be
ordered pending proceedings for revocation or other action. These
proceedings must be promptly instituted and determined.
(5) This section does not apply to requests made by the department
of revenue, under the authority of RCW 82.08.155 (as recodified by this
act), to the liquor control board to suspend a person's ((spirits))
liquor license and to refuse to renew any ((spirits)) liquor license
held by the person and to issue any new ((spirits)) liquor license to
the person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RCW 82.08.155 is recodified as a section in
chapter 82.32 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act must be
liberally construed to effectuate the intent of the legislature to
provide for the effective collection of taxes by the department of
revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---