BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95N.020 and 2006 c 183 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means the Washington materials management and
financing authority created under RCW 70.95N.280.
(2) "Authorized party" means a manufacturer who submits an
individual independent plan or the entity authorized to submit an
independent plan for more than one manufacturer.
(3) "Board" means the board of directors of the Washington
materials management and financing authority created under RCW
70.95N.290.
(4) "Collector" means an entity licensed to do business in the
state that gathers unwanted covered electronic products from
households, small businesses, school districts, small governments, and
charities for the purpose of recycling and meets minimum standards that
may be developed by the department.
(5) "Contract for services" means an instrument executed by the
authority and one or more persons or entities that delineates
collection, transportation, and recycling services, in whole or in
part, that will be provided to the citizens of the state within service
areas as described in the approved standard plan.
(6) "Covered electronic product" includes a cathode ray tube or
flat panel computer monitor having a viewable area greater than four
inches when measured diagonally, a desktop computer, a laptop or a
portable computer, or a cathode ray tube or flat panel television
having a viewable area greater than four inches when measured
diagonally that has been used in the state by any covered entity
regardless of original point of purchase. "Covered electronic product"
does not include: (a) A motor vehicle or replacement parts for use in
motor vehicles or aircraft, or any computer, computer monitor, or
television that is contained within, and is not separate from, the
motor vehicle or aircraft; (b) monitoring and control instruments or
systems; (c) medical devices; (d) products including materials intended
for use as ingredients in those products as defined in the federal
food, drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.) or the virus-serum-toxin act of 1913 (21 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.), and regulations
issued under those acts; (e) equipment used in the delivery of patient
care in a health care setting; (f) a computer, computer monitor, or
television that is contained within a clothes washer, clothes dryer,
refrigerator, refrigerator and freezer, microwave oven, conventional
oven or range, dishwasher, room air conditioner, dehumidifier, or air
purifier; or (g) hand-held portable voice or data devices used for
commercial mobile services as defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 332 (d)(1).
(7) "Covered entity" means any household, charity, school district,
small business, or small government located in Washington state.
(8) "Curbside service" means a collection service providing
regularly scheduled pickup of covered electronic products from
households or other covered entities in quantities generated from
households.
(9) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(10) "Electronic product" includes a cathode ray tube or flat panel
computer monitor having a viewable area greater than four inches when
measured diagonally; a desktop computer; a laptop or a portable
computer; or a cathode ray tube or flat screen television having a
viewable area greater than four inches when measured diagonally.
(11) "Equivalent share" means the weight in pounds of covered
electronic products identified for an individual manufacturer under
this chapter as determined by the department under RCW 70.95N.200.
(12) "Household" means a single detached dwelling unit or a single
unit of a multiple dwelling unit and appurtenant structures.
(13) "Independent plan" means a plan for the collection,
transportation, and recycling of unwanted covered electronic products
that is developed, implemented, and financed by an individual
manufacturer or by an authorized party.
(14) "Manufacturer" means any person, in business or no longer in
business but having a successor in interest, who, irrespective of the
selling technique used, including by means of distance or remote sale:
(a) Manufactures or has manufactured a covered electronic product
under its own brand names for sale in or into this state. However, a
licensor is not considered a manufacturer for the purposes of this
chapter;
(b) Assembles or has assembled a covered electronic product that
uses parts manufactured by others for sale in or into this state under
the assembler's brand names;
(c) Resells or has resold in or into this state under its own brand
names a covered electronic product produced by other suppliers,
including retail establishments that sell covered electronic products
under their own brand names;
(d) Manufactures or manufactured a cobranded product for sale in or
into this state that carries the name of both the manufacturer and a
retailer;
(e) Imports or has imported a covered electronic product into the
United States that is sold in or into this state. However, if the
imported covered electronic product is manufactured by any person with
a presence in the United States meeting the criteria of manufacturer
under (a) through (d) of this subsection, that person is the
manufacturer. For purposes of this subsection, "presence" means any
person that performs activities conducted under the standards
established for interstate commerce under the commerce clause of the
United States Constitution; or
(f) Sells at retail a covered electronic product acquired from an
importer that is the manufacturer as described in (e) of this
subsection, and elects to register in lieu of the importer as the
manufacturer for those products.
(15) "New entrant" means: (a) A manufacturer of televisions that
have been sold in the state for less than ten years; or (b) a
manufacturer of desktop computers, laptop and portable computers, or
computer monitors that have been sold in the state for less than five
years. However, a manufacturer of both televisions and computers or a
manufacturer of both televisions and computer monitors that is deemed
a new entrant under either only (a) or (b) of this subsection is not
considered a new entrant for purposes of this chapter.
(16) "Orphan product" means a covered electronic product that lacks
a manufacturer's brand or for which the manufacturer is no longer in
business and has no successor in interest.
(17) "Plan's equivalent share" means the weight in pounds of
covered electronic products for which a plan is responsible. A plan's
equivalent share is equal to the sum of the equivalent shares of each
manufacturer participating in that plan.
(18) "Plan's return share" means the sum of the return shares of
each manufacturer participating in that plan.
(19) "Premium service" means services such as at-location system
upgrade services provided to covered entities and at-home pickup
services offered to households. "Premium service" does not include
curbside service.
(20) "Processor" means an entity engaged in disassembling,
dismantling, or shredding electronic products to recover materials
contained in the electronic products and prepare those materials for
reclaiming or reuse in new products in accordance with processing
standards established by this chapter and by the department. A
processor may also salvage parts to be used in new products.
(21) "Product type" means one of the following categories:
Computer monitors; desktop computers; laptop and portable computers;
and televisions.
(22) "Program" means the collection, transportation, and recycling
activities conducted to implement an independent plan or the standard
plan.
(23) "Program year" means each full calendar year after the program
has been initiated.
(24) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing unwanted
electronic products, components, and by-products into usable or
marketable materials for use other than landfill disposal or
incineration. "Recycling" does not include energy recovery or energy
generation by means of combusting unwanted electronic products,
components, and by-products with or without other waste. Smelting of
electronic materials to recover metals for reuse in conformance with
all applicable laws and regulations is not considered disposal or
energy recovery.
(25) "Retailer" means a person who offers covered electronic
products for sale at retail through any means including, but not
limited to, remote offerings such as sales outlets, catalogs, or the
internet, but does not include a sale that is a wholesale transaction
with a distributor or a retailer.
(26) "Return share" means the percentage of covered electronic
products by weight identified for an individual manufacturer, as
determined by the department under RCW 70.95N.190.
(27) "Reuse" means any operation by which an electronic product or
a component of a covered electronic product changes ownership and is
used for the same purpose for which it was originally purchased.
(28) "Small business" means a business employing less than fifty
people.
(29) "Small government" means a city in the state with a population
less than fifty thousand, a county in the state with a population less
than one hundred twenty-five thousand, and special purpose districts in
the state.
(30) "Standard plan" means the plan for the collection,
transportation, and recycling of unwanted covered electronic products
developed, implemented, and financed by the authority on behalf of
manufacturers participating in the authority.
(31) "Transporter" means an entity that transports covered
electronic products from collection sites or services to processors or
other locations for the purpose of recycling, but does not include any
entity or person that hauls their own unwanted electronic products.
(32) "Unwanted electronic product" means a covered electronic
product that has been discarded or is intended to be discarded by its
owner.
(33) "White box manufacturer" means a person who manufactured
unbranded covered electronic products offered for sale in the state
within ten years prior to a program year for televisions or within five
years prior to a program year for desktop computers, laptop or portable
computers, or computer monitors.
(34) "Licensor" means any person, in business or no longer in
business but having a successor in interest, who either directly
licenses or licenses through its affiliates names, images, or
intellectual property to a manufacturer of covered electronic products
but who does not personally manufacture, assemble, or resell covered
electronic products. A licensor may not be considered a manufacturer
of covered electronic products.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.95N.030 and 2006 c 183 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A manufacturer must participate in an independent plan or the
standard plan to implement and finance the collection, transportation,
and recycling of covered electronic products. A licensor is not
required to participate in an independent plan or standard plan.
(2) An independent plan or the standard plan must be implemented
and fully operational no later than January 1, 2009.
(3) The manufacturers participating in an approved plan are
responsible for covering all administrative and operational costs
associated with the collection, transportation, and recycling of their
plan's equivalent share of covered electronic products. If costs are
passed on to consumers, it must be done without any fees at the time
the unwanted electronic product is delivered or collected for
recycling. However, this does not prohibit collectors providing
premium or curbside services from charging customers a fee for the
additional collection cost of providing this service, when funding for
collection provided by an independent plan or the standard plan does
not fully cover the cost of that service.
(4) Nothing in this chapter changes or limits the authority of the
Washington utilities and transportation commission to regulate
collection of solid waste in the state of Washington, including
curbside collection of residential recyclable materials, nor does this
chapter change or limit the authority of a city or town to provide such
service itself or by contract pursuant to RCW 81.77.020.
(5) Manufacturers are encouraged to collaborate with electronic
product retailers, certificated waste haulers, processors, recyclers,
charities, and local governments within the state in the development
and implementation of their plans.

--- END ---