BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.52.112 and 2005 c 2 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A primary is a first stage in the public process by which
voters elect candidates to public office.
(2) Whenever candidates for a partisan office are to be elected,
the general election must be preceded by a primary conducted under this
chapter. Based upon votes cast at the primary, the top two candidates
will be certified as qualified to appear on the general election
ballot, unless only one candidate qualifies as provided in RCW
((29A.36.170)) 29A.36.171.
(3) For partisan office, if a candidate has expressed a party or
independent preference on the declaration of candidacy, then that
preference will be shown after the name of the candidate on the primary
and general election ballots by appropriate abbreviation as set forth
in rules of the secretary of state. A candidate may express no party
or independent preference. Any party or independent preferences are
shown for the information of voters only and may in no way limit the
options available to voters.
(4) No primary may be held for any single position in any partisan
primary, as required by RCW 29A.52.111, if, after the last day allowed
for candidates to withdraw, only one candidate files for the position.
The county auditor must, as soon as possible, notify the candidate so
affected that the office for which he or she filed will not appear on
the primary ballot.

--- END ---