BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS AND DECLARATION OF PURPOSE. (1)
The legislature finds that historically governmental and
nongovernmental water purveyors have played two key public service
roles: Providing safe drinking water and providing water for fire
protection. This dual function approach is a deeply embedded and
state-regulated feature of water system planning, engineering,
operation, and maintenance. This dual function enables purveyors to
provide these critical public services in a cost-effective way that
protects public health and safety, promotes economic development, and
supports appropriate land use planning.
(2) The legislature finds that the provision of integrated, dual
function water facilities and services benefits all customers of a
purveyor, similar to other benefits provided to water system customers
in response to regulation regarding safe drinking water such as
treatment and water quality monitoring.
(3) The legislature finds that water purveyors plan, construct,
acquire, operate, and maintain fire suppression water facilities in
response to regulatory requirements, including without limitation the
public water system coordination act, RCW 70.116.080, the design of
public water systems and water system operations requirements, chapter
246-290 WAC, Parts 3 and 5, the state building code, chapter 19.27 RCW,
and the international fire code. The availability of infrastructure
and water to fight fires allows for the development and habitability of
property, increases property values, and benefits customers and
property through lower casualty insurance rates.
(4) The legislature finds that recent Washington supreme court
decisions, including Lane v. City of Seattle, 164 Wn.2d 875 (2008), and
City of Tacoma v. City of Bonney Lake, et al., 173 Wn.2d 584 (2012),
have created uncertainty and confusion as to the role,
responsibilities, cost allocation, and recovery authority of water
purveyors. If left unresolved, the absence of legal clarity will
adversely affect the availability and condition of fire suppression
infrastructure necessary to protect life and property.
(5) It is the legislature's intent to determine appropriate methods
of organizing public services and the authority of water purveyors with
respect to critical public services. The legislature further intends
this chapter to clarify the authority of water purveyors to provide
fire suppression water facilities and services and to recover the costs
for those facilities and services. The legislature also intends to
provide liability protections appropriate for water purveyors engaged
in this vital public service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Fire suppression water facilities" means water supply
transmission and distribution facilities, interties, pipes, valves,
control systems, lines, storage, pumps, fire hydrants, and other
facilities, or any part thereof, used or usable for the delivery of
water for fire suppression purposes.
(2) "Fire suppression water services" or "services" means operation
and maintenance of fire suppression water facilities and the delivery
of water for fire suppression purposes.
(3) "Municipal corporation" means any city, town, county, water-sewer district, port district, public utility district, irrigation
district, and any other municipal corporation, quasi-municipal
corporation, or political subdivision of the state.
(4) "Purveyor" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW
70.116.030(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 COST ALLOCATION AND RECOVERY. A purveyor
may allocate and recover the costs of fire suppression water facilities
and services from all customers as costs of complying with state laws
and regulations, or from customers based on service to, benefits
conferred upon, and burdens and impacts caused by various classes of
customers, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 CONTRACTS TO PROVIDE FOR FACILITIES AND
SERVICES. A city, town, or county may contract with purveyors for the
provision of fire suppression water facilities, services, or both. The
contract may take the form of a franchise agreement, an interlocal
agreement pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW, or an agreement under other
contracting authority, and may provide for funding or cost recovery of
fire suppression water facilities, services, or both, as the parties
may agree.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 PAYMENT BY COUNTIES. A county is not
required to pay for fire suppression water facilities or services
except: (1) As a customer of a purveyor; (2) in areas where a county
is acting as a purveyor; or (3) where a county has agreed to do so
consistent with section 4 of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 LIABILITY PROTECTION FOR FIRE SUPPRESSION
WATER FACILITIES AND SERVICES. (1) A purveyor that is a municipal
corporation is not liable for any damages that arise out of a fire
event and relate to the operation, maintenance, and provision of fire
suppression water facilities and services that are located within or
outside its corporate boundaries.
(2) A purveyor that is not a municipal corporation is not liable
for any damages that arise out of a fire event and relate to the
operation, maintenance, and provision of fire suppression water
facilities and services if the purveyor has a description of fire
hydrant maintenance measures. The description of fire hydrant
maintenance measures must be kept on file by the water purveyor and be
available to the public, and may be included within the purveyor's most
recently approved water system plan or small water system management
program.
(3) Consistent with RCW 36.55.060, with respect to counties and
notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, agreements or franchises may, as the parties mutually agree,
include indemnification, hold harmless, or other risk management
provisions under which purveyors indemnify and hold harmless cities,
towns, and counties against damages arising from fire suppression
activities during fire events. Such provisions are unaffected by
subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 LIBERAL CONSTRUCTION. This chapter is
exempted from the rule of strict construction and must be liberally
construed to give full effect to the objectives and purposes for which
it was enacted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 POWERS CONFERRED BY CHAPTER ARE
SUPPLEMENTAL. (1) The powers and authority conferred by this chapter
are supplemental to powers and authority conferred by other law, and
nothing contained in this chapter may be construed as limiting any
other powers or authority of any municipal corporation or other entity
under applicable law.
(2) As to water companies that are regulated by the utilities and
transportation commission under Title 80 RCW, nothing in this chapter
is intended to change or limit the authority or jurisdiction of the
utilities and transportation commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RATIFICATION OF PRIOR ACTS. To the extent
that they provide for or address funding, cost allocation, and recovery
of fire suppression water facilities and services, all ordinances,
resolutions, and contracts adopted, entered, implemented, or performed
prior to the effective date of this section are hereby validated,
ratified, and confirmed. This chapter must not affect or impair any
ordinance, resolution, or contract lawfully entered into prior to the
effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 CODIFICATION. Sections 1 through 9 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---