BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The taxes imposed by this chapter do not apply to amounts received
by the Washington health benefit exchange established under chapter
43.71 RCW from the state of Washington or the federal government.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.71.010 and 2012 c 87 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise. Terms and phrases used
in this chapter that are not defined in this section must be defined as
consistent with implementation of a state health benefit exchange
pursuant to the affordable care act.
(1) "Affordable care act" means the federal patient protection and
affordable care act, P.L. 111-148, as amended by the federal health
care and education reconciliation act of 2010, P.L. 111-152, or federal
regulations or guidance issued under the affordable care act.
(2) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority,
established under chapter 41.05 RCW.
(3) "Board" means the governing board established in RCW 43.71.020.
(4) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner, established in
Title 48 RCW.
(5) "Exchange" means the Washington health benefit exchange
established in RCW 43.71.020.
(6)(a) "Self-sustaining" means capable of operating without direct
state tax subsidy. Self-sustaining sources include, but are not
limited to, federal grants, federal premium tax subsidies and credits,
charges to health carriers, and premiums paid by enrollees.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "direct state tax subsidy"
does not include a tax preference as defined in RCW 43.136.021.
(7) This section expires July 1, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies both prospectively and
retroactively.

--- END ---