BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.25.210 and 2011 c 60 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may conduct a pilot project to evaluate the
effect of granting the commission additional authority over budget
development, spending, and staffing. If the commission intends to
conduct a pilot project, it must provide a notice in writing to the
secretary by ((June 1, 2008)) July 1, 2013. If the commission chooses
to conduct a pilot project, the pilot project shall begin on July 1,
((2008)) 2013, and conclude on June 30, ((2013)) 2018.
(2) The pilot project shall include the following provisions:
(a) That the secretary shall employ an executive director that is:
(i) Hired by and serves at the pleasure of the commission;
(ii) Exempt from the provisions of the civil service law, chapter
41.06 RCW and whose salary is established by the commission in
accordance with RCW 43.03.028; and
(iii) Responsible for performing all administrative duties of the
commission, including preparing an annual budget, and any other duties
as delegated to the executive director by the commission;
(b) Consistent with the budgeting and accounting act:
(i) With regard to budget for the remainder of the ((2007-2009))
2013-2015 biennium, the commission has authority to spend the remaining
funds allocated with respect to chiropractors licensed under this
chapter; and
(ii) Beginning with the ((2009-2011)) 2015-2017 biennium, the
commission is responsible for proposing its own biennial budget which
the secretary must submit to the office of financial management;
(c) That, prior to adopting credentialing fees under RCW 43.70.250,
the secretary shall collaborate with the commission to determine the
appropriate fees necessary to support the activities of the commission;
(d) That, prior to the secretary exercising the secretary's
authority to adopt uniform rules and guidelines, or any other actions
that might impact the licensing or disciplinary authority of the
commission, the secretary shall first meet with the commission to
determine how those rules or guidelines, or changes to rules or
guidelines, might impact the commission's ability to effectively carry
out its statutory duties. If the commission, in consultation with the
secretary, determines that the proposed rules or guidelines, or changes
to existing rules or guidelines, will negatively impact the
commission's ability to effectively carry out its statutory duties,
then the individual commission shall collaborate with the secretary to
develop alternative solutions to mitigate the impacts. If an
alternative solution cannot be reached, the parties may resolve the
dispute through a mediator as set forth in (f) of this subsection;
(e) That the commission shall negotiate with the secretary to
develop performance-based expectations, including identification of key
performance measures. The performance expectations should focus on
consistent, timely regulation of health care professionals; and
(f) That in the event there is a disagreement between the
commission and the secretary, that is unable to be resolved through
negotiation, a representative of both parties shall agree on the
designation of a third party to mediate the dispute.
(3) By December 15, ((2013)) 2017, the secretary((,)) and the
commission((, and the other commissions conducting similar pilot
projects under RCW 18.71.430, 18.79.390, and 18.32.765,)) shall report
to the governor and the legislature on the results of the pilot
project. The report shall:
(a) Compare the effectiveness of licensing and disciplinary
activities of ((each)) the commission during the pilot project with the
licensing and disciplinary activities of the commission prior to the
pilot project and the disciplinary activities of other disciplining
authorities during the same time period as the pilot project;
(b) Compare the efficiency of ((each)) the commission with respect
to the timeliness and personnel resources during the pilot project to
the efficiency of the commission prior to the pilot project and the
efficiency of other disciplining authorities during the same period as
the pilot project;
(c) Compare the budgetary activity of ((each)) the commission
during the pilot project to the budgetary activity of the commission
prior to the pilot project and to the budgetary activity of other
disciplining authorities during the same period as the pilot project;
(d) Evaluate ((each)) the commission's regulatory activities,
including timelines, consistency of decision making, and performance
levels in comparison to other disciplining authorities; and
(e) Review summaries of national research and data regarding
regulatory effectiveness and patient safety.
(4) The secretary shall employ staff that are hired and managed by
the executive director provided that nothing contained in this section
may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or
the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.25 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the authority provided in RCW 42.52.804, the
commission, its members, or staff as directed by the commission, may
communicate, present information requested, volunteer information,
testify before legislative committees, and educate the legislature, as
the commission may from time to time see fit.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.71.430 and 2011 c 60 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((commission shall conduct a pilot project to evaluate the
effect of granting the commission additional authority over budget
development, spending, and staffing. The pilot project shall begin on
July 1, 2008, and conclude on June 30, 2013.
(2) The pilot project shall include the following provisions:
(a) That the)) secretary shall employ an executive director that
is:
(((i))) (a) Hired by and serves at the pleasure of the commission;
(((ii))) (b) Exempt from the provisions of the civil service law,
chapter 41.06 RCW and whose salary is established by the commission in
accordance with RCW 43.03.028; and
(((iii))) (c) Responsible for performing all administrative duties
of the commission, including preparing an annual budget, and any other
duties as delegated to the executive director by the commission((;
(b))).
(2) Consistent with the budgeting and accounting act((:
(i) With regard to budget for the remainder of the 2007-2009
biennium, the commission has authority to spend the remaining funds
allocated with respect to its professions, physicians regulated under
this chapter and physician assistants regulated under chapter 18.71A
RCW; and
(ii) Beginning with the 2009-2011 biennium)), the commission is
responsible for proposing its own biennial budget which the secretary
must submit to the office of financial management((;
(c) That,)).
(3) Prior to adopting credentialing fees under RCW 43.70.250, the
secretary shall collaborate with the commission to determine the
appropriate fees necessary to support the activities of the
commission((;
(d) That,)).
(4) Prior to the secretary exercising the secretary's authority to
adopt uniform rules and guidelines, or any other actions that might
impact the licensing or disciplinary authority of the commission, the
secretary shall first meet with the commission to determine how those
rules or guidelines, or changes to rules or guidelines, might impact
the commission's ability to effectively carry out its statutory duties.
If the commission, in consultation with the secretary, determines that
the proposed rules or guidelines, or changes to existing rules or
guidelines, will negatively impact the commission's ability to
effectively carry out its statutory duties, then the individual
commission shall collaborate with the secretary to develop alternative
solutions to mitigate the impacts. If an alternative solution cannot
be reached, the parties may resolve the dispute through a mediator as
set forth in (((f) of this subsection;
(e) That)) subsection (6) of this section.
(5) The commission shall negotiate with the secretary to develop
performance-based expectations, including identification of key
performance measures. The performance expectations should focus on
consistent, timely regulation of health care professionals((; and
(f) That)).
(6) In the event there is a disagreement between the commission and
the secretary, that is unable to be resolved through negotiation, a
representative of both parties shall agree on the designation of a
third party to mediate the dispute.
(((3) By December 15, 2013, the secretary, the commission, and the
other commissions conducting similar pilot projects under RCW
18.79.390, 18.25.210, and 18.32.765, shall report to the governor and
the legislature on the results of the pilot project. The report shall:
(a) Compare the effectiveness of licensing and disciplinary
activities of each commission during the pilot project with the
licensing and disciplinary activities of the commission prior to the
pilot project and the disciplinary activities of other disciplining
authorities during the same time period as the pilot project;
(b) Compare the efficiency of each commission with respect to the
timeliness and personnel resources during the pilot project to the
efficiency of the commission prior to the pilot project and the
efficiency of other disciplining authorities during the same period as
the pilot project;
(c) Compare the budgetary activity of each commission during the
pilot project to the budgetary activity of the commission prior to the
pilot project and to the budgetary activity of other disciplining
authorities during the same period as the pilot project;
(d) Evaluate each commission's regulatory activities, including
timelines, consistency of decision making, and performance levels in
comparison to other disciplining authorities; and
(e) Review summaries of national research and data regarding
regulatory effectiveness and patient safety.
(4))) (7) The secretary shall employ staff that are hired and
managed by the executive director provided that nothing contained in
this section may be construed to alter any existing collective
bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining
agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the authority provided in RCW 42.52.804, the
commission, its members, or staff as directed by the commission, may
communicate, present information requested, volunteer information,
testify before legislative committees, and educate the legislature, as
the commission may from time to time see fit.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.79.390 and 2011 c 60 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((commission shall conduct a pilot project to evaluate the
effect of granting the commission additional authority over budget
development, spending, and staffing. The pilot project shall begin on
July 1, 2008, and conclude on June 30, 2013.
(2) The pilot project shall include the following provisions:
(a) That the)) secretary shall employ an executive director that
is:
(((i))) (a) Hired by and serves at the pleasure of the commission;
(((ii))) (b) Exempt from the provisions of the civil service law,
chapter 41.06 RCW and whose salary is established by the commission in
accordance with RCW 43.03.028; and
(((iii))) (c) Responsible for performing all administrative duties
of the commission, including preparing an annual budget, and any other
duties as delegated to the executive director by the commission((;
(b))).
(2) Consistent with the budgeting and accounting act((:
(i) With regard to budget for the remainder of the 2007-2009
biennium, the commission has authority to spend the remaining funds
allocated with respect to advanced registered nurses, registered
nurses, and licensed practical nurses regulated under this chapter; and
(ii) Beginning with the 2009-2011 biennium)), the commission is
responsible for proposing its own biennial budget which the secretary
must submit to the office of financial management((;
(c) That,)).
(3) Prior to adopting credentialing fees under RCW 43.70.250, the
secretary shall collaborate with the commission to determine the
appropriate fees necessary to support the activities of the
commission((;
(d) That,)).
(4) Prior to the secretary exercising the secretary's authority to
adopt uniform rules and guidelines, or any other actions that might
impact the licensing or disciplinary authority of the commission, the
secretary shall first meet with the commission to determine how those
rules or guidelines, or changes to rules or guidelines, might impact
the commission's ability to effectively carry out its statutory duties.
If the commission, in consultation with the secretary, determines that
the proposed rules or guidelines, or changes to existing rules or
guidelines, will negatively impact the commission's ability to
effectively carry out its statutory duties, then the individual
commission shall collaborate with the secretary to develop alternative
solutions to mitigate the impacts. If an alternative solution cannot
be reached, the parties may resolve the dispute through a mediator as
set forth in (((f) of this subsection;
(e) That)) subsection (6) of this section.
(5) The commission shall negotiate with the secretary to develop
performance-based expectations, including identification of key
performance measures. The performance expectations should focus on
consistent, timely regulation of health care professionals((; and
(f) That)).
(6) In the event there is a disagreement between the commission and
the secretary, that is unable to be resolved through negotiation, a
representative of both parties shall agree on the designation of a
third party to mediate the dispute.
(((3) By December 15, 2013, the secretary, the commission, and the
other commissions conducting similar pilot projects under RCW
18.71.430, 18.25.210, and 18.32.765, shall report to the governor and
the legislature on the results of the pilot project. The report shall:
(a) Compare the effectiveness of licensing and disciplinary
activities of each commission during the pilot project with the
licensing and disciplinary activities of the commission prior to the
pilot project and the disciplinary activities of other disciplining
authorities during the same time period as the pilot project;
(b) Compare the efficiency of each commission with respect to the
timeliness and personnel resources during the pilot project to the
efficiency of the commission prior to the pilot project and the
efficiency of other disciplining authorities during the same period as
the pilot project;
(c) Compare the budgetary activity of each commission during the
pilot project to the budgetary activity of the commission prior to the
pilot project and to the budgetary activity of other disciplining
authorities during the same period as the pilot project;
(d) Evaluate each commission's regulatory activities, including
timelines, consistency of decision making, and performance levels in
comparison to other disciplining authorities; and
(e) Review summaries of national research and data regarding
regulatory effectiveness and patient safety.
(4))) (7) The secretary shall employ staff that are hired and
managed by the executive director provided that nothing contained in
this section may be construed to alter any existing collective
bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining
agreement.
(8) By December 31, 2013, the commission must present a report with
recommendations to the governor and the legislature regarding:
(a) Evidence-based practices and research-based practices used by
boards of nursing when conducting licensing, educational, disciplinary,
and financial activities and the use of such practices by the
commission; and
(b) A comparison of the commission's licensing, education,
disciplinary, and financial outcomes with those of other boards of
nursing using a national database.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the authority provided in RCW 42.52.804, the
commission, its members, or staff as directed by the commission, may
communicate, present information requested, volunteer information,
testify before legislative committees, and educate the legislature, as
the commission may from time to time see fit.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.70.240 and 1998 c 245 s 73 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary and each of the professional licensing and
disciplinary boards ((under the administration of the department))
listed in RCW 18.130.040(2)(b) shall enter into written operating
agreements on administrative procedures with input from the regulated
profession and the public. The intent of these agreements is to
provide a process for the department to consult each board on
administrative matters and to ensure that the administration and staff
functions effectively enable each board to fulfill its statutory
responsibilities in a manner that supports the health care delivery
system and evidence-based practices across all health professions. The
agreements shall include, but not be limited to, the following
provisions:
(1) Administrative activities supporting the board's policies,
goals, and objectives;
(2) Development and review of the agency budget as it relates to
the board; ((and))
(3) Board related personnel issues;
(4) Use of performance audits to evaluate the consistent use of
common business practices where appropriate; and
(5) Calculation and reporting of timelines and performance
measures.
The agreements shall be reviewed and revised in like manner if
appropriate at the beginning of each ((fiscal year)) biennium, and at
other times upon written request by the secretary or the board. Any
dispute between a board and the department, including the terms of the
operating agreement, must be mediated and determined by a
representative of the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 18.71.0191 (Executive director -- Staff) and 1994 sp.s. c 9
s 326, 1991 c 3 s 168, & 1979 ex.s. c 111 s 6; and
(2) RCW 18.79.130 (Executive director -- Staff) and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s
413.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---