BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means the health care authority.
(2) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(3) "Emerging best practice" or "promising practice" means a
program or practice that, based on statistical analyses or a well-established theory of change, shows potential for meeting the evidence-based or research-based criteria, which may include the use of a
program that is evidence-based for outcomes other than those listed in
this section.
(4) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has been
tested in heterogeneous or intended populations with multiple
randomized, or statistically controlled evaluations, or both; or one
large multiple site randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation,
or both, where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review
demonstrates sustained improvements in at least one outcome.
"Evidence-based" also means a program or practice that can be
implemented with a set of procedures to allow successful replication in
Washington and, when possible, is determined to be cost-beneficial.
(5) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has been
tested with a single randomized, or statistically controlled
evaluation, or both, demonstrating sustained desirable outcomes; or
where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review supports
sustained outcomes as described in this subsection but does not meet
the full criteria for evidence-based.
(6) "Service coordination organization" or "service contracting
entity" means the authority and department, or an entity that may
contract with the state to provide, directly or through subcontracts,
a comprehensive delivery system of medical, behavioral, long-term care,
or social support services, including entities such as regional support
networks as defined in RCW 71.24.025, managed care organizations that
provide medical services to clients under chapter 74.09 RCW, counties
providing chemical dependency services under chapters 74.50 and 70.96A
RCW, and area agencies on aging providing case management services
under chapter 74.39A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The authority and the department shall
base contract performance measures developed under section 3 of this
act on the following outcomes when contracting with service contracting
entities: Improvements in client health status and wellness; increases
in client participation in meaningful activities; reductions in client
involvement with criminal justice systems; reductions in avoidable
costs in hospitals, emergency rooms, crisis services, and jails and
prisons; increases in stable housing in the community; improvements in
client satisfaction with quality of life; and reductions in population-level health disparities.
(2) The performance measures must demonstrate the manner in which
the following principles are achieved within each of the outcomes under
subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Maximization of the use of evidence-based practices will be
given priority over the use of research-based and promising practices,
and research-based practices will be given priority over the use of
promising practices. The agencies will develop strategies to identify
programs that are effective with ethnically diverse clients and to
consult with tribal governments, experts within ethnically diverse
communities and community organizations that serve diverse communities;
(b) The maximization of the client's independence, recovery, and
employment;
(c) The maximization of the client's participation in treatment
decisions; and
(d) The collaboration between consumer-based support programs in
providing services to the client.
(3) In developing performance measures under section 3 of this act,
the authority and the department shall consider expected outcomes
relevant to the general populations that each agency serves. The
authority and the department may adapt the outcomes to account for the
unique needs and characteristics of discrete subcategories of
populations receiving services, including ethnically diverse
communities.
(4) The authority and the department shall coordinate the
establishment of the expected outcomes and the performance measures
between each agency as well as each program to identify expected
outcomes and performance measures that are common to the clients
enrolled in multiple programs and to eliminate conflicting standards
among the agencies and programs.
(5) The authority and the department shall establish timelines and
mechanisms for service contracting entities to report data related to
performance measures and outcomes, including phased implementation of
public reporting of outcome and performance measures in a form that
allows for comparison of performance measures and levels of improvement
between geographic regions of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 By September 1, 2014:
(1) The authority shall adopt performance measures to determine
whether service contracting entities are achieving the outcomes
described in section 2 of this act for clients enrolled in medical
managed care programs operated according to Title XIX or XXI of the
federal social security act.
(2) The department shall adopt performance measures to determine
whether service contracting entities are achieving the outcomes
described in section 2 of this act for clients receiving mental health,
long-term care, or chemical dependency services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The authority and the department shall
develop work groups of stakeholders particular to each area of outcomes
and performance measures. The work groups shall provide support in the
form of assistance and consultation in the development of the initial
outcomes and performance measures. Each work group must include
participants with expertise in evidence-based, research-based, and
promising practices related to the outcomes that the particular work
group is supporting.
(2) The authority and the department may contract with entities
that evaluate the evidence from clinical research studies, such as the
Pacific Northwest evidence-based practice center, to provide advice,
consultation services, and expertise to the work groups.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 By July 1, 2015, the authority and the
department shall require that contracts with service coordination
organizations include provisions requiring the adoption of the outcomes
and performance measures developed under this chapter and mechanisms
for reporting data to support each of the outcomes and performance
measures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) By December 1, 2014, the department and
the authority shall report jointly to the legislature on the expected
outcomes and the performance measures. The report must identify the
performance measures and the expected outcomes established for each
program, the relationship between the performance measures and expected
improvements in client outcomes, mechanisms for reporting outcomes and
measuring performance, and options for applying the performance
measures and expected outcomes development process to other health and
social service programs.
(2) By December 1, 2016, the department and the authority shall
report to the legislature on the incorporation of the performance
measures into contracts with service coordination organizations and
progress toward achieving the identified outcomes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The outcomes and performance measures
established pursuant to this chapter do not establish a standard of
care in any civil action brought by a recipient of services. The
failure of a service coordination organization to meet the outcomes and
performance measures established pursuant to this chapter does not
create civil liability on the part of the service coordination
organization in a claim brought by a recipient of services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The authority shall incorporate the expected outcomes and criteria
to measure the performance of service coordination organizations as
provided in chapter 70.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 12 of
this act) into contracts with managed care organizations that provide
services to clients under this chapter.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.96A.320 and 1990 c 151 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority, or two or more counties acting
jointly, may establish an alcoholism and other drug addiction program.
If two or more counties jointly establish the program, they shall
designate one county to provide administrative and financial services.
(2) To be eligible for funds from the department for the support of
the county alcoholism and other drug addiction program, the county
legislative authority shall establish a county alcoholism and other
drug addiction board under RCW 70.96A.300 and appoint a county
alcoholism and other drug addiction program coordinator under RCW
70.96A.310.
(3) The county legislative authority may apply to the department
for financial support for the county program of alcoholism and other
drug addiction. To receive financial support, the county legislative
authority shall submit a plan that meets the following conditions:
(a) It shall describe the services and activities to be provided;
(b) It shall include anticipated expenditures and revenues;
(c) It shall be prepared by the county alcoholism and other drug
addiction program board and be adopted by the county legislative
authority;
(d) It shall reflect maximum effective use of existing services and
programs; and
(e) It shall meet other conditions that the secretary may require.
(4) The county may accept and spend gifts, grants, and fees, from
public and private sources, to implement its program of alcoholism and
other drug addiction.
(5) The department shall require that any agreement to provide
financial support to a county that performs the activities of a service
coordination organization for alcoholism and other drug addiction
services must incorporate the expected outcomes and criteria to measure
the performance of service coordination organizations as provided in
chapter 70.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 12 of this act).
(6) The county may subcontract for detoxification, residential
treatment, or outpatient treatment with treatment programs that are
approved treatment programs. The county may subcontract for other
services with individuals or organizations approved by the department.
(((6))) (7) To continue to be eligible for financial support from
the department for the county alcoholism and other drug addiction
program, an increase in state financial support shall not be used to
supplant local funds from a source that was used to support the county
alcoholism and other drug addiction program before the effective date
of the increase.

Sec. 10 RCW 71.24.330 and 2008 c 261 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Contracts between a regional support network and the
department shall include mechanisms for monitoring performance under
the contract and remedies for failure to substantially comply with the
requirements of the contract including, but not limited to, financial
penalties, termination of the contract, and reprocurement of the
contract.
(b) The department shall incorporate the criteria to measure the
performance of service coordination organizations into contracts with
regional support networks as provided in chapter 70.-- RCW (the new
chapter created in section 12 of this act).
(2) The regional support network procurement processes shall
encourage the preservation of infrastructure previously purchased by
the community mental health service delivery system, the maintenance of
linkages between other services and delivery systems, and maximization
of the use of available funds for services versus profits. However, a
regional support network selected through the procurement process is
not required to contract for services with any county-owned or operated
facility. The regional support network procurement process shall
provide that public funds appropriated by the legislature shall not be
used to promote or deter, encourage, or discourage employees from
exercising their rights under Title 29, chapter 7, subchapter II,
United States Code or chapter 41.56 RCW.
(3) In addition to the requirements of RCW 71.24.035, contracts
shall:
(a) Define administrative costs and ensure that the regional
support network does not exceed an administrative cost of ten percent
of available funds;
(b) Require effective collaboration with law enforcement, criminal
justice agencies, and the chemical dependency treatment system;
(c) Require substantial implementation of department adopted
integrated screening and assessment process and matrix of best
practices;
(d) Maintain the decision-making independence of designated mental
health professionals;
(e) Except at the discretion of the secretary or as specified in
the biennial budget, require regional support networks to pay the state
for the costs associated with individuals who are being served on the
grounds of the state hospitals and who are not receiving long-term
inpatient care as defined in RCW 71.24.025;
(f) Include a negotiated alternative dispute resolution clause; and
(g) Include a provision requiring either party to provide one
hundred eighty days' notice of any issue that may cause either party to
voluntarily terminate, refuse to renew, or refuse to sign a mandatory
amendment to the contract to act as a regional support network. If
either party decides to voluntarily terminate, refuse to renew, or
refuse to sign a mandatory amendment to the contract to serve as a
regional support network they shall provide ninety days' advance notice
in writing to the other party.

Sec. 11 RCW 74.39A.090 and 2004 c 141 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature intends that any staff reassigned by the
department as a result of shifting of the reauthorization
responsibilities by contract outlined in this section shall be
dedicated for discharge planning and assisting with discharge planning
and information on existing discharge planning cases. Discharge
planning, as directed in this section, is intended for residents and
patients identified for discharge to long-term care pursuant to RCW
70.41.320, 74.39A.040, and 74.42.058. The purpose of discharge
planning is to protect residents and patients from the financial
incentives inherent in keeping residents or patients in a more
expensive higher level of care and shall focus on care options that are
in the best interest of the patient or resident.
(2) The department shall contract with area agencies on aging:
(a) To provide case management services to consumers receiving home
and community services in their own home; and
(b) To reassess and reauthorize home and community services in home
or in other settings for consumers consistent with the intent of this
section:
(i) Who have been initially authorized by the department to receive
home and community services; and
(ii) Who, at the time of reassessment and reauthorization, are
receiving home and community services in their own home.
(3) In the event that an area agency on aging is unwilling to enter
into or satisfactorily fulfill a contract or an individual consumer's
need for case management services will be met through an alternative
delivery system, the department is authorized to:
(a) Obtain the services through competitive bid; and
(b) Provide the services directly until a qualified contractor can
be found.
(4)(a) The department shall include, in its oversight and
monitoring of area agency on aging performance, assessment of case
management roles undertaken by area agencies on aging in this section.
The scope of oversight and monitoring includes, but is not limited to,
assessing the degree and quality of the case management performed by
area agency on aging staff for elderly and ((disabled)) persons with
disabilities in the community.
(b) The department shall incorporate the expected outcomes and
criteria to measure the performance of service coordination
organizations into contracts with area agencies on aging as provided in
chapter 70.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 12 of this act).
(5) Area agencies on aging shall assess the quality of the in-home
care services provided to consumers who are receiving services under
the medicaid personal care, community options programs entry system or
chore services program through an individual provider or home care
agency. Quality indicators may include, but are not limited to, home
care consumers satisfaction surveys, how quickly home care consumers
are linked with home care workers, and whether the plan of care under
RCW 74.39A.095 has been honored by the agency or the individual
provider.
(6) The department shall develop model language for the plan of
care established in RCW 74.39A.095. The plan of care shall be in clear
language, and written at a reading level that will ensure the ability
of consumers to understand the rights and responsibilities expressed in
the plan of care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---