BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 46.16A.050 (Registration -- Requirements
before issuance -- Penalty -- Rules) and 2010 c 161 s 405 are each
repealed.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.63.020 and 2010 c 252 s 3, 2010 c 161 s 1125, and
2010 c 8 s 9077 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Failure to perform any act required or the performance of any act
prohibited by this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating to traffic
including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is
designated as a traffic infraction and may not be classified as a
criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the following
provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative
regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:
(1) RCW 46.09.470(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance;
(2) RCW 46.09.480 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;
(3) RCW 46.10.490(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit-forming drugs or in a manner endangering the person of another;
(4) RCW 46.10.495 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;
(5) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of title,
registration certificates, and markings indicating that a vehicle has
been destroyed or declared a total loss;
(6) RCW 46.16A.030 ((and 46.16A.050(3))) relating to the nonpayment
of taxes and fees by failure to register a vehicle ((and falsifying
residency when registering a motor vehicle));
(7) RCW 46.16A.520 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to
drive;
(8) RCW 46.16A.320 relating to vehicle trip permits;
(9) RCW 46.19.050 relating to knowingly providing false information
in conjunction with an application for a special placard or license
plate for disabled persons' parking;
(10) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's
license;
(11) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a
driver's license or instruction permit;
(12) RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession and use of
a driver's license;
(13) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked
license or status;
(14) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle
with a suspended or revoked license;
(15) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an
occupational driver's license, temporary restricted driver's license,
or ignition interlock driver's license;
(16) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without
an ignition interlock device in violation of a license notation that
the device is required;
(17) RCW 46.20.750 relating to circumventing an ignition interlock
device;
(18) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;
(19) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;
(20) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of
financial responsibility;
(21) RCW 46.35.030 relating to recording device information;
(22) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of
sunscreening material;
(23) RCW 46.37.650 relating to the sale, resale, distribution, or
installation of a previously deployed air bag;
(24) RCW 46.37.671 through 46.37.675 relating to signal preemption
devices;
(25) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot
vehicles;
(26) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous
articles;
(27) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(28) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(29) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairers, storage
persons, and appraisers;
(30) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving
record to be furnished to an insurance company, an employer, and an
alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;
(31) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a
registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;
(32) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck
operators;
(33) RCW 46.55.300 relating to vehicle immobilization;
(34) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers,
flaggers, or firefighters;
(35) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information to or
cooperate with an officer;
(36) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give
identification to an officer;
(37) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude pursuing police
vehicles;
(38) RCW 46.61.212(4) relating to reckless endangerment of
emergency zone workers;
(39) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;
(40) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(41) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one
driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;
(42) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor vehicle;
(43) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;
(44) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent driving;
(45) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of roadway
workers;
(46) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on highways;
(47) RCW 46.61.655(7) (a) and (b) relating to failure to secure a
load;
(48) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an unattended
vehicle with the motor running;
(49) RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle fuel;
(50) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or attempt
to cancel a traffic citation;
(51) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding, abetting,
coercing, and committing crimes;
(52) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic offenders;
(53) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to obtain a
refund;
(54) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle business
practices, except where that chapter provides for the assessment of
monetary penalties of a civil nature;
(55) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of passengers
in for hire vehicles;
(56) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier insurance;
(57) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine without a
vehicle certificate;
(58) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a limousine
carrier;
(59) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;
(60) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training schools;
(61) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a cab card,
letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued under chapter
46.87 RCW;
(62) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an unregistered or
unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

--- END ---