BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.34.020 and 2012 c 10 s 62 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Abandonment" means action or inaction by a person or entity
with a duty of care for a vulnerable adult that leaves the vulnerable
person without the means or ability to obtain necessary food, clothing,
shelter, or health care.
(2) "Abuse" means the willful action or inaction that inflicts
injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation, or punishment on a
vulnerable adult. In instances of abuse of a vulnerable adult who is
unable to express or demonstrate physical harm, pain, or mental
anguish, the abuse is presumed to cause physical harm, pain, or mental
anguish. Abuse includes sexual abuse, mental abuse, physical abuse,
and exploitation of a vulnerable adult, which have the following
meanings:
(a) "Sexual abuse" means any form of nonconsensual sexual contact,
including but not limited to unwanted or inappropriate touching, rape,
sodomy, sexual coercion, sexually explicit photographing, and sexual
harassment. Sexual abuse includes any sexual contact between a staff
person, who is not also a resident or client, of a facility or a staff
person of a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, and a
vulnerable adult living in that facility or receiving service from a
program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, whether or not it is
consensual.
(b) "Physical abuse" means the willful action of inflicting bodily
injury or physical mistreatment. Physical abuse includes, but is not
limited to, striking with or without an object, slapping, pinching,
choking, kicking, shoving, prodding, or the use of chemical restraints
or physical restraints unless the restraints are consistent with
licensing requirements, and includes restraints that are otherwise
being used inappropriately.
(c) "Mental abuse" means any willful action or inaction of mental
or verbal abuse. Mental abuse includes, but is not limited to,
coercion, harassment, inappropriately isolating a vulnerable adult from
family, friends, or regular activity, and verbal assault that includes
ridiculing, intimidating, yelling, or swearing.
(d) "Exploitation" means an act of forcing, compelling, or exerting
undue influence over a vulnerable adult causing the vulnerable adult to
act in a way that is inconsistent with relevant past behavior, or
causing the vulnerable adult to perform services for the benefit of
another.
(3) "Consent" means express written consent granted after the
vulnerable adult or his or her legal representative has been fully
informed of the nature of the services to be offered and that the
receipt of services is voluntary.
(4) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(5) "Facility" means a residence licensed or required to be
licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, assisted living facilities; chapter
18.51 RCW, nursing homes; chapter 70.128 RCW, adult family homes;
chapter 72.36 RCW, soldiers' homes; or chapter 71A.20 RCW, residential
habilitation centers; or any other facility licensed or certified by
the department.
(6) "Financial exploitation" means the illegal or improper use,
control over, or withholding of the property, income, resources, or
trust funds of the vulnerable adult by any person or entity for any
person's or entity's profit or advantage other than for the vulnerable
adult's profit or advantage. "Financial exploitation" includes, but is
not limited to:
(a) The use of deception, intimidation, or undue influence by a
person or entity in a position of trust and confidence with a
vulnerable adult to obtain or use the property, income, resources, or
trust funds of the vulnerable adult for the benefit of a person or
entity other than the vulnerable adult;
(b) The breach of a fiduciary duty, including, but not limited to,
the misuse of a power of attorney, trust, or a guardianship
appointment, that results in the unauthorized appropriation, sale, or
transfer of the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the
vulnerable adult for the benefit of a person or entity other than the
vulnerable adult; or
(c) Obtaining or using a vulnerable adult's property, income,
resources, or trust funds without lawful authority, by a person or
entity who knows or clearly should know that the vulnerable adult lacks
the capacity to consent to the release or use of his or her property,
income, resources, or trust funds.
(7) "Financial institution" has the same meaning as in RCW
30.22.040 and 30.22.041. For purposes of this chapter only, "financial
institution" also means a "broker-dealer" or "investment adviser" as
defined in RCW 21.20.005.
(8) "Incapacitated person" means a person who is at a significant
risk of personal or financial harm under RCW 11.88.010(1) (a), (b),
(c), or (d).
(9) "Individual provider" means a person under contract with the
department to provide services in the home under chapter 74.09 or
74.39A RCW.
(10) "Interested person" means a person who demonstrates to the
court's satisfaction that the person is interested in the welfare of
the vulnerable adult, that the person has a good faith belief that the
court's intervention is necessary, and that the vulnerable adult is
unable, due to incapacity, undue influence, or duress at the time the
petition is filed, to protect his or her own interests.
(11) "Mandated reporter" is an employee of the department; law
enforcement officer; social worker; professional school personnel;
individual provider; an employee of a facility; an operator of a
facility; an employee of a social service, welfare, mental health,
adult day health, adult day care, home health, home care, or hospice
agency; county coroner or medical examiner; Christian Science
practitioner; or health care provider subject to chapter 18.130 RCW.
(12) "Neglect" means (a) a pattern of conduct or inaction by a
person or entity with a duty of care that fails to provide the goods
and services that maintain physical or mental health of a vulnerable
adult, or that fails to avoid or prevent physical or mental harm or
pain to a vulnerable adult; or (b) an act or omission by a person or
entity with a duty of care that demonstrates a serious disregard of
consequences of such a magnitude as to constitute a clear and present
danger to the vulnerable adult's health, welfare, or safety, including
but not limited to conduct prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100.
(13) "Permissive reporter" means any person, including, but not
limited to, an employee of a financial institution, attorney, or
volunteer in a facility or program providing services for vulnerable
adults.
(14) "Protective services" means any services provided by the
department to a vulnerable adult with the consent of the vulnerable
adult, or the legal representative of the vulnerable adult, who has
been abandoned, abused, financially exploited, neglected, or in a state
of self-neglect. These services may include, but are not limited to
case management, social casework, home care, placement, arranging for
medical evaluations, psychological evaluations, day care, or referral
for legal assistance.
(15) "Self-neglect" means the failure of a vulnerable adult, not
living in a facility, to provide for himself or herself the goods and
services necessary for the vulnerable adult's physical or mental
health, and the absence of which impairs or threatens the vulnerable
adult's well-being. This definition may include a vulnerable adult who
is receiving services through home health, hospice, or a home care
agency, or an individual provider when the neglect is not a result of
inaction by that agency or individual provider.
(16) "Social worker" means:
(a) A social worker as defined in RCW 18.320.010(2); or
(b) Anyone engaged in a professional capacity during the regular
course of employment in encouraging or promoting the health, welfare,
support, or education of vulnerable adults, or providing social
services to vulnerable adults, whether in an individual capacity or as
an employee or agent of any public or private organization or
institution.
(17) "Vulnerable adult" includes a person:
(a) Sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or
physical inability to care for himself or herself; or
(b) Found incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW; or
(c) Who has a developmental disability as defined under RCW
71A.10.020; or
(d) Admitted to any facility; or
(e) Receiving services from home health, hospice, or home care
agencies licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW;
or
(f) Receiving services from an individual provider; or
(g) Who self-directs his or her own care and receives services from
a personal aide under chapter 74.39 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.34.035 and 2010 c 133 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When there is reasonable cause to believe that abandonment,
abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect of a vulnerable adult has
occurred, mandated reporters shall immediately report to the
department.
(2) When there is reason to suspect that sexual assault has
occurred, mandated reporters shall immediately report to the
appropriate law enforcement agency and to the department.
(3) When there is reason to suspect that physical assault has
occurred or there is reasonable cause to believe that an act has caused
fear of imminent harm:
(a) Mandated reporters shall immediately report to the department;
and
(b) Mandated reporters shall immediately report to the appropriate
law enforcement agency, except as provided in subsection (4) of this
section.
(4) A mandated reporter is not required to report to a law
enforcement agency, unless requested by the injured vulnerable adult or
his or her legal representative or family member, an incident of
physical assault between vulnerable adults that causes minor bodily
injury and does not require more than basic first aid, unless:
(a) The injury appears on the back, face, head, neck, chest,
breasts, groin, inner thigh, buttock, genital, or anal area;
(b) There is a fracture;
(c) There is a pattern of physical assault between the same
vulnerable adults or involving the same vulnerable adults; or
(d) There is an attempt to choke a vulnerable adult.
(5) When there is reason to suspect that the death of a vulnerable
adult was caused by abuse, neglect, or abandonment by another person,
mandated reporters shall, pursuant to RCW 68.50.020, report the death
to the medical examiner or coroner having jurisdiction, as well as the
department and local law enforcement, in the most expeditious manner
possible. A mandated reporter is not relieved from the reporting
requirement provisions of this subsection by the existence of a
previously signed death certificate. If abuse, neglect, or abandonment
caused or contributed to the death of a vulnerable adult, the death is
a death caused by unnatural or unlawful means, and the body shall be
the jurisdiction of the coroner or medical examiner pursuant to RCW
68.50.010.
(6) Permissive reporters may report to the department or a law
enforcement agency when there is reasonable cause to believe that a
vulnerable adult is being or has been abandoned, abused, financially
exploited, or neglected.
(7) No facility, as defined by this chapter, agency licensed or
required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, or facility or agency
under contract with the department to provide care for vulnerable
adults may develop policies or procedures that interfere with the
reporting requirements of this chapter.
(8) Each report, oral or written, must contain as much as possible
of the following information:
(a) The name and address of the person making the report;
(b) The name and address of the vulnerable adult and the name of
the facility or agency providing care for the vulnerable adult;
(c) The name and address of the legal guardian or alternate
decision maker;
(d) The nature and extent of the abandonment, abuse, financial
exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect;
(e) Any history of previous abandonment, abuse, financial
exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect;
(f) The identity of the alleged perpetrator, if known; and
(g) Other information that may be helpful in establishing the
extent of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, neglect, or the
cause of death of the deceased vulnerable adult.
(9) Unless there is a judicial proceeding or the person consents,
the identity of the person making the report under this section is
confidential.
(10) In conducting an investigation of abandonment, abuse,
financial exploitation, self-neglect, or neglect, the department or law
enforcement, upon request, must have access to all relevant records
related to the vulnerable adult that are in the possession of mandated
reporters and their employees, unless otherwise prohibited by law.
Providing access to records relevant to an investigation by the
department or law enforcement under this provision may not be deemed a
violation of any confidential communication privilege.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.34.067 and 2011 c 170 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Where appropriate, an investigation by the department may
include a private interview with the vulnerable adult regarding the
alleged abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect.
(2) In conducting the investigation, the department shall interview
the complainant, unless anonymous, and shall use its best efforts to
interview the vulnerable adult or adults harmed, and, consistent with
the protection of the vulnerable adult shall interview facility staff,
any available independent sources of relevant information, including if
appropriate the family members of the vulnerable adult.
(3) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with: (a) Those persons or agencies required to report
under this chapter or submit a report under this chapter; (b)
consultants designated by the department; and (c) designated
representatives of Washington Indian tribes if client information
exchanged is pertinent to cases under investigation or the provision of
protective services. Information considered privileged by statute and
not directly related to reports required by this chapter must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(4) The department shall prepare and keep on file a report of each
investigation conducted by the department for a period of time in
accordance with policies established by the department.
(5) If the department has reason to believe that the vulnerable
adult has suffered from abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation,
neglect, or self-neglect, and lacks the ability or capacity to consent,
and needs the protection of a guardian, the department may bring a
guardianship action under chapter 11.88 RCW.
(6) For purposes consistent with this chapter, the department, the
certified professional guardian board, and the office of public
guardianship may share information contained in reports and
investigations of the abuse, abandonment, neglect, self-neglect, and
financial exploitation of vulnerable adults. This information may be
used solely for (a) recruiting or appointing appropriate guardians and
(b) monitoring, or when appropriate, disciplining certified
professional or public guardians. Reports of abuse, abandonment,
neglect, self-neglect, and financial exploitation are confidential
under RCW 74.34.095 and other laws, and secondary disclosure of
information shared under this section is prohibited.
(7) When the investigation is completed and the department
determines that an incident of abandonment, abuse, financial
exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect has occurred, the department
shall inform the vulnerable adult of their right to refuse protective
services, and ensure that, if necessary, appropriate protective
services are provided to the vulnerable adult, with the consent of the
vulnerable adult. The vulnerable adult has the right to withdraw or
refuse protective services.
(((7))) (8) The department's adult protective services division may
enter into agreements with federally recognized tribes to investigate
reports of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, neglect, or
self-neglect of vulnerable adults on property over which a federally
recognized tribe has exclusive jurisdiction. If the department has
information that abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect
is criminal or is placing a vulnerable adult on tribal property at
potential risk of personal or financial harm, the department may notify
tribal law enforcement or another tribal representative specified by
the tribe. Upon receipt of the notification, the tribe may assume
jurisdiction of the matter. Neither the department nor its employees
may participate in the investigation after the tribe assumes
jurisdiction. The department, its officers, and its employees are not
liable for any action or inaction of the tribe or for any harm to the
alleged victim, the person against whom the allegations were made, or
other parties that occurs after the tribe assumes jurisdiction.
Nothing in this section limits the department's jurisdiction and
authority over facilities or entities that the department licenses or
certifies under federal or state law.
(((8))) (9) The department may photograph a vulnerable adult or
their environment for the purpose of providing documentary evidence of
the physical condition of the vulnerable adult or his or her
environment. When photographing the vulnerable adult, the department
shall obtain permission from the vulnerable adult or his or her legal
representative unless immediate photographing is necessary to preserve
evidence. However, if the legal representative is alleged to have
abused, neglected, abandoned, or exploited the vulnerable adult,
consent from the legal representative is not necessary. No such
consent is necessary when photographing the physical environment.
(((9))) (10) When the investigation is complete and the department
determines that the incident of abandonment, abuse, financial
exploitation, or neglect has occurred, the department shall inform the
facility in which the incident occurred, consistent with
confidentiality requirements concerning the vulnerable adult,
witnesses, and complainants.

--- END ---