BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the large number
of youth involved in the juvenile justice system with mental health
challenges is of significant concern. Access to effective treatment is
critical to the successful treatment of youth in the early stages of
their contact with the juvenile justice system. Such access may
prevent further involvement in the system after an initial contact or
assist a youth in avoiding any further contact with the juvenile
justice system altogether. There is growing evidence that mental
health diversion strategies, in particular, are effective in connecting
youth with needed treatment and preventing additional offending
behaviors. These strategies allow a continuum of opportunities for
connecting youth who may be facing a mental illness or disorder to
community mental health services at multiple decision points, such as
law enforcement diversion, prosecutor diversion, court-based diversion,
and court disposition. The effective use of these strategies can
result not only in significant cost savings for the juvenile justice
system, but can create the benefit of improved lives of the youth who
face mental health challenges and barriers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a police officer has reasonable cause to believe that a
juvenile has committed acts constituting a nonfelony crime that is not
a serious offense as identified in RCW 10.77.092, and the officer
believes that the juvenile suffers from a mental disorder, and the
local prosecutor has entered into an agreement with law enforcement
regarding the detention of juveniles who may have a mental disorder,
the arresting officer, instead of taking the juvenile to the local
juvenile detention facility, may take the juvenile to:
(a) An evaluation and treatment facility as defined in RCW
71.34.020 if the facility has been identified as an alternative
location by agreement of the prosecutor, law enforcement, and the
mental health provider;
(b) A facility or program identified by agreement of the prosecutor
and law enforcement; or
(c) A location already identified and in use by law enforcement for
the purpose of mental health diversion.
(2) For the purposes of this section, an "alternative location"
means a facility or program that has the capacity to evaluate a youth
and, if determined to be appropriate, develop a behavioral health
intervention plan and initiate treatment.
(3) If a juvenile is taken to any location described in subsection
(1)(a) or (b) of this section, the juvenile may be held for up to
twelve hours and must be examined by a mental health professional
within three hours of arrival.
(4) The authority provided pursuant to this section is in addition
to existing authority under RCW 10.31.110.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.40.070 and 2010 c 289 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Complaints referred to the juvenile court alleging the
commission of an offense shall be referred directly to the prosecutor.
The prosecutor, upon receipt of a complaint, shall screen the complaint
to determine whether:
(a) The alleged facts bring the case within the jurisdiction of the
court; and
(b) On a basis of available evidence there is probable cause to
believe that the juvenile did commit the offense.
(2) If the identical alleged acts constitute an offense under both
the law of this state and an ordinance of any city or county of this
state, state law shall govern the prosecutor's screening and charging
decision for both filed and diverted cases.
(3) If the requirements of subsections (1)(a) and (b) of this
section are met, the prosecutor shall either file an information in
juvenile court or divert the case, as set forth in subsections (5),
(6), and (8) of this section. If the prosecutor finds that the
requirements of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section are not met,
the prosecutor shall maintain a record, for one year, of such decision
and the reasons therefor. In lieu of filing an information or
diverting an offense a prosecutor may file a motion to modify community
supervision where such offense constitutes a violation of community
supervision.
(4) An information shall be a plain, concise, and definite written
statement of the essential facts constituting the offense charged. It
shall be signed by the prosecuting attorney and conform to chapter
10.37 RCW.
(5) Except as provided in RCW 13.40.213 and subsection (7) of this
section, where a case is legally sufficient, the prosecutor shall file
an information with the juvenile court if:
(a) An alleged offender is accused of a class A felony, a class B
felony, an attempt to commit a class B felony, a class C felony listed
in RCW 9.94A.411(2) as a crime against persons or listed in RCW
9A.46.060 as a crime of harassment, or a class C felony that is a
violation of RCW 9.41.080 or 9.41.040(2)(a)(iii); or
(b) An alleged offender is accused of a felony and has a criminal
history of any felony, or at least two gross misdemeanors, or at least
two misdemeanors; or
(c) An alleged offender has previously been committed to the
department; or
(d) An alleged offender has been referred by a diversion unit for
prosecution or desires prosecution instead of diversion; or
(e) An alleged offender has ((two)) three or more diversion
agreements on the alleged offender's criminal history; or
(f) A special allegation has been filed that the offender or an
accomplice was armed with a firearm when the offense was committed.
(6) Where a case is legally sufficient the prosecutor shall divert
the case if the alleged offense is a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
or violation and the alleged offense is the offender's first offense or
violation. If the alleged offender is charged with a related offense
that must or may be filed under subsections (5) and (8) of this
section, a case under this subsection may also be filed.
(7) Where a case is legally sufficient to charge an alleged
offender with either prostitution or prostitution loitering and the
alleged offense is the offender's first prostitution or prostitution
loitering offense, the prosecutor shall divert the case.
(8) Where a case is legally sufficient and falls into neither
subsection (5) nor (6) of this section, it may be filed or diverted.
In deciding whether to file or divert an offense under this section the
prosecutor shall be guided only by the length, seriousness, and recency
of the alleged offender's criminal history and the circumstances
surrounding the commission of the alleged offense.
(9) Whenever a juvenile is placed in custody or, where not placed
in custody, referred to a diversion interview, the parent or legal
guardian of the juvenile shall be notified as soon as possible
concerning the allegation made against the juvenile and the current
status of the juvenile. Where a case involves victims of crimes
against persons or victims whose property has not been recovered at the
time a juvenile is referred to a diversion unit, the victim shall be
notified of the referral and informed how to contact the unit.
(10) The responsibilities of the prosecutor under subsections (1)
through (9) of this section may be performed by a juvenile court
probation counselor for any complaint referred to the court alleging
the commission of an offense which would not be a felony if committed
by an adult, if the prosecutor has given sufficient written notice to
the juvenile court that the prosecutor will not review such complaints.
(11) The prosecutor, juvenile court probation counselor, or
diversion unit may, in exercising their authority under this section or
RCW 13.40.080, refer juveniles to mediation or victim offender
reconciliation programs. Such mediation or victim offender
reconciliation programs shall be voluntary for victims.

Sec. 4 RCW 13.40.080 and 2012 c 201 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A diversion agreement shall be a contract between a juvenile
accused of an offense and a diversion unit whereby the juvenile agrees
to fulfill certain conditions in lieu of prosecution. Such agreements
may be entered into only after the prosecutor, or probation counselor
pursuant to this chapter, has determined that probable cause exists to
believe that a crime has been committed and that the juvenile committed
it. Such agreements shall be entered into as expeditiously as
possible.
(2) A diversion agreement shall be limited to one or more of the
following:
(a) Community restitution not to exceed one hundred fifty hours,
not to be performed during school hours if the juvenile is attending
school;
(b) Restitution limited to the amount of actual loss incurred by
any victim;
(c) Attendance at up to ten hours of counseling and/or up to twenty
hours of educational or informational sessions at a community agency.
The educational or informational sessions may include sessions relating
to respect for self, others, and authority; victim awareness;
accountability; self-worth; responsibility; work ethics; good
citizenship; literacy; and life skills. If an assessment identifies
mental health needs, a youth may access up to thirty hours of
counseling. The counseling sessions may include services demonstrated
to improve behavioral health and reduce recidivism. For purposes of
this section, "community agency" may also mean a community-based
nonprofit organization, a physician, a counselor, a school, or a
treatment provider, if approved by the diversion unit. The state shall
not be liable for costs resulting from the diversion unit exercising
the option to permit diversion agreements to mandate attendance at up
to ((ten)) thirty hours of counseling and/or up to twenty hours of
educational or informational sessions;
(d) A fine, not to exceed one hundred dollars;
(e) Requirements to remain during specified hours at home, school,
or work, and restrictions on leaving or entering specified geographical
areas; and
(f) Upon request of any victim or witness, requirements to refrain
from any contact with victims or witnesses of offenses committed by the
juvenile.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this
section, youth courts are not limited to the conditions imposed by
subsection (2) of this section in imposing sanctions on juveniles
pursuant to RCW 13.40.630.
(4) In assessing periods of community restitution to be performed
and restitution to be paid by a juvenile who has entered into a
diversion agreement, the court officer to whom this task is assigned
shall consult with the juvenile's custodial parent or parents or
guardian. To the extent possible, the court officer shall advise the
victims of the juvenile offender of the diversion process, offer victim
impact letter forms and restitution claim forms, and involve members of
the community. Such members of the community shall meet with the
juvenile and advise the court officer as to the terms of the diversion
agreement and shall supervise the juvenile in carrying out its terms.
(5)(a) A diversion agreement may not exceed a period of six months
and may include a period extending beyond the eighteenth birthday of
the divertee.
(b) If additional time is necessary for the juvenile to complete
restitution to a victim, the time period limitations of this subsection
may be extended by an additional six months.
(c) If the juvenile has not paid the full amount of restitution by
the end of the additional six-month period, then the juvenile shall be
referred to the juvenile court for entry of an order establishing the
amount of restitution still owed to the victim. In this order, the
court shall also determine the terms and conditions of the restitution,
including a payment plan extending up to ten years if the court
determines that the juvenile does not have the means to make full
restitution over a shorter period. For the purposes of this subsection
(5)(c), the juvenile shall remain under the court's jurisdiction for a
maximum term of ten years after the juvenile's eighteenth birthday.
Prior to the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the juvenile
court may extend the judgment for restitution an additional ten years.
The court may relieve the juvenile of the requirement to pay full or
partial restitution if the juvenile reasonably satisfies the court that
he or she does not have the means to make full or partial restitution
and could not reasonably acquire the means to pay the restitution over
a ten-year period. If the court relieves the juvenile of the
requirement to pay full or partial restitution, the court may order an
amount of community restitution that the court deems appropriate. The
county clerk shall make disbursements to victims named in the order.
The restitution to victims named in the order shall be paid prior to
any payment for other penalties or monetary assessments. A juvenile
under obligation to pay restitution may petition the court for
modification of the restitution order.
(6) The juvenile shall retain the right to be referred to the court
at any time prior to the signing of the diversion agreement.
(7) Divertees and potential divertees shall be afforded due process
in all contacts with a diversion unit regardless of whether the
juveniles are accepted for diversion or whether the diversion program
is successfully completed. Such due process shall include, but not be
limited to, the following:
(a) A written diversion agreement shall be executed stating all
conditions in clearly understandable language;
(b) Violation of the terms of the agreement shall be the only
grounds for termination;
(c) No divertee may be terminated from a diversion program without
being given a court hearing, which hearing shall be preceded by:
(i) Written notice of alleged violations of the conditions of the
diversion program; and
(ii) Disclosure of all evidence to be offered against the divertee;
(d) The hearing shall be conducted by the juvenile court and shall
include:
(i) Opportunity to be heard in person and to present evidence;
(ii) The right to confront and cross-examine all adverse witnesses;
(iii) A written statement by the court as to the evidence relied on
and the reasons for termination, should that be the decision; and
(iv) Demonstration by evidence that the divertee has substantially
violated the terms of his or her diversion agreement;
(e) The prosecutor may file an information on the offense for which
the divertee was diverted:
(i) In juvenile court if the divertee is under eighteen years of
age; or
(ii) In superior court or the appropriate court of limited
jurisdiction if the divertee is eighteen years of age or older.
(8) The diversion unit shall, subject to available funds, be
responsible for providing interpreters when juveniles need interpreters
to effectively communicate during diversion unit hearings or
negotiations.
(9) The diversion unit shall be responsible for advising a divertee
of his or her rights as provided in this chapter.
(10) The diversion unit may refer a juvenile to a restorative
justice program, community-based counseling, or treatment programs.
(11) The right to counsel shall inure prior to the initial
interview for purposes of advising the juvenile as to whether he or she
desires to participate in the diversion process or to appear in the
juvenile court. The juvenile may be represented by counsel at any
critical stage of the diversion process, including intake interviews
and termination hearings. The juvenile shall be fully advised at the
intake of his or her right to an attorney and of the relevant services
an attorney can provide. For the purpose of this section, intake
interviews mean all interviews regarding the diversion agreement
process.
The juvenile shall be advised that a diversion agreement shall
constitute a part of the juvenile's criminal history as defined by RCW
13.40.020(7). A signed acknowledgment of such advisement shall be
obtained from the juvenile, and the document shall be maintained by the
diversion unit together with the diversion agreement, and a copy of
both documents shall be delivered to the prosecutor if requested by the
prosecutor. The supreme court shall promulgate rules setting forth the
content of such advisement in simple language.
(12) When a juvenile enters into a diversion agreement, the
juvenile court may receive only the following information for
dispositional purposes:
(a) The fact that a charge or charges were made;
(b) The fact that a diversion agreement was entered into;
(c) The juvenile's obligations under such agreement;
(d) Whether the alleged offender performed his or her obligations
under such agreement; and
(e) The facts of the alleged offense.
(13) A diversion unit may refuse to enter into a diversion
agreement with a juvenile. When a diversion unit refuses to enter a
diversion agreement with a juvenile, it shall immediately refer such
juvenile to the court for action and shall forward to the court the
criminal complaint and a detailed statement of its reasons for refusing
to enter into a diversion agreement. The diversion unit shall also
immediately refer the case to the prosecuting attorney for action if
such juvenile violates the terms of the diversion agreement.
(14) A diversion unit may, in instances where it determines that
the act or omission of an act for which a juvenile has been referred to
it involved no victim, or where it determines that the juvenile
referred to it has no prior criminal history and is alleged to have
committed an illegal act involving no threat of or instance of actual
physical harm and involving not more than fifty dollars in property
loss or damage and that there is no loss outstanding to the person or
firm suffering such damage or loss, counsel and release or release such
a juvenile without entering into a diversion agreement. A diversion
unit's authority to counsel and release a juvenile under this
subsection includes the authority to refer the juvenile to community-based counseling or treatment programs or a restorative justice
program. Any juvenile released under this subsection shall be advised
that the act or omission of any act for which he or she had been
referred shall constitute a part of the juvenile's criminal history as
defined by RCW 13.40.020(7). A signed acknowledgment of such
advisement shall be obtained from the juvenile, and the document shall
be maintained by the unit, and a copy of the document shall be
delivered to the prosecutor if requested by the prosecutor. The
supreme court shall promulgate rules setting forth the content of such
advisement in simple language. A juvenile determined to be eligible by
a diversion unit for release as provided in this subsection shall
retain the same right to counsel and right to have his or her case
referred to the court for formal action as any other juvenile referred
to the unit.
(15) A diversion unit may supervise the fulfillment of a diversion
agreement entered into before the juvenile's eighteenth birthday and
which includes a period extending beyond the divertee's eighteenth
birthday.
(16) If a fine required by a diversion agreement cannot reasonably
be paid due to a change of circumstance, the diversion agreement may be
modified at the request of the divertee and with the concurrence of the
diversion unit to convert an unpaid fine into community restitution.
The modification of the diversion agreement shall be in writing and
signed by the divertee and the diversion unit. The number of hours of
community restitution in lieu of a monetary penalty shall be converted
at the rate of the prevailing state minimum wage per hour.
(17) Fines imposed under this section shall be collected and paid
into the county general fund in accordance with procedures established
by the juvenile court administrator under RCW 13.04.040 and may be used
only for juvenile services. In the expenditure of funds for juvenile
services, there shall be a maintenance of effort whereby counties
exhaust existing resources before using amounts collected under this
section.

Sec. 5 RCW 13.40.127 and 2012 c 177 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A juvenile is eligible for deferred disposition unless he or
she:
(a) Is charged with a sex or violent offense;
(b) Has a criminal history which includes any felony;
(c) Has a prior deferred disposition or deferred adjudication; or
(d) Has two or more adjudications.
(2) The juvenile court may, upon motion at least fourteen days
before commencement of trial and, after consulting the juvenile's
custodial parent or parents or guardian and with the consent of the
juvenile, continue the case for disposition for a period not to exceed
one year from the date the juvenile is found guilty. The court shall
consider whether the offender and the community will benefit from a
deferred disposition before deferring the disposition. The court may
waive the fourteen-day period anytime before the commencement of trial
for good cause.
(3) Any juvenile who agrees to a deferral of disposition shall:
(a) Stipulate to the admissibility of the facts contained in the
written police report;
(b) Acknowledge that the report will be entered and used to support
a finding of guilt and to impose a disposition if the juvenile fails to
comply with terms of supervision;
(c) Waive the following rights to: (i) A speedy disposition; and
(ii) call and confront witnesses; and
(d) Acknowledge the direct consequences of being found guilty and
the direct consequences that will happen if an order of disposition is
entered.
The adjudicatory hearing shall be limited to a reading of the
court's record.
(4) Following the stipulation, acknowledgment, waiver, and entry of
a finding or plea of guilt, the court shall defer entry of an order of
disposition of the juvenile.
(5) Any juvenile granted a deferral of disposition under this
section shall be placed under community supervision. The court may
impose any conditions of supervision that it deems appropriate
including posting a probation bond. Payment of restitution under RCW
13.40.190 shall be a condition of community supervision under this
section.
The court may require a juvenile offender convicted of animal
cruelty in the first degree to submit to a mental health evaluation to
determine if the offender would benefit from treatment and such
intervention would promote the safety of the community. After
consideration of the results of the evaluation, as a condition of
community supervision, the court may order the offender to attend
treatment to address issues pertinent to the offense.
The court may require the juvenile to undergo a mental health or
substance abuse assessment, or both. If the assessment identifies a
need for treatment, conditions of supervision may include treatment for
the assessed need that has been demonstrated to improve behavioral
health and reduce recidivism.
(6) A parent who signed for a probation bond has the right to
notify the counselor if the juvenile fails to comply with the bond or
conditions of supervision. The counselor shall notify the court and
surety of any failure to comply. A surety shall notify the court of
the juvenile's failure to comply with the probation bond. The state
shall bear the burden to prove, by a preponderance of the evidence,
that the juvenile has failed to comply with the terms of community
supervision.
(7)(a) Anytime prior to the conclusion of the period of
supervision, the prosecutor or the juvenile's juvenile court community
supervision counselor may file a motion with the court requesting the
court revoke the deferred disposition based on the juvenile's lack of
compliance or treat the juvenile's lack of compliance as a violation
pursuant to RCW 13.40.200.
(b) If the court finds the juvenile failed to comply with the terms
of the deferred disposition, the court may:
(i) Revoke the deferred disposition and enter an order of
disposition; or
(ii) Impose sanctions for the violation pursuant to RCW 13.40.200.
(8) At any time following deferral of disposition the court may,
following a hearing, continue supervision for an additional one-year
period for good cause.
(9)(a) At the conclusion of the period of supervision, the court
shall determine whether the juvenile is entitled to dismissal of the
deferred disposition only when the court finds:
(i) The deferred disposition has not been previously revoked;
(ii) The juvenile has completed the terms of supervision;
(iii) There are no pending motions concerning lack of compliance
pursuant to subsection (7) of this section; and
(iv) The juvenile has either paid the full amount of restitution,
or, made a good faith effort to pay the full amount of restitution
during the period of supervision.
(b) If the court finds the juvenile is entitled to dismissal of the
deferred disposition pursuant to (a) of this subsection, the juvenile's
conviction shall be vacated and the court shall dismiss the case with
prejudice, except that a conviction under RCW 16.52.205 shall not be
vacated. Whenever a case is dismissed with restitution still owing,
the court shall enter a restitution order pursuant to RCW 13.40.190 for
any unpaid restitution. Jurisdiction to enforce payment and modify
terms of the restitution order shall be the same as those set forth in
RCW 13.40.190.
(c) If the court finds the juvenile is not entitled to dismissal of
the deferred disposition pursuant to (a) of this subsection, the court
shall revoke the deferred disposition and enter an order of
disposition. A deferred disposition shall remain a conviction unless
the case is dismissed and the conviction is vacated pursuant to (b) of
this subsection or sealed pursuant to RCW 13.50.050.
(10)(a)(i) Any time the court vacates a conviction pursuant to
subsection (9) of this section, if the juvenile is eighteen years of
age or older and the full amount of restitution ordered has been paid,
the court shall enter a written order sealing the case.
(ii) Any time the court vacates a conviction pursuant to subsection
(9) of this section, if the juvenile is not eighteen years of age or
older and full restitution ordered has been paid, the court shall
schedule an administrative sealing hearing to take place no later than
thirty days after the respondent's eighteenth birthday, at which time
the court shall enter a written order sealing the case. The
respondent's presence at the administrative sealing hearing is not
required.
(iii) Any deferred disposition vacated prior to June 7, 2012, is
not subject to sealing under this subsection.
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a juvenile from
petitioning the court to have the records of his or her deferred
dispositions sealed under RCW 13.50.050 (11) and (12).
(c) Records sealed under this provision shall have the same legal
status as records sealed under RCW 13.50.050.

--- END ---