BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that low-income
students and students of color often do not have access to dual-credit
programs that allow students to earn both high school and college
credits. Low-income students and students of color are
underrepresented in running start. Running start provides a cost-effective way for high school students to obtain college credits. It
also accelerates their progress through the education system. Because
low-income students and students of color are underrepresented in
running start, they are unable to take advantage of its benefits.
Therefore, a pilot project is necessary to improve enrollment among
those populations and to ensure that running start is accessible to all
students.
The purpose of this pilot project is to provide coordination
between middle schools, high schools, and running start college
programs to help address the existing opportunity gap.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The increasing enrollment of underrepresented students in the
running start pilot project shall be facilitated by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and involve close collaboration
and coordination between the participating institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28A.600.300 that have over fifty students
participating in the running start program and school districts with
students participating in that program. School districts of the second
class and nonhigh districts are not required to participate. School
districts must meet with participating institutions of higher education
located within their district and identify a plan for increasing
enrollment of underrepresented students in the running start program.
These meetings may include more than one school district or
participating institution of higher education. A plan identified by
each school district and partnering running start institution must be
provided to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by
August 1, 2014. The plan must include a focus on:
(a) Identifying and implementing strategies to provide outreach
regarding the running start program to underrepresented populations at
middle schools and high schools to ensure that students and families
have information on the program. These strategies should include
outreach efforts conducted by students from underrepresented
populations, representatives from participating institutions of higher
education visiting local high schools, and school districts providing
explicit information sessions regarding running start;
(b) Ensuring better coordination between middle schools, high
schools, and participating institutions of higher education to provide
academic guidance to students who have been underrepresented in the
running start program so that these students are better able to
participate in that program.
(2) By December 1, 2014, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction must provide to appropriate committees of the legislature
guidelines for improving outreach to students who have been
underrepresented in the running start program and collaboration among
middle schools, high schools, and participating institutions of higher
education based on the plans that were reported by school districts and
participating institutions of higher education.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
collect current demographic data from each school district related to
student participation in running start. This data shall be compared
with data collected after two years of collaboration as described in
subsection (1) of this section, and submitted to appropriate committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2016.
(4) This section expires August 1, 2017.

--- END ---