BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71A.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The department:
(1) Shall, within thirty days of admission to a residential
habilitation center, ensure that each resident's individual
habilitation plan includes a plan for discharge to the community;
(2) Shall use a person-centered approach in developing the
discharge plan to assess the resident's needs and identify services the
resident requires to successfully transition to the community,
including:
(a) Providing choice of community living options and providers,
consistent with federal requirements, including offering to place, with
the consent of the resident or his or her guardian, each resident of
the residential habilitation center on the appropriate home and
community-based waiver, as authorized under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n, and
provide continued access to the services through medicaid and through
state funds made available for this purpose that meet his or her
assessed needs;
(b) Providing residents and their families or guardians
opportunities to visit state-operated living alternatives and supported
living options in the community. Such visits must be conducted with
the consent of the residents of these community facilities;
(c) Offering residents leaving a residential habilitation center a
"right to return" to an intermediate care facility for individuals with
disabilities for two years following their move;
(d) Addressing services in addition to those that will be provided
by providers of residential services that are necessary to address the
resident's assessed needs, including:
(i) Medical services;
(ii) Nursing services;
(iii) Dental care;
(iv) Behavioral and mental health supports;
(v) Habilitation services; and
(vi) Employment or other day support;
(3) Shall assure that, prior to discharge from a residential
habilitation center, clients continue to receive services for which
they have an assessed need;
(4) Shall maximize federal funding for transitioning clients, such
as utilizing the roads to community living grant;
(5) Shall use any savings achieved through efficiencies to extend
services, including state-staffed and private contractor-staffed crisis
stabilization and respite services, to people with developmental
disabilities currently receiving limited or no services, consistent
with RCW 71A.10.015;
(6) Shall employ the quality assurance process currently in use by
the department to monitor the adjustment of each resident who leaves a
residential habilitation center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71A.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning November 1, 2013, and annually thereafter, the
department shall submit information to the appropriate committees of
the legislature regarding persons who have transitioned from
residential habilitation centers to the community, for the first two
years following each person's new placement, including:
(a) Progress toward meeting the requirements of this act;
(b) Client and guardian satisfaction with services;
(c) Stability of placement and provider turnover, including
information on returns to a residential habilitation center under
section 1(2)(d) of this act;
(d) Safety and health outcomes;
(e) Types of services received by clients transitioned to the
community; and
(f) Continued accessibility of former residents to family.
(2) This section expires November 1, 2018.

--- END ---