BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.580 and 2004 c 17 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A tenant screening service provider may not disclose (a) a
tenant's, applicant's, or household member's status as a victim of
domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or (b) that a tenant or
applicant has previously terminated a rental agreement under RCW
59.18.575.
(2) A landlord may not terminate a tenancy, fail to renew a
tenancy, or refuse to enter into a rental agreement based on the
tenant's or applicant's or a household member's status as a victim of
domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or based on the tenant
or applicant having terminated a rental agreement under RCW 59.18.575.
(((2))) (3) A tenant screening service provider who discloses
information in violation of subsection (1) of this section or a
landlord who refuses to enter into a rental agreement in violation of
subsection (2) of this section may be liable to the tenant or applicant
in a civil action for damages sustained by the tenant or applicant.
The prevailing party may also recover court costs and reasonable
attorneys' fees.
(((3))) (4) It is a defense to an unlawful detainer action under
chapter 59.12 RCW that the action to remove the tenant and recover
possession of the premises is in violation of subsection (((1))) (2) of
this section.
(((4))) (5) This section does not prohibit adverse housing
decisions based upon other lawful factors within the landlord's
knowledge.

--- END ---