BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.98.100 and 2005 c 282 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
The section shall administer a compliance audit at least once
annually for each prosecuting attorney, district and municipal court,
and originating agency to ensure that all disposition reports have been
received and added to the criminal ((offender)) history record
information described in RCW 43.43.705. The section shall ((prepare
listings of all arrests charged and listed in the)) identify criminal
((offender)) history record information for which no disposition report
has been received and ((which)) has been outstanding for ((more than
nine months)) one year or longer since the date of arrest. Each
((prosecuting attorney, district and municipal court, and originating))
open arrest shall be researched for a final disposition by section
staff or the criminal justice agency shall be furnished a list of
outstanding disposition reports for criminal history record information
of persons who were arrested or against whom charges were filed by that
agency. Each criminal justice agency shall provide the section with a
current disposition report or status within sixty days of receipt of
notification of open arrest. Cases pending prosecution shall be
considered outstanding dispositions in the compliance audit. ((Within
forty-five days, the prosecuting attorney, district and municipal
court, and originating agency shall provide the section with a current
disposition report for each outstanding disposition. The section shall
assist prosecuting attorneys with the compliance audit by cross-checking outstanding cases with the administrative office of the courts
and the department of corrections. The section may provide technical
assistance to prosecuting attorneys, district or municipal courts, or
originating agencies for their compliance audits.)) The results of
compliance audits shall be published annually and distributed to
legislative committees dealing with criminal justice issues, the office
of financial management, and criminal justice agencies and
associations.

--- END ---