BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.70.100 and 2007 c 119 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((No action based upon a health care provider's professional
negligence may be commenced unless the defendant has been given at
least ninety days' notice of the intention to commence the action. The
notice required by this section shall be given by regular mail,
registered mail, or certified mail with return receipt requested, by
depositing the notice, with postage prepaid, in the post office
addressed to the defendant. If the defendant is a health care provider
entity defined in RCW 7.70.020(3) or, at the time of the alleged
professional negligence, was acting as an actual agent or employee of
such a health care provider entity, the notice may be addressed to the
chief executive officer, administrator, office of risk management, if
any, or registered agent for service of process, if any, of such health
care provider entity. Notice for a claim against a local government
entity shall be filed with the agent as identified in RCW 4.96.020(2).
Proof of notice by mail may be made in the same manner as that
prescribed by court rule or statute for proof of service by mail. If
the notice is served within ninety days of the expiration of the
applicable statute of limitations, the time for the commencement of the
action must be extended ninety days from the date the notice was
mailed, and after the ninety-day extension expires, the claimant shall
have an additional five court days to commence the action.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section are not
applicable with respect to any defendant whose name is unknown to the
plaintiff at the time of filing the complaint and who is identified
therein by a fictitious name.
(3) After the filing of the ninety-day presuit notice, and)) Before
a superior court trial, all causes of action, whether based in tort,
contract, or otherwise, for damages arising from injury occurring as a
result of health care provided after July 1, 1993, shall be subject to
mandatory mediation prior to trial except as provided in subsection
(((6))) (4) of this section.
(((4))) (2) The supreme court shall by rule adopt procedures to
implement mandatory mediation of actions under this chapter. The
implementation contemplates the adoption of rules by the supreme court
which will require mandatory mediation without exception unless
subsection (((6))) (4) of this section applies. The rules on mandatory
mediation shall address, at a minimum:
(a) Procedures for the appointment of, and qualifications of,
mediators. A mediator shall have experience or expertise related to
actions arising from injury occurring as a result of health care, and
be a member of the state bar association who has been admitted to the
bar for a minimum of five years or who is a retired judge. The parties
may stipulate to a nonlawyer mediator. The court may prescribe
additional qualifications of mediators;
(b) Appropriate limits on the amount or manner of compensation of
mediators;
(c) The number of days following the filing of a claim under this
chapter within which a mediator must be selected;
(d) The method by which a mediator is selected. The rule shall
provide for designation of a mediator by the superior court if the
parties are unable to agree upon a mediator;
(e) The number of days following the selection of a mediator within
which a mediation conference must be held;
(f) A means by which mediation of an action under this chapter may
be waived by a mediator who has determined that the claim is not
appropriate for mediation; and
(g) Any other matters deemed necessary by the court.
(((5))) (3) Mediators shall not impose discovery schedules upon the
parties.
(((6))) (4) The mandatory mediation requirement of subsection
(((4))) (2) of this section does not apply to an action subject to
mandatory arbitration under chapter 7.06 RCW or to an action in which
the parties have agreed, subsequent to the arisal of the claim, to
submit the claim to arbitration under chapter 7.04A or 7.70A RCW.
(((7))) (5) The implementation also contemplates the adoption of a
rule by the supreme court for procedures for the parties to certify to
the court the manner of mediation used by the parties to comply with
this section.

--- END ---