BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.32.534 and 1999 c 179 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To implement an impaired dentist program as authorized by RCW
18.130.175, the commission shall enter into a contract with a voluntary
substance abuse monitoring program. The impaired dentist program may
include any or all of the following:
(a) Contracting with providers of treatment programs;
(b) Receiving and evaluating reports of suspected impairment from
any source;
(c) Intervening in cases of verified impairment;
(d) Referring impaired dentists to treatment programs;
(e) Monitoring the treatment and rehabilitation of impaired
dentists including those ordered by the commission;
(f) Providing education, prevention of impairment, posttreatment
monitoring, and support of rehabilitated impaired dentists; and
(g) Performing other related activities as determined by the
commission.
(2) A contract entered into under subsection (1) of this section
shall be financed by a surcharge of up to ((twenty-five)) fifty dollars
on each license issuance or renewal to be collected by the department
of health from every dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW. These
moneys shall be placed in the health professions account to be used
solely for the implementation of the impaired dentist program.

--- END ---