BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 28B.50.873 (Reduction in force of
tenured or probationary faculty members due to financial emergency--Conditions -- Procedure -- Rights) and 1991 c 238 s 72, 1990 c 33 s 559,
1989 c 175 s 81, & 1981 2nd ex.s. c 13 s 1 are each repealed.

--- END ---