BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.50.100 and 2012 c 228 s 5 and 2012 c 148 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
There is hereby created a board of trustees for each college
district as set forth in this chapter. Each board of trustees shall be
composed of five trustees, except as provided in RCW 28B.50.102, who
shall be appointed by the governor for terms commencing October 1st of
the year in which appointed. In making such appointments the governor
shall give consideration to geographical diversity, and representing
labor, business, women, and racial and ethnic minorities, in the
membership of the boards of trustees. The boards of trustees ((for
districts containing technical colleges)) shall include at least one
member from business and one member from labor.
The successors of the trustees initially appointed shall be
appointed by the governor to serve for a term of five years except that
any person appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the
expiration of any term shall be appointed only for the remainder of the
term. Each member shall serve until a successor is appointed and
qualified.
Every trustee shall be a resident and qualified elector of the
college district. No trustee may be an employee of the community and
technical college system, a member of the board of directors of any
school district, or a member of the governing board of any public or
private educational institution.
Each board of trustees shall organize itself by electing a chairman
from its members. The board shall adopt a seal and may adopt such
bylaws, rules and regulations as it deems necessary for its own
government. Three members of the board shall constitute a quorum, but
a lesser number may adjourn from time to time and may compel the
attendance of absent members in such manner as prescribed in its
bylaws, rules, or regulations. The district president, or if there be
none, the president of the college, shall serve as, or may designate
another person to serve as, the secretary of the board, who shall not
be deemed to be a member of the board.
Each board of trustees shall follow procedures for open public
meetings in chapter 42.30 RCW. Each board shall provide time for
public comment at each meeting.
Members of the boards of trustees may be removed for misconduct or
malfeasance in office in the manner provided by RCW 28B.10.500.

--- END ---