BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35A.14.295 and 1997 c 429 s 36 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a code city may resolve to annex
territory containing residential property owners to the city if there
is within the city, unincorporated territory:
(a) Containing less than one hundred acres and having at least
eighty percent of the boundaries of such area contiguous to the code
city; or
(b) Of any size and having ((at least eighty percent)) all of the
boundaries of such area contiguous to the city ((if such area existed
before June 30, 1994)), and is within the same county and within the
same urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110, and the city
((was)) is planning under chapter 36.70A RCW ((as of June 30, 1994)).
(2) The resolution shall describe the boundaries of the area to be
annexed, state the number of voters residing therein as nearly as may
be, and set a date for a public hearing on such resolution for
annexation. Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication of the
resolution at least once a week for two weeks prior to the date of the
hearing, in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
code city and one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
area to be annexed.
(3) For purposes of subsection (1)(b) of this section, territory
bounded by a river, lake, or other body of water is considered
contiguous to a city that is also bounded by the same river, lake, or
other body of water.

--- END ---