BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.210.260 and 2012 c 16 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Public school districts and private schools which conduct any of
grades kindergarten through the twelfth grade may provide for the
administration of oral medication, topical medication, eye drops,
((or)) ear drops, or nasal spray, of any nature to students who are in
the custody of the school district or school at the time of
administration, but are not required to do so by this section, subject
to the following conditions:
(1) The board of directors of the public school district or the
governing board of the private school or, if none, the chief
administrator of the private school shall adopt policies which address
the designation of employees who may administer oral medications,
topical medications, eye drops, ((or)) ear drops, or nasal spray to
students, the acquisition of parent requests and instructions, and the
acquisition of requests from licensed health professionals prescribing
within the scope of their prescriptive authority and instructions
regarding students who require medication for more than fifteen
consecutive school days, the identification of the medication to be
administered, the means of safekeeping medications with special
attention given to the safeguarding of legend drugs as defined in
chapter 69.41 RCW, and the means of maintaining a record of the
administration of such medication;
(2) The board of directors shall seek advice from one or more
licensed physicians or nurses in the course of developing the foregoing
policies;
(3) The public school district or private school is in receipt of
a written, current and unexpired request from a parent, or a legal
guardian, or other person having legal control over the student to
administer the medication to the student;
(4) The public school district or the private school is in receipt
of (a) a written, current and unexpired request from a licensed health
professional prescribing within the scope of his or her prescriptive
authority for administration of the medication, as there exists a valid
health reason which makes administration of such medication advisable
during the hours when school is in session or the hours in which the
student is under the supervision of school officials, and (b) written,
current and unexpired instructions from such licensed health
professional prescribing within the scope of his or her prescriptive
authority regarding the administration of prescribed medication to
students who require medication for more than fifteen consecutive
workdays;
(5) The medication is administered by an employee designated by or
pursuant to the policies adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section and in substantial compliance with the prescription of a
licensed health professional prescribing within the scope of his or her
prescriptive authority or the written instructions provided pursuant to
subsection (4) of this section. If a school nurse is on the premises,
a nasal spray that is a legend drug or a controlled substance must be
administered by the school nurse. If no school nurse is on the
premises, a nasal spray that is a legend drug or a controlled substance
may be administered by a school employee who is not a school nurse.
After a school employee who is not a school nurse administers a nasal
spray that is a legend drug or a controlled substance, the employee
shall summon emergency medical assistance as soon as practicable;
(6) The medication is first examined by the employee administering
the same to determine in his or her judgment that it appears to be in
the original container and to be properly labeled; and
(7) The board of directors shall designate a professional person
licensed pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW or chapter 18.79 RCW as it
applies to registered nurses and advanced registered nurse
practitioners, to delegate to, train, and supervise the designated
school district personnel in proper medication procedures.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.210.270 and 2012 c 16 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the event a school employee administers oral medication,
topical medication, eye drops, ((or)) ear drops, or nasal spray to a
student pursuant to RCW 28A.210.260 in substantial compliance with the
prescription of the student's licensed health professional prescribing
within the scope of the professional's prescriptive authority or the
written instructions provided pursuant to RCW 28A.210.260(4), and the
other conditions set forth in RCW 28A.210.260 have been substantially
complied with, then the employee, the employee's school district or
school of employment, and the members of the governing board and chief
administrator thereof shall not be liable in any criminal action or for
civil damages in their individual or marital or governmental or
corporate or other capacities as a result of the administration of the
medication.
(2) The administration of oral medication, topical medication, eye
drops, ((or)) ear drops, or nasal spray to any student pursuant to RCW
28A.210.260 may be discontinued by a public school district or private
school and the school district or school, its employees, its chief
administrator, and members of its governing board shall not be liable
in any criminal action or for civil damages in their governmental or
corporate or individual or marital or other capacities as a result of
the discontinuance of such administration: PROVIDED, That the chief
administrator of the public school district or private school, or his
or her designee, has first provided actual notice orally or in writing
in advance of the date of discontinuance to a parent or legal guardian
of the student or other person having legal control over the student.

--- END ---