BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.35.202 and 2012 c 229 s 810 are each amended to
read as follows:
The boards of trustees of Central Washington University, Eastern
Washington University, and Western Washington University may offer
educational specialist degrees.

--- END ---