BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds as follows:
(a) Over fifteen thousand individuals have been determined by the
department of social and health services' division of developmental
disabilities to be eligible for services but are currently not
receiving paid services or supports;
(b) There is not a significant difference between the division of
developmental disabilities case loads of those who receive and those
who do not receive services; and
(c) Most people with developmental disabilities live with their
parents, even into adulthood, and supporting and providing care by
parents can be a stressful activity especially as the parents
themselves age.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends that fairness and equity be
applied in cases between those who receive no paid services from the
division of developmental disabilities and those who do receive
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Within funds provided by the legislature for this purpose, the
department must expand the informing families building trust
communication project to provide information to individuals and
families on the no paid services case load about the developmental
disabilities system. The information should assist families in
planning as their children reach points of transitions. The department
must assist the developmental disabilities council to reach clients on
the no paid services case load.

Sec. 3 RCW 71A.12.161 and 2009 c 312 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The individual and family services program for individuals
eligible to receive services under this title is established. This
program replaces family support opportunities, traditional family
support, and the flexible family support pilot program. The department
shall transfer funding associated with these existing family support
programs to the individual and family services program and shall
operate the program within available funding. The services provided
under the individual and family services program shall be funded by
state funding without benefit of federal match.
(2) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.
The rules shall provide:
(a) That eligibility to receive services in the individual and
family services program be determined solely by an assessment of
individual need;
(b) For service priority levels to be developed that specify a
maximum amount of dollars for each person per level per year;
(c) That the dollar caps for each service priority level be
adjusted by the vendor rate increases authorized by the legislature;
and
(d) That the following services be available under the program:
(i) Respite care;
(ii) Therapies;
(iii) Architectural and vehicular modifications;
(iv) Equipment and supplies;
(v) Specialized nutrition and clothing;
(vi) Excess medical costs not covered by another source;
(vii) Copays for medical and therapeutic services;
(viii) Transportation;
(ix) Training;
(x) Counseling;
(xi) Behavior management;
(xii) Parent/sibling education;
(xiii) Recreational opportunities; and
(xiv) Community services grants.
(3) In addition to services provided for the service priority
levels under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the department
shall provide for:
(a) One-time exceptional needs and emergency needs for individuals
and families not receiving individual and family services annual grants
to assist individuals and families who experience a short-term crisis;
and
(b) Respite services based on the department's assessment for:
(i) A parent who provides personal care in the home to his or her
adult son or daughter with developmental disabilities; or
(ii) A family member who replaces the parent as the primary
caregiver, resides with, and provides personal care in the home for the
adult with developmental disabilities.
(4)(a) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2014, and within funds
provided by the legislature for this purpose, the department must
provide services under the individual and family services program for
one thousand persons who have requested such services and who are not
receiving any paid services from the department.
(b) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2015, and within funds
provided by the legislature for this purpose, the department must
provide services under the individual and family services program for
one thousand persons who have requested such services and who are not
receiving any paid services from the department.
(5) If a person has more complex needs, a family is experiencing a
more prolonged crisis, or it is determined a person needs additional
services, the department shall assess the individual to determine if
placement in a waiver program would be appropriate.

--- END ---