BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.100 and 2009 c 183 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
groundwater right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
groundwaters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location in
substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or
the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.
(2) An amendment to construct replacement or a new additional well
or wells at a location outside of the location of the original well or
wells or to change the manner or place of use of the water shall be
issued only after publication of notice of the application and findings
as prescribed in the case of an original application. Such amendment
shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that: (a) The
additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public groundwater as the original well or wells; (b) where a
replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well or
wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be
properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where
an additional well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells
may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the
original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d) other existing
rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an approved
manner of construction and shall require a showing of compliance with
the terms of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of
an original permit.
(3)(a)(i) When an amendment would move an existing permit or
certificate's annual quantity or portion thereof to another existing
right held by the applicant and meets the following conditions: (A)
The move of the point of withdrawal of the groundwater right's annual
quantity or a portion thereof is within the same body of groundwater
and further from a hydraulically connected surface water body; or (B)
the move of the point of withdrawal of the groundwater right's annual
quantity or a portion thereof is to a lower aquifer depth or unit
within the same body of public groundwater in the same watershed, as
that term is defined in RCW 90.74.010; or (C) the move is within the
same body of public groundwater that discharges into saltwater; and (D)
each individual water right's instantaneous quantity is not increased;
and (E) the annual quantity of water of the two amended rights does not
exceed the annual quantity of water granted under the combined
individual underlying water rights; and (F) the applicant provides a
hydrological analysis showing there is no impairment or reduced
impairment of an existing water right; and (G) the applicant complies
with the notice requirements of RCW 90.03.280; and (H) the applicant
provides the department with a draft report of examination identifying
the satisfaction of the criteria of this subsection; then
(ii) The department's consideration is limited to the determination
of the scope and validity of the existing rights and whether the
hydrological analysis presented by the applicant sufficiently
demonstrates that existing water rights will not be impaired or any
impairment will be less than that which would potentially occur under
the unamended rights.
(b) The department shall promptly determine the completeness of
applications satisfying the conditions of this subsection, assist the
applicant with advertising notice of the application, and post notice
of the application on the department's web site. Any third party who
alleges that the third party's senior water right will be impaired by
the proposed change may file a letter of concern or support with the
department and the department may consider the concern or support
expressed in the letter. These letters must be received by the
department within thirty days of the department's posting of the notice
of application. The director shall review the application and take
action to review and approve or deny it within one hundred twenty days
of posting notice. The one hundred twenty-day time period may be
extended for an additional one hundred twenty days by the director or
at the request of the applicant. If the director fails to act within
the prescribed time period, the application is deemed approved and is
appealable pursuant to RCW 43.21B.230(1) and 43.21B.310(4).
(4) The construction of a replacement or new additional well or
wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be allowed
without application to the department for an amendment. However, the
following apply to such a replacement or new additional well: (a) The
well shall tap the same body of public groundwater as the original well
or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the use of the
original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or
wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104
RCW; (c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original water use permit or certificate; (d) the
construction and use of the well shall not interfere with or impair
water rights with an earlier date of priority than the water right or
rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement or
additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a
well it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an
approved manner of construction of the well; and (g) the department
shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this
subsection (((3))) (4).
(((4))) (5) As used in this section, the "location of the original
well or wells" is the area described as the point of withdrawal in the
original public notice published for the application for the water
right for the well.
(((5))) (6) The development and use of a small irrigation
impoundment, as defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a
change or amendment for the purposes of this section. The exemption
expressly provided by this subsection shall not be construed as
requiring an amendment of any existing water right to enable the holder
of the right to store water governed by the right.
(((6))) (7) This section does not apply to a water right involved
in an approved local water plan created under RCW 90.92.090 or a banked
water right under RCW 90.92.070.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.44.100 and 2003 c 329 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
groundwater right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
groundwaters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location in
substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or
the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.
(2) An amendment to construct replacement or a new additional well
or wells at a location outside of the location of the original well or
wells or to change the manner or place of use of the water shall be
issued only after publication of notice of the application and findings
as prescribed in the case of an original application. Such amendment
shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that: (a) The
additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public groundwater as the original well or wells; (b) where a
replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well or
wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be
properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where
an additional well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells
may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the
original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d) other existing
rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an approved
manner of construction and shall require a showing of compliance with
the terms of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of
an original permit.
(3)(a)(i) When an amendment would move an existing permit or
certificate's annual quantity or portion thereof to another existing
right held by the applicant and meets the following conditions: (A)
The move of the point of withdrawal of the groundwater right's annual
quantity or a portion thereof is within the same body of groundwater
and further from a hydraulically connected surface water body; or (B)
the move of the point of withdrawal of the groundwater right's annual
quantity or a portion thereof is to a lower aquifer depth or unit
within the same body of public groundwater in the same watershed, as
that term is defined in RCW 90.74.010; or (C) the move is within the
same body of public groundwater that discharges into saltwater; and (D)
each individual water right's instantaneous quantity is not increased;
and (E) the annual quantity of water of the two amended rights does not
exceed the annual quantity of water granted under the combined
individual underlying water rights; and (F) the applicant provides a
hydrological analysis showing there is no impairment or reduced
impairment of an existing water right; and (G) the applicant complies
with the notice requirements of RCW 90.03.280; and (H) the applicant
provides the department with a draft report of examination identifying
the satisfaction of the criteria of this subsection; then
(ii) The department's consideration is limited to the determination
of the scope and validity of the existing rights and whether the
hydrological analysis presented by the applicant sufficiently
demonstrates that existing water rights will not be impaired or any
impairment will be less than that which would potentially occur under
the unamended rights.
(b) The department shall promptly determine the completeness of
applications satisfying the conditions of this subsection, assist the
applicant with advertising notice of the application, and post notice
of the application on the department's web site. Any third party who
alleges that the third party's senior water right will be impaired by
the proposed change may file a letter of concern or support with the
department and the department may consider the concern or support
expressed in the letter. These letters must be received by the
department within thirty days of the department's posting of the notice
of application. The director shall review the application and take
action to review and approve or deny it within one hundred twenty days
of posting notice. The one hundred twenty-day time period may be
extended for an additional one hundred twenty days by the director or
at the request of the applicant. If the director fails to act within
the prescribed time period, the application is deemed approved and is
appealable pursuant to RCW 43.21B.230(1) and 43.21B.310(4).
(4) The construction of a replacement or new additional well or
wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be allowed
without application to the department for an amendment. However, the
following apply to such a replacement or new additional well: (a) The
well shall tap the same body of public groundwater as the original well
or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the use of the
original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or
wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104
RCW; (c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original water use permit or certificate; (d) the
construction and use of the well shall not interfere with or impair
water rights with an earlier date of priority than the water right or
rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement or
additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a
well it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an
approved manner of construction of the well; and (g) the department
shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this
subsection (((3))) (4).
(((4))) (5) As used in this section, the "location of the original
well or wells" is the area described as the point of withdrawal in the
original public notice published for the application for the water
right for the well.
(((5))) (6) The development and use of a small irrigation
impoundment, as defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a
change or amendment for the purposes of this section. The exemption
expressly provided by this subsection shall not be construed as
requiring an amendment of any existing water right to enable the holder
of the right to store water governed by the right.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect June 30,
2019.

--- END ---