BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.100 and 2009 c 183 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
groundwater right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
groundwaters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location in
substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or
the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.
(2) An amendment to construct replacement or a new additional well
or wells at a location outside of the location of the original well or
wells or to change the manner or place of use of the water shall be
issued only after publication of notice of the application and findings
as prescribed in the case of an original application. Such amendment
shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that: (a) The
additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public groundwater as the original well or wells; (b) where a
replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well or
wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be
properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where
an additional well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells
may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the
original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d) other existing
rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an approved
manner of construction and shall require a showing of compliance with
the terms of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of
an original permit.
(3) The construction of a replacement or new additional well or
wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be allowed
without application to the department for an amendment. However, the
following apply to such a replacement or new additional well: (a) The
well shall tap the same body of public groundwater as the original well
or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the use of the
original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or
wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104
RCW; (c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original water use permit or certificate; (d) the
construction and use of the well shall not interfere with or impair
water rights with an earlier date of priority than the water right or
rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement or
additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a
well it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an
approved manner of construction of the well; and (g) the department
shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this
subsection (3).
(4) As used in this section, the "location of the original well or
wells" is the area described as the point of withdrawal in the original
public notice published for the application for the water right for the
well.
(5) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring an amendment of any
existing water right to enable the holder of the right to store water
governed by the right.
(6)(a) An application or applications to consolidate the annual
quantities of multiple water rights or permits from the same body of
public groundwater held by the applicant must be approved by the
department under the limited review identified in (b) of this
subsection when:
(i)(A) The annual quantity of water of the consolidated water
rights and permits does not exceed the annual quantity of water granted
under the combined individual underlying water rights or permits;
(B) Each individual water right's instantaneous quantity is not
increased;
(C) The applicant provides a hydrological analysis showing there is
no impairment or reduced potential impairment of existing water rights;
(D) The applicant complies with the notice requirements of RCW
90.03.280; and
(E) The applicant provides the department with a draft report of
examination identifying the satisfaction of the criteria of this
subsection; and
(ii) The department, in a review limited to existing water rights
as provided in (b) of this subsection, finds that existing water rights
will not be impaired or potential impairment is reduced.
(b) The department's consideration under this subsection is limited
to the determination of the following:
(i) The scope and validity or the rights for which the application
is submitted; and
(ii) Whether the hydrological analysis presented by the applicant
sufficiently demonstrates that existing water rights will not be
impaired or any impairment will be less than that which would
potentially occur under the unamended rights.
(7) This section does not apply to a water right involved in an
approved local water plan created under RCW 90.92.090 or a banked water
right under RCW 90.92.070.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.44.100 and 2003 c 329 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
groundwater right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
groundwaters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location in
substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or
the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.
(2) An amendment to construct replacement or a new additional well
or wells at a location outside of the location of the original well or
wells or to change the manner or place of use of the water shall be
issued only after publication of notice of the application and findings
as prescribed in the case of an original application. Such amendment
shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that: (a) The
additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public groundwater as the original well or wells; (b) where a
replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well or
wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be
properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where
an additional well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells
may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the
original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d) other existing
rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an approved
manner of construction and shall require a showing of compliance with
the terms of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of
an original permit.
(3) The construction of a replacement or new additional well or
wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be allowed
without application to the department for an amendment. However, the
following apply to such a replacement or new additional well: (a) The
well shall tap the same body of public groundwater as the original well
or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the use of the
original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or
wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104
RCW; (c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original water use permit or certificate; (d) the
construction and use of the well shall not interfere with or impair
water rights with an earlier date of priority than the water right or
rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement or
additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a
well it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an
approved manner of construction of the well; and (g) the department
shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this
subsection (3).
(4) As used in this section, the "location of the original well or
wells" is the area described as the point of withdrawal in the original
public notice published for the application for the water right for the
well.
(5) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring an amendment of any
existing water right to enable the holder of the right to store water
governed by the right.
(6)(a) An application or applications to consolidate the annual
quantities of multiple water rights or permits from the same body of
public groundwater held by the applicant must be approved by the
department under the limited review identified in (b) of this
subsection when:
(i)(A) The annual quantity of water of the consolidated water
rights and permits does not exceed the annual quantity of water granted
under the combined individual underlying water rights or permits;
(B) Each individual water right's instantaneous quantity is not
increased;
(C) The applicant provides a hydrological analysis showing there is
no impairment or reduced potential impairment of existing water rights;
(D) The applicant complies with the notice requirements of RCW
90.03.280; and
(E) The applicant provides the department with a draft report of
examination identifying the satisfaction of the criteria of this
subsection; and
(ii) The department, in a review limited to existing water rights
as provided in (b) of this subsection, finds that existing water rights
will not be impaired or potential impairment is reduced.
(b) The department's consideration under this subsection is limited
to the determination of the following:
(i) The scope and validity or the rights for which the application
is submitted; and
(ii) Whether the hydrological analysis presented by the applicant
sufficiently demonstrates that existing water rights will not be
impaired or any impairment will be less than that which would
potentially occur under the unamended rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect June 30,
2019.

--- END ---