BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.480 and 1984 c 220 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The following property shall be exempt from taxation:)) (1)
Except as provided otherwise in subsection (2) of this section, the
real and personal property of a nonprofit fair association that
sponsors or conducts a fair or fairs ((which)) that receive support
from ((revenues collected pursuant to RCW 67.16.100 and allocated by
the director of the department of agriculture. To be exempt under this
section, the property must be used exclusively for fair purposes,
except as provided in RCW 84.36.805. However, the loan or rental of
property otherwise exempt under this section to a private
concessionaire or to any person for use as a concession in conjunction
with activities permitted under this section shall not nullify the
exemption if the concession charges are subject to agreement and the
rental income, if any, is reasonable and is devoted solely to the
operation and maintenance of the property.)) the fair fund, as created
in RCW 15.76.115 and allocated by the director of the department of
agriculture, is exempt from taxation.
(2) A nonprofit fair association with real and personal property
valued at more than fifty million dollars is not eligible for the
exemption under this section.

--- END ---