BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.215.020 and 1999 c 335 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person may represent oneself as a surgical technologist by use
of any title or description, or perform the functions of a surgical
technologist, without being registered by the department under the
provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.215 RCW
to read as follows:
In order to perform functions in a hospital licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW, a registered surgical technologist must first submit
evidence of any one of the following to the department in a manner
acceptable to the secretary:
(1) Successful completion of a nationally and programmatically
accredited surgical technology program;
(2) Successful completion of a surgical technology program offered
by the United States armed forces; or
(3) Performance of surgical technology functions in a hospital for
a period of one year in the five years immediately preceding January 1,
2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.215 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter prohibits or affects:
(1) A person licensed under this title acting within his or her
scope of practice;
(2) A person performing functions in the discharge of official
duties on behalf of the United States government including, but not
limited to, the armed forces, coast guard, public health service,
veterans' bureau, or bureau of Indian affairs; or
(3) A person completing the clinical portion of a surgical
technology education program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of health shall adopt rules
necessary to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act take effect
August 1, 2014.

--- END ---