BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that more than three
hundred sixty thousand people in the United States experience cardiac
arrest outside of a hospital every year, and only ten percent survive
because the remainder do not receive timely cardiopulmonary
resuscitation. When administered immediately, cardiopulmonary
resuscitation doubles or triples survival rates from cardiac arrest.
Sudden cardiac arrest can happen to anyone at any time. Many victims
appear healthy and have no known heart disease or other risk factors.
The legislature finds that schools are the hearts of our community, and
preparing students to help with a sudden cardiac arrest emergency could
save the life of a child, parent, or teacher. Washington state has a
longstanding history of training members of the public in
cardiopulmonary resuscitation with community-based training programs.
The legislature finds that training students will continue the legacy
of providing high quality emergency cardiac care to its citizens.
Therefore, the legislature intends to create a generation of lifesavers
by putting cardiopulmonary resuscitation skills in the hands of all
high school graduates and providing schools with a flexible framework
to prepare for an emergency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) An automated external defibrillator is often a critical
component in the chain of survival for a cardiac arrest victim.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with school districts and stakeholder groups, shall
develop guidance for a medical emergency response and automated
external defibrillator program for high schools.
(3) The medical emergency response and automated external
defibrillator program must comply with current evidence-based guidance
from the American heart association or other national science
organization.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the department of health, shall assist districts in
carrying out a program under this section, including providing
guidelines and advice for seeking grants for the purchase of automated
external defibrillators or seeking donations of automated external
defibrillators. The superintendent may coordinate with local health
districts or other organizations in seeking grants and donations for
this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Each school district that operates a high school must offer
instruction in cardiopulmonary resuscitation to students as provided in
this section. Beginning with the 2013-14 school year, instruction in
cardiopulmonary resuscitation must be included in at least one health
class necessary for graduation.
(2) Instruction in cardiopulmonary resuscitation under this section
must:
(a) Be an instructional program developed by the American heart
association or the American red cross or be nationally recognized and
based on the most current national evidence-based emergency
cardiovascular care guidelines for cardiopulmonary resuscitation;
(b) Include appropriate use of an automated external defibrillator;
and
(c) Incorporate hands-on practice in addition to cognitive
learning.
(3) School districts may offer the instruction in cardiopulmonary
resuscitation directly or arrange for the instruction to be provided by
available community-based providers. The instruction is not required
to be provided by a certificated teacher. Certificated teachers
providing the instruction are not required to be certified trainers of
cardiopulmonary resuscitation. A student is not required to earn
certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation to successfully complete
the instruction for the purposes of this section.

--- END ---