BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.146.070 and 2008 c 299 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When making grants or loans for water pollution control
facilities, the department shall consider the following:
(a) The protection of water quality and public health;
(b) The cost to residential ratepayers if they had to finance water
pollution control facilities without state assistance;
(c) Actions required under federal and state permits and compliance
orders;
(d) The level of local fiscal effort by residential ratepayers
since 1972 in financing water pollution control facilities;
(e) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 70.146.110, whether the
entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW
90.71.010;
(f) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310;
(g) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 70.146.120, and effective
one calendar year following the development and statewide availability
of model evergreen community management plans and ordinances under RCW
35.105.050, whether the project is sponsored by an entity that has been
recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the
evergreen community recognition program created in RCW 35.105.030;
(h) The extent to which the applicant county or city, or if the
applicant is another public body, the extent to which the county or
city in which the applicant public body is located, has established
programs to mitigate nonpoint pollution of the surface or subterranean
water sought to be protected by the water pollution control facility
named in the application for state assistance; and
(i) The recommendations of the Puget Sound partnership, created in
RCW 90.71.210, and any other board, council, commission, or group
established by the legislature or a state agency to study water
pollution control issues in the state.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 may not receive a grant or loan for water
pollution control facilities unless it has adopted a comprehensive
plan, including a capital facilities plan element, and development
regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not
require any county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to
adopt a comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting
or receiving a grant or loan under this chapter if such request is made
before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040.
A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 which has not
adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations within the
time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited from
receiving a grant or loan under this chapter if the comprehensive plan
and development regulations are adopted as required by RCW 36.70A.040
before submitting a request for a grant or loan.
(3) Whenever the department is considering awarding grants or loans
for public facilities to special districts requesting funding for a
proposed facility located in a county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040, it shall consider whether the county, city, or town
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the
proposed facility is located has adopted a comprehensive plan and
development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(4) When making loans for water pollution control facilities, the
department may provide loans to publicly owned industrial wastewater
treatment facilities that relieve a city of the burden of processing
industrial wastewater.
(5) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
effects of water pollution on Puget Sound may be funded under this
chapter only if the project is not in conflict with the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.50A.030 and 2007 c 341 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall use the moneys in the water pollution control
revolving fund to provide financial assistance as provided in the water
quality act of 1987 and as provided in RCW 90.50A.040:
(1) To make loans, on the condition that:
(a) Such loans are made at or below market interest rates,
including interest free loans, at terms not to exceed twenty years;
(b) Annual principal and interest payments will commence not later
than one year after completion of any project and all loans will be
fully amortized not later then twenty years after project completion;
(c) The recipient of a loan will establish a dedicated source of
revenue for repayment of loans; and
(d) The fund will be credited with all payments of principal and
interest on all loans.
(2) Loans may be made for the following purposes:
(a) To public bodies for the construction or replacement of water
pollution control facilities as defined in section 212 of the federal
water quality act of 1987;
(b) For the implementation of a management program established
under section 319 of the federal water quality act of 1987 relating to
the management of nonpoint sources of pollution, subject to the
requirements of that act; ((and))
(c) For development and implementation of a conservation and
management plan under section 320 of the federal water quality act of
1987 relating to the national estuary program, subject to the
requirements of that act; and
(d) For the planning, design, and construction of publicly owned
wastewater treatment facilities, including publicly owned industrial
wastewater treatment facilities that relieve a city of the burden of
processing industrial wastewater.
(3) The department may also use the moneys in the fund for the
following purposes:
(a) To buy or refinance the water pollution control facilities'
debt obligations of public bodies at or below market rates, if such
debt was incurred after March 7, 1985;
(b) To guarantee, or purchase insurance for, public body
obligations for water pollution control facility construction or
replacement or activities if the guarantee or insurance would improve
credit market access or reduce interest rates, or to provide loans to
a public body for this purpose;
(c) As a source of revenue or security for the payment of principal
and interest on revenue or general obligation bonds issued by the state
if the proceeds of the sale of such bonds will be deposited in the
fund;
(d) To earn interest on fund accounts; and
(e) To pay the expenses of the department in administering the
water pollution control revolving fund according to administrative
reserves authorized by federal and state law.
(4) The department shall present a biennial progress report on the
use of moneys from the account to the appropriate committees of the
legislature. The report shall consist of a list of each recipient,
project description, and amount of the grant, loan, or both.
(5) The department may not use the moneys in the water pollution
control revolving fund for grants.

--- END ---