BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that in 2008 the
legislature passed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6468, which
provided temporary tax relief for honey beekeepers. The legislature
further finds that the 2008 legislation included the following intent
language: "The legislature finds that recent occurrences of colony
collapse disorder and the resulting loss of bee hives will have an
economic impact on the state's agricultural sector. The legislature
intends to provide temporary business and occupation tax relief for
Washington's apiarists." The legislature further finds that in 2013,
colony collapse disorder is still a significant problem for the apiary
industry.
(2) Because of the continuing problems associated with colony
collapse disorder, it is the legislature's intent to extend the tax
relief provided in the 2008 legislation, subject to a rigorous and
periodic review of the health of honey bee colonies in Washington to
determine whether colony collapse disorder is still a significant
problem in the apiary industry. It is the legislature's intent that
the tax relief provided in this act will not be extended when data
indicates that honey bee colony survivorship has improved, as provided
in the colony collapse disorder progress report, published annually by
the United States department of agriculture, and data provided by the
Washington state department of agriculture to the joint legislative
audit and review committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of feed
to an eligible apiarist for use in the raising of a bee colony used to
make honey bee products.
(2) This exemption is available only if the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department.
(3) The definitions in RCW 82.04.629 apply to this section.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of feed to an eligible apiarist for use in the raising of a bee
colony used to make honey bee products.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.04.629 apply to this section.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.136 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As part of the joint legislative audit and review committee's
tax preference review under this chapter for the tax preferences
contained within this act, the joint legislative audit and review
committee must also evaluate whether Washington state taxes are a
disproportionately large percentage of the commercial beekeeper's
operational or capital costs, including an analysis of the impact of
Washington state taxes on similar sized businesses.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A honey bee work group must be created
to address challenges facing the honey bee industry and to develop a
report outlining solutions that bolster the use of Washington honey bee
colonies used to pollinate tree fruits, berries, and seeds. The work
group must include the following members: Two members from the
Washington state beekeepers association; one apiarist as defined in RCW
15.60.005 with no less than one thousand hives; one apiarist as defined
in RCW 15.60.005 with no more than twenty-five hives; one member from
the Washington State University apiary lab; one member from the
Washington state department of agriculture; one member from the tree
fruit industry; and one member from the seed industry.
(2) The work group may include or seek input from other agencies,
organizations, or stakeholders. By December 31, 2013, and in
compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the work group must submit a report to
the legislature that includes the following: (a) Proposed changes to
the industry's tax structure to increase competitiveness with out-of-state beekeepers for pollination contracts; (b) providing analytics and
metrics to measure the value of the proposed tax structure changes; (c)
proposed additional resources needed to continue applied and basic
research to support commercial beekeepers in the state and to recover
colony losses; (d) identifying colony levels needed to meet the
pollination demands of the Washington agricultural industry; (e)
identifying other policy changes that would increase the
competitiveness of Washington beekeepers; (f) other industry needs that
would increase the market share of pollination contracts awarded to
Washington beekeepers; and (g) metrics needed to provide accountability
for state resources invested in the honey bee industry.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.04.629 and 2008 c 314 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts derived from the
wholesale sale of honey bee products by an eligible apiarist who owns
or keeps bee colonies and who does not qualify for an exemption under
RCW 82.04.330 in respect to such sales.
(2) The exemption provided in subsection (1) of this section does
not apply to any person selling such products at retail or to any
person selling manufactured substances or articles.
(3) The following definitions in this subsection apply ((to))
throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Bee colony" means a natural group of honey bees containing
seven thousand or more workers and one or more queens, housed in a man-made hive with movable frames, and operated as a beekeeping unit.
(b) "Eligible apiarist" means a person who owns or keeps one or
more bee colonies and who grows, raises, or produces honey bee products
for sale at wholesale and is registered under RCW 15.60.021.
(c) "Honey bee products" means queen honey bees, packaged honey
bees, honey, pollen, bees wax, propolis, or other substances obtained
from honey bees. "Honey bee products" does not include manufactured
substances or articles.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2016.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.04.630 and 2008 c 314 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by an eligible
apiarist, as defined in RCW 82.04.629, for providing bee pollination
services to a farmer using a bee colony owned or kept by the person
providing the pollination services.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.04.213 apply to this section.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2016.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.08.0204 and 2008 c 314 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of
honey bees to an eligible apiarist, as defined in RCW 82.04.629. This
exemption is available only if the buyer provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2016.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.12.0204 and 2008 c 314 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of honey bees by an eligible apiarist, as defined in RCW 82.04.629.
This exemption is available only if the buyer provides the seller with
an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 2008 c 314 s 7 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---