BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
PROFESSIONAL LEARNING. (1) The legislature finds that a clear
definition of professional learning provides a foundational vision that
sets the course for how state, regional, and local education leaders
support educator development. A shared, statewide definition is a
piece of critical infrastructure to guide policy and investments in the
content, structure, and provision of the types of professional
development that are associated with increased student performance.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
partnership with the professional educator standards board, the
educational service districts, and other experts and practitioners,
shall create a common definition for professional learning. The office
must submit the definition to the education committees of the
legislature by January 15, 2014, along with a recommended framework for
how the definition may be used to guide and inform state, regional, and
local policy and investments in professional development that will have
the highest anticipated return on investment in terms of increased
student performance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.310
RCW to read as follows:
PROFESSIONAL LEARNING. Subject to funds appropriated specifically
for this purpose or made available through supplemental grants, federal
funds, or other funding sources, each educational service district
shall retain professional development coordinators with expertise in
mathematics, science, and English language arts. The coordinators
shall offer regional professional development opportunities, as well as
technical assistance and customized professional development, to
individual schools and districts on request. The professional
development is intended to assist educators with implementation of
state standards in mathematics, science, and English language arts;
alignment of curriculum and instruction; and instructional strategies
that have been demonstrated to improve student engagement and
achievement.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.165.015 and 2009 c 548 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM. Unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Approved program" means a program submitted to and approved by
the office of the superintendent of public instruction and conducted
pursuant to the plan that addresses the required elements as provided
for in this chapter.
(2) "Basic skills areas" means reading, writing, ((and))
mathematics, and science as well as readiness associated with these
skills.
(3) "Participating student" means a student in kindergarten through
grade twelve who scores below standard for his or her grade level on
the statewide assessments and who is identified in the approved plan to
receive services.
(4) "Statewide assessments" means one or more of the several basic
skills assessments administered as part of the state's student
assessment system, and assessments in the basic skills areas
administered by local school districts.
(5) "Underachieving students" means students with the greatest
academic deficits in basic skills as identified by the statewide
assessments.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.165.025 and 2009 c 556 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM. (1) A participating school district
shall submit the district's plan for using learning assistance funds to
the office of the superintendent of public instruction for approval, to
the extent required under subsection (2) of this section. The program
plan must identify the program activities to be implemented from RCW
28A.165.035 and implement all of the elements in (a) through (h) of
this subsection. The school district plan shall include the following:
(a) District and school-level data on reading, writing, science,
and mathematics achievement as reported pursuant to chapter 28A.655 RCW
and relevant federal law;
(b) Processes used for identifying the underachieving students to
be served by the program, including the identification of school or
program sites providing program activities;
(c) How accelerated learning plans are developed and implemented
for participating students. Accelerated learning plans may be
developed as part of existing student achievement plan process such as
student plans for achieving state high school graduation standards,
individual student academic plans, or the achievement plans for groups
of students. Accelerated learning plans shall include:
(i) Achievement goals for the students;
(ii) Roles of the student, parents, or guardians and teachers in
the plan;
(iii) Communication procedures regarding student accomplishment;
and
(iv) Plan reviews and adjustments processes;
(d) How state level and classroom assessments are used to inform
instruction;
(e) How focused and intentional instructional strategies have been
identified and implemented;
(f) How highly qualified instructional staff are developed and
supported in the program and in participating schools;
(g) How other federal, state, district, and school resources are
coordinated with school improvement plans and the district's strategic
plan to support underachieving students; and
(h) How a program evaluation will be conducted to determine
direction for the following school year.
(2) If a school district has received approval of its plan once, it
is not required to submit a plan for approval under RCW 28A.165.045 or
this section unless the district has made a significant change to the
plan. If a district has made a significant change to only a portion of
the plan the district need only submit a description of the changes
made and not the entire plan. Plans or descriptions of changes to the
plan must be submitted by July 1st as required under this section. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish
guidelines for what a "significant change" is.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.320.190 and 2009 c 578 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
EXTENDED LEARNING OPPORTUNITIES PROGRAM. (1) The extended learning
opportunities program is created for eligible ((eleventh and)) ninth
through twelfth grade students who are not on track to meet local or
state graduation requirements as well as eighth grade students who need
additional assistance in order to have the opportunity for a successful
entry into high school. The program shall provide early notification
of graduation status and information on education opportunities
including preapprenticeship programs that are available.
(2) Under the extended learning opportunities program and to the
extent funds are available for that purpose, districts shall make
available to students in grade twelve who have failed to meet one or
more local or state graduation requirements the option of continuing
enrollment in the school district in accordance with RCW 28A.225.160.
Districts are authorized to use basic education program funding to
provide instruction to eligible students under RCW 28A.150.220(((3)))
(5).
(3) Under the extended learning opportunities program,
instructional services for eligible students can occur during the
regular school day, evenings, on weekends, or at a time and location
deemed appropriate by the school district, including the educational
service district, in order to meet the needs of these students.
Instructional services provided under this section do not include
services offered at private schools. Instructional services can
include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) Individual or small group instruction;
(b) Instruction in English language arts and/or mathematics that
eligible students need to pass all or part of the ((Washington)) state
high school assessment ((of student learning));
(c) Attendance in a public high school or public alternative school
classes or at a skill center;
(d) Inclusion in remediation programs, including summer school;
(e) Language development instruction for English language learners;
(f) Online curriculum and instructional support, including programs
for credit retrieval and ((Washington)) state assessment ((of student
learning)) preparatory classes; and
(g) Reading improvement specialists available at the educational
service districts to serve eighth((, eleventh, and)) through twelfth
grade educators through professional development in accordance with RCW
28A.415.350. The reading improvement specialist may also provide
direct services to eligible students and those students electing to
continue a fifth year in a high school program who are still struggling
with basic reading skills.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.180.090 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 6 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL INSTRUCTIONAL PROGRAM. The superintendent
of public instruction shall develop an evaluation system designed to
measure increases in the English and academic proficiency of eligible
pupils. When developing the system, the superintendent shall:
(1) Require school districts to assess potentially eligible pupils
within ten days of registration using an English proficiency assessment
or assessments as specified by the superintendent of public
instruction. Results of these assessments shall be made available to
both the superintendent of public instruction and the school district;
(2) Require school districts to annually assess all eligible pupils
at the end of the school year using an English proficiency assessment
or assessments as specified by the superintendent of public
instruction. Results of these assessments shall be made available to
both the superintendent of public instruction and the school district.
Aggregated results must be posted on the web site of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for each school and school
district, using the Washington state report card. The report card must
include the average length of time students in each school and district
are enrolled in the transitional bilingual instructional program,
annual change in the number and percentage of students making progress
in learning English, annual change in the number and percentage of
students attaining English proficiency, and the number and percentage
of students meeting annual targets in reading and mathematics for state
and federal accountability; and
(3) Develop a system to evaluate increases in the English and
academic proficiency of students who are, or were, eligible pupils.
This evaluation shall include students when they are in the program and
after they exit the program until they finish their K-12 career or
transfer from the school district. Aggregated results from the
academic assessment of students who were formerly eligible pupils under
the program must be reported by school and school district using the
Washington state report card. The purpose of the evaluation system is
to inform schools, school districts, parents, and the state of the
effectiveness of the transitional bilingual programs in school and
school districts in teaching these students English and other content
areas, such as mathematics and writing((; and
(4) Report to the education and fiscal committees of the
legislature by November 1, 2002, regarding the development of the
systems described in this section and a timeline for the full
implementation of those systems. The legislature shall approve and
provide funding for the evaluation system in subsection (3) of this
section before any implementation of the system developed under
subsection (3) of this section may occur)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28A.185
RCW to read as follows:
HIGHLY CAPABLE PROGRAM. For the purposes of the program for highly
capable students under this chapter, a highly capable student means a
student who performs, or shows potential for performing, at
significantly advanced levels when compared to others of his or her
age, experience, or environment. Outstanding capabilities are seen
with the student's general intellectual aptitudes, specific academic
abilities, creative productivities within a specific domain, or
leadership skills. Highly capable students are present in all cultural
and linguistic groups and across all socioeconomic strata; coexist with
all manner of disabling conditions both visible and invisible; and
manifest across all areas of human endeavor.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.185.020 and 2009 c 548 s 708 are each amended to
read as follows:
HIGHLY CAPABLE PROGRAM. (1) The legislature finds that, for highly
capable students, access to accelerated learning and enhanced
instruction is access to a basic education. The education of highly
capable students may include supports and services that are in addition
to those ordinarily provided as part of general education.
(2) There are multiple definitions of highly capable, from
intellectual to academic to artistic. The research literature strongly
supports using multiple criteria to identify highly capable students,
and therefore, the legislature does not intend to prescribe a single
method. Instead, the legislature intends to allocate funding based on
two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school
district's population and authorize school districts to identify
through the use of multiple, objective criteria those students most
highly capable and eligible to receive accelerated learning and
enhanced instruction in the program offered by the district. Access to
accelerated learning and enhanced instruction through the program for
highly capable students does not constitute an individual entitlement
for any particular student.
(((2))) (3) Supplementary funds provided by the state for the
program for highly capable students under RCW 28A.150.260 shall be
categorical funding to provide services to highly capable students as
determined by a school district under RCW 28A.185.030.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.185.030 and 2009 c 380 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
HIGHLY CAPABLE PROGRAM. Local school districts may establish and
operate, either separately or jointly, programs for highly capable
students. Such authority shall include the right to employ and pay
special instructors and to operate such programs jointly with a public
institution of higher education. Local school districts which
establish and operate programs for highly capable students shall adopt
identification procedures and provide educational opportunities as
follows:
(1) In accordance with rules adopted by the superintendent of
public instruction, school districts shall implement procedures for
nomination, assessment and selection of their most highly capable
students for the purposes of the highly capable program. ((Nominations
shall be based upon data from teachers, other staff, parents, students,
and members of the community. Assessment shall be based upon a review
of each student's capability as shown by multiple criteria intended to
reveal, from a wide variety of sources and data, each student's unique
needs and capabilities. Selection shall be made by a broadly based
committee of professionals, after consideration of the results of the
multiple criteria assessment.)) Under the procedures, no single
criterion should prevent a student's identification. However, any
single criterion, if strong enough, may indicate a need for services.
The rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction must
include but are not limited to consistent procedures for:
(a) Universal screening;
(b) Regular public notification;
(c) Use of multiple criteria;
(d) Involvement of qualified professionals in the identification
process;
(e) Family involvement in decision making;
(f) Notification of parents or legal guardians;
(g) Safeguards to reduce cultural, linguistic, socioeconomic, and
gender bias, and to mitigate impacts resulting from disabilities; and
(h) Periodic reviews, including input from families.
(2) When a student, who is a child of a military family in
transition, has been assessed or enrolled as highly capable by a
sending school, the receiving school shall initially honor placement of
the student into a like program.
(a) The receiving school shall determine whether the district's
program is a like program when compared to the sending school's
program; and
(b) The receiving school may conduct subsequent assessments to
determine appropriate placement and continued enrollment in the
program.
(3) Students selected pursuant to procedures outlined in this
section shall be provided, to the extent feasible, an educational
opportunity which takes into account each student's unique needs and
capabilities and the limits of the resources and program options
available to the district, including those options which can be
developed or provided by using funds allocated by the superintendent of
public instruction for that purpose.
(4) The definitions in Article II of RCW 28A.705.010 apply to
subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
FAIRNESS AND BIAS REVIEW. Before implementing revisions to the
state essential academic learning requirements as authorized under RCW
28A.655.070, the superintendent of public instruction must ensure that
a fairness and bias review of the revisions has been conducted,
including providing an opportunity for input from the educational
opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee under RCW
28A.300.136 and from an additional diverse group of community
representatives, parents, and educators to be convened by the
superintendent.

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
FAMILY ENGAGEMENT COORDINATOR. The purpose of this section is to
provide for the allocation of state funding that the legislature deems
necessary to support school districts in offering the minimum
instructional program of basic education under RCW 28A.150.220. The
allocation shall be determined as follows:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a
basic education instructional allocation for each common school
district.
(2) The distribution formula under this section shall be for
allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under chapter
28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and
regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use
basic education instructional funds to implement a particular
instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires
school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student
ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay
for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this
section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning
period.
(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been
adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a
school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic
education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing
and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support
instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high,
middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section.
The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not
constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or
structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical
schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of
a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students
using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours
of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the
intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted
from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average
full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the
district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school
to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further
adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small
schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are
defined as follows:
(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;
(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight;
and
(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
six.
(4)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers
needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one
teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following
general education average class size of full-time equivalent students
per teacher:

General education
average
class size
Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23
Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium and beginning with schools with
the highest percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price
meals in the prior school year, the general education average class
size for grades K-3 shall be reduced until the average class size
funded under this subsection (4) is no more than 17.0 full-time
equivalent students per teacher beginning in the 2017-18 school year.
(c) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high
school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom teachers
based on the following number of full-time equivalent students per
teacher in career and technical education:

Career and technical
education average
class size
Approved career and technical education offered at
the middle school and high school level . . . . . . . . . . . . 26.57
Skill center programs meeting the standards established
by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction . . . . . . . . . . . . 22.76

(d) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum
specify:
(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than
fifty percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price
meals; and
(ii) A specialty average class size for laboratory science,
advanced placement, and international baccalaureate courses.
(5) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition
to classroom teachers:

Elementary
School Middle
School High
School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level
administrators . . . . . . . . . . . .
1.253
1.353
1.880

Teacher librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology,
and media to support school library media programs . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.663
0.519
0.523

Health and social services:

School nurses . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.076 0.060 0.096

Social workers . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.042 0.006 0.015

Psychologists . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.017 0.002 0.007

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach and graduation
advising . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.493
1.116
1.909

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional
services provided by classified employees . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.936
0.700
0.652

Office support and other noninstructional aides . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.012 2.325 3.269

Custodians . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.657 1.942 2.965

Classified staff providing student and staff safety . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.079 0.092 0.141

((Parent involvement)) Family engagement coordinators . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.00 0.00 0.00

(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to
provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as
follows:

Staff per 1,000
K-12 students
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.628
Facilities, maintenance, and grounds . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.813
Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.332

(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district
to support certificated and classified staffing of central
administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under
subsections (4)(a) and (b) and (5) of this section and (a) of this
subsection.
(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to
school districts for career and technical education and skill center
administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified
in the omnibus appropriations act.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the minimum
allocation for each school district shall include allocations per
annual average full-time equivalent student for the following
materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted for inflation
from the 2008-09 school year:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $54.43
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $147.90
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $58.44
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $124.07
Instructional professional development for certified and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $9.04
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $73.27
Security and central office . . . . . . . . . . . . $50.76

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium, the minimum allocation for
maintenance, supplies, and operating costs shall be increased as
specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The following
allocations, adjusted for inflation from the 2007-08 school year, are
provided in the 2015-16 school year, after which the allocations shall
be adjusted annually for inflation as specified in the omnibus
appropriations act:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $113.80
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $309.21
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $122.17
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $259.39
Instructional professional development for certificated and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $18.89
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $153.18
Security and central office administration . . . . . . . . . . . . $106.12

(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this
section, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based
on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:
(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students
in grades seven through twelve;
(b) Laboratory science courses for students in grades nine through
twelve;
(c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades nine through twelve offered in a high school; and
(d) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades eleven and twelve offered through a skill center.
(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this
section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs
and services:
(a) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
underachieving students through the learning assistance program under
RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the
district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for
free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum
allocation for the program shall provide for each level of prototypical
school resources to provide, on a statewide average, 1.5156 hours per
week in extra instruction with a class size of fifteen learning
assistance program students per teacher.
(b) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students
whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be
based on the head count number of students in each school who are
eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction
program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum
allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide
resources to provide, on a statewide average, 4.7780 hours per week in
extra instruction with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction
program students per teacher. Notwithstanding other provisions of this
subsection (10), the actual per-student allocation may be scaled to
provide a larger allocation for students needing more intensive
intervention and a commensurate reduced allocation for students needing
less intensive intervention, as detailed in the omnibus appropriations
act.
(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for
highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030,
allocations shall be based on two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school district's full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs
shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590
hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen highly capable program
students per teacher.
(11) The allocations under subsections (4)(a) and (b), (5), (6),
and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW
28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental
instructional resources for students with disabilities.
(12)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high
schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this
section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are
eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such
students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the
omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and
reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.
(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4),
(7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter
28A.700 RCW.
(13)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds
shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.
(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect.
(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each
month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall
be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional
hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the
present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review
of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the
common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

Sec. 12 RCW 28C.18.162 and 2009 c 238 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
RECRUITING WASHINGTON TEACHERS. Unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this section and RCW 28C.18.160 and 28C.18.164 through 28C.18.168.
(1) "High-demand occupation" means an occupation with a substantial
number of current or projected employment opportunities. For the
purposes of opportunity internships, the teaching of mathematics,
science, bilingual education, special education, or English as a second
language is considered a high-demand occupation.
(2) "Low-income high school student" means a student who is
enrolled in grade((s)) ten, eleven, or twelve in a public high school
and who qualifies for federal free or reduced-price meals. If a
student qualifies at the time the student begins participating in the
opportunity internship program, the student remains eligible even if
the student does not receive free or reduced-price meals thereafter.
To participate in the program, the student must remain enrolled in high
school until the student receives a high school diploma.
(3) "Opportunity internship consortium" means a local consortium
formed for the purpose of participating in the opportunity internship
program and which may be composed of a local workforce development
council, economic development council, area high schools, community or
technical colleges, apprenticeship councils, preapprenticeship programs
such as running start for the trades, private vocational schools
licensed under chapter 28C.10 RCW, public and private four-year
institutions of higher education, employers in targeted industries, and
labor organizations. Partnerships of high schools, teacher preparation
programs, and community-based organizations offering the program under
RCW 28A.415.370 may be considered opportunity internship consortia.
(4) "Opportunity internship graduate" means a low-income high
school student who successfully completes an opportunity internship
program and graduates from high school.
(5) "Postsecondary program of study" means an undergraduate or
graduate certificate, apprenticeship, or degree program.
(6) "Preapprenticeship" means a program of at least ninety hours
and not more than one hundred eighty hours in length that provides
practical experience, education, preparation, and the development of
skills that would be beneficial for entry into state-approved
apprenticeship programs, including but not limited to construction
industry structure and the construction process; orientation to state-approved apprenticeship; tools of the various trades and safe handling
of power tools; and industry standards of safety, responsibility, and
craft excellence.
(7) "Targeted industry" means a business or industry identified by
a local workforce development council as having high-demand occupations
that require candidates to have completed a postsecondary program of
study.

Sec. 13 RCW 28A.660.042 and 2007 c 396 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
RECRUITING WASHINGTON TEACHERS. (1) The pipeline for paraeducators
conditional scholarship program is created.
(2)(a) Except as provided under subsection (3) of this section,
participation is limited to paraeducators without a college degree who
have at least three years of classroom experience. It is anticipated
that candidates enrolled in this program will complete their associate
of arts degree at a community and technical college in two years or
less and become eligible for a mathematics, special education, or
English as a second language endorsement via route one in the
alternative routes to teacher certification program provided in this
chapter.
(((2))) (b) Entry requirements for candidates under this subsection
(2) include district or building validation of qualifications,
including three years of successful student interaction and leadership
as a classified instructional employee.
(3) Subject to the availability of funds for the pipeline for
paraeducators conditional scholarship program under RCW 28A.660.050,
after qualified candidates under subsection (2) of this section have
been accepted, individuals who participated in one of the recruiting
Washington teachers grant programs under RCW 28A.415.370 may
participate in the pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship
program if the individual meets the criteria for the scholarship under
RCW 28A.660.050.

Sec. 14 RCW 28A.660.050 and 2012 c 229 s 507 are each amended to
read as follows:
RECRUITING WASHINGTON TEACHERS. Subject to the availability of
amounts appropriated for these purposes, the conditional scholarship
programs in this chapter are created under the following guidelines:
(1) The programs shall be administered by the student achievement
council. In administering the programs, the council has the following
powers and duties:
(a) To adopt necessary rules and develop guidelines to administer
the programs;
(b) To collect and manage repayments from participants who do not
meet their service obligations; and
(c) To accept grants and donations from public and private sources
for the programs.
(2) Requirements for participation in the conditional scholarship
programs are as provided in this subsection (2).
(a) The alternative route conditional scholarship program is
limited to interns of professional educator standards board-approved
alternative routes to teaching programs under RCW 28A.660.040. For
fiscal year 2011, priority must be given to fiscal year 2010
participants in the alternative route partnership program. In order to
receive conditional scholarship awards, recipients shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment in alternative
certification routes through a professional educator standards board-approved program;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of
the alternative route certification program and receipt of a residency
teaching certificate; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed eight thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees,
and educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation
for the alternative route certification program in which the recipient
is enrolled. The council may adjust the annual award by the average
rate of resident undergraduate tuition and fee increases at the state
universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(b) The pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship program
is limited to qualified ((paraeducators)) individuals as provided by
RCW 28A.660.042. Paraeducators who apply for the program under RCW
28A.660.042(2) shall receive first priority in scholarship awards. In
order to receive conditional scholarship awards, recipients shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment at a community and
technical college for no more than two years and attain an associate of
arts degree;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of an
associate of arts degree. This progress requirement is a condition for
eligibility into a route one program of the alternative routes to
teacher certification program for a mathematics, special education, or
English as a second language endorsement; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed four thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees, and
educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation for
the alternative route certification program in which the recipient is
enrolled. The student achievement council may adjust the annual award
by the average rate of tuition and fee increases at the state community
and technical colleges.
(c) The retooling to teach mathematics and science conditional
scholarship program is limited to current K-12 teachers. In order to
receive conditional scholarship awards:
(i) Individuals currently employed as teachers shall pursue a
middle level mathematics or science, or secondary mathematics or
science endorsement; or
(ii) Individuals who are certificated with an elementary education
endorsement shall pursue an endorsement in middle level mathematics or
science, or both; and
(iii) Individuals shall use one of the pathways to endorsement
processes to receive a mathematics or science endorsement, or both,
which shall include passing a mathematics or science endorsement test,
or both tests, plus observation and completing applicable coursework to
attain the proper endorsement; and
(iv) Individuals shall receive no more than the annual amount of
the scholarship, not to exceed three thousand dollars, for the cost of
tuition, test fees, and educational expenses, including books,
supplies, and transportation for the endorsement pathway being pursued.
(3) The Washington professional educator standards board shall
select individuals to receive conditional scholarships. In selecting
recipients, preference shall be given to eligible veterans or national
guard members.
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, a conditional scholarship is
a loan that is forgiven in whole or in part in exchange for service as
a certificated teacher employed in a Washington state K-12 public
school. The state shall forgive one year of loan obligation for every
two years a recipient teaches in a public school. Recipients who fail
to continue a course of study leading to residency teacher
certification or cease to teach in a public school in the state of
Washington in their endorsement area are required to repay the
remaining loan principal with interest.
(5) Recipients who fail to fulfill the required teaching obligation
are required to repay the remaining loan principal with interest and
any other applicable fees. The student achievement council shall adopt
rules to define the terms for repayment, including applicable interest
rates, fees, and deferments.
(6) The student achievement council may deposit all appropriations,
collections, and any other funds received for the program in this
chapter in the future teachers conditional scholarship account
authorized in RCW 28B.102.080.

Sec. 15 RCW 28A.660.040 and 2010 c 235 s 504 are each amended to
read as follows:
RECRUITING WASHINGTON TEACHERS. Alternative route programs under
this chapter shall operate one to four specific route programs.
Successful completion of the program shall make a candidate eligible
for residency teacher certification. The mentor of the teacher
candidate at the school and the supervisor of the teacher candidate
from the teacher preparation program must both agree that the teacher
candidate has successfully completed the program.
(1) Alternative route programs operating route one programs shall
enroll currently employed classified instructional employees with
transferable associate degrees or former participants in the recruiting
Washington teachers program who enter through the pipeline for
paraeducators conditional scholarship program under RCW 28A.660.042 who
are seeking residency teacher certification with endorsements in
mathematics, special education, bilingual education, or English as a
second language. It is anticipated that candidates enrolled in this
route will complete both their baccalaureate degree and requirements
for residency certification in two years or less, including a mentored
internship to be completed in the final year. In addition, partnership
programs shall uphold entry requirements for candidates that include:
(a) District or building validation of qualifications, including
one year of successful student interaction and leadership as a
classified instructional employee;
(b) Successful passage of the statewide basic skills exam; and
(c) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers.
(2) Alternative route programs operating route two programs shall
enroll currently employed classified staff with baccalaureate degrees
seeking residency teacher certification in subject matter shortage
areas and areas with shortages due to geographic location. Candidates
enrolled in this route must complete a mentored internship complemented
by flexibly scheduled training and coursework offered at a local site,
such as a school or educational service district, or online or via
video-conference over the K-20 network, in collaboration with the
partnership program's higher education partner. In addition,
partnership grant programs shall uphold entry requirements for
candidates that include:
(a) District or building validation of qualifications, including
one year of successful student interaction and leadership as classified
staff;
(b) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution
of higher education. The individual's college or university grade
point average may be considered as a selection factor;
(c) Successful completion of the subject matter assessment required
by RCW 28A.410.220(3);
(d) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(e) Successful passage of the statewide basic skills exam.
(3) Alternative route programs seeking funds to operate route three
programs shall enroll individuals with baccalaureate degrees, who are
not employed in the district at the time of application. When
selecting candidates for certification through route three, districts
and approved preparation program providers shall give priority to
individuals who are seeking residency teacher certification in subject
matter shortage areas or shortages due to geographic locations.
Cohorts of candidates for this route shall attend an intensive summer
teaching academy, followed by a full year employed by a district in a
mentored internship, followed, if necessary, by a second summer
teaching academy. In addition, partnership programs shall uphold entry
requirements for candidates that include:
(a) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution
of higher education. The individual's grade point average may be
considered as a selection factor;
(b) Successful completion of the subject matter assessment required
by RCW 28A.410.220(3);
(c) External validation of qualifications, including demonstrated
successful experience with students or children, such as reference
letters and letters of support from previous employers;
(d) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(e) Successful passage of statewide basic skills exam.
(4) Alternative route programs operating route four programs shall
enroll individuals with baccalaureate degrees, who are employed in the
district at the time of application, or who hold conditional teaching
certificates or emergency substitute certificates. Cohorts of
candidates for this route shall attend an intensive summer teaching
academy, followed by a full year employed by a district in a mentored
internship. If employed on a conditional certificate, the intern may
serve as the teacher of record, supported by a well-trained mentor. In
addition, partnership programs shall uphold entry requirements for
candidates that include:
(a) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution
of higher education. The individual's grade point average may be
considered as a selection factor;
(b) Successful completion of the subject matter assessment required
by RCW 28A.410.220(3);
(c) External validation of qualifications, including demonstrated
successful experience with students or children, such as reference
letters and letters of support from previous employers;
(d) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(e) Successful passage of statewide basic skills exam.
(5) Applicants for alternative route programs who are eligible
veterans or national guard members and who meet the entry requirements
for the alternative route program for which application is made shall
be given preference in admission.

--- END ---