BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide funding and resources to school districts in order to
successfully implement the teacher and principal evaluation system.
Training has been provided for principals only. The legislature
understands the importance of also providing adequate training for
teachers. The legislature further intends that the training will be
developed within the local school district and be responsive to the
specific instructional framework chosen by each district.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.405.104 and 2010 c 235 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If funds are provided for professional development activities
designed specifically for first through third-year teachers, the funds
shall be allocated first to districts participating in the evaluation
systems in RCW 28A.405.100 (2) and (6) before the required
implementation date under that section.
(2)(a) Funds shall be provided for a minimum of two professional
development days for K-12 teachers during the 2013-14 and 2014-15
school years for the purpose of training and understanding the
evaluation system enacted in 2012.
(b) The training should at a minimum include the following topics:
Examination of the instructional framework, relationship of the state
required criteria and rubrics to the instructional framework, the use
of multiple measures, the relationship between the teacher and
principal evaluation systems, and other evaluation topics necessary for
the successful implementation of the Washington teacher and principal
evaluation system.

--- END ---