BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that many local
governmental entities are experiencing financial challenges, and
understands the multiple needs of local governmental entities to
provide important services. It is the intent of the legislature to
provide flexibility to local governmental entities regarding the
disposition of surplus property for the development of affordable
housing and to allow sufficient discretion to local governmental
entities to balance these competing needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A governmental entity may sell, lease,
exchange, or donate surplus property to an eligible organization at a
price that is less than fair market value, or may create beneficial
sales terms including, but not limited to, extended closings, if the
affordable housing to be developed on the property will be occupied
primarily by extremely low-income, very low-income, federally qualified
low-income, or low-income households.
(2) A governmental entity disposing of surplus property under
subsection (1) of this section must: (a) Enter into a recorded
covenant with the eligible organization or a loan note in the name of
the governmental entity, to ensure that the property will meet the
required income, rent, and sales price restrictions; and (b) monitor
compliance with the covenant or loan note.
(3) An eligible organization may obtain surplus property through
purchase, lease, exchange, or donation, under reasonable option and
conveyance conditions, in return for: (a) A recorded covenant to
provide rental housing for extremely low-income, very low-income,
federally qualified low-income, or low-income households for at least
forty years; or (b) a loan note in the name of a governmental entity
for homeownership programs in which the homeowners are extremely low-income, very low-income, federally qualified low-income, or low-income.
(4) As an alternative to the requirements of this section,
counties, cities, and towns may sell surplus property at a discount for
affordable housing that may be part of mixed-income or mixed-use
developments, provided that the affordable housing complies with the
guidelines for affordable housing, income levels, affordable rents,
affordable sales prices, and minimum terms of affordability under RCW
36.70A.540 for affordable housing incentive programs.
(5) The authority granted to counties, cities, and towns in this
section is in addition to, and must not be construed to limit, any
existing authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Affordable housing" means residential housing that is rented
or owned by a person who qualifies as an extremely low-income, very
low-income, federally qualified low-income, or low-income household or
who is from a special needs population, and for which monthly housing
costs, including utilities other than telephone, do not exceed thirty
percent of the household's maximum allowed monthly income for the
housing unit. "Affordable housing" also means farmworker housing.
(2) "Eligible organization" means a county, city, or town
government, local housing authority, public development authority,
community renewal agency, regional support network established under
chapter 71.24 RCW, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based
organization, federally recognized Indian tribe in the state of
Washington, or nonprofit housing assistance organization, including
such entities materially participating as a general partner or managing
members of a partnership, limited liability company, or equivalent
organization.
(3) "Extremely low-income household" means a single person, family,
or unrelated persons living together whose income is at or below thirty
percent of the county area median income where the affordable housing
is located, adjusted for household size.
(4) "Federally qualified low-income household" means a single
person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose income is
more than fifty percent but is at or below sixty percent of the county
area median income where the affordable housing is located, adjusted
for household size.
(5) "Governmental entity" means the state department of
corrections, enterprise services, natural resources, social and health
services, or transportation, the state parks and recreation commission,
a county, city, or town government, or a regional transit authority.
(6) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income is more than sixty
percent but is at or below eighty percent of the county area median
income where the affordable housing is located, adjusted for household
size.
(7) "Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income is more than eighty
percent but is at or below one hundred fifteen percent of the county
area median income where the affordable housing is located.
(8) "Primarily" means fifty-one percent or more.
(9) "Real property" means land, buildings, or buildings and land.
"Real property" also includes air rights.
(10) "Surplus property" means real property, or any interest in
real property, that is not required for the governmental entity's needs
or the discharge of its responsibilities. "Surplus property" includes,
but is not limited to, real property, or any interest in real property,
declared surplus by a governmental entity under that entity's own
policies and procedures. However, "surplus property" does not include
state forest lands managed by the department of natural resources.
(11) "Very low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income is at or below fifty
percent of the county area median income for the county where the
affordable housing is located, adjusted for household size.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may sell, lease, exchange, or donate surplus
property to an eligible organization for the purpose of affordable
housing as specified in chapter 39.-- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 18 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
The department may sell, lease, exchange, or donate surplus
property to an eligible organization for the purpose of affordable
housing as specified in chapter 39.-- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 18 of this act).

Sec. 6 RCW 47.12.063 and 2011 c 376 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to continue the
department's policy giving priority consideration to abutting property
owners in agricultural areas when disposing of property through its
surplus property program under this section.
(2) Whenever the department determines that any real property owned
by the state of Washington and under the jurisdiction of the department
is no longer required for transportation purposes and that it is in the
public interest to do so, the department may sell the property or
exchange it in full or part consideration for land or improvements or
for construction of improvements at fair market value to any person
through the solicitation of written bids through public advertising in
the manner prescribed under RCW 47.28.050 or in the manner prescribed
under RCW 47.12.283.
(3) The department may forego the processes prescribed by RCW
47.28.050 and 47.12.283 and sell the real property to any of the
following entities or persons at fair market value:
(a) Any other state agency;
(b) The city or county in which the property is situated;
(c) Any other municipal corporation;
(d) Regional transit authorities created under chapter 81.112 RCW;
(e) The former owner of the property from whom the state acquired
title;
(f) In the case of residentially improved property, a tenant of the
department who has resided thereon for not less than six months and who
is not delinquent in paying rent to the state;
(g) Any abutting private owner but only after each other abutting
private owner (if any), as shown in the records of the county assessor,
is notified in writing of the proposed sale. If more than one abutting
private owner requests in writing the right to purchase the property
within fifteen days after receiving notice of the proposed sale, the
property shall be sold at public auction in the manner provided in RCW
47.12.283;
(h) To any other owner of real property required for transportation
purposes;
(i) In the case of property suitable for residential use, any
nonprofit organization that is dedicated to providing affordable
housing to very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households
as defined in ((RCW 43.63A.510)) section 3 of this act and is eligible
to receive assistance through the Washington housing trust fund created
in chapter 43.185 RCW; or
(j) A federally recognized Indian tribe within whose reservation
boundary the property is located.
(4) The department also may forego the processes prescribed by RCW
47.28.050 and 47.12.283, and may sell, lease, exchange, or donate
surplus property to an eligible organization as specified in chapter
39.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 18 of this act) for the
purpose of affordable housing or, in the case of surplus property not
suitable for residential use, for purposes that support or complement
the development of affordable housing.
(5) When selling real property pursuant to RCW 47.12.283, the
department may withhold or withdraw the property from an auction when
requested by one of the entities or persons listed in subsection (3) of
this section and only after the receipt of a nonrefundable deposit
equal to ten percent of the fair market value of the real property or
five thousand dollars, whichever is less. This subsection does not
prohibit the department from exercising its discretion to withhold or
withdraw the real property from an auction if the department determines
that the property is no longer surplus or chooses to sell the property
through one of the other means listed in subsection (2) of this
section. If a transaction under this subsection is not completed
within sixty days, the real property must be put back up for sale.
(((5))) (6) Sales to purchasers may at the department's option be
for cash, by real estate contract, or exchange of land or improvements.
Transactions involving the construction of improvements must be
conducted pursuant to chapter 47.28 RCW and Title 39 RCW, as
applicable, and must comply with all other applicable laws and rules.
(((6))) (7) Conveyances made pursuant to this section shall be by
deed executed by the secretary of transportation and shall be duly
acknowledged.
(((7))) (8) Unless otherwise provided, all moneys received pursuant
to the provisions of this section less any real estate broker
commissions paid pursuant to RCW 47.12.320 shall be deposited in the
motor vehicle fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may sell, lease, exchange, or donate surplus
property to an eligible organization for the purpose of affordable
housing as specified in chapter 39.-- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 18 of this act).

Sec. 8 RCW 79.11.005 and 2003 c 334 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department ((is authorized to)) may sell any real property
not designated or acquired as state forest lands, but acquired by the
state, either in the name of the forest board, the forestry board, or
the division of forestry, for administrative sites, lien foreclosures,
or other purposes whenever it shall determine that the lands are no
longer or not necessary for public use.
(2) The department also may sell, lease, exchange, or donate
surplus property, other than state forest lands, to an eligible
organization for the purpose of affordable housing as specified in
chapter 39.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 18 of this act).
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section
and chapter 39.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 18 of this
act), the sale may be made after public notice to the highest bidder
for such a price as approved by the governor, but not less than the
fair market value of the real property, plus the value of improvements
thereon. Any instruments necessary to convey title must be executed by
the governor in a form approved by the attorney general.
(((3))) (4) All amounts received from the sale must be credited to
the fund of the department of government that is responsible for the
acquisition and maintenance of the property sold.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission may sell, lease, exchange, or donate surplus
property to an eligible organization for the purpose of affordable
housing as specified in chapter 39.-- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 18 of this act).

Sec. 10 RCW 79A.05.170 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 23 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Except for those lands subject to section 9 of this act and
chapter 39.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 18 of this act),
any lands owned by the ((state parks and recreation)) commission, which
are determined to be surplus to the needs of the state for development
for state park purposes and which the commission proposes to deed to a
local government or other entity, shall be accompanied by a clause
requiring that if the land is not used for outdoor recreation purposes,
ownership of the land shall revert to the ((state parks and
recreation)) commission.
(2) The ((state parks and recreation)) commission, in cases where
land subject to such a reversionary clause is proposed for use or
disposal for purposes other than recreation, shall require that, if the
land is surplus to the needs of the commission for park purposes at the
time the commission becomes aware of its proposed use for nonrecreation
purposes, the holder of the land or property shall reimburse the
commission for the release of the reversionary interest in the land.
The reimbursement shall be in the amount of the fair market value of
the reversionary interest as determined by a qualified appraiser
agreeable to the commission. Appraisal costs shall be borne by the
local entity which holds title to the land.
(3) Any funds generated under a reimbursement under this section
shall be deposited in the parkland acquisition account which is hereby
created in the state treasury. Moneys in this account are to be used
solely for the purchase or acquisition of property for use as state
park property by the commission, as directed by the legislature; all
such funds shall be subject to legislative appropriation.

Sec. 11 RCW 79A.05.175 and 2007 c 145 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except for those lands subject to section 9 of this act and chapter
39.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 18 of this act), whenever
the commission finds that any land under its control cannot
advantageously be used for park purposes, it is authorized to dispose
of such land by the method provided in this section or by the method
provided in RCW 79A.05.170. If such lands are school or other grant
lands, control thereof shall be relinquished by resolution of the
commission to the proper state officials. If such lands were acquired
under restrictive conveyances by which the state may hold them only so
long as they are used for park purposes, they may be returned to the
donor or grantors by the commission. All other such lands may be
either sold by the commission to the highest bidder or exchanged for
other lands of equal value by the commission, and all conveyance
documents shall be executed by the governor. All such exchanges shall
be accompanied by a transfer fee, to be set by the commission and paid
by the other party to the transfer; such fee shall be paid into the
parkland acquisition account established under RCW 79A.05.170. The
commission may accept sealed bids, electronic bids, or oral bids at
auction. Bids on all sales shall be solicited at least twenty days in
advance of the sale date by an advertisement appearing at least once a
week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in
the county in which the land to be sold is located. If the commission
feels that no bid received adequately reflects the fair value of the
land to be sold, it may reject all bids, and may call for new bids.
All proceeds derived from the sale of such park property shall be paid
into the park land acquisition account. All land considered for
exchange shall be evaluated by the commission to determine its
adaptability to park usage. The equal value of all lands exchanged
shall first be determined by the appraisals to the satisfaction of the
commission. No sale or exchange of state park lands shall be made
without the unanimous consent of the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Every city and town, including every code city operating under
Title 35A RCW, may sell, lease, exchange, or donate surplus property to
an eligible organization for the purpose of affordable housing as
specified in chapter 39.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 18
of this act). The authority granted to cities and towns, including
code cities, in this section is in addition to, and must not be
construed to limit, any existing authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 36.34 RCW
to read as follows:
Every county may sell, lease, exchange, or donate surplus property
to an eligible organization for the purpose of affordable housing as
specified in chapter 39.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 18
of this act). The authority granted to counties in this section is in
addition to, and must not be construed to limit, any existing
authority.

Sec. 14 RCW 81.112.080 and 1992 c 101 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
An authority shall have the following powers in addition to the
general powers granted by this chapter:
(1) To carry out the planning processes set forth in RCW
81.104.100;
(2) To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to
lease, construct, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate,
and regulate the use of high capacity transportation facilities and
properties within authority boundaries including surface, underground,
or overhead railways, tramways, busways, buses, bus sets, entrained and
linked buses, ferries, or other means of local transportation except
taxis, and including escalators, moving sidewalks, personal rapid
transit systems or other people-moving systems, passenger terminal and
parking facilities and properties, and such other facilities and
properties as may be necessary for passenger, vehicular, and vessel
access to and from such people-moving systems, terminal and parking
facilities and properties, together with all lands, rights-of-way,
property, equipment, and accessories necessary for such high capacity
transportation systems. When developing specifications for high
capacity transportation system operating equipment, an authority shall
take into account efforts to establish or sustain a domestic
manufacturing capacity for such equipment. The right of eminent domain
shall be exercised by an authority in the same manner and by the same
procedure as or may be provided by law for cities of the first class,
except insofar as such laws may be inconsistent with the provisions of
this chapter. Public transportation facilities and properties which
are owned by any city, county, county transportation authority, public
transportation benefit area, or metropolitan municipal corporation may
be acquired or used by an authority only with the consent of the agency
owning such facilities. Such agencies are hereby authorized to convey
or lease such facilities to an authority or to contract for their joint
use on such terms as may be fixed by agreement between the agency and
the authority.
The facilities and properties of an authority whose vehicles will
operate primarily within the rights-of-way of public streets, roads, or
highways, may be acquired, developed, and operated without the corridor
and design hearings that are required by RCW 35.58.273 for mass transit
facilities operating on a separate right-of-way;
(3) To dispose of any real or personal property acquired in
connection with any authority function and that is no longer required
for the purposes of the authority, in the same manner as provided for
cities of the first class. When an authority determines that a
facility or any part thereof that has been acquired from any public
agency without compensation is no longer required for authority
purposes, but is required by the agency from which it was acquired, the
authority shall by resolution transfer it to such agency;
(4) To sell, lease, exchange, or donate surplus property to an
eligible organization for the purpose of affordable housing as
specified in chapter 39.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 18
of this act);
(5) To fix rates, tolls, fares, and charges for the use of such
facilities and to establish various routes and classes of service.
Fares or charges may be adjusted or eliminated for any distinguishable
class of users.

Sec. 15 RCW 36.34.135 and 1993 c 461 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a county owns property that is located anywhere within the
county, including within the limits of a city or town, and that is
suitable for affordable housing, the legislative authority of the
county may, by negotiation, lease the property for affordable housing
for a term not to exceed seventy-five years to any public housing
authority or nonprofit organization that has demonstrated its ability
to construct or operate housing for very low-income, low-income, or
moderate-income households as defined in ((RCW 43.63A.510)) section 3
of this act and special needs populations. Leases for housing for very
low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households and special needs
populations shall not be subject to any requirement of periodic rental
adjustments, as provided in RCW 36.34.180, but shall provide for such
fixed annual rents as appear reasonable considering the public, social,
and health benefits to be derived by providing an adequate supply of
safe and sanitary housing for very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households and special needs populations.

Sec. 16 RCW 39.102.020 and 2010 c 164 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Annual state contribution limit" means seven million five
hundred thousand dollars statewide per fiscal year.
(2) "Assessed value" means the valuation of taxable real property
as placed on the last completed assessment roll.
(3) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board under
chapter 43.160 RCW.
(4) "Demonstration project" means one of the following projects:
(a) Bellingham waterfront redevelopment project;
(b) Spokane river district project at Liberty Lake; and
(c) Vancouver riverwest project.
(5) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(6) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning July 1st
and ending the following June 30th.
(7) "Local excise tax allocation revenue" means an amount of local
excise taxes equal to some or all of the sponsoring local government's
local excise tax increment, amounts of local excise taxes equal to some
or all of any participating local government's excise tax increment as
agreed upon in the written agreement under RCW 39.102.080(1), or both,
and dedicated to local infrastructure financing.
(8) "Local excise tax increment" means an amount equal to the
estimated annual increase in local excise taxes in each calendar year
following the approval of the revenue development area by the board
from taxable activity within the revenue development area, as set forth
in the application provided to the board under RCW 39.102.040, and
updated in accordance with RCW 39.102.140(1)(f).
(9) "Local excise taxes" means local revenues derived from the
imposition of sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030.
(10) "Local government" means any city, town, county, port
district, and any federally recognized Indian tribe.
(11) "Local infrastructure financing" means the use of revenues
received from local excise tax allocation revenues, local property tax
allocation revenues, other revenues from local public sources, and
revenues received from the local option sales and use tax authorized in
RCW 82.14.475, dedicated to pay either the principal and interest on
bonds authorized under RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public improvement
costs on a pay-as-you-go basis subject to RCW 39.102.195, or both.
(12) "Local property tax allocation revenue" means those tax
revenues derived from the receipt of regular property taxes levied on
the property tax allocation revenue value and used for local
infrastructure financing.
(13) "Low-income housing" means residential housing for low-income
persons or families who lack the means which is necessary to enable
them, without financial assistance, to live in decent, safe, and
sanitary dwellings, without overcrowding. For the purposes of this
subsection, "low income" means income that does not exceed eighty
percent of the median family income for the standard metropolitan
statistical area in which the revenue development area is located.
(14) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a local government.
(15) "Participating local government" means a local government
having a revenue development area within its geographic boundaries that
has entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring local government
as provided in RCW 39.102.080 to allow the use of all or some of its
local excise tax allocation revenues or other revenues from local
public sources dedicated for local infrastructure financing.
(16) "Participating taxing district" means a local government
having a revenue development area within its geographic boundaries that
has entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring local government
as provided in RCW 39.102.080 to allow the use of some or all of its
local property tax allocation revenues or other revenues from local
public sources dedicated for local infrastructure financing.
(17) "Property tax allocation revenue base value" means the
assessed value of real property located within a revenue development
area less the property tax allocation revenue value.
(18)(a)(i) "Property tax allocation revenue value" means
seventy-five percent of any increase in the assessed value of real
property in a revenue development area resulting from:
(A) The placement of new construction, improvements to property, or
both, on the assessment roll, where the new construction and
improvements are initiated after the revenue development area is
approved by the board;
(B) The cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when such cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as provided in RCW
84.14.020, and the new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements are initiated after the revenue development
area is approved by the board;
(C) The cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when such cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as
provided in RCW 84.26.070, and the rehabilitation is initiated after
the revenue development area is approved by the board.
(ii) Increases in the assessed value of real property in a revenue
development area resulting from (a)(i)(A) through (C) of this
subsection are included in the property tax allocation revenue value in
the initial year. These same amounts are also included in the property
tax allocation revenue value in subsequent years unless the property
becomes exempt from property taxation.
(b) "Property tax allocation revenue value" includes seventy-five
percent of any increase in the assessed value of new construction
consisting of an entire building in the years following the initial
year, unless the building becomes exempt from property taxation.
(c) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, "property tax
allocation revenue value" does not include any increase in the assessed
value of real property after the initial year.
(d) There is no property tax allocation revenue value if the
assessed value of real property in a revenue development area has not
increased as a result of any of the reasons specified in (a)(i)(A)
through (C) of this subsection.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, "initial year" means:
(i) For new construction and improvements to property added to the
assessment roll, the year during which the new construction and
improvements are initially placed on the assessment roll;
(ii) For the cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when such cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW, the year when such cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of levying taxes for
collection in the following year; and
(iii) For the cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when
such cost is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55
RCW, the year when such cost is treated as new construction for
purposes of levying taxes for collection in the following year.
(19) "Public improvement costs" means the cost of: (a) Design,
planning, acquisition including land acquisition, site preparation
including land clearing, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation,
improvement, and installation of public improvements; (b) demolishing,
relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending construction of
public improvements; (c) the local government's portion of relocating
utilities as a result of public improvements; (d) financing public
improvements, including interest during construction, legal and other
professional services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs
on general indebtedness issued to finance public improvements, and any
necessary reserves for general indebtedness; (e) assessments incurred
in revaluing real property for the purpose of determining the property
tax allocation revenue base value that are in excess of costs incurred
by the assessor in accordance with the revaluation plan under chapter
84.41 RCW, and the costs of apportioning the taxes and complying with
this chapter and other applicable law; (f) administrative expenses and
feasibility studies reasonably necessary and related to these costs;
and (g) any of the above-described costs that may have been incurred
before adoption of the ordinance authorizing the public improvements
and the use of local infrastructure financing to fund the costs of the
public improvements.
(20) "Public improvements" means:
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the revenue development area
that include:
(i) Street, bridge, and road construction and maintenance,
including highway interchange construction;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements,
including wastewater reuse facilities;
(iii) Sidewalks, traffic controls, and streetlights;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas, including trails; and
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems;
(b) Expenditures for facilities and improvements that support
affordable housing as defined in ((RCW 43.63A.510)) section 3 of this
act.
(21) "Real property" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.04.090 and
also includes any privately owned improvements located on publicly
owned land that are subject to property taxation.
(22) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as
defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied by
public utility districts specifically for the purpose of making
required payments of principal and interest on general indebtedness;
(b) regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of the
common schools under RCW 84.52.065; and (c) regular property taxes
authorized by RCW 84.55.050 that are limited to a specific purpose.
"Regular property taxes" do not include excess property tax levies that
are exempt from the aggregate limits for junior and senior taxing
districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043.
(23) "Relocating a business" means the closing of a business and
the reopening of that business, or the opening of a new business that
engages in the same activities as the previous business, in a different
location within a one-year period, when an individual or entity has an
ownership interest in the business at the time of closure and at the
time of opening or reopening. "Relocating a business" does not include
the closing and reopening of a business in a new location where the
business has been acquired and is under entirely new ownership at the
new location, or the closing and reopening of a business in a new
location as a result of the exercise of the power of eminent domain.
(24) "Revenue development area" means the geographic area adopted
by a sponsoring local government and approved by the board, from which
local excise and property tax allocation revenues are derived for local
infrastructure financing.
(25)(a) "Revenues from local public sources" means:
(i) Amounts of local excise tax allocation revenues and local
property tax allocation revenues, dedicated by sponsoring local
governments, participating local governments, and participating taxing
districts, for local infrastructure financing; and
(ii) Any other local revenues, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, including revenues derived from federal and private
sources.
(b) Revenues from local public sources do not include any local
funds derived from state grants, state loans, or any other state moneys
including any local sales and use taxes credited against the state
sales and use taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW.
(26) "Small business" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
19.85.020.
(27) "Sponsoring local government" means a city, town, or county,
and for the purpose of this chapter a federally recognized Indian tribe
or any combination thereof, that adopts a revenue development area and
applies to the board to use local infrastructure financing.
(28) "State contribution" means the lesser of:
(a) One million dollars;
(b) The total amount of local excise tax allocation revenues, local
property tax allocation revenues, and other revenues from local public
sources, that are dedicated by a sponsoring local government, any
participating local governments, and participating taxing districts, in
the preceding calendar year to the payment of principal and interest on
bonds issued under RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public improvement costs on
a pay-as-you-go basis subject to RCW 39.102.195, or both;
(c) The amount of project award granted by the board in the notice
of approval to use local infrastructure financing under RCW 39.102.040;
or
(d) The highest amount of state excise tax allocation revenues and
state property tax allocation revenues for any one calendar year as
determined by the sponsoring local government and reported to the board
and the department as required by RCW 39.102.140.
(29) "State excise tax allocation revenue" means an amount equal to
the annual increase in state excise taxes estimated to be received by
the state in each calendar year following the approval of the revenue
development area by the board, from taxable activity within the revenue
development area as set forth in the application provided to the board
under RCW 39.102.040 and periodically updated and reported as required
in RCW 39.102.140(1)(f).
(30) "State excise taxes" means revenues derived from state retail
sales and use taxes under RCW 82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020 at the rate
provided in RCW 82.08.020(1), less the amount of tax distributions from
all local retail sales and use taxes, other than the local sales and
use taxes authorized by RCW 82.14.475 for the applicable revenue
development area, imposed on the same taxable events that are credited
against the state retail sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW.
(31) "State property tax allocation revenue" means an amount equal
to the estimated tax revenues derived from the imposition of property
taxes levied by the state for the support of common schools under RCW
84.52.065 on the property tax allocation revenue value, as set forth in
the application submitted to the board under RCW 39.102.040 and updated
annually in the report required under RCW 39.102.140(1)(f).
(32) "Taxing district" means a government entity that levies or has
levied for it regular property taxes upon real property located within
a proposed or approved revenue development area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.19.19201 (Affordable housing -- Inventory of suitable
property) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 218, 1995 c 399 s 64, & 1993 c 461
s 7;
(2) RCW 43.20A.037 (Affordable housing -- Inventory of suitable
housing) and 1995 c 399 s 65 & 1993 c 461 s 8;
(3) RCW 43.63A.510 (Affordable housing -- Inventory of state-owned
land) and 1993 c 461 s 2 & 1990 c 253 s 6;
(4) RCW 47.12.064 (Affordable housing -- Inventory of suitable
property) and 1995 c 399 s 121 & 1993 c 461 s 10; and
(5) RCW 72.09.055 (Affordable housing--Inventory of suitable
property) and 1995 c 399 s 202 & 1993 c 461 s 12.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

--- END ---