BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
Members of a health profession board or commission, as identified
in RCW 18.130.040(2)(b), may express their professional opinions to an
elected official about the work of the board or commission on which the
member serves, even if those opinions differ from the department of
health's official position.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.70.320 and 2008 c 134 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created in the state treasury an account to be known
as the health professions account. Except as provided otherwise in
chapter 18.71 RCW for the medical quality assurance commission, all
fees received by the department for health professions licenses,
registration, certifications, renewals, or examinations and the civil
penalties assessed and collected by the department under RCW 18.130.190
((shall)) must be forwarded to the state treasurer who ((shall)) must
credit such moneys to the health professions account.
(2) Except as provided otherwise in chapter 18.71 RCW for the
medical quality assurance commission, all expenses incurred in carrying
out the health professions licensing activities of the department
((shall)) must be paid from the account as authorized by legislative
appropriation((, except as provided in subsection (4) of this
section)). Any residue in the account ((shall)) must be accumulated
and ((shall)) does not revert to the general fund at the end of the
biennium.
(3) The secretary ((shall)) must biennially prepare a budget
request based on the anticipated costs of administering the health
professions licensing activities of the department which ((shall)) must
include the estimated income from health professions fees.
(((4) The secretary shall, at the request of a board or commission
as applicable, spend unappropriated funds in the health professions
account that are allocated to the requesting board or commission to
meet unanticipated costs of that board or commission when revenues
exceed more than fifteen percent over the department's estimated
six-year spending projections for the requesting board or commission.
Unanticipated costs shall be limited to spending as authorized in
subsection (3) of this section for anticipated costs.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission has authority over budget development, spending,
and staffing.
(a) That the commission must employ an executive director that is:
(i) Hired by and serves at the pleasure of the commission;
(ii) Exempt from the provisions of the civil service law, chapter
41.06 RCW, and whose salary is established by the commission in
accordance with RCW 43.03.028 and 42.17A.110; and
(iii) Responsible for performing all administrative duties of the
commission, including preparing an annual budget, and any other duties
as delegated to the executive director by the commission;
(b) Consistent with the budgeting and accounting act, beginning
with the 2013-2015 biennium, the commission is responsible for
proposing its own biennial budget that the commission submits to the
office of financial management;
(c) Prior to adopting credentialing fees under RCW 43.70.250, the
commission may consult with the secretary to determine the appropriate
fees necessary to support the activities of the commission;
(d) Prior to the secretary adopting uniform rules and guidelines,
or any other actions that might impact the licensing or disciplinary
authority of the commission, the secretary must first meet with the
commission to determine how those rules or guidelines, or changes to
rules or guidelines, might impact the commission's ability to
effectively carry out its statutory duties. If the commission
determines that the proposed rules or guidelines, or changes to
existing rules or guidelines, will negatively impact the commission's
ability to effectively carry out its statutory duties, then the
commission must develop alternative solutions to mitigate the impacts.
(2) An attorney general representing the department, secretary, or
the commission must liberally construe the commission's powers and
independence.
(3) The commission, its members, or staff as directed by the
commission, may communicate, present information requested, volunteer
information, testify before legislative committees, and educate the
legislature, as the commission may from time to time see fit.
(4) The commission may contract with the department for services
from the department that it provides other entities within the
department. The commission may negotiate terms and price with the
department; however, the department may not charge the commission a
higher rate or less favorable term than the best terms received by any
of its entities or contractors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW
to read as follows:
The medical quality assurance account is hereby created in the
state treasury.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.71.401 and 1997 c 79 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
All assessments, fines, and other funds collected or received under
this chapter must be deposited in the ((health professions account))
medical quality assurance account created in section 4 of this act and
used solely to administer and implement this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.71.420 and 1991 c 3 s 171 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary of health shall)) commission must allocate all
appropriated funds to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.71.0191 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 326 are each amended
to read as follows:
((The secretary of the department of health shall)) Except as
provided otherwise in section 3 of this act, the commission must
appoint, from a list of three names supplied by the commission, an
executive director who ((shall)) must act to carry out the provisions
of this chapter. The secretary ((shall)) must also employ such
additional staff including administrative assistants, investigators,
and clerical staff as are required to enable the commission to
accomplish its duties and responsibilities. The executive director is
exempt from the provisions of the civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW,
as now or hereafter amended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---