BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The prescription monitoring program contributes to patient
safety and reduction in drug errors for all patients, including
medicaid beneficiaries in Washington state. Further, the prescription
monitoring program provides the critical function of reducing costs
borne by medicaid and provides for the detection of fraud in the
medicaid system.
(2) Because of the nexus between medicaid, medicaid fraud, and cost
reductions, the funding for the operations and management of the
prescription monitoring program should be funded entirely from the
medicaid fraud penalty account under RCW 74.09.215, with the option of
funding the prescription monitoring program through voluntary
contributions from private individuals and corporations as defined
under Title 23, 23B, 24, or 25 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.225.020 and 2012 c 192 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((When sufficient funding is provided for such purpose through
federal or private grants, or is appropriated by the legislature,)) The
department shall establish and maintain a prescription monitoring
program to monitor the prescribing and dispensing of all Schedules II,
III, IV, and V controlled substances and any additional drugs
identified by the board of pharmacy as demonstrating a potential for
abuse by all professionals licensed to prescribe or dispense such
substances in this state. The program shall be designed to improve
health care quality and effectiveness by reducing abuse of controlled
substances, reducing duplicative prescribing and overprescribing of
controlled substances, and improving controlled substance prescribing
practices with the intent of eventually establishing an electronic
database available in real time to dispensers and prescribers of
controlled substances. As much as possible, the department should
establish a common database with other states. This program's
management and operations shall be funded entirely from the funds in
the account established under RCW 74.09.215. Nothing in this chapter
prohibits voluntary contributions from private individuals and business
entities as defined under Title 23, 23B, 24, or 25 RCW to assist in
funding the prescription monitoring program.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, each
dispenser shall submit to the department by electronic means
information regarding each prescription dispensed for a drug included
under subsection (1) of this section. Drug prescriptions for more than
one day use should be reported. The information submitted for each
prescription shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Patient identifier;
(b) Drug dispensed;
(c) Date of dispensing;
(d) Quantity dispensed;
(e) Prescriber; and
(f) Dispenser.
(3) Each dispenser shall submit the information in accordance with
transmission methods established by the department.
(4) The data submission requirements of subsections (1) through (3)
of this section do not apply to:
(a) Medications provided to patients receiving inpatient services
provided at hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW; or patients of
such hospitals receiving services at the clinics, day surgery areas, or
other settings within the hospital's license where the medications are
administered in single doses;
(b) Pharmacies operated by the department of corrections for the
purpose of providing medications to offenders in department of
corrections institutions who are receiving pharmaceutical services from
a department of corrections pharmacy, except that the department of
corrections must submit data related to each offender's current
prescriptions for controlled substances upon the offender's release
from a department of corrections institution; or
(c) Veterinarians licensed under chapter 18.92 RCW. The
department, in collaboration with the veterinary board of governors,
shall establish alternative data reporting requirements for
veterinarians that allow veterinarians to report:
(i) By either electronic or nonelectronic methods;
(ii) Only those data elements that are relevant to veterinary
practices and necessary to accomplish the public protection goals of
this chapter; and
(iii) No more frequently than once every three months and no less
frequently than once every six months.
(5) The department shall continue to seek federal grants to support
the activities described in chapter 259, Laws of 2007. The department
may not require a practitioner or a pharmacist to pay a fee or tax
specifically dedicated to the operation and management of the system.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.09.215 and 2012 c 241 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
The medicaid fraud penalty account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from civil penalties collected under RCW
74.09.210, all receipts received under judgments or settlements that
originated under a filing under the federal false claims act, and all
receipts received under judgments or settlements that originated under
the state medicaid fraud false claims act, chapter 74.66 RCW, must be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation and must be used only for medicaid services, fraud
detection and prevention activities, recovery of improper payments,
((and)) for other medicaid fraud enforcement activities, and the
prescription monitoring program established in chapter 70.225 RCW.

--- END ---