BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that legal financial
obligations can be a significant problem for people trying to satisfy
criminal penalties. Further, the county-based system of collecting
legal financial obligations makes it difficult to ascertain both how
successful people are in satisfying these obligations and how many
people fail to satisfy these obligations. Therefore, the legislature
intends to collect the information necessary to ascertain the success
and efficiency of the county-based system of collecting legal financial
obligations by changing the form of the annual report required to be
submitted to the legislature.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.23.110 and 2003 c 379 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington association of county officials, in consultation
with county clerks, shall determine a funding formula for allocation of
moneys to counties for purposes of collecting legal financial
obligations, and report this formula to the legislature and the
administrative office of the courts by September 1, 2003. The
Washington association of county officials shall report on:
(1) The amounts of legal financial obligations collected by each of
the county clerks;
(2) The number of individuals, by county, owing legal financial
obligations;
(3) The total amount of outstanding debt from the individuals in
subsection (2) of this section;
(4) The amount of outstanding legal financial obligation debt from
restitution;
(5) The amount of outstanding legal financial obligation debt from
fines and fees;
(6) The amount of outstanding legal financial obligation debt from
collections costs, including interest and clerks fees;
(7) The number of cases of people making regular payments.
"Regular payments" is defined as payments that are less than sixty days
past due;
(8) The number of notices of delinquency sent out;
(9) The number of individuals sent notices of delinquency;
(10) The number of notices to appear for nonpayment issued;
(11) The number of individuals sent notices for nonpayment;
(12) The number of individuals whose wages were garnisheed;
(13) The number of tax refunds intercepted;
(14) The number of individuals issued property tax liens;
(15) The number of warrants for failure to appear issued;
(16) The number of individuals for whom warrants were issued;
(17) The total number of outstanding warrants for failure to
appear;
(18) The total number of outstanding warrants for nonpayment;
(19) The number of people jailed for failure to appear;
(20) The number of people jailed for nonpayment; and
(21) The average number of days spent in jail for nonpayment.
The report shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the
legislature no later than December 1, ((2004)) 2013, and annually
thereafter.

--- END ---