BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.28.010 and 2012 c 56 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the
following words and phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter shall
have the following meanings:
(1) "Debt adjuster," which includes any person known as a debt
pooler, debt manager, debt consolidator, debt prorater, or credit
counselor, is any person engaging in or holding himself or herself out
as engaging in the business of debt adjusting for compensation. The
term shall not include:
(a) Attorneys-at-law, escrow agents, accountants, broker-dealers in
securities, or investment advisors in securities, while performing
services solely incidental to the practice of their professions;
(b) Any person, partnership, association, or corporation doing
business under and as permitted by any law of this state or of the
United States relating to banks, consumer finance businesses, consumer
loan companies, trust companies, mutual savings banks, savings and loan
associations, building and loan associations, credit unions, crop
credit associations, development credit corporations, industrial
development corporations, title insurance companies, insurance
companies, or third-party account administrators;
(c) Persons who, as employees on a regular salary or wage of an
employer not engaged in the business of debt adjusting, perform credit
services for their employer;
(d) Public officers while acting in their official capacities and
persons acting under court order;
(e) Any person while performing services incidental to the
dissolution, winding up or liquidation of a partnership, corporation,
or other business enterprise;
(f) Nonprofit organizations dealing exclusively with debts owing
from commercial enterprises to business creditors;
(g) Nonprofit organizations engaged in debt adjusting and which do
not assess against the debtor a service charge in excess of fifteen
dollars per month.
(2) "Debt adjusting" means the managing, counseling, settling,
adjusting, prorating, or liquidating of the indebtedness of a debtor,
or receiving funds for the purpose of distributing said funds among
creditors in payment or partial payment of obligations of a debtor.
(3) "Debt adjusting agency" is any partnership, corporation, or
association engaging in or holding itself out as engaging in the
business of debt adjusting.
(4) "Financial institution" means any person doing business under
the laws of any state or the United States relating to commercial
banks, bank holding companies, savings banks, savings and loan
associations, trust companies, or credit unions.
(5) "Third-party account administrator" means an independent entity
that holds or administers a dedicated bank account for fees and
payments to creditors, debt collectors, debt adjusters, or debt
adjusting agencies in connection with the renegotiation, settlement,
reduction, or other alteration of the terms of payment or other terms
of a debt.
(6) "Fair share" means the creditor contributions paid to nonprofit
debt adjusters by the creditors whose consumers receive debt adjusting
services from the nonprofit debt adjusters and pay down their debt
accordingly. "Fair share" does not include grants received by
nonprofit debt adjusters for services unrelated to debt adjusting.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.28.080 and 2012 c 56 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By contract a debt adjuster may charge a reasonable fee for
debt adjusting services. The total fee for debt adjusting services,
including, but not limited to, any fee charged by a financial
institution or a third-party account administrator, may not exceed
fifteen percent of the total debt listed by the debtor on the contract.
The fee retained by the debt adjuster from any one payment made by or
on behalf of the debtor may not exceed fifteen percent of the payment
not including fair share. The debt adjuster may make an initial charge
of up to twenty-five dollars which shall be considered part of the
total fee. If an initial charge is made, no additional fee may be
retained which will bring the total fee retained to date to more than
fifteen percent of the total payments made to date. No fee whatsoever
shall be applied against rent and utility payments for housing.
In the event of cancellation or default on performance of the
contract by the debtor prior to its successful completion, the debt
adjuster may collect in addition to fees previously received, six
percent of that portion of the remaining indebtedness listed on said
contract which was due when the contract was entered into, but not to
exceed twenty-five dollars.
(2) A debt adjuster shall not be entitled to retain any fee until
notifying all creditors listed by the debtor that the debtor has
engaged the debt adjuster in a program of debt adjusting.
(3) The department of financial institutions has authority to
enforce compliance with this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.28.120 and 1999 c 151 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
A debt adjuster shall not:
(1) Take any contract, or other instrument which has any blank
spaces when signed by the debtor;
(2) Receive or charge any fee in the form of a promissory note or
other promise to pay or receive or accept any mortgage or other
security for any fee, whether as to real or personal property;
(3) Lend money or credit;
(4) Take any confession of judgment or power of attorney to confess
judgment against the debtor or appear as the debtor in any judicial
proceedings;
(5) Take, concurrent with the signing of the contract or as a part
of the contract or as part of the application for the contract, a
release of any obligation to be performed on the part of the debt
adjuster;
(6) Advertise services, display, distribute, broadcast or televise,
or permit services to be displayed, advertised, distributed,
broadcasted or televised in any manner whatsoever wherein any false,
misleading or deceptive statement or representation with regard to the
services to be performed by the debt adjuster, or the charges to be
made therefor, is made;
(7) Offer, pay, or give any cash, fee, gift, bonus, premiums,
reward, or other compensation to any person for referring any
prospective customer to the debt adjuster;
(8) Receive any cash, fee, gift, bonus, premium, reward, or other
compensation, other than fair share, from any person other than the
debtor or a person in the debtor's behalf in connection with his or her
activities as a debt adjuster; or
(9) Disclose to anyone the debtors who have contracted with the
debt adjuster; nor shall the debt adjuster disclose the creditors of a
debtor to anyone other than: (a) The debtor; or (b) another creditor
of the debtor and then only to the extent necessary to secure the
cooperation of such a creditor in a debt adjusting plan.

--- END ---