BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.25.0194 and 1974 ex.s. c 97 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state and its political subdivisions, including school
districts, and all officials, agents, employees, or representatives
thereof, are prohibited from in any way discriminating against licensed
chiropractors in performing and receiving compensation for services
covered by their licenses. Licensed chiropractors must be allowed to
perform sports physicals for school athletes and physical examinations
required for commercial driver's licenses.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.25.0195 and 1974 ex.s. c 97 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state and its
political subdivisions, and all officials, agents, employees, or
representatives thereof, are prohibited from entering into any
agreement or contract with any individual, group, association,
including the Washington interscholastic activities association, or
corporation which in any way, directly or indirectly, discriminates
against licensed chiropractors in performing and receiving compensation
for services covered by their licenses.

--- END ---