BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature finds that
Washington's system to support persons with intellectual disabilities
in the residential services and supports program should more
aggressively investigate and resolve complaints of abuse or neglect for
the vulnerable populations it serves. The legislature intends to
address current funding levels that limit the department of social and
health services' ability to promote vulnerable adult protections in the
program. The legislature further intends that the cost of complaint
investigation should be supported by an appropriate certification fee
paid by the regulated businesses, rather than by the general taxpayers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
CERTIFICATION FEES. (1) Before the issuance of initial certification
for the residential services and supports program, the applicant shall
pay a certification fee. After initial certification, the certified
provider must also pay an annual certification fee. Beginning July 1,
2014, and thereafter, the initial and annual certification fees must be
established in the omnibus appropriations act and any amendment or
additions made to that act. The certification fees established in the
omnibus appropriations act and any amendment or additions made to that
act may not exceed the department's costs for investigation of
complaints about provider practice and individuals alleged to have
abused, neglected, abandoned, or exploited clients. The certification
fees must include all of the department's cost of paying providers for
the amount of the certification fee attributed to medicaid clients.
(2) No fee may be required of government-operated programs, the
portion of certified residential services and supports clients for whom
the program pays licensing fees under chapter 70.128 or 18.20 RCW, or
court-appointed receivers.
(3) The department may not collect the certification fee
established in subsection (1) of this section if federal matching funds
are unavailable for paying providers the amount of the license fee
attributed to medicaid clients, or if federal matching funds are
unavailable for investigative resources hired as a result of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 DEPARTMENT DUTIES. The department shall use
additional investigative resources to address a significant growth in
the residential services and supports program complaint workload. The
department shall use the resources to intervene for clients in a
timelier manner when there is possible abuse or neglect. "Complaints,"
as used in this section, include both complaints about provider
practice, under this chapter, and complaints about individuals alleged
to have abused, neglected, abandoned, or exploited clients, under
chapter 74.34 RCW. The department shall submit annual reports to the
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature, starting
December 1, 2015, and ending December 1, 2019. Each annual report must
show how many investigators have been hired as a result of this
chapter, and the number of cases investigated by these new staff. The
report must also show how the percentage of total complaints
investigated, and the average length of time to close a case, have
changed as a result of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each
added to chapter 71A.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2014.

--- END ---