BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that allergies are
a serious medical disorder that affect more than one in five persons in
the United States and are the sixth leading cause of chronic disease.
Roughly one in thirteen children has a food allergy, and the incidence
is rising. Up to forty percent of food-allergic children may be at
risk for anaphylaxis, a severe and potentially life-threatening
reaction. Anaphylaxis may also occur due to an insect sting, drug
allergy, or other causes. Twenty-five percent of first-time
anaphylactic reactions among children occur in a school setting.
Anaphylaxis can occur anywhere on school property, including the
classroom, playground, school bus, or on field trips.
(2) Rapid and appropriate administration of the drug epinephrine,
also known as adrenaline, to a patient experiencing an anaphylactic
reaction may make the difference between life and death. In a school
setting, epinephrine is typically administered intramuscularly via an
epinephrine autoinjector device. Medical experts agree that the
benefits of emergency epinephrine administration far outweigh the
risks.
(3) The legislature further finds that, on many days, as much as
twenty percent of the nation's combined adult and child population can
be found in public and nonpublic schools. Therefore, schools need to
be prepared to treat potentially life-threatening anaphylactic
reactions in the event a student is experiencing a first-time
anaphylactic reaction, a student does not have his or her own
epinephrine autoinjector device available, or if a school nurse is not
in the vicinity at the time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
(1) School districts and nonpublic schools may maintain at a school
in a designated location a supply of epinephrine autoinjectors based on
the number of students enrolled in the school.
(2)(a) A physician may prescribe epinephrine autoinjectors in the
name of the school district or school to be maintained for use when
necessary. Epinephrine prescriptions must be accompanied by a standing
physician's order for the administration of school-supplied,
undesignated epinephrine autoinjectors for potentially life-threatening
allergic reactions.
(b) There are no changes to current prescription or self-administration practices for children with existing physician
prescribed epinephrine autoinjectors or a physician guided anaphylaxis
action plan.
(c) Epinephrine autoinjectors may be obtained from donation
sources, but must require a physician's prescription.
(3)(a) When a student does not have an epinephrine autoinjector or
a prescription for an epinephrine autoinjector on file, the school
nurse or designated trained school personnel may utilize the school
district or school supply of epinephrine autoinjectors to respond to an
anaphylactic reaction under a standing protocol from a physician
employed under RCW 28A.210.300 or any other physician with which the
school has contracted for medical services.
(b) Epinephrine autoinjectors may be used on school property,
including the school building, playground, and school bus, as well as
during field trips or sanctioned excursions away from school property.
The school nurse or designated trained school personnel may carry an
appropriate supply of school owned epinephrine autoinjectors on field
trips or excursions.
(4)(a) If a student is injured or harmed due to the administration
of epinephrine that a physician has prescribed and a pharmacist has
dispensed to a school under this section, the physician and pharmacist
may not be held responsible for the injury unless he or she issued the
prescription with a conscious disregard for safety.
(b) If a student is injured or harmed due to the administration of
epinephrine that a school employee has administered to a student, the
school employee may not be held responsible for the injury if he or she
acted in good faith professionally and according to his or her training
level. The school employee may be held responsible for the injury if
he or she administered the epinephrine injection with a conscious
disregard for safety.
(c) A school, school district, nonpublic school, or the office of
the superintendent of public instruction is not responsible for any
injury that occurs under (a) or (b) of this subsection.

--- END ---