BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.63.151 and 1991 sp.s. c 25 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each party to a traffic infraction case is responsible for costs
incurred by that party. Notwithstanding RCW 46.63.110(4), a court may
assess additional costs of up to twenty-five dollars against a
defendant, except for a holder of a commercial driver's license, who is
successful in setting aside a committed finding after failing to
respond to an infraction or failing to appear for a hearing. No other
costs or attorneys' fees may be awarded to either party in a traffic
infraction case, except as provided for in RCW 46.30.020(2).

--- END ---