BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A pharmacist may dispense not more than a ninety-day supply of
a drug other than a controlled substance pursuant to a valid
prescription that specifies an initial quantity of less than a
ninety-day supply followed by periodic refills of that amount if all of
the following requirements are satisfied:
(a) The patient has completed an initial thirty-day supply of the
drug. However, if the prescription continues the same medication as
previously dispensed in a ninety-day supply, the initial thirty-day
supply under this subsection (1) is not required;
(b) The total quantity of dosage units dispensed does not exceed
the total quantity of dosage units authorized by the prescriber on the
prescription including refills;
(c) The prescriber has not specified on the prescription that
dispensing the prescription in an initial amount followed by periodic
refills is medically necessary; and
(d) The pharmacist is exercising his or her professional judgment.
(2) In no case may a pharmacist dispense a greater supply of a drug
pursuant to this section if the prescriber personally indicates, either
orally or in their own handwriting, "no change to quantity," or words
of similar meaning. Nothing in this section prohibits a prescriber
from checking a box on a prescription marked "no change to quantity,"
provided that the prescriber personally initials the box or checkmark.
(3) Nothing in this section may be construed to require a health
care service plan, health insurer, workers' compensation insurance
plan, pharmacy benefit manager, or any other person or entity
including, but not limited to, a state program or state employer, to
provide coverage for a drug in a manner inconsistent with the
beneficiary's plan benefit.

--- END ---