BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Phototherapy device" means equipment that emits ultraviolet
radiation used by a health care professional in the treatment of
disease.
(2) "Tanning facility" means any location, place, area, structure,
or business that provides persons access to any ultraviolet tanning
device.
(3) "Ultraviolet tanning device" means equipment that emits
electromagnetic radiation with wavelengths in the air between two
hundred and four hundred nanometers used for tanning of the skin
including, but not limited to, a sunlamp, tanning booth, or tanning
bed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This chapter does not apply to a
phototherapy device used by or under the direct supervision of a
licensed physician who is trained in the use of phototherapy devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Persons under eighteen years of age are
prohibited from using an ultraviolet tanning device.
(2) Proof of age must be satisfied with a driver's license or other
government-issued identification containing the date of birth and a
photograph of the individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A tanning facility that violates this
chapter is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand
dollars per day in addition to any other penalty established by law.
(2) A first violation of this chapter is a class 1 infraction.
Each day a first violation continues constitutes a separate infraction.
(3) Any violation of this chapter subsequent to a first violation
is a misdemeanor under RCW 9A.20.010. Each day a subsequent violation
continues constitutes a separate misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---