BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.009 and 2009 c 537 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The authority, or an employing agency at the authority's
direction, ((an employing agency)) shall initially determine and
periodically review whether an employee is eligible for benefits
pursuant to the criteria established under this chapter.
(2) An employing agency shall inform an employee in writing whether
or not he or she is eligible for benefits when initially determined and
upon any subsequent change, including notice of the employee's right to
an appeal.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.011 and 2012 c 87 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(2) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established
under RCW 41.05.055.
(3) "Dependent care assistance program" means a benefit plan
whereby state and public employees may pay for certain employment
related dependent care with pretax dollars as provided in the salary
reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 129 or
other sections of the internal revenue code.
(4) "Director" means the director of the authority.
(5) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means
law enforcement officers and firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
members of the Washington state patrol retirement fund as defined in
RCW 43.43.120, and reserve officers and firefighters as defined in RCW
41.24.010 who die as a result of injuries sustained in the course of
employment as determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department
of labor and industries.
(6) "Employee" includes all employees of the state, whether or not
covered by civil service; elected and appointed officials of the
executive branch of government, including full-time members of boards,
commissions, or committees; justices of the supreme court and judges of
the court of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state
legislature. Pursuant to contractual agreement with the authority,
"employee" may also include: (a) Employees of a county, municipality,
or other political subdivision of the state and members of the
legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to
office after February 20, 1970, if the legislative authority of the
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state seeks
and receives the approval of the authority to provide any of its
insurance programs by contract with the authority, as provided in RCW
41.04.205 and 41.05.021(1)(g); (b) employees of employee organizations
representing state civil service employees, at the option of each such
employee organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees of
employee organizations currently pooled with employees of school
districts for the purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at the
option of each such employee organization; (c) employees of a school
district if the authority agrees to provide any of the school
districts' insurance programs by contract with the authority as
provided in RCW 28A.400.350; (d) employees of a tribal government, if
the governing body of the tribal government seeks and receives the
approval of the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by
contract with the authority, as provided in RCW 41.05.021(1) (f) and
(g); and (e) employees of the Washington health benefit exchange if the
governing board of the exchange established in RCW 43.71.020 seeks and
receives approval of the authority to provide any of its insurance
programs by contract with the authority, as provided in RCW
41.05.021(1) (g) and (n). "Employee" does not include: Adult family
((homeowners)) home providers; unpaid volunteers; patients of state
hospitals; inmates; employees of the Washington state convention and
trade center as provided in RCW 41.05.110; students of institutions of
higher education as determined by their institution; and any others not
expressly defined as employees under this chapter or by the authority
under this chapter.
(7) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(8) "Employing agency" means a division, department, or separate
agency of state government, including an institution of higher
education; a county, municipality, school district, educational service
district, or other political subdivision; and a tribal government
covered by this chapter.
(9) "Faculty" means an academic employee of an institution of
higher education whose workload is not defined by work hours but whose
appointment, workload, and duties directly serve the institution's
academic mission, as determined under the authority of its enabling
statutes, its governing body, and any applicable collective bargaining
agreement.
(10) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows
employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the
amount of employee contributions from among a range of choices offered
by the authority.
(11) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01
RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW,
or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.
(12) "Medical flexible spending arrangement" means a benefit plan
whereby state and public employees may reduce their salary before taxes
to pay for medical expenses not reimbursed by insurance as provided in
the salary reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec.
125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.
(13) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility
and enrollment requirements under the salary reduction plan.
(14) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.
(15) "Premium payment plan" means a benefit plan whereby state and
public employees may pay their share of group health plan premiums with
pretax dollars as provided in the salary reduction plan under this
chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the
internal revenue code.
(16) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:
(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or
educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;
(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district on or after October 1, 1993, and
immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;
(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district due to a total and permanent disability,
and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.
(17) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.
(18) "Salary reduction plan" means a benefit plan whereby state and
public employees may agree to a reduction of salary on a pretax basis
to participate in the dependent care assistance program, medical
flexible spending arrangement, or premium payment plan offered pursuant
to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.
(19) "Seasonal employee" means an employee hired to work during a
recurring, annual season with a duration of three months or more, and
anticipated to return each season to perform similar work.
(20) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in:
(a) RCW 41.32.010(17) on or after July 1, 1996; or
(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or
(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;
and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.32.010(33), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan
3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.
(21) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical
and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state
health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the
department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and
local school districts.
(22) "Tribal government" means an Indian tribal government as
defined in section 3(32) of the employee retirement income security act
of 1974, as amended, or an agency or instrumentality of the tribal
government, that has government offices principally located in this
state.
(23) "Employer group" means those counties, municipalities,
political subdivisions, the Washington health benefit exchange, tribal
governments, school districts, and educational service districts, and
employee organizations representing state civil service employees,
obtaining employee benefits through a contractual agreement with the
authority.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.05.065 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 8 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall study all matters connected with the provision
of health care coverage, life insurance, liability insurance,
accidental death and dismemberment insurance, and disability income
insurance or any of, or a combination of, the enumerated types of
insurance for employees and their dependents on the best basis possible
with relation both to the welfare of the employees and to the state.
However, liability insurance shall not be made available to dependents.
(2) The board shall develop employee benefit plans that include
comprehensive health care benefits for employees. In developing these
plans, the board shall consider the following elements:
(a) Methods of maximizing cost containment while ensuring access to
quality health care;
(b) Development of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment and ensure access to quality care, including but not
limited to prepaid delivery systems and prospective payment methods;
(c) Wellness incentives that focus on proven strategies, such as
smoking cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol
misuse, appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and
motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition
education;
(d) Utilization review procedures including, but not limited to a
cost-efficient method for prior authorization of services, hospital
inpatient length of stay review, requirements for use of outpatient
surgeries and second opinions for surgeries, review of invoices or
claims submitted by service providers, and performance audit of
providers;
(e) Effective coordination of benefits; and
(f) Minimum standards for insuring entities.
(3) To maintain the comprehensive nature of employee health care
benefits, benefits provided to employees shall be substantially
equivalent to the state employees' health benefits plan in effect on
January 1, 1993. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit changes or
increases in employee point-of-service payments or employee premium
payments for benefits or the administration of a high deductible health
plan in conjunction with a health savings account. The board may
establish employee eligibility criteria which are not substantially
equivalent to employee eligibility criteria in effect on January 1,
1993.
(4) Except if bargained for under chapter 41.80 RCW, the board
shall design benefits and determine the terms and conditions of
employee and retired employee participation and coverage, including
establishment of eligibility criteria subject to the requirements of
this chapter. Employer groups obtaining benefits through contractual
agreement with the authority for employees defined in RCW 41.05.011(6)
(a) through (d) may contractually agree with the authority to benefits
eligibility criteria which differs from that determined by the board.
The eligibility criteria established by the board shall be no more
restrictive than the following:
(a) Except as provided in (b) through (e) of this subsection, an
employee is eligible for benefits from the date of employment if the
employing agency anticipates he or she will work an average of at least
eighty hours per month and for at least eight hours in each month for
more than six consecutive months. An employee determined ineligible
for benefits at the beginning of his or her employment shall become
eligible in the following circumstances:
(i) An employee who works an average of at least eighty hours per
month and for at least eight hours in each month and whose anticipated
duration of employment is revised from less than or equal to six
consecutive months to more than six consecutive months becomes eligible
when the revision is made.
(ii) An employee who works an average of at least eighty hours per
month over a period of six consecutive months and for at least eight
hours in each of those six consecutive months becomes eligible at the
first of the month following the six-month averaging period.
(b) A seasonal employee is eligible for benefits from the date of
employment if the employing agency anticipates that he or she will work
an average of at least eighty hours per month and for at least eight
hours in each month of the season. A seasonal employee determined
ineligible at the beginning of his or her employment who works an
average of at least ((half-time, as defined by the board,)) eighty
hours per month over a period of six consecutive months and at least
eight hours in each of those six consecutive months becomes eligible at
the first of the month following the six-month averaging period. A
benefits-eligible seasonal employee who works a season of less than
nine months shall not be eligible for the employer contribution during
the off season, but may continue enrollment in benefits during the off
season by self-paying for the benefits. A benefits-eligible seasonal
employee who works a season of nine months or more is eligible for the
employer contribution through the off season following each season
worked.
(c) Faculty are eligible as follows:
(i) Faculty who the employing agency anticipates will work
half–time or more for the entire instructional year or equivalent nine-month period are eligible for benefits from the date of employment.
Eligibility shall continue until the beginning of the first full month
of the next instructional year, unless the employment relationship is
terminated, in which case eligibility shall cease the first month
following the notice of termination or the effective date of the
termination, whichever is later.
(ii) Faculty who the employing agency anticipates will not work for
the entire instructional year or equivalent nine-month period are
eligible for benefits at the beginning of the second consecutive
quarter or semester of employment in which he or she is anticipated to
work, or has actually worked, half-time or more. Such an employee
shall continue to receive uninterrupted employer contributions for
benefits if the employee works at least half-time in a quarter or
semester. Faculty who the employing agency anticipates will not work
for the entire instructional year or equivalent nine-month period, but
who actually work half-time or more throughout the entire instructional
year, are eligible for summer or off-quarter or off-semester coverage.
Faculty who have met the criteria of this subsection (4)(c)(ii), who
work at least two quarters or two semesters of the academic year with
an average academic year workload of half-time or more for three
quarters or two semesters of the academic year, and who have worked an
average of half-time or more in each of the two preceding academic
years shall continue to receive uninterrupted employer contributions
for benefits if he or she works at least half-time in a quarter or
semester or works two quarters or two semesters of the academic year
with an average academic workload each academic year of half-time or
more for three quarters or two semesters. Eligibility under this
section ceases immediately if this criteria is not met.
(iii) Faculty may establish or maintain eligibility for benefits by
working for more than one institution of higher education. When
faculty work for more than one institution of higher education, those
institutions shall prorate the employer contribution costs, or if
eligibility is reached through one institution, that institution will
pay the full employer contribution. Faculty working for more than one
institution must alert his or her employers to his or her potential
eligibility in order to establish eligibility.
(iv) The employing agency must provide written notice to faculty
who are potentially eligible for benefits under this subsection (4)(c)
of their potential eligibility.
(v) To be eligible for maintenance of benefits through averaging
under (c)(ii) of this subsection, faculty must provide written
notification to his or her employing agency or agencies of his or her
potential eligibility.
(vi) For the purposes of this subsection (4)(c):
(A) "Academic year" means summer, fall, winter, and spring quarters
or summer, fall, and spring semesters;
(B) "Half-time" means one-half of the full-time academic workload
as determined by each institution; except that for community and
technical college faculty, half-time academic workload is calculated
according to RCW 28B.50.489.
(d) A legislator is eligible for benefits on the date his or her
term begins. All other elected and full-time appointed officials of
the legislative and executive branches of state government are eligible
for benefits on the date his or her term begins or they take the oath
of office, whichever occurs first.
(e) A justice of the supreme court and judges of the court of
appeals and the superior courts become eligible for benefits on the
date he or she takes the oath of office.
(f) Except as provided in (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection,
eligibility ceases for any employee the first of the month following
termination of the employment relationship.
(g) In determining eligibility under this section, the employing
agency may disregard training hours, standby hours, or temporary
changes in work hours as determined by the authority under this
section.
(h) Insurance coverage for all eligible employees begins on the
first day of the month following the date when eligibility for benefits
is established. If the date eligibility is established is the first
working day of a month, insurance coverage begins on that date.
(i) Eligibility for an employee whose work circumstances are
described by more than one of the eligibility categories in (a) through
(e) of this subsection shall be determined solely by the criteria of
the category that most closely describes the employee's work
circumstances.
(j) Except for an employee eligible for benefits under (b) or
(c)(ii) of this subsection, an employee who has established eligibility
for benefits under this section shall remain eligible for benefits each
month in which he or she is in pay status for eight or more hours, if
(i) he or she remains in a benefits-eligible position and (ii) leave
from the benefits-eligible position is approved by the employing
agency. A benefits-eligible seasonal employee is eligible for the
employer contribution in any month of his or her season in which he or
she is in pay status eight or more hours during that month.
Eligibility ends if these conditions are not met, the employment
relationship is terminated, or the employee voluntarily transfers to a
noneligible position.
(k) For the purposes of this subsection((:
(i) "Academic year" means summer, fall, winter, and spring quarters
or semesters;
(ii) "Half-time" means one-half of the full-time academic workload
as determined by each institution, except that half-time for community
and technical college faculty employees shall have the same meaning as
"part-time" under RCW 28B.50.489;
(iii))), the board shall define "benefits-eligible position."
((shall be defined by the board.))
(5) The board may authorize premium contributions for an employee
and the employee's dependents in a manner that encourages the use of
cost-efficient managed health care systems.
(6)(a) For any open enrollment period following August 24, 2011,
the board shall offer a health savings account option for employees
that conforms to section 223, Part VII of subchapter B of chapter 1 of
the internal revenue code of 1986. The board shall comply with all
applicable federal standards related to the establishment of health
savings accounts.
(b) By November 30, 2015, and each year thereafter, the authority
shall submit a report to the relevant legislative policy and fiscal
committees that includes the following:
(i) Public employees' benefits board health plan cost and service
utilization trends for the previous three years, in total and for each
health plan offered to employees;
(ii) For each health plan offered to employees, the number and
percentage of employees and dependents enrolled in the plan, and the
age and gender demographics of enrollees in each plan;
(iii) Any impact of enrollment in alternatives to the most
comprehensive plan, including the high deductible health plan with a
health savings account, upon the cost of health benefits for those
employees who have chosen to remain enrolled in the most comprehensive
plan.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, for any
open enrollment period following August 24, 2011, the board shall offer
a high deductible health plan in conjunction with a health savings
account developed under subsection (6) of this section.
(8) Employees shall choose participation in one of the health care
benefit plans developed by the board and may be permitted to waive
coverage under terms and conditions established by the board.
(9) The board shall review plans proposed by insuring entities that
desire to offer property insurance and/or accident and casualty
insurance to state employees through payroll deduction. The board may
approve any such plan for payroll deduction by insuring entities
holding a valid certificate of authority in the state of Washington and
which the board determines to be in the best interests of employees and
the state. The board shall adopt rules setting forth criteria by which
it shall evaluate the plans.
(10) Before January 1, 1998, the public employees' benefits board
shall make available one or more fully insured long-term care insurance
plans that comply with the requirements of chapter 48.84 RCW. Such
programs shall be made available to eligible employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees as well as eligible dependents
which, for the purpose of this section, includes the parents of the
employee or retiree and the parents of the spouse of the employee or
retiree. Employees of local governments, political subdivisions, and
tribal governments not otherwise enrolled in the public employees'
benefits board sponsored medical programs may enroll under terms and
conditions established by the administrator, if it does not jeopardize
the financial viability of the public employees' benefits board's long-term care offering.
(a) Participation of eligible employees or retired employees and
retired school employees in any long-term care insurance plan made
available by the public employees' benefits board is voluntary and
shall not be subject to binding arbitration under chapter 41.56 RCW.
Participation is subject to reasonable underwriting guidelines and
eligibility rules established by the public employees' benefits board
and the health care authority.
(b) The employee, retired employee, and retired school employee are
solely responsible for the payment of the premium rates developed by
the health care authority. The health care authority is authorized to
charge a reasonable administrative fee in addition to the premium
charged by the long-term care insurer, which shall include the health
care authority's cost of administration, marketing, and consumer
education materials prepared by the health care authority and the
office of the insurance commissioner.
(c) To the extent administratively possible, the state shall
establish an automatic payroll or pension deduction system for the
payment of the long-term care insurance premiums.
(d) The public employees' benefits board and the health care
authority shall establish a technical advisory committee to provide
advice in the development of the benefit design and establishment of
underwriting guidelines and eligibility rules. The committee shall
also advise the board and authority on effective and cost-effective
ways to market and distribute the long-term care product. The
technical advisory committee shall be comprised, at a minimum, of
representatives of the office of the insurance commissioner, providers
of long-term care services, licensed insurance agents with expertise in
long-term care insurance, employees, retired employees, retired school
employees, and other interested parties determined to be appropriate by
the board.
(e) The health care authority shall offer employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees the option of purchasing long-term care insurance through licensed agents or brokers appointed by the
long-term care insurer. The authority, in consultation with the public
employees' benefits board, shall establish marketing procedures and may
consider all premium components as a part of the contract negotiations
with the long-term care insurer.
(f) In developing the long-term care insurance benefit designs, the
public employees' benefits board shall include an alternative plan of
care benefit, including adult day services, as approved by the office
of the insurance commissioner.
(g) The health care authority, with the cooperation of the office
of the insurance commissioner, shall develop a consumer education
program for the eligible employees, retired employees, and retired
school employees designed to provide education on the potential need
for long-term care, methods of financing long-term care, and the
availability of long-term care insurance products including the
products offered by the board.
(11) The board may establish penalties to be imposed by the
authority when the eligibility determinations of an employing agency
fail to comply with the criteria under this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.05.066 and 2007 c 156 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
A certificate of domestic partnership ((issued to a couple of the
same sex)) qualified under the provisions of RCW 26.60.030 shall be
recognized as evidence of a qualified ((same sex)) domestic partnership
fulfilling all necessary eligibility criteria for the partner of the
employee to receive benefits. Nothing in this section affects the
requirements of ((same sex)) domestic partners to complete
documentation related to federal tax status that may currently be
required by the board for employees choosing to make premium payments
on a pretax basis.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.05.080 and 2009 c 523 s 1 and 2009 c 522 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Under the qualifications, terms, conditions, and benefits set
by the board:
(a) Retired or disabled state employees, retired or disabled school
employees, retired or disabled employees of county, municipal, or other
political subdivisions, or retired or disabled employees of tribal
governments covered by this chapter may continue their participation in
insurance plans and contracts after retirement or disablement;
(b) Separated employees may continue their participation in
insurance plans and contracts if participation is selected immediately
upon separation from employment;
(c) Surviving spouses, surviving state registered domestic
partners, and dependent children of emergency service personnel killed
in the line of duty may participate in insurance plans and contracts.
(2) Rates charged surviving spouses and surviving state registered
domestic partners of emergency service personnel killed in the line of
duty, retired or disabled employees, separated employees, spouses, or
dependent children who are not eligible for parts A and B of medicare
shall be based on the experience of the community rated risk pool
established under RCW 41.05.022.
(3) Rates charged to surviving spouses and surviving state
registered domestic partners of emergency service personnel killed in
the line of duty, retired or disabled employees, separated employees,
spouses, or children who are eligible for parts A and B of medicare
shall be calculated from a separate experience risk pool comprised only
of individuals eligible for parts A and B of medicare; however, the
premiums charged to medicare-eligible retirees and disabled employees
shall be reduced by the amount of the subsidy provided under RCW
41.05.085.
(4) Surviving spouses, surviving state registered domestic
partners, and dependent children of emergency service personnel killed
in the line of duty and retired or disabled and separated employees
shall be responsible for payment of premium rates developed by the
authority which shall include the cost to the authority of providing
insurance coverage including any amounts necessary for reserves and
administration in accordance with this chapter. These self pay rates
will be established based on a separate rate for the employee, the
spouse, state registered domestic partners, and the children.
(5) The term "retired state employees" for the purpose of this
section shall include but not be limited to members of the legislature
whether voluntarily or involuntarily leaving state office.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.05.095 and 2010 c 94 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any plan offered to employees under this chapter must offer
each employee the option of covering any ((unmarried)) dependent of the
employee under the age of twenty-((five)) six.
(2) ((Any employee choosing under subsection (1) of this section to
cover a dependent who is: (a) Age twenty through twenty-three and not
a registered student at an accredited secondary school, college,
university, vocational school, or school of nursing; or (b) age twenty-four, shall be required to pay the full cost of such coverage.
(3) Any employee choosing under subsection (1) of this section to
cover a dependent with disabilities, mental illness, or intellectual or
other developmental disabilities, who is incapable of self-support, may
continue covering that dependent under the same premium and payment
structure as for dependents under the age of twenty, irrespective of
age)) Coverage must terminate upon attainment of age twenty-six except
in the case of a child who is and continues to be both (a) incapable of
self-sustaining employment by reason of a developmental disability or
physical handicap and (b) chiefly dependent upon the employee for
support and maintenance, provided proof of such incapacity and
dependency is furnished by the employee within sixty days of the
child's attainment of age twenty-six and subsequently as may be
required by the authority, but not more frequently than annually after
the two-year period following the child's attainment of age twenty-six.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.05.195 and 2009 c 523 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter or rules or
procedures adopted by the authority, the authority shall make available
to retired or disabled employees who are enrolled in parts A and B of
medicare one or more medicare supplemental insurance policies that
conform to the requirements of chapter 48.66 RCW. The policies shall
be chosen in consultation with the public employees' benefits board.
These policies shall be made available to retired or disabled state
employees; retired or disabled school district employees; retired
employees of county, municipal, or other political subdivisions or
retired employees of tribal governments eligible for coverage available
under the authority; or surviving spouses or surviving state registered
domestic partners of emergency service personnel killed in the line of
duty.

--- END ---