BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.04.050 and 2012 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
The following named officers and persons, active or retired, are
hereby authorized to solemnize marriages, to wit: Justices of the
supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of the superior
courts, supreme court commissioners, court of appeals commissioners,
superior court commissioners, judges of courts of limited jurisdiction
as defined in RCW 3.02.010, elected officials in the executive or
legislative branch of state, county, or municipal government, and any
regularly licensed or ordained minister or any priest, imam, rabbi, or
similar official of any religious organization((, and judges of courts
of limited jurisdiction as defined in RCW 3.02.010)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 26.04 RCW
to read as follows:
An elected official in the executive or legislative branch of
state, county, or municipal government is not required to solemnize any
marriage, and is immune from any civil claim or cause of action based
on a refusal to solemnize any marriage.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.04.070 and 2012 c 3 s 6 are each amended to read as
follows:
In the solemnization of marriage no particular form is required,
except that the parties thereto shall assent or declare in the presence
of the minister, priest, imam, rabbi, or similar official of any
religious organization, elected official, or judicial officer
solemnizing the same, and in the presence of at least two attending
witnesses, that they take each other to be spouses.

--- END ---