BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this chapter is to establish
a training program for managers of manufactured housing communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Manufactured housing community" has the same meaning as
provided in RCW 59.20.030.
(2) "Manufactured housing community management" means those
actions, functions, or duties related to the management of a
manufactured housing community including, but not limited to, the
collection of rent and other charges, renting mobile home lots, the
enforcement of the terms of tenancy, and the implementation of landlord
and tenant duties and responsibilities under chapter 59.20 RCW.
(3) "Manufactured housing community manager" means a person who
performs manufactured housing community management, and is required to
be trained under this chapter to perform manufactured housing community
management services.
(4) "Training program" means the manufactured housing community
manager training program established pursuant to this chapter and
administered by the attorney general under the manufactured/mobile home
dispute resolution program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A person must not manage a manufactured
housing community in this state beyond the grace period identified in
subsection (3) of this section until the person has completed the
training program.
(2) An owner of a manufactured housing community is not required to
be trained under this chapter if the owner employs a resident manager,
property manager, or independent contract manager who has completed the
training program to perform manufactured housing community management
duties.
(3) If a person becomes a manufactured housing community manager
and has not previously completed the training program, the person must
complete the training program within one year of beginning employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Any person required to be trained as a
manufactured housing community manager must acquire a certificate of
completion of training from the attorney general.
(2) The certificate of completion of training must:
(a) Be made available for view by the public; and
(b) Indicate that the person has satisfactorily completed a minimum
of four hours of training as prescribed under subsection (4) of this
section.
(3) A certificate of completion of training is effective upon the
date of issue and is valid for one year.
(4) A minimum of four hours of manufactured housing community
manager training is required annually.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The attorney general under the
manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution program must administer the
training program.
(2) The attorney general must develop the curriculum for the
training program with input from statewide associations representing
manufacturing housing community tenants and owners.
(3) The attorney general must issue certificates of completion of
training to persons who have successfully completed the training
program, and must maintain a list of the names of these persons to be
made available to the public.
(4) The attorney general may charge a fee for the training program
to recover the costs of the training program, but only to the extent
funds are not available in the manufactured/mobile home dispute
resolution program account to cover the costs of the training program.
(5) The attorney general may enforce this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The attorney general is not responsible for
the conduct of a landlord, manager, owner, or other person attending or
required to attend the training program. This chapter does not create
a cause of action against the attorney general related to the training
program or a violation of this chapter by any person required to attend
the training program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A violation of this chapter is a class 1
civil infraction under RCW 7.80.120.

Sec. 8 RCW 59.30.070 and 2007 c 431 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution program account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
sources directed to the manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution
program must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for the costs associated with administering
the manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution program, including the
training program under chapter 59.-- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 12 of this act). Only the attorney general or the attorney
general's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 3 through 5 of this act take
effect July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Except for sections 3 through 5 of this
act, this act takes effect August 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 59 RCW.

--- END ---