BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that regulatory
processes impose significant costs on doing business and significantly
influence investment behavior, location decisions, start-up activity,
expansions, and hiring. The legislature further finds that, for more
than a decade, the executive and legislative branches have called upon
state agencies to review their regulations to achieve meaningful
regulatory reform and improve the regulatory climate for Washington
businesses. However, a 2012 performance audit conducted by the state
auditor's office found that the departments of ecology, health, and
labor and industries have not adopted sufficient streamlining processes
or formally measured the results of their streamlining activities.
Thus, it is the intent of the legislature to formally direct these
three state agencies to achieve the regulatory reform that has been
repeatedly called for by the governor and the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW
to read as follows:
The department of ecology must establish a continuous, formal
review process of its rules. The review must be based on a prioritized
work plan and must include rules relating to licenses, permits, and
inspections. The review must identify rules that can be simplified,
amended, or repealed with a goal to reduce the regulatory burden on
businesses without compromising the public health or safety.
Performance measures must be adopted to assess the effectiveness of
streamlining efforts. The department must establish a process for
effectively applying sunset provisions to rules when applicable. The
department must present an update to the applicable committees of the
legislature regarding its review process, performance measures, and
accomplishments of its streamlining efforts by January 2014, and every
other year thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.22 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of labor and industries must establish a continuous,
formal review process of its rules. The review must be based on a
prioritized work plan and must include rules relating to licenses,
permits, and inspections. The review must identify rules that can be
simplified, amended, or repealed with a goal to reduce the regulatory
burden on businesses without compromising the public health or safety.
Performance measures must be adopted to assess the effectiveness of
streamlining efforts. The department must establish a process for
effectively applying sunset provisions to rules when applicable. The
department must present an update to the applicable committees of the
legislature regarding its review process, performance measures, and
accomplishments of its streamlining efforts by January 2014, and every
other year thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of health must establish a continuous, formal review
process of its rules. The review must be based on a prioritized work
plan and must include rules relating to licenses, permits, and
inspections. The review must identify rules that can be simplified,
amended, or repealed with a goal to reduce the regulatory burden on
businesses without compromising the public health or safety.
Performance measures must be adopted to assess the effectiveness of
streamlining efforts. The department must establish a process for
effectively applying sunset provisions to rules when applicable. The
department must present an update to the applicable committees of the
legislature regarding its review process, performance measures, and
accomplishments of its streamlining efforts by January 2014, and every
other year thereafter.

--- END ---