BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.419 and 2003 c 193 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
State, local, or county law enforcement personnel may enforce
speeding violations under RCW 46.61.400 on private roads within a
community organized under chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.38 RCW if:
(1) A majority of the homeowner's association's, condominium
association's, or association of apartment owners' board of directors
votes to authorize the issuance of speeding infractions on its private
roads, and declares a speed limit not lower than twenty miles per hour;
(2) A written agreement regarding the speeding enforcement is
signed by the homeowner's association, condominium association, or
association of apartment owners president and the chief law enforcement
official of the city or county within whose jurisdiction the private
road is located;
(3) The homeowner's association, condominium association, or
association of apartment owners has provided written notice to all of
the homeowners, unit owners, or apartment owners describing the new
authority to issue speeding infractions; and
(4) Signs have been posted declaring the speed limit at all vehicle
entrances to the community.

--- END ---