BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.225.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 87 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Prescription information submitted to the department shall be
confidential, in compliance with chapter 70.02 RCW and federal health
care information privacy requirements and not subject to disclosure,
except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(2) The department shall maintain procedures to ensure that the
privacy and confidentiality of patients and patient information
collected, recorded, transmitted, and maintained is not disclosed to
persons except as in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(3) The department may provide data in the prescription monitoring
program to the following persons:
(a) Persons authorized to prescribe or dispense controlled
substances, for the purpose of providing medical or pharmaceutical care
for their patients;
(b) An individual who requests the individual's own prescription
monitoring information;
(c) Health professional licensing, certification, or regulatory
agency or entity;
(d) Appropriate local, state, and federal law enforcement or
prosecutorial officials who are engaged in a bona fide specific
investigation involving a designated person;
(e) Authorized practitioners of the department of social and health
services and the health care authority regarding medicaid program
recipients;
(f) The director or director's designee within the department of
labor and industries regarding workers' compensation claimants;
(g) The director or the director's designee within the department
of corrections regarding offenders committed to the department of
corrections;
(h) Other entities under grand jury subpoena or court order;
((and))
(i) Personnel of the department for purposes of administration and
enforcement of this chapter or chapter 69.50 RCW; and
(j) Personnel of a test site that meets the standards under
subsection (2) of this section pursuant to an agreement between the
test site and a person identified in (a) of this subsection to provide
assistance in determining which medications are being used by an
identified patient who is under the care of that person.
(4) The department may provide data to public or private entities
for statistical, research, or educational purposes after removing
information that could be used to identify individual patients,
dispensers, prescribers, and persons who received prescriptions from
dispensers.
(5) A dispenser or practitioner acting in good faith is immune from
any civil, criminal, or administrative liability that might otherwise
be incurred or imposed for requesting, receiving, or using information
from the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.225 RCW
to read as follows:
Test sites that may receive access to data in the prescription
monitoring program under RCW 70.225.040 must be:
(1) Licensed by the department as a test site under chapter 70.42
RCW; and
(2) Certified as a drug testing laboratory by the United States
department of health and human services, substance abuse mental health
services administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.225 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Test sites that qualify under section 2 of this act may not
store in any form, such as hard copy, electronic, or digital, any data
accessed from the prescription drug monitoring program database. Data
may only be transmitted to those entities listed in RCW 70.225.040(3).
(2) Access to data by the test site must occur under the
supervision of the responsible person as designated by the department
of health and human services, substance abuse mental health services
administration.
(3) Data may not be collected, disclosed, sold, or used in any
manner, except as provided in this chapter.

--- END ---