BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The voters of each county that does not operate under a home
rule charter may exercise within the county the powers of initiative
and referendum as provided in this section and sections 2 through 4 of
this act. The powers of initiative and referendum may not be used to
alter or avoid duties mandated by state law or state agency rule.
(2) The county legislative authority of each county that does not
operate under a home rule charter must establish by ordinance the form
to be used for referendum and initiative petitions in its county, and
must establish procedures for the circulation and signing of referendum
and initiative petitions.
(3) All referendum and initiative petitions adopted under
subsection (2) of this section must contain the full text of the
proposed measure and the ballot title and the following warning
verbatim:

"WARNING
Every person who signs this petition with any other than his or her
true name, or who knowingly signs more than one of these petitions, or
signs this petition when he or she is not a legal voter, or who signs
this petition when he or she is otherwise not qualified to sign it, or
who makes any false statement on this petition may be punished by fine
or imprisonment or both."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section and section 1 of
this act, any legal voter of a county may initiate ordinances or
amendments to existing ordinances by filing with the county auditor an
initiative petition. No ordinance that is the result of an initiative
approved by a majority of voters may be amended or repealed within two
years after enactment, unless a measure to amend or repeal the
ordinance is approved by a majority of voters voting at any special or
general election or is approved by a unanimous vote of the entire
membership of the county legislative authority.
(2) Ordinances providing for the compensation or working conditions
of county employees, redistricting of commissioner districts,
authorization or repeal of any appropriation of money or any portion of
the annual budget, and authorization or repeal of taxes or fees, are
not subject to an initiative.
(3)(a) Any legal voter of the county may file an initiative
proposal with the county auditor. The county auditor may charge a
twenty dollar filing fee. Within five working days from receipt of the
proposal, the county auditor must confer with the petitioner to review
the proposal as to form and style. The county auditor must assign the
initiative proposal a serial number, which must be the identifying
number for the proposal. The county auditor must then transmit a copy
of the proposal to the county prosecuting attorney.
(b) The county prosecuting attorney must confer with the petitioner
to review the legal aspects of the proposal. Within ten working days
after receipt of the proposal, the county prosecuting attorney must
compose a concise statement, posed as a positive question that does not
contain more than twenty-five words, that is a true and impartial
description of the initiative petition's essential contents. The
concise statement must be the ballot title.
(c) The petitioner has one hundred twenty days after the ballot
title is composed by the county prosecuting attorney to collect
signatures of registered voters of the county, equal to or more than
twenty-five percent of the number of votes cast in the county for the
office of governor at the last regular gubernatorial election, and
submit the petition containing the signatures to the county auditor for
filing. All initiative petitions proposing a measure to be submitted
to the people for their approval or rejection at the next general
election must be submitted for filing not less than one hundred twenty
days before such election.
(d) Within ten days after the filing of the initiative petition,
the county auditor must determine whether the petition bears sufficient
signatures.
(e) If the county auditor verifies the petition as containing
sufficient signatures, the county legislative authority must, within
twenty days after the petition is verified, consider the proposed
initiative. The county legislative authority must either pass the
proposed initiative without change or amendment or submit the proposed
initiative to the people at the next general election.
(f) If the proposed initiative is enacted by the county legislative
authority without change or amendment, the initiative is subject to
referendum.
(g) If the county legislative authority does not pass the proposed
initiative and proposes a substitute measure concerning the same
subject matter, the proposed substitute measure may be placed on the
same ballot with the proposed initiative. On the ballot, the voters
must be given, first, the option of approving either measure or
rejecting both measures and, second, the option to approve one measure
and reject the other. If a majority of the voters voting on the first
option are for approving either measure, then the measure receiving the
majority of votes cast on the second option is approved. If a majority
of the voters voting on the first option are for rejecting both
measures, then neither measure is approved regardless of the votes on
the second option.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The county legislative authority by ordinance may submit any
proposed or enacted ordinance to the voters for their approval or
rejection at a general or special election. If the ordinance is
approved by a majority of the voters voting on it, the ordinance
becomes effective ten days after the results of the election are
certified, unless a later date is specified by the measure submitting
the ordinance to the voters. If an enacted ordinance is rejected by a
majority of voters voting on it, the ordinance ceases to be effective
ten days after the results of the election are certified, unless a
later date is specified by the measure submitting the ordinance to the
voters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in this section and section 1 of this
act, an ordinance, or any part of an ordinance, may be subjected to a
referendum by the voters of the county. Emergency ordinances,
ordinances, or sections of any ordinance that: Provide for the
compensation or working conditions of county employees; authorize or
repeal any appropriations of money or any portion of the annual budget;
or authorize or repeal taxes or fees are not subject to referendum.
(b) Upon the filing of a referendum petition, the operation of the
protested ordinance must be suspended until the referendum petition is
found insufficient or until the referendum has been rejected by a
majority of voters voting at an election. The filing of a referendum
petition against one or more sections of any ordinance suspends the
operation of only those protested sections pending the outcome of the
referendum.
(2)(a) Any legal voter of the county may file a referendum proposal
against any ordinance, or part of any ordinance, with the county
auditor within fifteen days after the ordinance is enacted by the
county legislative authority. The county auditor may charge a twenty
dollar filing fee.
(b) Within five working days from its receipt of the referendum
proposal, the county auditor must confer with the petitioner to review
the proposal as to form and style. The county auditor must assign the
referendum proposal a serial number, which must be the identifying
number for the proposal. The county auditor must then transmit a copy
of the proposal to the county prosecuting attorney.
(c) The county prosecuting attorney must confer with the petitioner
to review the legal aspects of the proposal. Within ten working days
after receipt of the proposal, the county prosecuting attorney must
compose a concise statement, posed as a positive question that does not
contain more than twenty-five words, that is a true and impartial
description of the referendum petition's essential contents. The
concise statement must be the ballot title.
(d) The petitioner has one hundred twenty days after the ballot
title is composed by the county prosecuting attorney to collect
signatures of registered voters of the county, equal to or more than
twenty-five percent of the number of votes cast in the county for the
office of governor at the last regular gubernatorial election, and
submit the referendum petition containing the signatures to the county
auditor for filing. All referendum petitions proposing a measure to be
submitted to the people for their approval or rejection at the next
general or special election must be submitted for filing not less than
ninety days before such election.
(e) Within ten days after the filing of the referendum petition,
the county auditor must determine whether the petition bears sufficient
signatures. If the county auditor verifies the petition as containing
sufficient signatures, the county auditor must submit the proposed
referendum to the people at the next general or special election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Sections 1 through 4 of this act do not apply to any county
that operates under a home rule charter.
(2) Sections 1 through 4 of this act do not supersede conflicting
special local referendum procedures enacted in any other legislation.

--- END ---