BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Master programs may include provisions for siting or
prohibiting the siting of marine aquaculture net pen facilities.
(2) Nothing in this section authorizes a local government to
prohibit the use and operation of marine aquaculture net pen facilities
that are in conformity with applicable requirements as of July 28,
2013.

--- END ---