BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.19.648 and 2012 c 171 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Effective June 1, 2015, all state agencies, to the extent
determined practicable by the rules adopted by the department of
commerce pursuant to RCW 43.325.080, are required to satisfy one
hundred percent of their fuel usage for operating publicly owned
vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment from electricity or
biofuel. Compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas, or propane may
be substituted for electricity or biofuel if the department of commerce
determines that electricity and biofuel are not reasonably available.
(2) Effective June 1, 2018, all local government subdivisions of
the state, to the extent determined practicable by ((the rules adopted
by the department of commerce)) each local government subdivision
pursuant to RCW 43.325.080(2)(b), are required to satisfy one hundred
percent of their fuel usage for operating publicly owned vessels,
vehicles, and construction equipment from electricity or biofuel. The
following are exempt from this requirement: (a) Transit agencies using
compressed natural gas on June 1, 2018((, are exempt from this
requirement)); (b) police, fire, and other emergency response vehicles;
(c) engine retrofits that would void warranties; and (d) conventional
vehicles and equipment owned before June 1, 2018. Compressed natural
gas, liquefied natural gas, or propane may be substituted for
electricity or biofuel if the department of commerce determines that
electricity and biofuel are not reasonably available.
(3) In order to phase in this transition for the state, all state
agencies, to the extent determined practicable by the department of
commerce by rules adopted pursuant to RCW 43.325.080, are required to
achieve forty percent fuel usage for operating publicly owned vessels,
vehicles, and construction equipment from electricity or biofuel by
June 1, 2013. Compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas, or
propane may be substituted for electricity or biofuel if the department
of commerce determines that electricity and biofuel are not reasonably
available. The department of enterprise services, in consultation with
the department of commerce, shall report to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2013, on what percentage of the state's fuel
usage is from electricity or biofuel.
(4) Except for cars owned or operated by the Washington state
patrol, when tires on vehicles in the state's motor vehicle fleet are
replaced, they must be replaced with tires that have the same or better
rolling resistance as the original tires.
(5) By December 31, 2015, the state must, to the extent
practicable, install electrical outlets capable of charging electric
vehicles in each of the state's fleet parking and maintenance
facilities.
(6) The department of transportation's obligations under subsection
(3) of this section are subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for the specific purpose identified in subsection (3) of
this section.
(7) The department of transportation's obligations under subsection
(5) of this section are subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for the specific purpose identified in subsection (5) of
this section unless the department receives federal or private funds
for the specific purpose identified in subsection (5) of this section.
(8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component
assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to
charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and
consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.
(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility
that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter
a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged
battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and
consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.325.080 and 2011 c 353 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By June 1, 2010, the department shall adopt rules to define
practicability and clarify how state agencies will be evaluated in
determining whether they have met the goals set out in RCW
43.19.648(1). At a minimum, the rules must address:
(a) Criteria for determining how the goal in RCW 43.19.648(1) will
be met by June 1, 2015;
(b) Factors considered to determine compliance with the goal in RCW
43.19.648(1), including but not limited to: The regional availability
of fuels; vehicle costs; differences between types of vehicles,
vessels, or equipment; the cost of program implementation; and cost
differentials in different parts of the state; and
(c) A schedule for phased-in progress towards meeting the goal in
RCW 43.19.648(1) that may include different schedules for different
fuel applications or different quantities of biofuels.
(2)(a) By June 1, 2015, the department shall adopt rules to
((define practicability and)) clarify how local government subdivisions
of the state will be evaluated in determining whether they have met the
goals set out in RCW 43.19.648(2). At a minimum, the rules must
address:
(((a))) (i) Criteria for determining how the goal in RCW
43.19.648(2) will be met by June 1, 2018, including recommendations to
local government subdivisions on mechanisms or frameworks that could be
used when considering cost, fuel availability, and other conversion
issues when the local government subdivisions are determining the
practicability of purchasing decisions;
(((b))) (ii) Factors considered to determine compliance with the
goal in RCW 43.19.648(2), including but not limited to: The regional
availability of fuels; vehicle costs; differences between types of
vehicles, vessels, or equipment; the cost of program implementation;
and cost differentials in different parts of the state; and
(((c))) (iii) A schedule for phased-in progress towards meeting the
goal in RCW 43.19.648(2) that may include different schedules for
different fuel applications or different quantities of biofuels.
(b) Every local government subdivision must determine whether
meeting the fuel usage requirement in RCW 43.19.648(2) is practicable.

--- END ---