BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.32.180 and 1999 c 364 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person licensed to practice dentistry in this state shall
renew his or her license and comply with administrative procedures,
administrative requirements, continuing education requirements, and
fees as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The commission, in
its sole discretion, may permit the applicant to be licensed without
examination, and with or without conditions, if it is satisfied that
the applicant meets all the requirements for licensure in this state
and is competent to engage in the practice of dentistry.
(2) Licenses issued under this chapter remain unexpired and in full
force and effect for thirty days beyond the scheduled renewal date.
However, (a) the applicable late fee applies to any renewal for which
the payment is received by the department after the scheduled renewal
date and (b) the department may not extend the next scheduled renewal
date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of payment, a health carrier shall treat a Washington
licensed dentist as continuing to be licensed, and the license as
unexpired and in full force and effect, for thirty days after the
scheduled renewal date of the license. This applies notwithstanding
RCW 43.70.280.

--- END ---