BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.27.530 and 2012 c 132 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2010, the building code council shall adopt rules
requiring that all buildings classified as residential occupancies, as
defined in the state building code in chapter 51-54 WAC, but excluding
owner-occupied single-family residences legally occupied before July
26, 2009, be equipped with carbon monoxide alarms.
(2)(a) The building code council may phase in the carbon monoxide
alarm requirements on a schedule that it determines reasonable,
provided that the rules require that by January 1, 2011, all newly
constructed buildings classified as residential occupancies will be
equipped with carbon monoxide alarms, and all other buildings
classified as residential occupancies will be equipped with carbon
monoxide alarms by January 1, ((2013)) 2015.
(b) Owner-occupied single-family residences legally occupied before
July 26, 2009, are exempt from the requirements of this subsection (2).
However, for any owner-occupied single-family residence that is sold on
or after July 26, 2009, the seller must equip the residence with carbon
monoxide alarms in accordance with the requirements of the state
building code before the buyer or any other person may legally occupy
the residence following such sale.
(3) The building code council may exempt categories of buildings
classified as residential occupancies if it determines that requiring
carbon monoxide alarms are unnecessary to protect the health and
welfare of the occupants.
(4) The rules adopted by the building code council under this
section must (a) consider applicable nationally accepted standards and
(b) require that the maintenance of a carbon monoxide alarm in a
building where a tenancy exists, including the replacement of
batteries, is the responsibility of the tenant, who shall maintain the
alarm as specified by the manufacturer.
(5) Real estate brokers licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW shall not
be liable in any civil, administrative, or other proceeding for the
failure of any seller or other property owner to comply with the
requirements of this section or rules adopted by the building code
council.

--- END ---