BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 59.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When the plaintiff, after the exercise of due diligence, is
unable to personally serve the summons on the defendant or defendants,
the court may authorize the alternative means of service described in
this section.
(2) Upon filing of an affidavit from the person or persons
attempting service describing those attempts, and the filing of an
affidavit from the plaintiff, plaintiff's agent, or plaintiff's
attorney stating the belief that the defendant or defendants cannot be
found, the court may enter an order authorizing service of the summons
as follows:
(a) The summons and complaint must be posted in a conspicuous place
on the premises unlawfully held not less than nine days from the return
date stated in the summons; and
(b) Copies of the summons and complaint must be deposited in the
mail, postage prepaid, by both regular mail and certified mail directed
to the defendant or defendants' last known address not less than nine
days from the return date stated in the summons.
(3) When service on the defendant or defendants is accomplished by
this alternative procedure, the court's jurisdiction is limited to
restoring possession of the premises to the plaintiff and no money
judgment may be entered against the defendant or defendants until
jurisdiction over the defendant or defendants is obtained.

--- END ---