BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
The criminal justice training commission firing range maintenance
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys
generated by the rental of the commission's firing range facilities,
property, and equipment must be deposited into the account. The
sources of the moneys generated and deposited under this section may
include federal, state, local, or private grants, consistent with RCW
43.101.190. Expenditures from the account may be used only for cost
related to rental, maintenance, or development of the commission's
firing range facilities, property, and equipment. Only the executive
director, acting on behalf of the criminal justice training commission,
or the executive director's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

--- END ---