BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.61.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 2 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise((, the term)):
(1) "Contract crew hauling vehicle," as used in this chapter, means
every self-propelled vehicle, regardless of its seating capacity,
owned, leased, operated, and maintained by a charter party carrier, as
defined in RCW 81.70.020, contracting with a railroad company or its
agents, contractors, subcontractors, or vendors, used primarily to
provide railroad crew transportation.
(2) "Passenger-carrying vehicle," as used in this chapter, means
those buses and trucks owned, operated, and maintained by a railroad
company which transports railroad employees in other than the cab of
such vehicle and designed primarily for operation on roads which may or
may not be equipped with retractable flanged wheels for operation on
railroad tracks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 81.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall regulate charter party carriers providing
railroad crew transportation and every contract crew hauling vehicle
with respect to the safety of equipment, driver qualifications,
insurance levels, and safety of operations.
(2) The commission shall adopt rules and require reports as
necessary to carry out this chapter regarding contract crew hauling
vehicles and establish federal motor vehicle safety standards for
contract crew hauling vehicles as the minimum safety standards,
including:
(a) Driver qualifications, including a driver's minimum age and
skill, physical condition, and appropriate type or class of license;
(b) Equipment safety;
(c) Safety of operations;
(d) Passenger safety;
(e) Adequate insurance coverage that satisfies the following
minimum amounts, which may be increased by rule adopted by the
commission:
(i) Liability insurance of five million dollars;
(ii) Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage of five million
dollars; and
(iii) Property damage coverage of five hundred thousand dollars.
If a person contracts with the charter party carrier on behalf of the
railroad company to transport railroad employees, the insurance
requirements may be satisfied by either that person or the charter
party carrier, so long as the charter party carrier names that person
as an additional insured or named insured;
(f) The suspension, revocation, or cancellation of the certificate
issued by the commission and held by any charter party carrier owning,
leasing, operating, and maintaining contract crew hauling vehicles as
a result of serious or repeated violations of this chapter or rules
adopted under this chapter; and
(g) The form and posting of adequate notices in a conspicuous
location in all contract crew hauling vehicles to advise railroad
employee passengers of their right to submit complaints to the
commission regarding the safe operation or maintenance of vehicles.
(3) Charter party carriers owning, leasing, operating, and
maintaining contract crew hauling vehicles must retain for a time
period of at least three years all operational records relating to the
contract crew hauling vehicles, including vehicle records involving
accidents, maintenance and service records, drivers' records, records
of passenger complaints, all employment actions, driver logs, and
records of passengers transported.
(4) A person is immediately and automatically disqualified to work
as a driver of a contract crew hauling vehicle under this chapter if
the person's license is suspended or revoked two or more times within
a three-year period. The disqualification must last for two years from
the recent license suspension or revocation.
(5)(a) The commission may, in enforcing rules and orders relating
to charter party carriers owning, leasing, operating, and maintaining
contract crew hauling vehicles under this chapter, inspect any contract
crew hauling vehicles. Upon request, the chief of the state patrol or
the chief's designee may assist the commission in these inspections.
(b) The commission shall investigate safety complaints related to
employee transportation under this section and take appropriate
enforcement action as warranted.
(c) The commission may enforce this section under the authority in
RCW 81.04.380 through 81.04.405, including assessing penalties as are
warranted.
(d) Any interested person or group may request notice of, and
participate in, any hearings or proceedings held under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 81.61 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission must study any accidents involving vehicles
regulated under this chapter. A railroad company, and any charter
party carrier that owns or leases, operates, or maintains contract crew
hauling vehicles in the state, must, at the request of the commission,
provide data on such accidents, including the location, time of day,
visibility, a description of the event, and whether the accident caused
any property damage or personal injuries. The commission must make
this data available upon request and must provide a report to the
legislature by December 31, 2014, and annually thereafter, summarizing
the last year's findings and including recommendations for avoiding
accidents in the future.

--- END ---