BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that railroad
yardmasters are required to work excessively long hours by railroad
carriers. Yardmasters are responsible for, among other things,
supervising the breaking up and putting together of train cars in rail
yards and overseeing the work of switching crews. Requiring
yardmasters to work sixteen-hour shifts without adequate rest between
shifts poses significant health and safety risks to both workers and
the public. The legislature declares that this act regulating the
hours of service for yardmasters constitutes an exercise of the state's
police power to protect and promote the health, safety, and welfare of
the residents of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission
created in chapter 80.01 RCW.
(2) "Day" means a period of twenty-four consecutive hours.
(3) "Duty assignment" is the employee's headquarters or the
location where the employee is expected to begin performing service for
the railroad.
(4) "Employee" means an individual employed by a railroad carrier
or a contractor or subcontractor of a railroad carrier to perform the
duties of a yardmaster. Such duties include: Routing and directing
trains in a rail yard; operating switching equipment in a rail yard
tower; monitoring switching orders and schedules to determine the time
trains arrive and depart; supervising the breaking up and putting
together of train cars according to a schedule; receiving and
transmitting switching orders to and from yard crews; directing,
overseeing, monitoring, and supervising switching crews and road
switcher assignments; and arranging for defective cars to be removed
from a train for repair.
(5) "Final release" is the time that an employee is released from
all activities at the behest of the railroad and begins his or her
statutory off-duty period.
(6) "Railroad carrier" means a carrier of persons or property upon
vehicles, other than streetcars, operated upon stationary rails, the
route of which is principally outside incorporated cities and towns.
"Railroad carrier" includes the officers and agents of the railroad
carrier.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) When scheduling an employee for duty,
the following rules apply:
(a) An employee may not remain on duty, go on duty, or be in any
other mandatory service for a railroad carrier in excess of two hundred
seventy-six hours per calendar month.
(b) An employee may not remain or go on duty for a period in excess
of twelve consecutive hours.
(c) An employee may not remain or go on duty unless that employee
has had at least ten consecutive hours off duty during the prior
twenty-four hours.
(d) An employee may not remain or go on duty after the employee has
initiated an on-duty period each day for six consecutive days, unless
the employee has had at least forty-eight consecutive hours off duty at
the employee's duty assignment during which time the employee is
unavailable for any service for any railroad carrier. Any employee who
works a seventh consecutive day must have at least seventy-two
consecutive hours off duty at the employee's duty assignment during
which time the employee is unavailable for any service for any railroad
carrier.
(e) An employee may not remain or go on duty during any time when
the employee is prohibited by the federal hours of service law, 49
U.S.C. Sec. 21101 et seq., from going or remaining on duty.
(f) At the conclusion of an employee's on-duty period, the employee
must remain unavailable for any service for any railroad carrier for a
period of at least ten hours.
(2) In determining the time an employee is on or off duty, the
following rules apply:
(a) Time on duty begins when the employee reports for duty and ends
when the employee is finally released from duty.
(b) Time the employee performs the duties listed in section 2(4) of
this act is time on duty.
(c) Time the employee performs the duties of a dispatching service
employee, signal employee, or train employee, as those terms are
defined in 49 U.S.C. Sec. 21101, is time on duty.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A railroad carrier may not communicate
with an employee by telephone, by pager, or in any other manner that
could reasonably be expected to disrupt the employee's rest during the
employee's minimum off-duty periods required by section 3 of this act.
(2) This section does not prohibit communication necessary to
notify an employee of an emergency situation, as defined by the
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) This chapter does not apply to a
situation involving: (a) A casualty; (b) an unavoidable accident; (c)
an act of God; or (d) a delay resulting from a cause unknown and
unforeseeable to a railroad carrier or its officer or agent in charge
of the employee when the employee left a terminal.
(2) The commission may exempt a class II or class III railroad
carrier having not more than fifteen employees from the limitations
imposed by this chapter. The commission may allow the exemption after
a full hearing, for good cause shown, and on deciding that the
exemption is in the public interest and will not affect safety
adversely. The exemption must be for a specific period of time and is
subject to review at least annually. The exemption may not authorize
a railroad carrier to require or allow its employees to be on duty more
than a total of sixteen hours in a twenty-four hour period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The number of hours established by this
chapter that an employee may be required or allowed to be on duty is
the maximum number of hours consistent with safety. Shorter hours of
service and time on duty of an employee are proper subjects for
collective bargaining between a railroad carrier and its employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) If the commission determines that a
railroad carrier has violated a provision of this chapter, it may
assess the railroad carrier a civil penalty.
(a) For class II and class III railroad carriers, the commission
may assess a civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars and
not more than twenty-five thousand dollars. In cases where a grossly
negligent violation or a pattern of repeated violations has caused an
imminent hazard of death or injury to individuals, or has caused death
or injury, the maximum penalty is one hundred thousand dollars.
(b) For class I railroad carriers, the commission may assess a
civil penalty of not less than ten thousand dollars and not more than
fifty thousand dollars. In cases where a grossly negligent violation
or a pattern of repeated violations has caused an imminent hazard of
death or injury to individuals, or has caused death or injury, the
maximum penalty is one million dollars.
(2) A separate violation occurs each day a facility is not in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The commission may adopt rules to administer
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 81 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---