BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a person is
allowed a credit against the tax due. The credit is equal to one
thousand dollars per fiscal year for each full-time employment position
filled by an individual with a developmental disability after the
effective date of this section. A credit is earned for the fiscal year
the person is hired to fill the position. Additionally, a credit is
earned for each fiscal year the position is continuously maintained
over the subsequent consecutive fiscal years. If a position is filled
before January 1st, this position is eligible for the full yearly
credit. If it is filled after December 31st, this position is eligible
for half of the credit.
(b) Credits are available on a first-in-time basis. The department
must maintain a running total of all credits claimed under this section
during each fiscal year. The department may not allow any credit, or
portion thereof, which would cause the total amount of credit claimed
under this section to exceed two million dollars in any fiscal year.
The department must provide written notice to any person who has
claimed tax credits in excess of the two million dollar limitation in
this subsection. The notice must indicate the amount of tax due and
provide that the tax be paid within thirty days from the date of such
notice. The notice must also advise the person that the unused credit
can be claimed in the next fiscal year, subject to the two million
dollar limit. The department may not assess penalties and interest as
provided in chapter 82.32 RCW on the amount due in the initial notice,
if the amount due is paid by the due date specified in the notice, or
any extension thereof.
(c) A person may claim the credit under this section only against
taxes originally due and reported to the department on or after the
date that the employment position is filled. The amount of credit
claimed for a reporting period may not exceed the tax otherwise due
under this chapter for that reporting period. Persons unable to claim
their credit, or any portion thereof, in the fiscal year for which the
credit was earned may carry the unused credit over to subsequent fiscal
years until used. However, the carryover into subsequent fiscal years
is only permitted to the extent that the two million dollar limit for
any fiscal year is not exceeded. No refunds may be granted for credits
under this section.
(d) No application is necessary to claim the tax credit.
(e) To claim a credit under this section, a person must
electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and any
other information required by the department, in an electronic format
as provided or approved by the department. Any return, form, or
information required to be filed in an electronic format under this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format. As used in this subsection, "return" has the same meaning as
"return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(f) If the position filled by an individual with a developmental
disability is not full time, the credit in (a) of this subsection must
be ratably reduced.
(g) Credit is authorized only for employees hired for full-time
employment positions where the hiring takes place on or after July 1,
2013. Full-time employment positions filled by existing employees are
eligible for the credit under this section only if the position vacated
by the existing employee is filled by a new hire, and both the existing
employee and the new hire are individuals with a developmental
disability.
(h) A person may not claim the credit under this section if the
person has claimed a credit against the tax due under this chapter,
under any other provision of law, with respect to the same employment
position.
(2) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for the tax credit under this section for any reason, the
amount of taxes for which a credit has been claimed for which the
person was not eligible for the credit is immediately due. The
department must assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes for
which the person is not eligible. The interest must be assessed at the
rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was claimed, and must
accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning July 1st
and ending the following June 30th.
(b) "Full-time" means at least thirty-five hours a week, four
hundred fifty-five hours a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred
twenty hours a year.
(c) "Full-time employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee, who is employed for at least twelve consecutive months. Once
a permanent full-time employee has been hired, a position does not
cease to be a full-time employment position solely due to periods in
which the position goes vacant, as long as:
(i) The cumulative period of any vacancies in that position is not
more than one hundred twenty days in the fiscal year;
(ii) During a vacancy, the employer is training or actively
recruiting a replacement; and
(iii) The vacancy is filled by a permanent full-time employee who
is an individual with a developmental disability.
(d) "Individual with a developmental disability" means an
individual with a developmental disability as defined in RCW
71A.10.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---