BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the use of a
motor vehicle is often a necessity for residents' livelihood and
families. Therefore, the legislature finds it is important for the
public to know what the charges and fees will be for the private
impound of cars and other vehicles parked on private property, and that
those charges should be reasonable to ensure that residents may
retrieve impounded vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For a private impound performed by any registered tow truck
operator using tow trucks classified by the Washington state patrol by
rule under RCW 46.55.050(1) as class A, class E, or class D only, the
following limitations apply:
(a) The maximum towing hourly rate listed on the fee schedule filed
with the department under RCW 46.55.063(1) may not exceed one hundred
thirty-five percent of the maximum hourly rate for a class A tow truck
at the time of filing as negotiated by the Washington state patrol,
pursuant to rule, and contained in the letter of contractual agreement
and letter of appointment authorizing a registered tow truck operator
to respond to state patrol-originated calls.
(b) The maximum daily storage rate listed on the fee schedule filed
with the department under RCW 46.55.063(1) may not exceed one hundred
thirty-five percent of the maximum daily storage rate for an impound at
the time of filing as negotiated by the Washington state patrol,
pursuant to rule, and contained in the letter of contractual agreement
and letter of appointment authorizing a registered tow truck operator
to respond to state patrol-originated calls.
(c) The maximum after hours release fee listed on the fee schedule
filed with the department under RCW 46.55.063(1) may not exceed one
hundred percent of the maximum after hours release fee for an impound
at the time of filing as negotiated by the Washington state patrol,
pursuant to rule, and contained in the letter of contractual agreement
and letter of appointment authorizing a registered tow truck operator
to respond to state patrol-originated calls.
(2) The limitations set forth in subsection (1) of this section
apply to all registered tow truck operators whether or not they hold,
have applied for, or received letters of appointment from the
Washington state patrol to respond to state patrol-originated calls.
(3) The limitations set forth in subsection (1) of this section do
not apply to:
(a) Any other classes of tow trucks classified by the Washington
state patrol by rule under RCW 46.55.050(1); or
(b) Law enforcement impounds or private voluntary towing.
(4) The limitations set forth in subsection (1) of this section
only apply if the vehicle is parked and upright, has all its wheels and
tires attached, does not have a broken axle, and has not been involved
in an accident at the location from which it is being impounded.
(5) This section does not affect the authority of any city, town,
or county to enforce, maintain, or amend any ordinance, enacted prior
to January 1, 2013, and valid under state law in existence at the time
of its enactment, that regulates maximum allowable rates and related
charges for private impounds by registered tow truck operators.

--- END ---