BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.77 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If the state hospital has not met the performance targets
established in RCW 10.77.068 for timely completion of competency
evaluations and restorations of competency in order to stand trial in
fifty percent of cases submitted by any one county, as documented in
the most recent quarterly report under RCW 10.77.068(3) or confirmed by
records maintained by the department, the court of that county may
appoint a qualified expert or professional person, whom the prosecuting
attorney and defense attorney shall approve, to evaluate and report
upon the mental condition of the defendant. When determining his or
her approval of a qualified expert or professional person, the
prosecuting attorney may take into account, among other factors,
whether it is more likely than not that an evaluation in the jail by a
qualified expert or professional person will be inadequate to complete
an accurate evaluation.
(2) A court that appoints a qualified expert or professional person
under this section shall do so from a list of qualified experts or
professional persons assembled with participation by representatives of
the prosecuting attorney and the defense bar.
(3) A qualified expert or professional person appointed by a court
for an indigent person under this section should be compensated for
competency evaluations in an amount that will encourage in-depth
evaluation reports. Subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose, the department must reimburse
the county for the costs of a qualified expert or professional person
appointed for an indigent person under this section in an amount
determined by the department to be fair and reasonable. The amount of
reimbursement established by the department must at least meet the
equivalent amount for evaluations conducted by the department. The
county is responsible for the costs of the evaluation that exceed the
amount reimbursed by the department. The county shall maintain data on
the timeliness of competency evaluations completed under this section.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2016.

--- END ---