BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.88B.021 and 2012 c 164 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning January 7, 2012, except as provided in RCW
18.88B.041, any person hired as a long-term care worker must be
certified as a home care aide as provided in this chapter within
((one)) two hundred ((fifty)) calendar days after the date of being
hired ((or within one hundred fifty calendar days after March 29, 2012,
whichever is later)). In computing the time periods in this
subsection, the first day is the date of hire ((or March 29, 2012,
whichever is applicable)).
(2)(a) No person may practice or, by use of any title or
description, represent himself or herself as a certified home care aide
without being certified as provided in this chapter.
(b) This section does not prohibit a person: (i) From practicing
a profession for which the person has been issued a license or which is
specifically authorized under this state's laws; or (ii) who is exempt
from certification under RCW 18.88B.041 from providing services as a
long-term care worker.
(c) In consultation with consumer and worker representatives, the
department shall, by January 1, 2013, establish by rule a single scope
of practice that encompasses both long-term care workers who are
certified home care aides and long-term care workers who are exempted
from certification under RCW 18.88B.041.
(3) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.88B RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may issue a provisional certification to a
long-term care worker who is limited English proficient to allow the
person additional time to comply with the requirement that a long-term
care worker become certified as a home care aide within two hundred
calendar days after the date of hire as provided in RCW 18.88B.021, if
the long-term care worker:
(a) Is limited English proficient; and
(b) Complies with other requirements established by the department
in rule.
(2) The department shall issue a provisional certification to a
long-term care worker who has met the requirements of subsection (1) of
this section. The provisional certification may only be issued once
and is valid for no more than sixty days after the expiration of the
two hundred calendar day requirement for becoming certified.
(3) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "limited English proficient"
means that an individual is limited in his or her ability to read,
write, or speak English.
(5) The department may not issue any provisional certifications
after March 1, 2016.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2016.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.39A.341 and 2012 c 164 s 405 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All long-term care workers shall complete twelve hours of
continuing education training in advanced training topics each year.
This requirement applies beginning July 1, 2012.
(2) Completion of continuing education as required in this section
is a prerequisite to maintaining home care aide certification under
chapter 18.88B RCW.
(3) Unless voluntarily certified as a home care aide under chapter
18.88B RCW, subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) An individual provider caring only for his or her biological,
step, or adoptive child;
(b) Registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed under
chapter 18.79 RCW;
(c) Before January 1, 2016, a long-term care worker employed by a
community residential service business; or
(((c))) (d) Before July 1, 2014, a person hired as an individual
provider who provides twenty hours or less of care for one person in
any calendar month.
(4) Only training curriculum approved by the department may be used
to fulfill the training requirements specified in this section. The
department shall only approve training curriculum that:
(a) Has been developed with input from consumer and worker
representatives; and
(b) Requires comprehensive instruction by qualified instructors.
(5) Individual providers under RCW 74.39A.270 shall be compensated
for training time required by this section.
(6) The department of health shall adopt rules to implement
subsection (1) of this section.
(7) The department shall adopt rules to implement subsection (2) of
this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.20.270 and 2012 c 164 s 702 and 2012 c 10 s 16 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Caregiver" includes any person who provides residents with
hands-on personal care on behalf of an assisted living facility, except
volunteers who are directly supervised.
(b) "Direct supervision" means oversight by a person who has
demonstrated competency in the core areas or has been fully exempted
from the training requirements pursuant to this section, is on the
premises, and is quickly and easily available to the caregiver.
(2) Training must have the following components: Orientation,
basic training, specialty training as appropriate, and continuing
education. All assisted living facility employees or volunteers who
routinely interact with residents shall complete orientation. Assisted
living facility administrators, or their designees, and caregivers
shall complete orientation, basic training, specialty training as
appropriate, and continuing education.
(3) Orientation consists of introductory information on residents'
rights, communication skills, fire and life safety, and universal
precautions. Orientation must be provided at the facility by
appropriate assisted living facility staff to all assisted living
facility employees before the employees have routine interaction with
residents.
(4) Basic training consists of modules on the core knowledge and
skills that caregivers need to learn and understand to effectively and
safely provide care to residents. Basic training must be outcome-based, and the effectiveness of the basic training must be measured by
demonstrated competency in the core areas through the use of a
competency test. Basic training must be completed by caregivers within
one hundred twenty days of the date on which they begin to provide
hands-on care. Until competency in the core areas has been
demonstrated, caregivers shall not provide hands-on personal care to
residents without direct supervision. Assisted living facility
administrators, or their designees, must complete basic training and
demonstrate competency within one hundred twenty days of employment.
(5) For assisted living facilities that serve residents with
special needs such as dementia, developmental disabilities, or mental
illness, specialty training is required of administrators, or
designees, and caregivers.
(a) Specialty training consists of modules on the core knowledge
and skills that caregivers need to effectively and safely provide care
to residents with special needs. Specialty training should be
integrated into basic training wherever appropriate. Specialty
training must be outcome-based, and the effectiveness of the specialty
training measured by demonstrated competency in the core specialty
areas through the use of a competency test.
(b) Specialty training must be completed by caregivers within one
hundred twenty days of the date on which they begin to provide hands-on
care to a resident having special needs. However, if specialty
training is not integrated with basic training, the specialty training
must be completed within ninety days of completion of basic training.
Until competency in the core specialty areas has been demonstrated,
caregivers shall not provide hands-on personal care to residents with
special needs without direct supervision.
(c) Assisted living facility administrators, or their designees,
must complete specialty training and demonstrate competency within one
hundred twenty days from the date on which the administrator or his or
her designee is hired, if the assisted living facility serves one or
more residents with special needs.
(6) Continuing education consists of ongoing delivery of
information to caregivers on various topics relevant to the care
setting and care needs of residents. Competency testing is not
required for continuing education. Continuing education is not
required in the same calendar year in which basic or modified basic
training is successfully completed. Continuing education is required
in each calendar year thereafter. If specialty training is completed,
the specialty training applies toward any continuing education
requirement for up to two years following the completion of the
specialty training.
(7) Persons who successfully challenge the competency test for
basic training are fully exempt from the basic training requirements of
this section. Persons who successfully challenge the specialty
training competency test are fully exempt from the specialty training
requirements of this section.
(8) ((Licensed persons who perform the tasks for which they are
licensed are fully or partially exempt from the training requirements
of this section, as specified by the department in rule.)) (a)
Registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed under chapter
18.79 RCW are exempt from any continuing education requirement
established under this section.
(b) The department may adopt rules that would exempt licensed
persons from all or part of the training requirements under this
chapter, if they are (i) performing the tasks for which they are
licensed and (ii) subject to chapter 18.130 RCW.
(9) In an effort to improve access to training and education and
reduce costs, especially for rural communities, the coordinated system
of long-term care training and education must include the use of
innovative types of learning strategies such as internet resources,
videotapes, and distance learning using satellite technology
coordinated through community colleges or other entities, as defined by
the department.
(10) The department shall develop criteria for the approval of
orientation, basic training, and specialty training programs.
(11) Assisted living facilities that desire to deliver facility-based training with facility designated trainers, or assisted living
facilities that desire to pool their resources to create shared
training systems, must be encouraged by the department in their
efforts. The department shall develop criteria for reviewing and
approving trainers and training materials that are substantially
similar to or better than the materials developed by the department.
The department may approve a curriculum based upon attestation by an
assisted living facility administrator that the assisted living
facility's training curriculum addresses basic and specialty training
competencies identified by the department, and shall review a
curriculum to verify that it meets these requirements. The department
may conduct the review as part of the next regularly scheduled yearly
inspection and investigation required under RCW 18.20.110. The
department shall rescind approval of any curriculum if it determines
that the curriculum does not meet these requirements.
(12) The department shall adopt rules for the implementation of
this section.
(13)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the
orientation, basic training, specialty training, and continuing
education requirements of this section commence September 1, 2002, or
one hundred twenty days from the date of employment, whichever is
later, and shall be applied to (i) employees hired subsequent to
September 1, 2002; and (ii) existing employees that on September 1,
2002, have not successfully completed the training requirements under
RCW 74.39A.010 or 74.39A.020 and this section. Existing employees who
have not successfully completed the training requirements under RCW
74.39A.010 or 74.39A.020 shall be subject to all applicable
requirements of this section.
(b) Beginning January 7, 2012, long-term care workers, as defined
in RCW 74.39A.009, employed by facilities licensed under this chapter
are also subject to the training requirements under RCW 74.39A.074.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.128.230 and 2012 c 164 s 705 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Caregiver" includes all adult family home resident managers
and any person who provides residents with hands-on personal care on
behalf of an adult family home, except volunteers who are directly
supervised.
(b) "Indirect supervision" means oversight by a person who has
demonstrated competency in the core areas or has been fully exempted
from the training requirements pursuant to this section and is quickly
and easily available to the caregiver, but not necessarily on-site.
(2) Training must have three components: Orientation, basic
training, and continuing education. All adult family home providers,
resident managers, and employees, or volunteers who routinely interact
with residents shall complete orientation. Caregivers shall complete
orientation, basic training, and continuing education.
(3) Orientation consists of introductory information on residents'
rights, communication skills, fire and life safety, and universal
precautions. Orientation must be provided at the facility by
appropriate adult family home staff to all adult family home employees
before the employees have routine interaction with residents.
(4) Basic training consists of modules on the core knowledge and
skills that caregivers need to learn and understand to effectively and
safely provide care to residents. Basic training must be outcome-based, and the effectiveness of the basic training must be measured by
demonstrated competency in the core areas through the use of a
competency test. Basic training must be completed by caregivers within
one hundred twenty days of the date on which they begin to provide
hands-on care. Until competency in the core areas has been
demonstrated, caregivers shall not provide hands-on personal care to
residents without ((indirect)) direct supervision.
(5) For adult family homes that serve residents with special needs
such as dementia, developmental disabilities, or mental illness,
specialty training is required of providers and resident managers.
(a) Specialty training consists of modules on the core knowledge
and skills that providers and resident managers need to effectively and
safely provide care to residents with special needs. Specialty
training should be integrated into basic training wherever appropriate.
Specialty training must be outcome-based, and the effectiveness of the
specialty training measured by demonstrated competency in the core
specialty areas through the use of a competency test.
(b) Specialty training must be completed by providers and resident
managers before admitting and serving residents who have been
determined to have special needs related to mental illness, dementia,
or a developmental disability. Should a resident develop special needs
while living in a home without specialty designation, the provider and
resident manager have one hundred twenty days to complete specialty
training.
(6) Continuing education consists of ongoing delivery of
information to caregivers on various topics relevant to the care
setting and care needs of residents. Competency testing is not
required for continuing education. Continuing education is not
required in the same calendar year in which basic or modified basic
training is successfully completed. Continuing education is required
in each calendar year thereafter. If specialty training is completed,
the specialty training applies toward any continuing education
requirement for up to two years following the completion of the
specialty training.
(7) Persons who successfully challenge the competency test for
basic training are fully exempt from the basic training requirements of
this section. Persons who successfully challenge the specialty
training competency test are fully exempt from the specialty training
requirements of this section.
(8) ((Licensed persons who perform the tasks for which they are
licensed are fully or partially exempt from the training requirements
of this section, as specified by the department in rule.)) (a)
Registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed under chapter
18.79 RCW are exempt from any continuing education requirement
established under this section.
(b) The department may adopt rules that would exempt licensed
persons from all or part of the training requirements under this
chapter, if they are (i) performing the tasks for which they are
licensed and (ii) subject to chapter 18.130 RCW.
(9) In an effort to improve access to training and education and
reduce costs, especially for rural communities, the coordinated system
of long-term care training and education must include the use of
innovative types of learning strategies such as internet resources,
videotapes, and distance learning using satellite technology
coordinated through community colleges, private associations, or other
entities, as defined by the department.
(10) Adult family homes that desire to deliver facility-based
training with facility designated trainers, or adult family homes that
desire to pool their resources to create shared training systems, must
be encouraged by the department in their efforts. The department shall
develop criteria for reviewing and approving trainers and training
materials. The department may approve a curriculum based upon
attestation by an adult family home administrator that the adult family
home's training curriculum addresses basic and specialty training
competencies identified by the department, and shall review a
curriculum to verify that it meets these requirements. The department
may conduct the review as part of the next regularly scheduled
inspection authorized under RCW 70.128.070. The department shall
rescind approval of any curriculum if it determines that the curriculum
does not meet these requirements.
(11) The department shall adopt rules by September 1, 2002, for the
implementation of this section.
(12)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the
orientation, basic training, specialty training, and continuing
education requirements of this section commence September 1, 2002, and
shall be applied to (i) employees hired subsequent to September 1,
2002; or (ii) existing employees that on September 1, 2002, have not
successfully completed the training requirements under RCW 70.128.120
or 70.128.130 and this section. Existing employees who have not
successfully completed the training requirements under RCW 70.128.120
or 70.128.130 shall be subject to all applicable requirements of this
section.
(b) Beginning January 7, 2012, long-term care workers, as defined
in RCW 74.39A.009, employed by an adult family home are also subject to
the training requirements under RCW 74.39A.074.

--- END ---