BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature makes the following
findings:
(1) By 2030 nearly twenty percent or one out of every five people
in our state will be age sixty-five or older and by 2060 the population
of people who are age eighty-five or older in our state will more than
triple. This will affect every area of state government;
(2) There is a need for increased focus and a planning to support
the growing number of seniors and people with disabilities with
Washington state. Planning is necessary across a broad range of policy
areas including health, long-term services and supports, housing,
transportation, financial security, and protections for vulnerable
adults;
(3) To address the growing demand for long-term services and
supports, Washington state must do more to leverage private resources,
support families so they can take care of their loved ones without
having to resort to medicaid and help people plan for potential future
costs;
(4) In the past few decades, a number of initiatives have been
undertaken to reform Washington's system of supports for seniors to
emphasize home and community based options. These efforts have saved
millions of dollars by preventing expensive institutional placements;
and
(5) Washington must begin planning for the future long-term
services and supports needs of its residents by taking steps to grow
its workforce, resources, and quality long-term services and supports,
and identify alternative long-term care financing options to help
families and reduce the rate of growth in medicaid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A joint legislative executive committee
on aging and disability issues is established, with members as provided
in this subsection.
(a) The president of the senate shall appoint the chair of the
senate committee with jurisdiction over long-term care policy as well
as one additional member from each of the two largest caucuses of the
senate;
(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint the
chair of the house committee with jurisdiction over long-term care
policy as well as one additional member from each of the two largest
caucuses of the house of representatives;
(c) The governor shall appoint one member to service as a liaison
to the committee;
(d) The secretary of the department of social and health services
or his or her designee; and
(e) The director of the health care authority or his or her
designee.
(2) The joint committee must be convened by September 1, 2013. At
the first meeting, the members of the joint committee shall select
cochairs from among the committee members. The joint committee shall
establish advisory committees, consisting of at least three
stakeholders and chaired by a member of the joint committee, to focus
on specific topic areas. All meetings of the joint committee and the
advisory committees are open to the public.
(3) The joint committee shall consult with the office of the
insurance commissioner, the caseload forecast council, and other
appropriate entities with specialized knowledge of the growing needs of
the aging and disability populations.
(4) The joint committee shall conduct the following activities:
(a)(i) Establish a profile of Washington's current elderly and
disabled population and its needs;
(ii) Establish an inventory of the services and supports currently
available to the elderly and disabled, including health care providers
and facilities, long-term care providers and facilities, caregiver
supports, public and private financing, transportation services, and
housing;
(iii) Assess the areas of the current system where the additional
support is needed for Washington's current elderly population;
(b)(i) Establish a profile of Washington's expected elderly and
disabled population in 2025 and evaluate its anticipated needs;
(ii) Establish an anticipated inventory of future services and
supports that will be required to meet the needs of the elderly and
disabled population in 2025;
(c) Develop a strategy of actions that the state may take to
prepare for the future demographic trends in the elderly and disabled
populations and build the necessary capacity to meet these demands,
including the identification of:
(i) Statutory and regulatory changes to promote the most efficient
use of resources, such as simplifying administrative procedures,
facilitating points of entry into the long-term care services and
supports system, and improving transitions between care settings;
(ii) Practices for promoting the use of technology, chronic care
management, and disability prevention programs to maintain the
independence of the elderly and disabled populations;
(iii) Caregiver supports;
(iv) Specialized resources for populations with special needs, such
as chronic conditions and dementia; and
(v) Housing and transportation programs to help individuals who are
elderly or disabled to maintain their independence.
(5) Staff support for the joint committee must be provided by the
senate committee services, the office of program research, and the
office of financial management. The office of financial management
shall designate staff of the department of social and health services
to provide additional support to the joint committee.
(6) The joint committee members may be reimbursed for travel
expenses as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter
44.04 RCW as appropriate. Advisory committee members may not receive
compensation or reimbursement for travel and expenses.
(7) The expenses of the joint committee must be paid jointly by the
senate, the house of representatives, and the office of financial
management. Joint committee expenditures are subject to approval by
the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of
representatives executive rules committee, or their successor
committees.
(8) The joint committee shall report its findings and
recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 10, 2014.
(9) This section expires December 15, 2014.

--- END ---