BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.730 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 47 are each
amended to read as follows:
((In establishing Title XIX payments for inpatient hospital
services:
(1) To the extent funds are appropriated specifically for this
purpose, and subject to any conditions placed on appropriations made
for this purpose, the authority shall provide a disproportionate share
hospital adjustment considering the following components:
(a) A low-income care component based on a hospital's medicaid
utilization rate, its low-income utilization rate, its provision of
obstetric services, and other factors authorized by federal law;
(b) A medical indigency care component based on a hospital's
services to persons who are medically indigent; and
(c) A state-only component, to be paid from available state funds
to hospitals that do not qualify for federal payments under (b) of this
subsection, based on a hospital's services to persons who are medically
indigent;
(2) The payment methodology for disproportionate share hospitals
shall be specified by the authority in regulation.
(3))) (1) When determining its payment rates for hospital services
provided to medical assistance recipients, the authority, in accordance
with 42 U.S.C. 1396a(13)(A)(iv) and to the extent that funds are
appropriated specifically for this purpose, shall establish a
low-income disproportionate share hospital payment mechanism that takes
into account the situation of hospitals serving a disproportionate
number of low-income patients with special needs.
(2) The low-income disproportionate share hospital payment
mechanism must comply with the requirements of 42 U.S.C. 1396r-4.
(3) Authority expenditures in each federal fiscal year for
disproportionate share hospital payments may not exceed the amount
specified in 42 U.S.C. 1396r-4(f) or in regulations or guidance issued
by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services as available
for federal financial participation.
(4) If sufficient funds are specifically appropriated by the
legislature in the biennial appropriations act for such purpose, the
authority has authority to create and maintain disproportionate share
hospital payment mechanisms in addition to the low-income
disproportionate share hospital payment mechanism.
(5) The director may adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this
section.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed as a right or an
entitlement by any hospital to any payment from the authority.

--- END ---