BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.56.350 and 2003 c 111 s 1428 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every presidential elector who attends at the time and place
appointed, and gives his or her vote for president and vice president,
is entitled to receive from this state((, five dollars)) a subsistence
allowance and travel expenses pursuant to RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060
for each day's attendance at the meeting of the college of electors((,
and ten cents per mile for travel by the usually traveled route in
going to and returning from the place where the electors meet)).

--- END ---