BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Effective August 1, 2013, or upon the expiration of a
collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the provisions of
this section, whichever is later, each school district board of
directors of a school district with a year-end average headcount
enrollment of ten thousand or more students must adopt a policy on
assignment of certificated instructional staff consistent with the
provisions of this section. This section applies to all collective
bargaining agreements entered into or renewed after the effective date
of this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Certificated instructional staff" means classroom teachers and
educational staff associates;
(b) "Displaced" means a certificated instructional staff member
assigned to a particular school no longer has an assignment to that
school as a result of a request for reassignment by the certificated
instructional staff member, a principal, or the district
administration; change in program; change in enrollment; or
implementation of a state or federal accountability intervention model.
As provided under RCW 28A.405.100(4)(b), a certificated instructional
staff member may not be displaced during a probationary period to the
supervision of an individual other than the original evaluator; and
(c) "Nonprovisional" means a certificated instructional staff
member who does not fall under the provisions of RCW 28A.405.220.
(3) A nonprovisional certificated instructional staff member may be
assigned to a particular school only with the mutual agreement of the
principal and the staff member being assigned. As provided under RCW
28A.405.100(8), evaluation results must be used as one of multiple
factors in the consideration of an agreement to an assignment beginning
with the 2015-16 school year.
(4) If an assignment with mutual agreement is not identified, the
superintendent or designee may assign the certificated instructional
staff member to a temporary position, including a substitute
assignment, an instructional support position, a position in a district
office, or other position.
(5) If a displaced nonprovisional certificated instructional staff
member is not assigned to a nontemporary position with mutual agreement
by May 15th of the school year following the displacement, the
superintendent may initiate notice of nonrenewal of contract as
provided under RCW 28A.405.210. Lack of assignment under this section
of a displaced certificated instructional staff member to a
nontemporary position after eight or more months, including cumulative
time spent in successive assignments to temporary positions,
constitutes grounds for a finding of probable cause under RCW
28A.405.210.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to grant employers or
employees the right to reach agreements that are in conflict with the
provisions of section 1 of this act.

--- END ---