BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDING. The legislature finds that despite
efforts to identify and provide various forms of assistance to schools
and school districts that are struggling to improve student
achievement, there remain a small number of schools that are
persistently lowest-achieving and not making progress. Incremental
change has not been a successful strategy to turn around the
performance of these schools. Rather, a more significant
transformation and renewal of school governance, staffing, leadership,
and management is necessary to allow these schools first to recover,
and then to be successful on an ongoing basis. Transformation and
renewal requires innovation and leadership from the state level, along
with the structures, resources, and expertise to implement change that
will dramatically improve student performance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Learning management organization" means a nonprofit
corporation with expertise in managing both the daily operations and
the academic and instructional learning environment of a school under
a contract with the governing authority of the school. A learning
management organization must be either a public benefit nonprofit
corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.490, or a nonprofit corporation as
defined in RCW 24.03.005 that has applied for tax-exempt status under
section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3)).
(2) "Original school district" means the school district within
whose boundaries a school is located and does not include the renewal
district.
(3) "Renewal district" means an office within the office of the
superintendent of public instruction that has been assigned the powers
and responsibilities of a school district as provided under this
chapter.
(4) "Renewal school" means a school that has been temporarily
transferred from its original school district to the jurisdiction of
the renewal district as provided under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RENEWAL DISTRICT. (1) The renewal district
is hereby established as a statewide school district within the state
of Washington. The superintendent of public instruction shall exercise
all powers and responsibilities assigned under this title to a school
district board of directors for the governance and oversight of the
renewal district, including under RCW 28A.150.230 and 28A.320.015,
except as otherwise provided in this chapter.
(2) The renewal district and the superintendent of public
instruction as the governing authority of the district have
jurisdiction over all renewal schools that have been temporarily
transferred to the district under section 4 of this act.
(3) The renewal district is not a local taxing district and the
superintendent of public instruction may not levy taxes under RCW
84.52.053. The superintendent of public instruction may not buy or
sell real property under RCW 28A.335.120 or incur bonded indebtedness
under RCW 28A.530.010 or 28A.530.080, and does not have the power of
eminent domain under RCW 28A.335.220. The state treasurer shall act as
the treasurer for the renewal district, with the same responsibilities
for renewal district funds as are assigned by law to the county
treasurer for local school district funds.
(4) The renewal district shall be designated as a local education
agency of the state under applicable federal laws and rules and is
responsible for meeting the requirements of local education agencies
under those laws and rules, including those regarding the receipt and
expenditure of federal funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RENEWAL SCHOOLS--TRANSFER. (1) Beginning in
January 2014, the superintendent of public instruction shall annually
recommend to the state board of education schools for temporary
transfer to the jurisdiction of the renewal district.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt criteria
for the recommendation, including:
(a) The school has been identified under RCW 28A.657.020 as a
persistently lowest-achieving school and is furthermore among the
persistently lowest-achieving of these schools;
(b) The school is not the subject of a required action plan in a
required action district under chapter 28A.657 RCW, except that a
school that has been the subject of a required action plan for at least
three years and has not been released from required action under RCW
28A.657.100 may be recommended for transfer to the renewal district;
and
(c) The school is not the subject of a currently active federal
school improvement grant.
(3) No more than twenty schools that meet the superintendent's
criteria may be transferred to the renewal district each single year.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide a school
district superintendent with written notice of the recommendation for
transfer of a school to the renewal district by certified mail or
personal service. A school district superintendent may request
reconsideration of the superintendent of public instruction's
recommendation. The reconsideration is limited to a determination of
whether the school met the criteria for being recommended for transfer
to the renewal district. A request for reconsideration must be in
writing and served on the superintendent of public instruction within
ten days of service of the notice of the superintendent's
recommendation.
(5) The state board of education must consider the recommendations
of the superintendent of public instruction under subsection (1) of
this section at a public meeting. The state board of education may
modify the superintendent's recommendations before directing the annual
transfer of schools to the jurisdiction of the renewal district. The
transfer shall take effect on September 1st following the board's
decision.
(6) During the period of time between the board's decision and the
effective date of the transfer of a school under this section, the
original school district must cooperate with the superintendent of
public instruction in developing a transfer plan, including but not
limited to providing necessary financial and staffing information to
the superintendent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 LEARNING MANAGEMENT ORGANIZATION CONTRACTS.
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with a
learning management organization for the management and operation of
each renewal school. A learning management organization may manage
more than one renewal school, but each school shall be the subject of
a separate contract. The term of a contract under this section shall
be no more than three years. A learning management organization may
apply for renewal of a contract. The superintendent of public
instruction shall use the performance framework established under this
section as a primary determining factor in awarding or denying a
contract renewal.
(2) The superintendent's requests for proposals for learning
management organizations must require an applicant to provide:
(a) The applicant's strategic vision for operation, management, and
transformation and renewal of a persistently lowest-achieving school;
(b) A plan to support the vision presented, including explanation
and evidence of the applicant's budget and personnel capacity and
commitment to execute the responsibilities of school operation and
management;
(c) A draft of the performance framework that the applicant would
use to guide the transformation and renewal of the school; and
(d) A statement of assurance that the applicant will provide public
accountability and transparency in all matters concerning practices,
decisions, and expenditures related to its management of a renewal
school.
(3) A contract with a learning management organization must contain
a performance framework that clearly sets forth the academic and
operational performance indicators, measures, and metrics for the
improvement of student learning in the renewal school. Annual
performance targets must be established under the contract. The
learning management organization must develop, oversee, and implement
a school transformation and renewal plan based on the performance
framework.
(4) At a minimum, the performance framework must include
indicators, measures, and metrics for:
(a) Student academic proficiency;
(b) Student academic growth;
(c) Achievement gaps in both proficiency and growth between major
student subgroups;
(d) Attendance;
(e) Recurrent enrollment from year to year;
(f) Graduation rates and postsecondary readiness, for high schools;
(g) Financial performance and sustainability; and
(h) Performance and stewardship by the learning management
organization, including compliance with all applicable laws, rules, and
terms of the contract with the superintendent of public instruction.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction and the learning
management organization may also include additional rigorous, valid,
and reliable indicators in the performance framework to augment
external evaluations of the performance of the renewal school.
(6) The performance framework must require the disaggregation of
all student performance data by major student subgroups, including
gender, race and ethnicity, poverty status, special education status,
English learner status, and highly capable status.
(7) A contract with a learning management organization must include
expectations and indicators for parent and community involvement in the
renewal school. The learning management organization must establish
and hold regular public meetings with a standing parent and community
advisory committee.
(8) A learning management organization may contract with
individuals, organizations, educational service districts, and school
districts including the original school district to provide goods and
services to a renewal school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RENEWAL DISTRICT EMPLOYEES. (1) The
original school district must notify all certificated and classified
employees assigned to a school that is scheduled to be transferred to
the renewal district under section 4 of this act that their employment
contracts shall be nonrenewed at the end of the school year before the
transfer takes effect. The transfer of the school of assignment to the
jurisdiction of the renewal district where the superintendent of public
instruction has governing authority, including over the employment of
necessary staff, constitutes probable cause for contract nonrenewal.
For certificated employees, the notice must comply with the provisions
of RCW 28A.405.210 and 28A.405.220.
(2) Certificated and classified employees assigned to a school that
is scheduled to be transferred to the renewal district may apply to the
original school district for a transfer of assignment within the
original district, which request must be considered according to the
policies and procedures of the district regarding transfers of
assignment.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall exercise the
powers of a school district board of directors under RCW 28A.400.300
with regard to employment of certificated and classified employees who
shall be considered employees of the renewal district.
(4) Under the terms of the contracts executed under section 5 of
this act, the superintendent must delegate to the learning management
organization the responsibility to hire, assign, evaluate, and dismiss
all staff of a renewal school.
(5) Classified and certificated staff previously assigned to a
school that is transferred to the renewal district may apply to the
learning management organization to become employees of the renewal
district assigned to that school.
(6) Years of service in a renewal school by certificated
instructional staff shall be included in the years of service
calculation for purposes of the statewide salary allocation schedule
under RCW 28A.150.410.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RENEWAL DISTRICT STUDENTS. (1) The original
school district must notify all parents of students attending a school
scheduled to be transferred to the renewal district of the state board
of education's decision to transfer the school.
(2) A parent of a student scheduled to attend a renewal school must
be permitted to transfer the student to another school within the
original school district, but may be required to follow other school
assignment policies of the original school district.
(3) Except for transfers requested by a parent under this section,
assignment of students to a renewal school must be based on the same
policies for student assignment to other schools in the original school
district.
(4) Students enrolled in a renewal school may participate in
interscholastic and extracurricular activities offered by the original
school district in the same manner as other students enrolled in the
original school district, including being required to pay fees to
participate in extracurricular activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RENEWAL SCHOOLS--APPLICABILITY OF STATE
LAWS. (1) The superintendent of public instruction, as the governing
authority of the renewal district, and the schools transferred to its
jurisdiction are exempt from all state statutes and rules applicable to
school districts and school district boards of directors, except those
statutes and rules made applicable under this chapter.
(2) The renewal district and all renewal schools must:
(a) Comply with state and federal health, safety, parents' rights,
civil rights, and nondiscrimination laws applicable to school districts
and to the same extent as school districts, including but not limited
to chapter 28A.642 RCW (discrimination prohibition) and chapter 28A.640
RCW (sexual equality);
(b) Provide instruction in the essential academic learning
requirements and participate in the statewide student assessment system
as provided under RCW 28A.655.070;
(c) Employ certificated instructional staff as required in RCW
28A.410.025, however the renewal district may hire noncertificated
instructional staff of unusual competence and in exceptional cases as
specified in RCW 28A.150.203(7);
(d) Comply with the employee record check requirements in RCW
28A.400.303;
(e) Adhere to generally accepted accounting principles and be
subject to financial examinations and audits as determined by the state
auditor, including annual audits for legal and fiscal compliance;
(f) Comply with the annual performance report under RCW
28A.655.110;
(g) Be subject to the performance improvement goals adopted by the
state board of education under RCW 28A.305.130;
(h) Comply with the open public meetings act in chapter 42.30 RCW
and open public records requirements in RCW 42.56.040; and
(i) Be subject to and comply with legislation enacted after the
effective date of this section governing the operation and management
of the renewal district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 FUNDING. (1) According to the schedule
established under RCW 28A.510.250, the superintendent of public
instruction shall deduct from the apportionment payments due to an
original school district funding for each annual average full-time
equivalent student enrolled in a renewal school, including general
apportionment, special education, categorical, and other nonbasic
education moneys including local effort assistance. Categorical
funding must be deducted for a renewal school based on the same funding
criteria used for other public schools, except that the superintendent
of public instruction is exempt from rules and statutes regarding the
expenditure of these funds.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall place the
deducted funds in a separate account for each renewal school, and funds
in such an account may be spent only in support of that school. Any
unspent funds at the end of a school fiscal year remain in the account
to be used in future years for the benefit of that school.
(3) Federal funds that are made available to the renewal district
as a local education agency must be apportioned among the renewal
schools by the superintendent of public instruction based on the
programs and criteria that generated the funds.
(4) State funds deducted from the apportionment of an original
school district under subsection (1) of this section and federal funds
apportioned to a renewal school under subsection (3) of this section
must be included in the levy base of the school's original school
district under RCW 84.52.0531.
(5) If an original school district has a local levy for maintenance
and operations, the district must transmit to the superintendent of
public instruction a per-student amount of the levy for each annual
average full-time equivalent student enrolled in a renewal school in
that district. The superintendent of public instruction must place the
funds in the separate account under subsection (2) of this section and
spend the funds only in support of that school. For levies submitted
to voters after the transfer of a school to the renewal district, the
school must be included in levy planning, budgets, and funding
distribution in the same manner as other schools in the original school
district.
(6) Notwithstanding the transfer of a school to the renewal
district, the original school district must continue to receive
applicable state and federal funds for pupil transportation under
chapter 28A.160 RCW and for food services under chapter 28A.235 RCW for
students enrolled in a renewal school and shall continue to provide
transportation services and food services to the students enrolled in
that school in the same manner as such services would be provided
absent the transfer of the school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 FACILITIES. (1) A renewal school is
entitled to the continued rent free use of its existing facility. The
original school district remains responsible for major repairs and
safety upgrades that may be required, as well as continued payment for
any outstanding bonds or capital projects associated with the school.
The renewal district is responsible for routine maintenance of the
facility, including but not limited to, cleaning, painting, gardening,
and landscaping.
(2) The original school district retains ownership of and legal
title to the land, building, and equipment of a renewal school. After
the decision is made by the state board of education to transfer a
school to the renewal district, the original school district may not
remove supplies or equipment from the renewal school without written
authorization from the superintendent of public instruction or the
contracted learning management organization for the school.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction may negotiate with the
original school district for payment of the school's share of
insurance, utilities, or other similar shared overhead associated with
the operation of a renewal school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RENEWAL SCHOOLS--RETURN TO ORIGINAL
DISTRICT. (1) The state board of education must establish criteria for
measuring the improvement of each renewal school, based on the
performance framework and performance targets established under section
5 of this act.
(2) A renewal school is eligible to be returned to the jurisdiction
of its original school district after the school has met the
performance improvement criteria of the state board of education for
three consecutive years.
(3) The state board of education must notify the superintendent of
public instruction by January of the year after which a renewal school
becomes eligible to be returned to its original school district. The
superintendent of public instruction shall negotiate with the original
school district for the return of the renewal school, including
addressing the employment status of employees of the renewal school.
Any notices of nonrenewal of contracts for certificated instructional
staff of the renewal school must comply with RCW 28A.405.210 and
28A.405.220. The return of a renewal school to its original school
district takes effect September 1st after the board's decision.
(4) Any unspent balances in the account associated with the renewal
school must be credited to the original school district.
(5) The board of directors of the original school district may
negotiate a new contract with the learning management organization to
continue oversight and management of a returned renewal school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding RCW 41.56.060 and 41.56.070, the bargaining units
of classified employees of the renewal district established under
section 3 of this act must be limited to the employees of each renewal
school within the district and must be separate from other bargaining
units in the district. The superintendent of public instruction must
consult with the learning management organizations that are under
contract to manage and operate renewal schools when fulfilling the
responsibilities of a public employer under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding RCW 41.59.070 and 41.59.080, the bargaining units
of certificated employees of the renewal district established under
section 3 of this act must be limited to the employees of each renewal
school within the district and must be separate from other bargaining
units in the district. The superintendent of public instruction must
consult with the learning management organizations that are under
contract to manage and operate renewal schools when fulfilling the
responsibilities of an employer under this chapter.

Sec. 14 RCW 28A.310.140 and 2006 c 263 s 608 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every school district must be included entirely within a single
educational service district. If the boundaries of any school district
within an educational service district are changed in any manner so as
to extend the school district beyond the boundaries of that educational
service district, the superintendent of public instruction shall change
the boundaries of the educational service districts so affected in a
manner consistent with the purposes of RCW 28A.310.010 and this
section. This section does not apply to the renewal district
established under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 28A.315
RCW to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the renewal district
established under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 28A.323
RCW to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the renewal district
established under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 28A.343
RCW to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the renewal district
established under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---