BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that progress is
being made in making dual high school and college credit courses
available for students:
(a) Overall dual credit program enrollments increased by almost
four percent between 2009 and 2012;
(b) The number of dual credit programs offered by Washington high
schools increased by almost fifteen percent between the 2009-10 school
year and the 2011-12 school year; and
(c) Dual credit program participation rates for low-income students
increased more than fourteen percent between the 2009-10 school year
and the 2011-12 school year.
(2) However, the legislature further finds that more can be done to
promote academic acceleration for all students and eliminate barriers,
real or perceived, that may prevent students from enrolling in rigorous
advanced courses, including dual credit courses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Each school district board of directors is encouraged to adopt
an academic acceleration policy for high school students as provided
under this section.
(2) Under an academic acceleration policy:
(a) The district automatically enrolls any student who meets the
state standard on the high school statewide student assessment in the
next most rigorous level of advanced courses offered by the high
school. Students who successfully complete such an advanced course are
then enrolled in the next most rigorous level of advanced course, with
the objective that students will eventually be automatically enrolled
in courses that offer the opportunity to earn dual credit for high
school and college.
(b) The subject matter of the advanced courses in which the student
is automatically enrolled depends on the content area or areas of the
statewide student assessment where the student has met the state
standard. Students who meet the state standard on both end-of-course
mathematics assessments are considered to have met the state standard
for high school mathematics. Students who meet the state standard in
both reading and writing are eligible for enrollment in advanced
courses in English, social studies, humanities, and other related
subjects.
(c) The district must notify students and parents or guardians
regarding the academic acceleration policy and the advanced courses
available to students.
(d) The district must provide a parent or guardian with an
opportunity to opt out of the academic acceleration policy and enroll
a student in an alternative course.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose,
the academic acceleration incentive program is established as provided
in this section. The intent of the legislature is that the funds
awarded under the program be used to support teacher training,
curriculum, technology, examination fees, and other costs associated
with offering dual credit courses to high school students.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
allocate half of the funds appropriated for the purposes of this
section on a competitive basis to provide one-time grants for high
schools to expand the availability of dual credit courses. To be
eligible for a grant, a school district must have adopted an academic
acceleration policy as provided under section 2 of this act. In making
grant awards, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
must give priority to grants for high schools with a high proportion of
low-income students and high schools seeking to develop new capacity
for dual credit courses rather than proposing marginal expansion of
current capacity.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
allocate half of the funds appropriated for the purposes of this
section to school districts as an incentive award for each student who
earned dual high school and college credit, as described under
subsection (4) of this section, for courses offered by the district's
high schools during the previous school year. School districts must
distribute the award to the high schools that generated the funds. The
award amount for low-income students eligible to participate in the
federal free and reduced-price meals program who earn dual credits must
be set at one hundred twenty-five percent of the base award for other
students. A student who earns more than one dual credit in the same
school year counts only once for the purposes of the incentive award.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the following students are
considered to have earned dual high school and college credit in a
course offered by a high school:
(a) Students who achieve a score of three or higher on an AP
examination;
(b) Students who achieve a score of four or higher on an
examination of the international baccalaureate diploma programme;
(c) Students who successfully complete a Cambridge advanced
international certificate of education examination;
(d) Students who successfully complete a course through the college
in the high school program under RCW 28A.600.290 and are awarded credit
by the partnering institution of higher education; and
(e) Students who satisfy the dual enrollment and class performance
requirements to earn college credit through a tech prep course.
(5) If a high school provides access to online courses for students
to earn dual high school and college credit at no cost to the student,
such a course is considered to be offered by the high school. Students
enrolled in the running start program under RCW 28A.600.300 do not
generate an incentive award under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to data on student enrollment in dual credit courses,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall collect
and post on the Washington state report card web site the rates at
which students earn college credit through a dual credit course, using
the following criteria:
(1) Students who achieve a score of three or higher on an AP
examination;
(2) Students who achieve a score of four or higher on an
examination of the international baccalaureate diploma programme;
(3) Students who successfully complete a Cambridge advanced
international certificate of education examination;
(4) Students who successfully complete a course through the college
in the high school program under RCW 28A.600.290 and are awarded credit
by the partnering institution of higher education; and
(5) Students who satisfy the dual enrollment and class performance
requirements to earn college credit through a tech prep course; and
(6) Students who successfully complete a course through the running
start program under RCW 28A.600.300 and are awarded credit by the
institution of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If specific funding for purposes of section
3 of this act, referencing section 3 of this act by bill or chapter and
section number, is not provided by June 30, 2013, in the omnibus
operating appropriations act, section 3 of this act is null and void.

--- END ---