BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.285.040 and 2013 c 158 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each qualifying utility shall pursue all available conservation
that is cost-effective, reliable, and feasible.
(a) By January 1, 2010, using methodologies consistent with those
used by the Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council in ((its)) the most recently published regional power plan as
it existed on the effective date of this section or a subsequent date
as may be provided by the department or the commission by rule, each
qualifying utility shall identify its achievable cost-effective
conservation potential through 2019. Nothing in the rule adopted under
this subsection precludes a qualifying utility from using its utility
specific conservation measures, values, and assumptions in identifying
its achievable cost-effective conservation potential. At least every
two years thereafter, the qualifying utility shall review and update
this assessment for the subsequent ten-year period.
(b) Beginning January 2010, each qualifying utility shall establish
and make publicly available a biennial acquisition target for cost-effective conservation consistent with its identification of achievable
opportunities in (a) of this subsection, and meet that target during
the subsequent two-year period. At a minimum, each biennial target
must be no lower than the qualifying utility's pro rata share for that
two-year period of its cost-effective conservation potential for the
subsequent ten-year period.
(c)(i) Except as provided in (c)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection,
beginning on January 1, 2014, cost-effective conservation achieved by
a qualifying utility in excess of its biennial acquisition target may
be used to help meet the immediately subsequent two biennial
acquisition targets, such that no more than twenty percent of any
biennial target may be met with excess conservation savings.
(ii) Beginning January 1, 2014, a qualifying utility may use single
large facility conservation savings in excess of its biennial target to
meet up to an additional five percent of the immediately subsequent two
biennial acquisition targets, such that no more than twenty-five
percent of any biennial target may be met with excess conservation
savings allowed under all of the provisions of this section combined.
For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c)(ii), "single large facility
conservation savings" means cost-effective conservation savings
achieved in a single biennial period at the premises of a single
customer of a qualifying utility whose annual electricity consumption
prior to the conservation savings exceeded five average megawatts.
(iii) Beginning January 1, 2012, and until December 31, 2017, a
qualifying utility with an industrial facility located in a county with
a population between ninety-five thousand and one hundred fifteen
thousand that is directly interconnected with electricity facilities
that are capable of carrying electricity at transmission voltage, may
use cost-effective conservation from that industrial facility in excess
of its biennial acquisition target to help meet the immediately
subsequent two biennial acquisition targets, such that no more than
twenty-five percent of any biennial target may be met with excess
conservation savings allowed under all of the provisions of this
section combined.
(d) In meeting its conservation targets, a qualifying utility may
count high-efficiency cogeneration owned and used by a retail electric
customer to meet its own needs. High-efficiency cogeneration is the
sequential production of electricity and useful thermal energy from a
common fuel source, where, under normal operating conditions, the
facility has a useful thermal energy output of no less than thirty-three percent of the total energy output. The reduction in load due to
high-efficiency cogeneration shall be: (i) Calculated as the ratio of
the fuel chargeable to power heat rate of the cogeneration facility
compared to the heat rate on a new and clean basis of a
best-commercially available technology combined-cycle natural gas-fired
combustion turbine; and (ii) counted towards meeting the biennial
conservation target in the same manner as other conservation savings.
(((d))) (e) The commission may determine if a conservation program
implemented by an investor-owned utility is cost-effective based on the
commission's policies and practice.
(((e))) (f) The commission may rely on its standard practice for
review and approval of investor-owned utility conservation targets.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (j) of this subsection, each
qualifying utility shall use eligible renewable resources or acquire
equivalent renewable energy credits, or any combination of them, to
meet the following annual targets:
(i) At least three percent of its load by January 1, 2012, and each
year thereafter through December 31, 2015;
(ii) At least nine percent of its load by January 1, 2016, and each
year thereafter through December 31, 2019; and
(iii) At least fifteen percent of its load by January 1, 2020, and
each year thereafter.
(b) A qualifying utility may count distributed generation at double
the facility's electrical output if the utility: (i) Owns or has
contracted for the distributed generation and the associated renewable
energy credits; or (ii) has contracted to purchase the associated
renewable energy credits.
(c) In meeting the annual targets in (a) of this subsection, a
qualifying utility shall calculate its annual load based on the average
of the utility's load for the previous two years.
(d) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if: (i) The utility's weather-adjusted load for the previous three years on average did not increase
over that time period; (ii) after December 7, 2006, the utility did not
commence or renew ownership or incremental purchases of electricity
from resources other than coal transition power or renewable resources
other than on a daily spot price basis and the electricity is not
offset by equivalent renewable energy credits; and (iii) the utility
invested at least one percent of its total annual retail revenue
requirement that year on eligible renewable resources, renewable energy
credits, or a combination of both.
(e) The requirements of this section may be met for any given year
with renewable energy credits produced during that year, the preceding
year, or the subsequent year. Each renewable energy credit may be used
only once to meet the requirements of this section.
(f) In complying with the targets established in (a) of this
subsection, a qualifying utility may not count:
(i) Eligible renewable resources or distributed generation where
the associated renewable energy credits are owned by a separate entity;
or
(ii) Eligible renewable resources or renewable energy credits
obtained for and used in an optional pricing program such as the
program established in RCW 19.29A.090.
(g) Where fossil and combustible renewable resources are cofired in
one generating unit located in the Pacific Northwest where the cofiring
commenced after March 31, 1999, the unit shall be considered to produce
eligible renewable resources in direct proportion to the percentage of
the total heat value represented by the heat value of the renewable
resources.
(h)(i) A qualifying utility that acquires an eligible renewable
resource or renewable energy credit may count that acquisition at one
and two-tenths times its base value:
(A) Where the eligible renewable resource comes from a facility
that commenced operation after December 31, 2005; and
(B) Where the developer of the facility used apprenticeship
programs approved by the council during facility construction.
(ii) The council shall establish minimum levels of labor hours to
be met through apprenticeship programs to qualify for this extra
credit.
(i) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if events beyond the reasonable
control of the utility that could not have been reasonably anticipated
or ameliorated prevented it from meeting the renewable energy target.
Such events include weather-related damage, mechanical failure,
strikes, lockouts, and actions of a governmental authority that
adversely affect the generation, transmission, or distribution of an
eligible renewable resource under contract to a qualifying utility.
(j)(i) Beginning January 1, 2016, only a qualifying utility that
owns or is directly interconnected to a qualified biomass energy
facility may use qualified biomass energy to meet its compliance
obligation under ((RCW 19.285.040(2))) this subsection.
(ii) A qualifying utility may no longer use electricity and
associated renewable energy credits from a qualified biomass energy
facility if the associated industrial pulping or wood manufacturing
facility ceases operation other than for purposes of maintenance or
upgrade.
(k) An industrial facility that hosts a qualified biomass energy
facility may only transfer or sell renewable energy credits associated
with its facility to the qualifying utility with which it is directly
interconnected with facilities owned by such a qualifying utility and
that are capable of carrying electricity at transmission voltage. The
qualifying utility may only use an amount of renewable energy credits
associated with qualified biomass energy that are equivalent to the
proportionate amount of its annual targets under (a)(ii) and (iii) of
this subsection that was created by the load of the industrial
facility. A qualifying utility that owns a qualified biomass energy
facility may not transfer or sell renewable energy credits associated
with qualified biomass energy to another person, entity, or qualifying
utility.
(3) Utilities that become qualifying utilities after December 31,
2006, shall meet the requirements in this section on a time frame
comparable in length to that provided for qualifying utilities as of
December 7, 2006.

--- END ---