BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.07.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 137 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The Washington higher education facilities authority is hereby
established as a public body corporate and politic, with perpetual
corporate succession, constituting an agency of the state of Washington
exercising essential governmental functions. The authority is a
"public body" within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010.
(2) The authority shall consist of ((six)) seven members as
follows: The governor, lieutenant governor, and ((four)) five public
members, one of whom shall be the president of a higher education
institution at the time of appointment. The public members shall be
residents of the state and appointed by the governor, subject to
confirmation by the senate, on the basis of their interest or expertise
in the provision of higher education and the financing of higher
education. The public members of the authority shall serve for terms
of four years. The initial terms of the public members shall be
staggered in a manner determined by the governor. In the event of a
vacancy on the authority due to death, resignation, or removal of one
of the public members, and upon the expiration of the term of any
public member, the governor shall appoint a successor for a term
expiring on the fourth anniversary of the successor's date of the
appointment. If any of the state offices are abolished, the resulting
vacancy on the authority shall be filled by the state officer who shall
succeed substantially to the power and duties of the abolished office.
Any public member of the authority may be removed by the governor for
misfeasance, malfeasance, willful neglect of duty, or any other cause
after notice and a public hearing, unless such notice and hearing shall
be expressly waived in writing.
(3) The governor shall serve as chairperson of the authority. The
authority shall elect annually one of its members as secretary. If the
governor shall be absent from a meeting of the authority, the secretary
shall preside. However, the governor may designate an employee of the
governor's office to act on the governor's behalf in all other respects
during the absence of the governor at any meeting of the authority. If
the designation is in writing and is presented to the person presiding
at the meetings of the authority who is included in the designation,
the vote of the designee has the same effect as if cast by the
governor.
(4) Any person designated by resolution of the authority shall keep
a record of the proceedings of the authority and shall be the custodian
of all books, documents, and papers filed with the authority, the
minute book or a journal of the authority, and the authority's official
seal, if any. The person may cause copies to be made of all minutes
and other records and documents of the authority, and may give
certificates to the effect that such copies are true copies. All
persons dealing with the authority may rely upon the certificates.
(5) Four members of the authority constitute a quorum. Members
participating in a meeting through the use of any means of
communication by which all members participating can hear each other
during the meeting shall be deemed to be present in person at the
meeting for all purposes. The authority may act on the basis of a
motion except when authorizing the issuance and sale of bonds, in which
case the authority shall act by resolution. Bond resolutions and other
resolutions shall be adopted upon the affirmative vote of four members
of the authority, and shall be signed by those members voting yes.
Motions shall be adopted upon the affirmative vote of a majority of a
quorum of members present at any meeting of the authority. All actions
taken by the authority shall take effect immediately without need for
publication or other public notice. A vacancy in the membership of the
authority does not impair the power of the authority to act under this
chapter.
(6) The members of the authority shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be entitled to reimbursement, solely from
the funds of the authority, for travel expenses as determined by the
authority incurred in the discharge of their duties under this chapter.

--- END ---