BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington state
uses debt financing to meet many of its essential capital and
transportation needs. This debt capacity is limited by the amount of
discretionary state government operating and transportation revenues
available to repay the debt. A comprehensive approach to manage the
state's debt capacity will help guide Washington's policymakers'
choices about the amounts, types, and uses of debt financing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The council on state debt is created and consists of the state
treasurer, acting as the chair and a nonvoting member; one member
appointed from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate; one member appointed from
each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives,
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; the director
of financial management; and the secretary of transportation. The
members of the council serve without additional compensation, but are
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while
attending sessions of the council or on official business authorized by
the council. The office of the state treasurer shall provide staff
support for the council.
(2) The purpose of the council is to advise and make
recommendations to the governor and the legislature on prudent levels
and types of state debt to fund essential capital and transportation
projects while protecting the state's credit rating, maintaining
financial market access and also preserving future budgetary
flexibility.
(3) The council shall oversee the preparation of and approve, by an
affirmative vote of at least four members, recommendations to the
governor and the legislature as required under this section. If the
council is unable to approve the required recommendations before the
date required in subsection (5) of this section, the office of the
state treasurer's recommendation has the same effect as if approved by
the council.
(4) The council's recommendations must take at least the following
into consideration:
(a) The overall amount of all types of debt issued by or on behalf
of the state as reflected in the debt affordability study prepared
annually by the state treasurer; and
(b) The impact of planned and proposed debt issuance on the state's
ability to access the bond market and the cost of those borrowings.
(5) On or before November 1st of each year, the council must
recommend the following:
(a) A prudent level of various purpose general obligation debt
service payments as a percentage of general state revenue;
(b) A prudent level of various purpose general obligation debt to
be authorized for the following biennium when taking into account:
(i) Capital needs for that biennium;
(ii) Projected capital needs reflected in the ten-year capital
project plan;
(iii) Debt capacity with respect to the constitutional debt limit
for that biennium;
(iv) Projected constitutional debt capacity for the following four
biennia; and
(v) The economic, revenue, and interest rate forecast;
(c) A prudent amount of other methods of financing, including but
not limited to limited obligation debt backed by specific revenues and
debt issued pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, that is available to fund
capital projects when taking into account the factors set forth in (b)
of this subsection;
(d) A prudent level of motor vehicle fuel tax general obligation
debt service payments as a percentage of current and projected motor
vehicle fuel tax revenues, taking into consideration the amount
directed to local governments, the amounts needed to pay current debt
service, and any other amounts directed to any other lawful source;
(e) A prudent level of motor vehicle fuel tax general obligation
debt to be authorized for the following biennium when taking into
account:
(i) The transportation needs for the following biennium according
to the transportation plan;
(ii) The projected transportation needs as reflected in the
transportation plan; and
(iii) The motor vehicle fuel tax capacity available when taking
into consideration the amount directed to local governments, the
amounts needed to pay current debt service, and any other amounts
directed to any other lawful purposes;
(f) A prudent amount of other methods of financing, including but
not limited to limited obligation bonds and financings authorized under
chapter 47.29 RCW, available to fund transportation projects when
taking into account the factors set forth in (e) of this subsection.
A maximum level of debt to be authorized in any bond authorization bill
required under section 7 of this act for capital projects; and
(g) A maximum level of debt to be authorized in any bond
authorization bill required under section 7 of this act for
transportation projects.
(6) The council must evaluate and include in its recommendations,
the following:
(a) The combined impact of issuing the proposed debt as identified
in the capital plan and transportation plan on the state's cost of
capital;
(b) The combined impact of issuing the proposed debt as identified
in the capital plan and the transportation plan on the general fund and
the motor vehicle fund; and
(c) A prudent limitation on the percentage of general state
revenues and motor vehicle fuel tax revenues to be permitted to be
obligated to the payment of debt service when taking into consideration
all relevant factors.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.88.030 and 2006 c 334 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director of financial management shall provide all agencies
with a complete set of instructions for submitting biennial budget
requests to the director at least three months before agency budget
documents are due into the office of financial management. The budget
document or documents shall consist of the governor's budget message
which shall be explanatory of the budget and shall contain an outline
of the proposed financial policies of the state for the ensuing fiscal
period, as well as an outline of the proposed six-year financial
policies where applicable, and shall describe in connection therewith
the important features of the budget. The biennial budget document or
documents shall also describe performance indicators that demonstrate
measurable progress towards priority results. The message shall set
forth the reasons for salient changes from the previous fiscal period
in expenditure and revenue items and shall explain any major changes in
financial policy. Attached to the budget message shall be such
supporting schedules, exhibits and other explanatory material in
respect to both current operations and capital improvements as the
governor shall deem to be useful to the legislature. The budget
document or documents must not set forth a proposal that relies on an
amount of state debt that exceeds the bond authorization bill required
under section 7 of this act. The budget document or documents shall
set forth a proposal for expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period, or
six-year period where applicable, based upon the estimated revenues and
caseloads as approved by the economic and revenue forecast council and
caseload forecast council or upon the estimated revenues and caseloads
of the office of financial management for those funds, accounts,
sources, and programs for which the forecast councils do not prepare an
official forecast. Revenues shall be estimated for such fiscal period
from the source and at the rates existing by law at the time of
submission of the budget document, including the supplemental budgets
submitted in the even-numbered years of a biennium. However, the
estimated revenues and caseloads for use in the governor's budget
document may be adjusted to reflect budgetary revenue transfers and
revenue and caseload estimates dependent upon budgetary assumptions of
enrollments, workloads, and caseloads. All adjustments to the approved
estimated revenues and caseloads must be set forth in the budget
document. The governor may additionally submit, as an appendix to each
supplemental, biennial, or six-year agency budget or to the budget
document or documents, a proposal for expenditures in the ensuing
fiscal period from revenue sources derived from proposed changes in
existing statutes.
The budget document or documents shall also contain:
(a) Revenues classified by fund and source for the immediately past
fiscal period, those received or anticipated for the current fiscal
period, and those anticipated for the ensuing biennium;
(b) The undesignated fund balance or deficit, by fund;
(c) Such additional information dealing with expenditures,
revenues, workload, performance, and personnel as the legislature may
direct by law or concurrent resolution;
(d) Such additional information dealing with revenues and
expenditures as the governor shall deem pertinent and useful to the
legislature;
(e) Tabulations showing expenditures classified by fund, function,
and agency;
(f) The expenditures that include nonbudgeted, nonappropriated
accounts outside the state treasury;
(g) Identification of all proposed direct expenditures to implement
the Puget Sound water quality plan under chapter 90.71 RCW, shown by
agency and in total; and
(h) Tabulations showing each postretirement adjustment by
retirement system established after fiscal year 1991, to include, but
not be limited to, estimated total payments made to the end of the
previous biennial period, estimated payments for the present biennium,
and estimated payments for the ensuing biennium.
(2) The budget document or documents shall include detailed
estimates of all anticipated revenues applicable to proposed operating
or capital expenditures and shall also include all proposed operating
or capital expenditures, including debt service required to be paid
from any fund for bonds, including payment requirements on projects
financed by other methods for the full term of the financing. The
total of beginning undesignated fund balance and estimated revenues
less working capital and other reserves shall equal or exceed the total
of proposed applicable expenditures. The budget document or documents
shall further include:
(a) Interest, amortization and redemption charges on the state
debt;
(b) Payments of all reliefs, judgments, and claims;
(c) Other statutory expenditures;
(d) Expenditures incident to the operation for each agency;
(e) Revenues derived from agency operations;
(f) Expenditures and revenues shall be given in comparative form
showing those incurred or received for the immediately past fiscal
period and those anticipated for the current biennium and next ensuing
biennium;
(g) A showing and explanation of amounts of general fund and other
funds obligations for debt service for bonds and payment requirements
for projects financed by other methods for the full term of the
financing and any transfers of moneys that otherwise would have been
available for appropriation;
(h) Common school expenditures on a fiscal-year basis;
(i) A showing, by agency, of the value and purpose of financing
contracts for the lease/purchase or acquisition of personal or real
property for the current and ensuing fiscal periods; and
(j) A showing and explanation of anticipated amounts of general
fund and other funds required to amortize the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability of the retirement system specified under chapter
41.45 RCW, and the contributions to meet such amortization, stated in
total dollars and as a level percentage of total compensation.
(3) The governor's operating budget document or documents shall
reflect the statewide priorities as required by RCW 43.88.090.
(4) The governor's operating budget document or documents shall
identify activities that are not addressing the statewide priorities.
(5) A separate capital budget document or schedule shall be
submitted that will contain the following:
(a) A statement setting forth a long-range facilities plan for the
state that identifies and includes the highest priority needs within
affordable spending levels;
(b) A capital program consisting of proposed capital projects for
the next biennium and the two biennia succeeding the next biennium
consistent with the long-range facilities plan. Insomuch as is
practical, and recognizing emergent needs, the capital program shall
reflect the priorities, projects, and spending levels proposed in
previously submitted capital budget documents in order to provide a
reliable long-range planning tool for the legislature and state
agencies;
(c) A capital plan consisting of proposed capital spending for at
least four biennia succeeding the next biennium, including debt service
required to be paid from any fund for bonds and payment requirements
for projects financed by other methods for the full term of the
financing;
(d) A strategic plan for reducing backlogs of maintenance and
repair projects. The plan shall include a prioritized list of specific
facility deficiencies and capital projects to address the deficiencies
for each agency, cost estimates for each project, a schedule for
completing projects over a reasonable period of time, and
identification of normal maintenance activities to reduce future
backlogs;
(e) A statement of the reason or purpose for a project;
(f) Verification that a project is consistent with the provisions
set forth in chapter 36.70A RCW;
(g) A statement about the proposed site, size, and estimated life
of the project, if applicable;
(h) Estimated total project cost;
(i) For major projects valued over five million dollars, estimated
costs for the following project components: Acquisition, consultant
services, construction, equipment, project management, and other costs
included as part of the project. Project component costs shall be
displayed in a standard format defined by the office of financial
management to allow comparisons between projects;
(j) Estimated total project cost for each phase of the project as
defined by the office of financial management;
(k) Estimated ensuing biennium costs;
(l) Estimated costs beyond the ensuing biennium, including debt
service required to be paid from any fund for bonds and payment
requirements for projects financed by other methods for the full term
of the financing;
(m) Estimated construction start and completion dates;
(n) Source and type of funds proposed;
(o) Estimated ongoing operating budget costs or savings resulting
from the project, including staffing and maintenance costs;
(p) For any capital appropriation requested for a state agency for
the acquisition of land or the capital improvement of land in which the
primary purpose of the acquisition or improvement is recreation or
wildlife habitat conservation, the capital budget document, or an
omnibus list of recreation and habitat acquisitions provided with the
governor's budget document, shall identify the projected costs of
operation and maintenance for at least the two biennia succeeding the
next biennium. Omnibus lists of habitat and recreation land
acquisitions shall include individual project cost estimates for
operation and maintenance as well as a total for all state projects
included in the list. The document shall identify the source of funds
from which the operation and maintenance costs are proposed to be
funded;
(q) Such other information bearing upon capital projects as the
governor deems to be useful;
(r) Standard terms, including a standard and uniform definition of
normal maintenance, for all capital projects;
(s) Such other information as the legislature may direct by law or
concurrent resolution.
For purposes of this subsection (5), the term "capital project"
shall be defined subsequent to the analysis, findings, and
recommendations of a joint committee comprised of representatives from
the house capital appropriations committee, senate ways and means
committee, legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
and office of financial management.
(6) No change affecting the comparability of agency or program
information relating to expenditures, revenues, workload, performance
and personnel shall be made in the format of any budget document or
report presented to the legislature under this section or RCW
43.88.160(1) relative to the format of the budget document or report
which was presented to the previous regular session of the legislature
during an odd-numbered year without prior legislative concurrence.
Prior legislative concurrence shall consist of (a) a favorable majority
vote on the proposal by the standing committees on ways and means of
both houses if the legislature is in session or (b) a favorable
majority vote on the proposal by members of the legislative evaluation
and accountability program committee if the legislature is not in
session.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.88.031 and 1991 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A capital appropriation bill shall include the estimated ((general
fund)) debt service costs from all funds associated with new capital
appropriations contained in that bill for the biennia in which the
appropriations occur and for the ((succeeding two biennia)) full term
of the financing.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.42.070 and 2009 c 500 s 1 and 2009 c 479 s 24 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
((On or after the effective date of this act,)) The treasurer shall
compute general state revenues for the ((three)) six fiscal years
immediately preceding ((such date)) the effective date of this section
and shall determine the arithmetic mean thereof. As soon as is
practicable after the close of each fiscal year thereafter, he or she
shall do likewise. In determining the amount of general state
revenues, the treasurer shall include all state money received in the
treasury from each and every source ((whatsoever except)), including
moneys received from ad valorem taxes levied by the state and deposited
in the general fund in each fiscal year, but not including: (1) Fees
and other revenues derived from the ownership or operation of any
undertaking, facility or project; (2) moneys received as gifts, grants,
donations, aid or assistance or otherwise from the United States or any
department, bureau or corporation thereof, or any person, firm or
corporation, public or private, when the terms and conditions of such
gift, grant, donation, aid or assistance require the application and
disbursement of such moneys otherwise than for the general purposes of
the state of Washington; (3) moneys to be paid into and received from
retirement system funds, and performance bonds and deposits; (4) moneys
to be paid into and received from trust funds ((including but not
limited to moneys received from taxes levied for specific purposes))
and the several permanent funds of the state and the moneys derived
therefrom but excluding bond redemption funds; (5) moneys received from
taxes levied for specific purposes and required to be deposited for
those purposes into specified funds or accounts other than the general
fund; and (6) proceeds received from the sale of bonds or other
evidences of indebtedness. Upon computing general state revenues, the
treasurer shall make and file in the office of the secretary of state,
a certificate containing the results of such computations. Copies of
said certificate shall be sent to each elected official of the state
and each member of the legislature. The treasurer shall, at the same
time, advise each elected official and each member of the legislature
of the current available debt capacity of the state, and may make
estimated projections for one or more years concerning debt capacity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.08 RCW
to read as follows:
Each year, the treasurer shall cause to be published a debt
affordability study that provides an assessment of the state's current
debt portfolio and an analysis of the impact of future debt issuance.
The study must include but is not limited to: An overview of the
state's outstanding and projected debt; the structure of the debt
portfolio; the state's credit rating and peer analysis; the cost of
existing debt; sources of funds for interest, principal, or lease
payments; and the purposes for which debt instruments and financing
contracts are issued. To assist with this work, the office of the
state treasurer shall convene and staff a work group to include staff
from the fiscal committees of the state house of representatives and
state senate and the office of financial management. A copy of the
debt affordability study shall be provided to the governor, the
legislature, the council on state debt and the state finance committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
To the extent any budget document or documents set forth a proposal
to issue debt, the governor shall also cause to be prepared a bond
authorization bill that reflects the amount and type of debt proposed
to be issued. In preparing the bond authorization bill, the governor
shall take into consideration the council on state debt's
recommendations with respect to the prudent level of debt to be issued
and not exceed such recommendations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following act or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) 2011 1st sp.s. c 46 s 1 (uncodified);
(2) 2011 1st sp.s. c 46 s 2 (uncodified); and
(3) RCW 39.42.140 (Working debt limit) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 46 s 3.

--- END ---