BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.060 and 2011 c 132 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The landlord will at all times during the tenancy keep the premises
fit for human habitation, and shall in particular:
(1) Maintain the premises to substantially comply with any
applicable code, statute, ordinance, or regulation governing their
maintenance or operation, which the legislative body enacting the
applicable code, statute, ordinance or regulation could enforce as to
the premises rented if such condition endangers or impairs the health
or safety of the tenant;
(2) Maintain the structural components including, but not limited
to, the roofs, floors, walls, chimneys, fireplaces, foundations, and
all other structural components, in reasonably good repair so as to be
usable;
(3) Keep any shared or common areas reasonably clean, sanitary, and
safe from defects increasing the hazards of fire or accident;
(4) Provide a reasonable program for the control of infestation by
insects, rodents, and other pests at the initiation of the tenancy and,
except in the case of a single-family residence, control infestation
during tenancy except where such infestation is caused by the tenant;
(5) Except where the condition is attributable to normal wear and
tear, make repairs and arrangements necessary to put and keep the
premises in as good condition as it by law or rental agreement should
have been, at the commencement of the tenancy;
(6) Provide reasonably adequate locks and furnish keys to the
tenant;
(7) Maintain and safeguard with reasonable care any master key or
duplicate keys to the dwelling unit;
(8) Maintain all electrical, plumbing, heating, and other
facilities and appliances supplied by him or her in reasonably good
working order;
(((8))) (9) Maintain the dwelling unit in reasonably weathertight
condition;
(((9))) (10) Except in the case of a single-family residence,
provide and maintain appropriate receptacles in common areas for the
removal of ashes, rubbish, and garbage, incidental to the occupancy and
arrange for the reasonable and regular removal of such waste;
(((10))) (11) Provide facilities adequate to supply heat and water
and hot water as reasonably required by the tenant;
(((11))) (12)(a) Provide a written notice to all tenants disclosing
fire safety and protection information. The landlord or his or her
authorized agent must provide a written notice to the tenant that the
dwelling unit is equipped with a smoke detection device as required in
RCW 43.44.110. The notice shall inform the tenant of the tenant's
responsibility to maintain the smoke detection device in proper
operating condition and of penalties for failure to comply with the
provisions of RCW 43.44.110(3). The notice must be signed by the
landlord or the landlord's authorized agent and tenant with copies
provided to both parties. Further, except with respect to a single-family residence, the written notice must also disclose the following:
(i) Whether the smoke detection device is hard-wired or battery
operated;
(ii) Whether the building has a fire sprinkler system;
(iii) Whether the building has a fire alarm system;
(iv) Whether the building has a smoking policy, and what that
policy is;
(v) Whether the building has an emergency notification plan for the
occupants and, if so, provide a copy to the occupants;
(vi) Whether the building has an emergency relocation plan for the
occupants and, if so, provide a copy to the occupants; and
(vii) Whether the building has an emergency evacuation plan for the
occupants and, if so, provide a copy to the occupants.
(b) The information required under this subsection may be provided
to a tenant in a multifamily residential building either as a written
notice or as a checklist that discloses whether the building has fire
safety and protection devices and systems. The checklist shall include
a diagram showing the emergency evacuation routes for the occupants.
(c) The written notice or checklist must be provided to new tenants
at the time the lease or rental agreement is signed;
(((12))) (13) Provide tenants with information provided or approved
by the department of health about the health hazards associated with
exposure to indoor mold. Information may be provided in written format
individually to each tenant, or may be posted in a visible, public
location at the dwelling unit property. The information must detail
how tenants can control mold growth in their dwelling units to minimize
the health risks associated with indoor mold. Landlords may obtain the
information from the department's web site or, if requested by the
landlord, the department must mail the information to the landlord in
a printed format. When developing or changing the information, the
department of health must include representatives of landlords in the
development process. The information must be provided by the landlord
to new tenants at the time the lease or rental agreement is signed;
(((13))) (14) The landlord and his or her agents and employees are
immune from civil liability for failure to comply with subsection
(((12))) (13) of this section except where the landlord and his or her
agents and employees knowingly and intentionally do not comply with
subsection (((12))) (13) of this section; and
(((14))) (15) Designate to the tenant the name and address of the
person who is the landlord by a statement on the rental agreement or by
a notice conspicuously posted on the premises. The tenant shall be
notified immediately of any changes in writing, which must be either
(a) delivered personally to the tenant or (b) mailed to the tenant and
conspicuously posted on the premises. If the person designated in this
section does not reside in the state where the premises are located,
there shall also be designated a person who resides in the county who
is authorized to act as an agent for the purposes of service of notices
and process, and if no designation is made of a person to act as agent,
then the person to whom rental payments are to be made shall be
considered such agent. Regardless of such designation, any owner who
resides outside the state and who violates a provision of this chapter
is deemed to have submitted himself or herself to the jurisdiction of
the courts of this state and personal service of any process may be
made on the owner outside the state with the same force and effect as
personal service within the state. Any summons or process served out-of-state must contain the same information and be served in the same
manner as personal service of summons or process served within the
state, except the summons or process must require the party to appear
and answer within sixty days after such personal service out of the
state. In an action for a violation of this chapter that is filed
under chapter 12.40 RCW, service of the notice of claim outside the
state must contain the same information and be served in the same
manner as required under chapter 12.40 RCW, except the date on which
the party is required to appear must not be less than sixty days from
the date of service of the notice of claim.
No duty shall devolve upon the landlord to repair a defective
condition under this section, nor shall any defense or remedy be
available to the tenant under this chapter, where the defective
condition complained of was caused by the conduct of such tenant, his
or her family, invitee, or other person acting under his or her
control, or where a tenant unreasonably fails to allow the landlord
access to the property for purposes of repair. When the duty imposed
by subsection (1) of this section is incompatible with and greater than
the duty imposed by any other provisions of this section, the
landlord's duty shall be determined pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section.

--- END ---