BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state does
not prohibit or specifically regulate the testing or operation of
autonomous technology in motor vehicles on public roads. It is the
intent of the legislature to encourage the safe development, testing,
and operation of motor vehicles with autonomous technology on the
public roads of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Autonomous technology" means technology installed on a motor
vehicle that renders it capable to drive without the active control of
or monitoring by a human operator. "Autonomous technology" excludes
active safety systems or driver assistance systems including, without
limitation, a system to provide electronic blind spot assistance, crash
avoidance, emergency braking, parking assistance, adaptive cruise
control, lane keep assistance, lane departure warning, or traffic jam
and queuing assistance, unless any system alone or in combination with
other systems enables the vehicle on which the technology is installed
to drive without the active control of or monitoring by a human
operator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) For testing purposes, a person must
possess a valid driver's license to operate a vehicle controlled by
autonomous technology in autonomous mode, unless such testing occurs
entirely on a closed course.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, a person is deemed the operator
of a vehicle controlled by autonomous technology in autonomous mode
when the person causes the autonomous technology to engage, regardless
of whether the person is physically present in the vehicle while the
vehicle is operating in autonomous mode.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A vehicle controlled by autonomous
technology may be operated on roads in this state by employees,
contractors, or other persons designated by manufacturers of autonomous
technology for the purpose of testing the technology.
(2) For testing purposes, a human operator must be present in a
vehicle controlled by autonomous technology such that he or she has the
ability to monitor the vehicle's performance and intervene, if
necessary, unless the vehicle is being tested or demonstrated on a
closed course.
(3) Prior to the start of testing, the entity performing the
testing must submit to the department proof of insurance or surety bond
acceptable to the department in the amount of five million dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A vehicle controlled by autonomous
technology must continue to meet federal standards and regulations for
a motor vehicle. The vehicle must:
(a) Have a means to engage and disengage the autonomous technology
that is easily accessible to the operator;
(b) Have a means, inside the vehicle, to visually indicate when the
motor vehicle is operating in autonomous mode;
(c) Have a means to alert the operator of the vehicle if a
technology failure affecting the ability of the vehicle to safely
operate autonomously is detected while the vehicle is operating
autonomously in order to indicate to the operator to take control of
the vehicle; and
(d) Be capable of being operated in compliance with applicable
traffic and motor vehicle laws of this state.
(2) Federal regulations promulgated by the national highway safety
administration supersede this section if found to be in conflict with
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department shall review statutes and
rules regarding autonomous vehicles and report to the transportation
committees of the legislature and the governor on June 30, 2026, with
recommendations on how to update and improve the statutes and rules.
(2) The department, in consultation with the department of
transportation and the Washington state patrol, shall provide written
notice to the legislature when large scale production and retail sale
of vehicles controlled by autonomous technology appears imminent. This
notice must include recommendations for the operation of such vehicles
by the general public.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2027.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A person may not operate a vehicle
controlled by autonomous technology except as provided in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 and 3 through 7 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 46 RCW.

--- END ---