BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) In 2011, the legislature directed the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to create a
statewide strategic plan for career and technical education. Among the
goals of the plan, completed in December of 2012, are to:
(a) Improve access to and quality of career and technical
education, which prepares students for lifelong learning and
employment;
(b) Ensure that every student receives comprehensive career
guidance that leads to a personalized program of study that will guide
course selection and other high school activities;
(c) Require career and technical education teachers and school
administrators to be prepared and supported in their roles; and
(d) Assure that career and technical education is a results-driven
education system so as to demonstrate a positive return on investment.
(2) Using the strategic plan goals and recommendations as a
resource, the legislature intends to use multiple strategies to provide
additional support for career education, exploration, and planning.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.220 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In order for students to have the opportunity to develop the
basic education knowledge and skills under RCW 28A.150.210, school
districts must provide instruction of sufficient quantity and quality
and give students the opportunity to complete graduation requirements
that are intended to prepare them for postsecondary education, gainful
employment, and citizenship. The program established under this
section shall be the minimum instructional program of basic education
offered by school districts.
(2) Each school district shall make available to students the
following minimum instructional offering each school year:
(a) For students enrolled in grades one through twelve, at least a
district-wide annual average of one thousand hours, which shall be
increased to at least one thousand eighty instructional hours for
students enrolled in each of grades seven through twelve and at least
one thousand instructional hours for students in each of grades one
through six according to an implementation schedule adopted by the
legislature, but not before the 2014-15 school year; and
(b) For students enrolled in kindergarten, at least four hundred
fifty instructional hours, which shall be increased to at least one
thousand instructional hours according to the implementation schedule
under RCW 28A.150.315.
(3) The instructional program of basic education provided by each
school district shall include:
(a) Instruction in the essential academic learning requirements
under RCW 28A.655.070;
(b) Instruction that provides students the opportunity to complete
twenty-four credits for high school graduation, subject to a phased-in
implementation of the twenty-four credits as established by the
legislature. Course distribution requirements may be established by
the state board of education under RCW 28A.230.090;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages;
(d) Supplemental instruction and services for underachieving
students through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005
through 28A.165.065;
(e) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled
students whose primary language is other than English through the
transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010
through 28A.180.080;
(f) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense
as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with
disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020; ((and))
(g) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010
through 28A.185.030; and
(h) Opportunities for students to participate in career
exploration, work-based learning, job shadowing, internships,
development of their high school and beyond plan, student advisories,
or other similar activities intended to engage students in preparing
for their future, which must be provided when the increase in
instructional hours required under subsection (2)(a) of this section
takes effect, for at least twenty instructional hours per year for
students in grades seven through twelve.
(4) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require
individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours
per day or to take any particular courses.
(5) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic
educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five
years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one
years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred eighty
school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school
district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or
equivalent, in kindergarten, to be increased to a minimum of one
hundred eighty school days per school year according to the
implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315. However, effective May
1, 1979, a school district may schedule the last five school days of
the one hundred and eighty day school year for noninstructional
purposes in the case of students who are graduating from high school,
including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early
release from school upon the request of a student, and all such
students may be claimed as a full-time equivalent student to the extent
they could otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes a school district from
enriching the instructional program of basic education, such as
offering additional instruction or providing additional services,
programs, or activities that the school district determines to be
appropriate for the education of the school district's students.
(7) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental
program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) To take effect beginning with the graduating class of 2017, the
state board of education must:
(a) Redesignate the credit in occupational education required for
high school graduation as a credit in career and technical education,
with courses approved under RCW 28A.700.010; and
(b) Adopt rules that permit a student to elect to pursue a course
in an alternative subject area in lieu of one or both of the following
required credits, based on an individualized program of study
identified in the student's high school and beyond plan, because the
student and parent have determined that such a course will better serve
the student's education and career goals:
(i) The career and technical education credit; and
(ii) The fourth credit of English.
(2) If, after the effective date of this section, the state board
of education increases the number of course credits in science that are
required for high school graduation under RCW 28A.230.090, the board
must permit a student to elect to pursue a course in an alternative
subject area in lieu of a third credit in science, based on an
individualized program of study identified in the student's high school
and beyond plan, because the student and parent have determined that
such a course will better serve the student's education and career
goals.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2011 c 203 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except as
provided in RCW 28A.230.122 and except those equivalencies established
by local high schools or school districts under RCW 28A.230.097. The
purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that a student is ready
for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and
citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high
school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level. However, school districts must use
the standard template for the high school and beyond plan developed
under section 5 of this act or a locally developed template that the
school district has determined to have equivalent characteristics,
components, and activities as the standard template.
(2)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board
of education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements
for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and
technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to
a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized.
The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in
these programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of
academic achievement, complete the program and earn the program's
certificate or credential, and complete other state and local
graduation requirements.
(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high
school graduation requirements to the education committees of the
legislature for review and to the quality education council established
under RCW 28A.290.010. The legislature shall have the opportunity to
act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted
through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a
fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis
prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the
legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted
legislation.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop a standard template for the high school and beyond plan
required for high school graduation. The purpose of the template is to
facilitate use of the high school and beyond plan as a tool to help
students, beginning in the eighth grade, develop a program of study for
their high school education based on their interests and goals, update
the plan annually, and use the plan to guide their selection of
courses, culminating project, and other activities. The office must
also develop materials to support school districts in working with
students to develop programs of study.
(2) The standard template must describe the following components
and activities to be included in a high school and beyond plan:
(a) Identification of personal interests and achievable career
goals;
(b) A plan for course-taking, to be annually reviewed and updated;
(c) Research on postsecondary education and entry-level jobs
related to the student's career interests, including the multiple
pathways to education and careers in any given field, the costs of
postsecondary education, and the projected wages of various career
options;
(d) Development of a budget based on personal and career interests
and goals, including a budget for postsecondary education;
(e) Completion of a resume and, if applicable, an application for
postsecondary education; and
(f) Participation in an on-site or virtual visit to a postsecondary
institution or a workplace.
(3) Beginning in the 2014-15 school year and beginning with
students in the eighth grade, school districts must use the standard
template for the high school and beyond plan developed under this
section or a locally developed template that the district has
determined to have equivalent characteristics, components, and
activities as the standard template. The forms of documentation
required for the components and activities of a high school and beyond
plan shall be established by the local school district.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "program of study" means a
coordinated, nonduplicative progression of courses within a career
pathway that aligns academic and career and technical education in
secondary education with postsecondary education to prepare students
for an occupation or group of occupations within a career cluster.
Each program of study follows a pathway offering multiple career
opportunities based on differing levels of education. A program of
study offers academic content and career and technical content aligned
with appropriate learning standards, includes opportunities for
students to earn dual high school and college credit, provides
opportunities for work-integrated learning, prepares students to enter
postsecondary education and employment, and culminates in an industry-recognized credential, certificate, or degree whenever possible.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.600.045 and 2008 c 170 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2014-15 school year, each high school must
implement a career planning and exploration program for all students in
grades nine through twelve. The legislature encourages each middle
school((,)) and junior high school((, and high school)) also to
implement a ((comprehensive guidance and planning)) career planning and
exploration program for all students. The purpose of the program is to
support students as they navigate their education and plan their
future; encourage an ongoing and personal relationship between each
student and an adult in the school; and involve parents in students'
educational decisions and plans. It is also a purpose of the program
to help students and parents understand that there are multiple
pathways and multiple opportunities for students to chart their
education and their future.
(2) A ((comprehensive guidance and planning)) career planning and
exploration program is a program that contains at least the following
components:
(a) A curriculum intended to provide the skills and knowledge
students need to select courses, explore options, plan for their
future, and take steps to implement their plans. The curriculum may
include such topics as analysis of students' test results; diagnostic
assessments of students' academic strengths and weaknesses; use of
assessment results in developing students' short-term and long-term
plans; assessments of student interests and aptitude; goal-setting
skills; planning for high school course selection; independent living
skills; exploration of options and opportunities for career and
technical education at the secondary and postsecondary level;
exploration of career opportunities in emerging and high-demand
programs including apprenticeships; and postsecondary options and how
to access them. Districts are encouraged to use available online
curricula for this purpose;
(b) Opportunities for regular meetings between ((each)) students
and a teacher, counselor, or other instructional staff member who
serves as an advisor throughout the ((student's)) students' enrollment
at the school. Nothing in this section prescribes a particular
frequency, duration, or teacher-to-student ratio for such meetings;
(c) Student-led conferences with the student's parents, guardians,
or family members and the student's advisor for the purpose of
demonstrating the student's accomplishments; identifying weaknesses;
planning and selecting courses; and setting long-term goals; and
(d) Data collection that allows schools to monitor students'
progress.
(3) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall provide support for
((comprehensive guidance and planning)) career planning and exploration
programs in public schools, including providing ongoing development and
improvement of the curriculum described in subsection (2) of this
section.
(4) Beginning in the 2015-16 school year, each middle school,
junior high school, and high school must provide information to
students and parents or guardians regarding the online career guidance
and exploration tools identified under section 13 of this act. Schools
are encouraged to offer training and orientation to students and
parents or guardians about using the online tools to identify a program
of study and consider multiple pathways for education and careers.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.230.097 and 2008 c 170 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each high school or school district board of directors shall
adopt course equivalencies for career and technical high school courses
offered to students in high schools and skill centers. A career and
technical course equivalency may be for whole or partial credit. Each
school district board of directors shall develop a course equivalency
approval procedure. Beginning with the 2014-15 school year, a school
district board of directors must, at a minimum, grant academic course
equivalency for a career and technical high school course from the
mandatory course equivalency list adopted under RCW 28A.700.070, but is
not limited to the courses on the list.
(2) Career and technical courses determined to be equivalent to
academic core courses, in full or in part, by the high school or school
district shall be accepted as meeting core requirements, including
graduation requirements, if the courses are recorded on the student's
transcript using the equivalent academic high school department
designation and title. Full or partial credit shall be recorded as
appropriate. The high school or school district shall also issue and
keep record of course completion certificates that demonstrate that the
career and technical courses were successfully completed as needed for
industry certification, college credit, or preapprenticeship, as
applicable. The certificate shall be either part of the student's high
school and beyond plan or the student's culminating project, as
determined by the student. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop and make available electronic samples of
certificates of course completion.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.700.070 and 2008 c 170 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
support school district efforts under RCW 28A.230.097 to adopt course
equivalencies for career and technical courses by:
(a) Recommending career and technical curriculum suitable for
course equivalencies;
(b) Publicizing best practices for high schools and school
districts in developing and adopting course equivalencies; and
(c) In consultation with the Washington association for career and
technical education, providing professional development, technical
assistance, and guidance for school districts seeking to expand their
lists of equivalent courses.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide professional development, technical assistance, and guidance
for school districts to develop career and technical course
equivalencies that also qualify as advanced placement courses.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt rules establishing a list of mandatory course equivalencies for
career and technical education courses for which school district boards
of directors must, at a minimum, award academic credit beginning in the
2014-15 school year.
(4) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate grant funds to
school districts to increase the integration and rigor of academic
instruction in career and technical courses. Grant recipients are
encouraged to use grant funds to support teams of academic and
technical teachers using a research-based professional development
model supported by the national research center for career and
technical education. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction may require that grant recipients provide matching
resources using federal Carl Perkins funds or other fund sources.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.700.030 and 2008 c 170 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
All approved preparatory secondary career and technical education
programs must meet the following minimum criteria:
(1) Either:
(a) Lead to a certificate or credential that is state or nationally
recognized by trades, industries, or other professional associations as
necessary for employment or advancement in that field; or
(b) Allow students to earn dual credit for high school and college
through tech prep, advanced placement, or other agreements or programs;
(2) Be comprised of a sequenced progression of multiple courses
that are technically intensive and rigorous; ((and))
(3) Include at least one work-integrated learning opportunity,
which may be work-based learning, an internship, a job shadow, or other
worksite experience; and
(4) Lead to workforce entry, state or nationally approved
apprenticeships, or postsecondary education in a related field.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.700.040 and 2008 c 170 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
establish performance measures and targets and monitor the performance
of career and technical education programs in at least the following
areas:
(a) Student participation in and completion of high-demand programs
as identified under RCW 28A.700.020;
(b) Students earning dual credit for high school and college; and
(c) Performance measures and targets established by the workforce
training and education coordinating board, including but not limited to
student academic and technical skill attainment, graduation rates,
postgraduation employment or enrollment in postsecondary education, and
other measures and targets as required by the federal Carl Perkins act,
as amended.
(2) If a school district fails to meet the performance targets
established under this section, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction may require the district to submit an improvement
plan. If a district fails to implement an improvement plan or
continues to fail to meet the performance targets for three consecutive
years, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may use
this failure as the basis to deny the approval or reapproval of one or
more of the district's career and technical education programs.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
establish criteria and an award or designation to recognize exemplary
career and technical education programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The education data center must develop a standard report using
individual student data, to be prepared and disseminated annually, on
the postsecondary education and employment outcomes for students who
graduate from Washington public high schools. The report must examine
outcomes one year after high school graduation and five years after
high school graduation.
(2) In developing the report, the education data center must
consult with the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
the state board for community and technical colleges, the student
achievement council, the public and private four-year institutions of
higher education, the workforce training and education coordinating
board, and the employment security department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The professional educator standards board shall review
certification standards for secondary principals to assure that
fundamentals of career and technical education and career and technical
education leadership are adequately reflected in the standards.
(2) The professional educator standards board, in collaboration
with approved career and technical education certification programs,
shall revise the standards for career and technical education
certification on the basis of business and industry work experience.
The objective of the revisions is to significantly increase the extent
that program requirements are based on demonstrated competencies rather
than course completion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2014, the board, in collaboration with the other
state education and workforce agencies, shall identify a sample of
existing, interactive online tools that students and parents or
guardians may use to explore career opportunities, identify a program
of study as defined under section 5 of this act, and assist in career
guidance. The board shall publicize these online tools on the board's
web site. The board may modify or supplement the online tools to make
them more helpful for users or to provide additional information
specific to the Washington state education system and economy.
(2) The board must annually create a brief, summary list of
promising careers based on analysis of employment openings and future
growth, as well as wages. The list must include careers that require
various levels of postsecondary education and must illustrate the
multiple pathways students may take to pursue the careers. The purpose
of the list is to illustrate a sample of high quality, high-demand
careers available through multiple pathways and encourage students and
parents or guardians to engage in career exploration. The list must be
publicized along with the online tools identified under subsection (1)
of this section and may be linked to other, more comprehensive analyses
and information regarding high-demand careers and career projections.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2015, the board, in consultation with the
state education and workforce agencies, must offer trainings regarding
the online tools in subsection (1) of this section to career and
technical education instructors, school counselors, and other education
or workforce-related personnel.
(4) The state education and workforce agencies and all community
and technical colleges must publicize the online tools and promising
careers identified under subsections (1) and (2) of this section on
their respective web sites. Worksource centers and libraries as
defined in RCW 27.12.010 must include information about the online
tools in existing publications, including newsletters, posters,
brochures, or other print materials, and must provide directions and
options for public internet access to the online tools.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "state education and
workforce agencies" means the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the state board of education, the state board for
community and technical colleges, the student achievement council, the
workforce training and education coordinating board, and the employment
security department.

--- END ---