BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.26.010 and 2004 c 129 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) The ability to respond to emergency situations by many of
Washington state's fire protection jurisdictions has not kept up with
the state's needs, particularly in urban regions;
(2) Providing ((a)) fire protection ((service system)) services
requires a shared partnership and responsibility among ((the)) federal,
state, local, and regional governments and the private sector;
(3) There are efficiencies to be gained by regional fire protection
service delivery while retaining local control; and
(4) Timely development of significant projects can best be achieved
through enhanced funding options for regional fire protection service
agencies, using already existing taxing authority to address fire
protection emergency service needs and new authority to address
critical fire protection projects and emergency services.

Sec. 2 RCW 52.26.020 and 2011 c 141 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the governing body of a regional fire protection
service authority.
(2) "Elected official" means an elected official of a participating
fire protection jurisdiction or a regional fire protection district
commissioner created under RCW 52.26.080.
(3) "Fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire district, city,
town, port district, municipal airport, or Indian tribe.
(4) "Participating fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire
protection jurisdiction participating in the formation or operation of
a regional fire protection service authority.
(5) "Regional fire protection service authority" or "authority"
means a municipal corporation, an independent taxing authority within
the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a
taxing district within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the
state Constitution, whose boundaries are coextensive with two or more
adjacent fire protection jurisdictions, or one city, and that has been
created by a vote of the people under this chapter to implement a
regional fire protection service authority plan.
(6) "Regional fire protection service authority plan" or "plan"
means a plan to develop and finance a fire protection service authority
project or projects, including, but not limited to, specific capital
projects, fire operations and emergency service operations pursuant to
RCW 52.26.040(3)(b), and preservation and maintenance of existing or
future facilities.
(7) "Regional fire protection service authority planning committee"
or "planning committee" means the advisory committee created under RCW
52.26.030 to create and propose to fire protection jurisdictions a
regional fire protection service authority plan to design, finance, and
develop fire protection and emergency service projects.
(8) "Regular property taxes" has the same meaning as in RCW
84.04.140.

Sec. 3 RCW 52.26.030 and 2004 c 129 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Regional fire protection service authority planning committees are
advisory entities that are created, convened, and empowered as follows:
(1) Any two or more adjacent fire protection jurisdictions, or any
one city, may create a regional fire protection service authority and
convene a regional fire protection service authority planning
committee. No fire protection jurisdiction may participate in more
than one authority.
(2) Each governing body of the fire protection jurisdiction or
jurisdictions participating in planning under this chapter shall
appoint three elected officials to the authority planning committee.
Members of the planning committee may receive compensation of seventy
dollars per day, or portion thereof, not to exceed seven hundred
dollars per year, for attendance at planning committee meetings and for
performance of other services in behalf of the authority, and may be
reimbursed for travel and incidental expenses at the discretion of
their respective governing body.
(3) A regional fire protection service authority planning committee
may receive state funding, as appropriated by the legislature, ((or))
county funding provided by the affected counties, or city funding
provided by affected cities for start-up funding to pay for salaries,
expenses, overhead, supplies, and similar expenses ordinarily and
necessarily incurred. Upon creation of a regional fire protection
service authority, the authority shall within one year reimburse the
state ((or)), county, or city for any sums advanced for ((these))
start-up costs ((from the state or county)).
(4) The planning committee shall conduct its affairs and formulate
a regional fire protection service authority plan as provided under RCW
52.26.040.
(5) At its first meeting, a regional fire protection service
authority planning committee may elect officers and provide for the
adoption of rules and other operating procedures.
(6) The planning committee may dissolve itself at any time by a
majority vote of the total membership of the planning committee. Any
participating fire protection jurisdiction may withdraw upon thirty
calendar days' written notice to the other participating jurisdictions,
if any.

Sec. 4 RCW 52.26.040 and 2011 c 141 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A regional fire protection service authority planning committee
shall adopt a regional fire protection service authority plan providing
for the governance, design, financing, and development of fire
protection and emergency services. The planning committee may consider
the following factors in formulating its plan:
(a) Land use planning criteria; and
(b) The input of cities and counties located within, or partially
within, a participating fire protection jurisdiction.
(2) The planning committee may coordinate its activities with
neighboring cities, towns, and other local governments that engage in
fire protection planning.
(3) The planning committee shall:
(a) Create opportunities for public input in the development of the
plan;
(b)(i) Adopt a plan proposing the creation of a regional fire
protection service authority and recommending governance, design,
financing, and development of fire protection and emergency service
facilities and operations, including maintenance and preservation of
facilities or systems. The plan may authorize the authority to
establish a system of ambulance service to be operated by the authority
or operated by contract after a call for bids.
((However,)) (ii) The authority shall not provide for the
establishment of an ambulance service that would compete with any
existing private ambulance service, unless the authority determines
that the region served by the authority, or a substantial portion of
the region served by the authority, is not adequately served by an
existing private ambulance service. In determining the adequacy of an
existing private ambulance service, the authority shall take into
consideration objective generally accepted medical standards and
reasonable levels of service which must be published by the authority.
Following the preliminary conclusion by the authority that the existing
private ambulance service is inadequate, and before establishing an
ambulance service or issuing a call for bids, the authority shall allow
a minimum of sixty days for the private ambulance service to meet the
generally accepted medical standards and accepted levels of service.
In the event of a second preliminary conclusion of inadequacy within a
twenty-four-month period, the authority may immediately issue a call
for bids or establish its own ambulance service and is not required to
afford the private ambulance service another sixty-day period to meet
the generally accepted medical standards and reasonable levels of
service. A private ambulance service that is not licensed by the
department of health or whose license is denied, suspended, or revoked
is not entitled to a sixty-day period within which to demonstrate
adequacy and the authority may immediately issue a call for bids or
establish an ambulance service; and
(c) In the plan, recommend sources of revenue authorized by RCW
52.26.050, identify the portions of the plan that may be amended by the
board of the authority without voter approval, consistent with RCW
52.26.050, and recommend a financing plan to fund selected fire
protection and emergency services and projects.
(4) Once adopted, the plan must be forwarded to the governing body
or bodies of participating fire protection ((jurisdictions' governing
bodies)) jurisdictions to initiate the election process under RCW
52.26.060.
(5) If the ballot measure is not approved, the planning committee
may redefine the selected regional fire protection service authority
projects, financing plan, and the ballot measure. The governing body
or bodies of participating fire protection ((jurisdictions' governing
bodies)) jurisdictions may approve the new plan and ballot measure, and
may then submit the revised proposition to the voters at a subsequent
election or a special election. If a ballot measure is not approved by
the voters by the third vote, the planning committee is dissolved.

Sec. 5 RCW 52.26.060 and 2006 c 200 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The governing bodies of two or more adjacent fire protection
jurisdictions or any one city may, upon receipt of the regional fire
protection service authority plan under RCW 52.26.040, ((may)) certify
the plan to the ballot, including identification of the revenue options
specified to fund the plan. The governing body or bodies of the fire
protection jurisdiction or jurisdictions may draft a ballot title, give
notice as required by law for ballot measures, and perform other duties
as required to put the plan before the voters of the proposed authority
for their approval or rejection as a single ballot measure that both
approves formation of the authority and approves the plan. Authorities
may negotiate interlocal agreements necessary to implement the plan.
The electorate is the voters voting within the boundaries of the
proposed regional fire protection service authority. A simple majority
of the total persons voting on the single ballot measure to approve the
plan and establish the authority is required for approval. However, if
the plan authorizes the authority to impose benefit charges or sixty
percent voter approved taxes, then the percentage of total persons
voting on the single ballot measure to approve the plan and establish
the authority is the same as in RCW 52.26.050. The authority must act
in accordance with the general election laws of the state. The
authority is liable for its proportionate share of the costs when the
elections are held under RCW 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330.

--- END ---