BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature maintains its commitment
to ensure that all students have an equitable opportunity to complete
a meaningful high school diploma and graduate from high school ready
for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and
citizenship, and equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.
(2) The legislature believes that students should be encouraged and
have sufficient flexibility to explore their options and take courses
in high school based on their individual interests and plans. The
legislature also recognizes the importance and responsibility of school
boards to tailor graduation requirements to local needs and goals.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to focus required courses
for high school graduation on the core, foundational knowledge and
skills that undergird career and college readiness, and leave
additional decisions about course selection to students, parents, and
local communities.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2011 c 203 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students as provided in
this section, except as provided in RCW 28A.230.122 and except those
equivalencies established by local high schools or school districts
under RCW 28A.230.097. The purpose of a high school diploma is to
declare that a student is ready for success in postsecondary education,
gainful employment, and citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to
be a lifelong learner. Beginning with the graduating class of 2017,
the credit and course distribution requirements established by the
state board for high school graduation may not exceed the requirements
under this section.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high
school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2)(a) ((In recognition of the statutory authority of the state
board of education to establish and enforce minimum high school
graduation requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate
the graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements
for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and
technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to
a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized.
The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in
these programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of
academic achievement, complete the program and earn the program's
certificate or credential, and complete other state and local
graduation requirements.
(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high
school graduation requirements to the education committees of the
legislature for review and to the quality education council established
under RCW 28A.290.010. The legislature shall have the opportunity to
act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted
through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a
fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis
prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the
legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted
legislation)) The state board shall establish the following credit and
course distribution requirements beginning with the graduating class of
2017:
(i) Four English credits;
(ii) Three mathematics credits, where the content of the third
credit is chosen by the student based on the student's interests and
high school and beyond plan;
(iii) Three social studies credits;
(iv) Two science credits;
(v) Two credits in health and fitness;
(vi) One credit in the arts;
(vii) One credit in occupational education; and
(viii) Six credits in a career concentration, which is a series of
related courses within a career pathway that lead to a specific post
high school career or educational outcome chosen by the student based
on the student's interests and high school and beyond plan, that may
include career and technical education, and are intended to provide a
focus for the student's learning.
(b) Particularly for students whose high school and beyond plan
indicates an intent to enroll directly in a four-year institution of
higher education after graduation, the state board may encourage but
not require selection of the following courses as the student's career
concentration:
(i) One additional science credit;
(ii) One additional credit in the arts;
(iii) Two credits in world languages; and
(iv) Two elective credits.
(c) The state board shall adopt rules consistent with this section
and other applicable state laws defining the minimum content of the
required credits and their alignment with the essential academic
learning requirements.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established ((by the state board of education)) under this
section or by a local school district, or both, for purposes of high
school graduation, students who receive instruction in American sign
language or one or more American Indian languages shall be considered
to have satisfied the state or local school district graduation
requirement for instruction in one or more languages other than
English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.220 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In order for students to have the opportunity to develop the
basic education knowledge and skills under RCW 28A.150.210, school
districts must provide instruction of sufficient quantity and quality
and give all students ((the)) an equitable opportunity to complete
graduation requirements that are intended to prepare them for
postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship. The
program established under this section shall be the minimum
instructional program of basic education offered by school districts.
(2) Each school district shall make available to students the
following minimum instructional offering each school year:
(a) For students enrolled in grades one through twelve, at least a
district-wide annual average of one thousand hours, which shall be
increased to at least one thousand eighty instructional hours for
students enrolled in each of grades seven through twelve and at least
one thousand instructional hours for students in each of grades one
through six according to an implementation schedule adopted by the
legislature, but not before the 2014-15 school year; and
(b) For students enrolled in kindergarten, at least four hundred
fifty instructional hours, which shall be increased to at least one
thousand instructional hours according to the implementation schedule
under RCW 28A.150.315.
(3) The instructional program of basic education provided by each
school district shall include:
(a) Instruction in the essential academic learning requirements
under RCW 28A.655.070;
(b) Instruction that provides all students ((the)) an equitable
opportunity to complete ((twenty-four credits for)) the high school
graduation((, subject to a phased-in implementation of the twenty-four
credits as established by the legislature. Course distribution
requirements may be established by the state board of education))
requirements under RCW 28A.230.090;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages;
(d) Supplemental instruction and services for underachieving
students through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005
through 28A.165.065;
(e) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled
students whose primary language is other than English through the
transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010
through 28A.180.080;
(f) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense
as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with
disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020; and
(g) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010
through 28A.185.030.
(4) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require
individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours
per day or to take any particular courses.
(5) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic
educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five
years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one
years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred eighty
school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school
district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or
equivalent, in kindergarten, to be increased to a minimum of one
hundred eighty school days per school year according to the
implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315. However, effective May
1, 1979, a school district may schedule the last five school days of
the one hundred and eighty day school year for noninstructional
purposes in the case of students who are graduating from high school,
including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early
release from school upon the request of a student, and all such
students may be claimed as a full-time equivalent student to the extent
they could otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes a school district from
enriching the instructional program of basic education, such as
offering additional instruction or providing additional services,
programs, or activities that the school district determines to be
appropriate for the education of the school district's students.
(7) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental
program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

--- END ---