BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall convene a work group to study and
recommend language for standardized clinical affiliation agreements for
clinical placements associated with the education and training of
physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, osteopathic physicians and
surgeons licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, and nurses licensed under
chapter 18.79 RCW.
(2) When choosing members of the work group, the department shall
consult with the health care personnel shortage task force and shall
attempt to ensure that the membership of the work group is
geographically diverse. The work group must, at a minimum, include
representatives of the following:
(a) Two-year institutions of higher education;
(b) Four-year institutions of higher education;
(c) The University of Washington medical school;
(d) The college of osteopathic medicine at the Pacific Northwest
University of Health Sciences;
(e) The health care personnel shortage task force;
(f) Statewide organizations representing hospitals and other
facilities that accept clinical placements;
(g) A statewide organization representing physicians;
(h) A statewide organization representing osteopathic physicians
and surgeons;
(i) A statewide organization representing nurses;
(j) A labor organization representing nurses; and
(k) Any other groups deemed appropriate by the department in
consultation with the health care personnel shortage task force.
(3) The work group shall develop one recommended standardized
clinical affiliation agreement for each profession or one recommended
standardized clinical affiliation agreement for all three professions.
The work group shall report its findings to the governor and the
appropriate standing committees of the legislature no later than
November 15, 2014.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2015.

--- END ---