BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.96.060 and 2012 c 183 s 5 and 2012 c 142 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person convicted of a misdemeanor marijuana offense under
RCW 69.50.4014 may apply to the sentencing court for a vacation of the
applicant's record of conviction for the offense. If the applicant
establishes that he or she was aged twenty-one or over at the time of
the offense and that the amount of marijuana in possession which formed
the basis of the offense was less than one ounce, the court shall
vacate the record of conviction by: (a)(i) Permitting the applicant to
withdraw the applicant's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not
guilty; or (ii) if the applicant has been convicted after a plea of not
guilty, the court setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (b) the
court dismissing the information, indictment, complaint, or citation
against the applicant and vacating the judgment and sentence.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, every
person convicted of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense who has
completed all of the terms of the sentence for the misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor offense may apply to the sentencing court for a vacation of
the applicant's record of conviction for the offense. If the court
finds the applicant meets the tests prescribed in subsection (((2)))
(3) of this section, the court may in its discretion vacate the record
of conviction by: (a)(i) Permitting the applicant to withdraw the
applicant's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty; or (ii)
if the applicant has been convicted after a plea of not guilty, the
court setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (b) the court dismissing
the information, indictment, complaint, or citation against the
applicant and vacating the judgment and sentence.
(((2))) (3) Pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, an
applicant may not have the record of conviction for a misdemeanor or
gross misdemeanor offense vacated if any one of the following is
present:
(a) There are any criminal charges against the applicant pending in
any court of this state or another state, or in any federal court;
(b) The offense was a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030
or an attempt to commit a violent offense;
(c) The offense was a violation of RCW 46.61.502 (driving while
under the influence), 46.61.504 (actual physical control while under
the influence), 9.91.020 (operating a railroad, etc. while
intoxicated), or the offense is considered a "prior offense" under RCW
46.61.5055 and the applicant has had a subsequent alcohol or drug
violation within ten years of the date of arrest for the prior offense;
(d) The offense was any misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor violation,
including attempt, of chapter 9.68 RCW (obscenity and pornography),
chapter 9.68A RCW (sexual exploitation of children), or chapter 9A.44
RCW (sex offenses);
(e) The applicant was convicted of a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor offense as defined in RCW 10.99.020, or the court
determines after a review of the court file that the offense was
committed by one family member or household member against another, or
the court, after considering the damage to person or property that
resulted in the conviction, any prior convictions for crimes defined in
RCW 10.99.020, or for comparable offenses in another state or in
federal court, and the totality of the records under review by the
court regarding the conviction being considered for vacation,
determines that the offense involved domestic violence, and any one of
the following factors exist:
(i) The applicant has not provided written notification of the
vacation petition to the prosecuting attorney's office that prosecuted
the offense for which vacation is sought, or has not provided that
notification to the court;
(ii) The applicant has previously had a conviction for domestic
violence. For purposes of this subsection, however, if the current
application is for more than one conviction that arose out of a single
incident, none of those convictions counts as a previous conviction;
(iii) The applicant has signed an affidavit under penalty of
perjury affirming that the applicant has not previously had a
conviction for a domestic violence offense, and a criminal history
check reveals that the applicant has had such a conviction; or
(iv) Less than five years have elapsed since the person completed
the terms of the original conditions of the sentence, including any
financial obligations and successful completion of any treatment
ordered as a condition of sentencing;
(f) For any offense other than those described in (e) of this
subsection, less than three years have passed since the person
completed the terms of the sentence, including any financial
obligations;
(g) The offender has been convicted of a new crime in this state,
another state, or federal court since the date of conviction;
(h) The applicant has ever had the record of another conviction
vacated; or
(i) The applicant is currently restrained, or has been restrained
within five years prior to the vacation application, by a domestic
violence protection order, a no-contact order, an antiharassment order,
or a civil restraining order which restrains one party from contacting
the other party.
(((3))) (4) Every person convicted of prostitution under RCW
9A.88.030 who committed the offense as a result of being a victim of
trafficking, RCW 9A.40.100, promoting prostitution in the first degree,
RCW 9A.88.070, or trafficking in persons under the trafficking victims
protection act of 2000, 22 U.S.C. Sec. 7101 et seq. may apply to the
sentencing court for vacation of the applicant's record of conviction
for the prostitution offense. An applicant may not have the record of
conviction for prostitution vacated if any one of the following is
present:
(a) There are any criminal charges against the applicant pending in
any court of this state or another state, or in any federal court;
(b) The offender has been convicted of another crime in this state,
another state, or federal court since the date of conviction; or
(c) The applicant has ever had the record of another prostitution
conviction vacated.
(((4))) (5) Once the court vacates a record of conviction under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the person shall be released
from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense and the
fact that the person has been convicted of the offense shall not be
included in the person's criminal history for purposes of determining
a sentence in any subsequent conviction. For all purposes, including
responding to questions on employment or housing applications, a person
whose conviction has been vacated under subsections (1) and (2) of this
section may state that he or she has never been convicted of that
crime. Nothing in this section affects or prevents the use of an
offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution.
(((5))) (6) All costs incurred by the court and probation services
shall be paid by the person making the motion to vacate the record
unless a determination is made pursuant to chapter 10.101 RCW that the
person making the motion is indigent, at the time the motion is
brought.
(((6))) (7) The clerk of the court in which the vacation order is
entered shall immediately transmit the order vacating the conviction to
the Washington state patrol identification section and to the local
police agency, if any, which holds criminal history information for the
person who is the subject of the conviction. The Washington state
patrol and any such local police agency shall immediately update their
records to reflect the vacation of the conviction, and shall transmit
the order vacating the conviction to the federal bureau of
investigation. A conviction that has been vacated under this section
may not be disseminated or disclosed by the state patrol or local law
enforcement agency to any person, except other criminal justice
enforcement agencies.

--- END ---