BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.51A.010 and 2010 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cannabis" means all parts of the plant Cannabis having a THC
concentration greater than three-tenths of one percent, whether growing
or not; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the
plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or
preparation of the plant, its seeds, or resin. For the purposes of
this chapter, "cannabis" does not include the mature stalks of the
plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds
of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,
mixture, or preparation of the mature stalks, except the resin
extracted therefrom, fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the
plant which is incapable of germination. "Cannabis" includes cannabis
products and useable cannabis.
(2) "Cannabis products" means products that contain cannabis or
cannabis extracts, have a measurable THC concentration greater than
three-tenths of one percent, and are intended for human consumption or
application, including, but not limited to, edible products, tinctures,
and lotions. "Cannabis products" does not include useable cannabis.
(3) "Designated provider" means a person who:
(a) Is eighteen years of age or older;
(b) Has been designated in writing by a patient to serve as a
designated provider under this chapter;
(c) Is prohibited from consuming ((marijuana)) cannabis obtained
for the personal, medical use of the patient for whom the individual is
acting as designated provider; and
(d) Is the designated provider to only one patient at any one time.
(((2))) (4) "Dispense" means the selection, measuring, packaging,
labeling, delivery, or sale of cannabis by a licensed access point,
licensed processor, licensed producer, or collective garden, to a
qualifying patient, designated provider, licensed access point,
licensed processor, or licensed producer.
(5) "Health care professional," for purposes of this chapter only,
means a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, a physician
assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, an osteopathic physician
licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, an osteopathic physicians' assistant
licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter
18.36A RCW, or an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under
chapter 18.79 RCW.
(((3))) (6) "Labeling" means all labels or other written, printed,
or graphic matter:
(a) Upon any cannabis intended for medical use; or
(b) Accompanying such cannabis.
(7) "Licensed access point" means a person or entity with a
Washington state business license that retails cannabis for medical use
to qualifying patients and designated providers.
(8) "Licensed processor" means a person or entity with a Washington
state business license, that processes, handles, or labels cannabis
products for wholesale to licensed access points and retails cannabis
for medical use to qualifying patients and designated providers.
(9) "Licensed producer" means a person or entity with a Washington
state business license that manufactures, produces, processes, handles,
or labels cannabis for wholesale to licensed access points and licensed
processors and retails cannabis for medical use to qualifying patients
and designated providers.
(10) "Medical use of ((marijuana)) cannabis" means the manufacture,
production, possession, transportation, delivery, ingestion,
application, or administration of ((marijuana, as defined in RCW
69.50.101(q),)) cannabis for the exclusive benefit of a qualifying
patient in the treatment of his or her terminal or debilitating
((illness)) medical condition.
(((4))) (11) "Plant" means an organism having at least three
distinguishable and distinct leaves, each leaf being at least three
centimeters in diameter, and a readily observable root formation
consisting of at least two separate and distinct roots, each being at
least two centimeters in length. Multiple stalks emanating from the
same root ball or root system is considered part of the same single
plant.
(12) "Process" means to label, handle, or process cannabis in
preparation for medical use.
(13) "Produce" means to plant, grow, harvest, process, store,
handle, package, or label cannabis for medical use.
(14) "Qualifying patient" means a person who:
(a) Is a patient of a health care professional;
(b) Has been diagnosed by that health care professional as having
a terminal or debilitating medical condition;
(c) Is a resident of the state of Washington at the time of such
diagnosis;
(d) Has been advised by that health care professional about the
risks and benefits of the medical use of ((marijuana)) cannabis; and
(e) Has been advised by that health care professional that they may
benefit from the medical use of ((marijuana)) cannabis.
(((5))) (15) "Tamper-resistant paper" means paper that meets one or
more of the following industry-recognized features:
(a) One or more features designed to prevent copying of the paper;
(b) One or more features designed to prevent the erasure or
modification of information on the paper; or
(c) One or more features designed to prevent the use of counterfeit
valid documentation.
(((6))) (16) "Terminal or debilitating medical condition" means:
(a) Cancer, human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), multiple sclerosis,
epilepsy or other seizure disorder, or spasticity disorders; or
(b) Intractable pain, limited for the purpose of this chapter to
mean pain unrelieved by standard medical treatments and medications; or
(c) Glaucoma, either acute or chronic, limited for the purpose of
this chapter to mean increased intraocular pressure unrelieved by
standard treatments and medications; or
(d) Crohn's disease with debilitating symptoms unrelieved by
standard treatments or medications; or
(e) Hepatitis C with debilitating nausea or intractable pain
unrelieved by standard treatments or medications; or
(f) Diseases, including anorexia, which result in nausea, vomiting,
wasting, appetite loss, cramping, seizures, muscle spasms, or
spasticity, when these symptoms are unrelieved by standard treatments
or medications; or
(g) Any other medical condition duly approved by the Washington
state medical quality assurance commission in consultation with the
board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as directed in this chapter.
(((7))) (17) "THC concentration" means percent of
tetrahydrocannabinol content per weight or volume of useable cannabis
or cannabis product.
(18) "Useable cannabis" means dried flowers of the Cannabis plant
having a THC concentration greater than three-tenths of one percent.
Useable cannabis excludes stems, stalks, leaves, seeds, and roots. For
purposes of this subsection, "dried" means containing less than fifteen
percent moisture content by weight. "Useable cannabis" does not
include cannabis products. "Useable cannabis," as a measurement of THC
concentration, only applies to the provisions of this chapter and is
not considered applicable to any other criminal laws related to
cannabis.
(19) "Valid documentation" means:
(a) A statement signed and dated by a qualifying patient's health
care professional written on tamper-resistant paper, which states that,
in the health care professional's professional opinion, the patient may
benefit from the medical use of ((marijuana)) cannabis; and
(b) Proof of identity such as a Washington state driver's license
or identicard, as defined in RCW 46.20.035.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.51A.040 and 2011 c 181 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
The medical use of cannabis in accordance with the terms and
conditions of this chapter does not constitute a crime and a qualifying
patient ((or)), designated provider, licensed access point, licensed
producer, or licensed processor in compliance with the terms and
conditions of this chapter may not be arrested, prosecuted, or subject
to other criminal sanctions or civil consequences, for possession,
manufacture, or delivery of, or for possession with intent to
manufacture or deliver, cannabis under state law, or have real or
personal property seized or forfeited for possession, manufacture, or
delivery of, or for possession with intent to manufacture or deliver,
cannabis under state law, and investigating peace officers and law
enforcement agencies may not be held civilly liable for failure to
seize cannabis in this circumstance, if:
(1)(a) The qualifying patient or designated provider possesses no
more than fifteen cannabis plants and:
(i) No more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis;
(ii) No more cannabis product than what could reasonably be
produced with no more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis; or
(iii) A combination of useable cannabis and cannabis product that
does not exceed a combined total representing possession and processing
of no more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis.
(b) If a person is both a qualifying patient and a designated
provider for another qualifying patient, the person may possess no more
than twice the amounts described in (a) of this subsection, whether the
plants, useable cannabis, and cannabis product are possessed
individually or in combination between the qualifying patient and his
or her designated provider;
(2) The qualifying patient or designated provider presents his or
her ((proof of registration with the department of health,)) valid
documentation to any peace officer who questions the patient or
provider regarding his or her medical use of cannabis;
(3) The qualifying patient or designated provider keeps a copy of
his or her ((proof of registration with the registry established in
section 901 of this act)) valid documentation and the qualifying
patient or designated provider's contact information ((posted
prominently next to)) available at all times on the premises where any
cannabis plants, cannabis products, or useable cannabis is located ((at
his or her residence));
(4) The investigating peace officer does not possess evidence that:
(a) The designated provider has converted cannabis produced or
obtained for the qualifying patient for his or her own personal use or
benefit; or
(b) The qualifying patient has converted cannabis produced or
obtained for his or her own medical use to the qualifying patient's
personal, nonmedical use or benefit;
(5) The investigating peace officer does not possess evidence that
the designated provider has served as a designated provider to more
than one qualifying patient within a fifteen-day period; and
(6) The ((investigating peace officer has not observed evidence of
any of the circumstances identified in section 901(4) of this act))
licensed access point, licensed producer, or licensed processor must:
(a) Verify that the qualifying patient or their designated provider
has valid documentation; and
(b) Keep records of all transactions.

--- END ---