BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Nursing is governed by specific laws and regulations and
requires a unique license to practice. Clinical supervision of a nurse
is based on knowledge of the laws, regulations, and rules governing
nursing practice, nursing practice standards, and nursing performance
standards;
(b) Student health needs have changed dramatically over the last
twenty years. The number of students with special health care needs
has risen exponentially;
(c) School nurses are held accountable through chapter 18.79 RCW
and the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, for errors in
nursing judgment and actions;
(d) Individuals who are not nurses are unqualified to make nursing
judgments and assessments;
(e) The independent nature of nursing has been recognized in both
statute and rule. For example, under RCW 18.79.040, "registered
nursing practice" includes the "administration, supervision,
delegation, and evaluation of nursing practice." Furthermore,
continuing competency rules recently adopted by the nursing care
quality assurance commission recognize and acknowledge the independent
nature of nursing; and
(f) The ability of a nurse to practice nursing without the
supervision of a nonnurse supervisor is particularly important given
the primacy of the nurse-patient relationship.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to reaffirm the
authority of a licensed nurse working in a school setting to practice
nursing without the supervision of a person who is not a licensed
nurse.
(3) It is not the intent of the legislature to:
(a) Prohibit a nonnurse from supervising a licensed nurse working
in a school setting with respect to matters other than the practice of
nursing, such as matters of administration, terms and conditions of
employment, and employee performance; or
(b) Require a school to provide clinical supervision for a licensed
nurse working in a school setting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Only a registered nurse or an advanced registered nurse
practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW may supervise, direct, or
evaluate a licensed nurse working in a school setting with respect to
the practice of nursing as defined in this section.
(2) Nothing in this section:
(a) Prohibits a nonnurse supervisor from supervising, directing, or
evaluating a licensed nurse working in a school setting with respect to
matters other than the practice of nursing;
(b) Requires a registered nurse or an advanced registered nurse
practitioner to be clinically supervised in a school setting; or
(c) Prohibits a nonnurse supervisor from conferring with a licensed
nurse working in a school setting with respect to the practice of
nursing.
(3) Within existing funds, the superintendent of public instruction
shall notify each school district in this state of the requirements of
this section.
(4) For purposes of this section, "practice of nursing" means:
(a) Registered nursing practice as defined in RCW 18.79.040,
advanced registered nursing practice as defined in RCW 18.79.050, and
licensed practical nursing practice as defined in RCW 18.79.060,
including, but not limited to:
(i) The administration of medication pursuant to a medication or
treatment order; and
(ii) The decision to summon emergency medical assistance; and
(b) Compliance with any state or federal statute or administrative
rule specifically regulating licensed nurses, including any statute or
rule defining or establishing standards of patient care or professional
conduct or practice.

--- END ---