BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.011 and 2013 c 2 s 306 (Initiative Measure No.
1240) are each amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(2) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established
under RCW 41.05.055.
(3) "Dependent care assistance program" means a benefit plan
whereby state and public employees may pay for certain employment
related dependent care with pretax dollars as provided in the salary
reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 129 or
other sections of the internal revenue code.
(4) "Director" means the director of the authority.
(5) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means
law enforcement officers and firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
members of the Washington state patrol retirement fund as defined in
RCW 43.43.120, and reserve officers and firefighters as defined in RCW
41.24.010 who die as a result of injuries sustained in the course of
employment as determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department
of labor and industries.
(6) "Employee" includes all employees of the state, whether or not
covered by civil service; elected and appointed officials of the
executive branch of government, including full-time members of boards,
commissions, or committees; justices of the supreme court and judges of
the court of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state
legislature. Pursuant to contractual agreement with the authority,
"employee" may also include: (a) Employees of a county, municipality,
or other political subdivision of the state and members of the
legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to
office after February 20, 1970, if the legislative authority of the
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state seeks
and receives the approval of the authority to provide any of its
insurance programs by contract with the authority, as provided in RCW
41.04.205 and 41.05.021(1)(g); (b) employees of employee organizations
representing state civil service employees, at the option of each such
employee organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees of
employee organizations currently pooled with employees of school
districts for the purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at the
option of each such employee organization; (c) employees of a school
district if the authority agrees to provide any of the school
districts' insurance programs by contract with the authority as
provided in RCW 28A.400.350; (d) employees of a tribal government, if
the governing body of the tribal government seeks and receives the
approval of the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by
contract with the authority, as provided in RCW 41.05.021(1) (f) and
(g); (e) employees of the Washington health benefit exchange if the
governing board of the exchange established in RCW 43.71.020 seeks and
receives approval of the authority to provide any of its insurance
programs by contract with the authority, as provided in RCW
41.05.021(1) (g) and (n); and (f) employees of a charter school
established under chapter 28A.710 RCW. "Employee" does not include:
Adult family homeowners; unpaid volunteers; patients of state
hospitals; inmates; employees of the Washington state convention and
trade center as provided in RCW 41.05.110; students of institutions of
higher education as determined by their institution; and any others not
expressly defined as employees under this chapter or by the authority
under this chapter.
(7) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(8) "Employing agency" means a division, department, or separate
agency of state government, including an institution of higher
education; a county, municipality, school district, educational service
district, or other political subdivision; charter school; and a tribal
government covered by this chapter.
(9) "Faculty" means an academic employee of an institution of
higher education whose workload is not defined by work hours but whose
appointment, workload, and duties directly serve the institution's
academic mission, as determined under the authority of its enabling
statutes, its governing body, and any applicable collective bargaining
agreement.
(10) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows
employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the
amount of employee contributions from among a range of choices offered
by the authority.
(11) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01
RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW,
or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.
(12) "Medical flexible spending arrangement" means a benefit plan
whereby state and public employees may reduce their salary before taxes
to pay for medical expenses not reimbursed by insurance as provided in
the salary reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec.
125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.
(13) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility
and enrollment requirements under the salary reduction plan.
(14) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.
(15) "Premium payment plan" means a benefit plan whereby state and
public employees may pay their share of group health plan premiums with
pretax dollars as provided in the salary reduction plan under this
chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the
internal revenue code.
(16) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:
(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or
educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;
(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district,
educational service district, or charter school on or after October 1,
1993, and immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;
(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district,
educational service district, or charter school due to a total and
permanent disability, and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement
allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.
(17) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.
(18) "Salary reduction plan" means a benefit plan whereby state and
public employees may agree to a reduction of salary on a pretax basis
to participate in the dependent care assistance program, medical
flexible spending arrangement, or premium payment plan offered pursuant
to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.
(19) "Seasonal employee" means an employee hired to work during a
recurring, annual season with a duration of three months or more, and
anticipated to return each season to perform similar work.
(20) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in:
(a)(i) RCW 41.32.010(17) on or after July 1, 1996; ((or
(b))) (ii) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; ((or
(c))) (iii) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;
and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.32.010(33), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan
3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010; or
(b) For the purposes of RCW 41.05.080:
(i) RCW 41.32.010 on or after the effective date of this section;
(ii) RCW 41.35.010 on or after the effective date of this section;
or
(iii) RCW 41.40.010 on or after the effective date of this section;
and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least twenty years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 2 as defined in RCW
41.32.010, the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2 as
defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement system
plan 2 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.
(21) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical
and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state
health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the
department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and
local school districts.
(22) "Tribal government" means an Indian tribal government as
defined in section 3(32) of the employee retirement income security act
of 1974, as amended, or an agency or instrumentality of the tribal
government, that has government offices principally located in this
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---