BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a decision is being considered to change an existing
degree program that is supported by state funding to a program that is
self-supporting and fee-based, the state universities, regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall:
(a) Publicly notify prospective students, including notification
in admission offers with an estimate of tuition and fees;
(b) Notify enrolled students and undergraduate or graduate student
government associations at least six months before implementation with
an estimate of tuition and fees; and
(c) Allow students currently enrolled in the program to continue in
the state-supported program structure for a consecutive amount of time
no greater than four years in length;
(2)(a) The state universities, regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College shall each establish or designate a committee
comprised of administrators, faculty, and students to create criteria
upon which to evaluate, prior to a shift being made, the proposed shift
of a degree program from a state-supported degree program to a self-supporting funding basis. Where possible, an existing budget or
advisory committee shall be designated instead of establishing a new
committee. When establishing evaluation criteria, the committee shall
consider including the following:
(i) The financial health and sustainability of the program;
(ii) If moving the program to a self-supporting funding basis
alters the availability of student financial aid;
(iii) The audience for the program, the format of the program, and
the institutional priority for state funding of the program;
(iv) Demographics of students served and graduates practicing in
typical fields of study; and
(v) Alternatives to shifting to a self-supporting funding basis
including raising tuition within the state-funded context or program
elimination;
(b) The committee that creates the criteria for moving a degree
from a state-supported degree program to a self-supporting funding
basis may also establish a process to periodically evaluate programs
that have shifted from a state-supported program to a fee-based funding
model for alignment with criteria established.

--- END ---