BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.010 and 2011 c 295 s 3 and 2011 c 78 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, or facility that provides child care and early learning
services outside a child's own home and includes the following
irrespective of whether there is compensation to the agency:
(a) "Child day care center" means an agency that regularly provides
child day care and early learning services for a group of children for
periods of less than twenty-four hours;
(b) "Early learning" includes but is not limited to programs and
services for child care; state, federal, private, and nonprofit
preschool; child care subsidies; child care resource and referral;
parental education and support; and training and professional
development for early learning professionals;
(c) "Family day care provider" means a child day care provider who
regularly provides child day care and early learning services for not
more than twelve children in the provider's home in the family living
quarters;
(d) "Nongovernmental private-public partnership" means an entity
registered as a nonprofit corporation in Washington state with a
primary focus on early learning, school readiness, and parental
support, and an ability to raise a minimum of five million dollars in
contributions;
(e) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a community
facility.
(2) "Agency" does not include the following:
(a) Persons related to the child in the following ways:
(i) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and
including first cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding
generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great;
(ii) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;
(iii) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as
well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons,
and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state
law; or
(iv) Spouses of any persons named in (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection (((2)(a))), even after the marriage is terminated;
(b) Persons who are legal guardians of the child;
(c) Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or
children, with or without compensation, where the person providing care
for periods of less than twenty-four hours does not conduct such
activity on an ongoing, regularly scheduled basis for the purpose of
engaging in business, which includes, but is not limited to,
advertising such care;
(d) Parents on a mutually cooperative basis exchange care of one
another's children;
(e) Nursery schools or kindergartens that are engaged primarily in
educational work with preschool children and in which no child is
enrolled on a regular basis for more than four hours per day;
(f) Schools, including boarding schools, that are engaged primarily
in education, operate on a definite school year schedule, follow a
stated academic curriculum, accept only school-age children, and do not
accept custody of children;
(g) Seasonal camps of three months' or less duration engaged
primarily in recreational or educational activities;
(h) Facilities providing child care for periods of less than
twenty-four hours when a parent or legal guardian of the child remains
on the premises of the facility for the purpose of participating in:
(i) Activities other than employment; or
(ii) Employment of up to two hours per day when the facility is
operated by a nonprofit entity that also operates a licensed child care
program at the same facility in another location or at another
facility;
(i) Any agency having been in operation in this state ten years
before June 8, 1967, and not seeking or accepting moneys or assistance
from any state or federal agency, and is supported in part by an
endowment or trust fund;
(j) An agency operated by any unit of local, state, or federal
government or an agency, located within the boundaries of a federally
recognized Indian reservation, licensed by the Indian tribe;
(k) An agency located on a federal military reservation, except
where the military authorities request that such agency be subject to
the licensing requirements of this chapter;
(l) An agency that offers early learning and support services, such
as parent education, and does not provide child care services on a
regular basis.
(3) "Applicant" means a person who requests or seeks employment in
an agency.
(4) "Conviction information" means criminal history record
information relating to an incident which has led to a conviction or
other disposition adverse to the applicant.
(5) "Department" means the department of early learning.
(6) "Director" means the director of the department.
(7) "Early achievers" means a program that improves the quality of
early learning programs and supports and rewards providers for
participation.
(8) "Employer" means a person or business that engages the services
of one or more people, especially for wages or salary to work in an
agency.
(((8))) (9) "Enforcement action" means denial, suspension,
revocation, modification, or nonrenewal of a license pursuant to RCW
43.215.300(1) or assessment of civil monetary penalties pursuant to RCW
43.215.300(3).
(((9))) (10) "Negative action" means a court order, court judgment,
or an adverse action taken by an agency, in any state, federal, tribal,
or foreign jurisdiction, which results in a finding against the
applicant reasonably related to the individual's character,
suitability, and competence to care for or have unsupervised access to
children in child care. This may include, but is not limited to:
(a) A decision issued by an administrative law judge;
(b) A final determination, decision, or finding made by an agency
following an investigation;
(c) An adverse agency action, including termination, revocation, or
denial of a license or certification, or if pending adverse agency
action, the voluntary surrender of a license, certification, or
contract in lieu of the adverse action;
(d) A revocation, denial, or restriction placed on any professional
license; or
(e) A final decision of a disciplinary board.
(((10))) (11) "Nonconviction information" means arrest, founded
allegations of child abuse, or neglect pursuant to chapter 26.44 RCW,
or other negative action adverse to the applicant.
(((11))) (12) "Probationary license" means a license issued as a
disciplinary measure to an agency that has previously been issued a
full license but is out of compliance with licensing standards.
(((12))) (13) "Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard
of care to be maintained by an agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The early achievers program is designed to accomplish the
following goals:
(a) Provide parents clear and easy accessible information about
quality child care and early education programs;
(b) Improve early learning programs throughout Washington state;
(c) Increase school readiness for children;
(d) Close the disparity between segments of the population with
regard to access to quality care; and
(e) Establish a uniform set of expectations and standards that
define, measure, and improve the quality of the early learning
environment.
(2) All licensed and certified child care programs may enroll in
the early achievers program. Child care providers may voluntarily
decide whether to participate.
(3) There are five quality levels in the early achievers program.
(4) The department shall prepare and implement rules in accordance
with the early achievers program and this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The standards and guidelines described in this section are
intended for the guidance of the department and the department of
social and health services. They are not intended to, do not, and may
not be relied upon to create a right or benefit, substantive or
procedural, enforceable at law by a party in litigation with the state.
(2) When providing services to parents applying for or receiving
working connections child care benefits, the department must provide
training to departmental employees on professionalism.
(3) When providing services to parents applying for or receiving
working connections child care benefits, the department of social and
health services has the following responsibilities:
(a) To return all calls from parents receiving working connections
child care benefits within two business days of receiving the call;
(b) To develop a process by which parents receiving working
connections child care benefits can submit required forms and
information electronically by June 30, 2015;
(c) To notify providers and parents ten days before the loss of
working connections child care benefits; and
(d) To provide parents with a document that explains in detail and
in easily understood language what services they are eligible for, how
they can appeal an adverse decision, and the parents' responsibilities
in obtaining and maintaining eligibility for working connections child
care.
(4) The department shall convene a parent and provider oversight
board.
(a) The oversight board must, at a minimum, consist of the
following:
(i) Five parents receiving working connections child care benefits
from diverse geographic locations; and
(ii) Five working connections child care providers from diverse
geographic locations.
(b) The oversight board shall meet at least three times a year.
(c) The purpose of the oversight board is to listen to issues
raised by parents receiving working connections child care and child
care providers and report to the department on recommended policy
changes to address the issues raised.
(d) The department is not responsible for any of the expenses
incurred by the oversight board members.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The legislature finds that the Aclara
group report on the eligibility requirements for working connections
child care which came from the pedagogy of lean management and focused
on identifying and eliminating nonvalue added work should be followed.
The legislature further finds that, following some of the
recommendations in the report, would result in simplifying and
streamlining the child care system to improve access and customer
service without decreasing the program's integrity.
(2) By December 1, 2013, the department and the department of
social and health services shall accomplish the following:
(a) Eliminate the current custody/visitation policy and design a
subsidy system that is flexible and accounts for small fluctuations in
family circumstances;
(b) Create broad authorization categories so that relatively minor
changes in parents' work schedules do not require changes in
authorization;
(c) Establish rules to specify that parents who receive working
connections child care benefits and participate in one hundred ten
hours or more of approved work or related activities are eligible for
full-time child care services; and
(d) Clarify and simplify the requirement to count child support as
income.

--- END ---