BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that identifying,
assessing, and finalizing a permanent adoptive home for a child is a
complex process. Professionals must balance expediting a permanent
home for a child with investigating and determining whether the health,
safety, and well-being of a particular child will be advanced through
permanent placement in a particular adoptive home and family. The
legislature intends to make certain changes to the laws relative to the
adoption process in order to foster safe, positive experiences for
adoptive children and their adoptive families.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.33.020 and 1993 c 81 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Alleged father" means a person whose parent-child relationship
has not been terminated, who is not a presumed father under chapter
26.26 RCW, and who alleges himself or whom a party alleges to be the
father of the child. It includes a person whose marriage to the mother
was terminated more than three hundred days before the birth of the
child or who was separated from the mother more than three hundred days
before the birth of the child.
(2) "Child" means a person under eighteen years of age.
(3) "Adoptee" means a person who is to be adopted or who has been
adopted.
(4) "Adoptive parent" means the person or persons who seek to adopt
or have adopted an adoptee.
(5) "Court" means the superior court.
(6) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(7) "Agency" means any public or private association, corporation,
or individual licensed or certified by the department as a child-placing agency under chapter 74.15 RCW or as an adoption agency.
(8) "Parent" means the natural or adoptive mother or father of a
child, including a presumed father under chapter 26.26 RCW. It does
not include any person whose parent-child relationship has been
terminated by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(9) "Legal guardian" means the department, an agency, or a person,
other than a parent or stepparent, appointed by the court to promote
the child's general welfare, with the authority and duty to make
decisions affecting the child's development.
(10) "Guardian ad litem" means a person, not related to a party to
the action, appointed by the court to represent the best interests of
a party who is under a legal disability.
(11) "Relinquish or relinquishment" means the voluntary surrender
of custody of a child to the department, an agency, or prospective
adoptive parents.
(12) "Individual approved by the court" or "qualified salaried
court employee" means a person who has a master's degree in social work
or a related field and one year of experience in ((social work)) family
and children's services or adoption, or a bachelor's degree in social
work or a related field and two years of experience in ((social work))
family and children's services or adoption, and includes a person not
having such qualifications only if the court makes specific findings of
fact that are entered of record establishing that the person has
reasonably equivalent education and experience. In addition to meeting
education and experience requirements, all such persons must receive at
least thirty hours of training every two years, either in-person or
online, on issues relative to adoption including, but not limited to:
Pertinent laws and regulations; ethical considerations; cultural
diversity; factors that lead to the need for adoption; feelings of
separation, grief, and loss experienced by children; attachment and
posttraumatic stress disorder; and psychological issues faced by
children.
(13) "Birth parent" means the biological mother or biological or
alleged father of a child, including a presumed father under chapter
26.26 RCW, whether or not any such person's parent-child relationship
has been terminated by a court of competent jurisdiction. "Birth
parent" does not include a biological mother or biological or alleged
father, including a presumed father under chapter 26.26 RCW, if the
parent-child relationship was terminated because of an act for which
the person was found guilty under chapter 9A.42 or 9A.44 RCW.
(14) "Nonidentifying information" includes, but is not limited to,
the following information about the birth parents, adoptive parents,
and adoptee:
(a) Age in years at the time of adoption;
(b) Heritage, including nationality, ethnic background, and race;
(c) Education, including number of years of school completed at the
time of adoption, but not name or location of school;
(d) General physical appearance, including height, weight, color of
hair, eyes, and skin, or other information of a similar nature;
(e) Religion;
(f) Occupation, but not specific titles or places of employment;
(g) Talents, hobbies, and special interests;
(h) Circumstances leading to the adoption;
(i) Medical and genetic history of birth parents;
(j) First names;
(k) Other children of birth parents by age, sex, and medical
history;
(l) Extended family of birth parents by age, sex, and medical
history;
(m) The fact of the death, and age and cause, if known;
(n) Photographs;
(o) Name of agency or individual that facilitated the adoption.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.33.190 and 2009 c 234 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person may at any time request an agency, the department,
an individual approved by the court, or a qualified salaried court
employee to prepare a preplacement report. A certificate signed under
penalty of perjury by the person preparing the report specifying his or
her qualifications as required in this chapter shall be attached to or
filed with each preplacement report and shall include a statement of
training or experience that qualifies the person preparing the report
to discuss relevant adoption issues. A person may have more than one
preplacement report prepared. All preplacement reports shall be filed
with the court in which the petition for adoption is filed.
(2) The preplacement report shall be a written document setting
forth all relevant information relating to the fitness of the person
requesting the report as an adoptive parent. The report shall be based
on a study which shall include an investigation of the home
environment, family life, existence of extended family and community
connections to serve as support, planned approach to child discipline
and punishment, health, facilities, and resources of the person
requesting the report. The fitness of a parent shall not be based on
the person's sincerely held religious or philosophical beliefs and
practices regarding child discipline and punishment that do not
otherwise constitute a violation of state law. The report shall
include a list of the sources of information on which the report is
based. The report shall include a recommendation as to the fitness of
the person requesting the report to be an adoptive parent. The report
shall also verify that the following issues were discussed with the
prospective adoptive parents:
(a) The concept of adoption as a lifelong developmental process and
commitment;
(b) The potential for the child to have feelings of identity
confusion and loss regarding separation from the birth parents;
(c) If applicable, the relevance of the child's relationship with
siblings and the potential benefit to the child of providing for a
continuing relationship and contact between the child and known
siblings;
(d) Disclosure of the fact of adoption to the child;
(e) The child's possible questions about birth parents and
relatives; and
(f) The relevance of the child's racial, ethnic, and cultural
heritage.
(3) All preplacement reports shall include a background check of
any conviction records, pending charges, or disciplinary board final
decisions of prospective adoptive parents and a reference to any prior
preplacement reports, whether complete or incomplete. The background
check shall include an examination of state and national criminal
identification data provided by the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system including, but not limited to, a fingerprint-based background check of national crime information databases for any
person being investigated. It shall also include a review of any child
abuse and neglect history of any adult living in the prospective
adoptive parents' home. The background check of the child abuse and
neglect history shall include a review of the child abuse and neglect
registries of all states in which the prospective adoptive parents or
any other adult living in the home have lived during the five years
preceding the date of the preplacement report.
(4) On all preplacement reports filed after January 1, 2015, the
preparer shall verify that the prospective adoptive parents were
provided with: (a) Copies of Washington state child abuse statutes and
rules; and (b) the list of informational and resource materials
developed and posted pursuant to section 7 of this act.
(5) An agency, the department, or a court approved individual may
charge a reasonable fee based on the time spent in conducting the study
and preparing the preplacement report. The court may set a reasonable
fee for conducting the study and preparing the report when a court
employee has prepared the report. An agency, the department, a court
approved individual, or the court may reduce or waive the fee if the
financial condition of the person requesting the report so warrants.
An agency's, the department's, or court approved individual's, fee is
subject to review by the court upon request of the person requesting
the report.
(((5))) (6) The person requesting the report shall designate to the
agency, the department, the court approved individual, or the court in
writing the county in which the preplacement report is to be filed. If
the person requesting the report has not filed a petition for adoption,
the report shall be indexed in the name of the person requesting the
report and a cause number shall be assigned. A fee shall not be
charged for filing the report. The applicable filing fee may be
charged at the time a petition governed by this chapter is filed. Any
subsequent preplacement reports shall be filed together with the
original report.
(((6))) (7) A copy of the completed preplacement report shall be
delivered to the person requesting the report.
(((7))) (8) A person may request that a report not be completed.
Reports not completed must be filed by the preparer in accordance with
subsection (6) of this section. A reasonable fee may be charged for
the value of work done.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.33.200 and 1990 c 146 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 26.33.220, at the time the petition
for adoption is filed, the court shall order a postplacement report
made to determine the nature and adequacy of the placement and to
determine if the placement is in the best interest of the child. The
report shall be prepared by an agency, the department, an individual
approved by the court, or a qualified salaried court employee appointed
by the court. A certificate signed under penalty of perjury by the
person preparing the report specifying his or her qualifications as
required in this chapter shall be attached to or filed with each
postplacement report. The report shall be in writing and contain all
reasonably available information concerning the physical and mental
condition of the child, home environment, family life, existence of
extended family and community connections to serve as support, planned
approach to child discipline and punishment, health, facilities and
resources of the petitioners, and any other facts and circumstances
relating to the propriety and advisability of the adoption. The
fitness of a parent shall not be based on the person's sincerely held
religious or philosophical beliefs and practices regarding child
discipline and punishment that do not otherwise constitute a violation
of state law. The report shall also include, if relevant, information
on the child's special cultural heritage, including membership in any
Indian tribe or band. The report shall be filed within sixty days of
the date of appointment, unless the time is extended by the court. The
preplacement report shall be made available to the person appointed to
make the postplacement report.
(2) A fee may be charged for preparation of the postplacement
report in the same manner as for a preplacement report under RCW
26.33.190.

Sec. 5 RCW 26.33.300 and 1991 c 3 s 288 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of health shall be a depository for statistical data
concerning adoption. It shall furnish to the clerk of each county a
data card which shall be completed and filed with the clerk on behalf
of each petitioner. The data card must indicate if the child being
adopted has previously been adopted and if this is a second or
subsequent adoption for the child. The clerk shall forward the
completed cards to the department of health which shall compile the
data, share the data with the department of social and health services,
and publish reports summarizing the data. A birth certificate shall
not be issued showing the petitioner as the parent of any child adopted
in the state of Washington until a data card has been completed and
filed.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.06A.030 and 2013 c 23 s 73 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ombuds shall perform the following duties:
(1) Provide information as appropriate on the rights and
responsibilities of individuals receiving family and children's
services, and on the procedures for providing these services;
(2) Investigate, upon his or her own initiative or upon receipt of
a complaint, an administrative act alleged to be contrary to law, rule,
or policy, imposed without an adequate statement of reason, or based on
irrelevant, immaterial, or erroneous grounds; however, the ombuds may
decline to investigate any complaint as provided by rules adopted under
this chapter;
(3) Monitor the procedures as established, implemented, and
practiced by the department to carry out its responsibilities in
delivering family and children's services with a view toward
appropriate preservation of families and ensuring children's health and
safety;
(4) Review periodically the facilities and procedures of state
institutions serving children, and state-licensed facilities or
residences;
(5) Recommend changes in the procedures for addressing the needs of
families and children;
(6) Submit annually to the committee and to the governor by
November 1st a report analyzing the work of the office, including
recommendations and information regarding the progress made by the
department of social and health services in implementing
recommendations made in the report on severe abuse of adopted children;
(7) Grant the committee access to all relevant records in the
possession of the ombuds unless prohibited by law; and
(8) Adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.06A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in 2014, and in even-numbered years thereafter, the
ombuds shall convene a work group to compile a list of informational
and resource materials that must be provided to prospective adoptive
parents by the agency, the department, an individual approved by the
court, or a qualified salaried court employee requested to prepare a
preplacement report pursuant to RCW 26.33.190.
(2) The work group must include the ombuds or his or her designee,
an individual approved by the court to prepare preplacement reports, an
attorney whose practice includes adoption law, an adoptive parent, an
adult who was adopted as a child, and representatives from the
following: The department of social and health services; the
administrative office of the courts; a domestic adoption agency; an
international adoption agency; and two or more ethnic and cultural
organizations expressing interest in outreach to adoptive parents and
children. Other members may be added as deemed appropriate by the work
group.
(3) The work group shall review informational and resource
materials currently provided to prospective adoptive parents, as well
as other materials recommended by work group members, and compile a
list of materials that must be provided to prospective adoptive parents
during preparation of the preplacement report. Included on such list
must be information relative to: Child abuse statutes and rules in the
state; availability of mental health services; training and educational
opportunities for parents in general and adoptive parents in
particular; respite services; ethnic and cultural community
organizations; and information, services, and outreach opportunities
available to adoptive children. Other materials may be included as
deemed appropriate by the work group.
(4) By December 31, 2014, the initial list must be: (a) Posted on
the public web sites of the office of the family and children's ombuds
and the department of social and health services; and (b) disseminated
to other agencies and persons identified by the work group. Updated
lists must thereafter be posted and disseminated on or before December
31st in even-numbered years.

--- END ---