BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.128.065 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 3 s 203 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A multiple facility operator must successfully demonstrate to
the department financial solvency and management experience for the
homes under its ownership and the ability to meet other relevant
safety, health, and operating standards pertaining to the operation of
multiple homes, including ways to mitigate the potential impact of
vehicular traffic related to the operation of the homes.
(2) The department shall only accept and process an application for
licensure of an additional home when:
(a) A period of no less than twenty-four months has passed since
the issuance of the initial adult family home license; and
(b) The department has taken no enforcement actions against the
applicant's currently licensed adult family homes during the twenty-four months prior to application.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the department
shall only accept and process an additional application for licensure
of other adult family homes when twelve months has passed since the
previous adult family home license, and the department has taken no
enforcement actions against the applicant's currently licensed adult
family homes during the twelve months prior to application.
(b) The department shall accept and process applications for
licensure of additional adult family homes when less than twelve months
have passed since the previous adult family home license, if the
applications are due to the change in ownership of existing adult
family homes that are currently licensed and the department has taken
no enforcement actions against the applicant's currently licensed adult
family homes during the twelve months prior to application.
(4) In the event of serious noncompliance leading to the imposition
of one or more actions listed in RCW 70.128.160(2) for violation of
federal, state, or local laws, or regulations relating to provision of
care or services to vulnerable adults or children, the department is
authorized to take one or more actions listed in RCW 70.128.160(2)
against any home or homes operated by the provider if there is a
violation in the home or homes.
(5) In the event of serious noncompliance in a home operated by a
provider with multiple adult family homes, leading to the imposition of
one or more actions listed in RCW 70.128.160(2), the department shall
inspect the other homes operated by the provider to determine whether
the same or related deficiencies are present in those homes. The cost
of these additional inspections may be imposed on the provider as a
civil penalty up to a maximum of three hundred dollars per additional
inspection.
(6) A provider is ultimately responsible for the day-to-day
operations of each licensed home.

--- END ---