BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No peace officer acting reasonably, considering the totality of
the incident from the perspective of a reasonable officer, in the
course of his or her duties may be held civilly or criminally liable
nor shall the city, county, state, or agency employing the officer.
This immunity includes, but is not limited to, the use of a less lethal
weapon.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "less lethal weapon" means
any device that is designed to or that has been converted to expel or
propel less lethal ammunition by any action, mechanism, or process for
the purpose of incapacitating, immobilizing, or stunning a human being
through the infliction of any less than lethal impairment of physical
condition, function, or senses, including physical pain or discomfort.
It is not necessary that a weapon leave any lasting or permanent
incapacitation, discomfort, pain, or other injury or disability in
order to qualify as a less lethal weapon.

--- END ---