BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county, city, or town may recover its reasonable expenses of
preparation of a nonproject environmental impact statement prepared
under RCW 43.21C.229 and 43.21C.440:
(a) Through access to financial assistance under RCW 36.70A.490;
(b) With funding from private sources; and
(c) By the assessment of fees consistent with the requirements and
limitations of this section.
(2)(a) A county, city, or town is authorized to assess a fee upon
subsequent development that will make use of and benefit from: (i) The
analysis in an environmental impact statement prepared for the purpose
of compliance with RCW 43.21C.440 regarding planned actions; or (ii)
the reduction in environmental analysis requirements resulting from the
exercise of authority under RCW 43.21C.229 regarding infill
development.
(b) The amount of the fee must be reasonable and proportionate to
the total expenses incurred by the county, city, or town in the
preparation of the environmental impact statement.
(3) A county, city, or town assessing fees under subsection (2)(a)
of this section must provide for a mechanism by which project
proponents may either elect to utilize the environmental review
completed by the lead agency and pay the fees under subsection (1) of
this section or certify that they do not want the local jurisdiction to
utilize the environmental review completed as a part of a planned
action and therefore not be assessed any associated fees. Project
proponents who choose this option may not make use of or benefit from
the up-front environmental review prepared by the local jurisdiction.
(4) Prior to the collection of fees, the county, city, or town must
enact an ordinance that establishes the total amount of expenses to be
recovered through fees and provides objective standards for determining
the fee amount to be imposed upon each development proposal
proportionate to the impacts of each development and to the benefits
accruing to each development from the nonproject environmental review.
The ordinance must provide: (a) A procedure by which an applicant who
disagrees with whether the amount of the fee is correct, reasonable, or
proportionate may pay the fee with the written stipulation "paid under
protest"; and (b) if the county, city, or town provides for an
administrative appeal of its decision on the project for which the fees
are imposed, any dispute about the amount of the fees must be resolved
in the same administrative appeals process. Any disagreement about the
reasonableness, proportionality, or amount of the fees imposed upon a
development may not be the basis for delay in issuance of a project
permit for that development.
(5) The ordinance adopted under subsection (4) of this section must
make information available about the amount of the expenses designated
for recovery. When these expenses have been fully recovered, the
county, city, or town may no longer assess a fee under this section.
(6) Any fees collected under this section from subsequent
development may be used to reimburse funding received from private
sources to conduct the environmental review.
(7) The county, city, or town shall refund fees collected where a
court of competent jurisdiction determines that the environmental
review conducted under RCW 43.21C.440, regarding planned actions, or
under RCW 43.21C.229, regarding infill development, was not sufficient
to comply with the requirements of this chapter regarding the proposed
development activity for which the fees were collected. The applicant
and the county, city, or town may mutually agree to a partial refund or
to waive the refund in the interest of resolving any dispute regarding
compliance with this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.91.020 and 2009 c 344 s 1 and 2009 c 230 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) ((Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section,))
The governing body of any city, town, county, water-sewer district, or
drainage district, hereinafter referred to as a "municipality" ((may))
must contract with owners of real estate for the construction of storm,
sanitary, or combination sewers, pumping stations, and disposal plants,
water mains, hydrants, reservoirs, or appurtenances, hereinafter called
"water or sewer facilities," within their boundaries or (except for
counties) within ten miles from their corporate limits connecting with
the public water or sewerage system to serve the area in which the real
estate of such owners is located, and to provide for a period of ((not
to exceed)) twenty years for the reimbursement of such owners and their
assigns by any owner of real estate who did not contribute to the
original cost of such water or sewer facilities and who subsequently
tap ((onto)) into or use the same of a fair pro rata share of the cost
of the construction of ((said)) the water or sewer facilities,
including not only those directly connected thereto, but also users
connected to laterals or branches connecting thereto, subject to such
reasonable rules and regulations as the governing body of such
municipality may provide or contract, and notwithstanding the
provisions of any other law.
(b) If authorized by ordinance or contract, a municipality may
participate in financing the development of water or sewer facilities
development projects authorized by, and in accordance with, (a) of this
subsection. Unless otherwise provided by ordinance or contract:
(i) Municipalities that contribute to the financing of water or
sewer facilities projects under this section have the same rights to
reimbursement as owners of real estate who make contributions as
authorized under this section; and
(ii) If the projects are jointly financed by a combination of
municipal funding and private funding by real estate owners, the amount
of reimbursement received by each participant in the financing must be
a pro rata share.
(c) Except as provided otherwise by this section, a municipality
seeking reimbursement from an owner of real estate under this section
is limited to the dollar amount authorized under this chapter ((and may
not collect any additional reimbursement, assessment, charge, or fee
for the infrastructure or facilities that were constructed under the
applicable ordinance, contract, or agreement)). This does not prevent
the collection of amounts for services or infrastructure that are
additional expenditures not subject to such ordinance, contract, or
agreement, nor does it prevent the collection of fees that are
reasonable and proportionate to the total expenses incurred by the
municipality in complying with this section.
(2)(((a) The contract may provide for an extension of the
twenty-year reimbursement period for a time not to exceed the duration
of any moratorium, phasing ordinance, concurrency designation, or other
governmental action that prevents making applications for, or the
approval of, any new development within the benefit area for a period
of six months or more.
(b) Upon the extension of the reimbursement period pursuant to (a)
of this subsection, the contract must specify the duration of the
contract extension and must be filed and recorded with the county
auditor. Property owners who are subject to the reimbursement
obligations under subsection (1) of this section shall be notified by
the contracting municipality of the extension filed under this
subsection.
(3))) Each contract shall include a provision requiring that every
two years from the date the contract is executed a property owner
entitled to reimbursement under this section provide the contracting
municipality with information regarding the current contract name,
address, and telephone number of the person, company, or partnership
that originally entered into the contract. If the property owner fails
to comply with the notification requirements of this subsection within
sixty days of the specified time, then the contracting municipality may
collect any reimbursement funds owed to the property owner under the
contract. Such funds must be deposited in the capital fund of the
municipality.
(((4))) (3) To the extent it may require in the performance of such
contract, such municipality may install said water or sewer facilities
in and along the county streets in the area to be served as hereinabove
provided, subject to such reasonable requirements as to the manner of
occupancy of such streets as the county may by resolution provide. The
provisions of such contract shall not be effective as to any owner of
real estate not a party thereto unless such contract has been recorded
in the office of the county auditor of the county in which the real
estate of such owner is located prior to the time such owner taps into
or connects to said water or sewer facilities.
(4) Within ninety days of the completion of a water or sewer
facility that was financed in accordance with the provisions of this
section, the owners of real estate who tap into or use the facility
must submit their complete cost data and associated information to the
applicable municipality. These owners must also provide reasonable and
timely responses for any resubmittal requests or additional
information, when applicable.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.02.020 and 2010 c 153 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except only as expressly provided in chapters 67.28, 81.104, and
82.14 RCW, the state preempts the field of imposing retail sales and
use taxes and taxes upon parimutuel wagering authorized pursuant to RCW
67.16.060, conveyances, and cigarettes, and no county, town, or other
municipal subdivision shall have the right to impose taxes of that
nature. Except as provided in RCW 64.34.440 and 82.02.050 through
82.02.090, no county, city, town, or other municipal corporation shall
impose any tax, fee, or charge, either direct or indirect, on the
construction or reconstruction of residential buildings, commercial
buildings, industrial buildings, or on any other building or building
space or appurtenance thereto, or on the development, subdivision,
classification, or reclassification of land. However, this section
does not preclude dedications of land or easements within the proposed
development or plat which the county, city, town, or other municipal
corporation can demonstrate are reasonably necessary as a direct result
of the proposed development or plat to which the dedication of land or
easement is to apply.
This section does not prohibit voluntary agreements with counties,
cities, towns, or other municipal corporations that allow a payment in
lieu of a dedication of land or to mitigate a direct impact that has
been identified as a consequence of a proposed development,
subdivision, or plat. A local government shall not use such voluntary
agreements for local off-site transportation improvements within the
geographic boundaries of the area or areas covered by an adopted
transportation program authorized by chapter 39.92 RCW. Any such
voluntary agreement is subject to the following provisions:
(1) The payment shall be held in a reserve account and may only be
expended to fund a capital improvement agreed upon by the parties to
mitigate the identified, direct impact;
(2) The payment shall be expended in all cases within five years of
collection; and
(3) Any payment not so expended shall be refunded with interest to
be calculated from the original date the deposit was received by the
county and at the same rate applied to tax refunds pursuant to RCW
84.69.100; however, if the payment is not expended within five years
due to delay attributable to the developer, the payment shall be
refunded without interest.
No county, city, town, or other municipal corporation shall require
any payment as part of such a voluntary agreement which the county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation cannot establish is
reasonably necessary as a direct result of the proposed development or
plat.
Nothing in this section prohibits cities, towns, counties, or other
municipal corporations from collecting reasonable fees from an
applicant for a permit or other governmental approval to cover the cost
to the city, town, county, or other municipal corporation of processing
applications, inspecting and reviewing plans, or preparing detailed
statements required by chapter 43.21C RCW, including reasonable fees
that are consistent with RCW 43.21C.420(6), 35.91.020, and section 1 of
this act.
This section does not limit the existing authority of any county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation to impose special
assessments on property specifically benefited thereby in the manner
prescribed by law.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
imposing or permits counties, cities, or towns to impose water, sewer,
natural gas, drainage utility, and drainage system charges. However,
no such charge shall exceed the proportionate share of such utility or
system's capital costs which the county, city, or town can demonstrate
are attributable to the property being charged. Furthermore, these
provisions may not be interpreted to expand or contract any existing
authority of counties, cities, or towns to impose such charges.
Nothing in this section prohibits a transportation benefit district
from imposing fees or charges authorized in RCW 36.73.120 nor prohibits
the legislative authority of a county, city, or town from approving the
imposition of such fees within a transportation benefit district.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
imposing transportation impact fees authorized pursuant to chapter
39.92 RCW.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
requiring property owners to provide relocation assistance to tenants
under RCW 59.18.440 and 59.18.450.
Nothing in this section limits the authority of counties, cities,
or towns to implement programs consistent with RCW 36.70A.540, nor to
enforce agreements made pursuant to such programs.
This section does not apply to special purpose districts formed and
acting pursuant to Title 54, 57, or 87 RCW, nor is the authority
conferred by these titles affected.

--- END ---