BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
maintain and expand access to postsecondary education and improve
opportunities for students. The legislature recognizes that access to
federal financial aid is a major avenue for overcoming financial
barriers to higher education for many students in Washington. The
legislature recognizes that recent federal changes in federal
regulations require the adjustment of definitions of certain
postsecondary institutions in state statutes to ensure that those
schools that currently meet the requirements are eligible for student
financial aid programs provided by the federal government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.16 RCW
to read as follows:
Schools shall be recognized as institutions of postsecondary study
under the following conditions:
(1) The school admits as regular students only those individuals
who have earned a recognized high school diploma or the equivalent of
a recognized high school diploma, or who are beyond the age of
compulsory education as provided in RCW 28A.225.010; and
(2) The school is licensed by name by the department under this
chapter to offer one or more training programs beyond the secondary
level.

--- END ---