BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.20.100 and 2006 c 13 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Suitable work for an individual is employment in an occupation
in keeping with the individual's prior work experience, education, or
training and if the individual has no prior work experience, special
education, or training for employment available in the general area,
then employment which the individual would have the physical and mental
ability to perform. In determining whether work is suitable for an
individual, the commissioner shall also consider the degree of risk
involved to the individual's health, safety, and morals, the
individual's physical fitness, the individual's length of unemployment
and prospects for securing local work in the individual's customary
occupation, the distance of the available work from the individual's
residence, and such other factors as the commissioner may deem
pertinent, including state and national emergencies. Work for which
the individual does not meet minimum age requirements required by law
or regulation is not suitable work.
(2) For individuals with base year work experience in agricultural
labor, any agricultural labor available from any employer shall be
deemed suitable unless it meets conditions in RCW 50.20.110 or the
commissioner finds elements of specific work opportunity unsuitable for
a particular individual.
(3) For part-time workers as defined in RCW 50.20.119, suitable
work includes suitable work under subsection (1) of this section that
is for seventeen or fewer hours per week.
(4) For individuals who have qualified for unemployment
compensation benefits under RCW 50.20.050 (1)(b)(iv) or (2)(b)(iv), as
applicable, an evaluation of the suitability of the work must consider
the individual's need to address the physical, psychological, legal,
and other effects of domestic violence or stalking.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---