BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.16.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7033 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected from every
person a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in
any one or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax ((shall
be)) is equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the
rate set out after the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses shall be deposited in the public works assistance
account created in RCW 43.155.050((: PROVIDED, That)). However,
during the fiscal year 2011, twenty percent of the moneys collected
under subsection (1) of this section on water distribution businesses
and sixty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of this
section on sewerage collection businesses must be deposited in the
general fund for general purpose expenditures.
(4)(a) Ten percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses must be deposited into
the water rights processing account created in RCW 90.03.650; the use
of such funds must be for but not limited to the following:
(i) Department of ecology review of water system plans;
(ii) Providing matching funds for United States geological survey
hydrological models;
(iii) Data tracking of actual water use on a watershed by watershed
basis; and
(iv) Water right processing.
(b) Ten percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses must be deposited into
the safe drinking water account created in RCW 70.119A.120; the use of
such funds must be for but not limited to the following:
(i) Department of health activities required to maintain state
primacy under the federal safe drinking water act;
(ii) Providing matching funds for United States environmental
protection agency grants to the department of health for drinking water
regulatory development and implementation;
(iii) Department of health educational programs intended to assist
public water system operators in understanding and complying with state
and federal regulations; and
(iv) Department of health public water system advisory committees
to assist the department of health in addressing public drinking water
issues.
(c) The revenue dedication in this subsection is intended to link
revenue provided by water utilities to the services provided to
utilities and their customers by the department of ecology and the
department of health.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.03.650 and 2010 c 285 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The water rights processing account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from the fees collected under RCW 90.03.655,
90.03.665, and 90.44.540 and the identified portion of taxes collected
under RCW 82.16.020 must be deposited into the account. Money in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may only be used to support the processing of water right
applications for a new appropriation, change, transfer, or amendment of
a water right as provided in this chapter and chapters 90.42 and 90.44
RCW or for the examination, certification, and renewal of certification
of water right examiners as provided in RCW 90.03.665.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.119A.120 and 1991 c 304 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The safe drinking water account is created in the general fund of
the state treasury. All receipts from the operating permit fees
required to be paid under RCW 70.119A.110 ((shall)) and the identified
portion of taxes collected under RCW 82.16.020 must be deposited into
the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used by the
department of health to carry out the purposes of chapter 304, Laws of
1991 and to carry out contracts with local governments in accordance
with this chapter.

--- END ---