BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that preserving a safe
and beneficial learning environment for all students requires the
establishment and enforcement of appropriate student discipline
policies. The legislature further finds that although physical
restraint and isolation of a student should be avoided, there may be
circumstances where school district boards of directors have authorized
these actions to preserve the safety of other students and school
staff. Nevertheless, if an incident of student restraint or isolation
occurs, school personnel should be held accountable for providing a
thorough explanation of the circumstances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Isolation" means excluding a student from his or her regular
instructional area and restricting the student alone within a room or
any other form of enclosure, from which the student may not leave.
(b) "Restraint" means physical intervention or force used to
control a student, including the use of a restraint device.
(c) "Restraint device" means a device used to assist in controlling
a student, including but not limited to metal handcuffs, plastic ties,
ankle restraints, leather cuffs, other hospital-type restraints, pepper
spray, tasers, or batons.
(2) The provisions of this section apply only to any restraint of
a student who has an individualized education program or plan developed
under section 504 of the rehabilitation act of 1973 that results in a
physical injury to a student or a staff member, any restraint of a
student who has an individualized education program or plan developed
under section 504 of the rehabilitation act of 1973 lasting longer than
two minutes, and any isolation of a student who has an individualized
education program or plan developed under section 504 of the
rehabilitation act of 1973. The provisions of this section apply only
to incidents of restraint or isolation that occur while a student who
has an individualized education program or plan developed under section
504 of the rehabilitation act of 1973 is participating in school-sponsored instruction or activities.
(3) Following the release of a student from the use of restraint or
isolation, the school must implement follow-up procedures. These
procedures must include reviewing the incident with the student and the
parent or guardian to address the behavior that precipitated the
restraint or isolation and reviewing the incident with the staff member
who administered the restraint or isolation to discuss whether proper
procedures were followed.
(4) Any school employee, resource officer, or school security
officer who uses any chemical spray, mechanical restraint, or physical
force on a student during school-sponsored instruction or activities
must inform the building administrator or building administrator's
designee as soon as possible, and within two business days submit a
written report of the incident to the district office. The written
report should include, at a minimum, the following information:
(a) The date and time of the incident;
(b) The name and job title of the individual who administered the
restraint or isolation;
(c) A description of the activity that led to the restraint or
isolation;
(d) The type of restraint or isolation used on the student,
including the duration; and
(e) Whether the student or staff was physically injured during the
restraint or isolation and any medical care provided.
(5) The principal or principal's designee must make a reasonable
effort to verbally inform the student's parent or guardian within
twenty-four hours of the incident, and must send written notification
as soon as practical but postmarked no later than five business days
after the restraint or isolation occurred. If the school or school
district customarily provides the parent or guardian with school-related information in a language other than English, the written
report under this section must be provided to the parent or guardian in
that language.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
A school that is required to develop an individualized education
program as required by federal law must include within the plan
procedures for notification of a parent or guardian regarding the use
of restraint or isolation. Parents and guardians of children who have
individualized education programs or plans developed under section 504
of the rehabilitation act of 1973 must be provided a copy of the
district policy on the use of isolation and restraint at the time that
the program or plan is created.

--- END ---