BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington
state's elderly population is growing and the number of individuals
with dementia is increasing. The legislature further finds that
approximately sixty percent of individuals with dementia will wander at
least once and that if not found within twenty-four hours, up to half
of wandering seniors with dementia will suffer serious injury or death.
The legislature further finds that the state of Washington has a
compelling interest in protecting the safety of vulnerable citizens
with cognitive impairments. The legislature further finds that
creating a public notification system to broadcast information about
missing persons with Alzheimer's disease, dementia, or other mental
disabilities to aid in their safe return, will help prevent unnecessary
suffering and death.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Law enforcement agency" means the law enforcement agency that
has primary jurisdiction for locating the missing senior citizen.
(2) "Silver alert" means a quick response system designed to issue
and coordinate alerts following the disappearance of a senior citizen
aged sixty-five or older, with a diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease,
dementia, or other mental disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A law enforcement agency may request a
silver alert for a senior citizen over the age of sixty-five when the
following conditions apply:
(1) The person suffers from a mental impairment verified by written
documentation;
(2) The request is made within seventy-two hours of the person's
disappearance;
(3) The disappearance poses a credible threat to the person's
health and safety;
(4) There is sufficient information to provide the public to assist
in locating the person; and
(5) A law enforcement investigation has ruled out alternative
explanations for the disappearance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Within existing resources, the Washington
state patrol shall develop and implement a plan, commonly known as a
"silver alert plan" for voluntary cooperation between local, state,
tribal, and other law enforcement agencies, state government agencies,
radio and television stations, and cable and satellite systems to
enhance the public's ability to assist in recovering senior citizens
aged sixty-five or older, with a diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease,
dementia, or other mental disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---