BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.16.110 and 2011 c 179 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means an owner and assignee of a community
solar project as defined in subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section that
is responsible for applying for the investment cost recovery incentive
on behalf of the other owners and performing such administrative tasks
on behalf of the other owners as may be necessary, such as receiving
investment cost recovery incentive payments, and allocating and paying
appropriate amounts of such payments to the other owners.
(2)(a) "Community solar project" means:
(i) A solar energy system that is capable of generating up to
seventy-five kilowatts of electricity and is owned by local
individuals, households, nonprofit organizations, or nonutility
businesses that is placed on the property owned by a cooperating local
governmental entity that is not in the light and power business or in
the gas distribution business;
(ii) A utility-owned solar energy system that is capable of
generating up to seventy-five kilowatts of electricity and that is
voluntarily funded by the utility's ratepayers where, in exchange for
their financial support, the utility gives contributors a payment or
credit on their utility bill for the value of the electricity produced
by the project; or
(iii) A solar energy system, placed on the property owned by a
cooperating local governmental entity that is not in the light and
power business or in the gas distribution business, that is capable of
generating up to seventy-five kilowatts of electricity, and that is
owned by a company whose members are each eligible for an investment
cost recovery incentive for the same customer-generated electricity as
provided in RCW 82.16.120.
(b) For the purposes of "community solar project" as defined in (a)
of this subsection:
(i) "Company" means an entity that is:
(A)(I) A limited liability company;
(II) A cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW; or
(III) A mutual corporation or association formed under chapter
24.06 RCW; and
(B) Not a "utility" as defined in this subsection (2)(b); and
(ii) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization exempt from
taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue
code of 1986, as amended, as of January 1, 2009; and
(iii) "Utility" means a light and power business, an electric
cooperative, or a mutual corporation that provides electricity service.
(3) "Customer-generated electricity" means a community solar
project or the alternating current electricity that is generated from
a renewable energy system located in Washington and installed on an
individual's, businesses', or local government's real property that is
also provided electricity generated by a light and power business.
(a) Customer-generated electricity includes alternating current
electricity generated from a renewable energy system that is owned by
an entity and installed on real property that is also provided
electricity generated by a light and power business and owned by an
individual, business, or local government in control of that entity.
For the purposes of this subsection, "control" has the same meaning as
provided in RCW 82.32.655(7).
(b) Except for community solar projects, a system located on a
leasehold interest does not qualify under this definition.
(c) Except for utility-owned community solar projects, "customer-generated electricity" does not include electricity generated by a
light and power business with greater than one thousand megawatt hours
of annual sales or a gas distribution business.
(4) "Economic development kilowatt-hour" means the actual kilowatt-hour measurement of customer-generated electricity multiplied by the
appropriate economic development factor.
(5) "Local governmental entity" means any unit of local government
of this state including, but not limited to, counties, cities, towns,
municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations, special purpose
districts, and school districts.
(6) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(7) "Renewable energy system" means a solar energy system, an
anaerobic digester as defined in RCW 82.08.900, or a wind generator
used for producing electricity.
(8) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
for use in the generation of electricity.
(9) "Solar inverter" means the device used to convert direct
current to alternating current in a solar energy system.
(10) "Solar module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained
physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and
providing a single direct current electrical output.
(11) "Stirling converter" means a device that produces electricity
by converting heat from a solar source utilizing a stirling engine.

--- END ---