BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The revised definition of the program of
basic education adopted in 2009 includes the expectation that students
will have the opportunity to complete twenty-four credits for high
school graduation. The state board of education has the statutory
authority to establish specific course requirements for graduation, and
in November 2010 the board adopted a career and college ready
graduation proposal based on several years of examination and review.
The board may not implement certain aspects of the proposal without
formal legislative authorization and funding. The revised definition
of basic education also requires an increase in minimum instructional
hours for secondary school students, with the implementation date to be
determined by the legislature.
(2) After further review, including considering the recommendations
of the quality education council and the joint task force on education
finance, the legislature finds that increasing instructional hours for
secondary students is a necessary but not sufficient expansion of the
education program to provide all students the opportunity to complete
career and college ready graduation requirements. The legislature
finds that students who are struggling in school, including English
language learners, may need opportunities for additional supplemental
instruction to take advantage of career and college ready graduation
requirements. Even after they are determined to be proficient in the
English language, English language learners may require opportunities
for additional support to catch up to their English-speaking peers in
other academic subjects such as mathematics or science. Students at
all grade levels would benefit from opportunities for additional family
support and counseling as they progress toward career and college
readiness. Providing additional targeted learning opportunities,
family support, and counseling are also essential for closing the
educational opportunity gap. The legislature has already stated that
it is a goal of basic education to give all students, not merely some
students, the opportunity to achieve personal and academic success.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to formally authorize, and
provide sufficient resources for, implementation of the opportunity for
students to complete twenty-four credits for graduation through a
comprehensive approach that includes increased instructional hours,
expansion of the learning assistance program and transitional bilingual
instructional programs, and resources to support additional family
engagement and counseling.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.220 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In order for students to have the opportunity to develop the
basic education knowledge and skills under RCW 28A.150.210, school
districts must provide instruction of sufficient quantity and quality
and give students the opportunity to complete graduation requirements
that are intended to prepare them for postsecondary education, gainful
employment, and citizenship. The program established under this
section shall be the minimum instructional program of basic education
offered by school districts.
(2) Each school district shall make available to students the
following minimum instructional offering each school year:
(a) For students enrolled in grades one through twelve, at least a
district-wide annual average of one thousand hours, which shall be
increased district-wide to at least one thousand eighty instructional
hours for students enrolled in each of grades seven through twelve and
at least one thousand instructional hours for students in each of
grades one through six ((according to an implementation schedule
adopted by the legislature, but not before)) beginning with the 2014-15
school year; and
(b) For students enrolled in kindergarten, at least four hundred
fifty instructional hours, which shall be increased to at least one
thousand instructional hours according to the implementation schedule
under RCW 28A.150.315.
(3) The instructional program of basic education provided by each
school district shall include:
(a) Instruction in the essential academic learning requirements
under RCW 28A.655.070;
(b) Instruction that provides students the opportunity to complete
twenty-four credits for high school graduation, ((subject to a phased-in implementation of the twenty-four credits as established by the
legislature)) beginning with students entering the ninth grade or
beginning the equivalent of a four-year high school program on or after
July 1, 2015. Course distribution requirements may be established by
the state board of education under RCW 28A.230.090;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages;
(d) Supplemental instruction and services for underachieving
students through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005
through 28A.165.065;
(e) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled
students whose primary language is other than English through the
transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010
through 28A.180.080;
(f) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense
as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with
disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020; and
(g) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010
through 28A.185.030.
(4) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require
individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours
per day or to take any particular courses.
(5) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic
educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five
years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one
years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred eighty
school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school
district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or
equivalent, in kindergarten, to be increased to a minimum of one
hundred eighty school days per school year according to the
implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315. However, effective May
1, 1979, a school district may schedule the last five school days of
the one hundred and eighty day school year for noninstructional
purposes in the case of students who are graduating from high school,
including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early
release from school upon the request of a student, and all such
students may be claimed as a full-time equivalent student to the extent
they could otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes a school district from
enriching the instructional program of basic education, such as
offering additional instruction or providing additional services,
programs, or activities that the school district determines to be
appropriate for the education of the school district's students.
(7) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental
program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of
state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school
districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic
education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as
follows:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a
basic education instructional allocation for each common school
district.
(2) The distribution formula under this section shall be for
allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under chapter
28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and
regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use
basic education instructional funds to implement a particular
instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires
school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student
ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay
for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this
section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning
period.
(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been
adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a
school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic
education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing
and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support
instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high,
middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section.
The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not
constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or
structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical
schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of
a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students
using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours
of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the
intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted
from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average
full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the
district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school
to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further
adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small
schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are
defined as follows:
(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;
(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight;
and
(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
six.
(4)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers
needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one
teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following
general education average class size of full-time equivalent students
per teacher:

General education
average
class size
Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23
Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium and beginning with schools with
the highest percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price
meals in the prior school year, the general education average class
size for grades K-3 shall be reduced until the average class size
funded under this subsection (4) is no more than 17.0 full-time
equivalent students per teacher beginning in the 2017-18 school year.
(c) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high
school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom teachers
based on the following number of full-time equivalent students per
teacher in career and technical education:

Career and technical
education average
class size
Approved career and technical education offered at
the middle school and high school level . . . . . . . . . . . . 26.57
Skill center programs meeting the standards established
by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction . . . . . . . . . . . . 22.76

(d) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum
specify:
(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than
fifty percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price
meals; and
(ii) A specialty average class size for laboratory science,
advanced placement, and international baccalaureate courses.
(e) To support the increase in instructional hours required under
RCW 28A.150.220(2)(a), beginning with the 2014-15 school year, the
minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high school shall
provide resources to provide an additional 2.222 hours of instruction
per week per annual average full-time equivalent student enrolled in
grades seven through twelve, based on the general education average
class sizes specified in (a) of this subsection.
(5) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition
to classroom teachers:

Elementary
School Middle
School High
School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level
administrators . . . . . . . . . . . .
1.253
1.353
1.880

Teacher librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology,
and media to support school library media programs . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.663
0.519
0.523

Health and social services:

School nurses . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.076 0.060 0.096

Social workers . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.042 0.006 0.015

Psychologists . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.017 0.002 0.007

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach and graduation
advising . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.493
((1.116))
1.616
((1.909))
2.409

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional
services provided by classified employees . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.936
0.700
0.652

Office support and other noninstructional aides . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.012 2.325 3.269

Custodians . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.657 1.942 2.965

Classified staff providing student and staff safety . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.079 0.092 0.141

((Parent involvement)) Family engagement coordinators . . . . . . . . . . . . ((0.00))
0.500 0.00 0.00

(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to
provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as
follows:

Staff per 1,000
K-12 students
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.628
Facilities, maintenance, and grounds . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.813
Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.332

(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district
to support certificated and classified staffing of central
administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under
subsections (4)(a) ((and)), (b), and (e) and (5) of this section and
(a) of this subsection.
(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to
school districts for career and technical education and skill center
administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified
in the omnibus appropriations act.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the minimum
allocation for each school district shall include allocations per
annual average full-time equivalent student for the following
materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted for inflation
from the 2008-09 school year:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $54.43
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $147.90
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $58.44
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $124.07
Instructional professional development for certified and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $9.04
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $73.27
Security and central office . . . . . . . . . . . . $50.76

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium, the minimum allocation for
((maintenance)) materials, supplies, and operating costs shall be
increased as specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The
following allocations, adjusted for inflation from the 2007-08 school
year, are provided in the 2015-16 school year, after which the
allocations shall be adjusted annually for inflation as specified in
the omnibus appropriations act:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $113.80
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $309.21
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $122.17
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $259.39
Instructional professional development for certificated and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $18.89
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $153.18
Security and central office administration . . . . . . . . . . . . $106.12

(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this
section, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based
on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:
(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students
in grades seven through twelve;
(b) Laboratory science courses for students in grades nine through
twelve;
(c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades nine through twelve offered in a high school; and
(d) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades eleven and twelve offered through a skill center.
(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this
section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs
and services:
(a) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
underachieving students through the learning assistance program under
RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the
district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for
free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum
allocation for each level of prototypical school for the program shall
provide ((for each level of prototypical school)) resources to provide,
on a statewide average, ((1.5156)) 2.000 hours per week in extra
instruction with a class size of fifteen learning assistance program
students per teacher.
(b) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students
whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be
based on the following:
(i) The head count number of students in each school who are
eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction
program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum
allocation ((for each level of prototypical school)) under this
subsection (10)(b)(i) shall provide resources to provide, on a
statewide average, ((4.7780)) the following hours per week in extra
instruction with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction program
students per teacher((. Notwithstanding other provisions of this
subsection (10), the actual per-student allocation may be scaled to
provide a larger allocation for students needing more intensive
intervention and a commensurate reduced allocation for students needing
less intensive intervention, as detailed in the omnibus appropriations
act)):

Hours per week
Grades K-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 4.778
Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 6.000
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 8.000

(ii) The head count number of students in each school who have
exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within the
previous two years based on their performance on the English
proficiency assessment approved by the superintendent of public
instruction under RCW 28A.180.090. The minimum allocation under this
subsection (10)(b)(ii) for each level of prototypical school shall
provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 3.000 hours per
week in extra instruction with fifteen exited transitional bilingual
instruction program students per teacher.
(iii) School districts may not receive allocations under both
(b)(i) and (ii) of this subsection for the same student in a single
school year.
(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for
highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030,
allocations shall be based on two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school district's full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs
shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590
hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen highly capable program
students per teacher.
(11) The allocations under subsections (4)(a) ((and)), (b), and
(e), (5), (6), and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided
under RCW 28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental
instructional resources for students with disabilities.
(12)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high
schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this
section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are
eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such
students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the
omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and
reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.
(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4),
(7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter
28A.700 RCW.
(13)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds
shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.
(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect.
(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each
month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall
be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional
hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the
present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review
of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the
common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.150.390 and 2010 c 236 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit to each
regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year a
programmed budget request for special education programs for students
with disabilities. Funding for programs operated by local school
districts shall be on an excess cost basis from appropriations provided
by the legislature for special education programs for students with
disabilities and shall take account of state funds accruing through RCW
28A.150.260 (4)(a) ((and)), (b), and (e), (5), (6), and (8).
(2) The excess cost allocation to school districts shall be based
on the following:
(a) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of students
ages birth through four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in
kindergarten who are eligible for and enrolled in special education,
multiplied by the district's base allocation per full-time equivalent
student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(b) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment, multiplied by the district's funded enrollment
percent, multiplied by the district's base allocation per full-time
equivalent student, multiplied by 0.9309.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Base allocation" means the total state allocation to all
schools in the district generated by the distribution formula under RCW
28A.150.260 (4)(a) ((and)), (b), and (e), (5), (6), and (8), to be
divided by the district's full-time equivalent enrollment.
(b) "Basic education enrollment" means enrollment of resident
students including nonresident students enrolled under RCW 28A.225.225
and students from nonhigh districts enrolled under RCW 28A.225.210 and
excluding students residing in another district enrolled as part of an
interdistrict cooperative program under RCW 28A.225.250.
(c) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding students ages birth
through four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in kindergarten,
as a percent of the district's annual average full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment.
(d) "Funded enrollment percent" means the lesser of the district's
actual enrollment percent or twelve and seven-tenths percent.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.180.030 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 6 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise:
(1) "Transitional bilingual instruction" means:
(a) A system of instruction which uses two languages, one of which
is English, as a means of instruction to build upon and expand language
skills to enable the pupil to achieve competency in English. Concepts
and information are introduced in the primary language and reinforced
in the second language: PROVIDED, That the program shall include
testing in the subject matter in English; or
(b) In those cases in which the use of two languages is not
practicable as established by the superintendent of public instruction
and unless otherwise prohibited by law, an alternative system of
instruction which may include English as a second language and is
designed to enable the pupil to achieve competency in English.
(2) "Primary language" means the language most often used by the
student for communication in his/her home.
(3) "Eligible pupil" means any enrollee of the school district
whose primary language is other than English and whose English language
skills are sufficiently deficient or absent to impair learning.
(4) "Exited pupil" means a student previously enrolled in the
transitional bilingual instruction program who is no longer eligible
for the program based on his or her performance on an English
proficiency assessment approved by the superintendent of public
instruction.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.180.040 and 2009 c 380 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every school district board of directors shall:
(a) Make available to each eligible pupil transitional bilingual
instruction to achieve competency in English, in accord with rules of
the superintendent of public instruction;
(b) Wherever feasible, ensure that communications to parents
emanating from the schools shall be appropriately bilingual for those
parents of pupils in the bilingual instruction program;
(c) Determine, by administration of an English test approved by the
superintendent of public instruction the number of eligible pupils
enrolled in the school district at the beginning of a school year and
thereafter during the year as necessary in individual cases;
(d) Ensure that a student who is a child of a military family in
transition and who has been assessed as in need of, or enrolled in, a
bilingual instruction program, the receiving school shall initially
honor placement of the student into a like program.
(i) The receiving school shall determine whether the district's
program is a like program when compared to the sending school's
program; and
(ii) The receiving school may conduct subsequent assessments
pursuant to RCW 28A.180.090 to determine appropriate placement and
continued enrollment in the program;
(e) Before the conclusion of each school year, measure each
eligible pupil's improvement in learning the English language by means
of a test approved by the superintendent of public instruction; ((and))
(f) Provide in-service training for teachers, counselors, and other
staff, who are involved in the district's transitional bilingual
program. Such training shall include appropriate instructional
strategies for children of culturally different backgrounds, use of
curriculum materials, and program models; and
(g) Make available a program of instructional support for up to two
years immediately after pupils exit from the program, for exited pupils
who need assistance in reaching grade-level performance in academic
subjects even though they have achieved English proficiency for
purposes of the transitional bilingual instructional program.
(2) The definitions in Article II of RCW 28A.705.010 apply to
subsection (1)(d) of this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2011 c 203 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except as
provided in RCW 28A.230.122 and except those equivalencies established
by local high schools or school districts under RCW 28A.230.097. The
purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that a student is ready
for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and
citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high
school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board
of education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements
for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and
technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to
a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized.
The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in
these programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of
academic achievement, complete the program and earn the program's
certificate or credential, and complete other state and local
graduation requirements.
(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high
school graduation requirements to the education committees of the
legislature for review and to the quality education council established
under RCW 28A.290.010. The legislature shall have the opportunity to
act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted
through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a
fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis
prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the
legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted
legislation.
(d) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement the
career and college ready graduation requirement proposal adopted under
board resolution on November 10, 2010, to take effect beginning with
students entering the ninth grade or beginning the equivalent of a
four-year high school program on or after July 1, 2015. The provisions
of chapter . . ., Laws of 2013 (this act) and the increased funding
allocated under RCW 28A.150.260 as amended by chapter . . ., Laws of
2013 (this act) constitute the funding by the legislature required
under this section to implement the proposal.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.165.015 and 2009 c 548 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) (("Approved program" means a program submitted to and approved
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction and conducted
pursuant to the plan that addresses the required elements as provided
for in this chapter.
(2))) "Basic skills areas" means reading, writing, and mathematics
as well as readiness associated with these skills.
(((3))) (2) "Participating student" means a student in kindergarten
through grade twelve who scores below standard for his or her grade
level on the statewide student assessments or other assessments
administered by the school or district and who is identified ((in)) by
the ((approved plan)) district to receive services.
(((4))) (3) "Statewide student assessments" means one or more of
the ((several basic skills assessments administered as part of the
state's student assessment system, and assessments in the basic skills
areas administered by local school districts)) assessments administered
by school districts as required under RCW 28A.655.070.
(((5))) (4) "Underachieving students" means students with the
greatest academic deficits in basic skills as identified by the
statewide, school, or district assessments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 28A.165
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Each school district receiving learning assistance program
funds must:
(a) Use one or more of the curricula or instructional programs
recommended by the office of the superintendent of public instruction
under this section to provide supplemental instruction to participating
students;
(b) Record each participating student in the statewide individual
student data system;
(c) Monitor and document the performance and progress of
participating students, using multiple sources of performance data.
When the office of the superintendent of public instruction has the
capacity to provide data on individual student growth or student growth
percentiles using the statewide student assessment, the school district
must include this data in its monitoring of the performance of
participating students;
(d) Conduct an annual evaluation of the program by analyzing the
performance data for participating students compared to the chosen
instructional strategies and curriculum, qualifications and training of
staff, and other relevant factors; and
(e) Prepare and submit to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction a year-end report on the learning assistance
program, using a common format prepared by the office. The office must
design the report so that information required in the report is not
already collected by the state through another source.
(2) The year-end report submitted by each district receiving
learning assistance program funds must include:
(a) The processes, assessments, and criteria used to identify the
underachieving students served by the program;
(b) The schools or sites that provided program services during the
year;
(c) Which recommended curricula or instructional programs were used
during the year and at which school or site;
(d) Summary data on total expenditures and average expenditures per
participating student attributable to learning assistance program
funds, by school or program site and at the district level;
(e) A summary of the annual evaluation for the program, including
a summary of the results of the district's analysis of performance data
for participating students; and
(f) The program changes the school district intends to make for the
ensuing year based on the evaluation results, and the outcomes expected
from those changes.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
publish a list of recommended supplemental curricula or instructional
programs for use in the learning assistance program. The office shall
compile the list in consultation with research organizations based on
research evidence indicating the curricula or instructional programs
are associated with increased student achievement. The office must
update the list periodically.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.165.055 and 2009 c 548 s 703 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Each school district with an approved program is eligible for
state funds provided for the learning assistance program.)) (1) The
funds for the learning assistance program shall be appropriated for the
learning assistance program and distributed to school districts in
accordance with RCW 28A.150.260 and the omnibus appropriations act.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section the
distribution formula is for school district allocation purposes only,
but funds appropriated for the learning assistance program must be
expended for the purposes of RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065.
(3)(a) School districts must allocate learning assistance program
funds to any school where more than fifty percent of the students are
eligible for free or reduced-price meals; and
(b) School districts must expend a greater amount per participating
student, on average, in schools where more than seventy-five percent of
the students are eligible for free or reduced-price meals, compared to
the amount expended per participating student in other schools in the
district.

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.165.065 and 2004 c 20 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
To ensure that school districts are meeting the requirements of
((an approved program)) this chapter, the superintendent of public
instruction shall monitor ((such)) learning assistance programs no less
than once every four years. ((Individual student records shall be
maintained at the school district.)) The primary purpose of program
monitoring is to evaluate the effectiveness of a district's allocation
and expenditure of resources, choice of curricula and instructional
programs, and other program components on improving student
achievement. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
may provide technical assistance to school districts to improve the
effectiveness of a learning assistance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.165.025 (School district program plan) and 2009 c 556
s 1 & 2004 c 20 s 3; and
(2) RCW 28A.165.045 (Plan approval process) and 2009 c 556 s 2 &
2004 c 20 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 3 through 6 and 8 through 12 of
this act take effect September 1, 2013.

--- END ---