BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 New start-up businesses in high-growth
economic sectors have significant potential to be future economic
engines for the state, positioning Washington to be a national leader
in the new knowledge economy. However, during the first few years of
development, start-ups can be stunted by the imposition of the business
and occupation tax. This tax, which is imposed on gross receipts,
tends to have a disproportionately negative impact on new businesses
that have yet to achieve profitability. The intent of the legislature
in exempting new businesses in certain key sectors of the knowledge
economy from the business and occupation tax is to create an economic
development tool that will promote and facilitate the location and
development of start-ups in Washington, encouraging entrepreneurs
inside and outside of the state to start new businesses here, in a
climate that can help them grow.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A new business, in computing the tax due under this chapter,
may deduct from the measure of the tax up to one million dollars in
each full calendar year, and a prorated portion for each partial
calendar year. The deduction is only allowed within the first thirty-six months of operation and after all other deductions have been
applied.
(2) A business is a new business eligible for the deduction
provided in subsection (1) of this section if all of the following
conditions are met:
(a) The business has not been in operation for longer than thirty-six months and has timely registered with the department as required
under RCW 82.32.030. For purposes of this section, a business begins
operating on the first day of the first month in which it has gross
income of the business, whether or not that income is taxable or
subject to tax in Washington;
(b) During the entire tax period in which any portion of the
deduction is claimed, the business has at least four permanent full-time employees who were residents of this state at the time of hiring;
and
(c) During the entire tax period in which any portion of the
deduction is claimed, the business is exclusively engaged in research,
development, design, engineering, or manufacturing of one or more of
the following:
(i) Computers, mobile devices, and related peripherals;
(ii) Software, excluding computer system design and services
related to networks and custom software;
(iii) Biotechnology, as defined in RCW 82.75.010(2);
(iv) Biotechnology products, as defined in RCW 82.75.010(3);
(v) Electronic medical or navigational testing, measurement, or
control instruments;
(vi) Pharmaceuticals;
(vii) Environmental technology, as defined in RCW 82.63.010(8);
(viii) Aerospace products, as defined in RCW 82.08.975;
(ix) Solar energy system components, as defined in RCW 82.04.294;
(x) Semiconductor materials and other electronic components;
(xi) Internet-based data storage technologies and search
technologies;
(xii) Industrial machinery for use in research, development,
design, engineering, manufacturing, or production of any of (c)(i)
through (xi) of this subsection; and
(xiii) Interactive gaming software and providing related digital
automated services.
(d) A business engaged in one or more of the activities of
research, development, design, engineering, or manufacturing of
products or technology in the areas identified in (c) of this
subsection may sell or license such products or technology, or provide
digital automated services related to interactive gaming software under
(c)(xiii) of this subsection, and still meet the requirement of
engaging exclusively in those activities in (c) of this subsection.
(3) A business eligible for the deduction provided in this section
must be a new business enterprise in Washington, which does not include
a business that:
(a) Has been reincorporated, restructured, reorganized, or
transferred, in whole or in part, from a business previously engaging
in activities that are substantially similar to those engaged in by the
new business;
(b) Is a new branch location or other facility of an existing
business, whether or not the new branch or facility is established as
a separate entity; or
(c) Is substantially similar to a business currently operated, or
a business that has been operated within the past five years, when the
majority of the beneficial ownership is the same.
(4) For purposes of this section, businesses or business activities
are presumed to be "substantially similar" if the businesses or
business activities are within the same North American industry
classification system group. The department may by rule provide
additional guidance consistent with the purpose of this section.
(5) An eligible new business must file an application, in the form
and manner required by the department, to qualify for the deduction
under this section. The department must rule on the application within
thirty days. The application is not limited to, but must include, the
following information:
(a) The name, tax registration number, and unified business
identifier number of the business;
(b) The name, tax registration number, and the unified business
identifier number, if any, of all direct and indirect beneficial owners
of the business;
(c) The physical address in zip code order of each facility owned
or operated by the business;
(d) The number of permanent full-time employees who were residents
of this state at the time of hiring and the number of permanent full-time employees who were residents of this state at the time of
application for the deduction; and
(e) A sworn statement, under penalty of perjury, that the applicant
believes the business to be a new business eligible for the credit and
that the business seeking to claim the deduction is not a business
that:
(i) Has been reincorporated, restructured, reorganized, or
transferred, in whole or in part, from a business previously engaging
in activities that are substantially similar to those engaged in by the
new business;
(ii) Is a new branch location or other facility of an existing
business, whether or not the new branch or facility is established as
a separate entity; or
(iii) Is substantially similar to a business currently operated, or
a business that has been operated within the past five years, when the
majority of the beneficial ownership is the same.
(6) Subject to the application requirements of subsections (5) and
(7) of this section, an eligible new business filing on a monthly or
quarterly basis may claim a deduction under this section for tax
reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 2013. Businesses
paying on an annual basis may claim a deduction under this section for
tax reporting periods beginning on or after January 1, 2013.
(7) No deduction is allowed under this section until after the
application required under subsection (5) of this section is filed and
approved by the department. The annual taxpayer savings available
statewide as a result of the deduction created under this section may
not exceed two million dollars per fiscal year.
(8) The legislature finds that accountability and the effectiveness
of attempts to foster job creation and retention are important aspects
of setting tax policy. In order to make policy choices regarding the
best use of limited state resources, the legislature needs to know how
the incentives are used, and the degree to which they meet the
legislature's intent. All persons claiming a tax preference under this
section must complete the annual survey with the department under RCW
82.32.585 for each year in which the tax preference is claimed, and for
three consecutive years after the last year in which the tax preference
is claimed. If a person fails to submit the required annual surveys
under this section, the department must declare the amount of the tax
preference claimed in the last calendar year in which the tax
preference was claimed to be immediately due with interest as required
under RCW 82.32.585.
(9) Unless earlier terminated as provided under subsection (7) of
this section, the tax preference created in this section expires on
December 31, 2018. No deduction may be claimed for any tax period
after December 31, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.136 RCW
to read as follows:
By December 31, 2019, the joint legislative audit and review
committee must submit a report to the legislature and the governor that
details the use, value, economic impact, and employment impact of the
new business tax preference created under section 2 of this act. The
report must include information for all preferences granted under
section 2 of this act through December 31, 2018, as well as information
for all businesses continuing to report data through the annual survey
as required under section 2(8) of this act. The department must
provide the joint legislative audit and review committee any
information requested in preparation of the report. As requested by
the committee, other agencies must also provide wage, employment,
benefits, and other information related to the economic impact of the
tax preference. The report is not limited to, but must include, an
analysis of:
(1) Growth of businesses that have received or are continuing to
receive the tax preference under section 2 of this act, as measured by
the following:
(a) The total capitalization of the businesses, and, for businesses
claiming the tax preference in multiple years, year-to-year changes in
the reported capitalization;
(b) The total number of employees of the businesses, and, for
businesses claiming the tax preference in multiple years, year-to-year
changes in the reported employment;
(c) The mean and median wages of employees of the businesses, and,
for businesses claiming the tax preference in multiple years, year-to-year changes in the reported mean and median wages; and
(d) The type and estimated economic value of other benefits
received by employees of the businesses;
(2) The relative success of the businesses receiving the tax
preference, as measured by the following:
(a) The failure rate of businesses receiving the tax preference
under section 2 of this act in comparison to the general business
failure rate for businesses in their first three years of operation in
the state;
(b) The growth of businesses claiming the tax preference under
section 2 of this act, as measured by the indicators set forth in
subsection (1) of this section, in comparison to comparable businesses
in other states and the nation;
(c) The rate of growth in industry sectors qualifying for the tax
preference under section 2 of this act, as compared to the historic
rate of growth in these industry sectors; and
(d) The rate of growth in industry sectors qualifying for the tax
preference under section 2 of this act in comparison to the rate of
growth in industry sectors not eligible for the tax preference under
section 2 of this act;
(3) The direct and indirect economic impact of businesses claiming
the tax preference on surrounding areas. The committee may contract
with innovate Washington or another entity capable of developing a
methodology and implementing it to determine the direct and indirect
economic impacts of the tax preference. This study should quantify, to
the greatest extent feasible, the state's return on investment for the
tax preference provided to start-ups under section 2 of this act, for
each dollar invested.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.32.585 and 2011 c 23 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Every person claiming a tax preference that requires a
survey under this section must file a complete annual survey with the
department.
(i) Except as provided in section 2 of this act or (a)(ii) of this
subsection, the survey is due by April 30th of the year following any
calendar year in which a person becomes eligible to claim the tax
preference that requires a survey under this section.
(ii) If the tax preference is a deferral of tax, the first survey
must be filed by April 30th of the calendar year following the calendar
year in which the investment project is certified by the department as
operationally complete, and a survey must be filed by April 30th of
each of the seven succeeding calendar years.
(b) The department may extend the due date for timely filing of
annual surveys under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.
(2)(a) The survey must include the amount of the tax preference
claimed for the calendar year covered by the survey. For a person that
claimed an exemption provided in RCW 82.08.025651 or 82.12.025651, the
survey must include the amount of tax exempted under those sections in
the prior calendar year for each general area or category of research
and development for which exempt machinery and equipment and labor and
services were acquired in the prior calendar year.
(b) The survey must also include the following information for
employment positions in Washington, not to include names of employees,
for the year that the tax preference was claimed:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) For persons claiming the tax preference provided under chapter
82.60 or 82.63 RCW, the survey must also include the number of new
products or research projects by general classification, and the number
of trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with activities at
the investment project.
(d) For persons claiming the credit provided under RCW 82.04.4452,
the survey must also include the qualified research and development
expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit was claimed,
the taxable amount during the calendar year for which the credit was
claimed, the number of new products or research projects by general
classification, the number of trademarks, patents, and copyrights
associated with the research and development activities for which the
credit was claimed, and whether the tax preference has been assigned,
and who assigned the credit. The definitions in RCW 82.04.4452 apply
to this subsection (2)(d).
(e) For persons claiming the tax exemption in RCW 82.08.025651 or
82.12.025651, the survey must also include the general areas or
categories of research and development for which machinery and
equipment and labor and services were acquired, exempt from tax under
RCW 82.08.025651 or 82.12.025651, in the prior calendar year.
(f) For persons claiming the tax preference provided in section 2
of this act, the survey must also include the amount of initial and
ongoing capital investments in the business inside and outside the
state. Capital investment means land, structures, and depreciable
property.
(g) If the person filing a survey under this section did not file
a survey with the department in the previous calendar year, the survey
filed under this section must also include the employment, wage, and
benefit information required under (b)(i) through (iv) of this
subsection for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar
year for which a tax preference was claimed.
(3) As part of the annual survey, the department may request
additional information necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the tax preference.
(4) All information collected under this section, except the
information required in subsection (2)(a) of this section, is deemed
taxpayer information under RCW 82.32.330. Information required in
subsection (2)(a) of this section is not subject to the confidentiality
provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon
request, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section. If the
amount of the tax preference claimed as reported on the survey is
different than the amount actually claimed or otherwise allowed by the
department based on the taxpayer's excise tax returns or other
information known to the department, the amount actually claimed or
allowed may be disclosed.
(5) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax reduced or saved
is less than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the
survey may request the department to treat the amount of the tax
reduction or savings as confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(6)(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a
tax preference that requires an annual survey under this section but
fails to submit a complete annual survey by the due date of the survey
or any extension under RCW 82.32.590, the department must declare the
amount of the tax preference claimed for the previous calendar year to
be immediately due. If the tax preference is a deferral of tax, twelve
and one-half percent of the deferred tax is immediately due. If the
economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee, the lessee is
responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has received the
economic benefit.
(b) The department must assess interest, but not penalties, on the
amounts due under this subsection. The interest must be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter,
retroactively to the date the tax preference was claimed, and accrues
until the taxes for which the tax preference was claimed are repaid.
Amounts due under this subsection are not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request.
(7) The department must use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must
report these statistics to the legislature each year by October 1st.
(8) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also
includes the state and its departments and institutions.
(b) "Tax preference" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and
includes only the tax preferences requiring a survey under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act expires December 31, 2020.

--- END ---