BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.19.075 and 2009 c 84 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Reasons for deviation from the standard calculation include but
are not limited to the following:
(a) Sources of income and tax planning. The court may deviate from
the standard calculation after consideration of the following:
(i) Income of a new spouse or new domestic partner if the parent
who is married to the new spouse or in a partnership with a new
domestic partner is asking for a deviation based on any other reason.
Income of a new spouse or new domestic partner is not, by itself, a
sufficient reason for deviation;
(ii) Income of other adults in the household if the parent who is
living with the other adult is asking for a deviation based on any
other reason. Income of the other adults in the household is not, by
itself, a sufficient reason for deviation;
(iii) Child support actually received from other relationships;
(iv) Gifts;
(v) Prizes;
(vi) Possession of wealth, including but not limited to savings,
investments, real estate holdings and business interests, vehicles,
boats, pensions, bank accounts, insurance plans, or other assets;
(vii) Extraordinary income of a child;
(viii) Tax planning considerations. A deviation for tax planning
may be granted only if the child would not receive a lesser economic
benefit due to the tax planning; or
(ix) Income that has been excluded under RCW 26.19.071(4)(((h)))
(i) if the person earning that income asks for a deviation for any
other reason.
(b) Nonrecurring income. The court may deviate from the standard
calculation based on a finding that a particular source of income
included in the calculation of the basic support obligation is not a
recurring source of income. Depending on the circumstances,
nonrecurring income may include overtime, contract-related benefits,
bonuses, or income from second jobs. Deviations for nonrecurring
income shall be based on a review of the nonrecurring income received
in the previous two calendar years.
(c) Debt and high expenses. The court may deviate from the
standard calculation after consideration of the following expenses:
(i) Extraordinary debt not voluntarily incurred;
(ii) A significant disparity in the living costs of the parents due
to conditions beyond their control;
(iii) Special needs of disabled children;
(iv) Special medical, educational, or psychological needs of the
children; or
(v) Costs incurred or anticipated to be incurred by the parents in
compliance with court-ordered reunification efforts under chapter 13.34
RCW or under a voluntary placement agreement with an agency supervising
the child.
(d) ((Residential schedule. The court may deviate from the
standard calculation if the child spends a significant amount of time
with the parent who is obligated to make a support transfer payment.
The court may not deviate on that basis if the deviation will result in
insufficient funds in the household receiving the support to meet the
basic needs of the child or if the child is receiving temporary
assistance for needy families. When determining the amount of the
deviation, the court shall consider evidence concerning the increased
expenses to a parent making support transfer payments resulting from
the significant amount of time spent with that parent and shall
consider the decreased expenses, if any, to the party receiving the
support resulting from the significant amount of time the child spends
with the parent making the support transfer payment.
(e))) Children from other relationships. The court may deviate
from the standard calculation when either or both of the parents before
the court have children from other relationships to whom the parent
owes a duty of support.
(i) The child support schedule shall be applied to the mother,
father, and children of the family before the court to determine the
presumptive amount of support.
(ii) Children from other relationships shall not be counted in the
number of children for purposes of determining the basic support
obligation and the standard calculation.
(iii) When considering a deviation from the standard calculation
for children from other relationships, the court may consider only
other children to whom the parent owes a duty of support. The court
may consider court-ordered payments of child support for children from
other relationships only to the extent that the support is actually
paid.
(iv) When the court has determined that either or both parents have
children from other relationships, deviations under this section shall
be based on consideration of the total circumstances of both
households. All child support obligations paid, received, and owed for
all children shall be disclosed and considered.
(2) All income and resources of the parties before the court, new
spouses or new domestic partners, and other adults in the households
shall be disclosed and considered as provided in this section. The
presumptive amount of support shall be determined according to the
child support schedule. Unless specific reasons for deviation are set
forth in the written findings of fact and are supported by the
evidence, the court shall order each parent to pay the amount of
support determined by using the standard calculation.
(3) The court shall enter findings that specify reasons for any
deviation or any denial of a party's request for any deviation from the
standard calculation made by the court. The court shall not consider
reasons for deviation until the court determines the standard
calculation for each parent.
(4) When reasons exist for deviation, the court shall exercise
discretion in considering the extent to which the factors would affect
the support obligation.
(5) Agreement of the parties is not by itself adequate reason for
any deviations from the standard calculation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 26.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The court shall make an adjustment to the standard calculation
for a shared residential schedule subject to the provisions in this
section.
(2) An adjustment to the standard calculation based on the
residential schedule may be made if there is a court order or findings
made by an administrative law judge regarding the number of overnights
the child or children spend with the obligor parent, and the number of
overnights allocated to the obligor is equivalent to at least fourteen
percent of annual overnights. The number of overnights in the court
order or administrative law judge's findings must be used to calculate
the residential adjustment. The findings made by an administrative law
judge may be based upon a written agreement between the parents or upon
sworn testimony provided by a party at the administrative hearing for
child support.
(3) The residential schedule adjustment must be based on the table
in section 3 of this act and the worksheet for calculating residential
credit, and must be determined as follows:
(a) Using the residential time table in section 3 of this act,
determine the appropriate figure in the TOTAL column for the number of
overnights of the obligor parent, and multiply this figure by the basic
child support obligation to determine the average monthly expenses
incurred during parenting time.
(b) Using the residential time table in section 3 of this act,
determine the appropriate figure in the DUPLICATED column based on the
number of overnights of the obligor parent, and multiply this figure by
the basic child support obligation to determine the average monthly
duplicated expenses.
(c) Determine the obligor parent's share of duplicated expenses by
multiplying the obligor parent's percentage share of the combined
monthly net income by the average monthly duplicated expenses
calculated under (b) of this subsection.
(d) Calculate the residential schedule adjustment by subtracting
the obligor parent's share of duplicated expenses, as determined under
(c) of this subsection, from the average monthly expenses during
parenting time, as determined under (a) of this subsection.
(e) The standard calculation must be adjusted by the amount of the
residential schedule adjustment in (d) of this subsection.
(4) An adjustment may not be made to the standard calculation based
on the shared residential schedule if:
(a) The adjustment would result in insufficient funds in the
household receiving the support transfer payment to meet the basic
needs of the child;
(b) The obligee's net income before receiving the support transfer
payment is at or below one hundred twenty-five percent of the federal
poverty level guidelines for one person; or
(c) The child is receiving temporary assistance for needy families.
(5) To help parties estimate the residential schedule adjustment,
the division of child support shall, if feasible and within available
resources, create a residential schedule adjustment calculator
available online.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 26.19 RCW
to read as follows:
Residential time table. The TOTAL column represents the
anticipated total out-of-pocket expenses expressed as a percentage of
the basic child support obligation that will be incurred by the parent
who will pay child support. The total expenses are the sum of
transferred and duplicated expenses. The DUPLICATED column represents
the duplicated expenses and reflects the assumption that when there is
an equal sharing of residential time, fifty percent of the basic child
support obligation will be duplicated. The number of annual overnights
column will determine the particular fractions of TOTAL and DUPLICATED
to be used in the residential time credit worksheet.

ANNUAL OVERNIGHTS

FROM TO TOTAL DUPLICATED

1 51 0.000 0.000

52 55 0.062 0.011

56 60 0.070 0.014

61 65 0.080 0.020

66 70 0.093 0.028

71 75 0.108 0.038

76 80 0.127 0.052

81 85 0.150 0.070

86 90 0.178 0.093

91 95 0.211 0.122

96 100 0.250 0.156

101 105 0.294 0.195

106 110 0.341 0.237

111 115 0.388 0.280

116 120 0.434 0.321

121 125 0.476 0.358

126 130 0.513 0.390

131 135 0.544 0.417

136 140 0.570 0.438

141 145 0.591 0.454

146 150 0.609 0.467

151 155 0.623 0.476

156 160 0.634 0.483

161 165 0.644 0.488

166 170 0.652 0.491

171 175 0.660 0.494

176 180 0.666 0.495

181 183 0.675 0.500

Sec. 4 RCW 26.09.170 and 2010 c 279 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 26.09.070(7), the
provisions of any decree respecting maintenance or support may be
modified: (a) Only as to installments accruing subsequent to the
petition for modification or motion for adjustment except motions to
compel court-ordered adjustments, which shall be effective as of the
first date specified in the decree for implementing the adjustment;
and, (b) except as otherwise provided in this section, only upon a
showing of a substantial change of circumstances. The provisions as to
property disposition may not be revoked or modified, unless the court
finds the existence of conditions that justify the reopening of a
judgment under the laws of this state.
(2) Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the
decree the obligation to pay future maintenance is terminated upon the
death of either party or the remarriage of the party receiving
maintenance or registration of a new domestic partnership of the party
receiving maintenance.
(3) Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the
decree, provisions for the support of a child are terminated by
emancipation of the child or by the death of the parent obligated to
support the child.
(4) Unless expressly provided by an order of the superior court or
a court of comparable jurisdiction, provisions for the support of a
child are terminated upon the marriage or registration of a domestic
partnership to each other of parties to a paternity order, or upon the
remarriage or registration of a domestic partnership to each other of
parties to a decree of dissolution. The remaining provisions of the
order, including provisions establishing paternity, remain in effect.
(5)(a) A party to an order of child support may petition for a
modification based upon a showing of substantially changed
circumstances at any time.
(b) An obligor's voluntary unemployment or voluntary
underemployment, by itself, is not a substantial change of
circumstances.
(6) An order of child support may be modified one year or more
after it has been entered without a showing of substantially changed
circumstances:
(a) If the order in practice works a severe economic hardship on
either party or the child;
(b) If a party requests an adjustment in an order for child support
which was based on guidelines which determined the amount of support
according to the child's age, and the child is no longer in the age
category on which the current support amount was based;
(c) If a child is still in high school, upon a finding that there
is a need to extend support beyond the eighteenth birthday to complete
high school; ((or))
(d) To add an automatic adjustment of support provision consistent
with RCW 26.09.100; or
(e) When any residential schedule adjustment that was made pursuant
to section 2 of this act is no longer accurate because, for a period of
at least six months, the child's residential time with the parents
varies from that set out in the child support order granting the
residential schedule adjustment, in an amount sufficient to change the
transfer payment by at least fifty dollars per month.
(7)(a) If twenty-four months have passed from the date of the entry
of the order or the last adjustment or modification, whichever is
later, the order may be adjusted without a showing of substantially
changed circumstances based upon:
(i) Changes in the income of the parents; or
(ii) Changes in the economic table or standards in chapter 26.19
RCW.
(b) Either party may initiate the adjustment by filing a motion and
child support worksheets.
(c) If the court adjusts or modifies a child support obligation
pursuant to this subsection by more than thirty percent and the change
would cause significant hardship, the court may implement the change in
two equal increments, one at the time of the entry of the order and the
second six months from the entry of the order. Twenty-four months must
pass following the second change before a motion for another adjustment
under this subsection may be filed.
(8)(a) The department of social and health services may file an
action to modify or adjust an order of child support if public
assistance money is being paid to or for the benefit of the child and
the child support order is at least twenty-five percent above or below
the appropriate child support amount set forth in the standard
calculation as defined in RCW 26.19.011 and reasons for the deviation
are not set forth in the findings of fact or order.
(b) The department of social and health services may file an action
to modify or adjust an order of child support in a nonassistance case
if:
(i) The child support order is at least twenty-five percent above
or below the appropriate child support amount set forth in the standard
calculation as defined in RCW 26.19.011;
(ii) The department has determined the case meets the department's
review criteria; and
(iii) A party to the order or another state or jurisdiction has
requested a review.
(c) The determination of twenty-five percent or more shall be based
on the current income of the parties and the department shall not be
required to show a substantial change of circumstances if the reasons
for the deviations were not set forth in the findings of fact or order.
(9) The department of social and health services may file an action
to modify or adjust an order of child support under subsections (5)
through (7) of this section if:
(a) Public assistance money is being paid to or for the benefit of
the child;
(b) A party to the order in a nonassistance case has requested a
review; or
(c) Another state or jurisdiction has requested a modification of
the order.
(10) If testimony other than affidavit is required in any
proceeding under this section, a court of this state shall permit a
party or witness to be deposed or to testify under penalty of perjury
by telephone, audiovisual means, or other electronic means, unless good
cause is shown.

Sec. 5 RCW 26.19.050 and 2005 c 282 s 37 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The administrative office of the courts shall develop and adopt
worksheets and instructions to assist the parties and courts in
establishing the appropriate child support level and apportionment of
support. The administrative office of the courts shall develop and
adopt a worksheet for calculating the residential schedule adjustment
that is consistent with section 2 of this act. The administrative
office of the courts shall attempt to the greatest extent possible to
make the worksheets and instructions understandable by persons who are
not represented by legal counsel.
(2) The administrative office of the courts shall develop and adopt
standards for the printing of worksheets and shall establish a process
for certifying printed worksheets. The administrator may maintain a
register of sources for approved worksheets.
(3) The administrative office of the courts should explore methods
to assist pro se parties and judges in the courtroom to calculate
support payments through automated software, equipment, or personal
assistance.

--- END ---