BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.28.150 and 1997 c 452 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
To carry out the purposes of this chapter, including but not
limited to, financing loans or grants to nonprofit organizations or
public housing authorities for: Affordable workforce housing within
one-half mile of a transit station; or tourism promotion, any
municipality ((shall have)) has the power to issue general obligation
bonds within the limitations now or hereafter prescribed by the laws of
this state. Such general obligation bonds ((shall)) must be
authorized, executed, issued, and made payable as other general
obligation bonds of such municipality((: PROVIDED, That)). However,
the governing body of such municipality may provide that such bonds
mature in not to exceed forty years from the date of their issue, may
provide that such bonds also be made payable from any special taxes
provided for in this chapter, and may provide that such bonds also be
made payable from any otherwise unpledged revenue, which may be derived
from the ownership or operation of any properties.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.28.160 and 1997 c 452 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To carry out the purposes of this chapter, including but not
limited to, financing a fund to make loans or grants to nonprofit
organizations or public housing authorities for: Affordable workforce
housing within one-half mile of a transit station; or tourism
promotion, the legislative body of any municipality ((shall have)) has
the power to issue revenue bonds without submitting the matter to the
voters of the municipality((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the
legislative body ((shall)) must create a special fund or funds for the
sole purpose of paying the principal of and interest on the bonds of
each such issue, into which fund or funds the legislative body may
obligate the municipality to pay all or part of amounts collected from
the special taxes provided for in this chapter, and/or to pay such
amounts of the gross revenue of all or any part of the facilities
constructed, acquired, improved, added to, repaired, or replaced
pursuant to this chapter, as the legislative body ((shall))
determines((: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That)). The principal of and
interest on such bonds ((shall be)) is payable only out of such special
fund or funds, and the owners of such bonds ((shall)) must have a lien
and charge against the gross revenue pledged to such fund.
((Such)) (a) The revenue bonds and the interest thereon issued
against ((such)) the fund or funds ((shall)) constitutes a claim of the
owners thereof only as against such fund or funds and the revenue
pledged therefor, and ((shall)) does not constitute a general
indebtedness of the municipality.
(b) Each ((such)) revenue bond ((shall)) must state upon its face
that it is payable from such special fund or funds, and all revenue
bonds issued under this chapter ((shall be)) are negotiable securities
within the provisions of the law of this state. ((Such)) The revenue
bonds may be registered either as to principal only or as to principal
and interest as provided in RCW 39.46.030, or may be bearer bonds((;
shall)). The revenue bonds must be:
(i) In such denominations as the legislative body ((shall)) deems
proper; ((shall be))
(ii) Payable at such time or times and at such places, as ((shall
be)) determined by the legislative body; ((shall be)) and
(iii) Executed in such manner and bear interest at such rate or
rates, as ((shall be)) determined by the legislative body.
((Such)) (c) The revenue bonds ((shall)) must be sold in such
manner as the legislative body ((shall)) deems to be for the best
interests of the municipality, either at public or private sale.
(d) The legislative body may at the time of the issuance of
((such)) the revenue bonds make ((such)) covenants with the owners of
((said)) such bonds as it may deem necessary to secure and guaranty the
payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, including
but not being limited to covenants to set aside adequate reserves to
secure or guaranty the payment of such principal and interest, to
pledge and apply thereto part or all of any lawfully authorized special
taxes provided for in this chapter, to maintain rates, charges, or
rentals sufficient with other available moneys to pay such principal
and interest and to maintain adequate coverage over debt service, to
appoint a trustee or trustees for the bond owners, to safeguard the
expenditure of the proceeds of sale of such bonds and to fix the powers
and duties of such trustee or trustees and to make such other covenants
as the legislative body may deem necessary to accomplish the most
advantageous sale of such bonds. The legislative body may also provide
that revenue bonds payable out of the same source may later be issued
on a parity with revenue bonds being issued and sold.
(e) The legislative body may include in the principal amount of any
such revenue bond issue an amount for engineering, architectural,
planning, financial, legal, and other services and charges incident to
the acquisition or construction of public stadium facilities,
convention center facilities, performing arts center facilities, and/or
visual arts center facilities, an amount to establish necessary
reserves, an amount for working capital and an amount necessary for
interest during the period of construction of any facilities to be
financed from the proceeds of such issue plus six months. The
legislative body may, if it deems it in the best interest of the
municipality, provide in any contract for the construction or
acquisition of any facilities or additions or improvements thereto or
replacements or extensions thereof that payment therefor ((shall)) may
be made only in such revenue bonds.
(f) If the municipality ((shall)) fails to carry out or perform any
of its obligations or covenants made in the authorization, issuance,
and sale of such bonds, the owner of any such bond may bring action
against the municipality and compel the performance of any or all of
such covenants.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds may
be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.28.180 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 38 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions set forth in subsections (2) and (3)
of this section, the legislative body of any county or any city, is
authorized to levy and collect a special excise tax of not to exceed
two percent on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging
that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW.
(2) Any levy authorized by this section is subject to the
following:
(a) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this
section must contain, in addition to all other provisions required to
conform to this chapter, a provision allowing a credit against the
county tax for the full amount of any city tax imposed pursuant to this
section upon the same taxable event.
(b)(i) In the event that any county has levied the tax authorized
by this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, either pledged the tax
revenues for payment of principal and interest on city revenue or
general obligation bonds authorized and issued pursuant to RCW
67.28.150 through 67.28.160 or has authorized and issued revenue or
general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150
through 67.28.160, such county is exempt from the provisions of (a) of
this subsection, to the extent that the tax revenues are pledged for
payment of principal and interest on bonds issued at any time pursuant
to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160. However, so much
of such pledged tax revenues, together with any investment earnings
thereon, not immediately necessary for actual payment of principal and
interest on such bonds may be used: (A) In any county with a
population of one million five hundred thousand or more, for repayment
either of limited tax levy general obligation bonds or of any county
fund or account from which a loan was made, the proceeds from the bonds
or loan being used to pay for constructing, installing, improving, and
equipping stadium capital improvement projects, and to pay for any
engineering, planning, financial, legal and professional services
incident to the development of such stadium capital improvement
projects, regardless of the date the debt for such capital improvement
projects was or may be incurred; (B) in any county with a population of
one million five hundred thousand or more, for repayment or refinancing
of bonded indebtedness incurred prior to January 1, 1997, for any
purpose authorized by this section or relating to stadium repairs or
rehabilitation, including but not limited to the cost of settling legal
claims, reimbursing operating funds, interest payments on short-term
loans, and any other purpose for which such debt has been incurred if
the county has created a public stadium authority to develop a stadium
and exhibition center under RCW 36.102.030; or (C) in other counties,
for county-owned facilities for agricultural promotion until January 1,
2009, and thereafter for any purpose authorized in this chapter.
(ii) A county is exempt under this subsection with respect to city
revenue or general obligation bonds issued after April 1, 1991, only if
such bonds mature before January 1, 2013. If any county located east
of the crest of the Cascade mountains has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, pledged the tax revenue
for payment of principal and interest on city revenue or general
obligation bonds, the county is exempt under this subsection with
respect to revenue or general obligation bonds issued after January 1,
2007, only if the bonds mature before January 1, 2035. Such a county
may only use funds under this subsection (2)(b) for constructing or
improving facilities authorized under this chapter, including county-owned facilities for agricultural promotion.
(iii) As used in this subsection (2)(b), "capital improvement
projects" may include, but not be limited to a stadium restaurant
facility, restroom facilities, artificial turf system, seating
facilities, parking facilities and scoreboard and information system
adjacent to or within a county owned stadium, together with equipment,
utilities, accessories and appurtenances necessary thereto. The
stadium restaurant authorized by this subsection (2)(b) must be
operated by a private concessionaire under a contract with the county.
(c)(i) No city within a county exempt under (b) of this subsection
may levy the tax authorized by this section so long as said county is
so exempt.
(ii) No city within a county with a population of one million five
hundred thousand or more may levy the tax authorized by this section.
(iii) However, in the event that any city in a county described in
(c)(i) or (ii) of this subsection (2) has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, authorized and issued
revenue or general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of RCW
67.28.150 through 67.28.160, such city may levy the tax so long as the
tax revenues are pledged for payment of principal and interest on bonds
issued at any time pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through
67.28.160.
(3) Any levy authorized by this section by a county that has a
population of one million five hundred thousand or more is subject to
the following:
(a) Taxes collected under this section in any calendar year before
2013 in excess of five million three hundred thousand dollars may only
be used as follows:
(i) Seventy percent from January 1, 2001, through December 31,
2012, for art museums, cultural museums, heritage museums, the arts,
and the performing arts. Moneys spent under this subsection (3)(a)(i)
must be used for the purposes of this subsection (3)(a)(i) in all parts
of the county.
(ii) Thirty percent from January 1, 2001, through December 31,
2012, for the following purposes and in a manner reflecting the
following order of priority: Stadium purposes as authorized under
subsection (2)(b) of this section; acquisition of open space lands;
youth sports activities; and tourism promotion. If all or part of the
debt on the stadium is refinanced, all revenues under this subsection
(3)(a)(ii) must be used to retire the debt.
(b) From January 1, 2013, through December 31, 2015, all revenues
under this section ((shall)) must be used to retire the debt on the
stadium, until the debt on the stadium is retired. On and after the
date the debt on the stadium is retired, and through December 31, 2015,
all revenues under this section in a county of one million five hundred
thousand or more must be deposited in the special account under (e) of
this subsection.
(c) From January 1, 2016, through December 31, 2020, all revenues
under this section must be deposited in the stadium and exhibition
center account under RCW 43.99N.060.
(d) On and after January 1, 2021, the revenues under this section
must be used as follows:
(i) At least thirty-seven and one-half percent of the revenues
under this section must be deposited in the special account under (e)
of this subsection.
(ii) At least thirty-seven and one-half percent of the revenues
under this section must be used for contracts, loans, or grants to
nonprofit organizations or public housing authorities for affordable
workforce housing within one-half of a mile of a transit station, as
described under RCW 9.91.025 or for services for homeless youth, or to
repay general obligation bonds issued pursuant to RCW 67.28.150 to
finance such contracts, loans, or grants or revenue bonds issued
pursuant to RCW 67.28.160 to finance a fund to make such contracts,
loans, or grants.
(iii) The remainder must be used for ((capital or operating
programs that promote tourism and attract tourists to the county))
loans or grants to fund capital or operating programs for tourism
promotion, or to repay general obligation or revenue bonds issued
pursuant to RCW 67.28.150 and 67.28.160 to finance such contracts,
loans, or grants. The county must conduct an open and transparent
public process with input from tourism industry stakeholders in the
allocation method or selection process for these revenues.
(e) At least forty percent of the revenues distributed pursuant to
(a)(i) of this subsection must be deposited in a special account. The
account may only be used for the purposes of (a)(i) of this subsection.
(f) School districts and schools may not receive revenues
distributed pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection.
(g) Moneys distributed to art museums, cultural museums, heritage
museums, the arts, and the performing arts, and moneys distributed for
tourism promotion must be in addition to and may not be used to replace
or supplant any other funding by the legislative body of the county.
(h) For the purposes of this section:
(i) "Affordable workforce housing" means housing for a single
person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose income is
between thirty percent and eighty percent of the median income,
adjusted for household size, for the county where the housing is
located; and
(ii) "Tourism promotion" includes activities or facilities intended
to attract visitors for overnight stays, arts, heritage, and cultural
events, and recreational, professional, and amateur sports events.
Moneys allocated to tourism promotion in a county with a population of
one million or more must be allocated to local public organizations and
nonprofit organizations formed for the express purpose of tourism
promotion in the county. Such organizations must use moneys from the
taxes to promote events in all parts of the county.
(i) No taxes collected under this section may be used for the
operation or maintenance of a public stadium that is financed directly
or indirectly by bonds to which the tax is pledged. Expenditures for
operation or maintenance include all expenditures other than
expenditures that directly result in new fixed assets or that directly
increase the capacity, life span, or operating economy of existing
fixed assets.
(j) No ad valorem property taxes may be used for debt service on
bonds issued for a public stadium that is financed by bonds to which
the tax is pledged, unless the taxes collected under this section are
or are projected to be insufficient to meet debt service requirements
on such bonds.
(k) If a substantial part of the operation and management of a
public stadium that is financed directly or indirectly by bonds to
which the tax is pledged is performed by a nonpublic entity or if a
public stadium is sold that is financed directly or indirectly by bonds
to which the tax is pledged, any bonds to which the tax is pledged
((shall)) must be retired. This subsection (3)(k) does not apply in
respect to a public stadium under chapter 36.102 RCW transferred to,
owned by, or constructed by a public facilities district under chapter
36.100 RCW or a stadium and exhibition center.
(l) The county may not lease a public stadium that is financed
directly or indirectly by bonds to which the tax is pledged to, or
authorize the use of the public stadium by, a professional major league
sports franchise unless the sports franchise gives the right of first
refusal to purchase the sports franchise, upon its sale, to local
government. This subsection (3)(l) does not apply to contracts in
existence on April 1, 1986.
(4) If a court of competent jurisdiction declares any provision of
subsection (3) of this section invalid, then that invalid provision is
null and void and the remainder of this section is not affected.

--- END ---