BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 81.77 RCW
to read as follows:
The following records that solid waste collection companies file
with the commission under the authority granted by this chapter and
chapters 81.04 and 81.16 RCW, and that the commission uses for
reviewing the rates of solid waste collection companies, are exempt
from disclosure under the public records act, chapter 42.56 RCW:
(1) Records of activities that are not subject to commission rate
regulation; and
(2) Records of affiliated interests, as defined in RCW 81.16.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.330 and 2012 c 68 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to public utilities and
transportation is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission
or attorney general under RCW 80.04.095 that a court has determined are
confidential under RCW 80.04.095;
(2) The residential addresses and residential telephone numbers of
the customers of a public utility contained in the records or lists
held by the public utility of which they are customers, except that
this information may be released to the division of child support or
the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another
state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, for the
establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order;
(3) The names, residential addresses, residential telephone
numbers, and other individually identifiable records held by an agency
in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or other ride-sharing program or
service; however, these records may be disclosed to other persons who
apply for ride-matching services and who need that information in order
to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share rides;
(4) The personally identifying information of current or former
participants or applicants in a paratransit or other transit service
operated for the benefit of persons with disabilities or elderly
persons;
(5) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transit passes or other fare payment media including, but not
limited to, stored value smart cards and magnetic strip cards, except
that an agency may disclose personally identifying information to a
person, employer, educational institution, or other entity that is
responsible, in whole or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring
or using a transit pass or other fare payment media for the purpose of
preventing fraud, or to the news media when reporting on public
transportation or public safety. As used in this subsection,
"personally identifying information" includes acquisition or use
information pertaining to a specific, individual transit pass or fare
payment media.
(a) Information regarding the acquisition or use of transit passes
or fare payment media may be disclosed in aggregate form if the data
does not contain any personally identifying information.
(b) Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies if the request is accompanied by a court order;
(6) Any information obtained by governmental agencies that is
collected by the use of a motor carrier intelligent transportation
system or any comparable information equipment attached to a truck,
tractor, or trailer; however, the information may be given to other
governmental agencies or the owners of the truck, tractor, or trailer
from which the information is obtained. As used in this subsection,
"motor carrier" has the same definition as provided in RCW 81.80.010;
(7) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transponders or other technology to facilitate payment of
tolls. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form as long as
the data does not contain any personally identifying information. For
these purposes aggregate data may include the census tract of the
account holder as long as any individual personally identifying
information is not released. Personally identifying information may be
released to law enforcement agencies only for toll enforcement
purposes. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies for other purposes only if the request is
accompanied by a court order; ((and))
(8) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use a driver's license or identicard that includes a radio
frequency identification chip or similar technology to facilitate
border crossing. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form
as long as the data does not contain any personally identifying
information. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies only for United States customs and border
protection enforcement purposes. Personally identifying information
may be released to law enforcement agencies for other purposes only if
the request is accompanied by a court order; and
(9) Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission
by a solid waste collection company in the context of a tariff filing
under chapter 81.04, 81.06, or 81.77 RCW, when such documents:
(a) Concern activities of the solid waste collection company that
are not subject to rate regulation by the commission; or
(b) Are documents of affiliated interests.

--- END ---