BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a school speed zone is created under RCW 46.61.440, the
proper authority listed in subsection (2) of this section must install
and maintain a sign indicating the end of the school speed zone. The
sign must be installed on a state highway, county road, or city street
if the beginning of the school speed zone is also marked. Such signs
must be installed by January 1, 2015.
(2)(a) If a sign must be installed pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section on a state highway, the department of transportation must
provide for the installation and continued maintenance of the sign.
(b) If a sign must be installed pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section on a county road, the county must provide for the installation
and continued maintenance of the sign.
(c) If a sign must be installed pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section on a city street, the city or town that has jurisdiction over
the city street must provide for the installation and continued
maintenance of the sign.
(3) A sign mandated under subsection (1) of this section must
conform to the "END SCHOOL ZONE" sign illustrated as sign S5-2 in
figure 7B-1 of the "Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices." Such
signs must comply with the "Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices,"
as adopted by the department, including rules regarding the minimum
size of such a sign and the minimum mounting height. A sign required
by this section may be installed on a sign assembly that is already
placed at the boundary of a school speed zone.

--- END ---