BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the offering of
affordable health care to Washington residents is a critical public
policy objective. The legislature further finds that as the affordable
care act is fully implemented, it is critical that quality health care
coverage continue to be available to residents of the state. The
legislature further finds that association health care plans are an
important means of delivering quality and affordable health care
coverage and that continuation of such plans will help mitigate the
costs of implementing the affordable care act. Therefore, the
legislature declares that association health care plans meeting certain
standards should be continued as a means of providing health care as
the affordable care act is implemented.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.21.047 and 2010 c 292 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An insurer may not offer any health benefit plan to any small
employer without complying with RCW 48.21.045(3).
(2) Employers purchasing health plans provided through associations
or through member-governed groups formed specifically for the purpose
of purchasing health care are not small employers and the plans are not
subject to RCW 48.21.045(3).
(3) For plan years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, health
plans provided through associations or member-governed groups are
deemed large group health benefit plans, if the association or member-governed group:
(a) Operates solely within the borders of a single state and only
includes member companies that have a registered Washington state
unified business identifier;
(b) Complies with all state and federal laws applicable to fully
insured large group health plans;
(c) Does not health underwrite individuals;
(d) Does not bar any entity from association membership based on
age, health status, or claims experience; and
(e) Offers coverage to all association members, regardless of age,
health status, or claims experience.
(4) For purposes of this section, "health benefit plan," "health
plan," and "small employer" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.
(((4))) (5) For purposes of this section, "census date" has the
same meaning as defined in RCW 48.44.010.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.44.024 and 2003 c 248 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A health care service contractor may not offer any health
benefit plan to any small employer without complying with RCW
48.44.023(3).
(2) Employers purchasing health plans provided through associations
or through member-governed groups formed specifically for the purpose
of purchasing health care are not small employers and the plans are not
subject to RCW 48.44.023(3).
(3) For plan years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, health
plans provided through associations or member-governed groups are
deemed large group health benefit plans, if the association or member-governed group:
(a) Operates solely within the borders of a single state and only
includes member companies that have a registered Washington state
unified business identifier;
(b) Complies with all state and federal laws applicable to fully
insured large group health plans;
(c) Does not health underwrite individuals;
(d) Does not bar any entity from association membership based on
age, health status, or claims experience; and
(e) Offers coverage to all association members, regardless of age,
health status, or claims experience.
(4) For purposes of this section, "health benefit plan," "health
plan," and "small employer" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.46.068 and 2003 c 248 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A health maintenance organization may not offer any health
benefit plan to any small employer without complying with RCW
48.46.066(3).
(2) Employers purchasing health plans provided through associations
or through member-governed groups formed specifically for the purpose
of purchasing health care are not small employers and are not subject
to RCW 48.46.066(3).
(3) For plan years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, health
plans provided through associations or member-governed groups are
deemed large group health benefit plans, if the association or member-governed group:
(a) Operates solely within the borders of a single state and only
includes member companies that have a registered Washington state
unified business identifier;
(b) Complies with all state and federal laws applicable to fully
insured large group health plans;
(c) Does not health underwrite individuals;
(d) Does not bar any entity from association membership based on
age, health status, or claims experience; and
(e) Offers coverage to all association members, regardless of age,
health status, or claims experience.
(4) For purposes of this section, "health benefit plan," "health
plan," and "small employer" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

--- END ---