BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds, according to the
Washington state injury and violence prevention guide issued by the
department of health in June 2008, in the state of Washington in 2006
that:
(a) Firearm injuries were the fourth leading cause of injury death;
including forty-nine percent of all suicides and fifty-five percent of
all homicides;
(b) About ninety percent of fatal firearm incidents involving
children occur in the home;
(c) A study of children from birth to age fourteen showed that
forty percent of firearm incidents happen in the same room where the
firearm is stored;
(d) The presence of a household firearm is also linked with an
increased risk of adults and adolescents using a firearm to attempt
suicide;
(e) Having a firearm in the house also puts an abused woman at
greater risk of being killed; and
(f) A 2007 nationwide-study of firearm ownership and storage
patterns among families with children revealed that, overall, few
families with children reported safe firearm storage.
(2) Public health approaches to reducing both motor vehicle crashes
and tobacco deaths have been highly successful and the legislature
believes that using public health approaches to reducing gun violence
and gun deaths will also result in success.
(3) In an effort to reduce the number of firearms-related deaths
and injuries, the legislature intends to:
(a) Institute a statewide educational program aimed at educating
firearm owners, prospective firearm owners, and those who live and work
where firearms are present, about firearm safety;
(b) Fund such a program with fees on the retail sales of firearms
and ammunition; and
(c) Promote the safe storage of firearms through a tax exemption on
the purchase of gun locks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of gun
locks.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "gun lock" means a trigger
locking device, chamber lock, or cable lock that is intended to prevent
the discharge of a firearm.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section do not apply with respect to the
use of gun locks.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "gun locks" has the same
meaning as provided in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected a fee on each retail sale in this
state of a firearm. The rate of the fee is as follows:
(a) Twenty-five dollars for every firearm sold at retail; or
(b) Fifteen dollars for every firearm sold at retail if a gun safe
or a gun lock is purchased at the time of sale with a firearm.
(2) The fee imposed under subsection (1) of this section must be
paid by the buyer to the seller. Each seller must collect from the
buyer the full amount of the fee in respect to each retail sale of a
firearm. The fee collected from the buyer by the seller must be paid
to the department of revenue in accordance with RCW 82.32.045.
(3) There is levied and collected a fee upon the retail sale of all
ammunition, in an amount equal to one cent per round of ammunition.
The fee imposed under this section must be paid by the buyer to the
seller. Each seller must collect from the buyer the full amount of the
fee in respect to each retail sale of ammunition. The fee collected
from the buyer by the seller must be paid to the department of revenue
in accordance with RCW 82.32.045.
(4) The department of revenue must incorporate into the
department's regular audit cycle a reconciliation of the number of
firearms and rounds of ammunition sold and the amount of revenue
collected by businesses selling firearms and ammunition at retail. The
department of revenue must collect the following information on the
business excise tax return from the businesses selling firearms and
ammunition at retail:
(a) The number of firearms sold;
(b) The rounds of ammunition sold; and
(c) The fees levied in this section.
(5) All other applicable provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW have full
force and application with respect to the fee imposed under this
section. The department of revenue must administer this section.
(6) All receipts from the firearm and ammunition fees imposed in
this section must be deposited in the firearm-related injury and death
prevention account in section 6 of this act.
(7) The following definitions in this subsection apply throughout
this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Ammunition" means cartridge cases, primers, bullets, or
propellant powder designed for use in any firearm.
(b) "Gun lock" has the same meaning as provided in section 2 of
this act.
(c) "Gun safe" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.832.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The fees required to be collected by the seller under section
4 of this act, are deemed to be held in trust by the seller until paid
to the department of revenue, and any seller who appropriates or
converts the fees collected to his or her own use or to any use other
than the payment of the fees to the extent that the money required to
be collected is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed
in this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) If any seller fails to collect the fees imposed under section
4 of this act or having collected the fees, fails to pay the collected
fees to the department of revenue in the manner prescribed in section
4 of this act, whether such failure is the result of his or her own
acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond the seller's control,
the seller is nevertheless, personally liable to the state for the
amount of the fees.
(3) The amount of the fees, until paid by the buyer to the seller
or to the department of revenue, constitutes a debt from the buyer to
the seller. Any seller who fails or refuses to collect the fees as
required with intent to violate the provisions of this chapter or to
gain some advantage or benefit, either direct or indirect, and any
buyer who refuses to pay any fees due under this chapter is guilty of
a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The firearm-related injury and death prevention account is
created in the state treasury. Expenditures from the account may be
used to fund the firearm-related injury and death prevention program
created in section 7 of this act and may be spent only after
appropriation.
(2) Moneys in the firearm-related injury and death prevention
account may be appropriated to the department of health to provide
funding for the firearm-related injury and death prevention program
created in section 7 of this act.
(3) All receipts from the firearm and ammunition fees imposed in
section 4 of this act must be deposited in the firearm-related injury
and death prevention account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A firearm-related injury and death prevention education program
is created to be administered by the department as provided in this
section.
(2) The department must identify public education efforts currently
underway within state government and among local governments and
private groups to educate firearm owners and prevent firearm-related
injuries and death. The department must convene stakeholders and
partners, conduct research, obtain data, identify needs, gaps,
opportunities, and strategies, and develop a plan for:
(a) Expanding and enhancing existing firearm safety education
programs for firearm owners, prospective firearm owners, and those who
live and work where firearms are present, with particular emphasis on
those programs that research shows have proven effective;
(b) Implementing additional firearm safety educational programs
throughout the state for firearm owners, prospective firearm owners,
and those who live and work where firearms are present, with particular
emphasis on those programs that research shows have proven effective;
(c) Promoting the safe storage and handling of all firearms and
minimization of risk of firearm-related injuries and death; and
(d) Evaluating the effectiveness and success of the program as a
whole, as well as its component parts.
(3) By December 1, 2013, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the
department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and the governor that details the plan for the program
created under this section, including all of the program's components
and projected costs.
(4) The department must begin implementation of the firearm-related
injury and death prevention education program in January 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---