BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.17.400 and 2007 c 62 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Disposition" means sales, exchanges, or other actions
resulting in a transfer of land ownership.
(b) "State agencies" includes:
(i) The department of natural resources established in chapter
43.30 RCW;
(ii) The department of fish and wildlife established in chapter
43.300 RCW;
(iii) The department of transportation established in chapter 47.01
RCW;
(iv) The parks and recreation commission established in chapter
79A.05 RCW; and
(v) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services established in this chapter.
(2) State agencies proposing disposition of state-owned land must
provide written notice of the proposed disposition to the legislative
authorities of the counties, cities, and towns in which the land is
located at least sixty days before entering into the disposition
agreement.
(3) In addition to the requirements of subsection (2) of this
section, the parks and recreation commission must provide written
notice to any port district, park and recreation district, or other
municipal corporation that is authorized to acquire or improve public
outdoor recreation land in which the land is located at least sixty
days before entering into the disposition agreement.
(4) The requirements of this section are in addition and
supplemental to other requirements of the laws of this state.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.05.179 and 2007 c 62 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Actions under this chapter are subject to the notification
requirements of RCW 43.17.400. Any entity entitled to written notice
may request in writing to enter into negotiations with the commission
in regard to the proposed disposition of lands owned by the commission.
The commission must respond to any request before entering into any
disposition agreement, if the request is received within thirty days
after the notice is provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Before the commission may close or otherwise cease management
operations in any state park for more than a consecutive twelve-month
period or for an unspecified period, the commission must provide
written notice to any public body in which the park is located within
sixty days of initiating the proposed action. Any public body entitled
to notice may request to enter into negotiations with the commission
for a management agreement regarding the park. The commission must
respond to any request before initiating the proposed action, if the
request is received within thirty days after the notice is provided.
(2) Any management agreement entered into pursuant to this section
must require that, if the land is not used for outdoor recreation
purposes, management responsibilities revert to the commission.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "public body" includes any
county, city, town, port district, park and recreation district, or
other municipal corporation that is authorized to acquire or improve
public outdoor recreation land.

--- END ---