BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.963 and 2009 c 469 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment used directly in generating electricity or
producing thermal heat using solar energy, or to sales of or charges
made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing such
machinery and equipment, but only if the purchaser develops with such
machinery, equipment, and labor a facility capable of generating not
more than ten kilowatts of electricity or producing not more than three
million British thermal units per day and provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.963:
(a) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities that are integral and necessary to the
generation of electricity or production and use of thermal heat using
solar energy;
(b) "Machinery and equipment" does not include: (i) Hand-powered
tools; (ii) property with a useful life of less than one year; (iii)
repair parts required to restore machinery and equipment to normal
working order; (iv) replacement parts that do not increase
productivity, improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of
machinery and equipment; (v) buildings; or (vi) building fixtures that
are not integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that
are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building;
((and))
(c) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity with solar energy if it provides any part of the process
that captures the energy of the sun, converts that energy to
electricity, and stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for
entry into or operation in parallel with electric transmission and
distribution systems; and
(d) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in producing thermal
heat with solar energy if it uses a solar collector or a solar hot
water system that (i) meets the certification standards for solar
collectors and solar hot water systems developed by the solar rating
and certification corporation; or (ii) is determined by the department
to be an equivalent collector or system. The department may consult
with Washington State University extension energy in determining
whether a solar collector or solar hot water system is an equivalent
collector or system.
(3) This section expires June 30, ((2013)) 2018.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.963 and 2009 c 469 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to
machinery and equipment used directly in generating not more than ten
kilowatts of electricity or producing not more than three million
British thermal units per day using solar energy, or to the use of
labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and
equipment.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.08.963 apply to this section.
(3) This section expires June 30, ((2013)) 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---