BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.56.280 and 1991 c 245 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
immediately after the last day of each month, the county treasurer
((shall)) must pay over to the state treasurer the amount collected by
the county treasurer and credited to the various state funds, but every
such payment ((shall be)) is subject to correction for error
discovered. If they are not paid to the state treasurer before the
twentieth day of the month the state treasurer ((shall)) must make a
sight draft on the county treasurer for such amount. Should any county
treasurer fail or refuse to honor the draft or make payment of the
amount thereon, except for manifest error or other good and sufficient
cause, the county treasurer ((shall be)) is guilty of nonfeasance in
office and upon conviction thereof ((shall)) must be punished according
to law.
(2) The county treasurer must place one percent of state property
taxes collected by the county in the county current expense fund to
defray costs of collection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes collected by a
county treasurer on or after August 1, 2013.

--- END ---