BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.20B.010 and 1987 c 75 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services.
(3) "License" means that exercise of regulatory authority by the
secretary to grant permission, authority, or liberty to do or to
forbear certain activities. The term includes licenses, permits,
certifications, registrations, and other similar terms.
(4) "Vendor" means an entity that provides goods or services to or
for clientele of the department and that controls operational
decisions.
(5) "Overpayment" means any payment or benefit to a recipient or to
a vendor in excess of that to which is entitled by law, rule, or
contract, including amounts in dispute.
(6) "Child welfare training and advancement program" means the
program administered in partnership between the department's children's
administration and participating universities in Washington to provide
educational benefits for students accepted into a masters of social
work program at one of the participating universities. Participation
in the program includes a stipend for tuition and specialized practicum
placement within the department. Students participating in the child
welfare training and advancement program agree to seek employment with
the department after graduation. If selected, child welfare training
and advancement program recipients must agree to work for the
department for a period roughly commensurate with the amount of time
they received educational assistance.
(7) "Child welfare training and advancement program participant
agreement" means an agreement signed by a participant in order to
participate in the child welfare training and advancement program and
receive financial assistance from the department in a masters of social
work degree program.
(8) "Employee overpayment" means an obligation owed by a current or
former state employee to reimburse the department for: (a) An
overpayment of salary to a current or former state employee occurring
in the current or a past pay period, which results from errors in
calculating an employee's pay such as using the wrong pay level, paying
a part-time employee as a full-time employee, or other intentional or
unintentional errors; (b) nonsalary payments made to the employee when
such payments are later determined to have been made in error; (c)
personal usage of state resources; or (d) payments made by the
department to a third party on the employee's behalf.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.20B.030 and 2012 c 258 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by law, including subsection (2)
of this section, there will be no collection of overpayments and other
debts due the department after the expiration of six years from the
date of notice of such overpayment or other debt unless the department
has commenced recovery action in a court of law or unless an
administrative remedy authorized by statute is in place. However, any
amount due in a case thus extended shall cease to be a debt due the
department at the expiration of ten years from the date of the notice
of the overpayment or other debt unless a court-ordered remedy would be
in effect for a longer period.
(2) There will be no collection of debts due the department after
the expiration of twenty years from the date a lien is recorded
pursuant to RCW 43.20B.080.
(3) The department, may, at any time, ((may)) accept offers of
compromise of disputed claims or may grant partial or total write-off
of any debt due the department or the department of early learning, if
it is no longer cost-effective to pursue. The department shall enter
into agreements with the department of early learning and shall, in
consultation with the department of early learning, adopt rules
establishing the considerations to be made in the granting or denial of
a partial or total write-off of debts.
(4) Notwithstanding the requirements of RCW 43.20B.630, 43.20B.635,
43.20B.640, and 43.20B.645, the department may waive all efforts to
collect overpayments from a client when the department determines that
the elements of equitable estoppel as set forth in WAC 388-02-0495, as
it existed on January 1, 2012, are met.
(5) Notwithstanding the requirements of section 3 of this act, the
department may waive efforts to collect financial assistance payments
from persons who received financial assistance through the child
welfare training and advancement program if the person meets certain
exemptions specified in the rules adopted by the department.
(6) Notwithstanding the requirements of section 4 of this act, the
department may waive efforts to collect overpayments from current or
former employees of the department who received employee overpayments.
(7) The department, through the office of financial recovery, has
rule-making authority to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department may establish and recover
financial assistance payments received by persons under the child
welfare training and advancement program who subsequently failed to
comply with the terms of their child welfare training and advancement
program participant agreement.
(2) The department may establish and recover any amounts owing
under a child welfare training and advancement program participant
agreement to repay the department for financial assistance paid on
behalf of the participant.
(3) If the child welfare training and advancement program
participant is not a department employee, the department may recover
financial assistance payments through an order to withhold and deliver.
(4) The department, through the office of financial recovery, has
rule-making authority to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department may recover overpayments
made to current or former employees.
(2) The procedures for establishment and recovery of employee
overpayments may vary depending on whether the employee is currently
employed by the department.
(a) The department may establish overpayments for current employees
and may recover those overpayments as salary overpayments, in a manner
that is consistent with the terms of the applicable collective
bargaining agreement.
(b) The department may establish overpayments for former employees
and may recover those employee overpayments through an order to
withhold and deliver.
(3) The department, through the office of financial recovery, has
rule-making authority to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) After the department of early learning
has imposed a fine or civil penalty against a child care provider or
facility under chapter 43.215 RCW and Title 170 WAC who has engaged in
any act or practice determined to be fraudulent, and a final debt has
been established, the department of social and health services, through
the office of financial recovery, may enforce the final debt.
(2) The office of financial recovery may enforce the debt through
lien and foreclosure, distraint, seizure and sale, order to withhold
and deliver, or other legal action available to the department of
social and health services to satisfy the debt due.
(3) Debts determined under this chapter or chapter 43.215 RCW are
subject to collection action without further necessity of action by a
presiding or reviewing officer. The office of financial recovery may
collect the debt in accordance with RCW 43.20B.635, 43.20B.640, and
43.20B.680 and sections 7 and 8 of this act. In addition, a lien based
on a fine or civil penalty against a child care provider or facility
may be subject to distraint, seizure, and sale in the same manner as
prescribed for support liens in RCW 74.20A.130.
(4) The department, through the office of financial recovery, has
rule-making authority to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Any action to enforce an employee
overpayment debt must be commenced within six years from the date of
the department's notice to the debtor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department of social and health services
may, at the secretary's discretion, secure the repayment of any
outstanding fine or civil penalty, or both, established by the
department of early learning, plus interest, if any, from a child care
provider who has engaged in any act or practice determined to be
fraudulent through the filing of a lien against the child care provider
or facility's real property, or by requiring the posting of a bond,
assignment of deposit, or some other form of security acceptable to the
department of social and health services, or by doing both.
(1) Any lien is effective from the date of filing for record with
the county auditor of the county in which the property is located and
the claim under the lien has preference over the claims of all
unsecured creditors.
(2) The department of social and health services shall review and
determine the acceptability of all other forms of security.
(3) Any bond must be issued by a company licensed as a surety in
the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Any action to enforce a fine or civil
penalty, or both, assessed by the department of early learning must be
commenced by the department of early learning or the department of
social and health services within six years from the date of the
department of early learning's notice to the child care provider or
facility, unless a lien is recorded pursuant to section 5 of this act,
in which case such action must be commenced within ten years from the
date of notice of the debt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 3 through 8 of this act are each
added to chapter 43.20B RCW.

--- END ---