BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The number of foreign language speakers has substantially
increased in Washington's public schools over the last decade. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction reports that nine
percent of the state's total student population was enrolled in the
transitional bilingual instruction program as of May 2013, and more
than two hundred different languages are spoken in students' homes.
(2) The office of the education ombuds reports an increased number
of complaints from English language learner students and limited
English proficient parents regarding schools' lack of provision of
accurate education interpretation and the use of students as
interpreters for their own families.
(3) There are no training programs in the state specifically for
foreign language education interpreters. The lack of qualified
individuals causes public schools to use untrained bilingual adults or
students themselves as interpreters for parents in high-stakes
situations where decisions about a student's academic future are being
made.
(4) Communicating effectively with limited English proficient
students and families presents a challenge for Washington public
schools, and the inability to meet this challenge leads to inequities
and increased gaps in student achievement, along with increased student
dropouts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By February 1, 2015, the office of the
education ombuds must submit to the education committees of the
legislature a feasibility study for development of a state foreign
language education interpreter training program designed to create a
pool of trained interpreters for public schools, including volunteer
interpreters.
(2) The study must include:
(a) An overview of current need for and availability of foreign
language education interpreters in public schools, as well as current
practices for providing these interpreters;
(b) An inventory of interpreter training programs in Washington and
examples from other states;
(c) An examination of state and federal laws that apply to the
provision of interpretation in public schools, including how laws
pertaining to family and student privacy apply to interpreters, and
including Title VI of the civil rights act of 1964 as it applies to
national origin discrimination affecting limited English proficient
parents and guardians; and
(d) An inventory of community resources for interpreter training,
including for volunteer interpreters.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Interpreter" means a bilingual or multilingual individual who
provides oral translation for others.
(b) "Foreign language education interpreter" means an individual
who provides oral translation for limited English proficient students
and parents in public schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2014, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---