BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.12.200 and 1998 c 335 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For the purposes of this chapter and unless otherwise required by
the context:)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" without other designation means the department of
revenue of the state of Washington.
(2) "Railroad company" means and includes any person owning or
operating a railroad, street railway, suburban railroad or interurban
railroad in this state, whether its line of railroad be maintained at
the surface, or above or below the surface of the earth, or by whatever
power its vehicles are transported; or owning any station, depot,
terminal or bridge for railroad purposes, as owner, lessee or
otherwise.
(3)(a) "Airplane company" means and includes any person owning,
controlling, operating or managing real or personal property, used or
to be used for or in connection with or to facilitate the conveyance
and transportation of persons and/or property by aircraft, and engaged
in the business of transporting persons and/or property for
compensation, as owner, lessee or otherwise.
(b) "Airplane company" does not include a "commuter air carrier" as
defined in RCW 82.48.010, whose ground property and equipment is
located primarily on privately held real property.
(4) "Electric light and power company" means and includes any
person owning, controlling, operating or managing real or personal
property, used or to be used for or in connection with or to facilitate
the generation, transmission or distribution of electricity in this
state, and engaged in the business of furnishing, transmitting,
distributing or generating electrical energy for light, heat or power
for compensation as owner, lessee or otherwise.
(5) "Telegraph company" means and includes any person owning,
controlling, operating or managing any telegraph or cable line in this
state, with appliances for the transmission of messages, and engaged in
the business of furnishing telegraph service for compensation, as
owner, lessee or otherwise.
(6) "Telephone company" means and includes any person owning,
controlling, operating or managing real or personal property, used or
to be used for or in connection with or to facilitate the transmission
of communication by telephone in this state through owned or controlled
exchanges and/or switchboards, and engaged in the business of
furnishing telephonic communication for compensation as owner, lessee
or otherwise.
(7) "Gas company" means and includes any person owning,
controlling, operating or managing real or personal property, used or
to be used for or in connection with or to facilitate the manufacture,
transportation, or distribution of natural or manufactured gas in this
state, and engaged for compensation in the business of furnishing gas
for light, heat, power or other use, as owner, lessee or otherwise.
(8) "Pipe line company" means and includes any person owning,
controlling, operating or managing real or personal property, used or
to be used for or in connection with or to facilitate the conveyance or
transportation of oils, natural or manufactured gas and/or other
substances, except water, by pipe line in this state, and engaged in
such business for compensation, as owner, lessee or otherwise.
(9) "Logging railroad company" means and includes any person
owning, controlling, operating or managing real or personal property,
used or to be used for or in connection with or to facilitate the
conveyance and transportation of forest products by rail in this state,
and engaged in the business of transporting forest products either as
private carrier or carrier for hire.
(10) "Person" means and includes any individual, firm,
copartnership, joint venture, association, corporation, trust, or any
other group acting as a unit, whether mutual, cooperative or otherwise,
and/or trustees or receivers appointed by any court.
(11) "Company" means and includes any railroad company, airplane
company, electric light and power company, telegraph company, telephone
company, gas company, pipe line company, or logging railroad company;
and the term "companies" means and includes all of such companies.
(12) "Operating property" means and includes all property, real and
personal, owned by any company, or held by it as occupant, lessee or
otherwise, including all franchises and lands, buildings, rights-of-way, water powers, motor vehicles, wagons, horses, aircraft,
aerodromes, hangars, office furniture, water mains, gas mains, pipe
lines, pumping stations, tanks, tank farms, holders, reservoirs,
telephone lines, telegraph lines, transmission and distribution lines,
dams, generating plants, poles, wires, cables, conduits, switch boards,
devices, appliances, instruments, equipment, machinery, landing slips,
docks, roadbeds, tracks, terminals, rolling stock equipment,
appurtenances and all other property of a like or different kind,
situate within the state of Washington, used by the company in the
conduct of its operations; and, in case of personal property used
partly within and partly without the state, it means and includes a
proportion of such personal property to be determined as in this
chapter provided.
(13) "Nonoperating property" means all physical property owned by
any company, other than that used during the preceding calendar year in
the conduct of its operations. It includes all lands and/or buildings
wholly used by any person other than the owning company. In cases
where lands and/or buildings are used partially by the owning company
in the conduct of its operations and partially by any other person not
assessable under this chapter under lease, sublease, or other form of
tenancy, the operating and nonoperating property of the company whose
property is assessed ((hereunder shall)) under this section must be
determined by the department of revenue in such manner as will, in its
judgment, secure the separate valuation of such operating and
nonoperating property upon a fair and equitable basis. The amount of
operating revenue received from tenants or occupants of property of the
owning company ((shall)) may not be considered material in determining
the classification of such property.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.48.010 and 1995 c 318 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by
the context:)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aircraft" means any weight-carrying device or structure for
navigation of the air which is designed to be supported by the
air((;)).
(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of transportation((;)).
(3) "Person" includes a firm, partnership, limited liability
company, or corporation((;)).
(4) "Small multi-engine fixed wing" means any piston-driven multi-engine fixed wing aircraft with a maximum gross weight as listed by the
manufacturer of less than seventy-five hundred pounds((; and)).
(5) "Large multi-engine fixed wing" means any piston-driven multi-engine fixed wing aircraft with a maximum gross weight as listed by the
manufacturer of seventy-five hundred pounds or more.
(6) "Commuter air carrier" means an air carrier holding authority
under Title 14, Part 298 of the code of federal regulations that
carries passengers on at least five round trips per week on at least
one route between two or more points according to its published flight
schedules that specify the times, days of the week, and places between
which those flights are performed.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.48.030 and 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 22 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, the
amount of the tax imposed by this chapter for each calendar year
((shall be)) is as follows:

Type of aircraft Registration fee

Single engine fixed wing $ 50

Small multi-engine fixed wing 65

Large multi-engine fixed wing 80

Turboprop multi-engine fixed wing 100

Turbojet multi-engine fixed wing 125

Helicopter 75

Sailplane 20

Lighter than air 20

Home built 20

(b) The amount of tax imposed by this chapter for each calendar
year with respect to aircraft owned and operated by a commuter air
carrier that is not an airplane company as defined in RCW 84.12.200 is
as follows:

Gross maximum take-off
weight of the aircraft Registration fee

Less than 4,001 lbs. $500

4,001-6,000 lbs. $1,000

6,001-8,000 lbs. $2,000

8,001-9,000 lbs. $3,000

9,001-12,500 lbs. $4,000

(2)(a) The amount of tax imposed under subsection (1) of this
section for each calendar year ((shall)) must be divided into twelve
parts corresponding to the months of the calendar year and the excise
tax upon an aircraft registered for the first time in this state after
the last day of any month ((shall)) may only be levied for the
remaining months of the calendar year including the month in which the
aircraft is being registered((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the
minimum amount payable ((shall be)) is three dollars.
(b) An aircraft ((shall be)) is deemed registered for the first
time in this state when such aircraft was not previously registered by
this state for the year immediately preceding the year in which
application for registration is made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An aircraft owned and operated by a commuter air carrier in
respect to which the tax imposed under RCW 82.48.030 has been paid for
a calendar year is exempt from property taxation for that calendar
year.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "aircraft" and "commuter air
carrier" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.48.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---