BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) On March 23, 2010, President Barack Obama signed into law the
patient protection and affordable care act and the health care and
education reconciliation act of 2010, collectively known as the
affordable care act;
(b) The affordable care act requires that states expand their
medicaid programs to include coverage for all individuals whose incomes
are at or below one hundred thirty-three percent of the federal poverty
guidelines;
(c) The United States supreme court has found that the medicaid
expansion aspect of the affordable care act shifts medicaid from a
program for the neediest in society to a comprehensive plan to provide
universal health insurance coverage;
(d) The state has made great progress in establishing a Washington
health benefit exchange to serve people over one hundred thirty-three
percent of the federal poverty guidelines as a marketplace for
insurance as required under the affordable care act.
(2) Individuals who will be newly eligible for medicaid under the
affordable care act deserve the same choices in their health care
coverage as those being served in the Washington health benefit
exchange will have. Making the Washington health benefit exchange
available to the thousands of people in Washington who will be forced
to receive health care through the medicaid expansion will give
individuals a choice in their health care and allow them to maintain
the same health insurance and health care providers if their income
changes.
(3) The legislature intends to require the health care authority to
work with the Washington health benefit exchange to develop and request
a waiver from the United States department of health and human services
to provide health insurance to those individuals who are newly eligible
for medicaid through the Washington health benefit exchange.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2014, the authority shall apply to the secretary of
the United States department of health and human services for a waiver
to authorize Washington state to enroll individuals at or below a
modified adjusted gross income of one hundred thirty-three percent of
the federal poverty guidelines in the Washington health benefit
exchange, rather than medicaid. The waiver must allow Washington
residents at or below a modified adjusted gross income of one hundred
thirty-three percent of the federal poverty guidelines to receive
premium assistance and cost-sharing subsidies to allow them to purchase
health insurance through the Washington health benefit exchange. The
waiver must combine federal and state sources of funds up to the same
amount and the same proportion that would have been used had the
enrollees been covered through medicaid.
(2) The authority, in collaboration with the Washington health
benefit exchange, shall submit a report to the legislature by December
1, 2013, with details of the operational and fiscal elements of the
waiver proposal.

--- END ---