BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.030 and 1971 ex.s. c 250 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All meetings of the governing body of a public agency shall be
open and public and all persons shall be permitted to attend any
meeting of the governing body of a public agency, except as otherwise
provided in this chapter.
(2) A governing body of a public agency may record its closed
executive session meetings described under RCW 42.30.110. Executive
session recordings by a governing body are public records exempt from
disclosure, inspection, or copying under chapter 42.56 RCW unless
disclosure of specific recordings is explicitly authorized by
resolution of the governing body. If an agency elects to disclose a
recording that may otherwise be protected by a privilege or statutory
exemption, any privilege or statutory exemption is waived only for the
record produced.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.30.120 and 2012 c 117 s 126 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each member of the governing body who attends a meeting of such
governing body where action is taken in violation of any provision of
this chapter applicable to him or her, with knowledge of the fact that
the meeting is in violation thereof, shall be subject to personal
liability in the form of a civil penalty in the amount of one hundred
dollars. The civil penalty shall be assessed by a judge of the
superior court and an action to enforce this penalty may be brought by
any person. A violation of this chapter does not constitute a crime
and assessment of the civil penalty by a judge shall not give rise to
any disability or legal disadvantage based on conviction of a criminal
offense.
(2) Any person who prevails against a public agency in any action
in the courts for a violation of this chapter shall be awarded all
costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees, incurred in connection
with such legal action. Pursuant to RCW 4.84.185, any public agency
((who)) that prevails in any action in the courts for a violation of
this chapter may be awarded reasonable expenses and attorneys' fees
upon final judgment and written findings by the trial judge that the
action was frivolous and advanced without reasonable cause.
(3) As a remedy for any intentional violation of this chapter, a
court shall order the recording of a governing body's closed executive
sessions for a period of two years from the date of the order.
Recordings shall be retained for a period of two years and are exempt
from disclosure, inspection, or copying under the public records act,
chapter 42.56 RCW.
(4) An agency has conditional immunity from liability to any person
for damages that are a consequence of specific actions made without
legal authority in an executive session if:
(a) The governing body self-discloses those specific actions in
writing and by reading aloud in public at the first regular meeting
after the agency discovers, should have discovered, or receives a
complaint of an unauthorized action in an executive session;
(b) Before the self-disclosure, there is no final action related to
the specific action;
(c) There is no actual or anticipated litigation related to the
specific action; and
(d) The disclosure is available for public inspection and copying.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.30.210 and 2001 c 216 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The attorney general's office may provide information,
technical assistance, and training on the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The office of the attorney general may provide the training and
may also approve any acceptable course of training to be offered by a
governmental body or other entity. The attorney general or other
entity providing the training shall provide a certification of course
completion to elected or appointed officials who complete an approved
training curriculum.

--- END ---