BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The special investigations services unit of the department may
collect, evaluate, collate, and analyze data and specific investigative
information concerning the existence, structure, activities, and
operations of security threat groups, drugs, and violence within
department facilities and the participants involved therein under the
jurisdiction of the department.
(2) Security threat group data must be located in a centralized
database of the department and must be used to maintain the safety and
security of offenders, staff, facilities, and the public. The data
compiled may aid in addressing violence reduction, illegal activities,
and identification of offender separation or protection needs, and may
be used to assist law enforcement agencies and prosecutors in
developing evidence for purposes of criminal prosecution upon request.
(3) The security threat group database and all contents in the
database are confidential and exempt from public disclosure under
chapter 42.56 RCW.

--- END ---