BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.40.0301 and 1994 c 301 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon review by any court, or appellate body, of a determination of
the valuation of property for purposes of taxation, it ((shall be)) is
presumed that the determination of the public official charged with the
duty of establishing such value is correct but this presumption
((shall)) is not ((be)) a defense against any correction indicated by
((clear, cogent and convincing)) a preponderance of the evidence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2014 and thereafter.

--- END ---