BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county, city, or town may recover its reasonable expenses of
preparation of a nonproject environmental impact statement prepared
under RCW 43.21C.229 and 43.21C.440:
(a) Through access to financial assistance under RCW 36.70A.490;
(b) With funding from private sources; and
(c) By the assessment of fees consistent with the requirements and
limitations of this section.
(2)(a) A county, city, or town is authorized to assess a fee upon
subsequent development that will make use of and benefit from: (i) The
analysis in an environmental impact statement prepared for the purpose
of compliance with RCW 43.21C.440 regarding planned actions; or (ii)
the reduction in environmental analysis requirements resulting from the
exercise of authority under RCW 43.21C.229 regarding infill
development.
(b) The amount of the fee must be reasonable and proportionate to
the total expenses incurred by the county, city, or town in the
preparation of the environmental impact statement.
(c) Counties, cities, and towns are not authorized by this section
to assess fees for general comprehensive plan amendments or updates.
(3) A county, city, or town assessing fees under subsection (2)(a)
of this section must provide for a mechanism by which project
proponents may either elect to utilize the environmental review
completed by the lead agency and pay the fees under subsection (1) of
this section or certify that they do not want the local jurisdiction to
utilize the environmental review completed as a part of a planned
action and therefore not be assessed any associated fees. Project
proponents who choose this option may not make use of or benefit from
the up-front environmental review prepared by the local jurisdiction.
(4) Prior to the collection of fees, the county, city, or town must
enact an ordinance that establishes the total amount of expenses to be
recovered through fees and provides objective standards for determining
the fee amount to be imposed upon each development proposal
proportionate to the impacts of each development and to the benefits
accruing to each development from the nonproject environmental review.
The ordinance must provide: (a) A procedure by which an applicant who
disagrees with whether the amount of the fee is correct, reasonable, or
proportionate may pay the fee with the written stipulation "paid under
protest"; and (b) if the county, city, or town provides for an
administrative appeal of its decision on the project for which the fees
are imposed, any dispute about the amount of the fees must be resolved
in the same administrative appeals process. Any disagreement about the
reasonableness, proportionality, or amount of the fees imposed upon a
development may not be the basis for delay in issuance of a project
permit for that development.
(5) The ordinance adopted under subsection (4) of this section must
make information available about the amount of the expenses designated
for recovery. When these expenses have been fully recovered, the
county, city, or town may no longer assess a fee under this section.
(6) Any fees collected under this section from subsequent
development may be used to reimburse funding received from private
sources to conduct the environmental review.
(7) The county, city, or town shall refund fees collected where a
court of competent jurisdiction determines that the environmental
review conducted under RCW 43.21C.440, regarding planned actions, or
under RCW 43.21C.229, regarding infill development, was not sufficient
to comply with the requirements of this chapter regarding the proposed
development activity for which the fees were collected. The applicant
and the county, city, or town may mutually agree to a partial refund or
to waive the refund in the interest of resolving any dispute regarding
compliance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.91 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Latecomer fee" means a charge collected by a municipality,
whether separately stated or as part of a connection fee for providing
access to a municipal system, against a real property owner who
connects to or uses a water or sewer facility subject to a contract
created under RCW 35.91.020.
(2) "Municipality" means the governing body of any county, city,
town, or drainage district.
(3) "Water or sewer facilities" means storm, sanitary, or
combination sewers, pumping stations, and disposal plants, water mains,
hydrants, reservoirs, or appurtenances.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.91.020 and 2009 c 344 s 1 and 2009 c 230 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) ((Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section,
the governing body of any city, town, county, water-sewer district, or
drainage district, hereinafter referred to as a "municipality" may
contract with owners of real estate for the construction of storm,
sanitary, or combination sewers, pumping stations, and disposal plants,
water mains, hydrants, reservoirs, or appurtenances, hereinafter called
"water or sewer facilities," within their boundaries or (except for
counties) within ten miles from their corporate limits connecting with
the public water or sewerage system to serve the area in which the real
estate of such owners is located, and to provide for a period of not to
exceed twenty years for the reimbursement of such owners and their
assigns by any owner of real estate who did not contribute to the
original cost of such water or sewer facilities and who subsequently
tap onto or use the same of a fair pro rata share of the cost of the
construction of said water or sewer facilities, including not only
those directly connected thereto, but also users connected to laterals
or branches connecting thereto, subject to such reasonable rules and
regulations as the governing body of such municipality may provide or
contract, and notwithstanding the provisions of any other law.)) At the
owner's request, a municipality must contract with the owner of real
estate for the construction or improvement of water or sewer facilities
that the owner elects to install solely at the owner's expense. The
owner must submit a request for a contract to the municipality prior to
approval of the water or sewer facility by the municipality. The
owner's request may only require a contract under this subsection
(1)(a) in locations where a municipality's ordinances require the
facilities to be improved or constructed as a prerequisite to further
property development. Water or sewer facilities improved or
constructed in accordance with this subsection (1)(a) must be located
within the municipality's corporate limits or, except as provided
otherwise by this subsection (1)(a), within ten miles of the
municipality's corporate limits. Water or sewer facilities improved or
constructed in accordance with this subsection (1)(a) may not be
located outside of the county that is party to the contract. The
contract must be filed and recorded with the county auditor and must
contain conditions required by the municipality in accordance with its
adopted policies and standards. Unless the municipality provides
written notice to the owner of its intent to request a comprehensive
plan approval, the owner must request a comprehensive plan approval for
a water or sewer facility, if required, and connection of the water or
sewer facility to the municipal system must be conditioned upon:
(i) Construction of the water or sewer facility according to plans
and specifications approved by the municipality;
(ii) Inspection and approval of the water or sewer facility by the
municipality;
(iii) Transfer to the municipality of the water or sewer facility,
without cost to the municipality, upon acceptance by the municipality
of the water or sewer facility;
(iv) Full compliance with the owner's obligations under the
contract and with the municipality's rules and regulations;
(v) Provision of sufficient security to the municipality to ensure
completion of the water or sewer facility and other performance under
the contract;
(vi) Payment by the owner to the municipality of all of the
municipality's costs associated with the water or sewer facility
including, but not limited to, engineering, legal, and administrative
costs; and
(vii) Verification and approval of all contracts and costs related
to the water or sewer facility.
(b) If authorized by ordinance or contract, a municipality may
participate in financing ((the development of)) water or sewer
facilities development projects authorized ((by,)) and improved or
constructed in accordance with((,)) (a) of this subsection. Unless
otherwise provided by ordinance or contract, municipalities that
participate in the financing of water or sewer facilities improved or
constructed in accordance with (a) of this subsection:
(i) ((Municipalities that contribute to the financing of water or
sewer facilities projects under this section)) Have the same rights to
reimbursement as owners of real estate who make contributions as
authorized under this section; and
(ii) ((If the projects are jointly financed by a combination of
municipal funding and private funding by real estate owners, the amount
of reimbursement received by each participant in the financing must be
a pro rata share)) Are entitled to a pro rata share of the
reimbursement based on the respective contribution of the owner and the
municipality.
(2) A contract entered into under this section must also provide,
in accordance with the requirements of this section, for the pro rata
reimbursement to the owner or the owner's assigns for twenty years, or
for a longer period if extended in accordance with subsection (4) of
this section. The reimbursements must be: (a) Within the period of
time that the contract is effective; (b) for a portion of the costs of
the water or sewer facilities improved or constructed in accordance
with the contract; and (c) from latecomer fees received by the
municipality from property owners who subsequently connect to or use
the water or sewer facilities, but who did not contribute to the
original cost of the facilities.
(((c))) (3) Except as provided otherwise by this section, a
municipality seeking reimbursement from an owner of real estate under
this section is limited to the dollar amount authorized ((under this
chapter and may not collect any additional reimbursement, assessment,
charge, or fee for the infrastructure or facilities that were
constructed under the applicable ordinance, contract, or agreement)) in
accordance with subsection (7) of this section. This does not prevent
the ((collection of)) municipality from collecting amounts for services
or infrastructure that are additional expenditures not subject to
((such)) the ordinance, contract, or agreement, nor does it prevent the
collection of fees that are reasonable and proportionate to the total
expenses incurred by the municipality in complying with this section.
(((2))) (4)(a) The contract may provide for an extension of the
twenty-year reimbursement period for a time not to exceed the duration
of any moratorium, phasing ordinance, concurrency designation, or other
governmental action that prevents making applications for, or the
approval of, any new development within the benefit area for a period
of six months or more.
(b) Upon the extension of the reimbursement period pursuant to (a)
of this subsection, the contract must specify the duration of the
contract extension and must be filed and recorded with the county
auditor. Property owners who are subject to the reimbursement
obligations under subsection (1) of this section shall be notified by
the contracting municipality of the extension filed under this
subsection.
(((3))) (5) The requirement for a municipality to contract with an
owner of real estate for the construction or improvement of water or
sewer facilities under this section is only applicable if the
facilities are consistent with all applicable comprehensive plans and
development regulations of the municipalities through which the
facilities will be constructed or will serve.
(6) Each contract ((shall)) must include a provision requiring that
every two years from the date the contract is executed a property owner
entitled to reimbursement under this section provide the
((contracting)) municipality with information regarding the current
contract name, address, and telephone number of the person, company, or
partnership that originally entered into the contract. If the property
owner fails to comply with the notification requirements of this
subsection within sixty days of the specified time, then the
contracting municipality may collect any reimbursement funds owed to
the property owner under the contract. ((Such)) The funds collected
under this subsection must be deposited in the capital fund of the
municipality.
(((4))) (7) To the extent it may require in the performance of
((such)) the contract, ((such)) the municipality may install ((said))
the water or sewer facilities in and along the county streets in the
area to be served as hereinabove provided, subject to ((such))
reasonable requirements as to the manner of occupancy of ((such)) the
streets as the county may by resolution provide. The provisions of
((such)) the contract ((shall)) may not be effective as to any owner of
real estate not a party thereto unless ((such)) the contract has been
recorded in the office of the county auditor of the county in which the
real estate of ((such)) the owner is located prior to the time ((such))
the owner taps into or connects to ((said)) the water or sewer
facilities.
(8) Within one hundred twenty days of the completion of a water or
sewer facility, the owners of the real estate must submit the total
cost of the water or sewer facility to the applicable municipality.
This information must be used by the municipality as the basis for
determining reimbursements by future users who benefit from the water
or sewer facility, but who did not contribute to the original cost of
the water or sewer facility.
(9) Nothing in this section is intended to create a private right
of action for damages against a municipality for failing to comply with
the requirements of this section. A municipality, its officials,
employees, or agents may not be held liable for failure to collect a
latecomer fee unless the failure was willful or intentional. Failure
of a municipality to comply with the requirements of this section does
not relieve a municipality of any future requirement to comply with
this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.02.020 and 2010 c 153 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except only as expressly provided in chapters 67.28, 81.104, and
82.14 RCW, the state preempts the field of imposing retail sales and
use taxes and taxes upon parimutuel wagering authorized pursuant to RCW
67.16.060, conveyances, and cigarettes, and no county, town, or other
municipal subdivision shall have the right to impose taxes of that
nature. Except as provided in RCW 64.34.440 and 82.02.050 through
82.02.090, no county, city, town, or other municipal corporation shall
impose any tax, fee, or charge, either direct or indirect, on the
construction or reconstruction of residential buildings, commercial
buildings, industrial buildings, or on any other building or building
space or appurtenance thereto, or on the development, subdivision,
classification, or reclassification of land. However, this section
does not preclude dedications of land or easements within the proposed
development or plat which the county, city, town, or other municipal
corporation can demonstrate are reasonably necessary as a direct result
of the proposed development or plat to which the dedication of land or
easement is to apply.
This section does not prohibit voluntary agreements with counties,
cities, towns, or other municipal corporations that allow a payment in
lieu of a dedication of land or to mitigate a direct impact that has
been identified as a consequence of a proposed development,
subdivision, or plat. A local government shall not use such voluntary
agreements for local off-site transportation improvements within the
geographic boundaries of the area or areas covered by an adopted
transportation program authorized by chapter 39.92 RCW. Any such
voluntary agreement is subject to the following provisions:
(1) The payment shall be held in a reserve account and may only be
expended to fund a capital improvement agreed upon by the parties to
mitigate the identified, direct impact;
(2) The payment shall be expended in all cases within five years of
collection; and
(3) Any payment not so expended shall be refunded with interest to
be calculated from the original date the deposit was received by the
county and at the same rate applied to tax refunds pursuant to RCW
84.69.100; however, if the payment is not expended within five years
due to delay attributable to the developer, the payment shall be
refunded without interest.
No county, city, town, or other municipal corporation shall require
any payment as part of such a voluntary agreement which the county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation cannot establish is
reasonably necessary as a direct result of the proposed development or
plat.
Nothing in this section prohibits cities, towns, counties, or other
municipal corporations from collecting reasonable fees from an
applicant for a permit or other governmental approval to cover the cost
to the city, town, county, or other municipal corporation of processing
applications, inspecting and reviewing plans, or preparing detailed
statements required by chapter 43.21C RCW, including reasonable fees
that are consistent with RCW 43.21C.420(6), section 1 of this act, and
beginning July 1, 2014, RCW 35.91.020.
This section does not limit the existing authority of any county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation to impose special
assessments on property specifically benefited thereby in the manner
prescribed by law.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
imposing or permits counties, cities, or towns to impose water, sewer,
natural gas, drainage utility, and drainage system charges. However,
no such charge shall exceed the proportionate share of such utility or
system's capital costs which the county, city, or town can demonstrate
are attributable to the property being charged. Furthermore, these
provisions may not be interpreted to expand or contract any existing
authority of counties, cities, or towns to impose such charges.
Nothing in this section prohibits a transportation benefit district
from imposing fees or charges authorized in RCW 36.73.120 nor prohibits
the legislative authority of a county, city, or town from approving the
imposition of such fees within a transportation benefit district.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
imposing transportation impact fees authorized pursuant to chapter
39.92 RCW.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
requiring property owners to provide relocation assistance to tenants
under RCW 59.18.440 and 59.18.450.
Nothing in this section limits the authority of counties, cities,
or towns to implement programs consistent with RCW 36.70A.540, nor to
enforce agreements made pursuant to such programs.
This section does not apply to special purpose districts formed and
acting pursuant to Title 54, 57, or 87 RCW, nor is the authority
conferred by these titles affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 and 3 of this act take effect
July 1, 2014.

--- END ---