BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.12.183 and 2011 c 190 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On or after January 1, 2012, any business that owns and
operates a for hire vehicle licensed under chapter 46.72 RCW, a
limousine under chapter 46.72A RCW, or a taxicab under chapter 81.72
RCW and the for hire operator or chauffeur of such vehicle is within
the mandatory coverage of this title.
(2) On or after January 1, 2012, any business that as owner or
agent leases a for hire vehicle licensed under chapter 46.72 RCW, a
limousine under chapter 46.72A RCW, or a taxicab under chapter 81.72
RCW to a for hire operator or a chauffeur and the for hire operator or
chauffeur of such vehicle is within the mandatory coverage of this
title.
(3) Prior to January 1, 2012, any business that owned and operated,
or as owner or agent leased, a for hire vehicle licensed under chapter
46.72 RCW, a limousine under chapter 46.72A RCW, or a taxicab under
chapter 81.72 RCW, and the for hire operator or chauffeur of such
vehicle is not within the mandatory coverage of this title.
(4) Any business that owned and operated, or as owner or agent
leased, a for hire vehicle licensed under chapter 46.72 RCW, a
limousine under chapter 46.72A RCW, or a taxicab under chapter 81.72
RCW that paid premium, penalty, or interest to the department in
settlement of a claim for unpaid premiums by the department prior to
January 1, 2012, where no fault for such claim was admitted, must have
such payment refunded by the department within ninety days after the
effective date of this section.
(5) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Chauffeur" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 46.04.115;
and
(b) "For hire operator" means a person who is operating a vehicle
for the purpose of carrying persons for compensation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies both prospectively and
retroactively to all causes of action arising under this section.

--- END ---