BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the first five years of a child's life
establish the foundation for educational success. The legislature also
finds that children who have high quality early learning opportunities
from birth through age five are more likely to succeed throughout their
K-12 education and beyond. The legislature further finds that the
benefits of high quality early learning experiences are particularly
significant for low-income parents and children, and provide an
opportunity to narrow the opportunity gap in Washington's K-12
educational system. The legislature understands that early supports
for high-risk parents of young children through home visiting services
show a high return on investment due to significantly improved chances
of better education, health, and life outcomes for children. The
legislature further recognizes that, when parents work or go to school,
high quality and full-day early learning opportunities should be
available and accessible for their children. In order to improve
education outcomes, particularly for low-income children, the
legislature is committed to expanding high quality early learning
opportunities and integrating currently disparate funding streams for
all birth-to-five early learning services including, working
connections child care and the early childhood education and assistance
program, into a single high quality continuum of learning that provides
essential services to low-income families and prepares all enrolled
children for success in school. The legislature therefore intends to
establish the early start program to provide a continuum of high
quality and accountable early learning opportunities for Washington's
parents and children.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.010 and 2011 c 295 s 3 and 2011 c 78 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, or facility that provides child care and early learning
services outside a child's own home and includes the following
irrespective of whether there is compensation to the agency:
(a) "Child day care center" means an agency that regularly provides
((child day care)) early childhood education and early learning
services for a group of children for periods of less than twenty-four
hours;
(b) "Early learning" includes but is not limited to programs and
services for child care; state, federal, private, and nonprofit
preschool; child care subsidies; child care resource and referral;
parental education and support; and training and professional
development for early learning professionals;
(c) "Family day care provider" means a child ((day)) care provider
who regularly provides ((child day care)) early childhood education and
early learning services for not more than twelve children in the
provider's home in the family living quarters;
(d) "Nongovernmental private-public partnership" means an entity
registered as a nonprofit corporation in Washington state with a
primary focus on early learning, school readiness, and parental
support, and an ability to raise a minimum of five million dollars in
contributions;
(e) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a community
facility.
(2) "Agency" does not include the following:
(a) Persons related to the child in the following ways:
(i) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and
including first cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding
generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great;
(ii) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;
(iii) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as
well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons,
and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state
law; or
(iv) Spouses of any persons named in (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection (2)(((a))), even after the marriage is terminated;
(b) Persons who are legal guardians of the child;
(c) Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or
children, with or without compensation, where the person providing care
for periods of less than twenty-four hours does not conduct such
activity on an ongoing, regularly scheduled basis for the purpose of
engaging in business, which includes, but is not limited to,
advertising such care;
(d) Parents on a mutually cooperative basis exchange care of one
another's children;
(e) Nursery schools ((or kindergartens)) that are engaged primarily
in ((educational work)) early childhood education with preschool
children and in which no child is enrolled on a regular basis for more
than four hours per day;
(f) Schools, including boarding schools, that are engaged primarily
in education, operate on a definite school year schedule, follow a
stated academic curriculum, accept only school-age children, and do not
accept custody of children;
(g) Seasonal camps of three months' or less duration engaged
primarily in recreational or educational activities;
(h) Facilities providing child care for periods of less than
twenty-four hours when a parent or legal guardian of the child remains
on the premises of the facility for the purpose of participating in:
(i) Activities other than employment; or
(ii) Employment of up to two hours per day when the facility is
operated by a nonprofit entity that also operates a licensed child care
program at the same facility in another location or at another
facility;
(i) ((Any agency having been in operation in this state ten years
before June 8, 1967, and not seeking or accepting moneys or assistance
from any state or federal agency, and is supported in part by an
endowment or trust fund;
(j) An agency)) A program operated by any unit of local, state, or
federal government or an agency, located within the boundaries of a
federally recognized Indian reservation, licensed by the Indian tribe;
(((k) An agency)) (j) A program located on a federal military
reservation, except where the military authorities request that such
agency be subject to the licensing requirements of this chapter;
(((l) An agency)) (k) A program that offers early learning and
support services, such as parent education, and does not provide child
care services on a regular basis.
(3) "Applicant" means a person who requests or seeks employment in
an agency.
(4) "Conviction information" means criminal history record
information relating to an incident which has led to a conviction or
other disposition adverse to the applicant.
(5) "Department" means the department of early learning.
(6) "Director" means the director of the department.
(7) "Early achievers" means a program that improves the quality of
early learning programs and supports and rewards providers for their
participation.
(8) "Employer" means a person or business that engages the services
of one or more people, especially for wages or salary to work in an
agency.
(((8))) (9) "Enforcement action" means denial, suspension,
revocation, modification, or nonrenewal of a license pursuant to RCW
43.215.300(1) or assessment of civil monetary penalties pursuant to RCW
43.215.300(3).
(((9))) (10) "Negative action" means a court order, court judgment,
or an adverse action taken by an agency, in any state, federal, tribal,
or foreign jurisdiction, which results in a finding against the
applicant reasonably related to the individual's character,
suitability, and competence to care for or have unsupervised access to
children in child care. This may include, but is not limited to:
(a) A decision issued by an administrative law judge;
(b) A final determination, decision, or finding made by an agency
following an investigation;
(c) An adverse agency action, including termination, revocation, or
denial of a license or certification, or if pending adverse agency
action, the voluntary surrender of a license, certification, or
contract in lieu of the adverse action;
(d) A revocation, denial, or restriction placed on any professional
license; or
(e) A final decision of a disciplinary board.
(((10))) (11) "Nonconviction information" means arrest, founded
allegations of child abuse, or neglect pursuant to chapter 26.44 RCW,
or other negative action adverse to the applicant.
(((11))) (12) "Probationary license" means a license issued as a
disciplinary measure to an agency that has previously been issued a
full license but is out of compliance with licensing standards.
(((12))) (13) "Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard
of care to be maintained by an agency.
(14) "Washington state preschool program" means an education
program for children three-to-five years of age who have not yet
entered kindergarten, such as the early childhood education and
assistance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1)(a) A legislative task force on early
learning is established, with members as provided in this subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(iii) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives shall jointly appoint:
(A) One member representing the early learning action council;
(B) One member representing the Washington state association of
head start and early childhood education and assistance program;
(C) One member from an educational service district;
(D) One member representing thrive by five;
(E) One member from the birth-to-three community;
(F) One member representing the Washington state child care
resource and referral system;
(G) One member who is a child care center provider;
(H) One member who provides early intervention services to infants
and toddlers with disabilities;
(I) One member representing the office of the superintendent of
public instruction;
(J) One member representing the service employees international
union 925;
(K) One member who is a family child care provider;
(L) One member who is a parent who is utilizing a state-funded
early learning program; and
(M) One member representing the Washington federation of
independent schools.
(iv) The governor shall appoint one representative each from the
department of social and health services and the department of early
learning.
(b) The task force shall choose its chair from among its
membership. The chair of the house of representatives early learning
and human services committee shall convene the initial meeting of the
task force.
(2) The task force shall complete the following objectives:
(a) Review the existing funding sources, program goals, and
restrictions associated with different funding streams for early
learning programs and services as identified by the technical working
group;
(b) Identify areas of alignment and conflicts in restrictions and
eligibility requirements associated with early learning funding and
services;
(c) Develop an implementation plan to create an accessible
integrated, high quality early learning program for children ages birth
to five. The implementation plan, at a minimum, must include the
following:
(i) A timeline for implementation of child care quality
improvements;
(ii) A timeline for increasing eligibility for the Washington state
preschool program to one hundred thirty percent of the federal poverty
rate;
(iii) A funding plan that blends and maximizes existing resources
and identifies new revenue from funds distributed to the general fund
pursuant to RCW 69.50.540 and other funding sources;
(iv) Incentives for integrating child care and preschool
programming to better serve working families;
(v) Provisions for full-day and half-day early learning programs;
(vi) Provisions for parent education and home visiting programs;
(vii) A variety of mixed settings for service delivery, including
but not limited to family child care, child care centers, schools, and
educational service districts;
(viii) Provisions for compensation for early learning professional
development; and
(ix) A plan for a single point of entry for families wanting early
learning services.
(3)(a) The chair of the task force shall appoint a technical
working group to:
(i) Review federal and state early education funding streams;
(ii) Develop technical options for aligning eligibility
requirements for child care and Washington state preschool;
(iii) Develop recommendations for an effective and responsive
eligibility system;
(iv) Develop technical options for system designs that blend and
braid disparate federal and state funding streams into a single
program, including the option of applying for waivers from existing
federal requirements; and
(v) Present findings and options to the task force.
(b) At a minimum, the technical working group must be composed of
financial and policy staff from the department of social and health
services and the department of early learning. Legislative staff may
provide technical support as needed to the technical working group, at
the request of the task force.
(4) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research, with assistance from the department of social and health
services and the department of early learning.
(5) Nonlegislative members, except those representing an employer
or organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(7) The implementation plan shall be submitted to the legislature
for approval by December 1, 2013. The plan may not be implemented
without authorization by the legislature.
(8) This section expires December 31, 2013.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.215.020 and 2010 c 233 s 1, 2010 c 232 s 2, and
2010 c 231 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department of early learning is created as an executive
branch agency. The department is vested with all powers and duties
transferred to it under this chapter and such other powers and duties
as may be authorized by law.
(2) The primary duties of the department are to implement state
early learning policy and to coordinate, consolidate, and integrate
child care and early learning programs in order to administer programs
and funding as efficiently as possible. The department's duties
include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) To support both public and private sectors toward a
comprehensive and collaborative system of early learning that serves
parents, children, and providers and to encourage best practices in
child care and early learning programs;
(b) To make early learning resources available to parents and
caregivers;
(c) To carry out activities, including providing clear and easily
accessible information about quality and improving the quality of early
learning opportunities for young children, in cooperation with the
nongovernmental private-public partnership;
(d) To administer child care and early learning programs;
(e) To annually review rates for child care compared to market
rates and make recommendations to the legislature;
(f) To conduct an annual survey of staff compensation in licensed
child care programs and the Washington state preschool program,
including early achievers and nonearly achievers programs, using data
generated by the managed education and registry information tool and
the early achievers program and report survey findings to the
legislature;
(g) To serve as the state lead agency for Part C of the federal
individuals with disabilities education act (IDEA);
(((f))) (h) To standardize internal financial audits, oversight
visits, performance benchmarks, and licensing criteria, so that
programs can function in an integrated fashion;
(((g))) (i) To support the implementation of the nongovernmental
private-public partnership and cooperate with that partnership in
pursuing its goals including providing data and support necessary for
the successful work of the partnership;
(((h))) (j) To work cooperatively and in coordination with the
early learning council;
(((i))) (k) To collaborate with the K-12 school system at the state
and local levels to ensure appropriate connections and smooth
transitions between early learning and K-12 programs;
(((j))) (l) To develop and adopt rules for administration of the
program of early learning established in RCW 43.215.141;
(((k))) (m) To develop a comprehensive birth-to-three plan to
provide education and support through a continuum of options including,
but not limited to, services such as: Home visiting; quality
incentives for infant and toddler child care subsidies; quality
improvements for family home and center-based child care programs
serving infants and toddlers; professional development; early literacy
programs; and informal supports for family, friend, and neighbor
caregivers; and
(((l))) (n) Upon the development of an early learning information
system, to make available to parents timely inspection and licensing
action information and provider comments through the internet and other
means.
(3) When additional funds are appropriated for the specific purpose
of home visiting and parent and caregiver support, the department must
reserve at least eighty percent for home visiting services to be
deposited into the home visiting services account and up to twenty
percent of the new funds for other parent or caregiver support.
(4) Home visiting services must include programs that serve
families involved in the child welfare system.
(5) The legislature shall fund the expansion in the Washington
state preschool program pursuant to RCW 43.215.142 in fiscal year 2014.
(6) The department's programs shall be designed in a way that
respects and preserves the ability of parents and legal guardians to
direct the education, development, and upbringing of their children,
and that recognizes and honors cultural and linguistic diversity. The
department shall include parents and legal guardians in the development
of policies and program decisions affecting their children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
Funds distributed to the general fund pursuant to RCW 69.50.540
must be utilized to phase in an integrated high quality continuum of
early learning program, called early start, for children birth-to-five
years of age. Components of early start include, but are not limited
to, the following:
(1) Home visiting and parent education and support programs;
(2) The early achievers program described in RCW 43.215.100;
(3) Integrated full-day, high quality early learning programs; and
(4) High quality preschool for children whose family income is at
or below one hundred thirty percent of the federal poverty level.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.215.100 and 2007 c 394 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department, in collaboration with community and
statewide partners, shall implement a voluntary quality rating and
improvement system, called the early achievers program, that is
applicable to licensed or certified child care centers and homes and
early education programs.
(2) The purpose of the ((voluntary quality rating and improvement
system)) early achievers program is: (a) To give parents clear and
easily accessible information about the quality of child care and early
education programs, support improvement in early learning programs
throughout the state, increase the readiness of children for school,
and close the disparity in access to quality care; and (b) to establish
a common set of expectations and standards that define, measure, and
improve the quality of early learning settings.
(3) Participation in the early achievers program is voluntary for
licensed or certified child care centers and homes.
(4) By fiscal year 2015, Washington state preschool programs
receiving state funds must enroll in the early achievers program and
maintain a minimum score level.
(5) Before final implementation of the ((voluntary quality rating
and improvement system)) early achievers program, the department shall
report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature. Nothing in this section changes the department's
responsibility to collectively bargain over mandatory subjects.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.215.430 and 1994 c 166 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall review applications from public or private
nonsectarian organizations for state funding of early childhood
education and assistance programs ((and award funds as determined by
department rules and based on)). The department shall consider local
community needs ((and)), demonstrated capacity ((to provide services)),
and the need to support a mixed delivery system of early learning when
reviewing applications.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.215.545 and 2006 c 265 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of early learning shall:
(1) Work in conjunction with the statewide child care resource and
referral network as well as local governments, nonprofit organizations,
businesses, and community child care advocates to create local child
care resource and referral organizations. These organizations may
carry out needs assessments, resource development, provider training,
technical assistance, and parent information and training;
(2) Actively seek public and private money for distribution as
grants to the statewide child care resource and referral network and to
existing or potential local child care resource and referral
organizations;
(3) Adopt rules regarding the application for and distribution of
grants to local child care resource and referral organizations. The
rules shall, at a minimum, require an applicant to submit a plan for
achieving the following objectives:
(a) Provide parents with information about child care resources,
including location of services and subsidies;
(b) Carry out child care provider recruitment and training
programs, including training under RCW 74.25.040;
(c) Offer support services, such as parent and provider seminars,
toy-lending libraries, and substitute banks;
(d) Provide information for businesses regarding child care supply
and demand;
(e) Advocate for increased public and private sector resources
devoted to child care;
(f) Provide technical assistance to employers regarding employee
child care services; and
(g) Serve recipients of temporary assistance for needy families and
working parents with incomes at or below household incomes of ((one))
two hundred ((seventy-five)) percent of the federal poverty line;
(4) Provide staff support and technical assistance to the statewide
child care resource and referral network and local child care resource
and referral organizations;
(5) Maintain a statewide child care licensing data bank and work
with department licensors to provide information to local child care
resource and referral organizations about licensed child care providers
in the state;
(6) Through the statewide child care resource and referral network
and local resource and referral organizations, compile data about local
child care needs and availability for future planning and development;
(7) Coordinate with the statewide child care resource and referral
network and local child care resource and referral organizations for
the provision of training and technical assistance to child care
providers; ((and))
(8) Collect and assemble information regarding the availability of
insurance and of federal and other child care funding to assist state
and local agencies, businesses, and other child care providers in
offering child care services;
(9) Beginning September 1, 2013, increase the base rate for all
child care providers by ten percent;
(10) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, provide tiered subsidy rate enhancements to child
care providers if the provider meets the following requirements:
(a) The provider meets quality rating and improvement system levels
2, 3, 4, or 5;
(b) The provider is actively participating in the early achievers
program;
(c) The provider continues to advance towards level 5 of the early
achievers program; and
(d) The provider must complete level 2 within eighteen months or
the reimbursement rate will return the level 1 rate; and
(11) Require exempt providers to participate in continuing
education, if adequate funding is available.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.215.135 and 2012 c 253 s 5 and 2012 c 251 s 1 are
each reenacted to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and implement policies in the
working connections child care program to promote stability and quality
of care for children from low-income households. Policies for the
expenditure of funds constituting the working connections child care
program must be consistent with the outcome measures defined in RCW
74.08A.410 and the standards established in this section intended to
promote continuity of care for children.
(2) Beginning in fiscal year 2013, authorizations for the working
connections child care subsidy shall be effective for twelve months
unless a change in circumstances necessitates reauthorization sooner
than twelve months. The twelve-month certification applies only if the
enrollments in the child care subsidy or working connections child care
program are capped.
(3) Beginning September 1, 2013, working connections child care
providers shall receive a five percent increase in the subsidy rate for
achieving level 2 in the early achievers programs. Providers must
complete level 2 and advance to level 3 within eighteen months in order
to maintain this increase.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 4 of this act, referencing section 4 of this act by bill or
chapter and section number, is not provided by June 30, 2013, in the
omnibus appropriations act, section 4 of this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 8 of this act, referencing section 8 of this act by bill or
chapter and section number, is not provided by June 30, 2013, in the
omnibus appropriations act, section 8 of this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 9 of this act, referencing section 9 of this act by bill or
chapter and section number, is not provided by June 30, 2013, in the
omnibus appropriations act, section 9 of this act is null and void.

--- END ---