BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that the
affordability of all higher education programs has decreased in recent
years due to increases in tuition, and that affordability is the major
barrier to access. Some students are deterred by the price of
postsecondary education and do not apply, while others, already
enrolled, face unexpected increases in tuition that may be beyond their
ability to pay and they may be forced to drop out.
(2) The legislature intends to create greater affordability and
predictability for students enrolling in postsecondary programs in
order to reduce the burden of tuition increases.
(3) The legislature recognizes that the value of programs that help
low-income and middle-income students and their families save for and
pay for higher education such as the advanced tuition payment program
and the state need grant. It is the intent of the legislature to build
on the success of these programs by engaging the employer and
foundation communities to offer tuition support and to partner in the
postsecondary preparation needs of the future workforce and a
prosperous economy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Fund administrator" means the private nonprofit corporation
that is registered under Title 24 RCW and qualified as a tax-exempt
entity under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code,
that will serve as the private partner in the public-private
partnership under this chapter.
(2) "GET units" means tuition units under the advanced college
tuition payment program in chapter 28B.95 RCW.
(3) "Institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in
RCW 28B.92.030.
(4) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.
(5) "Postsecondary program" means any certificate, degree,
apprenticeship, or college preparatory program offered at an
institution of higher education.
(6) "Program administrator" means the office of student financial
assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The tuition support fund program is
established and shall be known as the tuition assistance program for
Washingtonians' education or the tuition assistance program. The
purpose of the program is to provide financial support to students who,
due to lack of financial means, cannot afford to enroll in, or continue
their postsecondary program. Students may receive tuition assistance
program awards if they are enrolled in a qualified program and can
demonstrate financial need.
(2) The program shall be administered by the office.
(3) The fund administrator shall solicit contributions to the
tuition assistance program account in section 8 of this act.
(4) The total annual amount of each tuition assistance program
award may vary, but shall not exceed the annual cost of resident
undergraduate tuition fees and mandatory fees at the University of
Washington. An eligible recipient may receive a tuition assistance
program award for up to one hundred eighty quarter credits, or the
semester equivalent, or for up to five years, whichever comes first.
(5) Scholarships shall be awarded only to the extent that funds are
available for that purpose in the tuition assistance program account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) An eligible student is a student who:
(a) Is eligible for resident tuition and fee rates as defined in
RCW 28B.15.012;
(b) Can demonstrate financial need based on family contribution or
is at risk of withdrawal due to lack of financial means as determined
by the institution of higher education;
(c) Has declared an intention to complete a postsecondary program
at an institution of higher education; and
(d) Attends an institution of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.92.030 that participates in the state need grant program.
(2) An eligible recipient is an eligible student who:
(a) Has been awarded a tuition assistance program award in
accordance with the selection criteria and process established by the
program administrator; and
(b) Maintains satisfactory academic progress, as defined by the
institution of higher education where the student is enrolled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If a student who received a tuition
assistance program award ceases to be enrolled in an institution of
higher education, withdraws, or is no longer enrolled in a qualified
program, or otherwise is no longer eligible to receive a tuition
assistance program award, the student must notify the program
administrator as soon as practicable and is not eligible for further
tuition assistance program awards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The office must:
(1) Purchase GET units from the tuition assistance program account
to be owned and held in trust by the office, for the purpose of tuition
assistance program awards as provided for in this chapter;
(2) Distribute tuition assistance program awards. In order to
ensure the purchaser does not lose value, these GET units shall not be
distributed before the purchase value exceeds the payout value;
(3) Distribute tuition assistance program grants as they become
available as provided in section 8 of this act through direct payments
from the tuition assistance program account, to institutions of higher
education;
(4) Administer the process for awarding tuition assistance program
awards so that the institutions of higher education select the
participants;
(5) Establish rules for award repayment, approved leaves of
absence, deferments, and exceptions to recognize extenuating
circumstances that may impact students similar to the state need grant
program in RCW 28B.92.060;
(6) Contract with a fund administrator, outlining expected
deliverables and due dates. Deliverables must include a comprehensive
strategy to solicit funds, development of goals for enlarging the
tuition assistance program account, a plan for developing relationships
with potential employers, businesses, and foundation contributors, and
methods for assessing progress in meeting goals;
(7) Provide information to institutions of higher education, at
least once per year, to provide training on the tuition assistance
program and tools for administering the program alongside other state
financial aid programs; and
(8) Report to the governor and the legislature on tuition
assistance program awards and recipient outcomes, including any
recommendations for improvement of administration or program design.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The fund administrator shall:
(1) Solicit grants and donations from private sources such as
employers, businesses, and foundations to support the tuition
assistance program;
(2) Coordinate with the program administrator to deposit solicited
funds in the tuition assistance program account; and
(3) Report to the program administrator on progress in meeting
deliverables at least four times per year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The tuition assistance program account
is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
(2) The office shall deposit into the account all moneys received
for the tuition assistance program account. The account must be self-sustaining.
(3)(a) Expenditures from the account must be used for tuition
assistance program awards, which shall be paid directly to institutions
of higher education on behalf of recipients.
(b) Twenty percent of the contributions must be held in the account
to accrue interest.
(c) Forty percent of the contributions shall be for tuition
assistance program grants and forty percent of the contributions shall
be for the purposes of purchasing GET units.
(d) Purchased GET units shall be owned and held in trust by the
office.
(4) With the exception of the operating costs associated with the
management of the account by the treasurer's office as authorized in
chapter 43.79A RCW, the account shall be credited with all investment
income earned by the account.
(5) Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations
and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.
(6) Disbursements from the account shall be made only on the
authorization of the office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This chapter shall be known and cited as the
tuition assistance program for Washingtonians' education act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---