BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.20.330 and 2012 c 10 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Assisted living facilities are not required to provide
intermittent nursing services. The assisted living facility licensee
may choose to provide any of the following intermittent nursing
services through appropriately licensed and credentialed staff,
however, the facility may or may not need to provide additional
intermittent nursing services to comply with the reasonable
accommodation requirements in federal or state law:
(a) Medication administration;
(b) Administration of health care treatments;
(c) Diabetic management;
(d) Nonroutine ostomy care;
(e) Tube feeding; and
(f) Nurse delegation consistent with chapter 18.79 RCW.
(2) The licensee shall clarify on the disclosure form any
limitations, additional services, or conditions that may apply under
this section.
(3) In providing intermittent nursing services, the assisted living
facility shall observe the resident for changes in overall functioning
and respond appropriately when there are observable or reported changes
in the resident's physical, mental, or emotional functioning.
(4) The assisted living facility may provide intermittent nursing
services to ((the extent permitted by RCW 18.20.160)) residents who do
not require the frequent presence and supervision of a licensed
registered nurse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an assisted living facility chooses to provide continuing
nursing services and admits a person who requires the frequent presence
and evaluation of a registered nurse, the facility must have a
registered nurse available to assure the safe delivery of the required
care and services in accordance with applicable rules developed by the
department.
(2) An assisted living facility that is unable to assure that a
registered nurse is available to provide or direct the safe delivery of
the required care and services may not admit or retain a person who
requires the frequent presence and evaluation of a registered nurse.
Persons who are receiving hospice care or have a short-term illness
that is expected to be resolved within fourteen days may remain or be
admitted in the facility provided that the facility is able to assure
that sufficient numbers and appropriately qualified and trained staff
or outside service providers under RCW 18.20.380 are available to meet
the needs of such persons.
(3) If the assisted living facility license has the designation
required under section 4 of this act, the facility may provide
continuing nursing services, as defined by the department in rule, to
meet the needs of residents whose needs could not be met through
intermittent nursing services under RCW 18.20.330.
(4) On the disclosure form, the assisted living facility shall
describe any limitations, additional services, or conditions that may
apply under this section.
(5) In providing continuing nursing services, the assisted living
facility shall observe the resident for changes in overall functioning
and respond appropriately when there are observable or reported changes
in the resident's physical, mental, or emotional functioning that
exceed the licensee's licensure limitations and any limitations
described in the disclosure form.
(6) If an assisted living facility with a continuing nursing
services designation determines, or has reason to believe, that a
resident needs continuing nursing services or rehabilitative therapy
services, then the facility must provide the resident, the resident's
legal representative, if any, and, if not, the resident representative,
with a department-approved written notice informing the client that he
or she may be eligible for complete or partial coverage of those
services through medicare, medicaid, veterans' benefits, long-term care
insurance, or other benefit programs. The department shall develop the
written notice with input from stakeholders. The notice must inform
residents of possible coverage under the benefit programs at reduced
fee or no cost to the resident, and provide contact information for
those programs. The notice must be signed and dated by the resident,
or his or her representative if the resident lacks capacity. The
facility must retain a copy of the signed notice. If the resident
chooses to use his or her benefits under medicare, medicaid, veterans'
benefits, long-term care insurance, or other programs, the resident may
elect to receive the nursing or rehabilitative therapy services offered
through an outside health care provider under RCW 18.20.380, or from
the assisted living facility if the facility is an authorized provider
under the relevant benefit program. An assisted living facility that
fails to give the notice required under this subsection and charges
residents privately for the provision of continuing nursing or
rehabilitative services and such services were otherwise eligible for
medicare, veterans' benefits, long-term care insurance, or other third-party coverage, commits an act that constitutes financial exploitation
under chapter 74.34 RCW.
(7) An assisted living facility that chooses to provide continuing
nursing services, and has residents whose care is paid for in whole or
in part by medicaid, may not use the continuing nursing services
designation, or any physical plant alterations or application process
necessary for such designation, as a basis for the permanent discharge
of any of the facility's current medicaid residents. An assisted
living facility that receives an initial continuing nursing services
designation may not, for one year following the initial designation,
reduce the number of medicaid residents that the facility accepts or
retains below the highest number of medicaid residents living at the
facility within one year prior to the application for an initial
continuing nursing services designation.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.20.160 and 2012 c 10 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
((No person operating an assisted living facility licensed under
this chapter shall admit to or retain in the assisted living facility
any aged person requiring nursing or medical care of a type provided by
institutions licensed under chapters 18.51, 70.41 or 71.12 RCW, except
that when registered nurses are available, and upon a doctor's order
that a supervised medication service is needed, it may be provided.
Supervised medication services, as defined by the department and
consistent with chapters 69.41 and 18.79 RCW, may include an approved
program of self-medication or self-directed medication. Such
medication service shall be provided only to residents who otherwise
meet all requirements for residency in an assisted living facility. No
assisted living facility shall admit or retain a person who requires
the frequent presence and frequent evaluation of a registered nurse,
excluding persons who are receiving hospice care or persons who have a
short-term illness that is expected to be resolved within fourteen
days.)) The assisted living facility licensed under this chapter must
assume general responsibility for each resident and must promote each
resident's health, safety, and well-being consistent with the resident
negotiated care plan. In addition, the assisted living facility may
provide assistance with activities of daily living, health support
services, intermittent nursing services, and continuing nursing
services, as may be further defined by the department in rule, and
consistent with the care and services included in the disclosure form
required under RCW 18.20.300. To provide continuing nursing services,
the licensee shall obtain from the department a designation as required
by section 4 of this act. Without first obtaining the required
designation on its license, an assisted living facility may not admit
or retain a person who requires the frequent presence and frequent
evaluation of a licensed registered nurse, except for persons who are
receiving hospice care or persons who have a short-term illness that is
expected to be resolved within fourteen days. The assisted living
facility must assure that sufficient numbers and appropriately
qualified and trained staff are available to provide care and services
consistent with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An assisted living facility may provide continuing nursing
services if it secures a designation on its license from the
department.
(2) At least sixty days prior to the anticipated designation to
provide continuing nursing services, the applicant must submit to the
department a completed application on a form developed by the
department.
(3) Prior to granting an initial continuing nursing services
designation, the department shall make an inspection visit to the
assisted living facility applicant to determine the facility's
compliance with the continuing nursing services rules. At least once
every eighteen months, the department shall inspect the assisted living
facility to determine the facility's compliance with the applicable
rules to determine whether the designation may be continued.
(4) The department shall establish fees to be paid by assisted
living facilities prior to the issuance of an initial or renewal
designation under this section. The department shall establish the fee
at a level that covers the cost of the administration of the
designation program.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "continuing nursing services"
means the resident has been assessed with a condition or diagnosis that
is expected to require the frequent presence and supervision of a
licensed registered nurse.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.20.030 and 2012 c 10 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After January 1, 1958, no person shall operate or maintain an
assisted living facility as defined in this chapter within this state
without a license under this chapter.
(2) An assisted living facility license is not required for the
housing, or services, that are customarily provided under landlord
tenant agreements governed by the residential landlord-tenant act,
chapter 59.18 RCW, or when housing nonresident individuals who chose to
participate in programs or services under subsection (5) of this
section, when offered by the assisted living facility licensee or the
licensee's contractor. This subsection does not prohibit the licensee
from furnishing written information concerning available community
resources to the nonresident individual or the individual's family
members or legal representatives. The licensee may not require the use
of any particular service provider.
(3) Residents receiving domiciliary care, directly or indirectly by
the assisted living facility, are not considered nonresident
individuals for the purposes of this section.
(4) An assisted living facility license is required when any person
other than an outside service provider, under RCW 18.20.380, or family
member:
(a) Assumes general responsibility for the safety and well-being of
a resident;
(b) Provides assistance with activities of daily living, either
directly or indirectly;
(c) Provides health support services, either directly or
indirectly; ((or))
(d) Provides intermittent nursing services, either directly or
indirectly; or
(e) Provides continuing nursing services, either directly or
indirectly.
(5) An assisted living facility license is not required for one or
more of the following services that may, upon the request of the
nonresident, be provided to a nonresident individual: (a) Emergency
assistance provided on an intermittent or nonroutine basis; (b)
systems, including technology-based monitoring devices, employed by
independent senior housing, or independent living units in continuing
care retirement communities, to respond to the potential need for
emergency services; (c) scheduled and nonscheduled blood pressure
checks; (d) nursing assessment services to determine whether referral
to an outside health care provider is recommended; (e) making and
reminding the nonresident of health care appointments; (f) preadmission
assessment for the purposes of transitioning to a licensed care
setting; (g) medication assistance which may include reminding or
coaching the nonresident, opening the nonresident's medication
container, using an enabler, and handing prefilled insulin syringes to
the nonresident; (h) falls risk assessment; (i) nutrition management
and education services; (j) dental services; (k) wellness programs; (l)
prefilling insulin syringes when performed by a nurse licensed under
chapter 18.79 RCW; or (m) services customarily provided under landlord
tenant agreements governed by the residential landlord-tenant act,
chapter 59.18 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.20.020 and 2012 c 10 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adult day services" means care and services provided to a
nonresident individual by the assisted living facility on the assisted
living facility premises, for a period of time not to exceed ten
continuous hours, and does not involve an overnight stay.
(2) "Assisted living facility" means any home or other institution,
however named, which is advertised, announced, or maintained for the
express or implied purpose of providing housing, basic services, and
assuming general responsibility for the safety and well-being of the
residents, and may also provide domiciliary care, consistent with
chapter 142, Laws of 2004, to seven or more residents after July 1,
2000. However, an assisted living facility that is licensed for three
to six residents prior to or on July 1, 2000, may maintain its assisted
living facility license as long as it is continually licensed as an
assisted living facility. "Assisted living facility" shall not include
facilities certified as group training homes pursuant to RCW
71A.22.040, nor any home, institution or section thereof which is
otherwise licensed and regulated under the provisions of state law
providing specifically for the licensing and regulation of such home,
institution or section thereof. Nor shall it include any independent
senior housing, independent living units in continuing care retirement
communities, or other similar living situations including those
subsidized by the department of housing and urban development.
(3) "Basic services" means housekeeping services, meals, nutritious
snacks, laundry, and activities.
(4) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(5) "Domiciliary care" means: Assistance with activities of daily
living provided by the assisted living facility either directly or
indirectly; or health support services, if provided directly or
indirectly by the assisted living facility; or intermittent nursing
services, if provided directly or indirectly by the assisted living
facility; or continuing nursing services, if provided directly or
indirectly by the assisted living facility.
(6) "General responsibility for the safety and well-being of the
resident" means the provision of the following: Prescribed general low
sodium diets; prescribed general diabetic diets; prescribed mechanical
soft foods; emergency assistance; monitoring of the resident; arranging
health care appointments with outside health care providers and
reminding residents of such appointments as necessary; coordinating
health care services with outside health care providers consistent with
RCW 18.20.380; assisting the resident to obtain and maintain glasses,
hearing aids, dentures, canes, crutches, walkers, wheelchairs, and
assistive communication devices; observation of the resident for
changes in overall functioning; blood pressure checks as scheduled;
responding appropriately when there are observable or reported changes
in the resident's physical, mental, or emotional functioning; or
medication assistance as permitted under RCW 69.41.085 and as defined
in RCW 69.41.010.
(7) "Legal representative" means a person or persons identified in
RCW 7.70.065 who may act on behalf of the resident pursuant to the
scope of their legal authority. The legal representative shall not be
affiliated with the licensee, assisted living facility, or management
company, unless the affiliated person is a family member of the
resident.
(8) "Nonresident individual" means a person who resides in
independent senior housing, independent living units in continuing care
retirement communities, or in other similar living environments or in
an unlicensed room located within an assisted living facility. Nothing
in this chapter prohibits nonresidents from receiving one or more of
the services listed in RCW 18.20.030(5) or requires licensure as an
assisted living facility when one or more of the services listed in RCW
18.20.030(5) are provided to nonresidents. A nonresident individual
may not receive domiciliary care, as defined in this chapter, directly
or indirectly by the assisted living facility and may not receive the
items and services listed in subsection (6) of this section, except
during the time the person is receiving adult day services as defined
in this section.
(9) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal
successor thereof.
(10) "Resident" means an individual who is not related by blood or
marriage to the operator of the assisted living facility, and by reason
of age or disability, chooses to reside in the assisted living facility
and receives basic services and one or more of the services listed
under general responsibility for the safety and well-being of the
resident and may receive domiciliary care or respite care provided
directly or indirectly by the assisted living facility and shall be
permitted to receive hospice care through an outside service provider
when arranged by the resident or the resident's legal representative
under RCW 18.20.380.
(11) "Resident applicant" means an individual who is seeking
admission to a licensed assisted living facility and who has completed
and signed an application for admission, or such application for
admission has been completed and signed in their behalf by their legal
representative if any, and if not, then the designated representative
if any.
(12) "Resident's representative" means a person designated
voluntarily by a competent resident, in writing, to act in the
resident's behalf concerning the care and services provided by the
assisted living facility and to receive information from the assisted
living facility, if there is no legal representative. The resident's
competence shall be determined using the criteria in RCW
11.88.010(1)(e). The resident's representative may not be affiliated
with the licensee, assisted living facility, or management company,
unless the affiliated person is a family member of the resident. The
resident's representative shall not have authority to act on behalf of
the resident once the resident is no longer competent.
(13) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.20.090 and 2012 c 10 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt, amend, and promulgate such rules,
regulations, and standards with respect to all assisted living
facilities and operators thereof to be licensed hereunder as may be
designed to further the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter
in promoting safe and adequate care of individuals in assisted living
facilities and the sanitary, hygienic, and safe conditions of the
assisted living facility in the interest of public health, safety, and
welfare.
(2) The department shall also amend and adopt rules regarding the
provision of continuing nursing services, including rules that define:
(a) The process for designation of assisted living facilities,
including required notices to be provided to residents and their legal
representative if any, and if not, the resident's representative;
(b) The extent to which continuing nursing services may be provided
in assisted living facilities;
(c) Staffing requirements; and
(d) Physical plant requirements.

--- END ---