BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The intent of the legislature is to make
state capital budget and transportation budget appropriation and
expenditure data as transparent and easy to use by the public as is
feasible. It is important to provide information to the public on
state capital and transportation investments by legislative district
and county in a format that is easy to navigate and comprehend.
Providing such information contributes to governmental accountability,
public participation, agency efficiency, and open government.

Sec. 2 RCW 44.48.150 and 2008 c 326 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2009, in collaboration with the office of
financial management, using existing databases and structures currently
shared, the office of the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee shall establish and make available to the public a
searchable state expenditure information web site. The state
expenditure information web site shall provide access to current budget
data, access to current accounting data for budgeted expenditures and
staff, and access to historical data. At a minimum, the web site will
provide access or links to the following information as data are
available:
(a) State expenditures by fund or account;
(b) State expenditures by agency, program, and subprogram;
(c) State revenues by major source;
(d) State expenditures by object and subobject;
(e) State agency workloads, caseloads, and performance measures,
and recent performance audits; and
(f) State agency budget data by activity.
(2) "State agency," as used in this section, includes every state
agency, office, board, commission, or institution of the executive,
legislative, or judicial branches, including institutions of higher
education.
(3) The state expenditure information web site shall be updated
periodically as subsequent fiscal year data become available, and the
prior year expenditure data shall be maintained by the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee as part of its ten-year
historical budget data.
(4) By January 1, 2014, current and future capital project and
transportation project investments must be coded with the geographic
information sufficient to permit the public to search and identify
appropriation and expenditure data at the parent and subproject level
to the extent available by:
(a) State legislative district;
(b) County; and
(c) Agency project identifier.
(5) The office of the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee must, within existing resources, update the state
expenditure information web site to allow the public to search for
capital budget and transportation projects by selecting from an online
geographical map. The map must allow an in-depth examination of
financial and other data associated with such projects. Data elements
must include:
(a) Project title;
(b) Total appropriation;
(c) Project description;
(d) Expenditure data; and
(e) Administering agency.
(6) The web site must be easy to use, contain current and readily
available data, and allow for review and analysis by the public. The
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee must test
the web site with potential users to ensure that it is easy to navigate
and comprehend.

--- END ---