BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) In order to enhance the efficiency and
effectiveness of operations of institutions of higher education, the
office of financial management shall work with the department of
enterprise services, the department of transportation, the department
of commerce, institutions of higher education, and others as necessary
to comprehensively review reporting requirements related to the
provisions in RCW 19.27A.020, 19.27A.150, 70.235.020, 39.35D.020,
43.19.565, 43.41.130, 47.01.440, 70.94.151, 70.94.161, 70.94.527,
70.120A.010, 70.120A.050, 70.235.030, 70.235.040, 70.235.050,
70.235.060, 70.235.070, 80.80.030, 80.80.040, and 80.80.080. By
December 1, 2013, the office of financial management shall report to
the governor and the higher education committees of the legislature.
The report shall include recommendations for coordinating and
streamlining reporting, and promoting the most efficient use of state
resources at institutions of higher education.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Institutions of higher education and state higher education
agencies may use or accept electronic signatures for any human
resource, benefits, or payroll processes that require a signature.
Such signatures are valid and enforceable.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "electronic signature" has
the definition in RCW 41.05.014.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.85.020 and 2012 c 229 s 543 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The council:
(a) Shall adopt by rule, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW,
minimum standards for degree-granting institutions concerning granting
of degrees, quality of education, unfair business practices, financial
stability, and other necessary measures to protect citizens of this
state against substandard, fraudulent, or deceptive practices. The
rules shall require that an institution operating in Washington:
(i) Be accredited;
(ii) Have applied for accreditation and such application is pending
before the accrediting agency;
(iii) Have been granted a waiver by the council waiving the
requirement of accreditation; or
(iv) Have been granted an exemption by the council from the
requirements of this subsection (1)(a);
(b) May investigate any entity the council reasonably believes to
be subject to the jurisdiction of this chapter. In connection with the
investigation, the council may administer oaths and affirmations, issue
subpoenas and compel attendance, take evidence, and require the
production of any books, papers, correspondence, memorandums, or other
records which the council deems relevant or material to the
investigation. The council, including its staff and any other
authorized persons, may conduct site inspections, the cost of which
shall be borne by the institution, and examine records of all
institutions subject to this chapter;
(c) May negotiate and enter into interstate reciprocity agreements
with other state or multistate entities if the agreements are
consistent with the purposes in this chapter as determined by the
council;
(d) May enter into agreements with degree-granting institutions of
higher education based in this state, that are otherwise exempt under
the provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this section, for the purpose of
ensuring consistent consumer protection in interstate distance delivery
of higher education;
(e) Shall develop an interagency agreement with the workforce
training and education coordinating board to regulate degree-granting
private vocational schools with respect to degree and nondegree
programs; and
(((d))) (f) Shall develop and disseminate information to the public
about entities that sell or award degrees without requiring appropriate
academic achievement at the postsecondary level, including but not
limited to, a description of the substandard and potentially fraudulent
practices of these entities, and advice about how the public can
recognize and avoid the entities. To the extent feasible, the
information shall include links to additional resources that may assist
the public in identifying specific institutions offering substandard or
fraudulent degree programs.
(2) Financial disclosures provided to the council by degree-granting private vocational schools are not subject to public
disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

--- END ---