BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.57A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No licensee may be utilized in a remote site without approval
by the board or its designee. A "remote site" is defined as a setting
physically separate from the sponsoring or supervising physician's
primary place for meeting patients or a setting where the physician is
present less than twenty-five percent of the practice time of the
licensee.
(2)(a) Approval by the commission or its designee may be granted to
utilize a licensee in a remote site if:
(i) There is a demonstrated need for the utilization;
(ii) Adequate provision for timely communication between the
primary or alternate physician and the licensee exists;
(iii) The responsible sponsoring or supervising physician spends at
least ten percent of the practice time of the licensee in the remote
site unless the sponsoring physician demonstrates that adequate
supervision is being maintained by an alternate method such as
telecommunication.
(b) The names of the sponsoring or supervising physician and the
licensee must be prominently displayed at the entrance to the clinic or
in the reception area.
(3) No physician assistant holding an interim permit may be
utilized in a remote site setting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.71A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No licensee may be utilized in a remote site without approval
by the commission or its designee. A "remote site" is defined as a
setting physically separate from the sponsoring or supervising
physician's primary place for meeting patients or a setting where the
physician is present less than twenty-five percent of the practice time
of the licensee.
(2)(a) Approval by the commission or its designee may be granted to
utilize a licensee in a remote site if:
(i) There is a demonstrated need for the utilization;
(ii) Adequate provision for timely communication between the
primary or alternate physician and the licensee exists;
(iii) The responsible sponsoring or supervising physician spends at
least ten percent of the practice time of the licensee in the remote
site unless the sponsoring physician demonstrates that adequate
supervision is being maintained by an alternate method such as
telecommunication.
(b) The names of the sponsoring or supervising physician and the
licensee must be prominently displayed at the entrance to the clinic or
in the reception area.
(3) No physician assistant holding an interim permit may be
utilized in a remote site setting.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.57A.030 and 1993 c 28 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
An osteopathic physician assistant as defined in this chapter may
practice osteopathic medicine in this state only with the approval of
the ((practice arrangement plan)) delegation agreement by the board and
only to the extent permitted by the board. An osteopathic physician
assistant who has received a license but who has not received board
approval of the ((practice arrangement plan)) delegation agreement
under RCW 18.57A.040 may not practice. An osteopathic physician
assistant shall be subject to discipline by the board under the
provisions of chapter 18.130 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.57A.040 and 1993 c 28 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No osteopathic physician assistant practicing in this state
shall be employed or supervised by an osteopathic physician or
physician group without the approval of the board.
(2) Prior to commencing practice, an osteopathic physician
assistant licensed in this state shall apply to the board for
permission to be employed or supervised by an osteopathic physician or
physician group. The ((practice arrangement plan)) delegation
agreement shall be jointly submitted by the osteopathic physician or
physician group and osteopathic physician assistant. The secretary may
charge a fee as provided in RCW 43.70.250 to recover the cost for the
plan review. The ((practice arrangement plan)) delegation agreement
shall delineate the manner and extent to which the physician assistant
would practice and be supervised. Whenever an osteopathic physician
assistant is practicing in a manner inconsistent with the approved
((practice arrangement plan)) delegation agreement, the board may take
disciplinary action under chapter 18.130 RCW.
(3) An osteopathic physician may enter into delegation agreements
with five physician assistants, but may petition the board for a waiver
of this limit. However, no osteopathic physician may have under his or
her supervision more physician assistants than the osteopathic
physician can adequately supervise.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.57A.080 and 2007 c 264 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
An osteopathic physician(('s)) assistant may sign and attest to any
certificates, cards, forms, or other required documentation that the
osteopathic physician(('s)) assistant's supervising osteopathic
physician or osteopathic physician group may sign, provided that it is
within the osteopathic physician(('s)) assistant's scope of practice
and is consistent with the terms of the osteopathic physician(('s))
assistant's ((practice arrangement plan)) delegation agreement as
required by this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.71A.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 320 are each amended
to read as follows:
A physician assistant may practice medicine in this state only with
the approval of the ((practice arrangement plan)) delegation agreement
by the commission and only to the extent permitted by the commission.
A physician assistant who has received a license but who has not
received commission approval of the ((practice arrangement plan))
delegation agreement under RCW 18.71A.040 may not practice. A
physician assistant shall be subject to discipline under chapter 18.130
RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.71A.040 and 1996 c 191 s 58 and 1996 c 191 s 40 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) No physician assistant practicing in this state shall be
employed or supervised by a physician or physician group without the
approval of the commission.
(2) Prior to commencing practice, a physician assistant licensed in
this state shall apply to the commission for permission to be employed
or supervised by a physician or physician group. The ((practice
arrangement plan)) delegation agreement shall be jointly submitted by
the physician or physician group and physician assistant.
Administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees shall
be established as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The
((practice arrangement plan)) delegation agreement shall delineate the
manner and extent to which the physician assistant would practice and
be supervised. Whenever a physician assistant is practicing in a
manner inconsistent with the approved ((practice arrangement plan))
delegation agreement, the commission may take disciplinary action under
chapter 18.130 RCW.
(3) A physician may enter into delegation agreements with five
physician assistants, but may petition the commission for a waiver of
this limit. However, no physician may have under his or her
supervision more physician assistants than the physician can adequately
supervise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The medical quality assurance commission and
board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, working in collaboration
with a statewide organization representing the interests of physician
assistants, shall adopt new rules modernizing the current rules
regulating physician assistants and report to the legislature by
December 31, 2014.

--- END ---