BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.32.090 and 1945 c 88 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever authorized by ordinance or resolution of its legislative
authority any political subdivision of the state shall have power to
purchase supplies, materials, electronic data processing and
telecommunication equipment, software, services, and/or equipment from
or through the United States government without calling for bids,
notwithstanding any law or charter provision to the contrary.

--- END ---