BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
The boards of regents of the University of Washington and
Washington State University, and the boards of trustees of Central
Washington University, Eastern Washington University, Western
Washington University, and The Evergreen State College must each set
guidelines for the percentages of resident, nonresident, and foreign
students enrolled at each institution of higher education. The
guidelines must be established annually by formal vote during regular
meetings. As used in this section, "resident student" and "nonresident
student" have the definitions in RCW 28B.15.012.

--- END ---