BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.140.060 and 2005 c 339 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Applications for examinations, original certification,
licensure, or registration, and renewal certification, licensure, or
registration shall be made in writing to the department on forms
approved by the director. Applications for original and renewal
certification, licensure, or registration shall include a statement
confirming that the applicant shall comply with applicable rules and
regulations and that the applicant understands the penalties for
misconduct.
(2) The appropriate fees shall accompany all applications for
examination, reexamination, original certification, licensure, or
registration, and renewal certification, licensure, or registration.
(3) Each applicant for registration as a state-registered appraiser
trainee and each applicant seeking to change the level of his or her
credential must submit to a background investigation under section 3 of
this act.
(4) Qualified applicants for licensure or certification from
another jurisdiction not requiring trainee registration shall submit to
a background investigation under section 3 of this act.
(5) At the discretion of the director, existing credential holders
may by rule be required to submit to background investigations under
section 3 of this act at renewal.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.140.120 and 2005 c 339 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant for certification or licensure who is currently
certified or licensed and in good standing under the laws of another
state may obtain a certificate or license as a Washington state-certified or state-licensed real estate appraiser without being
required to satisfy the examination requirements of this chapter
if((:)) the director determines that ((the certification or licensure
requirements are substantially similar to those found in Washington
state; and that the other state has a written reciprocal agreement to
provide similar treatment to holders of Washington state certificates
and/or licenses)): The appraiser licensing and certification program
of the other state is in compliance with 12 U.S.C. 3351(b); and the
other state's requirements for certification or licensing meet or
exceed the licensure standards established in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.140 RCW
to read as follows:
Effective January 1, 2015, background investigations under this
chapter consist of fingerprint-based background checks through the
Washington state patrol criminal identification system and through the
federal bureau of investigation. The applicant is required to pay the
current federal and state fees for fingerprint-based criminal history
background checks. The applicant shall submit the fingerprint cards
and required fees for background checks to the department for
submission to the Washington state patrol.

--- END ---