BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.56.403 and 2011 c 367 s 709 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may provide for the establishment, construction,
and operation of a ((pilot)) project of high occupancy toll lanes on
state route 167 high occupancy vehicle lanes within King ((county)) and
Pierce counties. The department may issue, buy, and redeem bonds, and
deposit and expend them; secure and remit financial and other
assistance in the construction of high occupancy toll lanes, carry
insurance, and handle any other matters pertaining to ((the)) high
occupancy toll lanes ((pilot project)).
(2) Tolls for high occupancy toll lanes will be established as
follows:
(a) The schedule of toll charges for high occupancy toll lanes must
be established by the transportation commission and collected in a
manner determined by the commission.
(b) Toll charges shall not be assessed on authorized emergency
vehicles, transit buses, and vanpool vehicles owned or operated by any
public agency.
(c) The department shall establish performance standards for the
state route 167 high occupancy toll lane ((pilot)) project. The
department must automatically adjust the toll charge, using dynamic
tolling, to ensure that toll-paying single-occupant vehicle users are
only permitted to enter the lane to the extent that average vehicle
speeds in the lane remain above forty-five miles per hour at least
ninety percent of the time during peak hours. The toll charge may vary
in amount by time of day, level of traffic congestion within the
highway facility, vehicle occupancy, or other criteria, as the
commission may deem appropriate. The commission may also vary toll
charges for single-occupant inherently low-emission vehicles such as
those powered by electric batteries, natural gas, propane, or other
clean burning fuels.
(d) The commission shall periodically review the toll charges to
determine if the toll charges are effectively maintaining travel time,
speed, and reliability on the highway facilities.
(3) The department shall monitor the state route 167 high occupancy
toll lane ((pilot)) project and shall annually report to the
transportation commission and the legislature on operations and
findings. At a minimum, the department shall provide facility use data
and review the impacts on:
(a) Freeway efficiency and safety;
(b) Effectiveness for transit;
(c) Person and vehicle movements by mode;
(d) Ability to finance improvements and transportation services
through tolls; and
(e) The impacts on all highway users. The department shall analyze
aggregate use data and conduct, as needed, separate surveys to assess
usage of the facility in relation to geographic, socioeconomic, and
demographic information within the corridor in order to ascertain
actual and perceived questions of equitable use of the facility.
(4) The department shall modify the ((pilot)) project to address
identified safety issues and mitigate negative impacts to high
occupancy vehicle lane users.
(5) ((Authorization to impose high occupancy vehicle tolls for the
state route 167 high occupancy toll pilot project expires if either of
the following two conditions apply:
(a) If no contracts have been let by the department to begin
construction of the toll facilities associated with this pilot project
within four years of July 24, 2005; or
(b) If high occupancy vehicle tolls are being collected on June 30,
2013.
(6))) The department of transportation shall adopt rules that allow
automatic vehicle identification transponders used for electronic toll
collection to be compatible with other electronic payment devices or
transponders from the Washington state ferry system, other public
transportation systems, or other toll collection systems to the extent
that technology permits.
(((7) The conversion of a single existing high occupancy vehicle
lane to a high occupancy toll lane as proposed for SR-167 must be taken
as the exception for this pilot project.
(8))) (6) A violation of the lane restrictions applicable to the
high occupancy toll lanes established under this section is a traffic
infraction.
(((9) Procurement activity associated with this pilot project shall
be open and competitive in accordance with chapter 39.29 RCW.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---