BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.23.030 and 2007 c 298 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
No municipal officer shall be beneficially interested, directly or
indirectly, in any contract which may be made by, through or under the
supervision of such officer, in whole or in part, or which may be made
for the benefit of his or her office, or accept, directly or
indirectly, any compensation, gratuity or reward in connection with
such contract from any other person beneficially interested therein.
This section shall not apply in the following cases:
(1) The furnishing of electrical, water or other utility services
by a municipality engaged in the business of furnishing such services,
at the same rates and on the same terms as are available to the public
generally, which includes entering into agreements related to: (a)
Renewable energy incentive programs authorized under chapter 82.16 RCW;
or (b) the financing, acquisition, or installation of fixtures,
systems, and equipment, for compensation or otherwise, for the
conservation or more efficient use of electrical, water, or other
utility services;
(2) The designation of public depositaries for municipal funds;
(3) The publication of legal notices required by law to be
published by any municipality, upon competitive bidding or at rates not
higher than prescribed by law for members of the general public;
(4) The designation of a school director as clerk or as both clerk
and purchasing agent of a school district;
(5) The employment of any person by a municipality for unskilled
day labor at wages not exceeding two hundred dollars in any calendar
month. The exception provided in this subsection does not apply to a
county with a population of one hundred twenty-five thousand or more,
a city with a population of more than one thousand five hundred, an
irrigation district encompassing more than fifty thousand acres, or a
first-class school district;
(6)(a) The letting of any other contract in which the total amount
received under the contract or contracts by the municipal officer or
the municipal officer's business does not exceed one thousand five
hundred dollars in any calendar month.
(b) However, in the case of a particular officer of a second-class
city or town, or a noncharter optional code city, or a member of any
county fair board in a county which has not established a county
purchasing department pursuant to RCW 36.32.240, the total amount of
such contract or contracts authorized in this subsection (6) may exceed
one thousand five hundred dollars in any calendar month but shall not
exceed eighteen thousand dollars in any calendar year.
(c)(i) In the case of a particular officer of a rural public
hospital district, as defined in RCW 70.44.460, the total amount of
such contract or contracts authorized in this subsection (6) may exceed
one thousand five hundred dollars in any calendar month, but shall not
exceed twenty-four thousand dollars in any calendar year.
(ii) At the beginning of each calendar year, beginning with the
2006 calendar year, the legislative authority of the rural public
hospital district shall increase the calendar year limitation described
in this subsection (6)(c) by an amount equal to the dollar amount for
the previous calendar year multiplied by the change in the consumer
price index as of the close of the twelve-month period ending December
31st of that previous calendar year. If the new dollar amount
established under this subsection is not a multiple of ten dollars, the
increase shall be rounded to the next lowest multiple of ten dollars.
As used in this subsection, "consumer price index" means the consumer
price index compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States
department of labor for the state of Washington. If the bureau of
labor statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas
within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people,
covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and
including all items shall be used.
(d) The exceptions provided in this subsection (6) do not apply to:
(i) A sale or lease by the municipality as the seller or lessor;
(ii) The letting of any contract by a county with a population of
one hundred twenty-five thousand or more, a city with a population of
ten thousand or more, or an irrigation district encompassing more than
fifty thousand acres; or
(iii) Contracts for legal services, except for reimbursement of
expenditures.
(e) The municipality shall maintain a list of all contracts that
are awarded under this subsection (6). The list must be made available
for public inspection and copying;
(7) The leasing by a port district as lessor of port district
property to a municipal officer or to a contracting party in which a
municipal officer may be beneficially interested, if in addition to all
other legal requirements, a board of three disinterested appraisers and
the superior court in the county where the property is situated finds
that all terms and conditions of such lease are fair to the port
district and are in the public interest. The appraisers must be
appointed from members of the American Institute of Real Estate
Appraisers by the presiding judge of the superior court;
(8) The letting of any employment contract for the driving of a
school bus in a second-class school district if the terms of such
contract are commensurate with the pay plan or collective bargaining
agreement operating in the district;
(9) The letting of an employment contract as a substitute teacher
or substitute educational aide to an officer of a second-class school
district that has two hundred or fewer full-time equivalent students,
if the terms of the contract are commensurate with the pay plan or
collective bargaining agreement operating in the district and the board
of directors has found, consistent with the written policy under RCW
28A.330.240, that there is a shortage of substitute teachers in the
school district;
(10) The letting of any employment contract to the spouse of an
officer of a school district, when such contract is solely for
employment as a substitute teacher for the school district. This
exception applies only if the terms of the contract are commensurate
with the pay plan or collective bargaining agreement applicable to all
district employees and the board of directors has found, consistent
with the written policy under RCW 28A.330.240, that there is a shortage
of substitute teachers in the school district;
(11) The letting of any employment contract to the spouse of an
officer of a school district if the spouse was under contract as a
certificated or classified employee with the school district before the
date in which the officer assumes office and the terms of the contract
are commensurate with the pay plan or collective bargaining agreement
operating in the district. However, in a second-class school district
that has less than two hundred full-time equivalent students enrolled
at the start of the school year ((as defined in RCW 28A.150.040)), the
spouse is not required to be under contract as a certificated or
classified employee before the date on which the officer assumes
office;
(12) The authorization, approval, or ratification of any employment
contract with the spouse of a public hospital district commissioner if:
(a) The spouse was employed by the public hospital district before the
date the commissioner was initially elected; (b) the terms of the
contract are commensurate with the pay plan or collective bargaining
agreement operating in the district for similar employees; (c) the
interest of the commissioner is disclosed to the board of commissioners
and noted in the official minutes or similar records of the public
hospital district prior to the letting or continuation of the contract;
and (d) and the commissioner does not vote on the authorization,
approval, or ratification of the contract or any conditions in the
contract.
A municipal officer may not vote in the authorization, approval, or
ratification of a contract in which he or she is beneficially
interested even though one of the exemptions allowing the awarding of
such a contract applies. The interest of the municipal officer must be
disclosed to the governing body of the municipality and noted in the
official minutes or similar records of the municipality before the
formation of the contract.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.23.060 and 1999 c 261 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
If any provision of this chapter, with the exception of RCW
42.23.030(1), conflicts with any provision of a city or county charter,
or with any provision of a city-county charter, the charter shall
control if it contains stricter requirements than this chapter. The
provisions of this chapter shall be considered as minimum standards to
be enforced by municipalities.

--- END ---