BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the financial
services market is highly competitive, and that many financial services
are being delivered electronically by institutions headquartered
outside of our state. In order to maintain a stable tax base, the
legislature has adopted a principle for the taxation of financial
institutions that relies on the location of the borrower to determine
whether interest payments are subject to state excise tax. The
legislature finds that for financial institutions, interest income
should be treated consistently according to this principle, regardless
of the nature of the instrument through which the interest payments are
secured. The intent of the legislature is to provide for a stable tax
base that does not encourage Washington-headquartered taxpayers to move
their treasury function, and the jobs associated with that function,
outside of the state in order to benefit from a lower tax liability on
interest income.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.460 and 2011 c 174 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person
earning apportionable income taxable under this chapter and also
taxable in another state must, for the purpose of computing tax
liability under this chapter, apportion to this state, in accordance
with RCW 82.04.462, that portion of the person's apportionable income
derived from business activities performed within this state.
(2) The department must by rule provide a method of apportioning
the apportionable income of financial institutions, where such
apportionable income is taxable under RCW 82.04.290. The rule adopted
by the department must, to the extent feasible, be consistent with the
multistate tax commission's recommended formula for the apportionment
and allocation of net income of financial institutions as existing on
June 1, 2010, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section,
except that:
(a) The department's rule must provide for a single factor
apportionment method based on the receipts factor; ((and))
(b) The definition of "financial institution" contained in appendix
A to the multistate tax commission's recommended formula for the
apportionment and allocation of net income of financial institutions is
advisory only; and
(c) The definition of "loan" contained in the multistate tax
commission's recommended formula for the apportionment and allocation
of net income of financial institutions must also include investment
securities permissible for financial institutions by applicable bank
regulatory rules and issued by the person obligated to pay the
principal and interest thereon.
(3) The department may by rule provide a method or methods of
apportioning or allocating gross income derived from sales of
telecommunications service and competitive telephone service taxed
under this chapter, if the gross proceeds of sales subject to tax under
this chapter do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer's
income attributable to this state. The rule must provide for an
equitable and constitutionally permissible division of the tax base.
(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Apportionable income" means gross income of the business
generated from engaging in apportionable activities, including income
received from apportionable activities performed outside this state if
the income would be taxable under this chapter if received from
activities in this state, less the exemptions and deductions allowable
under this chapter. For purposes of this subsection, "apportionable
activities" means only those activities taxed under:
(i) RCW 82.04.255;
(ii) RCW 82.04.260 (3), (((4),)) (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), and
(((12))) (13);
(iii) RCW 82.04.280 (1)(e);
(iv) RCW 82.04.285;
(v) RCW 82.04.286;
(vi) RCW 82.04.290;
(vii) RCW 82.04.2907;
(viii) RCW 82.04.2908;
(ix) RCW 82.04.263, but only to the extent of any activity that
would be taxable under any of the provisions enumerated under (a)(i)
through (viii) of this subsection (4) if the tax classification in RCW
82.04.263 did not exist; and
(x) RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (14) and 82.04.280(1)(a), but only with
respect to advertising.
(b)(i) "Taxable in another state" means that the taxpayer is
subject to a business activities tax by another state on its income
received from engaging in apportionable activities; or the taxpayer is
not subject to a business activities tax by another state on its income
received from engaging in apportionable activities, but any other state
has jurisdiction to subject the taxpayer to a business activities tax
on such income under the substantial nexus standards in RCW
82.04.067(1).
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (4)(b), "business activities
tax" and "state" have the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.462.

--- END ---