BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
centralize and consolidate the procurement of spoken language
interpreter services and expand the use of language access providers,
thereby reducing administrative costs while protecting consumers. The
legislature further intends to institute quality controls by
establishing an advisory group to advise state agencies on the
qualifications, training, and education of state certified spoken
language interpreters through the department of social and health
services. The legislature further intends to exclude interpreter
services for sensory impaired persons from the provisions of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services and the health
care authority are each authorized to purchase interpreter services on
behalf of limited-English speaking applicants and recipients of public
assistance.
(2) The department of labor and industries is authorized to
purchase interpreter services for medical and vocational providers
authorized to provide services to limited-English speaking injured
workers or crime victims.
(3) No later than September 1, 2015, the department of social and
health services, the health care authority, and the department of labor
and industries must purchase spoken language interpreter services
directly from language access providers, or through contracts with
scheduling and coordinating delivery organizations, or both. Each
department must have at least one contract with an entity that provides
interpreter services exclusively through telephonic and video remote
technologies.
(4) By September 1, 2015, the department of enterprise services
shall develop and implement a model that all state agencies must use to
procure spoken language interpreter services by purchasing directly
from language access providers or through contracts with scheduling and
coordinating entities, or both. The department must have at least one
contract with an entity that provides interpreter services exclusively
through telephonic and video remote technologies. If the department of
enterprise services determines it is more cost effective or efficient,
it may jointly purchase these services with the department of social
and health services, the health care authority, and the department of
labor and industries as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
The department of social and health services, the health care
authority, and the department of labor and industries have the
authority to procure interpreters through the department of enterprise
services if the demand for spoken language interpreters cannot be met
through their respective contracts.
(5) All language access providers procured under this section must
be certified or authorized by the state. When a state-certified or
authorized language access provider is not available, a state agency is
authorized to contract with a spoken language interpreter with other
certifications or qualifications deemed to meet state standards.
Nothing in this subsection shall preclude providing interpretive
services through state employees or employees of medical or vocational
providers.
(6) Nothing in this section is intended to address how state
agencies procure interpreters for sensory-impaired persons.
(7) For purposes of this section, "state agency" means any state
office or activity of the executive branch of state government,
including state agencies, departments, offices, divisions, boards,
commissions, and correctional and other types of institutions, but
excludes institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016,
the school for the blind, and the center for childhood deafness and
hearing loss.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 39.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall establish
the spoken language interpreter advisory group to advise the
departments of social and health services, labor and industries, and
enterprise services and the health care authority on the policies,
rules, and regulations governing certification and authorization of
spoken language interpreters. The secretary, in consultation with the
directors, shall make appointments to the advisory group as follows:
(a) One designated representative each from the department of
social and health services, the department of labor and industries, the
department of enterprise services, or a designee department, and the
health care authority;
(b) Three spoken language interpreters, one of whom must provide
interpreter services through telephonic and video remote technologies,
initial terms being two serving two years, and one serving three years;
(c) One physician licensed by the state under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW, who shall serve an initial three-year term;
(d) One hospital language access administrator, who shall serve an
initial two-year term;
(e) Two representatives from immigrant or refugee advocacy
organizations, one serving an initial term of one year and the other an
initial term of two years;
(f) One representative from a labor organization, serving an
initial term of two years;
(g) One member from the public, serving an initial three-year term;
(h) One representative from an entity that provides interpreter
services through telephonic and video remote technologies;
(i) One representative for interpreter agencies, serving an initial
term of two years; and
(j) One representative from the department of social and health
services language testing and certification program.
(2) After initial appointments, members under subsection (1)(b)
through (i) of this section shall serve three-year terms and may be
appointed to no more than two sequential terms.
(3) Members of the advisory group may be reimbursed for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) The department of social and health services shall provide
staff to the advisory group.
(5) The advisory group shall meet as needed or as requested by the
director of the department of social and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 39.26 RCW
to read as follows:
The advisory group established under section 3 of this act shall
have the following duties:
(1) Develop and recommend policies to enhance the quality of
interpreters;
(2) Evaluate the certification standards used by the state,
including the code of ethics, and make recommendations; and
(3) Other duties as requested.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.56.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Adult family home provider" means a provider as defined in RCW
70.128.010 who receives payments from the medicaid and state-funded
long-term care programs.
(2) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which
has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in
their employment relations with employers.
(3) "Child care subsidy" means a payment from the state through a
child care subsidy program established pursuant to RCW 74.12.340 ((or
74.08A.340)), 45 C.F.R. Sec. 98.1 through 98.17, or any successor
program.
(4) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligations of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in
good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on personnel matters,
including wages, hours and working conditions, which may be peculiar to
an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that by
such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal
or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(5) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
commission.
(7) "Family child care provider" means a person who: (a) Provides
regularly scheduled care for a child or children in the home of the
provider or in the home of the child or children for periods of less
than twenty-four hours or, if necessary due to the nature of the
parent's work, for periods equal to or greater than twenty-four hours;
(b) receives child care subsidies; and (c) is either licensed by the
state under RCW 74.15.030 or is exempt from licensing under chapter
74.15 RCW.
(8) "Individual provider" means an individual provider as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240(4) who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, is a public employee as provided in RCW 74.39A.270.
(9) "Institution of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.
(10)(a) "Language access provider" means any independent contractor
who provides spoken language interpreter services ((for department of
social and health services appointments or medicaid enrollee
appointments, or provided these services on or after January 1, 2009,
and before June 10, 2010, whether paid by a broker, language access
agency, or the department)), whether paid by a language access agency,
broker, or the respective department: (i) For department of social and
health services appointments or medicaid enrollee appointments, or who
provided these services on or after January 1, 2009, and before June
10, 2010; (ii) for department of labor and industries authorized
medical and vocational providers, or who provided these services on or
after January 1, 2012, and before the effective date of this section;
or (iii) for state agencies, or who provided these services on or after
January 1, 2012, and before the effective date of this section.
(b) "Language access provider" does not mean an owner, manager, or
employee of a broker or a language access agency, an interpreter under
the medicaid administrative match program, or an interpreter appointed
or required in a court proceeding pursuant to RCW 2.43.030 or when
required by a federal consent decree or settlement agreement.
(c) "Department of social and health services appointments" does
not include court proceedings.
(d) "Medicaid enrollee appointments" does not include medicaid
administrative match program appointments or any other service provided
pursuant to that program.
(11) "Public employee" means any employee of a public employer
except any person (a) elected by popular vote, or (b) appointed to
office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy, administrative
assistant or secretary necessarily imply a confidential relationship to
(i) the executive head or body of the applicable bargaining unit, or
(ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii) any person appointed
to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (d) who is a court commissioner or a court
magistrate of superior court, district court, or a department of a
district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e) who is a
personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court judge, or
court commissioner. For the purpose of (e) of this subsection, no more
than one assistant for each judge or commissioner may be excluded from
a bargaining unit.
(12) "Public employer" means any officer, board, commission,
council, or other person or body acting on behalf of any public body
governed by this chapter, or any subdivision of such public body. For
the purposes of this section, the public employer of district court or
superior court employees for wage-related matters is the respective
county legislative authority, or person or body acting on behalf of the
legislative authority, and the public employer for nonwage-related
matters is the judge or judge's designee of the respective district
court or superior court.
(13) "Uniformed personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement officers as
defined in RCW 41.26.030 employed by the governing body of any city or
town with a population of two thousand five hundred or more and law
enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any county with
a population of ten thousand or more; (b) correctional employees who
are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and noncommissioned
security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020(9),
by a county with a population of seventy thousand or more, and who are
trained for and charged with the responsibility of controlling and
maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and safeguarding inmates
from other inmates; (c) general authority Washington peace officers as
defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a port district in a county with
a population of one million or more; (d) security forces established
under RCW 43.52.520; (e) firefighters as that term is defined in RCW
41.26.030; (f) employees of a port district in a county with a
population of one million or more whose duties include crash fire
rescue or other firefighting duties; (g) employees of fire departments
of public employers who dispatch exclusively either fire or emergency
medical services, or both; or (h) employees in the several classes of
advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, who are
employed by a public employer.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.56.510 and 2010 c 296 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this
chapter applies to the governor with respect to language access
providers. Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as
expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
governor is the public employer of language access providers who,
solely for the purposes of collective bargaining, are public employees.
The governor or the governor's designee shall represent the public
employer for bargaining purposes.
(2) There shall be collective bargaining, as defined in RCW
41.56.030, between the governor and language access providers, except
as follows:
(a) ((A statewide unit of all language access providers is)) The
only language access provider units appropriate for purposes of
collective bargaining under RCW 41.56.060 are:
(i) A statewide unit for language access providers who provide
spoken language interpreter services for department of social and
health services appointments, or medicaid enrollee appointments;
(ii) A statewide unit for language access providers who provide
spoken language interpreter services for injured workers or crime
victims receiving benefits from the department of labor and industries;
and
(iii) A statewide unit for language access providers who provide
spoken language interpreter services for any state agency through the
department of enterprise services, excluding language access providers
included in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection;
(b) The exclusive bargaining representatives of language access
providers in the units specified in (a) of this subsection shall be the
representatives chosen in ((an)) elections conducted pursuant to RCW
41.56.070.
Bargaining authorization cards furnished as the showing of interest
in support of any representation petition or motion for intervention
filed under this section are exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56
RCW. The public employment relations commission may not certify any
bargaining unit under subsection (2)(a)(ii) and (iii) of this section
before January 1, 2014;
(c) Notwithstanding the definition of "collective bargaining" in
RCW 41.56.030(4), the scope of collective bargaining for language
access providers under this section is limited solely to: (i) Economic
compensation, such as the manner and rate of payments; (ii)
professional development and training; (iii) labor-management
committees; and (iv) grievance procedures. Retirement benefits are not
subject to collective bargaining. By such obligation neither party may
be compelled to agree to a proposal or be required to make a concession
unless otherwise provided in this chapter;
(d) In addition to the entities listed in the mediation and
interest arbitration provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and
41.56.480, the provisions apply to the governor or the governor's
designee and the exclusive bargaining representative of language access
providers, except that:
(i) In addition to the factors to be taken into consideration by an
interest arbitration panel under RCW 41.56.465, the panel shall
consider the financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement;
(ii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and benefit provisions of
the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, the decision is not
binding on the state;
(e) Language access providers do not have the right to strike;
(f) If a single employee organization is the exclusive bargaining
representative for two or more bargaining units, the governor and the
employee organization may agree to negotiate a single collective
bargaining agreement for all of the bargaining units that the employee
organization represents.
(3) Language access providers who are public employees solely for
the purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this
section are not, for that reason, employees of the state for any other
purpose. This section applies only to the governance of the collective
bargaining relationship between the employer and language access
providers as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) Each party with whom the department of social and health
services, the department of labor and industries, and the department of
enterprise services contracts for language access services and each of
their subcontractors shall provide to the respective department an
accurate list of language access providers, as defined in RCW
41.56.030, including their names, addresses, and other contact
information, annually by January 30th, except that initially the lists
must be provided within thirty days of ((June 10, 2010)) the effective
date of this section. The departments shall, upon request, provide a
list of all language access providers, including their names,
addresses, and other contact information, to a labor union seeking to
represent language access providers.
(5) If a language access provider cannot be procured through a
bargaining unit, a state agency is authorized to contract with any
spoken language interpreter provider.
(6) This section does not create or modify:
(a) The ((department's)) obligation of any state agency to comply
with ((the)) federal statutes and regulations; and
(b) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to
the delivery of state services under chapter 74.04 or 39.26 RCW or
Title 51 RCW. The governor may not enter into, extend, or renew any
agreement under this chapter that does not expressly reserve the
legislative rights described in this subsection.
(((6))) (7) Upon meeting the requirements of subsection (((7))) (8)
of this section, the governor must submit, as a part of the proposed
biennial or supplemental operating budget submitted to the legislature
under RCW 43.88.030, a request for funds necessary to implement the
compensation and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining
agreement entered into under this section or for legislation necessary
to implement the agreement.
(((7))) (8) A request for funds necessary to implement the
compensation and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining
agreement entered into under this section may not be submitted by the
governor to the legislature unless the request has been:
(a) Submitted to the director of financial management by October
1st prior to the legislative session at which the requests are to be
considered, except that, for initial negotiations under this section,
the request may not be submitted before July 1, 2011; and
(b) Certified by the director of financial management as
financially feasible for the state or reflective of a binding decision
of an arbitration panel reached under subsection (2)(d) of this
section.
(((8))) (9) The legislature must approve or reject the submission
of the request for funds as a whole. If the legislature rejects or
fails to act on the submission, any collective bargaining agreement
must be reopened for the sole purpose of renegotiating the funds
necessary to implement the agreement.
(((9))) (10) If, after the compensation and benefit provisions of
an agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue
shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by
proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both
parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a
mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.
(((10))) (11) After the expiration date of any collective
bargaining agreement entered into under this section, all of the terms
and conditions specified in the agreement remain in effect until the
effective date of a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from
the expiration date stated in the agreement.
(((11))) (12) In enacting this section, the legislature intends to
provide state action immunity under federal and state antitrust laws
for the joint activities of language access providers and their
exclusive bargaining representative to the extent the activities are
authorized by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---