BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.80.010 and 2012 c 261 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" or "agencies" means the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of natural resources, and the parks and
recreation commission.
(2) "Annual natural investment permit" means the annual permit
issued by the parks and recreation commission for the purpose of
launching boats from the designated state parks boat launch sites.
(3) "Camper registration" means proof of payment of a camping fee
on recreational lands managed by the parks and recreation commission.
(4) "Day-use permit" means the permit created in RCW 79A.80.030.
(5) "Discover pass" means the annual pass created in RCW
79A.80.020.
(6) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
46.04.320 and which are required to be registered under chapter 46.16A
RCW. "Motor vehicle" does not include those motor vehicles exempt from
registration under RCW 46.16A.080 and state and publicly owned motor
vehicles as provided in RCW 46.16A.170 or vehicles with a valid off-road vehicle permit at locations where off-road vehicle activity is
allowed.
(7) "Recreation site or lands" means a state park, state lands and
state forest lands as those terms are defined in RCW 79.02.010, natural
resources conservation areas as that term is defined in RCW 79.71.030,
natural area preserves as that term is defined in RCW 79.70.020, and
fish and wildlife conservation sites including water access areas, boat
ramps, wildlife areas, parking areas, roads, and trailheads.
(8) "Sno-park seasonal permit" means the seasonal permit issued by
the parks and recreation commission for providing access to winter
recreational facilities for the period of November 1st through March
31st.
(9) "Vehicle access pass" means the pass created in RCW 79A.80.040.

--- END ---