BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.290.030 and 2008 c 233 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No scrap metal business may enter into a transaction to
purchase or receive private metal property or nonferrous metal property
from any person who cannot produce at least one piece of current
government-issued picture identification, including a valid driver's
license or identification card issued by any state.
(2) No scrap metal business may purchase or receive private metal
property or commercial metal property unless the seller: (a) Has a
commercial account with the scrap metal business; (b) can prove
ownership of the property by producing written documentation that the
seller is the owner of the property; or (c) can produce written
documentation that the seller is an employee or agent authorized to
sell the property on behalf of a commercial enterprise.
(3) No scrap metal business may enter into a transaction to
purchase or receive metallic wire that was burned in whole or in part
to remove insulation unless the seller can produce written proof to the
scrap metal business that the wire was lawfully burned.
(4) ((No transaction involving private metal property or nonferrous
metal property valued at greater than thirty dollars may be made in
cash or with any person who does not provide a street address under the
requirements of RCW 19.290.020.)) For transactions ((valued at greater
than thirty dollars)) involving private metal property or nonferrous
metal property, the person with whom the transaction is being made may
only be paid by a nontransferable check, mailed by the scrap metal
business to a street address provided under RCW 19.290.020, no earlier
than ((ten)) five days after the transaction was made. A transaction
occurs on the date provided in the record required under RCW
19.290.020. All scrap metal processors, scrap metal recycling centers,
and scrap metals suppliers are required to complete a five day tag and
hold involving private metal property or nonferrous metal property
unless they digitally capture a copy of one piece of current
government-issued picture identification, including a valid driver's
license or identification card issued by any state and capture a
picture of the material being sold.
(5) No scrap metal business may purchase or receive beer kegs from
anyone except a manufacturer of beer kegs or licensed brewery.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.290.060 and 2008 c 233 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Following notification((, either verbally or)) in writing((,))
from a commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its
political subdivisions that an item of private metal property,
nonferrous metal property, or commercial metal property has been
reported as stolen, a scrap metal business shall hold that property
intact and safe from alteration, damage, or commingling, and shall
place an identifying tag or other suitable identification upon the
property. The scrap metal business shall hold the property for a
period of time as directed by the applicable law enforcement agency up
to a maximum of ((ten business)) ninety days.
(2) A commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of
its political subdivisions shall not place on hold any item of private
metal property, nonferrous metal property, or commercial metal property
unless that law enforcement agency reasonably suspects that the
property is a lost or stolen item. Any hold that is placed on the
property must be removed within ((ten business)) ninety days after the
property on hold is determined not to be stolen or lost and the
property must be returned to the owner or released.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.290 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person to engage in the business of a
scrap metal processor or scrap metal recycler without having first
applied for and received a scrap metal license.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a person or
firm engaged in the unlawful activity described in this section is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(b) A second or subsequent offense is a class C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 19.290 RCW
to read as follows:
Application for a scrap metal license or renewal of a scrap metal
license shall be made on a form for this purpose, furnished by the
department of licensing, and shall be signed by the license holder or
his or her authorized agent and shall include the following
information:
(1) Name and address of the person, firm, partnership, association,
limited liability company, or corporation under which name the business
is to be conducted;
(2) Names and residence address of all persons having an interest
in the business or, if the owner is a corporation, the names and
addresses of the officers thereof;
(3) Certificate of approval of the chief of police of any city or
town having a population of over five thousand persons and in all other
instances a member of the Washington state patrol certifying that:
(a) The applicant has an established place of business at the
address shown on the application; and
(b) In the case of a renewal of a scrap metal license, the
applicant is in compliance with this chapter: PROVIDED, That the above
certification in any instance can be made by an authorized
representative of the department of licensing;
(4) Documentation demonstrating that the business is in compliance
with the terms of all applicable building code, zoning, and other land
use regulatory ordinances.
(5) Any other information that the department of licensing may
require.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 19.290 RCW
to read as follows:
The application, together with a fee of one thousand dollars per
physical location, shall be forwarded to the department of licensing.
Upon receipt of the application the department shall, if the
application is in order, issue a scrap metal license authorizing the
processor, recycler, or supplier to do business as such and forward the
fee to the state treasurer, to be deposited in the scrap metal license
account described in section 16 of this act. Upon receiving the
certificate, the owner shall cause it to be prominently displayed in
the place of business, where it may be inspected by an investigating
officer at any time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 19.290 RCW
to read as follows:
Before issuing a scrap metal license, the department of licensing
shall require the applicant to file with the department a surety bond
in the amount of ten thousand dollars, running to the state of
Washington and executed by a surety company authorized to do business
in the state of Washington. The bond shall be approved as to form by
the attorney general and conditioned upon the licensee conducting the
business in conformity with the provisions of this chapter. Any person
who has suffered any loss or damage by reason of fraud, carelessness,
neglect, violation of the terms of this chapter, or misrepresentation
on the part of the scrap metal processor or recycler, may institute an
action for recovery against the licensee and surety upon the bond.
However, the aggregate liability of the surety to all persons shall in
no event exceed the amount of the bond.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 19.290 RCW
to read as follows:
A license issued on the scrap metal license application remains in
force until suspended or revoked and may be renewed annually upon
reapplication and upon payment of a fee of five hundred dollars per
physical location. A licensee who fails or neglects to renew the
license before the assigned expiration date shall pay the fee for an
original scrap metal license as provided in this chapter.
Whenever a scrap metal processor, recycler, or supplier ceases to
do business as such or the license has been suspended or revoked, the
licensee shall immediately surrender the license to the department of
licensing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 19.290 RCW
to read as follows:
The licensee shall obtain a special set of license plates in
addition to the regular licenses and plates required for the operation
of such vehicles. The special plates must be displayed on vehicles
owned and/or operated by the licensee and used in the conduct of the
business. The fee for these plates shall be five dollars for the
original plates and two dollars for each additional set of plates
bearing the same license number. A licensee with more than one
licensed location in the state may use special plates bearing the same
license number for vehicles operated out of any of the licensed
locations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 19.290 RCW
to read as follows:
If a person whose scrap metal license has previously been canceled
for cause by the department of licensing files an application for a
license to conduct business as a scrap metal processor, recycler, or
supplier, or if the department is of the opinion that the application
is not filed in good faith or that the application is filed by some
person as a subterfuge for the real person in interest whose license
has previously been canceled for cause, the department may refuse to
issue the person a license to conduct business as a scrap metal
processor, recycler, or supplier.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 19.290
RCW to read as follows:
The director of licensing is hereby authorized to adopt reasonable
rules and regulations not in conflict with provisions hereof for the
proper operation and enforcement of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 19.290
RCW to read as follows:
The state of Washington hereby fully occupies and preempts the
entire field of regulation of scrap metal processors, recyclers, or
suppliers within the boundaries of the state. Any political
subdivision in this state may enact or enforce only those laws and
ordinances relating to the regulation of scrap metal processors,
recyclers, or suppliers that are specifically authorized by state law
and are consistent with this chapter. The local ordinances shall have
the same or lesser penalty as provided for by state law. Local laws
and ordinances that are inconsistent with, more restrictive than, or
exceed the requirements of state law shall not be enacted and are
hereby preempted and repealed, regardless of the code, charter, or home
rule status of such political subdivision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 19.290
RCW to read as follows:
(1) If it appears to the director of licensing that an unlicensed
person has engaged in an act or practice constituting a violation of
this chapter, or a rule adopted or an order issued under this chapter,
the director may issue an order directing the person to cease and
desist from continuing the act or practice. The director shall give
the person reasonable notice of and opportunity for a hearing. The
director may issue a temporary order pending a hearing. The temporary
order remains in effect until ten days after the hearing is held and
becomes final if the person to whom the notice is addressed does not
request a hearing within fifteen days after receipt of the notice.
(2) The director of licensing may assess a fine of up to one
thousand dollars with the final order for each act or practice
constituting a violation of this chapter by an unlicensed person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 19.290
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department of licensing or its authorized agent may examine
or subpoena any persons, books, papers, records, data, vehicles, or
metal property bearing upon the investigation or proceeding under this
chapter.
(2) The persons subpoenaed may be required to testify and produce
any books, papers, records, data, vehicles, or metal property that the
director of licensing deems relevant or material to the inquiry.
(3) The director of licensing or an authorized agent may administer
an oath to the person required to testify, and a person giving false
testimony after the administration of the oath is guilty of perjury in
the first degree under RCW 9A.72.020.
(4) A court of competent jurisdiction may, upon application by the
director, issue to a person who fails to comply, an order to appear
before the director of licensing or officer designated by the director,
to produce documentary or other evidence touching the matter under
investigation or in question.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 19.290
RCW to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to the
end that traffic in stolen private metal property or nonferrous metal
property may be prevented, and irresponsible, unreliable, or dishonest
persons may be prevented from engaging in the business of processing,
recycling, or supplying scrap metal in this state and reliable persons
may be encouraged to engage in businesses of processing, recycling, or
supplying scrap metal in this state.

Sec. 15 RCW 19.290.080 and 2007 c 377 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each violation of the requirements of this chapter that are not
subject to the criminal penalties under RCW 19.290.070 shall be
punishable, upon conviction, by a fine of not more than one thousand
dollars.
(2) Within two years of being convicted of a violation of any of
the requirements of this chapter that are not subject to the criminal
penalties under RCW 19.290.070, each subsequent violation shall be
punishable, upon conviction, by a fine of not more than ((two)) five
thousand dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 43.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is created in the state treasury an account to be known
as the scrap metal license account. All fees received by the
department of licensing for scrap metal licenses, registration, or
renewals and the civil penalties assessed and collected by the
department of licensing under RCW 19.290.080 shall be forwarded to the
state treasurer who shall credit the moneys to the scrap metal license
account.
(2) All expenses incurred in carrying out the scrap metal licensing
activities of the department of licensing shall be paid from the
account as authorized by legislative appropriation. Any residue in the
account shall be accumulated and shall not revert to the general fund
at the end of the biennium.
(3) The director of the department of licensing shall biennially
prepare a budget request based on the anticipated costs of
administering the scrap metal licensing activities of the department
which shall include the estimated income from scrap metal fees.

--- END ---