BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington's
small businesses are critical to the state's economic health and
vitality, and the time business owners spend interacting with multiple
state agencies takes time away from running or growing their business.
(2) The legislature further finds that regulatory agencies were
directed through an executive order in 2006 to develop a one-stop
business portal, but that a one-stop business portal has not yet been
developed.
(3) The legislature further finds that implementing a one-stop
integrated system that allows businesses to complete their state
government business in a customized, more efficient, and more effective
way will greatly improve the business customer experience, reduce the
time it takes businesses to conduct their interactions with state
government, and increase compliance with state regulations.
(4) The legislature further finds that in response to the need for
a one-stop business portal, the office of the chief information
officer, in collaboration with multiple state agencies, produced a
high-level technology architecture for an integrated enterprise system
that would provide businesses with that web-based, one-stop place for
businesses to conduct their business with the state.
(5) Therefore, the legislature intends to monitor the progress
towards development and implementation of the one-stop business portal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.41A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By November 30, 2013, the office of the chief information
officer must provide the economic development committees of the
legislature a plan for establishing performance benchmarks, and for
measuring the results of implementing a one-stop integrated system for
business interactions with government. The plan must include a
timeline, agency responsibilities, and a benchmark for initial
implementation. At a minimum, the following state agencies must
collaborate with the office of the chief information officer in
developing and tracking these benchmarks and performance measures: The
department of revenue, the department of labor and industries, the
secretary of state, the employment security department, the department
of commerce, and the office of regulatory assistance.
(2) The office of the chief information officer must submit a
progress report on the development of the one-stop integrated system to
the economic development committees of the legislature by January 1st
of each year, beginning with January 1, 2014, and ending with a report
documenting that the portal has reached the performance benchmark of
initial implementation.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the benchmark of initial
implementation must include development of a system backbone;
connection of the department of revenue, the department of labor and
industries, the secretary of state, and the employment security
department to the backbone; and development of a public-facing web
portal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, this act expires when the office of the chief information
officer reports to the economic development committees of the
legislature that the one-stop portal has reached initial
implementation.
(2) If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing
this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2013,
in the omnibus appropriations act, this act expires after the progress
report submitted by January 1, 2014, has been submitted.
(3) The chief information officer must provide notice of the
expiration date of this act to affected parties, including the chief
clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the
office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the
chief information officer.

--- END ---