BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.60.040 and 1998 c 213 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It ((shall be)) is unlawful for any person to operate a vessel
in a reckless manner.
(2) It ((shall be a violation)) is unlawful for a person to operate
a vessel while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, marijuana,
or any drug. A person is considered to be under the influence of
intoxicating liquor, marijuana, or any drug if, within two hours of
operating a vessel:
(a) The person has an alcohol concentration of 0.08 ((grams)) or
((more of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of breath,)) higher as
shown by analysis of the person's breath or blood made under RCW
46.61.506; or
(b) The person has ((0.08 percent or more by weight of alcohol in
the person's blood, as shown by analysis of the person's blood made
under RCW 46.61.506)) a THC concentration of 5.00 or higher as shown by
analysis of the person's blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or
(c) The person is under the influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor, marijuana, or any drug; or
(d) The person is under the combined influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor, marijuana, and any drug.
(3) The fact that any person charged with a violation of this
section is or has been entitled to use such drug under the laws of this
state shall not constitute a defense against any charge of violating
this section. ((A person cited under this subsection may upon request
be given a breath test for breath alcohol or may request to have a
blood sample taken for blood alcohol analysis. An arresting officer
shall administer field sobriety tests when circumstances permit.
(3))) (4) Any person who operates a vessel within this state is
deemed to have given consent, subject to the provisions of RCW
46.61.506, to a test or tests of the person's breath or blood for the
purpose of determining the alcohol concentration, THC concentration, or
presence of any drug in the person's breath or blood if arrested for
any offense where, at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has
reasonable grounds to believe the person was operating a vessel while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor, marijuana, or any drug.
Neither consent nor this section precludes a police officer from
obtaining a search warrant for a person's breath or blood. An
arresting officer may administer field sobriety tests when
circumstances permit.
(5) The test or tests of breath must be administered pursuant to
RCW 46.20.308. Where the officer has reasonable grounds to believe
that the person is under the influence of a drug, or where the person
is incapable due to physical injury, physical incapacity, or other
physical limitation, of providing a breath sample, or where the person
is being treated in a hospital, clinic, doctor's office, emergency
medical vehicle, ambulance, or other similar facility, a blood test
must be administered by a qualified person as provided in RCW
46.61.506(5). The officer shall warn the person that if the person
refuses to take the test, the person will be issued a class 1 civil
infraction under RCW 7.80.120.
(6) A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a
misdemeanor((, punishable as provided under RCW 9.92.030)). A
violation of subsection (2) of this section is a gross misdemeanor. In
addition to the statutory penalties imposed, the court may order the
defendant to pay restitution for any damages or injuries resulting from
the offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The refusal of a person to submit to a test of the alcohol
concentration, THC concentration, or presence of any drug in the
person's blood or breath is admissible into evidence at a subsequent
criminal trial.
(2) A person's refusal to submit to a test or tests pursuant to RCW
79A.60.040 constitutes a class 1 civil infraction under RCW 7.80.120.

Sec. 3 RCW 7.80.120 and 2003 c 365 s 3 and 2003 c 337 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a civil infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty.
(a) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 1 civil
infraction shall be two hundred fifty dollars, not including statutory
assessments, except for an infraction of state law involving: (i)
Potentially dangerous litter as specified in RCW 70.93.060(4) ((and an
infraction of state law involving)); (ii) violent video or computer
games under RCW 9.91.180; or (iii) a person's refusal to submit to a
test or tests pursuant to RCW 79A.60.040 and section 2 of this act, in
which case the maximum penalty and default amount is five hundred
dollars;
(b) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 2 civil
infraction shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars, not including
statutory assessments;
(c) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 3 civil
infraction shall be fifty dollars, not including statutory assessments;
and
(d) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 4 civil
infraction shall be twenty-five dollars, not including statutory
assessments.
(2) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule the conditions under
which local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines for civil
infractions.
(3) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this
chapter it is immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at
that time the court may grant an extension of the period in which the
penalty may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on or before the time
established for payment, the court may proceed to collect the penalty
in the same manner as other civil judgments and may notify the
prosecuting authority of the failure to pay.
(4) The court may also order a person found to have committed a
civil infraction to make restitution.

Sec. 4 RCW 10.31.100 and 2010 c 274 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has
committed or is committing a felony shall have the authority to arrest
the person without a warrant. A police officer may arrest a person
without a warrant for committing a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
only when the offense is committed in the presence of the officer,
except as provided in subsections (1) through (((10))) (11) of this
section.
(1) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor, involving physical harm or threats of harm to any person
or property or the unlawful taking of property or involving the use or
possession of cannabis, or involving the acquisition, possession, or
consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one years
under RCW 66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070
or 9A.52.080, shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(2) A police officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending
release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person
without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that:
(a) An order has been issued of which the person has knowledge
under RCW 26.44.063, or chapter 7.90, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26,
26.50, or 74.34 RCW restraining the person and the person has violated
the terms of the order restraining the person from acts or threats of
violence, or restraining the person from going onto the grounds of or
entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibiting
the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within,
a specified distance of a location or, in the case of an order issued
under RCW 26.44.063, imposing any other restrictions or conditions upon
the person; or
(b) A foreign protection order, as defined in RCW 26.52.010, has
been issued of which the person under restraint has knowledge and the
person under restraint has violated a provision of the foreign
protection order prohibiting the person under restraint from contacting
or communicating with another person, or excluding the person under
restraint from a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or
prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly
remaining within, a specified distance of a location, or a violation of
any provision for which the foreign protection order specifically
indicates that a violation will be a crime; or
(c) The person is sixteen years or older and within the preceding
four hours has assaulted a family or household member as defined in RCW
10.99.020 and the officer believes: (i) A felonious assault has
occurred; (ii) an assault has occurred which has resulted in bodily
injury to the victim, whether the injury is observable by the
responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical action has
occurred which was intended to cause another person reasonably to fear
imminent serious bodily injury or death. Bodily injury means physical
pain, illness, or an impairment of physical condition. When the
officer has probable cause to believe that family or household members
have assaulted each other, the officer is not required to arrest both
persons. The officer shall arrest the person whom the officer believes
to be the primary physical aggressor. In making this determination,
the officer shall make every reasonable effort to consider: (i) The
intent to protect victims of domestic violence under RCW 10.99.010;
(ii) the comparative extent of injuries inflicted or serious threats
creating fear of physical injury; and (iii) the history of domestic
violence of each person involved, including whether the conduct was
part of an ongoing pattern of abuse.
(3) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of any of the
following traffic laws shall have the authority to arrest the person:
(a) RCW 46.52.010, relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(b) RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(c) RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or
racing of vehicles;
(d) RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(e) RCW 46.20.342, relating to driving a motor vehicle while
operator's license is suspended or revoked;
(f) RCW 46.61.5249, relating to operating a motor vehicle in a
negligent manner.
(4) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor
vehicle accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle involved in
the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the
driver has committed in connection with the accident a violation of any
traffic law or regulation.
(5) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a
vessel accident may arrest the operator of a vessel involved in the
accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the operator
has committed, in connection with the accident, a violation of any
boating safety law or rule.
(6) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of RCW 79A.60.040
shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(((6))) (7) An officer may act upon the request of a law
enforcement officer in whose presence a traffic infraction was
committed, to stop, detain, arrest, or issue a notice of traffic
infraction to the driver who is believed to have committed the
infraction. The request by the witnessing officer shall give an
officer the authority to take appropriate action under the laws of the
state of Washington.
(((7))) (8) Any police officer having probable cause to believe
that a person has committed or is committing any act of indecent
exposure, as defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may arrest the person.
(((8))) (9) A police officer may arrest and take into custody,
pending release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a
person without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe
that an order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under
chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated the terms of that order.
(((9))) (10) Any police officer having probable cause to believe
that a person has, within twenty-four hours of the alleged violation,
committed a violation of RCW 9A.50.020 may arrest such person.
(((10))) (11) A police officer having probable cause to believe
that a person illegally possesses or illegally has possessed a firearm
or other dangerous weapon on private or public elementary or secondary
school premises shall have the authority to arrest the person.
For purposes of this subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).
(((11))) (12) Except as specifically provided in subsections (2),
(3), (4), and (((6))) (7) of this section, nothing in this section
extends or otherwise affects the powers of arrest prescribed in Title
46 RCW.
(((12))) (13) No police officer may be held criminally or civilly
liable for making an arrest pursuant to subsection (2) or (((8))) (9)
of this section if the police officer acts in good faith and without
malice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 79A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No person who has vessels for hire, or the agent or employee
thereof, shall rent, lease, charter, or otherwise permit the use of a
vessel, unless the person:
(a) Displays the vessel registration numbers and a valid decal on
the vessel hull as required by RCW 88.02.550(1);
(b) Keeps a copy of the vessel registration certificate aboard the
vessel, in compliance with RCW 88.02.340;
(c) Displays a carbon monoxide decal on the vessel as required by
RCW 88.02.390(2) if the vessel is motor-driven and is not a personal
watercraft;
(d) Provides a copy of the rental agreement to be kept aboard
during the rental, lease, charter, or use period for vessels required
under chapter 88.02 RCW to be registered;
(e) Ensures that the vessel, if motor-propelled, meets the muffler
or underwater exhaust system requirement in RCW 79A.60.130;
(f) Outfits the vessel with the quantity and type of personal
floatation devices required by RCW 79A.60.140 and 79A.60.160 for the
number and ages of the people who will use the vessel;
(g) Explains the personal floatation device requirements to the
person renting, leasing, chartering, or otherwise using the vessel;
(h) Equips the vessel with a skier-down flag, and explains observer
and personal floatation requirements of RCW 79A.60.170, if the persons
renting, leasing, chartering, or otherwise using the vessel will be
waterskiing;
(i) If the vessel is a personal watercraft, provides a personal
floatation device and a lanyard attached to an engine cutoff switch for
the operator to wear at all times when operating the personal
watercraft, as required by RCW 79A.60.190;
(j) Reviews with the person operating the vessel, and all other
persons who the operator may permit to operate the vessel, all the
information contained in the motor vessel safety operating and
equipment checklist prescribed by the Washington state parks and
recreation commission and required under RCW 79A.60.640(6); and
(k) Provides all other safety equipment required by RCW 79A.60.110
and referenced in the motor vessel safety operating and equipment
checklist prescribed by the Washington state parks and recreation
commission and required under RCW 79A.60.640(6).
(2) This section does not apply to fishing guides and charter boat
operators who have a United States coast guard operator's license and
are operating on navigable waters, and people who act in the capacity
of a paid whitewater river outfitter or guide, or who operate a vessel
carrying passengers for hire on whitewater rivers in this state.
(3) As provided in RCW 79A.60.020, a violation of this section is
a civil infraction punishable under chapter 7.84 RCW, unless:
(a) The violation is a violation of RCW 88.02.550, which is
punished as a class 2 civil infraction; or
(b) The current violation is the person's third violation of the
same provision of this chapter during the past three hundred sixty-five
days. If it is the person's third violation, then it must be punished
as a misdemeanor under RCW 9.92.030.

Sec. 6 RCW 79A.60.150 and 1993 c 244 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
If ((an infraction is issued under this chapter because a vessel
does not contain the required equipment and if the operator is not the
owner of the vessel, but is operating the vessel with the express or
implied permission of the owner, then either or both operator or owner
may be cited for the infraction)) a vessel does not contain the safety
equipment required under this chapter and the rules of the commission,
and the operator is not the owner of the vessel but is operating the
vessel with the express or implied permission of the owner, then either
the owner or the operator, or both, may be cited for the applicable
infraction or charged with the applicable crime.

--- END ---