BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that shellfish
aquaculture is a dynamic and rapidly evolving industry that is
important to the economy, history, and identity of western Washington
and many of the communities surrounding the Puget Sound.
(2) The legislature further finds that not all of the existing
scientific knowledge bases and state and local regulatory structures
have kept up with, or are positioned to continue to keep up with, the
rapid changes in technology, techniques, growing patterns, and markets
of the shellfish aquaculture industry.
(3) The legislature further finds that if there is a prolonged
period of time where scientific knowledge and state regulatory systems
are unable to develop in conjunction with the industry, this will lead
to an imbalance in three of the factors necessary for continued
economic growth: A thriving shellfish aquaculture industry; a healthy
marine ecosystem; and a social license for the shellfish aquaculture
industry to operate in a manner that is harmonious with other aquatic
uses.
(4) The legislature further finds that public investment in
research and continued thoughtful evolution in regulatory direction can
help develop and maintain the needed thriving industry, healthy
ecosystem, and social license to operate.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.30.632 and 2007 c 341 s 64 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The sea grant and cooperative extension shall jointly
administer a program to provide field agents to work with local
governments, property owners, and the general public to increase the
propagation of shellfish, and to address Puget Sound water quality
problems within Kitsap, Mason, and Jefferson counties that may limit
shellfish propagation potential. The sea grant and cooperative
extension shall each make available the services of no less than two
agents within these counties for the purposes of this section.
(2) The responsibilities of the field agents shall include but not
be limited to the following:
(a) Provide technical assistance to property owners, marine
industry owners and operators, and others, regarding methods and
practices to address nonpoint and point sources of pollution of Puget
Sound;
(b) Provide technical assistance to address water quality problems
limiting opportunities for enhancing the recreational harvest of
shellfish;
(c) Provide technical assistance in the management and increased
production of shellfish to facility operators or to those interested in
establishing an operation;
(d) Assist local governments to develop and implement education and
public involvement activities related to Puget Sound water quality;
(e) Assist in coordinating local water quality programs with
region-wide and statewide programs;
(f) Provide information and assistance to local watershed
committees.
(3) The sea grant and cooperative extension shall mutually
coordinate their field agent activities to avoid duplicative efforts
and to ensure that the full range of responsibilities under RCW
28B.30.632 through 28B.30.636 are carried out. They shall consult with
the Puget Sound partnership, created in RCW 90.71.210, and ensure
consistency with any of the Puget Sound partnership's water quality
management plans.
(4) Recognizing the special expertise of both agencies, the sea
grant and cooperative extension shall cooperate to divide their
activities as follows:
(a) Sea grant shall have primary responsibility to address water
quality issues related to activities within Puget Sound, and to provide
assistance regarding the management and improvement of shellfish
production; and
(b) Cooperative extension shall have primary responsibility to
address upland and freshwater activities affecting Puget Sound water
quality and associated watersheds.
(5)(a) In addition to the other responsibilities of this section,
the cooperative extension must establish a shellfish aquaculture public
information center in one of the following counties: Mason, Thurston,
Kitsap, Pierce, or Jefferson. Regardless of location, the shellfish
aquaculture public information center must provide services within all
five counties.
(b) The shellfish aquaculture public information center may provide
the following services:
(i) Develop a repository of information on sustainable aquaculture
practices;
(ii) Work with private growers to provide technical assistance
regarding sustainable aquaculture practices and permit and regulation
compliance;
(iii) Develop educational materials, kiosks, interpretative
centers, and other forums regarding the history, importance, and
sustainability of the shellfish industry;
(iv) Serve as a single point of contact for the public and as a
public ombuds regarding questions about shellfish aquaculture
permitting, enforcement, and concerns;
(v) Liaison with state and county governments to assist in
resolving or explaining public questions and concerns;
(vi) Seek federal funding for aquaculture research and development;
(vii) Serve as an information clearinghouse for aquaculture
activities and regulations;
(viii) Serve as a point of contact and a public clearinghouse
regarding abandoned aquaculture sites littered with derelict gear,
including investigations into any known owners with site restoration
responsibilities and other clean-up options when responsible owners are
unknown or nonexistent; and
(ix) Fulfill other duties deemed relevant to the assistance of a
vibrant, sustainable, shellfish aquaculture industry.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.30.634 and 1990 c 289 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except for the shellfish aquaculture public information center
required under RCW 28B.30.632, the sea grant and cooperative extension
shall require a match from nonstate sources of at least twenty-five
percent of the cost of the services provided, and not exceeding fifty
percent of the cost. The match may be either monetary compensation or
in-kind services, such as the provision for office space or clerical
support. Only direct costs of providing the services, excluding costs
of administrative overhead, may be included in the estimate of costs.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.20.475 and 2007 c 216 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The sea grant program at the University of Washington shall,
consistent with this section, commission ((a)) an ongoing series of
scientific research studies that examines the possible effects,
including the cumulative effects, of the current prevalent geoduck
aquaculture techniques and practices on the natural environment in and
around Puget Sound, including the Strait of Juan de Fuca. The sea
grant program shall use funding provided from the geoduck aquaculture
research account created in RCW 28B.20.476 to review existing
literature, directly perform research identified as needed, or to enter
into and manage contracts with scientific organizations or institutions
to accomplish these results.
(2) Prior to entering into a contract with a scientific
organization or institution, the sea grant program must:
(a) Analyze, through peer review, the credibility of the proposed
party to the contract, including whether the party has credible
experience and knowledge and has access to the facilities necessary to
fully execute the research required by the contract; and
(b) Require that all proposed parties to a contract fully disclose
any past, present, or planned future personal or professional
connections with the shellfish industry or public interest groups.
(3) To the degree appropriate, research conducted under this
section should be coordinated with any research efforts by the sea
grant program related to ocean acidification.
(4) All research commissioned under this section must be subjected
to a rigorous peer review process prior to being accepted and reported
by the sea grant program.
(((4))) (5) In prioritizing and directing research under this
section, the sea grant program shall meet with the department of
ecology at least annually and ((rely on)) consider guidance submitted
by the department of ecology. The department of ecology shall convene
the shellfish aquaculture ((regulatory)) committee created in section
((4, chapter 216, Laws of 2007)) 5 of this act as necessary to serve as
((an oversight)) a steering committee to formulate the guidance
provided to the sea grant program. The objective of the ((oversight))
steering committee, and the resulting guidance provided to the sea
grant program, is to ensure that the research required under this
section ((satisfies)) assists the planning, permitting, and data
management needs of the state, to assist in the prioritization of
research ((given limited funding)), and to help identify any research
that is beneficial to complete other than what is listed in subsection
(((5))) (6) of this section.
(((5))) (6) To satisfy the minimum requirements of subsection (1)
of this section, the sea grant program shall review all scientific
research that is existing or in progress that examines the possible
effect of currently prevalent geoduck practices((,)) on the natural
environment((,)) and prioritize and conduct new studies as needed, to
measure and assess the following:
(a) The environmental effects of structures commonly used in the
aquaculture industry to protect juvenile geoducks from predation;
(b) The environmental effects of commercial harvesting of geoducks
from intertidal geoduck beds, focusing on current prevalent harvesting
techniques, including a review of the recovery rates for benthic
communities after harvest;
(c) The extent to which geoducks in standard aquaculture tracts
alter the ecological characteristics of overlying waters while the
tracts are submerged, including impacts on species diversity, and the
abundance of other benthic organisms;
(d) Baseline information regarding naturally existing parasites and
diseases in wild and cultured geoducks, including whether and to what
extent commercial intertidal geoduck aquaculture practices impact the
baseline;
(e) Genetic interactions between cultured and wild geoduck,
including measurements of differences between cultured geoducks and
wild geoducks in terms of genetics and reproductive status; and
(f) The impact of the use of sterile triploid geoducks and whether
triploid animals diminish the genetic interactions between wild and
cultured geoducks.
(((6))) (7) If adequate funding is not made available for the
completion of all research required under this section, the sea grant
program shall consult with the shellfish aquaculture ((regulatory))
committee, via the department of ecology, to prioritize which of the
enumerated research projects have the greatest cost/benefit ratio in
terms of providing information important for regulatory decisions;
however, the study identified in subsection (((5))) (6)(b) of this
section shall receive top priority. The prioritization process may
include the addition of any new studies that may be appropriate in
addition to, or in place of, studies listed in this section.
(((7))) (8) When appropriate, all research commissioned under this
section must address localized and cumulative effects of geoduck
aquaculture.
(((8))) (9) The sea grant program and the University of Washington
are prohibited from retaining greater than fifteen percent of any
funding provided to implement this section for administrative overhead
or other deductions not directly associated with conducting the
research required by this section.
(((9))) (10) Individual commissioned contracts under this section
may address single or multiple components listed for study under this
section.
(((10))) (11) All initial research commissioned under this section
must be completed and the results reported to the ((appropriate
committees of the)) legislature consistent with RCW 43.01.036 by
December 1, 2013. ((In addition, the sea grant program shall provide
the appropriate committees of the legislature with annual reports
updating the status and progress of the ongoing studies that are
completed in advance of the 2013 deadline.)) Research completed after
the initial report must be summarized for legislators upon request.

Sec. 5 2007 c 216 s 4 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) The shellfish aquaculture ((regulatory)) committee is
established to, consistent with this section, serve as an advisory body
to the department ((of ecology)) on regulatory processes and approvals
for all current and new shellfish aquaculture activities, and the
activities conducted pursuant to RCW 90.58.060, as the activities
relate to shellfish. The shellfish aquaculture ((regulatory))
committee is advisory in nature, and no vote or action of the committee
may overrule existing statutes, regulations, or local ordinances nor
bind the decision-making process required of the University of
Washington's sea grant program under RCW 28B.20.475.
(2) The shellfish aquaculture ((regulatory)) committee shall
initially develop recommendations as to:
(a) A regulatory system or permit process for all current and new
shellfish aquaculture projects and activities that integrates all
applicable existing local, state, and federal regulations and is
efficient both for the regulators and the regulated; and
(b) Appropriate guidelines for geoduck aquaculture operations to be
included in shoreline master programs ((under section 5 of this act)).
When developing the initial recommendations for guidelines under this
subsection, the committee must examine the following:
(i) Methods for quantifying and reducing marine litter; and
(ii) Possible landowner notification policies and requirements for
establishing new geoduck aquaculture farms.
(3) After the completion of the initial charge of work for the
shellfish aquaculture committee, the committee must be reconstituted,
maintained, and asked to meet as necessary only to advise the sea grant
program at the University of Washington regarding the scoping of
research under RCW 28B.20.475.
(4)(a) The members of the shellfish aquaculture ((regulatory))
committee shall be appointed by the director of the department ((of
ecology)) as follows:
(i) Two representatives of county government, one from a county
located on the Puget Sound, and one from a county located on the
Pacific Ocean;
(ii) Two individuals who are professionally engaged in the
commercial aquaculture of shellfish, one who owns or operates an
aquatic farm in Puget Sound, and one who owns or operates an aquatic
farm in state waters other than the Puget Sound;
(iii) Two representatives of organizations representing the
environmental community;
(iv) Two individuals who own shoreline property, one of which does
not have a commercial geoduck operation on his or her property and one
of which who does have a commercial geoduck operation on his or her
property; and
(v) One representative each from the following state agencies: The
department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, the
department of agriculture, and the department of natural resources.
(b) In addition to the other participants listed in this
subsection, the governor shall invite the full participation of two
tribal governments, at least one of which is located within the
drainage of the Puget Sound.
(((4))) (5) The department ((of ecology)) shall provide
administrative and clerical assistance to the shellfish aquaculture
((regulatory)) committee and all agencies listed in subsection (((3)))
(4) of this section shall provide technical assistance.
(((5))) (6) Nonagency members of the shellfish aquaculture
((regulatory)) committee will not be compensated, but are entitled to
be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(((6))) (7) Any participation by a Native American tribe on the
shellfish aquaculture ((regulatory)) committee shall not, under any
circumstances, be viewed as an admission by the tribe that any of its
activities, or those of its members, are subject to any of the
statutes, regulations, ordinances, standards, or permit systems
reviewed, considered, or proposed by the committee.
(((7))) (8) The shellfish aquaculture ((regulatory)) committee is
authorized to form technical advisory panels as needed and appoint to
them members not on the shellfish aquaculture ((regulatory)) committee.
(((8) The department of ecology shall report the recommendations
and findings of the shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007, with a
further report, if necessary, by December 1, 2008.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 5 of this act is codified as a new
section in chapter 43.21A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RCW 43.21A.681 (Geoduck aquaculture
operations--Guidelines--Rules) and 2007 c 216 s 5 are each repealed.

--- END ---