BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.090 and 2009 c 428 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Public records shall be available for inspection and copying during
the customary office hours of the agency, the office of the secretary
of the senate, and the office of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives for a minimum of thirty hours per week, except weeks
that include state legal holidays, unless the person making the request
and the agency, the office of the secretary of the senate, or the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives or its
representative agree on a different time. Customary business hours
must be posted on the agency or office's web site and made known by
other means designed to provide the public with notice. Special
purpose districts that customarily do not maintain office hours for a
minimum of thirty hours per week are not required to do so and must
post on the agency headquarters location or web site directions on how
to contact agency personnel to inspect or copy public records.

--- END ---