BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.65.410 and 1993 c 340 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Every diver engaged in the commercial harvest of subtidal
geoduck clams shall obtain a ((nontransferable)) geoduck diver license.
An individual may only own one license and all geoduck harvesting
performed under the license must be done personally by the actual
license holder.
(b) The licensing requirement created in this section does not
apply to divers engaged in activities related to the cultivation of
geoduck clams as private sector cultured aquatic products as defined in
RCW 15.85.020.
(c) The geoduck diver license is a nontransferable license.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2015, the director may not issue more than
seventy-seven geoduck diver licenses in any one year.
(3) The annual geoduck diver license fee is as provided in RCW
77.65.440.
(4) A geoduck diver license expires on December 31st of each year.
Prior to the license's expiration, a license holder may apply to renew
the license holder's geoduck diver license only if the license holder
is included on a department of natural resources' geoduck harvest
agreement plan of operation during the applicable current calendar
year.
(5) Beginning January 1, 2015, each person applying for or renewing
a geoduck diver license under this section must complete the geoduck
diver safety program established in section 5 of this act prior to
being issued a license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The director of the department of fish
and wildlife shall give individuals who held a geoduck diver license in
2011, 2012, 2013, or 2014, and who were listed on a department of
natural resources' geoduck harvest agreement plan of operation during
the same period, the right of first refusal to purchase a geoduck diver
license for the 2015 license year.
(2) Any license holder who qualifies for the right of first refusal
under this section must have his or her intent to purchase a geoduck
diver license in 2015 known to the director of the department of fish
and wildlife within six months of the effective date of this section.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.65 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must revoke a geoduck diver license issued under RCW
77.65.410, and the licensee must surrender the license, if the licensee
is found in violation of a department of natural resources' geoduck
harvest agreement two or more times. The person surrendering the
geoduck diver license may not hold another geoduck diver license for a
period of one calendar year from the date the license is surrendered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a geoduck harvest safety
committee. The geoduck harvest safety committee consists of one
representative from the department, one representative from the
department's geoduck diver advisory committee, one representative from
an organization representing the interests of geoduck harvesters, and
one representative from an organization representing the interests of
geoduck divers. Each representative must be appointed by the
administrator.
(2) The geoduck harvest safety committee must meet at least
quarterly. By December 1, 2013, the committee must submit a
recommendation to the department regarding the establishment of a
geoduck diver safety program and safety requirements for geoduck divers
licensed under RCW 77.65.410.
(3) Upon the establishment of the geoduck diver safety program
under section 5 of this act, the geoduck harvest safety committee must
continue to review and evaluate the safety program's success and
effectiveness and recommend to the department appropriate changes to
improve the geoduck diver safety program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2014, the department must, by rule, create a
geoduck diver safety program and establish safety requirements for
geoduck divers licensed under RCW 77.65.410. The department must adopt
rules based on the recommendation of the geoduck harvest safety
committee established in section 4 of this act.
(2) The department may adopt, amend, or repeal rules as needed to
ensure the success and effectiveness of the geoduck diver safety
program created under subsection (1) of this section. The department
must consider the recommendations provided by the geoduck harvest
safety committee under section 4(3) of this act.
(3) The department may not adopt rules in conflict with safety
standards established by the department of labor and industries under
RCW 49.17.040.
(4) A civil suit or action may not be commenced or prosecuted
against the director, department, or any other government officer or
entity by reason of any actions taken in connection with the adoption
or enforcement of the geoduck diver safety program and safety
requirements established under subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
The state of Washington does not waive its sovereign immunity with
respect to any actions taken by the department under this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 79.135.210 and 2005 c 155 s 708 and 2005 c 113 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 79.135.040, geoducks shall be sold as
valuable materials under the provisions of chapter 79.90 RCW. After
confirmation of the sale, the department may enter into an agreement
with the purchaser for the harvesting of geoducks. The department may
place terms and conditions in the harvesting agreements as the
department deems necessary. The department may enforce the provisions
of any harvesting agreement by suspending or canceling the harvesting
agreement or through any other means contained in the harvesting
agreement. Any geoduck harvester may terminate a harvesting agreement
entered into pursuant to this subsection if actions of a governmental
agency, beyond the control of the harvester, its agents, or its
employees, prohibit harvesting, for a period exceeding thirty days
during the term of the harvesting agreement, except as provided within
the agreement. Upon termination of the agreement by the harvester, the
harvester shall be reimbursed by the department for the cost paid to
the department on the agreement, less the value of the harvest already
accomplished by the harvester under the agreement.
(2) Harvesting agreements under this title for the purpose of
harvesting geoducks shall require the harvester and the harvester's
agent or representatives to comply with all applicable commercial
diving safety standards and regulations promulgated and implemented by
the federal occupational safety and health administration established
under the federal occupational safety and health act of 1970 as the law
exists or as amended (84 Stat. 1590 et seq.; 29 U.S.C. Sec. 651 et
seq.). However, for the purposes of this section and RCW 77.60.070,
all persons who dive for geoducks are deemed to be employees as defined
by the federal occupational safety and health act. All harvesting
agreements shall provide that failure to comply with these standards is
cause for suspension or cancellation of the harvesting agreement.
Further, for the purposes of this subsection if the harvester contracts
with another person or entity for the harvesting of geoducks, the
harvesting agreement shall not be suspended or canceled if the
harvester terminates its business relationship with such an entity
until compliance with this subsection is secured.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2015, geoduck divers licensed under RCW
77.65.410 must annually complete the geoduck diver safety program
established in section 5 of this act in order to be maintained on a
department of natural resources' harvest agreement plan of operation.

--- END ---