BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.10.420 and 2012 c 102 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following public bodies are authorized to use the job order
contracting procedure:
(a) The department of enterprise services;
(b) The state universities, regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College;
(c) Sound transit (central Puget Sound regional transit authority);
(d) Every city with a population greater than seventy thousand and
any public authority chartered by such city under RCW 35.21.730 through
35.21.755;
(e) Every county with a population greater than four hundred fifty
thousand;
(f) Every port district with total revenues greater than fifteen
million dollars per year;
(g) Every public utility district with revenues from energy sales
greater than twenty-three million dollars per year;
(h) Every school district; ((and))
(i) The state ferry system; and
(j) The Washington state department of transportation, for the
administration of building improvement, replacement, and renovation
projects only.
(2)(a) The department of enterprise services may issue job order
contract work orders for Washington state parks department projects.
(b) The department of enterprise services, the University of
Washington, and Washington State University may issue job order
contract work orders for the state regional universities and The
Evergreen State College.
(3) Public bodies may use a job order contract for public works
projects when a determination is made that the use of job order
contracts will benefit the public by providing an effective means of
reducing the total lead-time and cost for the construction of public
works projects for repair and renovation required at public facilities
through the use of unit price books and work orders by eliminating
time-consuming, costly aspects of the traditional public works process,
which require separate contracting actions for each small project.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.131.408 and 2012 c 102 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2014:
(1) RCW 39.10.200 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 2, 2007 c 494 s 1, &
1994 c 132 s 1;
(2) RCW 39.10.210 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6014, 2007 c 494 s 101,
& 2005 c 469 s 3;
(3) RCW 39.10.220 and 2007 c 494 s 102 & 2005 c 377 s 1;
(4) RCW 39.10.230 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 3, 2009 c 75 s 1, 2007
c 494 s 103, & 2005 c 377 s 2;
(5) RCW 39.10.240 and 2007 c 494 s 104;
(6) RCW 39.10.250 and 2009 c 75 s 2 & 2007 c 494 s 105;
(7) RCW 39.10.260 and 2007 c 494 s 106;
(8) RCW 39.10.270 and 2009 c 75 s 3 & 2007 c 494 s 107;
(9) RCW 39.10.280 and 2007 c 494 s 108;
(10) RCW 39.10.290 and 2007 c 494 s 109;
(11) RCW 39.10.300 and 2009 c 75 s 4 & 2007 c 494 s 201;
(12) RCW 39.10.320 and 2007 c 494 s 203 & 1994 c 132 s 7;
(13) RCW 39.10.330 and 2009 c 75 s 5 & 2007 c 494 s 204;
(14) RCW 39.10.340 and 2007 c 494 s 301;
(15) RCW 39.10.350 and 2007 c 494 s 302;
(16) RCW 39.10.360 and 2009 c 75 s 6 & 2007 c 494 s 303;
(17) RCW 39.10.370 and 2007 c 494 s 304;
(18) RCW 39.10.380 and 2007 c 494 s 305;
(19) RCW 39.10.385 and 2010 c 163 s 1;
(20) RCW 39.10.390 and 2007 c 494 s 306;
(21) RCW 39.10.400 and 2007 c 494 s 307;
(22) RCW 39.10.410 and 2007 c 494 s 308;
(23) RCW 39.10.420 and 2013 c . . . s 1 (section 1 of this act),
2012 c 102 s 1, 2009 c 75 s 7, 2007 c 494 s 401, & 2003 c 301 s 1;
(24) RCW 39.10.430 and 2007 c 494 s 402;
(25) RCW 39.10.440 and 2007 c 494 s 403;
(26) RCW 39.10.450 and 2012 c 102 s 2 & 2007 c 494 s 404;
(27) RCW 39.10.460 and 2012 c 102 s 3 & 2007 c 494 s 405;
(28) RCW 39.10.470 and 2005 c 274 s 275 & 1994 c 132 s 10;
(29) RCW 39.10.480 and 1994 c 132 s 9;
(30) RCW 39.10.490 and 2007 c 494 s 501 & 2001 c 328 s 5;
(31) RCW 39.10.500 and 2007 c 494 s 502;
(32) RCW 39.10.510 and 2007 c 494 s 503;
(33) RCW 39.10.900 and 1994 c 132 s 13;
(34) RCW 39.10.901 and 1994 c 132 s 14;
(35) RCW 39.10.903 and 2007 c 494 s 510;
(36) RCW 39.10.904 and 2007 c 494 s 512; and
(37) RCW 39.10.905 and 2007 c 494 s 513.

--- END ---