BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 15.65 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A commodity board may appoint up to two nonvoting advisory
members to the board who have expertise in marketing, operations, or
other topics relevant to the work of the board. The term of office for
each nonvoting advisory member must be established in each board's
marketing order or agreement, but may not exceed three years.
Nonvoting advisory members may serve additional consecutive terms of
office if reappointed by the board.
(2) Nonvoting advisory members do not count toward establishing a
quorum of the board.
(3) Nonvoting advisory members must be compensated in the same
manner as board members under RCW 15.65.270(4).

--- END ---