BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that the
goals of the child welfare system are to protect the safety,
permanence, and well-being of the children it serves. The legislature
further recognizes the importance of maintaining publicly accessible
data that tracks the performance of the child welfare system, leading
to transparency and public understanding of the system.
(2) The legislature believes it is important to measure safety,
permanence, and well-being such that the public and the legislature may
understand how the child welfare system is performing. This
information will also serve the legislature in determining priorities
for investment of public dollars as well as need for substantive
legislative changes to facilitate improvement.
(3) The reports to the legislature under section 2 of this act will
be used to provide feedback to the department of social and health
services. The agencies referenced in section 2 of this act will not
disclose individually identifiable private information except as
allowable under federal and state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The University of Washington, through partners for our
children, within the school of social work, and the department, in
collaboration with other stakeholders, shall develop measurements in
the areas of safety, permanency, and well-being, using existing and
available data. Measurements must be calculated from data used in the
routine work of the state agencies' data and information technology
departments. Any new record linkage or data-matching activities
required in fulfillment of this section may be performed by partners
for our children pursuant to agreements developed under subsection (6)
of this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "state agencies" means any
agency or subagency providing data used in the integrated client
database maintained by the research and data analysis division of the
department. Any exchange of data must be in accordance with applicable
federal and state law.
(3) All measurements must use a methodology accepted by the
scientific community. All measurements must address any
disproportionate racial and ethnic inequality. The initial
measurements must be developed by December 1, 2013.
(4) The measurements may not require the state agencies to revise
their data collection systems, and may not require the state agencies
to provide individually identifiable information.
(5) The state agencies shall provide the University of Washington
with all measurement data related to the measurements developed under
this section at least quarterly beginning July 1, 2014. Partners for
our children shall make any nonidentifiable data publicly available.
Partners for our children shall report on the data to the legislature
and the governor annually starting December 31, 2014.
(6) By January 1, 2014, the state agencies shall execute agreements
with partners for our children to enable sharing of data pursuant to
RCW 42.48.020 sufficient to comply with this section.
(7) The fact that partners for our children has chosen to use a
specific measure, use a specific baseline, or compare any measure to a
baseline is not admissible as evidence of negligence by the department
in a civil action.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.13B.020 and 2012 c 205 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No later than December 1, ((2013)) 2014, the department shall
enter into performance-based contracts for the provision of family
support and related services. The department may enter into
performance-based contracts for additional services, other than case
management.
(2) ((Beginning December 1, 2013, the department may not renew its
current contracts with individuals or entities for the provision of the
child welfare services included in performance-based contracts under
this section for services in geographic areas served by network
administrators under such contracts, except as mutually agreed upon
between the department and the network administrator to allow for the
successful transition of services that meet the needs of children and
families.
(3))) The department shall conduct a procurement process to enter
into performance-based contracts with one or more network
administrators for family support and related services. As part of the
procurement process, the department shall consult with department
caseworkers, the exclusive bargaining representative for employees of
the department, tribal representatives, parents who were formerly
involved in the child welfare system, youth currently or previously in
foster care, child welfare services researchers, and the Washington
state institute for public policy to assist in identifying the
categories of family support and related services that will be included
in the procurement. The categories of family support and related
services shall be defined no later than July 15, 2012. In identifying
services, the department must review current data and research related
to the effectiveness of family support and related services that
mitigate child safety concerns and promote permanency, including
reunification, and child well-being. Expenditures for family support
and related services purchased under this section must remain within
the levels appropriated in the operating budget.
(((4))) (3)(a) Network administrators shall, directly or through
subcontracts with service providers:
(i) Assist caseworkers in meeting their responsibility for
implementation of case plans and individual service and safety plans;
and
(ii) Provide the family support and related services within the
categories of contracted services that are included in a child or
family's case plan or individual service and safety plan within funds
available under contract.
(b) While the department caseworker retains responsibility for case
management, nothing in chapter 205, Laws of 2012 limits the ability of
the department to continue to contract for the provision of case
management services by child-placing agencies, behavioral
rehabilitation services agencies, or other entities that provided case
management under contract with the department prior to July 1, 2005.
(((5))) (4) In conducting the procurement, the department shall
actively consult with other state agencies with relevant expertise,
such as the health care authority, and with philanthropic entities with
expertise in performance-based contracting for child welfare services.
The director of the office of financial management must approve the
request for proposal prior to its issuance.
(((6))) (5) The procurement process must be developed and
implemented in a manner that complies with applicable provisions of
intergovernmental agreements between the state of Washington and tribal
governments and must provide an opportunity for tribal governments to
contract for service delivery through network administrators.
(((7))) (6) The procurement and resulting contracts must include,
but are not limited to, the following standards and requirements:
(a) The use of family engagement approaches to successfully
motivate families to engage in services and training of the network's
contracted providers to apply such approaches;
(b) The use of parents and youth who are successful veterans of the
child welfare system to act as mentors through activities that include,
but are not limited to, helping families navigate the system,
facilitating parent engagement, and minimizing distrust of the child
welfare system;
(c) The establishment of qualifications for service providers
participating in provider networks, such as appropriate licensure or
certification, education, and accreditation by professional accrediting
entities;
(d) Adequate provider capacity to meet the anticipated service
needs in the network administrator's contracted service area. The
network administrator must be able to demonstrate that its provider
network is culturally competent and has adequate capacity to address
disproportionality, including utilization of tribal and other ethnic
providers capable of serving children and families of color or who need
language-appropriate services;
(e) Fiscal solvency of network administrators and providers
participating in the network;
(f) The use of evidence-based, research-based, and promising
practices, where appropriate, including fidelity and quality assurance
provisions;
(g) Network administrator quality assurance activities, including
monitoring of the performance of providers in their provider network,
with respect to meeting measurable service outcomes;
(h) Network administrator data reporting, including data on
contracted provider performance and service outcomes; and
(i) Network administrator compliance with applicable provisions of
intergovernmental agreements between the state of Washington and tribal
governments and the federal and Washington state Indian child welfare
act.
(((8))) (7) As part of the procurement process under this section,
the department shall issue the request for proposals no later than
December 31, ((2012. The department shall notify the apparently
successful bidders no later than June 30, 2013)) 2013, shall begin
implementation of performance-based contracting no later than July 1,
2014, and shall fully implement performance-based contracting no later
than July 1, 2015.
(((9))) (8) Performance-based payment methodologies must be used in
network administrator contracting. Performance measures should relate
to successful engagement by a child or parent in services included in
their case plan, and resulting improvement in identified problem
behaviors and interactions. For the initial three-year period of
implementation of performance-based contracting, the department may
transfer financial risk for the provision of services to network
administrators only to the limited extent necessary to implement a
performance-based payment methodology, such as phased payment for
services. However, the department may develop a shared savings
methodology through which the network administrator will receive a
defined share of any savings that result from improved performance. If
the department receives a Title IV-E waiver, the shared savings
methodology must be consistent with the terms of the waiver. If a
shared savings methodology is adopted, the network administrator shall
reinvest the savings in enhanced services to better meet the needs of
the families and children they serve.
(((10))) (9) The department must actively monitor network
administrator compliance with the terms of contracts executed under
this section.
(((11))) (10) The use of performance-based contracts under this
section must be done in a manner that does not adversely affect the
state's ability to continue to obtain federal funding for child
welfare-related functions currently performed by the state and with
consideration of options to further maximize federal funding
opportunities and increase flexibility in the use of such funds,
including use for preventive and in-home child welfare services.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.13.360 and 2012 c 205 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No later than December 30, ((2015)) 2016:
(a) In the demonstration sites selected under RCW 74.13.368(4)(a),
child welfare services shall be provided by supervising agencies with
whom the department has entered into performance-based contracts.
Supervising agencies may enter into subcontracts with other licensed
agencies; and
(b) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, and
notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department may not
directly provide child welfare services to families and children
provided child welfare services by supervising agencies in the
demonstration sites selected under RCW 74.13.368(4)(a).
(2) No later than December 30, ((2015)) 2016, for families and
children provided child welfare services by supervising agencies in the
demonstration sites selected under RCW 74.13.368(4)(a), the department
is responsible for only the following:
(a) Monitoring the quality of services for which the department
contracts under this chapter;
(b) Ensuring that the services are provided in accordance with
federal law and the laws of this state, including the Indian child
welfare act;
(c) Providing child protection functions and services, including
intake and investigation of allegations of child abuse or neglect,
emergency shelter care functions under RCW 13.34.050, and referrals to
appropriate providers; and
(d) Issuing licenses pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.
(3) No later than December 30, ((2015)) 2016, for families and
children provided child welfare services by supervising agencies in the
demonstration sites selected under RCW 74.13.368(4)(a), the department
may provide child welfare services only:
(a) For the limited purpose of establishing a control or comparison
group as deemed necessary by the child welfare transformation design
committee, with input from the Washington state institute for public
policy, to implement the demonstration sites selected and defined
pursuant to RCW 74.13.368(4)(a) in which the performance in achieving
measurable outcomes will be compared and evaluated pursuant to RCW
74.13.370; or
(b) In an emergency or as a provider of last resort. The
department shall adopt rules describing the circumstances under which
the department may provide those services. For purposes of this
section, "provider of last resort" means the department is unable to
contract with a private agency to provide child welfare services in a
particular geographic area or, after entering into a contract with a
private agency, either the contractor or the department terminates the
contract.
(4) For purposes of this chapter, on and after September 1, 2010,
performance-based contracts shall be structured to hold the supervising
agencies accountable for achieving the following goals in order of
importance: Child safety; child permanency, including reunification;
and child well-being.
(5) A federally recognized tribe located in this state may enter
into a performance-based contract with the department to provide child
welfare services to Indian children whether or not they reside on a
reservation. Nothing in this section prohibits a federally recognized
Indian tribe located in this state from providing child welfare
services to its members or other Indian children pursuant to existing
tribal law, regulation, or custom, or from directly entering into
agreements for the provision of such services with the department, if
the department continues to otherwise provide such services, or with
federal agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 74.13.368 (Performance-based contracts--Child welfare transformation design committee) and 2012 c 205 s 10,
2010 c 291 s 2, & 2009 c 520 s 8 are each suspended as of the effective
date of this section until December 1, 2015.

--- END ---