BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An agency practice, policy, or procedure used when
administering, interpreting, enforcing, or implementing any law is not
effective before and unless all of the following have been met:
(a) The insurance commissioner has communicated the practice,
policy, or procedure in writing to those affected at least thirty days
in advance of its use or implementation along with identification of
the statute conferring authority for that practice, policy, or
procedure;
(b) The commissioner publishes on the agency web site the practice,
policy, or procedure upon use or implementation along with prior
versions of that practice, policy, or procedure and enforcement actions
based upon that practice, policy, or procedure;
(c) Agency enforcement and application of a practice, policy, or
procedure applies equally to all similar products, services, and
licensees except as explicitly required otherwise by a law identified
by the commissioner; and
(d) The commissioner applies any new practice, policy, or procedure
prospectively only except as explicitly required otherwise by a law
identified by the commissioner.
(2) The commissioner may not impose a fine or suspend or revoke a
license for a violation of law relating to the filing, use, or approval
of a rate, form, or agreement by a carrier if the commissioner had
previously approved, waived a requirement for, or waived enforcement
against any carrier for a substantially similar rate, form, or
agreement in similar circumstances.
(3) The commissioner may not prohibit or take action against any
person for the negotiation of a provider or facility agreement in
advance of filing the agreement. The commissioner may not prohibit the
execution or use of a health care provider or facility agreement that
varies from the carrier's filed and approved agreements solely with
respect to terms and conditions:
(a) For which the commissioner has no statutory authority to
disapprove; or
(b) Required by another state or federal government agency with
jurisdiction over the agreement.
(4) In any action by the commissioner against any person for a
violation of law relating to the use of a rate, form, or agreement, the
determination of whether a material difference exists between the
approved and used rate, form, or agreement must be made in accordance
with state common law governing material modification of agreements.

--- END ---