BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2011 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Sections 2 and 3 of this act take effect July 1, ((2015)) 2014.

Sec. 2 2011 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Section 2 of this act expires July 1, ((2015)) 2014.

--- END ---