BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.05.040 and 2004 c 166 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Persons ((who are developmentally disabled)) with developmental
disabilities, impaired by chronic alcoholism or drug abuse, or
suffering from dementia shall not be detained for evaluation and
treatment or judicially committed solely by reason of that condition
unless such condition causes a person to be gravely disabled or as a
result of a mental disorder such condition exists that constitutes a
likelihood of serious harm: Provided however, That persons ((who are
developmentally disabled)) with developmental disabilities, impaired by
chronic alcoholism or drug abuse, or suffering from dementia and who
otherwise meet the criteria for detention or judicial commitment are
not ineligible for detention or commitment based on this condition
alone.
(2) The fact that a mental disorder within the definition of RCW
71.05.020 is caused by an underlying medical condition does not provide
a reason to withhold detention under this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.05.150 and 2011 c 148 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a designated mental health professional receives
information alleging that a person, as a result of a mental disorder:
(i) Presents a likelihood of serious harm; or (ii) is gravely disabled;
the designated mental health professional may, after investigation and
evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and
credibility of any person providing information to initiate detention,
if satisfied that the allegations are true and that the person will not
voluntarily seek appropriate treatment, file a petition for initial
detention. Before filing the petition, the designated mental health
professional must personally interview the person, unless the person
refuses an interview, and determine whether the person will voluntarily
receive appropriate evaluation and treatment at an evaluation and
treatment facility, crisis stabilization unit, or triage facility.
(2) A decision by a designated mental health professional not to
detain a person may be overridden by the affidavit of two examining
physicians, or one examining physician and one mental health
professional. The designated mental health professional must submit
the affidavits to a judge of the superior court as provided in
subsection (3) of this section for a review of legal sufficiency and
probable cause to support a petition for initial detention. If the
affidavits pass legal review, the designated mental health professional
shall complete the petition and process it to completion as provided in
this section.
(3)(a) An order to detain to a designated evaluation and treatment
facility for not more than a seventy-two-hour evaluation and treatment
period ((may)) must be issued by a judge of the superior court upon
request of a designated mental health professional, whenever it appears
to the satisfaction of a judge of the superior court:
(i) That there is probable cause to support the petition; and
(ii) That the person has refused or failed to accept appropriate
evaluation and treatment voluntarily.
(b) The petition for initial detention, signed under penalty of
perjury, or sworn telephonic testimony may be considered by the court
in determining whether there are sufficient grounds for issuing the
order.
(c) The order shall designate retained counsel or, if counsel is
appointed from a list provided by the court, the name, business
address, and telephone number of the attorney appointed to represent
the person.
(((3))) (4) The designated mental health professional shall then
serve or cause to be served on such person, his or her guardian, and
conservator, if any, a copy of the order together with a notice of
rights, and a petition for initial detention. After service on such
person the designated mental health professional shall file the return
of service in court and provide copies of all papers in the court file
to the evaluation and treatment facility and the designated attorney.
The designated mental health professional shall notify the court and
the prosecuting attorney that a probable cause hearing will be held
within seventy-two hours of the date and time of outpatient evaluation
or admission to the evaluation and treatment facility. The person
shall be permitted to be accompanied by one or more of his or her
relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or other
professional or religious advisor to the place of evaluation. An
attorney accompanying the person to the place of evaluation shall be
permitted to be present during the admission evaluation. Any other
individual accompanying the person may be present during the admission
evaluation. The facility may exclude the individual if his or her
presence would present a safety risk, delay the proceedings, or
otherwise interfere with the evaluation.
(((4))) (5) The designated mental health professional may notify a
peace officer to take such person or cause such person to be taken into
custody and placed in an evaluation and treatment facility. At the
time such person is taken into custody there shall commence to be
served on such person, his or her guardian, and conservator, if any, a
copy of the original order together with a notice of rights and a
petition for initial detention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW
to read as follows:
A designated mental health professional who conducts an evaluation
for imminent likelihood of serious harm or imminent danger because of
being gravely disabled under RCW 71.05.153 must also evaluate the
person under RCW 71.05.150 for likelihood of serious harm or grave
disability that does not meet the imminent standard for emergency
detention.

--- END ---