BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The state of Washington hereby occupies
and preempts the entire field regarding paid sick leave and paid safe
leave regulation for private employers within the boundaries of the
state. Local laws and ordinances that require or regulate paid sick
leave or paid safe leave in excess of standards adopted by the state
shall not be enacted and are preempted and unenforceable, regardless of
the nature of the code, charter, or home rule status of such city, code
city, town, or county. The state preemption created in this section
applies to all ordinances, codes, regulations, and rules pertaining to
paid sick or paid safe leave adopted at any time.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Paid sick leave" means paid leave:
(i) Due to the employee's mental or physical illness, injury, or
health condition; need for medical diagnosis care, or treatment of a
mental or physical illness, injury, or health condition; or need for
preventive medical care; or
(ii) To allow the employee to provide care of a family member with
a mental or physical illness, injury, or health condition; who needs
medical diagnosis, care, or treatment of a mental or physical illness,
injury, or health condition; or who needs preventive medical care.
(b) "Paid safe leave" means paid leave:
(i) Due to an employee's place of business, or the school or place
of care of an employee's child, being closed by order of a public
official to limit exposure to an infectious agent, biological toxin, or
hazardous material; or
(ii) Due to an employee or an employee's family member being a
victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking.
(3) This section may not be construed to impair any provision of a
collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 49 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 1 of this act governs the authority of a city or town to
enact or regulate paid sick leave and paid safe leave programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 1 of this act governs the authority of a code city to enact
or regulate paid sick leave and paid safe leave programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 1 of this act governs the authority of a county to enact or
regulate paid sick leave and paid safe leave programs.

--- END ---