BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A health district, with the consent of the county legislative
authority, the county treasurer, the county auditor, and the health
district board, may act as custodian of funds, may keep the record of
the receipts and disbursements, and may draw and may honor and pay all
warrants or checks, which shall be approved before issuance and payment
as directed by the board.
(2) The county may not charge a health district that does not
utilize the option in subsection (1) of this section for those services
provided.

--- END ---