BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.52.160 and 1996 c 213 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No state officer or state employee may employ or use any
person, money, or property under the officer's or employee's official
control or direction, or in his or her official custody, for the
private benefit or gain of the officer, employee, or another.
(2) This section does not prohibit the use of public resources to
benefit others as part of a state officer's or state employee's
official duties.
(3) This section does not prohibit de minimis use of state
facilities to provide employees with information about (a) medical,
surgical, and hospital care; (b) life insurance or accident and health
disability insurance; or (c) individual retirement accounts, by any
person, firm, or corporation administering such program as part of
authorized payroll deductions pursuant to RCW 41.04.020.
(4) The appropriate ethics boards may adopt rules providing
exceptions to this section for occasional use of the state officer or
state employee, of de minimis cost and value, if the activity does not
result in interference with the proper performance of public duties.

--- END ---