BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no person
may:
(a) Dock any cow, or procure the same to be done, within the state;
(b) Import or bring into the state any docked cow;
(c) Drive, work, use, or deal in any docked cow within the state.
(2) The prohibitions in subsection (1) of this section do not apply
with respect to a cow whose tail was docked for the purpose of saving
the animal's life or relieving the animal's pain in an emergency or for
other veterinary purposes, provided that all of the following
conditions are met:
(a) The treatment or operation is carried out by a veterinarian
licensed pursuant to chapter 18.92 RCW using only suitable instruments
and in hygienic conditions;
(b) Adequate anesthesia is used to minimize the animal's pain and
suffering during the treatment or operation; and
(c) The treatment or operation is performed in such a manner as to
minimize the long-term pain and suffering of the animal.
(3) Any person who violates this section has committed a class 1
civil infraction, punishable as provided in RCW 7.80.120. Each
individual instance of an act prohibited in subsection (1) of this
section involving an individual cow is considered a separate and
distinct violation.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Cow" means any animal of the bovine species.
(b) "Dock" means the intentional shortening of an animal's tail by
cutting or removing any portion of the solid part of the tail.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW
to read as follows:
The practice of docking, as defined in section 1 of this act, is
not an acceptable animal husbandry practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter are in addition to, and not in lieu
of, any other laws protecting animal welfare. This chapter may not be
construed to limit any other state law or rule protecting the welfare
of animals, nor does anything in this chapter prevent a local governing
body from adopting and enforcing its own animal welfare laws and
regulations. In the event of a conflict between this chapter and any
other provision of law, this chapter controls.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---