BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the safer
schools act of 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 According to Article IX of the Washington
state Constitution it is the paramount duty of the state to provide for
basic education. The legislature finds that pursuant to this duty,
basic education requires a safe learning environment. The legislature
finds that local school boards are required by federal law to adopt
school safety plans and existing public law already allows local school
boards to use school resource officers or hire private security
officers. The legislature further finds that for some school districts
this can be cost-prohibitive. It is the intent of the legislature to
provide local school boards additional options to provide for school
safety and ensure that Washington state is in compliance with all
provisions of the United States Constitution, federal law, and Article
I, section 24 of the Washington state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of a school district may adopt a written
policy authorizing one or more permanent employees of a school located
within the school district to possess firearms on school grounds. The
written policy must address:
(a) A procedure for implementing the written policy within the
school district, including a process for authorizing permanent
employees to possess firearms under the written policy and determining
that the requirements of the written policy are met;
(b) The training and eligibility requirements that will apply to
permanent employees who are authorized to possess firearms under the
written policy. The training and eligibility requirements must
include, at a minimum, the requirements of subsection (3) of this
section, and may include additional requirements as determined by the
board;
(c) The number of permanent employees who will be authorized to
possess firearms at schools within the school district;
(d) The types of firearms and ammunition that may be possessed on
school grounds; and
(e) Standards specifying the manner in which firearms shall be
possessed and stored, and the circumstances under which a firearm may
be used. The written policy shall require that permanent employees who
are authorized to possess firearms must keep the firearm concealed
while on school grounds except in circumstances authorized under the
written policy.
(2) A board that adopts a written policy authorizing permanent
employees to possess firearms on school grounds must notify local law
enforcement agencies within the school district of the adoption of the
policy.
(3) A permanent employee is not authorized to possess a firearm on
school grounds under this section unless the permanent employee has:
(a) Obtained a valid concealed pistol license issued under RCW
9.41.070;
(b) Successfully completed a firearms training program approved by
the criminal justice training commission under section 5 of this act;
and
(c) Been approved by the board as authorized to possess a firearm
on school grounds under the written policy.
(4) Permanent employees who are authorized under this section to
possess firearms on school grounds are responsible for obtaining an
approved firearm and ammunition, and paying the costs of the required
training program under section 5 of this act. The board may elect to
provide reimbursement to permanent employees for these expenses.
(5) The school district, the board, and permanent employees who are
authorized to possess firearms on school grounds pursuant to a written
policy that complies with the requirements of this section are not
liable for damages in any action arising from acts or omissions in
responding to an incident that threatens the safety or security of the
school or its students or employees, other than acts or omissions
constituting recklessness or willful or wanton misconduct.
(6) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Board" means the board of directors of a school district;
(b) "Permanent employee" means a teacher, administrator, or other
person under a continuing or renewable employment contract with the
school district for a period of not less than one school year, but does
not include a person who is in provisional or temporary status; and
(c) "School grounds" means elementary or secondary school premises,
school-provided transportation, or areas of facilities while being used
exclusively by schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.195
RCW to read as follows:
Private schools are authorized to adopt a written policy allowing
school employees to possess firearms on school grounds if done in
accordance with the standards established in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission shall establish a firearms training and education
program for permanent employees of school districts authorized to
possess firearms on school grounds under section 3 or 4 of this act.
The commission shall adopt rules establishing the fees, training
requirements, and procedures for obtaining the required training. The
fees charged by the commission shall recover the costs incurred by the
commission in developing and administering the program.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.41.280 and 2009 c 453 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person to carry onto, or to possess on,
public or private elementary or secondary school premises, school-provided transportation, or areas of facilities while being used
exclusively by public or private schools:
(a) Any firearm;
(b) Any other dangerous weapon as defined in RCW 9.41.250;
(c) Any device commonly known as "nun-chu-ka sticks", consisting of
two or more lengths of wood, metal, plastic, or similar substance
connected with wire, rope, or other means;
(d) Any device, commonly known as "throwing stars", which are
multi-pointed, metal objects designed to embed upon impact from any
aspect;
(e) Any air gun, including any air pistol or air rifle, designed to
propel a BB, pellet, or other projectile by the discharge of compressed
air, carbon dioxide, or other gas; or
(f)(i) Any portable device manufactured to function as a weapon and
which is commonly known as a stun gun, including a projectile stun gun
which projects wired probes that are attached to the device that emit
an electrical charge designed to administer to a person or an animal an
electric shock, charge, or impulse; or
(ii) Any device, object, or instrument which is used or intended to
be used as a weapon with the intent to injure a person by an electric
shock, charge, or impulse.
(2) Any such person violating subsection (1) of this section is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor. If any person is convicted of a
violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, the person shall have
his or her concealed pistol license, if any revoked for a period of
three years. Anyone convicted under this subsection is prohibited from
applying for a concealed pistol license for a period of three years.
The court shall send notice of the revocation to the department of
licensing, and the city, town, or county which issued the license.
Any violation of subsection (1) of this section by elementary or
secondary school students constitutes grounds for expulsion from the
state's public schools in accordance with RCW 28A.600.010. An
appropriate school authority shall promptly notify law enforcement and
the student's parent or guardian regarding any allegation or indication
of such violation.
Upon the arrest of a person at least twelve years of age and not
more than twenty-one years of age for violating subsection (1)(a) of
this section, the person shall be detained or confined in a juvenile or
adult facility for up to seventy-two hours. The person shall not be
released within the seventy-two hours until after the person has been
examined and evaluated by the designated mental health professional
unless the court in its discretion releases the person sooner after a
determination regarding probable cause or on probation bond or bail.
Within twenty-four hours of the arrest, the arresting law
enforcement agency shall refer the person to the designated mental
health professional for examination and evaluation under chapter 71.05
or 71.34 RCW and inform a parent or guardian of the person of the
arrest, detention, and examination. The designated mental health
professional shall examine and evaluate the person subject to the
provisions of chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW. The examination shall occur
at the facility in which the person is detained or confined. If the
person has been released on probation, bond, or bail, the examination
shall occur wherever is appropriate.
The designated mental health professional may determine whether to
refer the person to the county-designated chemical dependency
specialist for examination and evaluation in accordance with chapter
70.96A RCW. The county-designated chemical dependency specialist shall
examine the person subject to the provisions of chapter 70.96A RCW.
The examination shall occur at the facility in which the person is
detained or confined. If the person has been released on probation,
bond, or bail, the examination shall occur wherever is appropriate.
Upon completion of any examination by the designated mental health
professional or the county-designated chemical dependency specialist,
the results of the examination shall be sent to the court, and the
court shall consider those results in making any determination about
the person.
The designated mental health professional and county-designated
chemical dependency specialist shall, to the extent permitted by law,
notify a parent or guardian of the person that an examination and
evaluation has taken place and the results of the examination. Nothing
in this subsection prohibits the delivery of additional, appropriate
mental health examinations to the person while the person is detained
or confined.
If the designated mental health professional determines it is
appropriate, the designated mental health professional may refer the
person to the local regional support network for follow-up services or
the department of social and health services or other community
providers for other services to the family and individual.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Any student or employee of a private military academy when on
the property of the academy;
(b) Any person engaged in military, law enforcement, or school
district security activities. However, a person who is not a
commissioned law enforcement officer and who provides school security
services under the direction of a school administrator may not possess
a device listed in subsection (1)(f) of this section unless he or she
has successfully completed training in the use of such devices that is
equivalent to the training received by commissioned law enforcement
officers;
(c) Any person who is involved in a convention, showing,
demonstration, lecture, or firearms safety course authorized by school
authorities in which the firearms of collectors or instructors are
handled or displayed;
(d) Any person while the person is participating in a firearms or
air gun competition approved by the school or school district;
(e) Any person in possession of a pistol who has been issued a
license under RCW 9.41.070, or is exempt from the licensing requirement
by RCW 9.41.060, while picking up or dropping off a student;
(f) Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age legally in
possession of a firearm or dangerous weapon that is secured within an
attended vehicle or concealed from view within a locked unattended
vehicle while conducting legitimate business at the school;
(g) Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age who is in lawful
possession of an unloaded firearm, secured in a vehicle while
conducting legitimate business at the school; ((or))
(h) Any law enforcement officer of the federal, state, or local
government agency; or
(i) Any permanent employee who is authorized to possess a firearm
on school grounds under section 3 or 4 of this act.
(4) Subsections (1)(c) and (d) of this section do not apply to any
person who possesses nun-chu-ka sticks, throwing stars, or other
dangerous weapons to be used in martial arts classes authorized to be
conducted on the school premises.
(5) Subsection (1)(f)(i) of this section does not apply to any
person who possesses a device listed in subsection (1)(f)(i) of this
section, if the device is possessed and used solely for the purpose
approved by a school for use in a school authorized event, lecture, or
activity conducted on the school premises.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (3)(b), (c), (f), and (h) of
this section, firearms are not permitted in a public or private school
building.
(7) "GUN-FREE ZONE" signs shall be posted around school facilities
giving warning of the prohibition of the possession of firearms on
school grounds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---