BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Except as provided otherwise in
subsection (2) of this section, in addition to any other taxes, there
is levied and collected from every person for the privilege of engaging
within this state in a business operating pursuant to chapter 69.51A
RCW as a medical cannabis dispensary a marijuana excise tax equal to
twenty-five percent of the gross proceeds of sales of useable cannabis
and cannabis-infused products.
(2) Pharmacies licensed by the department of health under chapter
18.64 RCW are exempt from the tax levied in this section.
(3)(a) The taxes levied under this section must be paid to the
department in accordance with RCW 82.32.045.
(b) All other applicable provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW have full
force and application with respect to the tax imposed under this
section. The department must administer this section.
(4) Taxes collected under this section must be deposited in the
dedicated marijuana fund created in RCW 69.50.530.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Cannabis" has the same meaning as provided for "marijuana" in
RCW 69.50.101.
(b) "Cannabis-infused products" has the same meaning as provided
for "marijuana-infused products" in RCW 69.50.101.
(c) "Gross proceeds of sales" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.070.
(d) "Medical cannabis dispensary" means any business, person, or
entity that engages in the sale or delivery of marijuana to another
person pursuant to chapter 69.51A RCW in return for money or other
valuable consideration, or who is otherwise licensed to conduct retail
sales of medical cannabis under chapter 69.51A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---