BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.83.070 and 2011 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A traffic school established by a city, town, or county under
this chapter that collects fees for the cost of attending the traffic
school may use any fees collected that are in excess of the costs of
the traffic school for the following activities:
(a) Safe driver education materials and programs;
(b) Safe driver education promotions and advertising; or
(c) Costs associated with the training of law enforcement officers.
(2) This section does not authorize a city, town, or county to
increase or impose new fees for traffic schools solely for the uses
authorized in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) This section is not intended, and may not be construed, to
reduce, increase, or otherwise impact funding for judicial programs,
functions, or services.
(4) The fees collected by a traffic school in excess of the costs
of the traffic school must be used only for the activities listed in
subsection (1) of this section and are not subject to indirect costs or
to be used to supplement any other costs of a city, town, or county not
specifically described in this section.

--- END ---