BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.40.100 and 2013 c 302 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a))) A person is guilty of trafficking in the first degree
when:
(((i))) (a) Such person:
(((A))) (i) Recruits, harbors, transports, transfers, provides,
obtains, buys, purchases, or receives by any means another person
knowing, or in reckless disregard of the fact, (A) that force, fraud,
or coercion as defined in RCW 9A.36.070 will be used to cause the
person to engage in:
(I) Forced labor((,));
(II) Involuntary servitude((,));
(III) A sexually explicit act((,)); or
(IV) A commercial sex act, or (B) that the person has not attained
the age of eighteen years and is caused to engage in a sexually
explicit act or a commercial sex act; or
(((B))) (ii) Benefits financially or by receiving anything of value
from participation in a venture that has engaged in acts set forth in
(a)(i)(((A))) of this subsection; and
(((ii))) (b) The acts or venture set forth in (a)(((i))) of this
subsection:
(((A))) (i) Involve committing or attempting to commit kidnapping;
(((B))) (ii) Involve a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835;
(((C))) (iii) Involve the illegal harvesting or sale of human
organs; or
(((D))) (iv) Result in a death.
(((b))) (2) Trafficking in the first degree is a class A felony.
(((2))) (3)(a) A person is guilty of trafficking in the second
degree when such person:
(i) Recruits, harbors, transports, transfers, provides, obtains,
buys, purchases, or receives by any means another person knowing, or in
reckless disregard of the fact, that force, fraud, or coercion as
defined in RCW 9A.36.070 will be used to cause the person to engage in
forced labor, involuntary servitude, a sexually explicit act, or a
commercial sex act, or that the person has not attained the age of
eighteen years and is caused to ((engaged [engage])) engage in a
sexually explicit act or a commercial sex act; or
(ii) Benefits financially or by receiving anything of value from
participation in a venture that has engaged in acts set forth in (a)(i)
of this subsection.
(b) Trafficking in the second degree is a class A felony.
(((3))) (4)(a) A person who is either convicted or given a deferred
sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a statutory
or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for a
violation of a trafficking crime shall be assessed a ten thousand
dollar fee.
(b) The court shall not reduce, waive, or suspend payment of all or
part of the fee assessed in this section unless it finds, on the
record, that the offender does not have the ability to pay the fee in
which case it may reduce the fee by an amount up to two-thirds of the
maximum allowable fee.
(c) Fees assessed under this section shall be collected by the
clerk of the court and remitted to the treasurer of the county where
the offense occurred for deposit in the county general fund, except in
cases in which the offense occurred in a city or town that provides for
its own law enforcement, in which case these amounts shall be remitted
to the treasurer of the city or town for deposit in the general fund of
the city or town. Revenue from the fees must be used for local efforts
to reduce the commercial sale of sex including, but not limited to,
increasing enforcement of commercial sex laws.
(i) At least fifty percent of the revenue from fees imposed under
this section must be spent on prevention, including education programs
for offenders, such as john school, and rehabilitative services, such
as mental health and substance abuse counseling, parenting skills,
training, housing relief, education, vocational training, drop-in
centers, and employment counseling.
(ii) Revenues from these fees are not subject to the distribution
requirements under RCW 3.50.100, 3.62.020, 3.62.040, 10.82.070, or
35.20.220.
(((4))) (5) If the victim of any offense identified in this section
is a minor, force, fraud, or coercion are not necessary elements of an
offense and consent to the sexually explicit act or commercial sex act
does not constitute a defense.
(((5))) (6) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Commercial sex act" means any act of sexual contact or sexual
intercourse, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW, for which something
of value is given or received by any person; and
(b) "Sexually explicit act" means a public, private, or live
photographed, recorded, or videotaped act or show intended to arouse or
satisfy the sexual desires or appeal to the prurient interests of
patrons for which something of value is given or received.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.44.128 and 2013 c 302 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 9A.44.130 through 9A.44.145, 10.01.200,
43.43.540, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Business day" means any day other than Saturday, Sunday, or a
legal local, state, or federal holiday.
(2) "Conviction" means any adult conviction or juvenile
adjudication for a sex offense or kidnapping offense.
(3) "Disqualifying offense" means a conviction for: Any offense
that is a felony; a sex offense as defined in this section; a crime
against children or persons as defined in RCW 43.43.830(7) and
9.94A.411(2)(a); an offense with a domestic violence designation as
provided in RCW 10.99.020; permitting the commercial sexual abuse of a
minor as defined in RCW 9.68A.103; or any violation of chapter 9A.88
RCW.
(4) "Employed" or "carries on a vocation" means employment that is
full time or part time for a period of time exceeding fourteen days, or
for an aggregate period of time exceeding thirty days during any
calendar year. A person is employed or carries on a vocation whether
the person's employment is financially compensated, volunteered, or for
the purpose of government or educational benefit.
(5) "Fixed residence" means a building that a person lawfully and
habitually uses as living quarters a majority of the week. Uses as
living quarters means to conduct activities consistent with the common
understanding of residing, such as sleeping; eating; keeping personal
belongings; receiving mail; and paying utilities, rent, or mortgage.
A nonpermanent structure including, but not limited to, a motor home,
travel trailer, camper, or boat may qualify as a residence provided it
is lawfully and habitually used as living quarters a majority of the
week, primarily kept at one location with a physical address, and the
location it is kept at is either owned or rented by the person or used
by the person with the permission of the owner or renter. A shelter
program may qualify as a residence provided it is a shelter program
designed to provide temporary living accommodations for the homeless,
provides an offender with a personally assigned living space, and the
offender is permitted to store belongings in the living space.
(6) "In the community" means residing outside of confinement or
incarceration for a disqualifying offense.
(7) "Institution of higher education" means any public or private
institution dedicated to postsecondary education, including any
college, university, community college, trade, or professional school.
(8) "Kidnapping offense" means:
(a) The crimes of kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the
second degree, and unlawful imprisonment, as defined in chapter 9A.40
RCW, where the victim is a minor and the offender is not the minor's
parent;
(b) Any offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal
attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit an
offense that is classified as a kidnapping offense under this
subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for: An offense for
which the person would be required to register as a kidnapping offender
if residing in the state of conviction; or, if not required to register
in the state of conviction, an offense that under the laws of this
state would be classified as a kidnapping offense under this
subsection.
(9) "Lacks a fixed residence" means the person does not have a
living situation that meets the definition of a fixed residence and
includes, but is not limited to, a shelter program designed to provide
temporary living accommodations for the homeless, an outdoor sleeping
location, or locations where the person does not have permission to
stay.
(10) "Sex offense" means:
(a) Any offense defined as a sex offense by RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) Any violation under RCW 9A.44.096 (sexual misconduct with a
minor in the second degree);
(c) Any violation under RCW 9A.40.100(1)(((a)(ii)(B))) (b)(ii)
(trafficking);
(d) Any violation under RCW 9.68A.090 (communication with a minor
for immoral purposes);
(e) A violation under RCW 9A.88.070 (promoting prostitution in the
first degree) or RCW 9A.88.080 (promoting prostitution in the second
degree) if the person has a prior conviction for one of these offenses;
(f) Any violation under RCW 9A.40.100(1)(a)(i)(A) (III) or (IV) or
(a)(i)(B);
(g) Any gross misdemeanor that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a
criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit an offense that is classified as a sex offense under RCW
9.94A.030 or this subsection;
(((g))) (h) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense for which
the person would be required to register as a sex offender while
residing in the state of conviction; or, if not required to register in
the state of conviction, an offense that under the laws of this state
would be classified as a sex offense under this subsection;
(((h))) (i) Any federal conviction classified as a sex offense
under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 16911 (SORNA);
(((i))) (j) Any military conviction for a sex offense. This
includes sex offenses under the uniform code of military justice, as
specified by the United States secretary of defense;
(((j))) (k) Any conviction in a foreign country for a sex offense
if it was obtained with sufficient safeguards for fundamental fairness
and due process for the accused under guidelines or regulations
established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 16912.
(11) "School" means a public or private school regulated under
Title 28A RCW or chapter 72.40 RCW.
(12) "Student" means a person who is enrolled, on a full-time or
part-time basis, in any school or institution of higher education.

--- END ---