BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The health care authority, department of
social and health services, and department of health shall collaborate
to identify goals and benchmarks while also developing individual
agency plans to reduce the incidence of diabetes in Washington, improve
diabetes care, and better control the medical complications and
financial impacts associated with diabetes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The health care authority, department of
social and health services, and department of health shall submit a
coordinated report to the governor and the appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 31, 2014, and every even-numbered year
thereafter, on the following:
(1) The financial impacts and reach diabetes of all types is having
on programs administered by the agency and individuals enrolled in
those programs. Items included in this assessment must include the
number of lives with diabetes impacted or covered by programs
administered by each agency, the number of lives with diabetes and
family members impacted by prevention and diabetes control programs
implemented by the agency, the financial toll or impact diabetes and
the complications it places on these programs, and the financial toll
or impact diabetes and its complications place on these programs;
(2) An assessment of the benefits of implemented and existing
programs and activities aimed at controlling diabetes and preventing
the disease. This assessment must also document the amount and source
for any funding directed to the agency for the programs and activities
aimed at reaching those with diabetes;
(3) A description of the level of coordination existing between the
agencies on activities, programmatic activities, and messaging on
managing, treating, or preventing all forms of diabetes and its
complications;
(4) A development or revision of detailed policy-related action
plans and budget recommendations for battling diabetes that includes a
range of actionable items for consideration by the legislature. The
plans must identify proposed action steps to reduce the impact of
diabetes, prediabetes, and related diabetes complications. The plan
must also identify expected outcomes of the action steps proposed in
the following biennium while also establishing benchmarks for
controlling and preventing relevant forms of diabetes; and
(5) An estimate of savings, efficiencies, costs, and budgetary
savings and resources required to implement the plan identified in
subsection (4) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---