BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.69.180 and 2009 c 350 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Taxing districts other than the state may levy a tax upon all
the taxable property within the district for the purpose of:
(((1))) (a) Funding refunds paid or to be paid under this chapter,
except for refunds under RCW 84.69.020(1), including interest, as
ordered by the county treasurer or county legislative authority within
the preceding twelve months; and
(((2))) (b) Reimbursing the taxing district for taxes abated
((under RCW 84.70.010)), offset by any supplemental tax within the
preceding twelve months. This subsection (((2))) (1)(b) only applies
to abatements that do not require a refund under this chapter.
Abatements that require a refund are included within the scope of (a)
of this subsection (((1) of this section)).
(2) Any amount received under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this
section does not reduce the levy authority of a taxing district.

--- END ---