BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.64.011 and 2009 c 549 s 1008 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, definitions of terms
shall be as indicated when used in this chapter.
(1) "Administer" means the direct application of a drug or device,
whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the
body of a patient or research subject.
(2) "Board" means the Washington state board of pharmacy.
(3) "Compounding" shall be the act of combining two or more
ingredients in the preparation of a prescription.
(4) "Controlled substance" means a drug or substance, or an
immediate precursor of such drug or substance, so designated under or
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 69.50 RCW.
(5) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or
attempted transfer from one person to another of a drug or device,
whether or not there is an agency relationship.
(6) "Department" means the department of health.
(7) "Device" means instruments, apparatus, and contrivances,
including their components, parts, and accessories, intended (a) for
use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of
disease in human beings or other animals, or (b) to affect the
structure or any function of the body of human beings or other animals.
(8) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order
for a drug, biological, or device and, pursuant to that prescription or
order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or
packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.
(9) "Distribute" means the delivery of a drug or device other than
by administering or dispensing.
(10) The words "drug" and "devices" shall not include surgical or
dental instruments or laboratory materials, gas and oxygen, therapy
equipment, X-ray apparatus or therapeutic equipment, their component
parts or accessories, or equipment, instruments, apparatus, or
contrivances used to render such articles effective in medical,
surgical, or dental treatment, or for use or consumption in or for
mechanical, industrial, manufacturing, or scientific applications or
purposes, nor shall the word "drug" include any article or mixture
covered by the Washington pesticide control act (chapter 15.58 RCW), as
enacted or hereafter amended, nor medicated feed intended for and used
exclusively as a feed for animals other than human beings.
(11) "Drugs" means:
(a) Articles recognized in the official United States pharmacopoeia
or the official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease in human beings or other animals;
(c) Substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure
or any function of the body of human beings or other animals; or
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any substances
specified in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, but not including
devices or their component parts or accessories.
(12) "Health care entity" means an organization that provides
health care services in a setting that is not otherwise licensed by the
state. Health care entity includes a freestanding outpatient surgery
center or a freestanding cardiac care center. It does not include an
individual practitioner's office or a multipractitioner clinic.
(13) "Labeling" shall mean the process of preparing and affixing a
label to any drug or device container. The label must include all
information required by current federal and state law and pharmacy
rules.
(14) "Legend drugs" means any drugs which are required by any
applicable federal or state law or regulation to be dispensed on
prescription only or are restricted to use by practitioners only.
(15) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation,
compounding, or processing of a drug or other substance or device or
the packaging or repackaging of such substance or device, or the
labeling or relabeling of the commercial container of such substance or
device, but does not include the activities of a practitioner who, as
an incident to his or her administration or dispensing such substance
or device in the course of his or her professional practice, prepares,
compounds, packages, or labels such substance or device. The term does
not include the compounding of medications for physician offices,
ambulatory surgical centers, or ambulatory surgical facilities to be
used by a physician for ophthalmic purposes for nonspecific patients.
(16) "Manufacturer" shall mean a person, corporation, or other
entity engaged in the manufacture of drugs or devices.
(17) "Master license system" means the mechanism established by
chapter 19.02 RCW by which master licenses, endorsed for individual
state-issued licenses, are issued and renewed utilizing a master
application and a master license expiration date common to each
renewable license endorsement.
(18) "Nonlegend" or "nonprescription" drugs means any drugs which
may be lawfully sold without a prescription.
(19) "Person" means an individual, corporation, government,
governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust,
partnership or association, or any other legal entity.
(20) "Pharmacist" means a person duly licensed by the Washington
state board of pharmacy to engage in the practice of pharmacy.
(21) "Pharmacy" means every place properly licensed by the board of
pharmacy where the practice of pharmacy is conducted.
(22) The word "poison" shall not include any article or mixture
covered by the Washington pesticide control act (chapter 15.58 RCW), as
enacted or hereafter amended.
(23) "Practice of pharmacy" includes the practice of and
responsibility for: Interpreting prescription orders; the compounding,
dispensing, labeling, administering, and distributing of drugs and
devices; the monitoring of drug therapy and use; the initiating or
modifying of drug therapy in accordance with written guidelines or
protocols previously established and approved for his or her practice
by a practitioner authorized to prescribe drugs; the participating in
drug utilization reviews and drug product selection; the proper and
safe storing and distributing of drugs and devices and maintenance of
proper records thereof; the providing of information on legend drugs
which may include, but is not limited to, the advising of therapeutic
values, hazards, and the uses of drugs and devices.
(24) "Practitioner" means a physician, dentist, veterinarian,
nurse, or other person duly authorized by law or rule in the state of
Washington to prescribe drugs.
(25) "Prescription" means an order for drugs or devices issued by
a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of
Washington to prescribe drugs or devices in the course of his or her
professional practice for a legitimate medical purpose.
(26) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(27) "Wholesaler" shall mean a corporation, individual, or other
entity which buys drugs or devices for resale and distribution to
corporations, individuals, or entities other than consumers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall adopt rules to authorize the compounding of
medications for physician offices and ambulatory surgical centers or
ambulatory surgical facilities to be used by a physician for ophthalmic
purposes for nonspecific patients. The rules must establish limits on
the quantities that may be made available to the physician office,
ambulatory surgical center, or ambulatory surgical facility and
requirements to record the dispensing of the compounded medication,
including the identity of patients and the amount dispensed, and to
submit the records to the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---