BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person, firm, or corporation proposing a bid for the
construction or improvement of any state highway or any other project
for the department, in response to a call for bids, must disclose in
the bid proposal any circumstances where the person, firm, or
corporation or any affiliated person, firm, or corporation would
potentially benefit from any portion of any other contract with the
department that is reasonably related to the construction or
improvement of any state highway or any other project for the
department upon which the person, firm, or corporation is proposing a
bid.
(2) Whenever any contract for the construction or improvement of
any state highway or any other project for the department is dependent
upon work performed pursuant to another contract with the department,
the department must ensure that the liquidated damages provisions of
the related contracts prevent any person, firm, or corporation with a
financial interest in two or more contracts from receiving liquidated
damages under a contract or contracts that are more than the person,
firm, or corporation is required to pay under another contract or
contracts in the event that payments are required under two or more
liquidated damages provisions in related contracts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---