BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A general authority Washington law enforcement agency shall
reimburse a peace officer's training agency for any training, salary,
and benefits received by the peace officer while he or she was enrolled
in basic law enforcement training, if the law enforcement agency hires
the respective peace officer within five years of the peace officer's
completion of basic law enforcement training. The hiring law
enforcement agency shall reimburse the training agency within ninety
days of the peace officer's first day of employment based on the
following reimbursement amounts: (a) The training agency shall be
reimbursed for one hundred percent of the total amount of salary,
benefits, and any training received by the peace officer if the peace
officer was hired by the law enforcement agency within one year or less
of the peace officer's completion of the basic law enforcement
training; (b) the training agency shall be reimbursed for eighty
percent of the total amount of salary, benefits, and any training
received by the peace officer if the peace officer was hired by the law
enforcement agency within one year plus one day but no more than two
years of the peace officer's completion of the basic law enforcement
training; (c) the training agency shall be reimbursed for sixty percent
of the total amount of salary, benefits, and any training received by
the peace officer if the peace officer was hired by the law enforcement
agency within two years plus one day but no more than three years of
the peace officer's completion of the basic law enforcement training;
(d) the training agency shall be reimbursed for forty percent of the
total amount of salary, benefits, and any training received by the
peace officer if the peace officer was hired by the law enforcement
agency within three years plus one day but no more than four years of
the peace officer's completion of the basic law enforcement training;
(e) the training agency shall be reimbursed for twenty percent of the
total amount of salary, benefits, and any training received by the
peace officer if the peace officer was hired by the law enforcement
agency within four years plus one day but no more than five years of
the peace officer's completion of the basic law enforcement training;
and (f) no reimbursement shall be required to be provided to the
training agency if the peace officer was hired by the law enforcement
agency more than five years after the peace officer's completion of the
basic law enforcement training.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "training agency" means a law
enforcement agency that: (a) Pays salary and any benefits to a peace
officer while he or she is enrolled in basic law enforcement training;
(b) pays any percentage of training for a peace officer along with any
necessary facilities, supplies, materials, and room and board of
noncommuting attendees pursuant to RCW 43.101.200; (c) has ten or less
full-time commissioned peace officers; or (d) pays a salary of one
hundred fifty dollars or less per month than the hiring law enforcement
agency that has employed the respective peace officer. A "training
agency" does not include the Washington state criminal justice training
commission.

--- END ---