BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16A.130 and 2010 c 161 s 429 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall notify motor vehicle owners of the
liability insurance requirements described in RCW 46.30.020 through
46.30.040 at the time of issuance of an original motor vehicle
registration and when the department sends a motor vehicle registration
renewal notice.
(2) When the department sends a vehicle registration renewal notice
to a registered owner who has previously failed to respond to a random
sampling program request under section 3 of this act, the department
must also provide notice of the requirement for proof of meeting the
financial responsibility requirements and payment of the fifty dollar
penalty imposed under section 3 of this act in order to renew the
vehicle registration.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16A.110 and 2010 c 161 s 428 and 2010 c 8 s 9012
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A registered owner or the registered owner's authorized
representative must apply for a renewal vehicle registration to the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director on a form approved by the director. The application for a
renewal vehicle registration must be accompanied by a draft, money
order, certified bank check, or cash for all fees and taxes required by
law for the application for a renewal vehicle registration.
(2) An application and the fees and taxes for a renewal vehicle
registration must be handled in the same manner as an original vehicle
registration application. The registration does not need to show the
name of the lien holder when the application for renewal vehicle
registration becomes the renewal registration upon validation.
(3) A person expecting to be out of state during the normal renewal
period of a vehicle registration may renew a vehicle registration and
have license plates or tabs preissued by applying for a renewal as
described in subsection (1) of this section. A vehicle registration
may be renewed for the subsequent registration year up to eighteen
months before the current expiration date and must be displayed from
the date of issue or from the day of the expiration of the current
registration year, whichever date is later.
(4) Every applicant for a renewal vehicle registration due on or
after January 1, 2014, who has previously failed to respond to a random
sampling program request under section 3 of this act, must provide
current proof of financial responsibility to operate a vehicle as
required in RCW 46.30.020 and pay the fifty dollar penalty imposed
under section 3 of this act. The department may adopt rules regarding
valid proof of financial responsibility for persons renewing a vehicle
registration and establish conditions under which the penalty imposed
under section 3 of this act will not be assessed when a failure to
respond to a random sampling request is beyond the control of the
applicant. Conditions for not assessing the penalty may include, but
are not limited to, delays caused by extended hospitalization or
illness of the applicant.
(5) An application for a renewal vehicle registration is not
required for those vehicles owned, rented, or leased by:
(a) The state of Washington, or by any county, city, town, school
district, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington; or
(b) A governing body of an Indian tribe located within this state
and recognized as a governmental entity by the United States department
of the interior.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.29 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a random sampling program to
determine if registered vehicle owners meet the financial
responsibility requirements to operate a vehicle as required in RCW
46.30.020.
(2) The department shall select no more than three percent of
registered vehicles per year in monthly increments and send the
registered owner of each vehicle selected a form requesting that the
owner provide proof of financial responsibility to operate a vehicle as
required in RCW 46.30.020 for a randomly selected date during the last
registration period.
(3) If the registered owner fails to provide proof of financial
responsibility to operate a vehicle as required in RCW 46.30.020, as
requested by the department, within forty-five days of the date shown
on the request, the registered owner must be assessed a penalty of
fifty dollars to be collected before the registered owner may renew the
vehicle registration.
(4) The department shall administer and collect the fifty dollar
penalty. The department shall deduct an amount equal to the
administration and collection expenses. The department shall deposit
any remaining proceeds under this subsection to the financial
responsibility education account created in section 4 of this act for
use in public information campaigns to educate the public regarding the
financial responsibility requirements under this chapter and chapter
46.30 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.29 RCW
to read as follows:
The financial responsibility education account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. After the deduction of administration
and collection expenses incurred by the department, all receipts from
the fifty dollar penalty imposed under section 3 of this act must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for public information campaigns to educate the public regarding
the financial responsibility requirements under this chapter and
chapter 46.30 RCW. Only the director of the department of licensing or
the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.30.040 and 1991 sp.s. c 25 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who knowingly provides false evidence of financial
responsibility to a law enforcement officer ((or)), to a court, or to
the department of licensing on an application for renewal of a vehicle
registration, including an expired or canceled insurance policy, bond,
or certificate of deposit is guilty of a misdemeanor.

--- END ---