BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.007 and 2010 c 161 s 1105 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Veteran" includes every person, who at the time he or she seeks
the benefits of RCW 46.18.212, 46.18.235, 72.36.030, 41.04.010,
73.04.090, ((73.08.010, 73.08.070, 73.08.080,)) or 43.180.250 has
received an honorable discharge or received a discharge for medical
reasons with an honorable record, where applicable, and who has served
in at least one of the following capacities:
(1) As a member in any branch of the armed forces of the United
States, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, and has
fulfilled his or her initial military service obligation;
(2) As a member of the women's air forces service pilots;
(3) As a member of the armed forces reserves, national guard, or
coast guard, and has been called into federal service by a presidential
select reserve call up for at least one hundred eighty cumulative days;
(4) As a civil service crewmember with service aboard a U.S. army
transport service or U.S. naval transportation service vessel in
oceangoing service from December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946;
(5) As a member of the Philippine armed forces/scouts during the
period of armed conflict from December 7, 1941, through August 15,
1945; or
(6) A United States documented merchant mariner with service aboard
an oceangoing vessel operated by the department of defense, or its
agents, from both June 25, 1950, through July 27, 1953, in Korean
territorial waters and from August 5, 1964, through May 7, 1975, in
Vietnam territorial waters, and who received a military commendation.

Sec. 2 RCW 73.08.005 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 36 s 17 are each
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Direct costs" includes those allowable costs that can be
readily assigned to the statutory objectives of this chapter,
consistent with the cost principles promulgated by the federal office
of management and budget in circular No. A-87, dated May 10, 2004.
(2) "Family" means the spouse or domestic partner, surviving
spouse, surviving domestic partner, and dependent children of a living
or deceased veteran.
(3) "Indigent" means a person who is defined as such by the county
legislative authority using one or more of the following definitions:
(a) Receiving one of the following types of public assistance:
Temporary assistance for needy families, aged, blind, or disabled
assistance benefits, pregnant women assistance benefits, poverty-related veterans' benefits, food stamps or food stamp benefits
transferred electronically, refugee resettlement benefits, medicaid,
medical care services, or supplemental security income;
(b) Receiving an annual income, after taxes, of up to one hundred
fifty percent or less of the current federally established poverty
level, or receiving an annual income not exceeding a higher qualifying
income established by the county legislative authority; or
(c) Unable to pay reasonable costs for shelter, food, utilities,
and transportation because his or her available funds are insufficient.
(4) "Indirect costs" includes those allowable costs that are
generally associated with carrying out the statutory objectives of this
chapter, but the identification and tracking of those costs cannot be
readily assigned to a specific statutory objective without an
accounting effort that is disproportionate to the benefit received. A
county legislative authority may allocate allowable indirect costs to
its veterans' assistance fund if it is accomplished in a manner
consistent with the cost principles promulgated by the federal office
of management and budget in circular No. A-87, dated May 10, 2004.
(5) "Veteran" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 41.04.005 and
41.04.007, and ((includes a current member of the national guard or
armed forces reserves who has been deployed to serve in an armed
conflict)) in addition may include, at the discretion of the county
legislative authority and in consultation with the veterans' advisory
board, any other person who at the time he or she seeks the benefits of
RCW 73.08.010, 73.08.070, and 73.08.080:
(a) Has received a general discharge under honorable conditions; or
(b) Has received a medical or physical discharge with an honorable
record.
(6) "Veterans' advisory board" means a board established by a
county legislative authority under the authority of RCW 73.08.035.
(7) "Veterans' assistance fund" means an account in the custody of
the county auditor, or the chief financial officer in a county
operating under a charter, that is funded by taxes levied under the
authority of RCW 73.08.080.
(8) "Veterans' assistance program" means a program approved by the
county legislative authority under the authority of RCW 73.08.010 that
is fully or partially funded by the veterans' assistance fund
authorized by RCW 73.08.080.

--- END ---