BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may not sell, furnish, give away, or offer to sell,
furnish, or give away an energy drink to a person who is less than
eighteen years old.
(2) A person who violates this section commits a civil infraction.
The monetary penalty for the first violation of subsection (1) of this
section may not exceed fifty dollars. The monetary penalty for the
second violation of subsection (1) of this section may not exceed one
hundred dollars. The monetary penalty for having violated subsection
(1) of this section three or more times may not exceed five hundred
dollars for each violation.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "energy drink" means a soft
drink that contains eighty milligrams or more of caffeine per nine
fluid ounces and contains methylxanthines, B vitamins, or herbal
ingredients.

--- END ---