BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon finding one ounce or less of marijuana inadvertently left at
a retail store holding a pharmacy license, the store manager or
employee must promptly notify the local law enforcement agency. After
notification to the local law enforcement agency, the store manager or
employee must properly dispose of the marijuana.

--- END ---