BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Decisions listed in subsection (2) of this section are subject
to the requirements of RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c) pertaining to cultural
resources in effect as of July 1, 2012, unless the branch of government
has:
(a) A data-sharing agreement with the department of archaeology and
historic preservation;
(b) Either a local ordinance protecting archaeological and historic
properties or a cultural resource management plan approved by the
department of archaeology and historic preservation; and
(c) A written consultation agreement approved by affected federally
recognized tribes.
(2) This section applies to decisions pertaining to proposed
actions that were subject to the requirements of RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c)
as of July 1, 2012, but made exempt from the requirements:
(a) Through rule making conducted pursuant to section 301, chapter
1, Laws of 2012 1st sp. sess.;
(b) Pursuant to section 304(1)(a)(iii), chapter 1, Laws of 2012 1st
sp. sess. (codified as RCW 43.21C.229(1)(a)(iii));
(c) Pursuant to section 307, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 1st sp. sess.
(codified as RCW 43.21C.450); or
(d) Pursuant to other statutes enacted or rules adopted on or after
July 1, 2012.

--- END ---