BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.545 and 2006 c 265 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of early learning shall:
(1) Work in conjunction with the statewide child care resource and
referral network as well as local governments, nonprofit organizations,
businesses, and community child care advocates to create local child
care resource and referral organizations. These organizations may
carry out needs assessments, resource development, provider training,
technical assistance, and parent information and training;
(2) Actively seek public and private money for distribution as
grants to the statewide child care resource and referral network and to
existing or potential local child care resource and referral
organizations;
(3) Adopt rules allowing parents who receive working connections
child care benefits the option of making a supplemental payment to fund
any difference between the child care provider's private rate and the
state maximum rate for the following:
(a) Child care;
(b) Registration fees; or
(c) Field trips;
(4) Adopt rules regarding the application for and distribution of
grants to local child care resource and referral organizations. The
rules shall, at a minimum, require an applicant to submit a plan for
achieving the following objectives:
(a) Provide parents with information about child care resources,
including location of services and subsidies;
(b) Carry out child care provider recruitment and training
programs, including training under RCW 74.25.040;
(c) Offer support services, such as parent and provider seminars,
toy-lending libraries, and substitute banks;
(d) Provide information for businesses regarding child care supply
and demand;
(e) Advocate for increased public and private sector resources
devoted to child care;
(f) Provide technical assistance to employers regarding employee
child care services; and
(g) Serve recipients of temporary assistance for needy families and
working parents with incomes at or below household incomes of one
hundred seventy-five percent of the federal poverty line;
(((4))) (5) Provide staff support and technical assistance to the
statewide child care resource and referral network and local child care
resource and referral organizations;
(((5))) (6) Maintain a statewide child care licensing data bank and
work with department licensors to provide information to local child
care resource and referral organizations about licensed child care
providers in the state;
(((6))) (7) Through the statewide child care resource and referral
network and local resource and referral organizations, compile data
about local child care needs and availability for future planning and
development;
(((7))) (8) Coordinate with the statewide child care resource and
referral network and local child care resource and referral
organizations for the provision of training and technical assistance to
child care providers; and
(((8))) (9) Collect and assemble information regarding the
availability of insurance and of federal and other child care funding
to assist state and local agencies, businesses, and other child care
providers in offering child care services.

--- END ---