BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.335
RCW to read as follows:
Every school district board of directors shall require each school
to have at least one silent alarm located in its administrative
offices. The alarm may be located under the desk of a secretary,
principal, or other administrative employee. The alarm must alert
local police directly that a law enforcement response is necessary at
the school.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.335.010 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.102 are each
amended to read as follows:
Every board of directors, unless otherwise specifically provided by
law, shall:
(1) Cause all school buildings to be properly heated, lighted and
ventilated and maintained in a clean and sanitary condition; ((and))
(2) Maintain and repair, furnish and insure such school buildings;
(3) Require all school buildings when constructed or remodeled to
contain a mechanism by which the exterior building doors of the school
may be electronically locked from the administrative offices of the
school; and
(4) Require all school buildings, when constructed or anytime a
school construction project qualifies for a major renewal project under
the state's school construction assistance program, to be designed or
updated in such a way as to:
(a) Restrict the general public from entering the school through
the administrative offices; and
(b) Electronically lock administrative office doors to prohibit
access to the rest of the school building.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.335
RCW to read as follows:
When appropriations are made for state assistance for school
construction, the appropriations must include the sum of five million
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for the purposes of section 1 of
this act.

--- END ---