BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,322,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,133,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,011,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,466,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A maximum of $16,056,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and $14,875,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 is for state agency
operations.
(a) $9,692,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $8,169,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(i) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(a), the
superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of
four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the
civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans
civic education award.
(ii) By January 1, 2012, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall issue a report to the legislature with a timeline and
an estimate of costs for implementation of the common core standards.
The report must incorporate feedback from an open public forum for
recommendations to enhance the standards, particularly in math.
(iii) Within the amounts provided, and in consultation with the
public school employees of Washington and the Washington school
counselors' association, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop a model policy that further defines the
recommended roles and responsibilities of graduation coaches and
identifies best practices for how graduation coaches work in
coordination with school counselors and in the context of a
comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
(iv) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall,
no later than August 1, 2011, establish a standard statewide definition
of unexcused absence. The definition shall be reported to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives for
legislative review in the 2012 legislative session. Beginning no later
than January 1, 2012, districts shall report to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, daily student unexcused absence
data by school.
(b) $1,964,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,017,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for activities associated with the
implementation of new school finance systems required by chapter 236,
Laws of 2010 (K-12 education funding) and chapter 548, Laws of 2009
(state's education system), including technical staff, systems
reprogramming, and work group deliberations, including the quality
education council and the data governance working group.
(c) $851,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $851,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities.
(d) $1,744,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,387,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to the professional educator
standards board for the following:
(i) $1,050,000 in fiscal year 2012 and $1,050,000 in fiscal year
2013 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional
educator standards board; ((and))
(ii) $694,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $312,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are for conditional scholarship loans and mentor
stipends provided through the alternative routes to certification
program administered by the professional educator standards board,
including the pipeline for paraeducators program and the retooling to
teach conditional loan programs. Funding within this subsection
(1)(d)(ii) is also provided for the recruiting Washington teachers
program. Funding reductions in this subsection (1)(d)(ii) in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium are intended to be one-time; and
(iii) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the professional educator standards
board to develop educator interpreter standards and identify
interpreter assessments that are available to school districts.
Interpreter assessments should meet the following criteria: (A)
Include both written assessment and performance assessment; (B) be
offered by a national organization of professional sign language
interpreters and transliterators; and (C) be designed to assess
performance in more than one sign system or sign language. The board
shall establish a performance standard, defining what constitutes a
minimum assessment result, for each educational interpreter assessment
identified. The board shall publicize the standards and assessments
for school district use.
(e) $133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil
rights.
(f) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the ongoing work of the
education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.
(g) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on educational
opportunity for military children).
(h) $159,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
185, Laws of 2011 (bullying prevention), which requires the office of
the superintendent of public instruction to convene an ongoing work
group on school bullying and harassment prevention. Within the amounts
provided, $140,000 is for youth suicide prevention activities.
(i) $1,227,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,227,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive
data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including
development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and
research system (CEDARS).
(j) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for project citizen, a program
sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and the
center for civic education to promote participation in government by
middle school students.
(k) $166,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 192,
Laws of 2011 (school district insolvency). Funding is provided to
develop a clear legal framework and process for dissolution of a school
district.
(l) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2799
(collaborative schools). If such legislation is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(m) $128,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 2254
(foster care outcomes). The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall report on the implementation of the state's plan of
cross-system collaboration to promote educational stability and improve
education outcomes of foster youth. The first report is due December
1, 2012, and annually thereafter through 2015. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(n) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2337
(open K-12 education resources). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $9,267,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $12,267,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are for statewide programs.

(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) $2,541,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,541,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a corps of nurses located at
educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of
public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to
provide direct care to students, health education, and training for
school staff.
(ii) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a nonviolence and leadership
training program provided by the institute for community leadership.

(b) TECHNOLOGY
$1,221,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2012 and $1,221,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network
technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and
avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and
video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be
used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the
network.

(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers
scholarship program. The funds shall be used to support community
involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer
mentors with students selected as achievers scholars.
(ii) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for contracting with a college
scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach to
students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound
scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007.
(iii) $2,808,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $2,808,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the
dissemination of the navigation 101 curriculum to all districts. The
funding shall support electronic student planning tools and software
for analyzing the impact of navigation 101 on student performance, as
well as grants to a maximum of one hundred school districts each year,
based on progress and need for the implementation of the navigation 101
program. The implementation grants shall be awarded to a cross-section
of school districts reflecting a balance of geographic and demographic
characteristics. Within the amounts provided, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction will create a navigation 101
accountability model to analyze the impact of the program.
(iv) $337,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $337,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for implementation of the building
bridges statewide program for comprehensive dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement strategies.
(v) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for dropout prevention programs at
the office of the superintendent of public instruction, including the
jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program.
(vi) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
340, Laws of 2011 (assessment of students in state-funded full-day
kindergarten classrooms), including the development and implementation
of the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills (WaKIDS).
Of the amounts in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the fiscal year 2013
appropriation is for the implementation of House Bill No. 2586
(kindergarten inventory). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012,
this amount shall lapse.
(vii) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for an urban school turnaround
initiative as follows:
(A) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
select two schools in the largest urban school district in the state.
The selected schools shall be among the state's lowest-performing
schools; be located within the same community and form a continuum of
education for the students in that community; have significant
educational achievement gaps; and include a mix of elementary, middle,
or high schools.
(B) The office shall allocate the funds under this subsection
(2)(c)(vii) to the school district to be used exclusively in the
selected schools. The district may not charge an overhead or indirect
fee for the allocated funds or supplant other state, federal, or local
funds in the selected schools. The school district shall use the funds
for intensive supplemental instruction, services, and materials in the
selected schools ((in the 2012-13 school year)), including but not
limited to professional development for school staff; updated
curriculum, materials, and technology; extended learning opportunities
for students; reduced class size; summer enrichment activities;
school-based health clinics; and other research-based initiatives to
dramatically turn around the performance and close the achievement gap
in the schools. The office shall enter into an expenditure agreement
with the school district under which any funds under this subsection
(2)(c)(vii) remaining unspent on August 31, 2015, shall be returned to
the state. Priorities for the expenditure of the funds shall be
determined by the leadership and staff of each school.
(C) The office shall monitor the activities in the selected schools
and the expenditure of funds to ensure the intent of this subsection
(2)(c)(vii) is met, and submit a report to the legislature by December
1, 2013, including outcomes resulting from the urban school turnaround
initiative. The report submitted to the legislature must include a
comparison of student learning achievement in the selected schools with
schools of comparable demographics that have not participated in the
grant program.
(D) Funding provided in this subsection (2)(c)(vii) is intended to
be one-time.
(viii) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely to subsidize advanced placement exam fees
and international baccalaureate class fees and exam fees for low-income
students. To be eligible for the subsidy, a student must be either
enrolled or eligible to participate in the federal free or reduced
price lunch program, and the student must have maximized the allowable
federal contribution. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall set the subsidy in an amount so that the advanced
placement exam fee does not exceed $15.00 and the combined class and
exam fee for the international baccalaureate does not exceed $14.50.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---