BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington state
must review and recommend certification of local plans developed by
regional transportation planning organizations based on meeting federal
requirements. Currently, each regional transportation planning
organization must submit to the state an updated plan that includes
coordination elements, consistent with federal planning requirements.
In addition to federal planning requirements, transportation systems
for persons with special transportation needs should be operated as
efficiently as possible. Programs established by the legislature to
assist persons with special transportation needs should be accessed
with as much efficiency and coordination as possible.
The legislature further finds that the transportation needs of each
community are unique, and that transportation services may be improved
by establishing a system of statewide oversight that seeks input,
collaboration, and cooperation from and among all local service
providers, including public agencies, private organizations, and
community-based groups.
It is the intent of the legislature that public transportation
agencies, pupil transportation programs, private nonprofit
transportation providers, and other public agencies sponsoring programs
that require transportation services coordinate those transportation
services. Through coordination of transportation services, programs
will achieve increased efficiencies and will be able to provide more
rides to a greater number of persons with special transportation needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Persons with special transportation needs" means those
persons, including their personal attendants, who because of physical
or mental disability, income status, or age are unable to transport
themselves or purchase transportation.
(2) "Special needs coordinated transportation" is transportation
for persons with special transportation needs that is developed through
a collaborative community process involving: Transportation providers;
human service programs and agencies; consumers; social, educational,
and health service providers; employer and business representatives;
employees and employee representatives; and other affected parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The agency council on coordinated
transportation is created. The purpose of the council is to advance
and improve accessibility to and coordination of special needs
transportation services statewide. The council is composed of fourteen
voting members, four nonvoting, legislative members, and such other
nonvoting members as may be determined by the council.
(2) The fifteen voting members are the superintendent of public
instruction or a designee, the secretary of social and health services
or a designee, the secretary of transportation or a designee, the
director of the health care authority or a designee, and eleven members
appointed by the governor as follows:
(a) One representative from the office of the governor;
(b) Three persons who are consumers of special needs transportation
services, which must include:
(i) One person designated by the executive director of the
governor's committee on disability issues and employment; and
(ii) One person who is designated by the executive director of the
developmental disabilities council;
(c) One representative from the Washington association of pupil
transportation;
(d) One representative from the Washington state transit
association;
(e) One of the following:
(i) A representative from the community transportation association
of the Northwest; or
(ii) A representative from the community action council
association;
(f) One person who represents regional transportation planning
organizations and metropolitan planning organizations;
(g) One representative of brokers who provide nonemergency,
medically necessary trips to persons with special transportation needs
under the medicaid program administered by the health care authority;
(h) One representative from the Washington state department of
veterans affairs; and
(i) One representative of the state association of counties.
(3) The four nonvoting members are legislators as follows:
(a) Two members from the house of representatives, one from each of
the two largest caucuses, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, including at least one member from the house of
representatives transportation committee or the house of
representatives appropriations committee; and
(b) Two members from the senate, one from each of the two largest
caucuses, appointed by the president of the senate, including at least
one member from the senate transportation committee or the senate ways
and means committee.
(4) Gubernatorial appointees of the council must serve two-year
terms. Members may not receive compensation for their service on the
council, but must be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses
incurred in performing their duties as members as set forth in RCW
43.03.220.
(5) The council must vote on an annual basis to elect one of its
voting members to serve as chair. The position of chair must rotate
among the represented agencies, associations, and interest groups at
least every two years. If the position of chair is vacated for any
reason, the secretary of transportation or the secretary's designee
must serve as acting chair until the next regular meeting of the
council, at which time the members will elect a chair.
(6) The council must periodically assess its membership to ensure
that there exists a balanced representation of persons with special
transportation needs and providers of special transportation needs
services. Recommendations for modifying the membership of the council
must be included in the council's biennial report to the legislature as
provided in section 6 of this act.
(7) The department shall provide necessary staff support for the
council as resources allow.
(8) The council may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from
public or private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the council and
spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income from the public or private
sources according to their terms, unless the receipt of the gifts,
grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17A.560.
(9) The meetings of the council must be open to the public, with
the agenda published in advance, and minutes kept and made available to
the public. The public notice of the meetings must indicate that
accommodations for persons with disabilities will be made available
upon request.
(10) All meetings of the council must be held in locations that are
readily accessible to public transportation, and must be scheduled for
times when public transportation is available.
(11) The council must make an effort to include presentations by
and work sessions including persons with special transportation needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) To assure implementation of an effective
system of coordinated transportation that meets the needs of persons
with special transportation needs, the agency council on coordinated
transportation must adopt a biennial work plan that must, at a minimum:
(a) Focus on projects that identify and address barriers in laws,
policies, and procedures;
(b) Focus on results;
(c) Identify and advocate for transportation system improvements
for persons with special transportation needs; and
(d) Focus on projects that the members of the council are willing
to donate time to, with an emphasis on projects that involve:
(i) Coordinated human services transportation plans;
(ii) Cost and ride sharing;
(iii) Performance measures;
(iv) Mobility management; and
(v) Addressing underserved populations.
(2) The council must, as necessary, convene work groups at the
state, regional, or local level to develop and implement coordinated
approaches to special needs transportation.
(3) To improve the service experienced by persons with special
transportation needs, the council must develop statewide guidelines for
customer complaint processes so that information about policies
regarding the complaint processes is available consistently and
consumers are appropriately educated about available options. To be
eligible for funding on or after January 1, 2008, organizations
applying for state paratransit/special needs grants as described in
section 226(1), chapter 370, Laws of 2006 must implement a process
following the guidelines established by the council.
(4) The council must represent the needs and interests of persons
with special transportation needs in statewide efforts for emergency
and disaster preparedness planning by advising the emergency management
council on how to address transportation needs for high-risk
individuals during and after disasters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The agency council on coordinated
transportation must review and recommend certification of local plans
developed by regional transportation planning organizations based on
meeting federal requirements. Each regional transportation planning
organization must submit to the council an updated plan that includes
the elements, consistent with federal planning requirements, identified
by the council beginning July 1, 2014, and every four years thereafter.
Each regional transportation planning organization must submit to
the council every two years a prioritized regional human service and
transportation project list.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Based on the biennial work plan adopted by
the council pursuant to section 4 of this act and the available
resources of the members, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the
agency council on coordinated transportation must submit a progress
report to the legislature by December 1, 2015, and every other year
thereafter. The report must describe the council's progress in
achieving its objectives and in attaining the applicable goals
identified in the council's biennial work plan and highlight any
problems encountered in achieving these goals. The information will
also be reported in a form established by the council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

--- END ---