BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The number of foreign language speakers has substantially
increased in Washington's public schools over the last decade. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction reports that nine
percent of the state's total student population was enrolled in the
transitional bilingual instruction program as of May 2013, and more
than two hundred different languages are spoken in students' homes.
(2) Access to education-related information and communication in a
language they can understand helps limited English proficient parents
and guardians make informed decisions regarding their children's
academic future. Greater participation and involvement by parents and
families prevents students from dropping out of school, increases the
likelihood of student success in school, and contributes to closing the
educational opportunity gap.
(3) The office of the education ombuds reports an increased number
of complaints from English language learner students and limited
English proficient parents regarding lack of provision of accurate and
reliable interpretation and translation services for parents, as well
as having children act as interpreters during parent meetings.
(4) There are no certification programs in the state specifically
for K-12 education language interpreters, that is, bilingual adults who
are proficient in educational terminology, interpretation, and
translation. The lack of qualified individuals causes public schools
to use untrained bilingual adults or students themselves as
interpreters for school meetings with limited English proficient
parents. This practice creates an unfair disadvantage for English
language learner students as their parents might not receive accurate,
reliable information. Use of students in place of qualified adult
interpreters also places undue burdens on young children who may not
yet be fully proficient in either their native language or in English,
and undermines parental authority.
(5) Federal laws pertaining to the elementary and secondary
education act, civil rights, antidiscrimination, and migrant and
bilingual education, as well as state education laws and rules, affirm
the rights of parents of public school students to have access, as
practicable, to education-related information in a language they can
understand.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, by
June 1, 2015, the Washington state school directors' association,
together with the office of the education ombuds, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, and representatives of the
educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee,
parents with diverse cultural and linguistic backgrounds, and
interested education associations, must develop a model language access
policy and procedure for adoption by school districts.
(2) At a minimum, the policy and procedure must:
(a) Be aligned with federal and state laws pertaining to the rights
of parents and legal guardians of public school students to language
access; and
(b) Require use of adult language interpreters, not students, for
school meetings with limited English proficient parents and legal
guardians about high-stakes educational situations.
(3) The work group convened under subsection (1) of this section
shall compile a list of guidelines, local and national best practices,
community resources, interpretation and translation contractual
services available in the state, and electronic and telephonic services
available for the provision of both oral interpretation and translation
of written communications for limited English proficient individuals.
The list must be made available through electronic means by September
1, 2015, and updated annually by the Washington state school directors'
association, the office of the education ombuds, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, and the educational opportunity
gap oversight and accountability committee.
(4) The work group convened under subsection (1) of this section
shall also establish a definition of "high-stakes educational
situations" for use in the model language access policy and procedure.
In reviewing potential high-stakes educational situations, the work
group shall take into consideration discussions of academic progress or
academic deficiencies, health and safety, and disciplinary matters.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "language interpreter" means
a bilingual or multilingual individual who provides oral or written
language interpretation for others.
(6) By August 1, 2016, each school district board of directors
must, at a minimum, adopt the model language access policy and
procedure developed under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2014, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---