BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that every year significant public and
private infrastructure investments are made in Washington for the
purposes of energy, information networks, water, sewer, and
transportation. These investments are critical to contributing towards
the nation's economic and national security interests, connecting
regions, achieving long-term global competitiveness, and creating equal
access to economic opportunity for all the state's citizens.
(2) The legislature further finds that the public and private
investments may not be coordinated such that they provide maximum
efficiency and effectiveness, and that access to a broader array of
information would enable the state to make and manage more informed
investment decisions.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to direct the use of
available maps and available data for the creation and use of digital
cross-system infrastructure maps to inform and develop state priorities
around economic development and make investment decisions that allow
Washington's critical infrastructure to support both state and national
interests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state energy office and broadband office of the department,
the public works board, and the community economic revitalization
board, in collaboration with the department of transportation and
department of natural resources, and in consultation with other
agencies and organizations with expertise in energy, information
networks, water, sewer, and transportation, must:
(a) Develop one or more digital layered maps that within economic
corridors identify:
(i) Major power facilities and energy infrastructure sites;
(ii) Broadband availability;
(iii) Water and sewer infrastructure; and
(iv) Rail corridors, public highways including waterways, and
ports;
(b) Leverage and use available maps, available data, Washington's
adopted geographic information systems mapping standards, enterprise
infrastructure, web services, and applications, where appropriate; and
(c) Use commercially available, off-the-shelf software for the
creation of the maps that meet the following conditions:
(i) The map scale must not allow displays closer than 1:24,000;
(ii) The economic corridors may only identify energy,
transportation, water, sewer, and broadband services;
(iii) No geographical coordinates of any features or physical
facilities associated with the infrastructure may be identified; and
(iv) Information exempt from disclosure under RCW 42.56.420,
including through order or agreement, must not be included.
(2) The department and department of transportation must analyze
the maps to identify:
(a) Gaps in infrastructure, including missing, aged and substandard
infrastructure, corresponding with economic corridors; and
(b) Priority areas for future investment, based on the ability of
the infrastructure to meet the needs of local economies to compete in
the regional and global marketplace.
(3) The department and department of transportation must jointly
report to the legislature by January 1st of each year, beginning on
January 1, 2014, with the infrastructure gaps and investment
recommendations.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.330.010 and 2011 c 286 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Associate development organization" means a local economic
development nonprofit corporation that is broadly representative of
community interests.
(2) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of commerce.
(4) "Energy" has the definition in RCW 43.21F.025.
(5) "Financial institution" means a bank, trust company, mutual
savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union authorized
to do business in this state under state or federal law.
(((5))) (6) "Microenterprise development organization" means a
community development corporation, a nonprofit development
organization, a nonprofit social services organization or other locally
operated nonprofit entity that provides services to low-income
entrepreneurs.
(((6))) (7) "Small business" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 39.29.006.
(((7))) (8) "Statewide microenterprise association" means a
nonprofit entity with microenterprise development organizations as
members that serves as an intermediary between the department of
commerce and local microenterprise development organizations.

--- END ---