BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.50.902 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The college board, in consultation with business, industry,
labor, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the
department of commerce, the employment security department, the council
of presidents, and ((community and technical colleges)) institutions of
higher education, shall designate centers of excellence and allocate
funds to existing and new centers of excellence ((based)) on a
competitive basis.
(2) Eligible applicants for the program established under this
section include community and technical colleges. Priority shall be
given to applicants that have an established education and training
program serving the targeted industry, have networked effectively with
both secondary and baccalaureate institutions on developing a talent
pipeline for the targeted industry, and that have in their home
district or region an industry cluster with the same targeted industry
at its core.
(3) It is the role of centers of excellence to ((employ
strategies)) be central sources of information regarding education and
training services available to meet the needs of strategic industry
sectors and enhance the careers of students in these sectors, and to be
a communication conduit to Washington's education system about industry
trends, in order to:
(a) Build a diverse, competitive workforce for strategic
industries;
(b) Serve as one-stop sources of information for employers
regarding education and training programs that prepare workers for
strategic industries;
(c) Serve as an information entry point for prospective students
and job seekers regarding education, training, and employment in
strategic industries;
(d) Engage employer and labor representatives from strategic
industries in identifying industry needs for a skilled and educated
workforce and student needs for sustainable career growth, and in
developing and implementing action plans that address those needs;
(e) Create educational efficiencies;
(((b) Build a diverse, competitive workforce for strategic
industries;
(c))) (f) Maintain an institutional reputation for innovation and
responsiveness;
(((d))) (g) Develop innovative curriculum and means of delivering
education and training;
(((e))) (h) Identify industry skill standards and industry-based
certifications;
(i) Facilitate the creation of model programs of study that are
secondary and postsecondary sequences of education and training that
prepare students for careers in strategic industries;
(j) Act as brokers of information and resources related to
((community and technical college)) education and training and
assistance available for firms in a targeted industry, including
working with ((innovate Washington to develop methods to identify
businesses within a targeted industry that could benefit from the
services offered by innovate Washington under chapter 43.333 RCW)) K-12
schools, colleges and universities, and apprenticeship programs; and
(((f))) (k) Serve as partners with workforce development councils,
associate development organizations, and other workforce and economic
development organizations; and coordinate with industry assistance
organizations including impact Washington and innovate Washington in
order to connect businesses within the targeted industries to business
services.
(4) Examples of strategies under subsection (3) of this section
include but are not limited to: Sharing curriculum and other
instructional resources, to ensure cost savings to the system;
delivering collaborative certificate and degree programs; ((and))
holding statewide summits, seminars, conferences, and workshops on
industry trends and best practices in ((community and technical
college)) education and training; and coordinating industry-based
certifications.
(5) The centers of excellence shall seek federal funds and private
gifts and grants to supplement state resources for the purpose of
performing the strategies identified in subsections (3) and (4) of this
section.

--- END ---