BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.240 and 2006 c 290 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whoever knowingly transmits or receives gambling information by
telephone, telegraph, radio, semaphore, the internet, a
telecommunications transmission system, or similar means, or knowingly
installs or maintains equipment for the transmission or receipt of
gambling information ((shall be)), other than a person described in
subsection (2) of this section, is guilty of a class C felony subject
to the penalty set forth in RCW 9A.20.021. ((However,))
(2) Whoever knowingly transmits or receives gambling information
over the internet or knowingly installs or maintains equipment for the
transmission or receipt of gambling information over the internet, in
his or her primary residence for recreational purposes, commits a class
3 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW. For purposes of this
subsection, "recreational purposes" means solely for the defendant's
own enjoyment and not as part of an enterprise that derives income from
operating an internet web site that transmits or receives gambling
information.
(3) This section ((shall)) does not apply to such information
transmitted or received or equipment installed or maintained relating
to activities authorized by this chapter or to any act or acts in
furtherance thereof when conducted in compliance with the provisions of
this chapter and in accordance with the rules adopted under this
chapter.

--- END ---