BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.280.010 and 2006 c 195 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to encourage the development of
new safe, clean, and reliable energy resources to meet demand in
Washington for affordable and reliable electricity. To achieve this
end, the legislature finds it essential that electric utilities in
Washington develop comprehensive resource plans that explain the mix of
generation and demand-side resources they plan to use to meet their
customers' electricity needs in both the short term and the long term.
The legislature intends that information obtained from integrated
resource planning under this chapter will be used to assist in
identifying and developing: (1) New energy generation((,)); (2)
conservation and efficiency resources((,)); (3) methods, commercially
available technologies, and facilities for integrating renewable
resources, including to address an overgeneration event; and (4)
related infrastructure to meet the state's electricity needs.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.280.020 and 2009 c 565 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(2) "Conservation and efficiency resources" means any reduction in
electric power consumption that results from increases in the
efficiency of energy use, production, transmission, or distribution.
(3) "Consumer-owned utility" includes a municipal electric utility
formed under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title
54 RCW, an irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a
cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or
association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, a port district formed
under Title 53 RCW, or a water-sewer district formed under Title 57
RCW, that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to one
or more retail electric customers in the state.
(4) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(5) "Electric utility" means a consumer-owned or investor-owned
utility.
(6) "Full requirements customer" means an electric utility that
relies on the Bonneville power administration for all power needed to
supply its total load requirement other than that served by
nondispatchable generating resources totaling no more than six
megawatts or renewable resources.
(7) "Governing body" means the elected board of directors, city
council, commissioners, or board of any consumer-owned utility.
(8) "High efficiency cogeneration" means the sequential production
of electricity and useful thermal energy from a common fuel source,
where, under normal operating conditions, the facility has a useful
thermal energy output of no less than thirty-three percent of the total
energy output.
(9) "Integrated resource plan" means an analysis describing the mix
of generating resources ((and)), conservation, various technologies and
resources to integrate renewable resources, including to address an
overgeneration event, and efficiency resources that will meet current
and projected needs at the lowest reasonable cost to the utility and
its ratepayers and that complies with the requirements specified in RCW
19.280.030(1).
(10) "Investor-owned utility" means a corporation owned by
investors that meets the definition in RCW 80.04.010 and is engaged in
distributing electricity to more than one retail electric customer in
the state.
(11) "Lowest reasonable cost" means the lowest cost mix of
generating resources and conservation and efficiency resources
determined through a detailed and consistent analysis of a wide range
of commercially available resources. At a minimum, this analysis must
consider resource cost, market-volatility risks, demand-side resource
uncertainties, resource dispatchability, resource effect on system
operation, the risks imposed on the utility and its ratepayers, public
policies regarding resource preference adopted by Washington state or
the federal government, and the cost of risks associated with
environmental effects including emissions of carbon dioxide.
(12) "Plan" means either an "integrated resource plan" or a
"resource plan."
(13) "Renewable resources" means electricity generation facilities
fueled by: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar energy; (d) geothermal
energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) biomass energy utilizing animal waste,
solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field residues or dedicated
energy crops that do not include wood pieces that have been treated
with chemical preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or
copper-chrome-arsenic; (g) by-products of pulping or wood manufacturing
processes, including but not limited to bark, wood chips, sawdust, and
lignin in spent pulping liquors; (h) ocean thermal, wave, or tidal
power; or (i) gas from sewage treatment facilities.
(14) "Resource plan" means an assessment that estimates electricity
loads and resources over a defined period of time and complies with the
requirements in RCW 19.280.030(2).
(15) "Overgeneration event" means an event within an operating
period of a balancing authority when the electricity supply, including
generation from intermittent renewable resources, exceeds the demand
for electricity for that utility's energy delivery obligations and a
negatively priced regional market.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.280.030 and 2011 c 180 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each electric utility must develop a plan consistent with this
section.
(1) Utilities with more than twenty-five thousand customers that
are not full requirements customers shall develop or update an
integrated resource plan by September 1, 2008. At a minimum, progress
reports reflecting changing conditions and the progress of the
integrated resource plan must be produced every two years thereafter.
An updated integrated resource plan must be developed at least every
four years subsequent to the 2008 integrated resource plan. The
integrated resource plan, at a minimum, must include:
(a) A range of forecasts, for at least the next ten years or
longer, of projected customer demand which takes into account
econometric data and customer usage;
(b) An assessment of commercially available conservation and
efficiency resources. Such assessment may include, as appropriate,
high efficiency cogeneration, demand response and load management
programs, and currently employed and new policies and programs needed
to obtain the conservation and efficiency resources;
(c) An assessment of commercially available, utility scale
renewable and nonrenewable generating technologies including a
comparison of the benefits and risks of purchasing power or building
new resources;
(d) A comparative evaluation of renewable and nonrenewable
generating resources, including transmission and distribution delivery
costs, and conservation and efficiency resources using "lowest
reasonable cost" as a criterion;
(e) An assessment of methods, commercially available technologies,
or facilities for integrating renewable resources, including to address
an overgeneration event, if applicable to the utility's resource
portfolio;
(f) The integration of the demand forecasts and resource
evaluations into a long-range assessment describing the mix of supply
side generating resources and conservation and efficiency resources
that will meet current and projected needs at the lowest reasonable
cost and risk to the utility and its ratepayers; and
(((f))) (g) A short-term plan identifying the specific actions to
be taken by the utility consistent with the long-range integrated
resource plan.
(2) All other utilities may elect to develop a full integrated
resource plan as set forth in subsection (1) of this section or, at a
minimum, shall develop a resource plan that:
(a) Estimates loads for the next five and ten years;
(b) Enumerates the resources that will be maintained and/or
acquired to serve those loads; and
(c) Explains why the resources in (b) of this subsection were
chosen and, if the resources chosen are not: (i) Renewable resources
((or)); (ii) methods, commercially available technologies, or
facilities for integrating renewable resources, including to address an
overgeneration event; or (iii) conservation and efficiency resources,
why such a decision was made.
(3) An electric utility that is required to develop a resource plan
under this section must complete its initial plan by September 1, 2008.
(4) Resource plans developed under this section must be updated on
a regular basis, at a minimum on intervals of two years.
(5) Plans shall not be a basis to bring legal action against
electric utilities.
(6) Each electric utility shall publish its final plan either as
part of an annual report or as a separate document available to the
public. The report may be in an electronic form.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.280.060 and 2006 c 195 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall review the plans of consumer-owned utilities
and investor-owned utilities, and data available from other state,
regional, and national sources, and prepare an electronic report to the
legislature aggregating the data and assessing the overall adequacy of
Washington's electricity supply. The report shall include a statewide
summary of utility load forecasts, load/resource balance, and utility
plans for the development of thermal generation, renewable resources,
((and)) conservation and efficiency resources, and an examination of
assessment methods used by utilities to address overgeneration events.
The commission shall provide the department with data summarizing the
plans of investor-owned utilities for use in the department's statewide
summary. The department may submit its report within the biennial
report required under RCW 43.21F.045.

--- END ---