BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the availability
of affordable, fresh, and nourishing foods is essential for individuals
to maintain a healthy lifestyle. The legislature also finds that new
methods of purchasing and delivering fresh, nourishing foods are
emerging and lowering the costs of these foods. The legislature
further finds that the new business models for purchasing and
delivering fresh, nourishing foods are being inappropriately classified
as food service establishments. Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature to establish a pass-through wholesale food distributor
license for businesses that sell prepackaged foods from a food
processor certified by the United States department of agriculture and
deliver the food directly to consumers.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.20.145 and 2003 c 65 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state board shall consider the most recent version of the
United States food and drug administration's food code for the purpose
of adopting rules for food service.
(2) Pass-through wholesale food distributors that have a license
from the department of agriculture under section 3 of this act are
exempt from the state board's food service rules and any food service
regulations adopted by local health jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 69.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a license to operate as a pass-through wholesale food distributor to any entity that:
(a) Submits a completed application on forms approved by the
department;
(b) Provides the department with a list of all registered vehicles
owned and used by the applicant's business to deliver food;
(c) When using food storage facilities, attests that the entity
only uses food storage facilities that have been certified by the
United States department of agriculture;
(d) When using rented vehicles, attests that the operator maintains
a temperature log or uses a device to monitor the temperature of the
packages in real time; and
(e) Submits the appropriate fee to the department.
(2) The department may charge a fee not to exceed five hundred
dollars per license to defray the costs of administering the licensing
program created by this section.
(3) A licensed pass-through wholesale food distributor shall
protect food from contamination while in storage or transport. Food
must be stored and transported under conditions that protect food
against physical, chemical, and microbial contamination, as well as
against deterioration of the food and its container. This includes,
but is not limited to, the storing of raw materials in such a fashion
that they avoid cross-contamination of finished food products,
particularly ready-to-eat food. For example, the storage of raw fish
and seafood, meat, poultry, and other food which inherently contains
pathogenic and spoilage microorganisms, as well as soil and other
foreign material, must not come into direct contact with other food in
the same container or in any other cross-contaminating circumstance
with finished food products.
(4) In the event of a food recall, a licensed pass-through
wholesale food distributor shall use its client listserv to notify
customers of the recall and any other relevant information.
(5) The department shall:
(a) Establish procedures to verify the registration of any delivery
vehicles or certification of food storage facilities by the United
States department of agriculture;
(b) Provide for annual inspections of vehicles owned by the entity,
food storage facilities, and refrigeration equipment and audits of
temperature logs. The department shall provide for inspections of any
delivery vehicles at central vehicle distribution locations to review
food handling and inspect vehicle food storage areas, refrigeration
equipment, and product packaging. The department may not charge any
fees for the inspection;
(c) Investigate any complaints against a licensed pass-through
wholesale food distributor for the failure to maintain food delivery
vehicles in good working order; and
(d) Adopt rules, in consultation with the department of health and
local health jurisdictions, necessary to administer the program.
(6) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Department" means the department of agriculture.
(b) "Pass-through wholesale food distributor" means an entity that
receives prepackaged food from a food processor certified by the United
States department of agriculture and that delivers the food directly to
consumers who placed an order on the entity's web site, without opening
the packaging and without dividing it into smaller packages, by means
of refrigerated vehicles that meet United States department of
transportation standards. "Pass-through wholesale food distributor"
includes an entity that, prior to delivery to the consumer, temporarily
stores the prepackaged food in a food storage facility approved by the
United States department of agriculture.

--- END ---