BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a small but
potentially growing number of local governmental entities are showing
signs of declining financial health. The legislature also finds that
state government must improve its ability to analyze and appropriately
act upon information about the fiscal condition of its local
governments. The legislature also finds that increasing the awareness
of the nature and extent of challenges facing local governments can
help communities and the state work together to identify and resolve
issues sooner, at lower cost, and with less risk. The legislature
further finds that it respects the independence and importance of local
governmental entities and their locally elected leaders and governing
bodies as they work to respond to the needs and expectations of their
citizens.
Therefore, the legislature intends to create a fiscal health review
and response capability in which state and local governments work
collaboratively to identify and respond to financial problems
encountered by local governments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the local government fiscal health
commission.
(2) "Local government" means cities, towns, counties, special
purpose districts, political subdivisions, and any other municipal
corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state except school
districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The local government fiscal health
commission is hereby created and consists of twelve members as follows:
The state treasurer, the state auditor, one elected local government
member appointed by the chair of the commission from among three
candidates provided by a statewide association representing cities, one
elected local government member appointed by the chair of the
commission from among three candidates provided by a statewide
association representing counties, one member appointed by the chair of
the commission from among three candidates provided by a statewide
association representing county officials, one member appointed by the
chair of the commission from among three candidates provided by a
statewide association representing city and county managers, two
members appointed by the chair of the commission from among six
candidates provided by a statewide association representing employees,
the executive director of the municipal research and services center,
and three members appointed by the governor. The governor shall seek
to provide geographic balance and special expertise in local government
finance and management.
(2) The commission must select a chair from its membership. The
commission may select from its membership such other officers as it
deems appropriate. A majority of the voting members of the commission
constitutes a quorum.
(3) The term of appointment of the local government members is four
years from the date of appointment.
If an appointed member leaves elected office during their term, the
appointing entity shall make another appointment within thirty days.
(4) Any state official serving in an ex officio capacity may
designate an employee of their respective department to act on their
behalf in all respects with regard to any matter to come before the
commission. Such a designation shall be made in writing.
(5) The members of the commission serve without compensation but
are entitled to reimbursement under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, solely
from the funds of the commission, for expenses incurred in the
discharge of their duties under this chapter.
(6) Staff support for the commission must be provided by the state
auditor's office and the office of the state treasurer. In addition,
the commission may hire its own staff or contract for the provision of
services as it deems necessary and appropriate to carry out its duties
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The commission may:
(1) Make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary
or convenient for the exercise of its purposes or powers;
(2) Make expenditures as are appropriate for paying the
administrative costs of the commission and for carrying out the
provisions of this chapter;
(3) Receive contributions or grants from any source unless
otherwise prohibited;
(4) Delegate any of its powers and duties, except rule making
related to the commission's review and recommendations, if consistent
with the purposes of this chapter; and
(5) Exercise any other power, including rule making, reasonably
required to implement the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The commission must monitor, track, and
research factors that can cause fiscal stress in local governments.
If, based on this monitoring, the commission identifies that a local
government is more likely than not to experience financial stress in
the near term, the commission may:
(1) Offer resources and support to the local government;
(2) Enter into an agreement that allows the commission to engage
experienced professionals to provide guidance and assistance to the
local government;
(3) Work with the local government to create a financial and
management plan; or
(4) Exercise any other duty necessary to carry out the intent of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The governing body or chief executive of
a local government may request a preliminary review under this chapter.
The request must identify the existing or emerging financial conditions
that make the request necessary. The commission has the discretion to
determine:
(a) Whether it will provide the requested assistance;
(b) Under what terms and conditions it will provide the service;
and
(c) The scope of assistance to be provided.
(2) When the commission conducts a preliminary review under this
section, it must inform the local government of the results of its
review no more than fifteen days after concluding the review.
(3) The commission must provide copies of any reports or
recommendations made as a result of the preliminary review to the
governing body of the local government and provide the local government
an opportunity to comment prior to any report of the commission
becoming final.
(4) The commission may delegate to a subcommittee of the commission
or to commission staff the task of conducting the preliminary review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) If after conducting a preliminary
review, the commission and the local government determines that one or
more factors exist that support a finding of financial stress, the
commission may appoint a three-person committee, made up of government
officials with the requisite finance subject matter experience, to
conduct a thorough review of the financial condition of the local
government.
(2) In conducting its review, the committee has the following
powers:
(a) To examine the books and records of the local government; and
(b) To review any other documents deemed relevant to the financial
condition of the local government, including but not limited to
contracts or other documentation evidencing a debt or obligation of the
local government.
(3) If requested by the commission or on its own initiative, the
commission may:
(a) Utilize the services of other governmental entities or
employees; and
(b) Enter into contracts with experts in the required field to
assist in the review of the books and records.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Prior to any formal review being conducted
under section 7 of this act, the commission and the local government
must enter into an interlocal agreement pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW
to set forth the scope of the review. A formal review may not be
conducted without the consent of the local government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The state, the commission, and any
individual or group of individuals taking action under this chapter are
not liable for any obligation or claim against a local government
resulting from actions taken in accordance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Insofar as the provisions of this chapter
are inconsistent with the provisions of any general or special law, or
parts thereof, the provisions of this chapter are controlling.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---