BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.91.170 and 2003 c 53 s 52 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any person who has received notice that his or her behavior
is interfering with the use of a dog guide or service animal who
continues with reckless disregard to interfere with the use of a dog
guide or service animal by obstructing, intimidating, or otherwise
jeopardizing the safety of the dog guide or service animal user or his
or her dog guide or service animal is guilty of a misdemeanor, except
as provided in (b) of this subsection.
(b) A second or subsequent violation of this subsection is a gross
misdemeanor.
(2)(a) Any person who, with reckless disregard, allows his or her
dog to interfere with the use of a dog guide or service animal by
obstructing, intimidating, or otherwise jeopardizing the safety of the
dog guide or service animal user or his or her dog guide or service
animal is guilty of a misdemeanor, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection.
(b) A second or subsequent violation of this subsection is a gross
misdemeanor.
(3) Any person who, with reckless disregard, injures, disables, or
causes the death of a dog guide or service animal is guilty of a
((gross misdemeanor)) class C felony punishable according to chapter
9A.20 RCW.
(4) Any person who, with reckless disregard, allows his or her dog
to injure, disable, or cause the death of a dog guide or service animal
is guilty of a ((gross misdemeanor)) class C felony punishable
according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(5) ((Any person who intentionally injures, disables, or causes the
death of a dog guide or service animal is guilty of a class C felony
punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(6))) Any person who wrongfully obtains or exerts unauthorized
control over a dog guide or service animal with the intent to deprive
the dog guide or service animal user of his or her dog guide or service
animal is guilty of theft in the first degree, RCW 9A.56.030.
(((7))) (6)(a) In any case in which the defendant is convicted of
a violation of this section, he or she shall also be ordered to make
full restitution for all damages, including incidental and
consequential expenses incurred by the dog guide or service animal user
and the dog guide or service animal which arise out of or are related
to the criminal offense.
(b) Restitution for a conviction under this section shall include,
but is not limited to:
(i) The value of the replacement of an incapacitated or deceased
dog guide or service animal, the training of a replacement dog guide or
service animal, or retraining of the affected dog guide or service
animal and all related veterinary and care expenses; and
(ii) Medical expenses of the dog guide or service animal user,
training of the dog guide or service animal user, and compensation for
wages or earned income lost by the dog guide or service animal user.
(((8))) (7) Nothing in this section shall affect any civil remedies
available for violation of this section.
(((9))) (8) For purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Dog guide" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of
guiding blind persons or a dog trained for the purpose of assisting
hearing impaired persons.
(b) "Service animal" means an animal that is trained for the
purposes of assisting or accommodating a disabled person's sensory,
mental, or physical disability.
(c) "Notice" means a verbal or otherwise communicated warning
prescribing the behavior of another person and a request that the
person stop their behavior.
(d) "Value" means the value to the dog guide or service animal user
and does not refer to cost or fair market value.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.91.175 and 2005 c 212 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a)(i) Any person who has received notice that his or her
behavior is interfering with the use of an on-duty search and rescue
dog who continues with reckless disregard to interfere with the use of
an on-duty search and rescue dog by obstructing, intimidating, or
otherwise jeopardizing the safety of the search and rescue dog user or
his or her search and rescue dog is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable
according to chapter 9A.20 RCW, except when (a)(ii) of this subsection
applies.
(ii) A second or subsequent violation of (a)(i) of this subsection
is a gross misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(b)(i) Any person who, with reckless disregard, allows his or her
dog to interfere with the use of an on-duty search and rescue dog by
obstructing, intimidating, or otherwise jeopardizing the safety of the
search and rescue dog user or his or her search and rescue dog is
guilty of a misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW,
except when (b)(ii) of this subsection applies.
(ii) A second or subsequent violation of (b)(i) of this subsection
is a gross misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2)(a) Any person who, with reckless disregard, injures, disables,
or causes the death of an on-duty search and rescue dog is guilty of a
((gross misdemeanor)) class C felony punishable according to chapter
9A.20 RCW.
(b) Any person who, with reckless disregard, allows his or her dog
to injure, disable, or cause the death of an on-duty search and rescue
dog is guilty of a ((gross misdemeanor)) class C felony punishable
according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(3) ((Any person who intentionally injures, disables, or causes the
death of an on-duty search and rescue dog is guilty of a class C
felony.
(4))) Any person who wrongfully obtains or exerts unauthorized
control over an on-duty search and rescue dog with the intent to
deprive the dog user of his or her search and rescue dog is guilty of
theft in the first degree under RCW 9A.56.030.
(((5))) (4)(a) In any case in which the defendant is convicted of
a violation of this section, he or she shall also be ordered to make
full restitution for all damages, including incidental and
consequential expenses incurred by the search and rescue dog user and
the dog that arise out of, or are related to, the criminal offense.
(b) Restitution for a conviction under this section shall include,
but is not limited to:
(i) The value of the replacement of an incapacitated or deceased
dog, the training of a replacement search and rescue dog, or retraining
of the affected dog and all related veterinary and care expenses; and
(ii) Medical expenses of the search and rescue dog user, training
of the dog user, and compensation for any wages or earned income lost
by the search and rescue dog user as a result of a violation of
subsection (1), (2), or (3)((, or (4))) of this section.
(((6))) (5) Nothing in this section affects any civil remedies
available for violation of this section.
(((7))) (6) For purposes of this section, "search and rescue dog"
means a dog that is trained for the purpose of search and rescue of
persons lost or missing.

--- END ---