BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
eligible purchasers of prescribed add-on automotive adaptive equipment,
including charges incurred for labor and services rendered in respect
to the installation and repairing of such equipment. The exemption
provided in this section only applies if the eligible purchaser is
reimbursed in whole or in part for the purchase by the United States
government, and the reimbursement is paid directly to the seller.
(2) Sellers making tax-exempt sales under this section must obtain
an exemption certificate from the eligible purchaser in a form and
manner prescribed by the United States department of veterans affairs.
The seller must retain a copy of the exemption certificate for the
seller's files. In lieu of an exemption certificate, a seller may
capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the streamlined
sales and use tax agreement.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Add-on automotive adaptive equipment" means equipment
installed in, and modifications made to, a motor vehicle that are
necessary to assist physically challenged persons to enter, exit, or
safely operate a motor vehicle. The term includes but is not limited
to wheelchair lifts, wheelchair restraints, ramps, under vehicle lifts,
power door openers, power seats, lowered floors, raised roofs, raised
doors, hand controls, left foot gas pedals, chest and shoulder
harnesses, parking brake extensions, dual battery systems, steering
devices, reduced and zero effort steering and braking, voice-activated
controls, and digital driving systems. The term does not include motor
vehicles and equipment installed in a motor vehicle by the manufacturer
or manufacturers of the motor vehicle.
(b) "Eligible purchaser" means a veteran, or member of the armed
forces serving on active duty, who is disabled, regardless of whether
the disability is service connected as that term is defined by 38
U.S.C. Sec. 101, as amended, as of August 1, 2013.
(c) "Prescribed add-on automotive adaptive equipment" means add-on
automotive adaptive equipment prescribed by a physician.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 does not apply to the use of
prescribed add-on automotive adaptive equipment or to labor and
services rendered in respect to the installation and repairing of such
equipment. The exemption under this section only applies if the sale
of the prescribed add-on automotive adaptive equipment or labor and
services was exempt from sales tax under section 1 of this act or would
have been exempt from sales tax under section 1 of this act if the
equipment or labor and services had been purchased in this state.
(2) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---