BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.01.130 and 2010 c 161 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director:
(1) Shall supervise and control the issuing of vehicle certificates
of title, vehicle registrations, and vehicle license plates, and has
the full power to do all things necessary and proper to carry out the
provisions of the law relating to the registration of vehicles;
(2) May appoint and employ deputies, assistants, representatives,
and clerks;
(3) May establish branch offices in different parts of the state;
(4) May appoint county auditors in Washington state or, in the
absence of a county auditor, the department or an official of county
government as agents for applications for and the issuance of vehicle
certificates of title and vehicle registrations; and
(5)(a) Shall investigate the conviction records and pending charges
of any current employee of or prospective employee being considered for
any position with the department ((that)) who has or will have:
(i)(A) The ability to create or modify records of applicants for
enhanced drivers' licenses and identicards issued under RCW 46.20.202;
and
(((ii))) (B) The ability to issue enhanced drivers' licenses and
identicards under RCW 46.20.202; or
(ii) Access to information pertaining to vehicle license plates,
drivers' licenses, or identicards under RCW 46.08.066, or vessel
registrations issued under RCW 88.02.330 that, alone or in combination
with any other information, may reveal the identity of an individual,
or reveal that an individual is or was, performing an undercover or
covert law enforcement, public health work, or public assistance fraud
or support investigative activity.
(b) The investigation consists of a background check as authorized
under RCW 10.97.050, 43.43.833, and 43.43.834, and the federal bureau
of investigation. The background check must be conducted through the
Washington state patrol criminal identification section and may include
a national check from the federal bureau of investigation, which is
through the submission of fingerprints. The director shall use the
information solely to determine the character, suitability, and
competence of current or prospective employees subject to this section.
(c) The director shall investigate the conviction records and
pending charges of an employee subject to this subsection every five
years.
(d) Criminal justice agencies shall provide the director with
information that they may possess and that the director may require
solely to determine the employment suitability of current or
prospective employees subject to this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.08.066 and 2010 c 161 s 211 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may issue confidential license plates to:
(a) Units of local government and agencies of the federal
government for law enforcement purposes only;
(b) Any state official elected on a statewide basis for use on
official business. Only one set of confidential license plates may be
issued to these elected officials;
(c) Any other public officer or public employee for the personal
security of the officer or employee when recommended by the chief of
the Washington state patrol. These confidential license plates may
only be used on an unmarked publicly owned or controlled vehicle of the
employing government agency for the conduct of official business for
the period of time that the personal security of the state official,
public officer, or other public employee may require; and
(d) The office of the state treasurer. These confidential license
plates may only be used on an unmarked state owned or controlled
vehicle when required for the safe transportation of either state funds
or negotiable securities to or from the office of the state treasurer.
(2) The use of confidential license plates on other vehicles owned
or operated by the state of Washington by any officer or employee of
the state is limited to confidential, investigative, or undercover work
of state law enforcement agencies, confidential public health work, and
confidential public assistance fraud or support investigations.
(3) The department may issue confidential drivers' licenses and
identicards to the Washington state patrol, units of local government,
and agencies of the federal government for law enforcement purposes
only including, but not limited to, undercover or covert law
enforcement activities.
(4) The director may adopt rules governing applications for, and
the use of, confidential license plates, drivers' licenses, and
identicards.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.56.230 and 2011 c 350 s 2 and 2011 c 173 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following personal information is exempt from public inspection
and copying under this chapter:
(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients;
(2) Personal information((,)) including, but not limited to,
addresses, telephone numbers, personal electronic mail addresses,
social security numbers, emergency contact and date of birth
information for a participant in a public or nonprofit program serving
or pertaining to children, adolescents, or students, including but not
limited to early learning or child care services, parks and recreation
programs, youth development programs, and after-school programs.
Emergency contact information may be provided to appropriate
authorities and medical personnel for the purpose of treating the
individual during an emergency situation;
(3) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;
(4) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would: (a) Be prohibited to such persons
by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, 84.40.340, or any ordinance
authorized under RCW 35.102.145; or (b) violate the taxpayer's right to
privacy or result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer;
(5) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by
other law;
(6) Personal and financial information related to a small loan or
any system of authorizing a small loan in RCW 31.45.093; and
(7)(a) ((Documents and related materials and scanned images of
documents and related materials)) Any record used to prove identity,
age, residential address, social security number, or other personal
information required to apply for a driver's license or identicard.
(b) Information provided under RCW 46.20.111 that indicates that an
applicant declined to register with the selective service system.
(c) Any record pertaining to a vehicle license plate, driver's
license, or identicard issued under RCW 46.08.066 that, alone or in
combination with any other records, may reveal the identity of an
individual, or reveal that an individual is or was, performing an
undercover or covert law enforcement, public health work, or public
assistance fraud or support investigative activity.
(d) Any record pertaining to a vessel registration issued under RCW
88.02.330 that, alone or in combination with any other records, may
reveal the identity of an individual, or reveal that an individual is
or was, performing an undercover or covert law enforcement activity.

--- END ---