BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.230 and 2011 c 350 s 2 and 2011 c 173 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following personal information is exempt from public inspection
and copying under this chapter:
(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients;
(2) Personal information((,)) including, but not limited to,
addresses, telephone numbers, personal electronic mail addresses,
social security numbers, emergency contact and date of birth
information for a participant in a public or nonprofit program serving
or pertaining to children, adolescents, or students, including but not
limited to early learning or child care services, parks and recreation
programs, youth development programs, and after-school programs.
Emergency contact information may be provided to appropriate
authorities and medical personnel for the purpose of treating the
individual during an emergency situation;
(3) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;
(4) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would: (a) Be prohibited to such persons
by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, 84.40.340, sections 2 through
4 of this act, or any ordinance authorized under RCW 35.102.145; or (b)
violate the taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the taxpayer;
(5) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by
other law;
(6) Personal and financial information related to a small loan or
any system of authorizing a small loan in RCW 31.45.093; and
(7)(a) Documents and related materials and scanned images of
documents and related materials used to prove identity, age,
residential address, social security number, or other personal
information required to apply for a driver's license or identicard.
(b) Information provided under RCW 46.20.111 that indicates that an
applicant declined to register with the selective service system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.36 RCW
to read as follows:
Tax information, tax returns, supporting schedules, and documents
accompanying tax returns and supporting schedules are confidential and
privileged, and except as authorized by this section, neither the
department of licensing nor any other person may disclose any tax
information, tax returns, supporting schedules, or documents.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a)(i) "Tax information" means, except as provided otherwise in
(a)(ii) of this subsection (2):
(A) A taxpayer's identity;
(B) The nature, source, or amount of the taxpayer's payments, tax
refund applications and supporting documents, deductions, exemptions,
credits, liabilities, tax liability deficiencies, assessments, fuel
receipts, or distributions, whether taken from the taxpayer's books and
records or any other source;
(C) Whether the taxpayer's return was, is being, or will be
examined or subject to other investigation or processing;
(D) A part of a written tax determination or a background file
document relating to a written tax determination;
(E) Information contained in audit files of licensees; and
(F) Records received by, recorded by, prepared by, furnished to, or
collected by the department of licensing with respect to the
determination of the existence, or possible existence, of liability, or
the amount thereof, of a person under the laws of this state for a tax,
penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or other imposition, or offense.
(ii) Records that do not disclose information related to a specific
or identifiable taxpayer do not constitute tax information under this
section.
(b) "Taxpayer identity" means the taxpayer's name, address,
telephone number, registration number, or any combination thereof, or
any other information disclosing the identity of the taxpayer.
(c) "Tax return" means a tax or information return or claim for
refund required by, or provided for or permitted under, the laws of
this state that is filed with the department of licensing by, on behalf
of, or with respect to a person, and any amendment or supplement
thereto, including supporting schedules, attachments, or lists that are
supplemental to, or part of, the return so filed.
(3) This section does not prohibit the department of licensing
from:
(a) Disclosing tax return or tax information in a civil or criminal
judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:
(i) In respect of any tax imposed under the laws of this state if
the taxpayer or its officer or other person liable under this chapter
is a party in the proceeding;
(ii) In which the taxpayer about whom such tax return or tax
information is sought and another state agency are adverse parties in
the proceeding;
(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the
director prescribes by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, tax
return or tax information regarding a taxpayer to such taxpayer or to
such person or persons as that taxpayer may designate in a request for,
or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person, at the
taxpayer's request, to the extent necessary to comply with a request
for information or assistance made by the taxpayer to such other
person. However, tax return or tax information not received from the
taxpayer must not be disclosed if the director determines disclosure
would compromise any investigation or litigation by any federal, state,
or local government agency in connection with the civil or criminal
liability of the taxpayer or another person, or disclosure would
identify a confidential informant, or disclosure is contrary to any
agreement entered into by the department that provides for the
reciprocal exchange of information with other government agencies which
agreement requires confidentiality with respect to information unless
information is required to be disclosed to the taxpayer by the order of
any court;
(c) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer against whom a lien or
warrant under RCW 82.36.110 or 82.36.047 has been either issued or
filed and remains outstanding for a period of at least ten working
days. The department is not required to disclose any information under
this subsection if a taxpayer has entered a deferred payment
arrangement with the department for the payment of a lien or warrant
that has not been filed and is making payments upon such deficiency
that will fully satisfy the indebtedness;
(d) Publishing statistics classified as to prevent the
identification of particular tax returns or reports or items thereof;
(e) Disclosing tax return or tax information, for official purposes
only, to the governor or attorney general, or to any state agency, or
to any committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing with
matters of taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of industry
or the professions;
(f) Permitting the department of licensing's records to be audited
and examined by the proper state officer, his or her agents and
employees;
(g) Disclosing any tax return or tax information to a peace officer
as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting attorney, for
official purposes. The disclosure may be made only in response to a
search warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless the disclosure
is for the purpose of criminal tax enforcement. A peace officer or
county prosecuting attorney who receives the tax return or tax
information may disclose that tax return or tax information only for
use in the investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the
court proceeding for which the tax return or tax information originally
was sought;
(h) Disclosing any tax return or tax information to the proper
officer of the internal revenue service of the United States, the
Canadian government or provincial governments of Canada, or to the
proper officer of the tax department of any state or city or town or
county, for official purposes, but only if the statutes of the United
States, Canada or its provincial governments, or of such other state or
city or town or county, as the case may be, grants substantially
similar privileges to the proper officers of this state;
(i) Disclosing any tax return or tax information to the United
States department of justice, including the bureau of alcohol, tobacco,
firearms and explosives, the department of defense, the immigration and
customs enforcement, and the customs and border protection agencies of
the United States department of homeland security, the United States
coast guard, the alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau of the United
States department of treasury, and the United States department of
transportation, or any authorized representative of these federal
agencies, for official purposes;
(j) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with other tax
information, the taxpayer name, entity type, business address, mailing
address, license numbers, and the expiration date and status of such
licenses. This subsection may not be construed as giving authority to
the department to give, sell, or provide access to any list of
taxpayers for any commercial purpose;
(k) Disclosing tax return or tax information also maintained by
another Washington state or local governmental agency as a public
record available for inspection and copying under the provisions of
chapter 42.56 RCW or is a document maintained by a court of record and
is not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;
(l) Disclosing such tax return or tax information to the court in
respect to the department's application for a subpoena;
(m) Disclosing any tax return or tax information when the
disclosure is specifically authorized under any other section of the
Revised Code of Washington.
(4)(a) The department may disclose taxpayer information to a person
under investigation or during any court or administrative proceeding
against a person under investigation as provided in this subsection
(4). The disclosure must be in connection with the department's
official duties relating to an audit, collection activity, or a civil
or criminal investigation. The disclosure may occur only when the
person under investigation and the person in possession of data,
materials, or documents are parties to the tax information to be
disclosed. The department may disclose tax return or tax information
such as invoices, contracts, bills, statements, or checks. However,
the department may not disclose general ledgers, sales or cash receipt
journals, check registers, accounts receivable/payable ledgers, general
journals, financial statements, expert's workpapers, income tax
returns, state tax returns, tax return workpapers, or other similar
data, materials, or documents.
(b) Before disclosure of any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4), the department must, through written
correspondence, inform the person in possession of the data, materials,
or documents to be disclosed. The correspondence must clearly identify
the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The department may
not disclose tax return or tax information under this subsection (4)
until the time period allowed in (c) of this subsection has expired or
until the court has ruled on any challenge brought under (c) of this
subsection.
(c) The person in possession of the data, materials, or documents
to be disclosed by the department has twenty days from the receipt of
the written request required under (b) of this subsection to petition
the superior court of the county in which the petitioner resides for
injunctive relief. The court must limit or deny the request of the
department if the court determines that:
(i) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure are
cumulative or duplicative, or are obtainable from some other source
that is more convenient, less burdensome, or less expensive;
(ii) The production of the data, materials, or documents sought
would be unduly burdensome or expensive, taking into account the needs
of the department, the amount in controversy, limitations on the
petitioner's resources, and the importance of the issues at stake; or
(iii) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure
contain trade secret information that, if disclosed, could harm the
petitioner.
(d) The department must reimburse reasonable expenses for the
production of data, materials, or documents incurred by the person in
possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The
department may seek reimbursement for expenses incurred from the person
who requested the information.
(e) Requesting information under (b) of this subsection that may
indicate that a taxpayer is under investigation does not constitute a
disclosure of tax information under this section.
(5) Service of a subpoena does not constitute a disclosure of tax
return or tax information under this section. Notwithstanding anything
else to the contrary in this section, a person served with a subpoena
may disclose the existence or content of the subpoena to that person's
legal counsel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.38 RCW
to read as follows:
Tax information, tax returns, supporting schedules, and documents
accompanying tax returns and supporting schedules are confidential and
privileged, and except as authorized by this section, neither the
department of licensing nor any other person may disclose any tax
information, tax returns, supporting schedules, or documents.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a)(i) "Tax information" means, except as provided otherwise in
(a)(ii) of this subsection (2):
(A) A taxpayer's identity;
(B) The nature, source, or amount of the taxpayer's payments, tax
refund applications and supporting documents, deductions, exemptions,
credits, liabilities, tax liability deficiencies, assessments, fuel
receipts, or distributions, whether taken from the taxpayer's books and
records or any other source;
(C) Whether the taxpayer's return was, is being, or will be
examined or subject to other investigation or processing;
(D) A part of a written tax determination or a background file
document relating to a written tax determination;
(E) Information contained in audit files of licensees; and
(F) Records received by, recorded by, prepared by, furnished to, or
collected by the department of licensing with respect to the
determination of the existence, or possible existence, of liability, or
the amount thereof, of a person under the laws of this state for a tax,
penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or other imposition, or offense.
(ii) Records that do not disclose information related to a specific
or identifiable taxpayer do not constitute tax information under this
section.
(b) "Taxpayer identity" means the taxpayer's name, address,
telephone number, registration number, or any combination thereof, or
any other information disclosing the identity of the taxpayer.
(c) "Tax return" means a tax or information return or claim for
refund required by, or provided for or permitted under, the laws of
this state that is filed with the department of licensing by, on behalf
of, or with respect to a person, and any amendment or supplement
thereto, including supporting schedules, attachments, or lists that are
supplemental to, or part of, the return so filed.
(3) This section does not prohibit the department of licensing
from:
(a) Disclosing tax return or tax information in a civil or criminal
judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:
(i) In respect of any tax imposed under the laws of this state if
the taxpayer or its officer or other person liable under this chapter
is a party in the proceeding;
(ii) In which the taxpayer about whom such tax return or tax
information is sought and another state agency are adverse parties in
the proceeding;
(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the
director prescribes by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, tax
return or tax information regarding a taxpayer to such taxpayer or to
such person or persons as that taxpayer may designate in a request for,
or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person, at the
taxpayer's request, to the extent necessary to comply with a request
for information or assistance made by the taxpayer to such other
person. However, tax return or tax information not received from the
taxpayer must not be disclosed if the director determines disclosure
would compromise any investigation or litigation by any federal, state,
or local government agency in connection with the civil or criminal
liability of the taxpayer or another person, or disclosure would
identify a confidential informant, or disclosure is contrary to any
agreement entered into by the department that provides for the
reciprocal exchange of information with other government agencies which
agreement requires confidentiality with respect to information unless
information is required to be disclosed to the taxpayer by the order of
any court;
(c) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer against whom a lien or
warrant under RCW 82.36.110 or 82.36.047 has been either issued or
filed and remains outstanding for a period of at least ten working
days. The department is not required to disclose any information under
this subsection if a taxpayer has entered a deferred payment
arrangement with the department for the payment of a lien or warrant
that has not been filed and is making payments upon such deficiency
that will fully satisfy the indebtedness;
(d) Publishing statistics classified as to prevent the
identification of particular tax returns or reports or items thereof;
(e) Disclosing tax return or tax information, for official purposes
only, to the governor or attorney general, or to any state agency, or
to any committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing with
matters of taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of industry
or the professions;
(f) Permitting the department of licensing's records to be audited
and examined by the proper state officer, his or her agents and
employees;
(g) Disclosing any tax return or tax information to a peace officer
as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting attorney, for
official purposes. The disclosure may be made only in response to a
search warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless the disclosure
is for the purpose of criminal tax enforcement. A peace officer or
county prosecuting attorney who receives the tax return or tax
information may disclose that tax return or tax information only for
use in the investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the
court proceeding for which the tax return or tax information originally
was sought;
(h) Disclosing any tax return or tax information to the proper
officer of the internal revenue service of the United States, the
Canadian government or provincial governments of Canada, or to the
proper officer of the tax department of any state or city or town or
county, for official purposes, but only if the statutes of the United
States, Canada or its provincial governments, or of such other state or
city or town or county, as the case may be, grants substantially
similar privileges to the proper officers of this state;
(i) Disclosing any tax return or tax information to the United
States department of justice, including the bureau of alcohol, tobacco,
firearms and explosives, the department of defense, the immigration and
customs enforcement, and the customs and border protection agencies of
the United States department of homeland security, the United States
coast guard, the alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau of the United
States department of treasury, and the United States department of
transportation, or any authorized representative of these federal
agencies, for official purposes;
(j) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with other tax
information, the taxpayer name, entity type, business address, mailing
address, license numbers, and the expiration date and status of such
licenses. This subsection may not be construed as giving authority to
the department to give, sell, or provide access to any list of
taxpayers for any commercial purpose;
(k) Disclosing tax return or tax information also maintained by
another Washington state or local governmental agency as a public
record available for inspection and copying under the provisions of
chapter 42.56 RCW or is a document maintained by a court of record and
is not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;
(l) Disclosing such tax return or tax information to the court in
respect to the department's application for a subpoena;
(m) Disclosing any tax return or tax information when the
disclosure is specifically authorized under any other section of the
Revised Code of Washington.
(4)(a) The department may disclose taxpayer information to a person
under investigation or during any court or administrative proceeding
against a person under investigation as provided in this subsection
(4). The disclosure must be in connection with the department's
official duties relating to an audit, collection activity, or a civil
or criminal investigation. The disclosure may occur only when the
person under investigation and the person in possession of data,
materials, or documents are parties to the tax information to be
disclosed. The department may disclose tax return or tax information
such as invoices, contracts, bills, statements, or checks. However,
the department may not disclose general ledgers, sales or cash receipt
journals, check registers, accounts receivable/payable ledgers, general
journals, financial statements, expert's workpapers, income tax
returns, state tax returns, tax return workpapers, or other similar
data, materials, or documents.
(b) Before disclosure of any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4), the department must, through written
correspondence, inform the person in possession of the data, materials,
or documents to be disclosed. The correspondence must clearly identify
the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The department may
not disclose tax return or tax information under this subsection (4)
until the time period allowed in (c) of this subsection has expired or
until the court has ruled on any challenge brought under (c) of this
subsection.
(c) The person in possession of the data, materials, or documents
to be disclosed by the department has twenty days from the receipt of
the written request required under (b) of this subsection to petition
the superior court of the county in which the petitioner resides for
injunctive relief. The court must limit or deny the request of the
department if the court determines that:
(i) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure are
cumulative or duplicative, or are obtainable from some other source
that is more convenient, less burdensome, or less expensive;
(ii) The production of the data, materials, or documents sought
would be unduly burdensome or expensive, taking into account the needs
of the department, the amount in controversy, limitations on the
petitioner's resources, and the importance of the issues at stake; or
(iii) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure
contain trade secret information that, if disclosed, could harm the
petitioner.
(d) The department must reimburse reasonable expenses for the
production of data, materials, or documents incurred by the person in
possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The
department may seek reimbursement for expenses incurred from the person
who requested the information.
(e) Requesting information under (b) of this subsection that may
indicate that a taxpayer is under investigation does not constitute a
disclosure of tax information under this section.
(5) Service of a subpoena does not constitute a disclosure of tax
return or tax information under this section. Notwithstanding anything
else to the contrary in this section, a person served with a subpoena
may disclose the existence or content of the subpoena to that person's
legal counsel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.42 RCW
to read as follows:
Tax information, tax returns, supporting schedules, and documents
accompanying tax returns and supporting schedules are confidential and
privileged, and except as authorized by this section, neither the
department of licensing nor any other person may disclose any tax
information, tax returns, supporting schedules, or documents.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a)(i) "Tax information" means, except as provided otherwise in
(a)(ii) of this subsection (2):
(A) A taxpayer's identity;
(B) The nature, source, or amount of the taxpayer's payments, tax
refund applications and supporting documents, deductions, exemptions,
credits, liabilities, tax liability deficiencies, assessments, fuel
receipts, or distributions, whether taken from the taxpayer's books and
records or any other source;
(C) Whether the taxpayer's return was, is being, or will be
examined or subject to other investigation or processing;
(D) A part of a written tax determination or a background file
document relating to a written tax determination;
(E) Information contained in audit files of licensees; and
(F) Records received by, recorded by, prepared by, furnished to, or
collected by the department of licensing with respect to the
determination of the existence, or possible existence, of liability, or
the amount thereof, of a person under the laws of this state for a tax,
penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or other imposition, or offense.
(ii) Records that do not disclose information related to a specific
or identifiable taxpayer do not constitute tax information under this
section.
(b) "Taxpayer identity" means the taxpayer's name, address,
telephone number, registration number, or any combination thereof, or
any other information disclosing the identity of the taxpayer.
(c) "Tax return" means a tax or information return or claim for
refund required by, or provided for or permitted under, the laws of
this state that is filed with the department of licensing by, on behalf
of, or with respect to a person, and any amendment or supplement
thereto, including supporting schedules, attachments, or lists that are
supplemental to, or part of, the return so filed.
(3) This section does not prohibit the department of licensing
from:
(a) Disclosing tax return or tax information in a civil or criminal
judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:
(i) In respect of any tax imposed under the laws of this state if
the taxpayer or its officer or other person liable under this chapter
is a party in the proceeding;
(ii) In which the taxpayer about whom such tax return or tax
information is sought and another state agency are adverse parties in
the proceeding;
(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the
director prescribes by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, tax
return or tax information regarding a taxpayer to such taxpayer or to
such person or persons as that taxpayer may designate in a request for,
or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person, at the
taxpayer's request, to the extent necessary to comply with a request
for information or assistance made by the taxpayer to such other
person. However, tax return or tax information not received from the
taxpayer must not be disclosed if the director determines disclosure
would compromise any investigation or litigation by any federal, state,
or local government agency in connection with the civil or criminal
liability of the taxpayer or another person, or disclosure would
identify a confidential informant, or disclosure is contrary to any
agreement entered into by the department that provides for the
reciprocal exchange of information with other government agencies which
agreement requires confidentiality with respect to information unless
information is required to be disclosed to the taxpayer by the order of
any court;
(c) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer against whom a lien or
warrant under RCW 82.36.110 or 82.36.047 has been either issued or
filed and remains outstanding for a period of at least ten working
days. The department is not required to disclose any information under
this subsection if a taxpayer has entered a deferred payment
arrangement with the department for the payment of a lien or warrant
that has not been filed and is making payments upon such deficiency
that will fully satisfy the indebtedness;
(d) Publishing statistics classified as to prevent the
identification of particular tax returns or reports or items thereof;
(e) Disclosing tax return or tax information, for official purposes
only, to the governor or attorney general, or to any state agency, or
to any committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing with
matters of taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of industry
or the professions;
(f) Permitting the department of licensing's records to be audited
and examined by the proper state officer, his or her agents and
employees;
(g) Disclosing any tax return or tax information to a peace officer
as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting attorney, for
official purposes. The disclosure may be made only in response to a
search warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless the disclosure
is for the purpose of criminal tax enforcement. A peace officer or
county prosecuting attorney who receives the tax return or tax
information may disclose that tax return or tax information only for
use in the investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the
court proceeding for which the tax return or tax information originally
was sought;
(h) Disclosing any tax return or tax information to the proper
officer of the internal revenue service of the United States, the
Canadian government or provincial governments of Canada, or to the
proper officer of the tax department of any state or city or town or
county, for official purposes, but only if the statutes of the United
States, Canada or its provincial governments, or of such other state or
city or town or county, as the case may be, grants substantially
similar privileges to the proper officers of this state;
(i) Disclosing any tax return or tax information to the United
States department of justice, including the bureau of alcohol, tobacco,
firearms and explosives, the department of defense, the immigration and
customs enforcement, and the customs and border protection agencies of
the United States department of homeland security, the United States
coast guard, the alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau of the United
States department of treasury, and the United States department of
transportation, or any authorized representative of these federal
agencies, for official purposes;
(j) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with other tax
information, the taxpayer name, entity type, business address, mailing
address, license numbers, and the expiration date and status of such
licenses. This subsection may not be construed as giving authority to
the department to give, sell, or provide access to any list of
taxpayers for any commercial purpose;
(k) Disclosing tax return or tax information also maintained by
another Washington state or local governmental agency as a public
record available for inspection and copying under the provisions of
chapter 42.56 RCW or is a document maintained by a court of record and
is not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;
(l) Disclosing such tax return or tax information to the court in
respect to the department's application for a subpoena;
(m) Disclosing any tax return or tax information when the
disclosure is specifically authorized under any other section of the
Revised Code of Washington.
(4)(a) The department may disclose taxpayer information to a person
under investigation or during any court or administrative proceeding
against a person under investigation as provided in this subsection
(4). The disclosure must be in connection with the department's
official duties relating to an audit, collection activity, or a civil
or criminal investigation. The disclosure may occur only when the
person under investigation and the person in possession of data,
materials, or documents are parties to the tax information to be
disclosed. The department may disclose tax return or tax information
such as invoices, contracts, bills, statements, or checks. However,
the department may not disclose general ledgers, sales or cash receipt
journals, check registers, accounts receivable/payable ledgers, general
journals, financial statements, expert's workpapers, income tax
returns, state tax returns, tax return workpapers, or other similar
data, materials, or documents.
(b) Before disclosure of any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4), the department must, through written
correspondence, inform the person in possession of the data, materials,
or documents to be disclosed. The correspondence must clearly identify
the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The department may
not disclose tax return or tax information under this subsection (4)
until the time period allowed in (c) of this subsection has expired or
until the court has ruled on any challenge brought under (c) of this
subsection.
(c) The person in possession of the data, materials, or documents
to be disclosed by the department has twenty days from the receipt of
the written request required under (b) of this subsection to petition
the superior court of the county in which the petitioner resides for
injunctive relief. The court must limit or deny the request of the
department if the court determines that:
(i) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure are
cumulative or duplicative, or are obtainable from some other source
that is more convenient, less burdensome, or less expensive;
(ii) The production of the data, materials, or documents sought
would be unduly burdensome or expensive, taking into account the needs
of the department, the amount in controversy, limitations on the
petitioner's resources, and the importance of the issues at stake; or
(iii) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure
contain trade secret information that, if disclosed, could harm the
petitioner.
(d) The department must reimburse reasonable expenses for the
production of data, materials, or documents incurred by the person in
possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The
department may seek reimbursement for expenses incurred from the person
who requested the information.
(e) Requesting information under (b) of this subsection that may
indicate that a taxpayer is under investigation does not constitute a
disclosure of tax information under this section.
(5) Service of a subpoena does not constitute a disclosure of tax
return or tax information under this section. Notwithstanding anything
else to the contrary in this section, a person served with a subpoena
may disclose the existence or content of the subpoena to that person's
legal counsel.

--- END ---