BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary or secretary's designee may designate residents
of the total confinement facility who may participate in therapeutic
occupational assignments outside the secure perimeter of the total
confinement facility but within the confines of McNeil Island. The
secretary or secretary's designee shall impose such conditions upon the
resident as are necessary to ensure the safety of the community.
(2) The secretary or secretary's designee may designate residents
of a secure community transition facility who may participate in
therapeutic occupational assignments outside the secure perimeter of
the secure community transition facility but within the confines of
McNeil Island. The secretary or secretary's designee shall impose such
conditions upon the resident as are necessary to ensure the safety of
the community.
(3) For total confinement facility residents allowed to engage in
therapeutic occupational assignments outside of the perimeter of the
total confinement facility but who remain on McNeil Island the
secretary or secretary's designee shall determine the appropriate
direct staffing ratio necessary to ensure the safety of the community.
(4) For secure community transition facility residents allowed to
engage in therapeutic occupational assignments outside of the perimeter
of the secure community transition facility but within the confines of
McNeil Island the secretary or secretary's designee shall determine the
appropriate direct staffing ratio necessary to ensure the safety of the
community.

--- END ---