BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person desiring to change his or her surname at the time of
marriage may so indicate in the space provided on the Washington state
department of health marriage certificate form. A copy of a marriage
certificate, certified by the state registrar or the recording officer
in the county of record and on which a new surname is entered, shall be
accepted at state and local government offices for purposes of
effectuating such a surname change.
(2) An offender under the jurisdiction of the department of
corrections who changes his or her name at the time of marriage by so
indicating on the marriage certificate shall submit a copy of the
marriage certificate to the department of corrections within five days
of the solemnization of marriage. Violation of this subsection is a
misdemeanor.
(3) A sex offender subject to registration under RCW 9A.44.130 who
changes his or her name at the time of marriage by so indicating on the
marriage certificate shall follow the procedures set forth in RCW
9A.44.130(6).

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.44.130 and 2011 c 337 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any adult or juvenile residing whether or not the person has
a fixed residence, or who is a student, is employed, or carries on a
vocation in this state who has been found to have committed or has been
convicted of any sex offense or kidnapping offense, or who has been
found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of
committing any sex offense or kidnapping offense, shall register with
the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the
person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's
school, or place of employment or vocation, or as otherwise specified
in this section. When a person required to register under this section
is in custody of the state department of corrections, the state
department of social and health services, a local division of youth
services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility as a result of
a sex offense or kidnapping offense, the person shall also register at
the time of release from custody with an official designated by the
agency that has jurisdiction over the person.
(b) Any adult or juvenile who is required to register under (a) of
this subsection must give notice to the county sheriff of the county
with whom the person is registered within three business days:
(i) Prior to arriving at a school or institution of higher
education to attend classes;
(ii) Prior to starting work at an institution of higher education;
or
(iii) After any termination of enrollment or employment at a school
or institution of higher education.
(2)(a) A person required to register under this section must
provide the following information when registering: (i) Name and any
aliases used; (ii) complete and accurate residential address or, if the
person lacks a fixed residence, where he or she plans to stay; (iii)
date and place of birth; (iv) place of employment; (v) crime for which
convicted; (vi) date and place of conviction; (vii) social security
number; (viii) photograph; and (ix) fingerprints.
(b) A person may be required to update any of the information
required in this subsection in conjunction with any address
verification conducted by the county sheriff or as part of any notice
required by this section.
(c) A photograph or copy of an individual's fingerprints may be
taken at any time to update an individual's file.
(3)(a) Offenders shall register with the county sheriff within the
following deadlines:
(i) OFFENDERS IN CUSTODY. (A) Sex offenders who committed a sex
offense on, before, or after February 28, 1990, and who, on or after
July 28, 1991, are in custody, as a result of that offense, of the
state department of corrections, the state department of social and
health services, a local division of youth services, or a local jail or
juvenile detention facility, and (B) kidnapping offenders who on or
after July 27, 1997, are in custody of the state department of
corrections, the state department of social and health services, a
local division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention
facility, must register at the time of release from custody with an
official designated by the agency that has jurisdiction over the
offender. The agency shall within three days forward the registration
information to the county sheriff for the county of the offender's
anticipated residence. The offender must also register within three
business days from the time of release with the county sheriff for the
county of the person's residence, or if the person is not a resident of
Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of employment
or vocation. The agency that has jurisdiction over the offender shall
provide notice to the offender of the duty to register.
When the agency with jurisdiction intends to release an offender
with a duty to register under this section, and the agency has
knowledge that the offender is eligible for developmental disability
services from the department of social and health services, the agency
shall notify the division of developmental disabilities of the release.
Notice shall occur not more than thirty days before the offender is to
be released. The agency and the division shall assist the offender in
meeting the initial registration requirement under this section.
Failure to provide such assistance shall not constitute a defense for
any violation of this section.
(ii) OFFENDERS NOT IN CUSTODY BUT UNDER STATE OR LOCAL
JURISDICTION. Sex offenders who, on July 28, 1991, are not in custody
but are under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence review
board or under the department of corrections' active supervision, as
defined by the department of corrections, the state department of
social and health services, or a local division of youth services, for
sex offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990, must
register within ten days of July 28, 1991. Kidnapping offenders who,
on July 27, 1997, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of
the indeterminate sentence review board or under the department of
corrections' active supervision, as defined by the department of
corrections, the state department of social and health services, or a
local division of youth services, for kidnapping offenses committed
before, on, or after July 27, 1997, must register within ten days of
July 27, 1997. A change in supervision status of a sex offender who
was required to register under this subsection (3)(a)(ii) as of July
28, 1991, or a kidnapping offender required to register as of July 27,
1997, shall not relieve the offender of the duty to register or to
reregister following a change in residence.
(iii) OFFENDERS UNDER FEDERAL JURISDICTION. Sex offenders who, on
or after July 23, 1995, and kidnapping offenders who, on or after July
27, 1997, as a result of that offense are in the custody of the United
States bureau of prisons or other federal or military correctional
agency for sex offenses committed before, on, or after February 28,
1990, or kidnapping offenses committed on, before, or after July 27,
1997, must register within three business days from the time of release
with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if
the person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's
school, or place of employment or vocation. Sex offenders who, on July
23, 1995, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the
United States bureau of prisons, United States courts, United States
parole commission, or military parole board for sex offenses committed
before, on, or after February 28, 1990, must register within ten days
of July 23, 1995. Kidnapping offenders who, on July 27, 1997, are not
in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the United States bureau
of prisons, United States courts, United States parole commission, or
military parole board for kidnapping offenses committed before, on, or
after July 27, 1997, must register within ten days of July 27, 1997.
A change in supervision status of a sex offender who was required to
register under this subsection (3)(a)(iii) as of July 23, 1995, or a
kidnapping offender required to register as of July 27, 1997 shall not
relieve the offender of the duty to register or to reregister following
a change in residence, or if the person is not a resident of
Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of employment
or vocation.
(iv) OFFENDERS WHO ARE CONVICTED BUT NOT CONFINED. Sex offenders
who are convicted of a sex offense on or after July 28, 1991, for a sex
offense that was committed on or after February 28, 1990, and
kidnapping offenders who are convicted on or after July 27, 1997, for
a kidnapping offense that was committed on or after July 27, 1997, but
who are not sentenced to serve a term of confinement immediately upon
sentencing, shall report to the county sheriff to register within three
business days of being sentenced.
(v) OFFENDERS WHO ARE NEW RESIDENTS OR RETURNING WASHINGTON
RESIDENTS. Sex offenders and kidnapping offenders who move to
Washington state from another state or a foreign country that are not
under the jurisdiction of the state department of corrections, the
indeterminate sentence review board, or the state department of social
and health services at the time of moving to Washington, must register
within three business days of establishing residence or reestablishing
residence if the person is a former Washington resident. The duty to
register under this subsection applies to sex offenders convicted under
the laws of another state or a foreign country, federal or military
statutes for offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990,
or Washington state for offenses committed before, on, or after
February 28, 1990, and to kidnapping offenders convicted under the laws
of another state or a foreign country, federal or military statutes, or
Washington state for offenses committed before, on, or after July 27,
1997. Sex offenders and kidnapping offenders from other states or a
foreign country who, when they move to Washington, are under the
jurisdiction of the department of corrections, the indeterminate
sentence review board, or the department of social and health services
must register within three business days of moving to Washington. The
agency that has jurisdiction over the offender shall notify the
offender of the registration requirements before the offender moves to
Washington.
(vi) OFFENDERS FOUND NOT GUILTY BY REASON OF INSANITY. Any adult
or juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity under
chapter 10.77 RCW of (A) committing a sex offense on, before, or after
February 28, 1990, and who, on or after July 23, 1995, is in custody,
as a result of that finding, of the state department of social and
health services, or (B) committing a kidnapping offense on, before, or
after July 27, 1997, and who on or after July 27, 1997, is in custody,
as a result of that finding, of the state department of social and
health services, must register within three business days from the time
of release with the county sheriff for the county of the person's
residence. The state department of social and health services shall
provide notice to the adult or juvenile in its custody of the duty to
register. Any adult or juvenile who has been found not guilty by
reason of insanity of committing a sex offense on, before, or after
February 28, 1990, but who was released before July 23, 1995, or any
adult or juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity
of committing a kidnapping offense but who was released before July 27,
1997, shall be required to register within three business days of
receiving notice of this registration requirement.
(vii) OFFENDERS WHO LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE. Any person who lacks
a fixed residence and leaves the county in which he or she is
registered and enters and remains within a new county for twenty-four
hours is required to register with the county sheriff not more than
three business days after entering the county and provide the
information required in subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(viii) OFFENDERS WHO LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE AND WHO ARE UNDER
SUPERVISION. Offenders who lack a fixed residence and who are under
the supervision of the department shall register in the county of their
supervision.
(ix) OFFENDERS WHO MOVE TO, WORK, CARRY ON A VOCATION, OR ATTEND
SCHOOL IN ANOTHER STATE. Offenders required to register in Washington,
who move to another state, or who work, carry on a vocation, or attend
school in another state shall register a new address, fingerprints, and
photograph with the new state within three business days after
establishing residence, or after beginning to work, carry on a
vocation, or attend school in the new state. The person must also send
written notice within three business days of moving to the new state or
to a foreign country to the county sheriff with whom the person last
registered in Washington state. The county sheriff shall promptly
forward this information to the Washington state patrol.
(b) The county sheriff shall not be required to determine whether
the person is living within the county.
(c) An arrest on charges of failure to register, service of an
information, or a complaint for a violation of RCW 9A.44.132, or
arraignment on charges for a violation of RCW 9A.44.132, constitutes
actual notice of the duty to register. Any person charged with the
crime of failure to register under RCW 9A.44.132 who asserts as a
defense the lack of notice of the duty to register shall register
within three business days following actual notice of the duty through
arrest, service, or arraignment. Failure to register as required under
this subsection (3)(c) constitutes grounds for filing another charge of
failing to register. Registering following arrest, service, or
arraignment on charges shall not relieve the offender from criminal
liability for failure to register prior to the filing of the original
charge.
(d) The deadlines for the duty to register under this section do
not relieve any sex offender of the duty to register under this section
as it existed prior to July 28, 1991.
(4)(a) If any person required to register pursuant to this section
changes his or her residence address within the same county, the person
must provide, by certified mail, with return receipt requested or in
person, signed written notice of the change of address to the county
sheriff within three business days of moving.
(b) If any person required to register pursuant to this section
moves to a new county, the person must register with that county
sheriff within three business days of moving. Within three business
days, the person must also provide, by certified mail, with return
receipt requested or in person, signed written notice of the change of
address in the new county to the county sheriff with whom the person
last registered. The county sheriff with whom the person last
registered shall promptly forward the information concerning the change
of address to the county sheriff for the county of the person's new
residence. Upon receipt of notice of change of address to a new state,
the county sheriff shall promptly forward the information regarding the
change of address to the agency designated by the new state as the
state's offender registration agency.
(5)(a) Any person required to register under this section who lacks
a fixed residence shall provide signed written notice to the sheriff of
the county where he or she last registered within three business days
after ceasing to have a fixed residence. The notice shall include the
information required by subsection (2)(a) of this section, except the
photograph and fingerprints. The county sheriff may, for reasonable
cause, require the offender to provide a photograph and fingerprints.
The sheriff shall forward this information to the sheriff of the county
in which the person intends to reside, if the person intends to reside
in another county.
(b) A person who lacks a fixed residence must report weekly, in
person, to the sheriff of the county where he or she is registered.
The weekly report shall be on a day specified by the county sheriff's
office, and shall occur during normal business hours. The person must
keep an accurate accounting of where he or she stays during the week
and provide it to the county sheriff upon request. The lack of a fixed
residence is a factor that may be considered in determining an
offender's risk level and shall make the offender subject to disclosure
of information to the public at large pursuant to RCW 4.24.550.
(c) If any person required to register pursuant to this section
does not have a fixed residence, it is an affirmative defense to the
charge of failure to register, that he or she provided written notice
to the sheriff of the county where he or she last registered within
three business days of ceasing to have a fixed residence and has
subsequently complied with the requirements of subsections (3)(a)(vii)
or (viii) and (5) of this section. To prevail, the person must prove
the defense by a preponderance of the evidence.
(6) A sex offender subject to registration requirements under this
section who applies to change his or her name under RCW 4.24.130 or
section 1 of this act or any other law shall submit a copy of the
application to the county sheriff of the county of the person's
residence and to the state patrol not fewer than five days before the
entry of an order granting the name change. No sex offender under the
requirement to register under this section at the time of application
shall be granted an order changing his or her name if the court finds
that doing so will interfere with legitimate law enforcement interests,
except that no order shall be denied when the name change is requested
for religious or legitimate cultural reasons or in recognition of
marriage or dissolution of marriage. A sex offender under the
requirement to register under this section who receives an order or a
marriage certificate changing his or her name shall submit a copy of
the order or marriage certificate to the county sheriff of the county
of the person's residence and to the state patrol within three business
days of the entry of the order.
(7) Except as may otherwise be provided by law, nothing in this
section shall impose any liability upon a peace officer, including a
county sheriff, or law enforcement agency, for failing to release
information authorized under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2015.

--- END ---