BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any state agency authorized to conduct public works contracting
and competitive bidding under this chapter may do so electronically and
may use or accept electronic signatures in these processes. Such
signatures are deemed presumptively valid and enforceable.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Electronic signature" means a signature in electronic form
attached to or logically associated with an electronic record.
(b) "State agency" means any state office or activity of the
executive and judicial branches of state government, including state
departments, offices, divisions, boards, commissions, institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, and correctional and
other types of institutions.
(3) The office of chief information officer, in coordination with
the department of enterprise services and all state agencies with
contracting authority under this chapter, must establish standards and
policies for the electronic submittal of bids and electronic signatures
in public works contracting and competitive bidding processes.

--- END ---