BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.92.050 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 161 are each
amended to read as follows:
The office shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) Conduct a full analysis of student financial aid as a means of:
(a) Fulfilling educational aspirations of students of the state of
Washington((,)); and
(b) Improving the general, social, cultural, and economic character
of the state.
Such an analysis will be a continuous one and will yield current
information relevant to needed improvements in the state program of
student financial aid. The office will disseminate the information
yielded by their analyses to all appropriate individuals and agents.
(2) Monitor compliance of participating institutions of higher
education with financial aid program rules and regulations, and
evaluate continued participation based on performance, including but
not limited to administrative capability, electronic systems, standing
with accreditation bodies, and standing with the United States
department of education, including collection of additional data from
for-profit institutions necessary to evaluate the ability of the
institution to meet commitments to students receiving state aid.
(3) Provide training and assistance to institutions of higher
education regarding financial aid program rules and regulations.
(4) Impose conditions or terminate the participation of an
institution of higher education in state financial aid programs if the
institution of higher education puts state funds at risk or fails to
comply with program rules and regulations, as determined by the
council.
(5) Develop rigorous standards for review for participation of new
institutions of higher education in state financial aid programs.
(6) Design a state program of student financial aid based on the
data of the study referred to in this section. The state programs will
supplement available federal and local aid programs. The state
programs of student financial aid will not exceed the difference
between the budgetary costs of attending an institution of higher
education and the student's total resources, including family support,
personal savings, employment, and federal, state, and local aid
programs.
(((3))) (7) Determine and establish criteria for financial need of
the individual applicant based upon the consideration of that
particular applicant. In making this determination the office shall
consider the following:
(a) Assets and income of the student((.));
(b) Assets and income of the parents, or the individuals legally
responsible for the care and maintenance of the student((.));
(c) The cost of attending the institution of higher education the
student is attending or planning to attend((.)); and
(d) Any other criteria deemed relevant to the office.
(((4))) (8) Set the amount of financial aid to be awarded to any
individual needy or disadvantaged student in any school year.
(((5))) (9) Award financial aid to needy or disadvantaged students
for a school year based upon only that amount necessary to fill the
financial gap between the budgetary cost of attending an institution of
higher education and the family and student contribution.
(((6))) (10) Review the need and eligibility of all applications on
an annual basis and adjust financial aid to reflect changes in the
financial need of the recipients and the cost of attending the
institution of higher education.

--- END ---