BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.43.715 and 2012 c 87 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Consistent with federal law, the commissioner, in consultation
with the board and the health care authority, shall, by rule, select
the largest small group plan in the state by enrollment as the
benchmark plan for the individual and small group market for purposes
of establishing the essential health benefits in Washington state under
P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended.
(2) If the essential health benefits benchmark plan for the
individual and small group market does not include all of the ten
benefit categories specified by section 1302 of P.L. 111-148, as
amended, the commissioner, in consultation with the board and the
health care authority, shall, by rule, supplement the benchmark plan
benefits as needed to meet the minimum requirements of section 1302.
(3) A health plan required to offer the essential health benefits,
other than a health plan offered through the federal basic health
program or medicaid, under P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended, may not be
offered in the state unless the commissioner finds that it is
substantially equal to the benchmark plan. When making this
determination, the commissioner ((must)):
(a) Must ensure that the plan covers the ten essential health
benefits categories specified in section 1302 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010,
as amended; ((and))
(b) May consider whether the health plan has a benefit design that
would create a risk of biased selection based on health status and
whether the health plan contains meaningful scope and level of benefits
in each of the ten essential health benefit categories specified by
section 1302 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended;
(c) Notwithstanding the foregoing, for benefit years beginning
January 1, 2015, and only to the extent permitted by federal law and
guidance, must establish by rule the review and approval requirements
and procedures for pediatric oral services when offered in stand-alone
dental plans in the nongrandfathered individual and small group markets
outside of the exchange; and
(d) Unless prohibited by federal law and guidance, must allow
health carriers to also offer pediatric oral services within the health
benefit plan in the nongrandfathered individual and small group markets
outside of the exchange.
(4) Beginning December 15, 2012, and every year thereafter, the
commissioner shall submit to the legislature a list of state-mandated
health benefits, the enforcement of which will result in federally
imposed costs to the state related to the plans sold through the
exchange because the benefits are not included in the essential health
benefits designated under federal law. The list must include the
anticipated costs to the state of each state-mandated health benefit on
the list and any statutory changes needed if funds are not appropriated
to defray the state costs for the listed mandate. The commissioner may
enforce a mandate on the list for the entire market only if funds are
appropriated in an omnibus appropriations act specifically to pay the
state portion of the identified costs.

--- END ---