BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.405.470 and 2009 c 396 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A school district board of directors shall immediately place an
employee on compulsory administrative leave:
(a) Upon being informed and verifying that an employee whose
certificate or permit authorized under chapter 28A.405 or 28A.410 RCW
is subject to revocation under RCW 28A.410.090(3) upon a guilty plea or
conviction of any felony crime specified under RCW 28A.400.322 has been
charged with any such felony crime; and
(b) If a judge finds there is probable cause for the charge.
(2) A school district board of directors may continue to pay the
regular salary and any compensation due to an employee placed on
compulsory administrative leave pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, but must pay the salary and other compensation into an
interest-bearing trust account where the money remains until resolution
of the criminal case. In the event that the employee enters a guilty
plea or is convicted of any of the applicable charges, the contents of
the trust account must return to the school district. In the event
that the applicable charges are dismissed or the employee is acquitted
of those charges, the contents of the trust account must be transferred
to the employee.
(3) The school district shall immediately terminate the employment
of any person whose certificate or permit authorized under chapter
28A.405 or 28A.410 RCW is subject to revocation under RCW
28A.410.090(3) upon a guilty plea or conviction of any felony crime
specified under RCW 28A.400.322. Employment shall remain terminated
unless the employee successfully prevails on appeal. A school district
board of directors is entitled to recover from the employee any salary
or other compensation that may have been paid to the employee for the
period between such time as the employee was placed on administrative
leave, based upon criminal charges that the employee committed a felony
crime specified under RCW 28A.400.322, and the time termination becomes
final. This section shall only apply to employees holding a
certificate or permit who have contact with children during the course
of their employment.

--- END ---