BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.200 and 2011 c 359 s 2 and 2011 c 253 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
It shall be the director's duty with regard to licensing:
(1) In consultation and with the advice and assistance of persons
representative of the various type agencies to be licensed, to
designate categories of child care facilities for which separate or
different requirements shall be developed as may be appropriate whether
because of variations in the ages and other characteristics of the
children served, variations in the purposes and services offered or
size or structure of the agencies to be licensed, or because of any
other factor relevant thereto;
(2) In consultation with the state fire marshal's office, the
director shall use an interagency process to address health and safety
requirements for child care programs that serve school-age children and
are operated in buildings that contain public or private schools that
safely serve children during times in which school is in session;
(3) In consultation with the state fire marshal's office, the
director shall adopt licensing standards that allow children who attend
classes in a school building during school hours to remain in the same
building to participate in before-school or after-school programs;
(4) In consultation and with the advice and assistance of parents
or guardians, and persons representative of the various type agencies
to be licensed, to adopt and publish minimum requirements for licensing
applicable to each of the various categories of agencies to be licensed
under this chapter;
(((4))) (5) In consultation with law enforcement personnel, the
director shall investigate the conviction record or pending charges of
each agency and its staff seeking licensure or relicensure, and other
persons having unsupervised access to children in care;
(((5))) (6) To satisfy the shared background check requirements
provided for in RCW 43.215.215 and 43.20A.710, the department of early
learning and the department of social and health services shall share
federal fingerprint-based background check results as permitted under
the law. The purpose of this provision is to allow both departments to
fulfill their joint background check responsibility of checking any
individual who may have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults,
children, or juveniles. Neither department may share the federal
background check results with any other state agency or person;
(((6))) (7) To issue, revoke, or deny licenses to agencies pursuant
to this chapter. Licenses shall specify the category of care that an
agency is authorized to render and the ages and number of children to
be served;
(((7))) (8) To prescribe the procedures and the form and contents
of reports necessary for the administration of this chapter and to
require regular reports from each licensee;
(((8))) (9) To inspect agencies periodically to determine whether
or not there is compliance with this chapter and the requirements
adopted under this chapter;
(((9))) (10) To review requirements adopted under this chapter at
least every two years and to adopt appropriate changes after
consultation with affected groups for child day care requirements; and
(((10))) (11) To consult with public and private agencies in order
to help them improve their methods and facilities for the care and
early learning of children.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.210 and 2006 c 265 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of
fire protection, shall have the power and it shall be his or her duty:
(1) In consultation with the director and with the advice and
assistance of persons representative of the various type agencies to be
licensed, to adopt recognized minimum standard requirements pertaining
to each category of agency established pursuant to this chapter
necessary to protect all persons residing therein from fire hazards;
(2) To adopt minimum standard requirements to allow children who
attend classes in a school building during school hours to remain in
the same building to participate in before-school or after-school
programs;
(3) To make or cause to be made such inspections and investigations
of agencies as he or she deems necessary;
(((3))) (4) To make a periodic review of requirements under RCW
43.215.200(((5))) (9) and to adopt necessary changes after consultation
as required in subsection (1) of this section;
(((4))) (5) To issue to applicants for licenses under this chapter
who comply with the requirements, a certificate of compliance, a copy
of which shall be presented to the department before a license shall be
issued, except that an initial license may be issued as provided in RCW
43.215.280.

--- END ---