BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.13.182 and 1998 c 286 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a city or town planning under chapter
36.70A RCW as of June 30, 1994, may resolve to annex territory to the
city or town if there is, within the city or town, unincorporated
territory containing residential property owners within the same county
and within the same urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110
as the city or town:
(a) Containing less than one hundred acres and having at least
eighty percent of the boundaries of such area contiguous to the city or
town; or
(b) Of any size and having at least eighty percent of the
boundaries of the area contiguous to the city if the area existed
before June 30, 1994.
(2) The resolution shall describe the boundaries of the area to be
annexed, state the number of voters residing in the area as nearly as
may be, and set a date for a public hearing on the resolution for
annexation. Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication of the
resolution at least once a week for two weeks before the date of the
hearing in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
city or town and one or more newspapers of general circulation within
the area to be annexed.
(3) For purposes of subsection (1)(b) of this section, territory
bounded by a river, lake, or other body of water is considered
contiguous to a city that is also bounded by the same river, lake, or
other body of water.
(4) The annexation method authorized by this section may be used
only after obtaining approval by the owners of not less than seventy
percent in value according to the assessed valuation for general
taxation of the property for which annexation is proposed.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.13.238 and 2009 c 60 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) An annexation by a city or town that is proposing to annex
territory served by one or more fire protection districts may be
accomplished by ordinance after satisfying the requirements of this
section and entering into an interlocal agreement as provided in
chapter 39.34 RCW with the county and the fire protection district or
districts that have jurisdiction over the territory proposed for
annexation.
(b) A city or town proposing to annex territory shall initiate the
interlocal agreement process by sending notice to the fire protection
district representative and county representative stating the city's or
town's interest to enter into an interlocal agreement negotiation
process. The parties have forty-five days to respond in the
affirmative or negative. A negative response must state the reasons
the parties do not wish to participate in an interlocal agreement
negotiation. A failure to respond within the forty-five day period is
deemed an affirmative response and the interlocal agreement negotiation
process may proceed. The interlocal agreement process may not proceed
if any negative responses are received within the forty-five day
period.
(c) The interlocal agreement must describe the boundaries of the
territory proposed for annexation and must be consistent with the
boundaries identified in an ordinance describing the boundaries of the
territory proposed for annexation and setting a date for a public
hearing on the ordinance. If the boundaries of the territory proposed
for annexation are agreed to by all parties, a notice of intention must
be filed with the boundary review board created under RCW 36.93.030.
However, the jurisdiction of the board may not be invoked as described
in RCW 36.93.100 for annexations that are the subject of such
agreement.
(2) An interlocal annexation agreement under this section must
include the following:
(a) A statement of the goals of the agreement. Goals must include,
but are not limited to:
(i) The transfer of revenues and assets between the fire protection
districts and the city or town;
(ii) A consideration and discussion of the impact to the level of
service of annexation on the unincorporated area, and an agreement that
the impact on the ability of fire protection and emergency medical
services within the incorporated area must not be negatively impacted
at least through the budget cycle in which the annexation occurs;
(iii) A discussion with fire protection districts regarding the
division of assets and its impact to citizens inside and outside the
newly annexed area;
(iv) Community involvement, including an agreed upon schedule of
public meetings in the area or areas proposed for annexation;
(v) Revenue sharing, if any;
(vi) Debt distribution;
(vii) Capital facilities obligations of the city, county, and fire
protection districts;
(viii) An overall schedule or plan on the timing of any annexations
covered under this agreement; and
(ix) A description of which of the annexing cities' development
regulations will apply and be enforced in the area.
(b) The subject areas and policies and procedures the parties agree
to undertake in annexations. Subject areas may include, but are not
limited to:
(i) Roads and traffic impact mitigation;
(ii) Surface and storm water management;
(iii) Coordination and timing of comprehensive plan and development
regulation updates;
(iv) Outstanding bonds and special or improvement district
assessments;
(v) Annexation procedures;
(vi) Distribution of debt and revenue sharing for annexation
proposals, code enforcement, and inspection services;
(vii) Financial and administrative services; and
(viii) Consultation with other service providers, including water-sewer districts, if applicable.
(c) A term of at least five years, which may be extended by mutual
agreement of the city or town, the county, and the fire protection
district.
(3) If the fire protection district, annexing city or town, and
county reach an agreement on the enumerated goals, the annexation
ordinance may proceed and is not subject to referendum. If only the
annexing city or town and county reach an agreement on the enumerated
goals, the city or town and county may proceed with annexation under
the interlocal agreement, but the annexation ordinance provided for in
this section is subject to referendum for forty-five days after its
passage. Upon the filing of a timely and sufficient referendum
petition with the legislative body of the city or town, signed by
qualified electors in a number not less than ten percent of the votes
cast in the last general state election in the area to be annexed, the
question of annexation must be submitted to the voters of the area in
a general election if one is to be held within ninety days or at a
special election called for that purpose according to RCW 29A.04.330.
Notice of the election must be given as provided in RCW 35.13.080, and
the election must be conducted as provided in the general election laws
under Title 29A RCW. The annexation must be deemed approved by the
voters unless a majority of the votes cast on the proposition are in
opposition to the annexation.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from, but excluding,
the date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if a timely and
sufficient referendum petition has not been filed, the area annexed
becomes a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the ordinance
of annexation.
(4) If any portion of a fire protection district is proposed for
annexation to or incorporation into a city or town, both the fire
protection district and the city or town shall jointly inform the
employees of the fire protection district about hires, separations,
terminations, and any other changes in employment that are a direct
consequence of annexation or incorporation at the earliest reasonable
opportunity.
(5) The needed employees shall be taken in order of seniority and
the remaining employees who transfer as provided in this section and
RCW 35.10.360 and 35.10.370 shall head the list for employment in the
civil service system in order of their seniority, to the end that they
shall be the first to be reemployed in the city or town fire department
when appropriate positions become available. Employees who are not
immediately hired by the city or town shall be placed on a reemployment
list for a period not to exceed thirty-six months unless a longer
period is authorized by an agreement reached between the collective
bargaining representatives of the employees of the annexing and annexed
fire agencies and the annexing and annexed fire agencies.
(6)(a) Upon transfer, an employee is entitled to the employee
rights, benefits, and privileges to which he or she would have been
entitled as an employee of the fire protection district, including
rights to:
(i) Compensation at least equal to the level of compensation at the
time of transfer, unless the employee's rank and duties have been
reduced as a result of the transfer. If the transferring employee is
placed in a position with reduced rank and duties, the employee's
compensation may be adjusted, but the adjustment may not result in a
decrease of greater than fifty percent of the difference between the
employee's compensation before the transfer and the compensation level
for the position that the employee is transferred to;
(ii) Retirement, vacation, sick leave, and any other accrued
benefit;
(iii) Promotion and service time accrual; and
(iv) The length or terms of probationary periods, including no
requirement for an additional probationary period if one had been
completed before the transfer date.
(b) (a) of this subsection does not apply if upon transfer an
agreement for different terms of transfer is reached between the
collective bargaining representatives of the transferring employees and
the participating fire protection jurisdictions.
(7) If upon transfer, the transferring employee receives the
rights, benefits, and privileges established under subsection (6)(a)(i)
through (iv) of this section, those rights, benefits, and privileges
are subject to collective bargaining at the end of the current
bargaining period for the jurisdiction to which the employee has
transferred.
(8) Such bargaining must take into account the years of service the
transferring employee accumulated before the transfer and must be
treated as if those years of service occurred in the jurisdiction to
which the employee has transferred.
(9) The annexation method authorized by this section may be used
only after obtaining approval: (a) By the owners of not less than
seventy percent in value according to the assessed valuation for
general taxation of the property for which annexation is proposed; or
(b) through a ballot proposition, conducted in accordance with RCW
35.13.070, that is approved by sixty percent of the voters voting on
the proposition.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.13.470 and 2003 c 299 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a county, city, or town planning under
chapter 36.70A RCW and subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215
may initiate an annexation process for unincorporated territory by
adopting a resolution commencing negotiations for an interlocal
agreement as provided in chapter 39.34 RCW between a county and any
city or town within the county. The territory proposed for annexation
must meet the following criteria: (a) Be within the city or town urban
growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110, and (b) at least sixty
percent of the boundaries of the territory proposed for annexation must
be contiguous to the annexing city or town or one or more cities or
towns.
(2) If the territory proposed for annexation has been designated in
an adopted county comprehensive plan as part of an urban growth area,
urban service area, or potential annexation area for a specific city or
town, or if the urban growth area territory proposed for annexation has
been designated in a written agreement between a city or town and a
county for annexation to a specific city or town, the designation or
designations shall receive full consideration before a city or county
may initiate the annexation process provided for in RCW 35.13.480.
(3) The agreement shall describe the boundaries of the territory to
be annexed. A public hearing shall be held by each legislative body,
separately or jointly, before the agreement is executed. Each
legislative body holding a public hearing shall, separately or jointly,
publish the agreement at least once a week for two weeks before the
date of the hearing in one or more newspapers of general circulation
within the territory proposed for annexation.
(4) Following adoption and execution of the agreement by both
legislative bodies, the city or town legislative body shall adopt an
ordinance providing for the annexation of the territory described in
the agreement. The legislative body shall cause notice of the proposed
effective date of the annexation, together with a description of the
property to be annexed, to be published at least once each week for two
weeks subsequent to passage of the ordinance, in one or more newspapers
of general circulation within the city and in one or more newspapers of
general circulation within the territory to be annexed. If the
annexation ordinance provides for assumption of indebtedness or
adoption of a proposed zoning regulation, the notice shall include a
statement of the requirements. Any territory to be annexed through an
ordinance adopted under this section is annexed and becomes a part of
the city or town upon the date fixed in the ordinance of annexation,
which date may not be fewer than forty-five days after adoption of the
ordinance.
(5) The annexation method authorized by this section may be used
only after obtaining approval: (a) By the owners of not less than
seventy percent in value according to the assessed valuation for
general taxation of the property for which annexation is proposed; or
(b) through a ballot proposition, conducted in accordance with RCW
35.13.070, that is approved by sixty percent of the voters voting on
the proposition.

Sec. 4 RCW 35.13.480 and 2006 c 344 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any county planning under chapter
36.70A RCW and subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215 may
initiate an annexation process with the legislative body of any other
cities or towns that are contiguous to the territory proposed for
annexation in RCW 35.13.470 if:
(a) The county legislative body initiated an annexation process as
provided in RCW 35.13.470; and
(b) The affected city or town legislative body adopted a responsive
resolution rejecting the proposed annexation or declined to create the
requested interlocal agreement with the county; or
(c) More than one hundred eighty days have passed since adoption of
a county resolution as provided for in RCW 35.13.470 and the parties
have not adopted or executed an interlocal agreement providing for the
annexation of unincorporated territory. The legislative body for
either the county or an affected city or town may, however, pass a
resolution extending the negotiation period for one or more six-month
periods if a public hearing is held and findings of fact are made prior
to each extension.
(2) Any county initiating the process provided for in subsection
(1) of this section must do so by adopting a resolution commencing
negotiations for an interlocal agreement as provided in chapter 39.34
RCW between the county and any city or town within the county. The
annexation area must be within an urban growth area designated under
RCW 36.70A.110 and at least sixty percent of the boundaries of the
territory to be annexed must be contiguous to one or more cities or
towns.
(3) The agreement shall describe the boundaries of the territory to
be annexed. A public hearing shall be held by each legislative body,
separately or jointly, before the agreement is executed. Each
legislative body holding a public hearing shall, separately or jointly,
publish the agreement at least once a week for two weeks before the
date of the hearing in one or more newspapers of general circulation
within the territory proposed for annexation.
(4) Following adoption and execution of the agreement by both
legislative bodies, the city or town legislative body shall adopt an
ordinance providing for the annexation. The legislative body shall
cause notice of the proposed effective date of the annexation, together
with a description of the property to be annexed, to be published at
least once each week for two weeks subsequent to passage of the
ordinance, in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
city and in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
territory to be annexed. If the annexation ordinance provides for
assumption of indebtedness or adoption of a proposed zoning regulation,
the notice shall include a statement of the requirements. Any area to
be annexed through an ordinance adopted under this section is annexed
and becomes a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the
ordinance of annexation, which date may not be less than forty-five
days after adoption of the ordinance.
(5) The annexation ordinances provided for in RCW 35.13.470(4) and
subsection (4) of this section are subject to referendum for forty-five
days after passage. Upon the filing of a timely and sufficient
referendum petition with the legislative body, signed by registered
voters in number equal to not less than fifteen percent of the votes
cast in the last general state election in the area to be annexed, the
question of annexation shall be submitted to the voters of the area in
a general election if one is to be held within ninety days or at a
special election called for that purpose according to RCW 29A.04.330.
Notice of the election shall be given as provided in RCW 35.13.080 and
the election shall be conducted as provided in the general election
law. The annexation shall be deemed approved by the voters unless a
majority of the votes cast on the proposition are in opposition
thereto.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the
date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if no timely and
sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the area annexed shall
become a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the ordinance
of annexation.
(6) If more than one city or town adopts interlocal agreements
providing for annexation of the same unincorporated territory as
provided by this section, an election shall be held in the area to be
annexed pursuant to RCW 35.13.070 and 35.13.080. In addition to the
provisions of RCW 35.13.070 and 35.13.080, the ballot shall also
contain a separate proposition allowing voters to cast votes in favor
of annexation to any one city or town participating in an interlocal
agreement as provided by this section. If a majority of voters voting
on the proposition vote against annexation, the proposition is
defeated. If, however, a majority of voters voting in the election
approve annexation, the area shall be annexed to the city or town
receiving the highest number of votes among those cast in favor of
annexation.
(7) The annexation method authorized by this section may be used
only after obtaining approval: (a) By the owners of not less than
seventy percent in value according to the assessed valuation for
general taxation of the property for which annexation is proposed; or
(b) through a ballot proposition, conducted in accordance with RCW
35.13.070, that is approved by sixty percent of the voters voting on
the proposition.
(8) Costs for an election required under subsection (6) or (7) of
this section shall be borne by the county.

Sec. 5 RCW 35A.14.295 and 1997 c 429 s 36 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a code city may resolve to annex
territory containing residential property owners to the city if there
is within the city, unincorporated territory:
(a) Containing less than one hundred acres and having at least
eighty percent of the boundaries of such area contiguous to the code
city; or
(b) Of any size and having at least eighty percent of the
boundaries of such area contiguous to the city if such area existed
before June 30, 1994, and is within the same county and within the same
urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110, and the city was
planning under chapter 36.70A RCW as of June 30, 1994.
(2) The resolution shall describe the boundaries of the area to be
annexed, state the number of voters residing therein as nearly as may
be, and set a date for a public hearing on such resolution for
annexation. Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication of the
resolution at least once a week for two weeks prior to the date of the
hearing, in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
code city and one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
area to be annexed.
(3) For purposes of subsection (1)(b) of this section, territory
bounded by a river, lake, or other body of water is considered
contiguous to a city that is also bounded by the same river, lake, or
other body of water.
(4) The annexation method authorized by this section may be used
only after obtaining approval by the owners of not less than seventy
percent in value according to the assessed valuation for general
taxation of the property for which annexation is proposed.

Sec. 6 RCW 35A.14.460 and 2003 c 299 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a county or code city planning under
chapter 36.70A RCW and subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215
may initiate an annexation process for unincorporated territory by
adopting a resolution commencing negotiations for an interlocal
agreement as provided in chapter 39.34 RCW between a county and any
code city within the county. The territory proposed for annexation
must meet the following criteria: (a) Be within the code city urban
growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110, and (b) at least sixty
percent of the boundaries of the territory proposed for annexation must
be contiguous to the annexing code city or one or more cities or towns.
(2) If the territory proposed for annexation has been designated in
an adopted county comprehensive plan as part of an urban growth area,
urban service area, or potential annexation area for a specific city,
or if the urban growth area territory proposed for annexation has been
designated in a written agreement between a city and a county for
annexation to a specific city or town, the designation or designations
shall receive full consideration before a city or county may initiate
the annexation process provided for in RCW 35A.14.470.
(3) The agreement shall describe the boundaries of the territory to
be annexed. A public hearing shall be held by each legislative body,
separately or jointly, before the agreement is executed. Each
legislative body holding a public hearing shall, separately or jointly,
publish the agreement at least once a week for two weeks before the
date of the hearing in one or more newspapers of general circulation
within the territory proposed for annexation.
(4) Following adoption and execution of the agreement by both
legislative bodies, the city legislative body shall adopt an ordinance
providing for the annexation of the territory described in the
agreement. The legislative body shall cause notice of the proposed
effective date of the annexation, together with a description of the
property to be annexed, to be published at least once each week for two
weeks subsequent to passage of the ordinance, in one or more newspapers
of general circulation within the city and in one or more newspapers of
general circulation within the territory to be annexed. If the
annexation ordinance provides for assumption of indebtedness or
adoption of a proposed zoning regulation, the notice shall include a
statement of the requirements. Any territory to be annexed through an
ordinance adopted under this section is annexed and becomes a part of
the city upon the date fixed in the ordinance of annexation, which date
may not be fewer than forty-five days after adoption of the ordinance.
(5) The annexation method authorized by this section may be used
only after obtaining approval: (a) By the owners of not less than
seventy percent in value according to the assessed valuation for
general taxation of the property for which annexation is proposed; or
(b) through a ballot proposition, conducted in accordance with RCW
35.13.070, that is approved by sixty percent of the voters voting on
the proposition.

Sec. 7 RCW 35A.14.470 and 2006 c 344 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any county planning under chapter
36.70A RCW and subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215 may
initiate an annexation process with the legislative body of any other
cities or towns that are contiguous to the territory proposed for
annexation in RCW 35A.14.460 if:
(a) The county legislative body initiated an annexation process as
provided in RCW 35A.14.460; and
(b) The affected city legislative body adopted a responsive
resolution rejecting the proposed annexation or declined to create the
requested interlocal agreement with the county; or
(c) More than one hundred eighty days have passed since adoption of
a county resolution as provided for in RCW 35A.14.460 and the parties
have not adopted or executed an interlocal agreement providing for the
annexation of unincorporated territory. The legislative body for
either the county or an affected city may, however, pass a resolution
extending the negotiation period for one or more six-month periods if
a public hearing is held and findings of fact are made prior to each
extension.
(2) Any county initiating the process provided for in subsection
(1) of this section must do so by adopting a resolution commencing
negotiations for an interlocal agreement as provided in chapter 39.34
RCW between the county and any city or town within the county. The
annexation area must be within an urban growth area designated under
RCW 36.70A.110 and at least sixty percent of the boundaries of the
territory to be annexed must be contiguous to one or more cities or
towns.
(3) The agreement shall describe the boundaries of the territory to
be annexed. A public hearing shall be held by each legislative body,
separately or jointly, before the agreement is executed. Each
legislative body holding a public hearing shall, separately or jointly,
publish the agreement at least once a week for two weeks before the
date of the hearing in one or more newspapers of general circulation
within the territory proposed for annexation.
(4) Following adoption and execution of the agreement by both
legislative bodies, the city or town legislative body shall adopt an
ordinance providing for the annexation. The legislative body shall
cause notice of the proposed effective date of the annexation, together
with a description of the property to be annexed, to be published at
least once each week for two weeks subsequent to passage of the
ordinance, in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
city and in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
territory to be annexed. If the annexation ordinance provides for
assumption of indebtedness or adoption of a proposed zoning regulation,
the notice shall include a statement of the requirements. Any area to
be annexed through an ordinance adopted under this section is annexed
and becomes a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the
ordinance of annexation, which date may not be less than forty-five
days after adoption of the ordinance.
(5) The annexation ordinances provided for in RCW 35A.14.460(4) and
subsection (4) of this section are subject to referendum for forty-five
days after passage. Upon the filing of a timely and sufficient
referendum petition with the legislative body, signed by registered
voters in number equal to not less than fifteen percent of the votes
cast in the last general state election in the area to be annexed, the
question of annexation shall be submitted to the voters of the area in
a general election if one is to be held within ninety days or at a
special election called for that purpose according to RCW 29A.04.330.
Notice of the election shall be given as provided in RCW 35A.14.070 and
the election shall be conducted as provided in the general election
law. The annexation shall be deemed approved by the voters unless a
majority of the votes cast on the proposition are in opposition
thereto.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the
date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if no timely and
sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the area annexed shall
become a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the ordinance
of annexation.
(6) If more than one city or town adopts interlocal agreements
providing for annexation of the same unincorporated territory as
provided by this section, an election shall be held in the area to be
annexed pursuant to RCW 35A.14.070. In addition to the provisions of
RCW 35A.14.070, the ballot shall also contain a separate proposition
allowing voters to cast votes in favor of annexation to any one city or
town participating in an interlocal agreement as provided by this
section. If a majority of voters voting on the proposition vote
against annexation, the proposition is defeated. If, however, a
majority of voters voting in the election approve annexation, the area
shall be annexed to the city or town receiving the highest number of
votes among those cast in favor of annexation.
(7) The annexation method authorized by this section may be used
only after obtaining approval: (a) By the owners of not less than
seventy percent in value according to the assessed valuation for
general taxation of the property for which annexation is proposed; or
(b) through a ballot proposition, conducted in accordance with RCW
35.13.070, that is approved by sixty percent of the voters voting on
the proposition.
(8) Costs for an election required under subsection (6) or (7) of
this section shall be borne by the county.

Sec. 8 RCW 35A.14.480 and 2009 c 60 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) An annexation by a code city proposing to annex territory
served by one or more fire protection districts may be accomplished by
ordinance after satisfying the requirements of this section and
entering into an interlocal agreement as provided in chapter 39.34 RCW
with the county and the fire protection district or districts that have
jurisdiction over the territory proposed for annexation.
(b) A code city proposing to annex territory shall initiate the
interlocal agreement process by sending notice to the fire protection
district representative and county representative stating the code
city's interest to enter into an interlocal agreement negotiation
process. The parties have forty-five days to respond in the
affirmative or negative. A negative response must state the reasons
the parties do not wish to participate in an interlocal agreement
negotiation. A failure to respond within the forty-five day period is
deemed an affirmative response and the interlocal agreement negotiation
process may proceed. The interlocal agreement process may not proceed
if any negative responses are received within the forty-five day
period.
(c) The interlocal agreement must describe the boundaries of the
territory proposed for annexation and must be consistent with the
boundaries identified in an ordinance describing the boundaries of the
territory proposed for annexation and setting a date for a public
hearing on the ordinance. If the boundaries of the territory proposed
for annexation are agreed to by all parties, a notice of intention must
be filed with the boundary review board created under RCW 36.93.030.
However, the jurisdiction of the board may not be invoked as described
in RCW 36.93.100 for annexations that are the subject of such
agreement.
(2) An interlocal annexation agreement under this section must
include the following:
(a) A statement of the goals of the agreement. Goals must include,
but are not limited to:
(i) The transfer of revenues and assets between the fire protection
district and the code city;
(ii) A consideration and discussion of the impact to the level of
service of annexation on the unincorporated area, and an agreement that
the impact on the ability of fire protection and emergency medical
services within the incorporated area must not be negatively impacted
at least through the budget cycle in which the annexation occurs;
(iii) A discussion with fire protection districts regarding the
division of assets and its impact to citizens inside and outside the
newly annexed area;
(iv) Community involvement, including an agreed upon schedule of
public meetings in the area or areas proposed for annexation;
(v) Revenue sharing, if any;
(vi) Debt distribution;
(vii) Capital facilities obligations of the code city, county, and
fire protection districts;
(viii) An overall schedule or plan on the timing of any annexations
covered under this agreement; and
(ix) A description of which of the annexing code cities'
development regulations will apply and be enforced in the area.
(b) The subject areas and policies and procedures the parties agree
to undertake in annexations. Subject areas may include, but are not
limited to:
(i) Roads and traffic impact mitigation;
(ii) Surface and storm water management;
(iii) Coordination and timing of comprehensive plan and development
regulation updates;
(iv) Outstanding bonds and special or improvement district
assessments;
(v) Annexation procedures;
(vi) Distribution of debt and revenue sharing for annexation
proposals, code enforcement, and inspection services;
(vii) Financial and administrative services; and
(viii) Consultation with other service providers, including water-sewer districts, if applicable.
(c) A term of at least five years, which may be extended by mutual
agreement of the code city, the county, and the fire protection
district.
(3) If the fire protection district, annexing code city, and county
reach an agreement on the enumerated goals, the annexation ordinance
may proceed and is not subject to referendum. If only the annexing
code city and county reach an agreement on the enumerated goals, the
code city and county may proceed with annexation under the interlocal
agreement, but the annexation ordinance provided for in this section is
subject to referendum for forty-five days after its passage. Upon the
filing of a timely and sufficient referendum petition with the
legislative body of the code city, signed by qualified electors in a
number not less than ten percent of the votes cast in the last general
state election in the area to be annexed, the question of annexation
must be submitted to the voters of the area in a general election if
one is to be held within ninety days or at a special election called
for that purpose according to RCW 29A.04.330. Notice of the election
must be given as provided in RCW 35A.14.070, and the election must be
conducted as provided in the general election laws under Title 29A RCW.
The annexation must be deemed approved by the voters unless a majority
of the votes cast on the proposition are in opposition to the
annexation.
(4) After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from, but
excluding, the date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if a timely
and sufficient referendum petition has not been filed, the area annexed
becomes a part of the code city upon the date fixed in the ordinance of
annexation.
(5) The annexation method authorized by this section may be used
only after obtaining approval: (a) By the owners of not less than
seventy percent in value according to the assessed valuation for
general taxation of the property for which annexation is proposed; or
(b) through a ballot proposition, conducted in accordance with RCW
35.13.070, that is approved by sixty percent of the voters voting on
the proposition.

--- END ---