BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Gas" means natural gas and casinghead gas, or other gaseous
hydrocarbons from any lands or waters of this state, regardless of
whether it is produced from a gas well or from a well producing oil or
other liquid hydrocarbons.
(2) "Oil" means crude oil, condensate, distillate, or other oil, or
other liquid hydrocarbons extracted from any lands or waters of this
state, regardless of gravity.
(3) "Operating producer" means a producer who shares in the
production expenses of the severed product, and who conducts,
personally or by lease or contract, the daily operations of the
business of producing the product including, but not limited to, the
sale of the product, receipt of proceeds of the sale, and the payment
of expenses.
(4) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(5) "Point of production" means:
(a) For oil, the point where it is severed and is first metered or
measured in a manner approved by the department;
(b) For gas recovered from, or in association with, oil, where it
is severed and is first metered or measured in a manner approved by the
department after separation from the oil; and
(c) For gas not recovered from, or in association with, oil, where
it is severed and is first metered or measured in a manner approved by
the department.
(6) "Producer" means any person having an economic interest in the
severed product, whether engaged in the business of producing or
extracting oil or gas or not, who has, as a result of the ownership of
such interests, a right to receive a part or all of the oil and gas
produced or has a right to receive all or a part of the proceeds of the
oil or gas severed. Such persons include, but are not limited to,
persons owning a royalty interest, an overriding royalty interest, a
working or operating interest, a net profit interest, or any
combination thereof, but does not include laborers or employees working
on or at the production site.
(7) "Severance" means the taking from the lands or waters of this
state of any oil and gas in any manner, except that the withdrawal of
gas from underground storage, as underground storage is defined in RCW
80.40.010, may not constitute severance.
(8) "Value" means the fair market value of the oil or gas when
first metered and at the point of production.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) In addition to any other tax, an excise
tax of five percent is imposed upon the severance of oil and gas from
any lands or waters of this state, less the value of any part of the
oil or gas, the ownership or right to which is exempt from taxation
under section 4 of this act.
(2) The measure of the tax is the value of the oil and gas at the
time and point of production.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The taxes imposed by this chapter on the
severance of oil and gas are the liability of the producer or
producers. The operating producer must file the return with the
department, must pay the tax due, and must deduct and withhold the
ratable share of the tax from payments made to other producers in
proportion to their interest.
(2) If oil or gas on which the severance and conservation taxes are
due is not sold at the time of production but is retained by the
producer, the operating producer must pay to the department the taxes
due with respect to the oil and gas severed but not sold and must
deduct or withhold the ratable share of the tax from payments made to
other producers in proportion to their interest.
(3) The department may require taxes to be paid upon the basis of
the prevailing price being paid when first metered and point of
production of other oil or gas of like kind, character, quality, or
comparable source when the value reported to the department does not
represent the market value of oil or gas sold or retained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following are exempt from the taxes
imposed under this chapter:
(1) The value of any oil or gas reinjected for storage, provided
that any subsequent removal of oil or gas produced in this state from
storage for sale, use, or other retention constitutes a severance
within the meaning of this chapter;
(2) The value of any oil or gas owned by a producer or producers
exempt from tax by reason of federal law or a compact negotiated by the
state with a tribal government; and
(3) The value of liquid hydrocarbons that are a byproduct of carbon
sequestration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 All of chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the tax
imposed by this chapter. The department must provide for the effective
administration of this chapter by rules which must include, but are not
limited to, the value at the time and point of production and a
determination of metering methods, and measuring the severance of oil
and gas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department must deposit eighty
percent of the amount collected under section 2 of this act in the park
land trust revolving fund under RCW 43.30.385 reduced by the amount
contributed by the taxpayer under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A person may choose to contribute up to forty percent of the
tax due under section 2 of this act that would otherwise be deposited
into the park land trust revolving fund under RCW 43.30.385 to the
sustainable energy trust account created in section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) In computing tax owed under this
chapter, a person may take a credit for contributions made to the
sustainable energy trust account. Contributions must be deposited into
the sustainable energy trust account created in this section.
(2) A person may take a credit under this section for up to forty
percent of the person's tax liability in the amount of the contribution
made to the sustainable energy trust account.
(3) A credit claimed under this section may not exceed the person's
tax liability under this chapter in the tax reporting period in which
the credit is claimed. Unused credits may be carried forward until
used.
(4) The sustainable energy trust account is hereby created in the
state treasury. The account must be administered by the housing
finance commission. Only the commission may authorize expenditures
from the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department must deposit twenty percent
of the amount collected under section 2 of this act in the local
government severance taxation account established in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from this account must be used solely for making
distributions to those local governments in which impacts from oil and
gas production activities occur, after appropriation by statute.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.180.260 and 2009 c 65 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If economically feasible, the commission ((shall)) must develop
and implement a sustainable energy trust program to provide financing
for qualified improvement projects. In developing the sustainable
energy trust program, the commission ((shall)) must establish
eligibility criteria for financing that will enable it to choose
eligible applicants who are likely to repay loans made or acquired by
the commission and funded from the proceeds of commission bonds.
(2) The commission ((shall)) must, if economically feasible:
(a) Issue bonds, as defined in RCW 43.180.020, for the purpose of
financing loans for qualified energy efficiency and renewable energy
improvement projects in accordance with RCW 43.180.150;
(b) Participate fully in federal and other governmental programs
and take actions that are necessary and consistent with this chapter to
secure to itself and the people of the state the benefits of programs
to promote energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies;
(c) Contract with a certifying authority to accept applications for
energy efficiency and renewable energy improvement projects, to review
applications, including binding fixed price bids for the improvements,
and to approve qualified improvements for financing by the commission.
For solar electric systems, the certifying authority must use an
application certification process similar to the investment cost
recovery incentive application process provided under RCW 82.16.120.
No work by a certifying authority may commence under this section until
a request has been made by the commission; and
(d) Before entering into a contract with a certifying authority as
defined in RCW 43.180.020(2)(b), consult with the Washington State
University ((energy)) extension (([extension energy])) energy program
to determine which potential improvement technologies are appropriate.
(3) The commission may accept contributions made by a person to the
sustainable energy trust account created in section 7 of this act.
(4) No general fund resources may be expended to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The following real or personal property is exempt from property
taxation: Oil or gas reserves and leases on the rights to develop and
operate upon or within any lands and waters of this state for oil or
gas and the property rights attached to or inherent therein.
(2) This section does not in any way exempt the land, improvements,
or other real or personal property from property taxation.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.30.385 and 2012 c 166 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The park land trust revolving fund is to be utilized by the
department for the purpose of acquiring real property, including all
reasonable costs associated with these acquisitions, as a replacement
for the property transferred to the state parks and recreation
commission, as directed by the legislature in order to maintain the
land base of the affected trusts or under RCW 79.22.060 and to receive
voluntary contributions for the purpose of operating and maintaining
public use and recreation facilities, including trails, managed by the
department.
(2) In addition to the other purposes identified in this section,
the park land trust revolving fund may be utilized by the department to
hold funding for future acquisition of lands for the community forest
trust program from willing sellers under RCW 79.155.040.
(3)(a) Proceeds from transfers of real property to the state parks
and recreation commission or other proceeds identified from transfers
of real property as directed by the legislature ((shall)) must be
deposited in the park land trust revolving fund.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the proceeds
from real property transferred or disposed under RCW 79.22.060 must be
used solely to purchase replacement forest land, that must be actively
managed as a working forest, within the same county as the property
transferred or disposed. If the real property was transferred under
RCW 79.22.060 (1)(c) and (2)(c) from within a county participating in
the state forest land pool created under RCW 79.22.140, replacement
forest land may be located within any county participating in the land
pool.
(c) Disbursement from the park land trust revolving fund to acquire
replacement property and for operating and maintaining public use and
recreation facilities ((shall)) must be on the authorization of the
department.
(d) The proceeds from the recreation access pass account created in
RCW 79A.80.090 must be solely used for the purpose of operating and
maintaining public use and recreation facilities, including trails,
managed by the department.
(4) In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue
control, the park land trust revolving fund is subject in all respects
to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit
expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.
(5) The department is authorized to solicit and receive voluntary
contributions for the purpose of operating and maintaining public use
and recreation facilities, including trails, managed by the department.
The department may seek voluntary contributions from individuals and
organizations for this purpose. Voluntary contributions ((will)) must
be deposited into the park land trust revolving fund and used solely
for the purpose of public use and recreation facilities operations and
maintenance. Voluntary contributions are not considered a fee for use
of these facilities.
(6) A portion of the moneys from this fund collected from the oil
and gas severance tax may be used to recover the cost of oil and gas
regulation as contained in the budget of the department of natural
resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---