BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that: (a) The
benefit that all consumers and communications providers derive from
connection to the public network is enhanced by a universal service
program that enables as many consumers to be connected to the public
network as possible; and (b) consumers in all areas of the state should
have access to communications services at reasonable rates.
(2) Significant changes in the communications marketplace are
adversely affecting the ability of some communications companies to
continue to offer communications services in rural areas of the state
of Washington at rates that are comparable to those prevailing in urban
areas. These changes, absent explicit federal and state universal
service support for such communications companies, may lead to
unreasonable telephone service rate increases or cessation of service
for some Washington consumers.
(3) Pursuant to RCW 80.36.600, enacted in 1998, the legislature
directed the utilities and transportation commission to plan and
prepare to implement a universal service program that would benefit
telecommunications ratepayers in the state by minimizing implicit
sources of support and maximizing explicit sources of support that are
specific, sufficient, competitively neutral, and technologically
neutral to support basic telecommunications services for customers of
telecommunications companies in high-cost locations.
(4) As a result of the foregoing and to enable all consumers in
Washington to access and benefit from a ubiquitous public network, the
legislature intends to create a universal service program that: (a)
Enhances the public network; (b) is funded with a network connection
fee paid by communications providers based upon working telephone
numbers; (c) is administered by a neutral third party selected by the
utilities and transportation commission; (d) is operated pursuant to
rules adopted by the utilities and transportation commission; and (e)
advances universal service in a manner not inconsistent with the
requirements of the federal telecommunications act of 1996 (47 U.S.C.
Sec. 254).

Sec. 2 RCW 80.36.005 and 2009 c 565 s 53 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout ((RCW 80.36.410
through 80.36.475,)) this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Basic residential service" means those services set out in 47
C.F.R. Sec. 54.101(a)(2011) and mandatory extended area service
approved by the commission.
(2) "Communications provider" means a provider that provides a
working telephone number to a final consumer for intrastate wireline or
wireless communications services or interconnected voice over
interconnected protocol service, and includes local exchange carriers.
(3) "Communications services" includes telecommunications services
and information services and any combination thereof.
(4) "Community action agency" means local community action agencies
or local community service agencies designated by the department of
commerce under chapter 43.63A RCW.
(((2))) (5) "Community agency" means local community agencies that
administer community service voice mail programs.
(((3))) (6) "Community service voice mail" means a computerized
voice mail system that provides low-income recipients with: (a) An
individually assigned telephone number; (b) the ability to record a
personal greeting; and (c) a private security code to retrieve
messages.
(((4))) (7) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(((5))) (8) "Incumbent local exchange carrier" has the same meaning
as set forth in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 251(h).
(9) "Incumbent public network" means the network established by
incumbent local exchange carriers for the delivery of communications
services to customers that is used by communications providers for
origination or termination of communications services by or to
customers.
(10) "Interconnected voice over interconnected protocol service"
means an interconnected voice over internet protocol service that: (a)
Enables real-time, two-way voice communications; (b) requires a
broadband connection from the user's location; (c) requires internet
protocol-compatible customer premises equipment; and (d) permits users
generally to receive calls that originate on the public network and to
terminate calls to the public network.
(11) "Program" means the state universal communications service
program created in sections 3 and 4 of this act.
(12) "Service year" means the period between July 1st and June
30th.
(13) "Telecommunications" has the same meaning as defined in 47
U.S.C. Sec. 153(43).
(14) "Telecommunications act of 1996" means the telecommunications
act of 1996 (P.L. 104-104, 110 Stat. 56).
(15) "Working telephone number" means a north American numbering
plan telephone number, or successor dialing protocol that is developed
for use in placing calls to or from the public network, that enables a
consumer to make or receive calls.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A state universal communications service program is
established. The program may not exceed five million dollars in annual
distributions and must be funded on an equitable and nondiscriminatory
basis by every communications provider through the payment of a network
connection fee for connection to the incumbent public network.
Initially, the fee must be a surcharge on each working telephone number
rated within the state of Washington. The commission is authorized to
develop a new basis for the fee as it may determine to be in the public
interest. By order, the commission shall annually establish the
network connection fee. Each communications provider may, but is not
required to, pass-through to its customers the network connection fee
or any portion thereof.
(2) The program must be administered by a neutral third-party
administrator selected by the commission by contract through a
competitive process and subject to commission oversight. The
commission shall establish and approve the budget for the administrator
and the program expenses of the administrator must be paid out of the
fund established for the program after such expenses have been approved
by the commission. The administrator may establish an account or
accounts in one or more independent financial institutions within the
state.
(3) All receipts from the network connection fee created under
subsection (1) of this section, penalties imposed under section 5 of
this act, and other moneys authorized to be deposited in the fund by
law or order of a court of competent jurisdiction must be paid into the
fund, which shall be outside the state treasury and not be subject to
appropriation, as required under RCW 80.36.600(3)(a). Expenditures
from the fund may be used only as provided in this section. Pursuant
to rules adopted by the commission, only the administrator may
authorize expenditures from the fund.
(4) In addition to such other jurisdiction as the commission may
have, and notwithstanding RCW 80.66.010, the commission has
jurisdiction over all communications providers for the following
limited purposes: (a) Assessment, payment, and collection of fees
under subsection (1) of this section; (b) enforcement of fee payment
obligations; and (c) reports and information on the assessment,
payment, and collection of network connection fees and use of moneys
distributed.
(5) The commission shall establish eligibility criteria and
designate incumbent local exchange carriers that are eligible for
support from the fund.
(6) The commission shall use a benchmark equal to the local urban
rate floor established by the federal communications commission as the
affordable residential rate for purposes of administration of the fund.
(7) Communications providers that may receive support from the fund
must meet the eligibility criteria established by the commission and be
one of the following: (a) An incumbent local exchange carrier serving
fewer than forty thousand access lines in the state; or (b) a radio
communications service company providing wireless two-way voice
communications service to less than the equivalent of forty thousand
access lines in the state; provided that RCW 80.66.010 shall not apply
to any radio communications service company that receives support from
the fund, and that company and its intrastate telecommunications
services shall be subject to commission jurisdiction and regulation to
the extent determined by the commission. For purposes of determining
the access line threshold, the access lines or equivalents of all
affiliates must be counted as one carrier.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall adopt rules for the program that include
the following:
(a) Provisions for operation of the program and fund;
(b) Criteria for the selection of an independent neutral third-party administrator of the fund;
(c) Criteria for determining which incumbent local exchange
carriers are eligible for support from the fund;
(d) Contribution and remittance requirements for communications
providers related to the program, as authorized by section 3 of this
act;
(e) The method for establishing the annual benchmark used to
calculate the amount of support an eligible incumbent local exchange
carrier may receive from the fund. The benchmark is the rate the
commission determines to be a reasonable amount customers should pay
for basic residential service provided over the incumbent public
network supported by the program. However, if an incumbent local
exchange carrier is charging rates above the benchmark for the basic
residential service, that provider may not seek distributions from the
fund for the purpose of reducing those rates to the benchmark;
(f) Creation of an advisory board, consisting of a reasonable
balance of representatives from different types of communications
providers and consumers, to advise the commission on selecting and
overseeing the administrator of the fund;
(g) Readopt, amend, or repeal existing commission rules adopted
pursuant to RCW 80.36.610 and 80.36.620 as necessary to be consistent
with this chapter.
(2) The commission shall periodically review the accounts and
records of any communications provider that contribute to or receive
support under the program to ensure compliance with the program and
monitor the providers' use of the funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other penalties prescribed by law, the
commission may impose penalties for failure to make or delays in making
or filing the: (a) Required reports; or (b) payments of the network
connection fee under the program, or both. For the purposes of this
section, the provisions of RCW 80.04.380 through 80.04.405, inclusive,
apply to all companies that are required to contribute to, or that
receive support from, the fund created in section 3 of this act.
(2) Any penalties imposed by the commission under this section or
imposed for a violation of rules adopted under sections 3 through 6 of
this act or RCW 80.36.610 must be payable into the fund.
(3) In addition to any penalties imposed under this section, the
administrator, at the direction of the commission, may withhold
payments to any designated incumbent local exchange carrier that fails
to submit to the administrator information required to be submitted
under sections 3 through 5 of this act.
(4) Any action taken under this section must be taken only after
providing the affected communications provider with notice and an
opportunity for a hearing, unless otherwise provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission may delegate to the commission secretary or other
staff the authority to resolve disputes, approve expenses of the
administrator, and make other administrative decisions necessary to the
administration and supervision of the program consistent with the
relevant statutes and commission rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
By July 1, 2018, the commission shall report to the legislature
regarding whether and how the fund disbursements have been used to
provide rate stability for rural telecommunications customers in the
state and whether this act has served its intended purpose and should
be allowed to expire. Upon expiration of this act, the administrator
shall disburse all remaining funds and end its operations as directed
by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The utilities and transportation commission
shall adopt rules to implement this act prior to the effective date of
the other provisions of this act to ensure that this act is implemented
on its effective date.

Sec. 9 RCW 80.36.610 and 1998 c 337 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) The commission is authorized to take actions, conduct
proceedings, and enter orders as permitted or contemplated for a state
commission under the ((federal)) telecommunications act of 1996((, P.L.
104-104 (110 Stat. 56), but the commission's authority to either
establish a new state program or to adopt new rules to preserve and
advance universal service under section 254(f) of the federal act is
limited to the actions expressly authorized by RCW 80.36.600)). The
commission may establish by rule fees to be paid by persons seeking
commission action under the ((federal)) telecommunications act of 1996,
and by parties to proceedings under that act, to offset in whole or
part the commission's expenses that are not otherwise recovered through
fees in implementing the act((, but new fees or assessments charged
telecommunications carriers to either establish a state program or to
adopt rules to preserve and advance universal service under section
254(f) of the federal act do not take effect until the legislature has
approved a state universal service program.
(2) The legislature intends that under the future universal service
program established in this state:
(a) Every telecommunications carrier that provides intrastate
telecommunications services shall contribute, on an equitable and
nondiscriminatory basis, to the preservation and advancement of
universal service in the state;
(b) The contributions shall be competitively and technologically
neutral; and
(c) The universal service program to be established in accordance
with RCW 80.36.600 shall not be inconsistent with the requirements of
47 U.S.C. Sec. 254)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 7, 9, and 10 of this act
take effect July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Section 8 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 10 of this act expire
June 30, 2019.

--- END ---