BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the sunset review
process allows the legislature to evaluate the need for the continued
existence of agencies and programs, to assess the effectiveness and
performance of these agencies and programs, and to ensure public
accountability. It is the intent of the legislature to continue using
this important accountability tool.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.131.900 and 2000 c 189 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
RCW 43.131.010 through 43.131.150 ((shall)) expire ((on)) June 30,
((2015)) 2025, unless extended by law for an additional fixed period of
time.

--- END ---