BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not prohibit the department of labor and
industries from providing information about scholarship opportunities
offered by nonprofit organizations and available to children and
spouses of workers who suffered an injury in the course of employment
resulting in death or permanent total disability. The department of
labor and industries may, in its sole discretion, provide information
about one or more scholarship opportunities. The cost of printing and
inserting materials, any additional mailing costs, and any other
related costs must be borne by the scholarship organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may provide information about scholarship
opportunities offered by nonprofit organizations and available to
children and spouses of workers who suffered an injury in the course of
employment resulting in death or permanent total disability. The
department may, in its sole discretion, provide information about one
or more scholarship opportunities. The cost of printing and inserting
materials, any additional mailing costs, and any other related costs
must be borne by the scholarship organization.

--- END ---