BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.57A.050 and 2010 c 278 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within sixty days of the establishment of the boundaries of the
public transportation benefit area, the members of the county
legislative authority and the elected representative of each city
within the area shall provide for the selection of the governing body
of such area, the public transportation benefit area authority, which
shall consist of elected officials selected by and serving at the
pleasure of the governing bodies of component cities within the area
and the county legislative authority of each county within the area.
If at the time a public transportation benefit area authority assumes
the public transportation functions previously provided under the
Interlocal Cooperation Act (chapter 39.34 RCW) there are citizen
positions on the governing board of the transit system, those positions
may be retained as positions on the governing board of the public
transportation benefit area authority.
Within such sixty-day period, any city may by resolution of its
legislative body withdraw from participation in the public
transportation benefit area. The county legislative authority and each
city remaining in the public transportation benefit area may disapprove
and prevent the establishment of any governing body of a public
transportation benefit area if the composition thereof does not meet
its approval.
(2) In no case shall the governing body of a single county public
transportation benefit area be greater than nine voting members and in
the case of a multicounty area, fifteen voting members, unless the
governing body of a single county public transportation benefit area
finds it necessary to meet the requirements under RCW 82.14.045(1)(b),
in which case the governing body may have up to fifteen voting members.
Those cities within the transportation benefit area and excluded from
direct membership on the authority are hereby authorized to designate
a member of the authority who shall be entitled to represent the
interests of such city which is excluded from direct membership on the
authority. The legislative body of such city shall notify the
authority as to the determination of its authorized representative on
the authority.
(3) There is one nonvoting member of the public transportation
benefit area authority. The nonvoting member is recommended by the
labor organization representing the public transportation employees
within the local public transportation system. If the public
transportation employees are represented by more than one labor
organization, all such labor organizations shall select the nonvoting
member by majority vote. The nonvoting member shall comply with all
governing bylaws and policies of the authority. The chair or cochairs
of the authority shall exclude the nonvoting member from attending any
executive session held for the purpose of discussing negotiations with
labor organizations. The chair or cochairs may exclude the nonvoting
member from attending any other executive session. The requirement
that a nonvoting member be appointed to the governing body of a public
transportation benefit area authority does not apply to an authority
that has no employees represented by a labor union.
(4) Each member of the authority is eligible to be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and to
receive compensation, as set by the authority, in an amount not to
exceed forty-four dollars for each day during which the member attends
official meetings of the authority or performs prescribed duties
approved by the chair of the authority. Except that the authority may,
by resolution, increase the payment of per diem compensation to each
member from forty-four dollars up to ninety dollars per day or portion
of a day for actual attendance at board meetings or for performance of
other official services or duties on behalf of the authority. In no
event may a member be compensated in any year for more than seventy-five days, except the chair who may be paid compensation for not more
than one hundred days: PROVIDED, That compensation shall not be paid
to an elected official or employee of federal, state, or local
government who is receiving regular full-time compensation from such
government for attending meetings and performing prescribed duties of
the authority.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or
duties while representing more than one of his or her districts.
However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation
if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14.045 and 2008 c 86 s 102 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The legislative body of any city pursuant to RCW 35.92.060,
of any county which has created an unincorporated transportation
benefit area pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110, of any public
transportation benefit area pursuant to RCW 36.57A.080 and 36.57A.090,
of any county transportation authority established pursuant to chapter
36.57 RCW, and of any metropolitan municipal corporation within a
county with a population of one million or more pursuant to chapter
35.58 RCW, may, by resolution or ordinance for the sole purpose of
providing funds for the operation, maintenance, or capital needs of
public transportation systems or public transportation limited to
persons with special needs under RCW 36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, and in
lieu of the excise taxes authorized by RCW 35.95.040, submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters or include such authorization in
a proposition to perform the function of public transportation or
public transportation limited to persons with special needs under RCW
36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, and if approved by a majority of persons
voting thereon, impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms
of this chapter. Where an authorizing proposition is submitted by a
county on behalf of an unincorporated transportation benefit area, it
shall be voted upon by the voters residing within the boundaries of
such unincorporated transportation benefit area and, if approved, the
sales and use tax shall be imposed only within such area.
Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, any
county in which a county public transportation plan has been adopted
pursuant to RCW 36.57.070 and the voters of such county have authorized
the imposition of a sales and use tax pursuant to the provisions of
section 10, chapter 167, Laws of 1974 ex. sess., prior to July 1, 1975,
shall be authorized to fix and impose a sales and use tax as provided
in this section at not to exceed the rate so authorized without
additional approval of the voters of such county as otherwise required
by this section.
(b)(i) The governing body of any public transportation benefit area
with a population of more than two hundred thousand, which also meets
the requirements of (b)(ii) of this subsection, pursuant to RCW
36.57A.080 and 36.57A.090 may, for the sole purpose of providing funds
for the operation, maintenance, or capital needs of public
transportation systems or public transportation limited to persons with
special needs under RCW 36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, and in lieu of the
excise taxes authorized by RCW 35.95.040, impose by a majority weighted
vote a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter.
(ii) The governing body of any public transportation benefit area
that wishes to impose a sales and use tax pursuant to this subsection
(1)(b) must contain one or more members that represents each portion of
the territory of the public transportation benefit area as an elected
official. When voting to impose a sales and use tax pursuant to this
subsection (1)(b), there must be at least one elected official
representing each portion of the territory of the public transportation
benefit area present and voting on the resolution.
(iii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), "weighted vote" means
a vote that reflects the population each member of the governing body
represents relative to the population represented by the total
membership of the governing body. Population must be determined using
the federal 2010 census or subsequent federal census data.
(c) The tax authorized by this section shall be in addition to the
tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and shall be collected from those
persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
upon the occurrence of any taxable event within such city, public
transportation benefit area, county, or metropolitan municipal
corporation as the case may be. The rate of such tax shall be one-tenth, two-tenths, three-tenths, four-tenths, five-tenths, six-tenths,
seven-tenths, eight-tenths, or nine-tenths of one percent of the
selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used
(in the case of a use tax). The rate of such tax shall not exceed the
rate authorized by the voters unless such increase shall be similarly
approved.
(2)(a) In the event a metropolitan municipal corporation imposes a
sales and use tax pursuant to this chapter no city, county which has
created an unincorporated transportation benefit area, public
transportation benefit area authority, or county transportation
authority wholly within such metropolitan municipal corporation shall
be empowered to impose and/or collect taxes under RCW 35.95.040 or this
section, but nothing herein shall prevent such city or county from
imposing sales and use taxes pursuant to any other authorization.
(b) In the event a county transportation authority imposes a sales
and use tax under this section, no city, county which has created an
unincorporated transportation benefit area, public transportation
benefit area, or metropolitan municipal corporation, located within the
territory of the authority, shall be empowered to impose or collect
taxes under RCW 35.95.040 or this section.
(c) In the event a public transportation benefit area imposes a
sales and use tax under this section, no city, county which has created
an unincorporated transportation benefit area, or metropolitan
municipal corporation, located wholly or partly within the territory of
the public transportation benefit area, shall be empowered to impose or
collect taxes under RCW 35.95.040 or this section.

--- END ---