BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.330.250 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 956 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The economic development strategic reserve account is created
in the state treasury to be used only for the purposes of this section.
(2) Only the governor, with the recommendation of the director of
the department of commerce and the economic development commission, may
authorize expenditures from the account.
(3) Expenditures from the account shall be made in an amount
sufficient to fund a minimum of one staff position for the economic
development commission and to cover any other operational costs of the
commission.
(4) During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, moneys in
the account may also be transferred into the state general fund.
(5) Expenditures from the account may be made to prevent closure of
a business or facility, to prevent relocation of a business or facility
in the state to a location outside the state, or to recruit a business
or facility to the state. Expenditures may be authorized for:
(a) Workforce development;
(b) Public infrastructure needed to support or sustain the
operations of the business or facility; ((and))
(c) Other lawfully provided assistance, including, but not limited
to, technical assistance, environmental analysis, relocation
assistance, and planning assistance. Funding may be provided for such
assistance only when it is in the public interest and may only be
provided under a contractual arrangement ensuring that the state will
receive appropriate consideration, such as an assurance of job creation
or retention; and
(d) The joint center for aerospace technology innovation.
(6) The funds shall not be expended from the account unless:
(a) The circumstances are such that time does not permit the
director of the department of commerce or the business or facility to
secure funding from other state sources;
(b) The business or facility produces or will produce significant
long-term economic benefits to the state, a region of the state, or a
particular community in the state;
(c) The business or facility does not require continuing state
support;
(d) The expenditure will result in new jobs, job retention, or
higher incomes for citizens of the state;
(e) The expenditure will not supplant private investment; and
(f) The expenditure is accompanied by private investment.
(7) No more than three million dollars per year may be expended
from the account for the purpose of assisting an individual business or
facility pursuant to the authority specified in this section.
(8) If the account balance in the strategic reserve account exceeds
fifteen million dollars at any time, the amount in excess of fifteen
million dollars shall be transferred to the education construction
account.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.131.417 and 2012 c 242 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The joint center for aerospace technology innovation shall be
terminated July 1, ((2015)) 2020, as provided in RCW 43.131.418.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.131.418 and 2012 c 242 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, ((2016)) 2021:
(1) RCW 28B.155.010 and 2012 c 242 § 1; and
(2) RCW 28B.155.020 and 2012 c 242 § 2.

--- END ---