BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.23.020 and 1961 c 268 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For the purpose of chapter 268, Laws of 1961:)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Municipality" ((shall)) includes all counties, cities, towns,
districts, and other municipal corporations and quasi municipal
corporations organized under the laws of the state of Washington((;)).
(2) "Municipal officer" and "officer" ((shall)) each include all
elected and appointed officers of a municipality, together with all
deputies and assistants of such an officer, and all persons exercising
or undertaking to exercise any of the powers or functions of a
municipal officer((;)).
(3) "Contract" ((shall)) includes any contract, sale, lease, or
purchase((;)).
(4) "Contracting party" ((shall)) includes any person, partnership,
association, cooperative, corporation, or other business entity which
is a party to a contract with a municipality.
(5) "Apparent conflict of interest" means the appearance of a
private interest, actual or not, that a reasonable person would
conclude based on the circumstances is likely to compromise the
officer's or employee's judgment or is in conflict with the proper
discharge of the officer's or employee's official duties.
(6) "Beneficial interest" has the definition in RCW 42.52.010.
(7) "Municipal employee" or "employee" means an individual who is
employed by any department in any branch of municipal government.
(8) "Participate" means to participate in municipal action or a
proceeding personally and substantially as a municipal officer or
municipal employee, through approval, disapproval, decision,
recommendation, the rendering of advice, investigation, or otherwise
but does not include preparation, consideration, or enactment of
legislation or the performance of legislative duties.
(9)(a) "Transaction involving the municipality" means a proceeding,
application, submission, request for a ruling or other determination,
contract, claim, case, or other similar matter that the municipal
officer, municipal employee, or former municipal officer or municipal
employee in question believes, or has reason to believe:
(i) Is, or will be, the subject of municipal action; or
(ii) Is one to which the municipality is or will be a party; or
(iii) Is one in which the municipality has a direct and substantial
proprietary interest.
(b) "Transaction involving the municipality" does not include:
Preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation, including
appropriation of moneys in a budget, or the performance of legislative
duties by an officer or employee; or a claim, case, lawsuit, or similar
matter if the officer or employee did not participate in the underlying
transaction involving the municipality that is the basis for the claim,
case, or lawsuit.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.23.030 and 2007 c 298 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No municipal officer or municipal employee shall be
beneficially interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract which
may be made by, through, or under the supervision of such officer or
employee, in whole or in part, or which may be made for the benefit of
his or her office or position, or accept, directly or indirectly, any
compensation, gratuity or reward in connection with such contract from
any other person beneficially interested therein. This section shall
not apply in the following cases:
(((1))) (a) The furnishing of electrical, water, or other utility
services by a municipality engaged in the business of furnishing such
services, at the same rates and on the same terms as are available to
the public generally;
(((2))) (b) The designation of public depositaries for municipal
funds;
(((3))) (c) The publication of legal notices required by law to be
published by any municipality, upon competitive bidding or at rates not
higher than prescribed by law for members of the general public;
(((4))) (d) The designation of a school director as clerk or as
both clerk and purchasing agent of a school district;
(((5))) (e) The employment of any person by a municipality for
unskilled day labor at wages not exceeding two hundred dollars in any
calendar month. The exception provided in this subsection does not
apply to a county with a population of one hundred twenty-five thousand
or more, a city with a population of more than one thousand five
hundred, an irrigation district encompassing more than fifty thousand
acres, or a first-class school district;
(((6)(a))) (f)(i) The letting of any other contract in which the
total amount received under the contract or contracts by the municipal
officer or the municipal officer's business does not exceed one
thousand five hundred dollars in any calendar month.
(((b))) (ii) However, in the case of a particular officer of a
second-class city or town, or a noncharter optional code city, or a
member of any county fair board in a county which has not established
a county purchasing department pursuant to RCW 36.32.240, the total
amount of such contract or contracts authorized in this subsection
(((6))) (1)(f) may exceed one thousand five hundred dollars in any
calendar month but shall not exceed eighteen thousand dollars in any
calendar year.
(((c)(i))) (iii)(A) In the case of a particular officer of a rural
public hospital district, as defined in RCW 70.44.460, the total amount
of such contract or contracts authorized in this subsection (((6)))
(1)(f) may exceed one thousand five hundred dollars in any calendar
month, but shall not exceed twenty-four thousand dollars in any
calendar year.
(((ii))) (B) At the beginning of each calendar year, beginning with
the 2006 calendar year, the legislative authority of the rural public
hospital district shall increase the calendar year limitation described
in this subsection (((6)(c))) (1)(f)(iii) by an amount equal to the
dollar amount for the previous calendar year multiplied by the change
in the consumer price index as of the close of the twelve-month period
ending December 31st of that previous calendar year. If the new dollar
amount established under this subsection is not a multiple of ten
dollars, the increase shall be rounded to the next lowest multiple of
ten dollars. As used in this subsection, "consumer price index" means
the consumer price index compiled by the bureau of labor statistics,
United States department of labor for the state of Washington. If the
bureau of labor statistics develops more than one consumer price index
for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of
people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state,
and including all items shall be used.
(((d))) (iv) The exceptions provided in this subsection (((6)))
(1)(f) do not apply to:
(((i))) (A) A sale or lease by the municipality as the seller or
lessor;
(((ii))) (B) The letting of any contract by a county with a
population of one hundred twenty-five thousand or more, a city with a
population of ten thousand or more, or an irrigation district
encompassing more than fifty thousand acres; or
(((iii))) (C) Contracts for legal services, except for
reimbursement of expenditures.
(((e))) (v) The municipality shall maintain a list of all contracts
that are awarded under this subsection (((6))) (1)(f). The list must
be made available for public inspection and copying;
(((7))) (g) The leasing by a port district as lessor of port
district property to a municipal officer or to a contracting party in
which a municipal officer may be beneficially interested, if in
addition to all other legal requirements, a board of three
disinterested appraisers and the superior court in the county where the
property is situated finds that all terms and conditions of such lease
are fair to the port district and are in the public interest. The
appraisers must be appointed from members of the American Institute of
Real Estate Appraisers by the presiding judge of the superior court;
(((8))) (h) The letting of any employment contract for the driving
of a school bus in a second-class school district if the terms of such
contract are commensurate with the pay plan or collective bargaining
agreement operating in the district;
(((9))) (i) The letting of an employment contract as a substitute
teacher or substitute educational aide to an officer of a second-class
school district that has two hundred or fewer full-time equivalent
students, if the terms of the contract are commensurate with the pay
plan or collective bargaining agreement operating in the district and
the board of directors has found, consistent with the written policy
under RCW 28A.330.240, that there is a shortage of substitute teachers
in the school district;
(((10))) (j) The letting of any employment contract to the spouse
of an officer of a school district, when such contract is solely for
employment as a substitute teacher for the school district. This
exception applies only if the terms of the contract are commensurate
with the pay plan or collective bargaining agreement applicable to all
district employees and the board of directors has found, consistent
with the written policy under RCW 28A.330.240, that there is a shortage
of substitute teachers in the school district;
(((11))) (k) The letting of any employment contract to the spouse
of an officer of a school district if the spouse was under contract as
a certificated or classified employee with the school district before
the date in which the officer assumes office and the terms of the
contract are commensurate with the pay plan or collective bargaining
agreement operating in the district. However, in a second-class school
district that has less than two hundred full-time equivalent students
enrolled at the start of the school year as defined in RCW 28A.150.040,
the spouse is not required to be under contract as a certificated or
classified employee before the date on which the officer assumes
office;
(((12))) (l) The authorization, approval, or ratification of any
employment contract with the spouse of a public hospital district
commissioner if: (((a))) (i) The spouse was employed by the public
hospital district before the date the commissioner was initially
elected; (((b))) (ii) the terms of the contract are commensurate with
the pay plan or collective bargaining agreement operating in the
district for similar employees; (((c))) (iii) the interest of the
commissioner is disclosed to the board of commissioners and noted in
the official minutes or similar records of the public hospital district
prior to the letting or continuation of the contract; and (((d))) (iv)
and the commissioner does not vote on the authorization, approval, or
ratification of the contract or any conditions in the contract.
(2) A municipal officer may not vote in the authorization,
approval, or ratification of a contract in which he or she is
beneficially interested even though one of the exemptions allowing the
awarding of such a contract applies. The interest of the municipal
officer must be disclosed to the governing body of the municipality and
noted in the official minutes or similar records of the municipality
before the formation of the contract.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1) of this section,
no municipal officer or municipal employee may participate in a
transaction involving the municipality in his or her official capacity
with a contracting party of which the officer or employee is an
officer, agent, employee, or member, or in which the officer or
employee has a beneficial interest.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.23.040 and 1999 c 261 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A municipal officer or municipal employee is not interested in
a contract, within the meaning of RCW 42.23.030, if the officer or
employee has only a remote interest in the contract and the extent of
the interest is disclosed to the governing body of the municipality of
which the officer is an officer, or the employee is an employee, and
noted in the official minutes or similar records of the municipality
prior to the formation of the contract, and thereafter the governing
body authorizes, approves, or ratifies the contract in good faith by a
vote of its membership sufficient for the purpose without counting the
vote or votes of ((the)) any officer having ((the)) a remote interest.
(2) As used in this section, "remote interest" means:
(((1))) (a) That of a nonsalaried officer of a nonprofit
corporation;
(((2))) (b) That of an employee or agent of a contracting party
where the compensation of such employee or agent consists entirely of
fixed wages or salary;
(((3))) (c) That of a landlord or tenant of a contracting party;
(((4))) (d) That of a holder of less than one percent of the shares
of a corporation or cooperative which is a contracting party.
(3) None of the provisions of this section are applicable to any
officer or employee interested in a contract, even if the officer's or
employee's interest is only remote, if the officer or employee
influences or attempts to influence any other officer or employee of
the municipality ((of which he or she is an officer)) to enter into the
contract.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.23.050 and 1999 c 261 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any contract made in violation of the provisions of this chapter is
void and the performance thereof, in full or in part, by a contracting
party shall not be the basis of any claim against the municipality.
Any officer or employee violating the provisions of this chapter is
liable to the municipality of which he or she is an officer or employee
for a penalty in the amount of five hundred dollars, in addition to
such other civil or criminal liability or penalty as may otherwise be
imposed upon the officer or employee by law.
In addition to all other penalties, civil or criminal, the
violation by any officer of the provisions of this chapter may be
grounds for forfeiture of his or her office.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.23.070 and 1994 c 154 s 121 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No municipal officer or municipal employee may use his or her
position to secure special privileges or exemptions for himself,
herself, or others.
(2) No municipal officer or employee may, directly or indirectly,
give or receive or agree to receive any compensation, gift, reward, or
gratuity from a source except the employing municipality, for a matter
connected with or related to the officer's or employee's services as
such an officer or employee unless otherwise provided for by law.
(3) No municipal officer or municipal employee may accept
employment or engage in business or professional activity that the
officer or employee might reasonably expect would require or induce him
or her by reason of his or her ((official)) position to disclose
confidential information acquired by reason of his or her ((official))
position.
(4) No municipal officer or municipal employee may disclose
confidential information gained by reason of the officer's or
employee's position, nor may the officer or employee otherwise use such
information for his or her personal gain or benefit.
(5) No municipal officer or municipal employee may accept
employment, paid or unpaid, or engage in any business or professional
activity in a supervisory capacity of any kind that is an apparent
conflict of interest.

--- END ---