BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that when teachers and
school staff are trained in identifying and preventing child sexual
abuse, commercial sexual abuse of minors, and sexual exploitation of
minors, students benefit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall,
to the extent funding is available, develop and implement a training
program for all school employees regarding prevention of sexual abuse;
commercial sexual abuse of a minor, as defined in RCW 9.68A.100; and
sexual exploitation of a minor, as defined in RCW 9.68A.040.
(2) The training shall not be based solely on providing materials,
but also must include techniques on imparting these skills to students.
(3) The training program shall be developed in coordination with
school districts, the center for children and youth justice, youthcare,
the committee for children, the Washington state school directors'
association, the department of early learning, the department of social
and health services, and other interested parties.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop the training program by June 1, 2014, and implement the
training program by June 1, 2015.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.300.145 and 2006 c 135 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington coalition of sexual assault programs, in
consultation with the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the
Washington state school directors' association, the center for children
and youth justice, youthcare, the committee for children, the
department of early learning, the department of social and health
services, other relevant organizations, and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, shall ((develop)) by June 1,
2014, update existing educational materials ((to be)) made available
throughout the state to inform parents and other interested community
members about:
(1) The laws related to sex offenses, including registration,
community notification(([,])), and the classification of sex offenders
based on an assessment of the risk of reoffending;
(2) How to recognize behaviors characteristic of sex offenses and
sex offenders;
(3) How to prevent victimization, particularly that of young
children;
(4) How to take advantage of community resources for victims of
sexual assault; ((and))
(5) How to prevent children from being recruited into sex
trafficking; and
(6) Other information as deemed appropriate.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.400.317 and 2004 c 135 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A certificated or classified school employee who has knowledge
or reasonable cause to believe that a student has been a victim of
physical abuse or sexual misconduct by another school employee, shall
report such abuse or misconduct to the appropriate school
administrator. The school administrator shall cause a report to be
made to the proper law enforcement agency if he or she has reasonable
cause to believe that the misconduct or abuse has occurred as required
under RCW 26.44.030. During the process of making a reasonable cause
determination, the school administrator shall contact all parties
involved in the complaint.
(2) Certificated and classified school employees shall receive
training regarding their reporting obligations under state law in their
orientation training when hired and then every three years thereafter.
The training required under this subsection ((shall take place)) may be
incorporated within existing training programs and related resources.
(3) Nothing in this section changes any of the duties established
under RCW 26.44.030.

--- END ---