BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares all of
the following:
(1) The United States immigration and customs enforcement's secure
communities program burdens state resources by requiring local law
enforcement officers to assist with federal immigration enforcement.
The detainers issued as a result of the secure communities program and
related immigration and customs enforcement programs request that local
law enforcement agencies detain individuals for forty-eight hours.
Local tax dollars are spent on these detainers and the local law
enforcement agencies do not receive full reimbursement from the federal
government for these costs.
(2) The implementation of the secure communities program has not
matched up with its original goal of making our communities safer by
removing and deporting violent criminals. Because the program conducts
mandatory immigration checks of everyone booked into local jails, it
has led to the deportations of people with no criminal records. The
program actually harms communities by making immigrants and communities
of color less likely to report crimes. When every arrest is a
potential immigration arrest, people in immigrant communities are
afraid to report crimes or cooperate with investigations. The fewer
crimes that are reported, the longer criminals remain on the streets of
our communities.
(3) According to immigration and customs enforcement, the secure
communities program is supposed to prioritize the deportation of
illegal immigrants who have been accused or convicted of serious
crimes. However, immigration and customs enforcement statistics from
20ll show only twenty-two percent of the six thousand deported through
the program were high level, felony offenders. Twenty-eight percent
had no criminal record at all.
(4) Immigration detainers operate at the pretrial level. These
detainers require no determinations of probable cause or warrants.
Complying with these detainers could cause law enforcement officers to
violate individuals' constitutional rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 10.31 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A law enforcement officer is prohibited from detaining an
individual on the basis of an immigration detainer after that
individual becomes eligible for release from criminal custody, unless,
at the time the individual becomes eligible for release, a criminal
background check reveals the individual was previously convicted of a
most serious offense or violent offense.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Criminal custody" means in the custody of the state department
of corrections, the state department of social and health services, a
local division of youth services, or a local jail or detention facility
in connection to a criminal offense.
(b) "Eligible for release from criminal custody" means that the
individual may be released from criminal custody because one of the
following conditions has occurred:
(i) All criminal charges against the individual have been dropped
or dismissed;
(ii) The individual has been acquitted of all criminal charges
filed against him or her;
(iii) The individual has served all the time required for his or
her sentence;
(iv) The individual has posted bond; or
(v) The individual is otherwise eligible for release under state or
local law, or local policy.
(c) "Immigration detainer" means a detainer issued by an authorized
immigration officer, pursuant to section 287.7 of Title 8 of the code
of federal regulations that requests that the law enforcement official
maintain custody of the individual for a period not to exceed forty-eight hours, and to advise the authorized immigration office prior to
the release of that individual.
(d) "Law enforcement officer" means any local agency or officer of
a local agency authorized to enforce criminal statutes, regulations, or
local ordinances or to operate jails or to maintain custody of
individuals in jails, and any person or local agency or state
governmental entity authorized to operate juvenile detention facilities
or to maintain custody of individuals in juvenile detention facilities.
(e) "Most serious offense" has the same meaning as in RCW
9.94A.030.
(f) "Violent offense" has the same meaning as in RCW 9.94A.030.
(3) The state, its subdivisions, officers, and employees and local
governments and their subdivisions, officers, and employees are immune
from civil liability for damages arising from failure to comply with an
immigration detainer except upon proof of willful or wanton misconduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 10.31 RCW
to read as follows:
There being no legal authority for state or local law enforcement
officers to enforce federal civil immigration laws, no state or local
law enforcement officer shall make arrests or detain any individual
based on an administrative immigration warrant in the national crime
information center database of the federal bureau of investigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 10.31 RCW
to read as follows:
Unless an individual in the custody of a law enforcement officer or
agency is provided an opportunity to have counsel present, and signs a
written consent form that indicates knowledge of who the interviewer is
and the possible legal consequences of providing information to any
employee or agent of the United States immigration and customs
enforcement agency or the United States border patrol, no law
enforcement officer or agency shall make the individual available for
interview by any employee or agent of the United States immigrations
and customs enforcement agency or the United States border patrol, in
person or over the telephone or videoconference. Such notice shall be
provided in a language or manner that the individual in custody
understands. Any individual who is hospitalized or on suicide watch
shall not be made available for interviews with any employee or agent
of the United States immigration and customs enforcement agency or the
United States border patrol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---