BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds and reaffirms that
the state need grant program was based on the principle that the
funding follows resident students to their choice of institution of
higher education, recognizing that state need grant appropriations
constitute funding for students, not for institutions of higher
education. The legislature reaffirms that the primary purpose of the
program is to assist low-income, needy, and disadvantaged Washington
residents attending institutions of higher education.
(2) The legislature further finds that private nonprofit colleges
and universities provide access to higher education for thousands of
low-income Washington residents from every corner of the state at a
comparatively low cost to the state, and that by providing such access
these institutions of higher education help the state efficiently work
toward the goals of increasing college degree production and overall
educational attainment levels for Washington residents.
(3) The legislature further finds that state policy in place for
more than a decade before 2011, under which students attending private
nonprofit baccalaureate degree-granting institutions received state
need grant award amounts linked with award amounts for students
attending public research institutions, was discontinued in the 2011-
2013 omnibus appropriations act, resulting in twenty-two percent lower
awards for students at private nonprofit baccalaureate degree granting
institutions of higher education in relation to students attending
public research institutions in the 2012-13 academic year. It is the
intent of the legislature to restore equity for students attending
private nonprofit baccalaureate degree-granting institutions.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.92.060 and 2012 c 229 s 558 are each amended to
read as follows:
In awarding need grants, the office shall proceed substantially as
follows: PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein shall be construed to
prevent the office, in the exercise of its sound discretion, from
following another procedure when the best interest of the program so
dictates:
(1) The office shall annually select the financial aid award
recipients from among Washington residents applying for student
financial aid who have been ranked according to:
(a) Financial need as determined by the amount of the family
contribution; and
(b) Other considerations, such as whether the student is a former
foster youth, or is a placebound student who has completed an associate
of arts or associate of science degree or its equivalent.
(2) The financial need of the highest ranked students shall be met
by grants depending upon the evaluation of financial need until the
total allocation has been disbursed. Funds from grants which are
declined, forfeited or otherwise unused shall be reawarded until
disbursed, except that eligible former foster youth shall be assured
receipt of a grant. The office, in consultation with four-year
institutions of higher education, the council, and the state board for
community and technical colleges, shall develop award criteria and
methods of disbursement based on level of need, and not solely rely on
a first-come, first-served basis.
(3) A student shall be eligible to receive a state need grant for
up to five years, or the credit or clock hour equivalent of five years,
or up to one hundred twenty-five percent of the published length of
time of the student's program. A student may not start a new associate
degree program as a state need grant recipient until at least five
years have elapsed since earning an associate degree as a need grant
recipient, except that a student may earn two associate degrees
concurrently. Qualifications for renewal will include maintaining
satisfactory academic progress toward completion of an eligible program
as determined by the office. Should the recipient terminate his or her
enrollment for any reason during the academic year, the unused portion
of the grant shall be returned to the state educational grant fund by
the institution according to the institution's own policy for issuing
refunds, except as provided in RCW 28B.92.070.
(4) In computing financial need, the office shall determine a
maximum student expense budget allowance, not to exceed an amount equal
to the total maximum student expense budget at the public institutions
plus the current average state appropriation per student for operating
expense in the public institutions. Any child support payments
received by students who are parents attending less than half-time
shall not be used in computing financial need.
(5) Grant awards for students at private nonprofit baccalaureate
degree-granting institutions participating in the state need grant
program must be set at the same level as the student would receive if
attending one of the public research universities.
(6)(a) A student who is enrolled in three to six credit-bearing
quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits, may receive a
grant for up to one academic year before beginning a program that leads
to a degree or certificate.
(b) An eligible student enrolled on a less-than-full-time basis
shall receive a prorated portion of his or her state need grant for any
academic period in which he or she is enrolled on a less-than-full-time
basis, as long as funds are available.
(c) An institution of higher education may award a state need grant
to an eligible student enrolled in three to six credit-bearing quarter
credits, or the semester equivalent, on a provisional basis if:
(i) The student has not previously received a state need grant from
that institution;
(ii) The student completes the required free application for
federal student aid;
(iii) The institution has reviewed the student's financial
condition, and the financial condition of the student's family if the
student is a dependent student, and has determined that the student is
likely eligible for a state need grant; and
(iv) The student has signed a document attesting to the fact that
the financial information provided on the free application for federal
student aid and any additional financial information provided directly
to the institution is accurate and complete, and that the student
agrees to repay the institution for the grant amount if the student
submitted false or incomplete information.
(((6))) (7) As used in this section, "former foster youth" means a
person who is at least eighteen years of age, but not more than twenty-four years of age, who was a dependent of the department of social and
health services at the time he or she attained the age of eighteen.

--- END ---