BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a work group to review and make
recommendations on the practice of sexual orientation change efforts on
persons under eighteen years of age in Washington.
(2) The work group may include no more than fifteen members
representing various mental health providers. The department shall
make reasonable efforts to recruit a practitioner of sexual orientation
change efforts to serve on the work group. The work group membership
must include:
(a) One member who is a licensed mental health counselor under
chapter 18.225 RCW;
(b) One member who is a licensed marriage and family therapist
under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(c) One member who is a fully licensed independent clinical social
worker under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(d) One member who is a fully licensed advanced social worker under
chapter 18.225 RCW;
(e) One member of the examining board of psychology who is a
psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW;
(f) One physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW who specializes
in the practice of psychiatry;
(g) One osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW who
specializes in the practice of psychiatry;
(h) One member of the faith community who is also a licensed mental
health professional; and
(i) One member of the public.
(3) The work group shall:
(a) Evaluate research relating to the practice of sexual
orientation change efforts on persons who are less than eighteen years
of age. The work group shall base its research upon sources that are
peer-reviewed journals as well as other research that it determines is
highly reliable, including research provided by the Washington state
institute for public policy as provided in subsection (4) of this
section;
(b) Identify the potential harms to clients who are persons less
than eighteen years of age that may occur through the practice of
sexual orientation change efforts both by licensed mental health
providers and by unlicensed practitioners of sexual orientation change
efforts; and
(c) Develop recommendations for approaches to protect clients who
are persons less than eighteen years of age from potential harm related
to receiving sexual orientation change efforts. The recommendations
must consider approaches to protect clients both for licensed mental
health providers and unlicensed practitioners of sexual orientation
change efforts. The work group shall consider specific client
protection standards for the provision of sexual orientation change
efforts to clients who are persons less than eighteen years of age,
including the use of disclosure statements for clients receiving sexual
orientation change efforts and the prohibition of the practice.
(4) The department of health shall contract with the Washington
state institute of public policy to conduct a review of the research
related to sexual orientation change efforts and the potential harm
that it poses to clients less than eighteen years of age to inform the
efforts to the work group.
(5) The work group shall hold one public meeting on each side of
the Cascade crest. The public meetings may be held either in person or
through an electronic connection. The department shall establish an
opportunity for individuals to submit confidential comments to the work
group either in writing or by electronic means.
(6) The work group shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor, the appropriate committees of the legislature, and the
disciplining authorities representing mental health providers by
December 15, 2013.
(7) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Mental health providers" means marriage and family therapists
licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, mental health counselors licensed
under chapter 18.225 RCW, physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW
who specialize in the practice of psychiatry, osteopathic physicians
licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW who specialize in the practice of
psychiatry, psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW, and
independent clinical and advanced social workers licensed under chapter
18.225 RCW.
(b)(i) "Sexual orientation change efforts" means a regime practiced
by mental health providers that seeks to change an individual's sexual
orientation. The term includes efforts to change behaviors or gender
expressions, or to eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic attractions
or feelings toward individuals of the same sex. The term includes, but
is not limited to, practices commonly referred to as "reparative
therapy" or "conversion therapy."
(ii) The term does not include psychotherapies that (A) provide
acceptance, support, and understanding of clients or the facilitation
of clients' coping, social support, and identity exploration and
development, including sexual orientation-neutral interventions to
prevent or address unlawful conduct or unsafe sexual practices; and (B)
do not seek to change sexual orientation.
(8) This section expires January 1, 2014.

--- END ---