BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.32.180 and 1988 c 161 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every worker who suffers disability from an occupational
disease in the course of employment under the mandatory or elective
adoption provisions of this title, or his or her family and dependents
in case of death of the worker from such disease or infection, shall
receive the same compensation benefits and medical, surgical and
hospital care and treatment as would be paid and provided for a worker
injured or killed in employment under this title, except as follows:
(a) (([(1)])) This section and RCW 51.16.040 shall not apply where the
last exposure to the hazards of the disease or infection occurred prior
to January 1, 1937; and (b) (([(2)])) for claims filed on or after July
1, 1988, the rate of compensation for occupational diseases shall be
established as of the date the disease requires medical treatment or
becomes totally or partially disabling, whichever occurs first, and
without regard to the date of the contraction of the disease or the
date of filing the claim, except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2)(a) At the first day the worker is entitled to benefits under
RCW 51.32.090 for an occupational disease meeting the criteria of this
subsection, the rate of compensation must be established based on
whichever of the following would result in a greater benefit to the
worker:
(i) The wages the worker was receiving at the date of disease
manifestation, as determined by the department and taking into
consideration adjustments under RCW 51.32.075; or
(ii) The wages the worker was receiving at the time the
occupational disease prevented the worker from continuing to work,
regardless of when the disease first manifested or required medical
treatment and taking into consideration adjustments under RCW 51.32.075
subsequent to the date the occupational disease first prevented the
worker from continuing to work.
(b) This subsection applies to workers who, in the course of
employment, have contracted an occupational disease that is known to be
terminal. To allow for maximum stakeholder input, the department must
adopt rules defining when an occupational disease is "known to be
terminal."
(c) This subsection applies to claims filed on or after the
effective date of this section.

--- END ---