BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.36.025 and 2011 c 204 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may collect moneys to recover the reasonable costs
of purchasing, printing, and distributing official individual
identification devices or methods, regulatory forms, and other
supplies.
(2) In addition to the costs identified in subsection (1) of this
section, the director may also collect moneys to recover the reasonable
costs associated with the data entry and processing related to animal
health documents that facilitate disease control and traceability.
(3) All funds received under this section must be deposited in the
animal disease traceability account in the agricultural local fund
created in RCW 43.23.230 to cover the costs associated with this
chapter.

--- END ---