BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.32.099 and 2011 c 291 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature intends to create improved vocational
outcomes for Washington state injured workers and employers through
legislative and regulatory change under a pilot program for the period
of January 1, 2008, through June 30, 2013. This pilot vocational
system is intended to allow opportunities for eligible workers to
participate in meaningful retraining in high-demand occupations,
improve successful return to work and achieve positive outcomes for
workers, reduce the incidence of repeat vocational services, increase
accountability and responsibility, and improve cost predictability. To
facilitate the study and evaluation of the results of the proposed
changes, the department shall establish the temporary funding of
certain state fund vocational costs through the medical aid account to
ensure the appropriate assessments to employers for the costs of their
claims for vocational services in accordance with RCW 51.32.0991.
(b) An independent review and study of the effects of the pilot
program shall be conducted to determine whether it has achieved the
appropriate outcomes at reasonable cost to the system. The review
shall include, at a minimum, a report on the department's performance
with regard to the provision of vocational services, the skills
acquired by workers who receive retraining services, the types of
training programs approved, whether the workers are employed, at what
jobs and wages after completion of the training program and at various
times subsequent to their claim closure, the number and demographics of
workers who choose the option provided in subsection (4)(b) of this
section, and their employment and earnings status at various times
subsequent to claim closure. The department may adopt rules, in
collaboration with the subcommittee created under (c)(iii) of this
subsection, to further define the scope and elements of the required
study. Reports of the independent researcher are due on December 1,
2010, December 1, 2011, and December 1, 2012.
(c) In implementing the pilot program, the department shall:
(i) Establish a vocational initiative project that includes
participation by the department as a partner with WorkSource, the
established state system that administers the federal workforce
investment act of 1998. As a partner, the department shall place
vocational professional full-time employees at pilot WorkSource
locations; refer some workers for vocational services to these
vocational professionals; and work with employers in work source pilot
areas to market the benefits of on-the-job training programs and with
community colleges to reserve slots in high employer demand programs of
study as defined in RCW 28B.50.030. These on-the-job training programs
and community college slots may be considered by both department and
private sector vocational professionals for vocational plan
development. The department will also assist stakeholders in
developing additional vocational training programs in various
industries, including but not limited to agriculture and construction.
These programs will expand the choices available to injured workers in
developing their vocational training plans with the assistance of
vocational professionals.
(ii) Develop and maintain a register of state fund and self-insured
workers who have been retrained or have selected any of the vocational
options described in this section for at least the duration of the
pilot program.
(iii) Create a vocational rehabilitation subcommittee made up of
members appointed by the director for at least the duration of the
pilot program. This subcommittee shall provide the business and labor
partnership needed to maintain focus on the intent of the pilot
program, as described in this section, and provide consistency and
transparency to the development of rules and policies. The
subcommittee shall report to the director at least annually and
recommend to the director and the legislature any additional statutory
changes needed, which may include extension of the pilot period. The
subcommittee shall provide input and oversight with the department
concerning the study required under (b) of this subsection. The
subcommittee shall provide recommendations for additional changes or
incentives for injured workers to return to work with their employer of
injury. The subcommittee shall also consider options that, under
limited circumstances, would allow injured workers to attend
baccalaureate institutions under their vocational rehabilitation plans
and, by December 31, 2013, the subcommittee shall provide
recommendations to the director and the legislature on statutory
changes needed to develop those options.
(iv) The department shall develop an annual report concerning
Washington's workers' compensation vocational rehabilitation system to
the legislature and to the subcommittee by December 1, 2009, and
annually thereafter with the final report due by December 1, 2012. The
annual report shall include the number of workers who have participated
in more than one vocational training plan beginning with plans approved
on January 1, 2008, and in which industries those workers were
employed. The final report shall include the department's assessment
and recommendations for further legislative action, in collaboration
with the subcommittee.
(2)(a) For the purposes of this section, the day the worker
commences vocational plan development means the date the department or
self-insurer notifies the worker of his or her eligibility for plan
development services or of an eligibility determination in response to
a dispute of a vocational decision.
(b) When the supervisor or supervisor's designee has decided that
vocational rehabilitation is both necessary and likely to make the
worker employable at gainful employment, he or she shall be provided
with services necessary to develop a vocational plan that, if
completed, would render the worker employable. The vocational
professional assigned to the claim shall, at the initial meeting with
the worker, fully inform the worker of the return-to-work priorities
set forth in RCW 51.32.095(2) and of his or her rights and
responsibilities under the workers' compensation vocational system.
The department shall provide tools to the vocational professional for
communicating this and other information required by RCW 51.32.095 and
this section to the worker.
(c) On the date the worker commences vocational plan development,
the department shall also inform the employer in writing of the
employer's right to make a valid return-to-work offer during the first
fifteen days following the commencement of vocational plan development.
However, at the sole discretion of the supervisor or the supervisor's
designee, an employer may be granted an extension of time of up to ten
additional days to make a valid return-to-work offer. The additional
days may be allowed by the department with or without a request from
the employer. The extension may only be granted if the employer made
a return-to-work offer to the worker within fifteen days of the date
the worker commenced vocational plan development that met some but not
all of the requirements in this section. To be valid, the offer must
be for bona fide employment with the employer of injury, consistent
with the worker's documented physical and mental restrictions as
provided by the worker's health care provider. When the employer makes
a valid return-to-work offer, the vocational plan development services
and temporary total disability compensation shall be terminated
effective on the starting date for the job without regard to whether
the worker accepts the return-to-work offer.
(d) Following the time period described in (c) of this subsection,
the employer may still provide, and the worker may accept, any valid
return-to-work offer. The worker's acceptance of such an offer shall
result in the termination of vocational plan development or
implementation services and temporary total disability compensation
effective the day the employment begins.
(3)(a) All vocational plans must contain an accountability
agreement signed by the worker detailing expectations regarding
progress, attendance, and other factors influencing successful
participation in the plan. Failure to abide by the agreed expectations
shall result in suspension of vocational benefits pursuant to RCW
51.32.110.
(b) Any formal education included as part of the vocational plan
must be for an accredited or licensed program or other program approved
by the department. The department shall develop rules that provide
criteria for the approval of nonaccredited or unlicensed programs.
(c) The vocational plan for an individual worker must be completed
and submitted to the department within ninety days of the day the
worker commences vocational plan development. The department may
extend the ninety days for good cause. Criteria for good cause shall
be provided in rule. The frequency and reasons for good cause
extensions shall be reported to the subcommittee created under
subsection (1)(c)(iii) of this section.
(d) Costs for the vocational plan may include books, tuition, fees,
supplies, equipment, child or dependent care, training fees for on-the-job training, the cost of furnishing tools and other equipment
necessary for self-employment or reemployment, and other necessary
expenses in an amount not to exceed twelve thousand dollars. This
amount shall be adjusted effective July 1 of each year for vocational
plans or retraining benefits available under subsection (4)(b) of this
section approved on or after this date but before June 30 of the next
year based on the average percentage change in tuition for the next
fall quarter for all Washington state community colleges.
(e) The duration of the vocational plan shall not exceed two years
from the date the plan is implemented. The worker shall receive
temporary total disability compensation under RCW 51.32.090 and the
cost of transportation while he or she is actively and successfully
participating in a vocational plan.
(f) If the worker is required to reside away from his or her
customary residence, the reasonable cost of board and lodging shall
also be paid.
(4) Vocational plan development services shall be completed within
ninety days of commencing. Except as provided in RCW 51.32.095(3),
during vocational plan development the worker shall, with the
assistance of a vocational professional, participate in vocational
counseling and occupational exploration to include, but not be limited
to, identifying possible job goals, training needs, resources, and
expenses, consistent with the worker's physical and mental status. A
vocational rehabilitation plan shall be developed by the worker and the
vocational professional and submitted to the department or
self-insurer. Following this submission, the worker shall elect one of
the following options:
(a) Option 1: The department or self-insurer implements and the
worker participates in the vocational plan developed by the vocational
professional and approved by the worker and the department or
self-insurer. For state fund claims, the department must review and
approve the vocational plan before implementation may begin. If the
department takes no action within fifteen days, the plan is deemed
approved. The worker may, within fifteen days of the department's
approval of the plan or of a determination that the plan is valid
following a dispute, elect option 2. However, in the sole discretion
of the supervisor or supervisor's designee, the department may approve
an election for option 2 benefits that was submitted in writing within
twenty-five days of the department's approval of the plan or of a
determination that the plan is valid following a dispute if the worker
provides a written explanation establishing that he or she was unable
to submit his or her election of option 2 benefits within fifteen days.
In no circumstance may the department approve of an election for option
2 benefits that was submitted more than twenty-five days after the
department's approval of a retraining plan or of a determination that
a plan is valid following a dispute.
(i) Following successful completion of the vocational plan, any
subsequent assessment of whether vocational rehabilitation is both
necessary and likely to enable the injured worker to become employable
at gainful employment under RCW 51.32.095(1) shall include
consideration of transferable skills obtained in the vocational plan.
(ii) If a vocational plan is successfully completed on a claim
which is thereafter reopened as provided in RCW 51.32.160, the cost and
duration available for any subsequent vocational plan is limited to
that in subsection (3)(d) and (e) of this section, less that previously
expended.
(b) Option 2: The worker declines further vocational services
under the claim and receives an amount equal to six months of temporary
total disability compensation under RCW 51.32.090. The award is
payable in biweekly payments in accordance with the schedule of
temporary total disability payments, until such award is paid in full.
These payments shall not include interest on the unpaid balance.
However, upon application by the worker, and at the discretion of the
department, the compensation may be converted to a lump sum payment.
The vocational costs defined in subsection (3)(d) of this section shall
remain available to the worker, upon application to the department or
self-insurer, for a period of five years. The vocational costs shall,
if expended, be available for programs or courses at any accredited or
licensed institution or program from a list of those approved by the
department for tuition, books, fees, supplies, equipment, and tools,
without department or self-insurer oversight. The department shall
issue an order as provided in RCW 51.52.050 confirming the option 2
election, setting a payment schedule, and terminating temporary total
disability benefits effective the date of the order confirming that
election. The department shall thereafter close the claim. A worker
who elects option 2 benefits shall not be entitled to further temporary
total, or to permanent total, disability benefits except upon a showing
of a worsening in the condition or conditions accepted under the claim
such that claim closure is not appropriate, in which case the option 2
selection will be rescinded and the amount paid to the worker will be
assessed as an overpayment. A claim that was closed based on the
worker's election of option 2 benefits may be reopened as provided in
RCW 51.32.160, but cannot be reopened for the sole purpose of allowing
the worker to seek vocational assistance.
(i) If within five years from the date the option 2 order becomes
final, the worker is subsequently injured or suffers an occupational
disease or reopens the claim as provided in RCW 51.32.160, and
vocational rehabilitation is found both necessary and likely to enable
the injured worker to become employable at gainful employment under RCW
51.32.095(1), the duration of any vocational plan under subsection
(3)(e) of this section shall not exceed eighteen months.
(ii) If the available vocational costs are utilized by the worker,
any subsequent assessment of whether vocational rehabilitation is both
necessary and likely to enable the injured worker to become employable
at gainful employment under RCW 51.32.095(1) shall include
consideration of the transferable skills obtained.
(iii) If the available vocational costs are utilized by the worker
and the claim is thereafter reopened as provided in RCW 51.32.160, the
cost available for any vocational plan is limited to that in subsection
(3)(d) of this section less that previously expended.
(iv) Option 2 may only be elected once per worker.
(c) The director, in his or her sole discretion, may provide the
worker vocational assistance not to exceed that in subsection (3) of
this section, without regard to the worker's prior option selection or
benefits expended, where vocational assistance would prevent permanent
total disability under RCW 51.32.060.
(5)(a) As used in this section, "vocational plan interruption"
means an occurrence which disrupts the plan to the extent the
employability goal is no longer attainable. "Vocational plan
interruption" does not include institutionally scheduled breaks in
educational programs, occasional absence due to illness, or
modifications to the plan which will allow it to be completed within
the cost and time provisions of subsection (3)(d) and (e) of this
section.
(b) When a vocational plan interruption is beyond the control of
the worker, the department or self-insurer shall recommence plan
development. If necessary to complete vocational services, the cost
and duration of the plan may include credit for that expended prior to
the interruption. A vocational plan interruption is considered outside
the control of the worker when it is due to the closure of the
accredited institution, when it is due to a death in the worker's
immediate family, or when documented changes in the worker's accepted
medical conditions prevent further participation in the vocational
plan.
(c) When a vocational plan interruption is the result of the
worker's actions, the worker's entitlement to benefits shall be
suspended in accordance with RCW 51.32.110. If plan development or
implementation is recommenced, the cost and duration of the plan shall
not include credit for that expended prior to the interruption. A
vocational plan interruption is considered a result of the worker's
actions when it is due to the failure to meet attendance expectations
set by the training or educational institution, failure to achieve
passing grades or acceptable performance review, unaccepted or
postinjury conditions that prevent further participation in the
vocational plan, or the worker's failure to abide by the accountability
agreement per subsection (3)(a) of this section.

--- END ---