BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.17.247 and 2009 c 208 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The district manager for district two as defined in WAC 16-390-010 is authorized to transfer one hundred fifty thousand dollars from
the fruit and vegetable district fund to the plant pest account within
the agricultural local fund. The amount transferred is to be derived
from fees collected for state inspections of tree fruits and is to be
used solely for activities related to the control of Rhagoletis
pomonella in district two. The transfer of money must occur by
September 1, 2009. ((On June 30, 2013, any unexpended portion of the
one hundred fifty thousand dollars must be transferred to the fruit and
vegetable inspection account and deposited in the district account for
the district that includes Yakima county.))
(2) In addition to the transfer identified in subsection (1) of
this section, the district manager for district two as defined in WAC
16-390-010 is authorized to transfer an additional one hundred fifty
thousand dollars from the fruit and vegetable district fund to the
plant pest account within the agricultural local fund for the same
purposes identified in subsection (1) of this section. The transfer of
money must occur by September 1, 2013.
(3) This section expires July 1, ((2013)) 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect June 30, 2013.

--- END ---