BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.17.160 and 2010 c 8 s 12013 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((No)) A person shall not discharge or in any manner
discriminate against any employee because such employee has filed any
complaint or instituted or caused to be instituted any proceeding under
or related to this chapter, or has testified or is about to testify in
any such proceeding or because of the exercise by such employee on
behalf of himself or herself or others of any right afforded by this
chapter.
(2) Any employee who believes that he or she has been discharged or
otherwise discriminated against by any person in violation of this
section may, within ((thirty)) one hundred eighty days after such
violation occurs, file a complaint with the director alleging such
discrimination. Upon receipt of such complaint, the director shall
cause such investigation to be made as he or she deems appropriate. If
upon such investigation, the director determines that the provisions of
this section have been violated, he ((of [or])) or she shall bring an
action in the superior court of the county wherein the violation is
alleged to have occurred against the person or persons who is alleged
to have violated the provisions of this section. If the director
determines that the provisions of this section have not been violated,
the employee may institute the action on his or her own behalf within
thirty days of such determination. In any such action the superior
court shall have jurisdiction, for cause shown, to restrain violations
of subsection (1) of this section and order all appropriate relief
including rehiring or reinstatement of the employee to his or her
former position with back pay.
(3) Within ninety days of the receipt of the complaint filed under
this section, the director shall notify the complainant of his or her
determination under subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon request of a victim or victim's representative, the
director must:
(a) Meet with the victim or victim's representative regarding the
inspection or investigation conducted under this chapter concerning an
employee's serious physical harm that resulted in in-patient
hospitalization or death. Alternatives to live meetings may be used.
Reasonable efforts must be made to arrange for the meeting to take
place before the director decides whether to issue a citation;
(b) Provide to the victim or victim's representative:
(i) A copy of any citation or report issued as a result of the
inspection or investigation. The citation or report must be provided
at no cost and provided on the later of the date the citation or report
is received by the employer and the date of the request;
(ii) Notification of any appeal filed under RCW 49.17.140 regarding
a citation issued as a result of the inspection or investigation; and
(iii) An explanation of the rights of employees and employee
representatives to participate in the proceedings conducted under RCW
49.17.140;
(c) Provide to the victim or victim's representative an opportunity
to appear and make a statement before the parties at proceedings during
reassumption of jurisdiction by the director or appeal before the board
of industrial insurance appeals regarding any violations associated
with the fatality or hospitalization. This opportunity must be
provided before the director enters an agreement to withdraw or modify
a violation associated with the fatality or hospitalization or reduce
an associated penalty. Alternatives to live appearances may be used.
(2) The director shall adopt rules regarding the rights of victims
and their representatives under this section and for the informal
review of any claim of a denial of such a right. These rules shall
ensure insofar as possible that the issuance of a citation following a
workplace fatality or hospitalization is not unduly delayed in order
for the director to meet with the victim or victim's representative.
(3) For purposes of this section, "victim" means:
(a) An employee who has sustained serious physical harm resulting
in death or in-patient hospitalization that is the subject of an
inspection or investigation conducted under this chapter; or
(b) A family member of an employee described in (a) of this
subsection, if the employee is killed or cannot reasonably exercise the
employee's rights under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The requirements of this section apply to an employer that is
required by law or chooses to establish a safety committee to
communicate and evaluate safety and health issues in the workplace.
(2) The employer must provide at least eight hours of safety and
health training to members of the safety committee within three months
of appointment to the committee and annually thereafter. This training
must include training on hazard identification and control. Trainers
and class content must meet requirements established by the department.
The training shall be in addition to and may be combined with training
programs provided to all employees pursuant to the rules for accident
prevention programs.
(3) The safety committee shall:
(a) Identify situations that may be a source of danger or hazard to
workers;
(b) Make recommendations to the employer and the workers for the
improvement of the safety and health of workers; and
(c) Recommend to the employer and the workers the establishment,
maintenance, and monitoring of programs, measures, and procedures
respecting the safety and health of workers.
(4) If the employer receives written recommendations from the
safety committee pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the
employer shall respond to the safety committee in writing no later than
twenty-one calendar days after receiving the recommendations.
(5) At least one employer and one employee member of the safety
committee shall conduct regular inspections of the physical condition
of the workplace, as well as equipment, work methods, and work
practices, to ensure that prompt action is taken to correct any
hazardous condition found. Such an inspection must be performed no
less than once every three months. Written reports of such inspections
must be provided to and reviewed by the full safety committee within
forty-five days of the inspection's completion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The employer shall provide to each new employee at the time of
hiring and prior to beginning work written information about all
employee rights provided pursuant to this chapter, including at least
the following:
(a) The right to request a workplace inspection;
(b) The right to receive information and training about workplace
hazards;
(c) The right to receive copies of test results done to find
hazards in the workplace;
(d) The right to review records of work-related injuries and
illnesses;
(e) The right to get copies of medical records; and
(f) The right to exercise these rights without fear of retaliation
or discrimination.
(2) The department shall develop and make available materials to
assist employers with implementing this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The WISHA advisory committee shall continue
its work of reviewing and making recommendations regarding civil
penalties under the Washington industrial safety and health act to
ensure that the assessment of civil penalties meets the requirements
under the occupational safety and health act of 1970 (84 Stat. 1590; 29
U.S.C. Sec. 651 et seq.). The WISHA advisory committee shall also
review statutory civil penalties and make recommendations regarding any
changes to the civil penalties. The department of labor and industries
shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2013, regarding: (1) Recommendations by the WISHA advisory
committee and department steps with respect to ensuring the assessment
of civil penalties meets federal requirements; and (2) recommendations
of the WISHA advisory committee regarding any changes to the statutory
civil penalties.

--- END ---