BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 1.20.017 and 2012 c 11 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Each public entity ((shall)) must display the national league
of families' POW/MIA flag along with the flag of the United States and
the flag of the state upon or near the principal building of the public
entity on the following days: (a) Former Prisoners of War Recognition
Day on April 9th; (b) Armed Forces Day on the third Saturday in May;
(((b))) (c) Memorial Day on the last Monday in May; (((c))) (d) Flag
Day on June 14th; (((d))) (e) Independence Day on July 4th; (((e))) (f)
National Korean War Veterans Armistice Day on July 27th; (((f))) (g)
National POW/MIA Recognition Day on the third Friday in September;
((and (g))) (h) Veterans' Day on November 11th; and (i) Pearl Harbor
Remembrance Day on December 7th. If the designated day falls on a
Saturday or Sunday, then the POW/MIA flag ((will)) must be displayed on
the preceding Friday.
(2) The governor's veterans affairs advisory committee ((shall))
must provide information to public entities regarding the purchase and
display of the POW/MIA flag upon request.
(3) As used in this section, "public entity" means every state
agency, including each institution of higher education, and every
county, city, and town.

--- END ---