BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that shellfish
aquaculture is a dynamic and rapidly evolving industry that is
important to the economy, history, and identity of western Washington
and many of its rural coastal communities.
(2) The legislature further finds that research conducted at its
direction under the oversight of Washington sea grant since 2007 has
considerably improved the existing scientific knowledge of the
environmental effects of shellfish culture and with that knowledge, and
at the direction of the legislature, state and local regulatory
structures have been or are in the process of being updated to
adequately regulate culture activities.
(3) The legislature further finds that in addition to state and
local regulation, the United States army corps of engineers, the
national marine fisheries service, and the United States fish and
wildlife service provide federal oversight and regulation of shellfish
aquaculture and that these federal permits are periodically reviewed
and updated based on evolving scientific knowledge.
(4) The legislature further finds that shellfish aquaculture is a
dynamic industry, with culture methods continually evolving in response
to changing markets and technology, and as such, continued investment
in research can help develop and maintain a thriving industry and a
healthy ecosystem.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.30.632 and 2007 c 341 s 64 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The sea grant and cooperative extension shall jointly
administer a program to provide field agents to work with local
governments, property owners, and the general public to increase the
propagation of shellfish, and to address Puget Sound water quality
problems within Kitsap, Mason, and Jefferson counties that may limit
shellfish propagation potential. The sea grant and cooperative
extension shall each make available the services of no less than two
agents within these counties for the purposes of this section.
(2) The responsibilities of the field agents shall include but not
be limited to the following:
(a) Provide technical assistance to property owners, marine
industry owners and operators, and others, regarding methods and
practices to address nonpoint and point sources of pollution of Puget
Sound;
(b) Provide technical assistance to address water quality problems
limiting opportunities for enhancing the recreational harvest of
shellfish;
(c) Provide technical assistance in the management and increased
production of shellfish to facility operators or to those interested in
establishing an operation;
(d) Assist local governments to develop and implement education and
public involvement activities related to Puget Sound water quality;
(e) Assist in coordinating local water quality programs with
region-wide and statewide programs;
(f) Provide information and assistance to local watershed
committees.
(3) The sea grant and cooperative extension shall mutually
coordinate their field agent activities to avoid duplicative efforts
and to ensure that the full range of responsibilities under RCW
28B.30.632 through 28B.30.636 are carried out. They shall consult with
the Puget Sound partnership, created in RCW 90.71.210, and ensure
consistency with any of the Puget Sound partnership's water quality
management plans.
(4) Recognizing the special expertise of both agencies, the sea
grant and cooperative extension shall cooperate to divide their
activities as follows:
(a) Sea grant shall have primary responsibility to address water
quality issues related to activities within Puget Sound, and to provide
assistance regarding the management and improvement of shellfish
production; and
(b) Cooperative extension shall have primary responsibility to
address upland and freshwater activities affecting Puget Sound water
quality and associated watersheds.
(5) In addition to the other responsibilities of this section, the
sea grant program must, consistent with RCW 28B.30.634, establish a
shellfish aquaculture public information center to provide the
following services:
(a) Develop a repository of information on sustainable aquaculture
practices;
(b) Work with private growers to provide technical assistance
regarding sustainable aquaculture practices and permit and regulation
compliance;
(c) Develop educational materials, kiosks, interpretative centers,
and other forums regarding the history, importance, and sustainability
of the shellfish industry;
(d) Serve as a single point of contact for the public and as a
public ombuds regarding questions about shellfish aquaculture
permitting, enforcement, and concerns;
(e) Liaison with state and county governments to assist in
resolving or explaining public questions and concerns;
(f) Seek federal funding for aquaculture research and development;
(g) Serve as an information clearinghouse for aquaculture
activities and regulations;
(h) Serve as a point of contact and a public clearinghouse
regarding abandoned aquaculture sites, including investigations into
any known owners with site restoration responsibilities and other
clean-up options when responsible owners are unknown or nonexistent;
and
(i) Fulfill other duties deemed relevant to the assistance of a
vibrant, sustainable, shellfish aquaculture industry.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.30.634 and 1990 c 289 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for the shellfish aquaculture public information center
required under RCW 28B.30.632, the sea grant and cooperative extension
shall require a match from nonstate sources of at least twenty-five
percent of the cost of the services provided, and not exceeding fifty
percent of the cost. The match may be either monetary compensation or
in-kind services, such as the provision for office space or clerical
support. Only direct costs of providing the services, excluding costs
of administrative overhead, may be included in the estimate of costs.
(2) The sea grant is not required to establish or maintain a
shellfish aquaculture public information center, as provided in RCW
28B.30.632, if funding is not available from the federal government,
the state government, gifts or donations, or from some other source.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.20.475 and 2007 c 216 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The sea grant program at the University of Washington shall,
consistent with this section and RCW 28B.20.476, commission ((a series
of)) scientific research studies that examine((s)) the possible
negative and positive effects, including the cumulative effects((, of
the current prevalent geoduck aquaculture techniques and practices on
the natural environment in and around Puget Sound, including the Strait
of Juan de Fuca)) and the economic contribution of evolving shellfish
aquaculture techniques and practices on Washington's economy and marine
ecosystems. The sea grant program shall use funding provided from the
((geoduck)) shellfish aquaculture research account created in RCW
28B.20.476 to review existing literature, ((directly perform))
competitively select research studies identified as needed, ((or to))
and enter into and manage contracts with scientific organizations or
institutions to ((accomplish these results)) conduct these studies.
(2) Prior to entering into a contract with a scientific
organization or institution, the sea grant program must:
(a) Analyze((, through peer review,)) the credibility of the
proposed party to the contract, including whether the party has
credible experience and knowledge and has access to the facilities
necessary to fully execute the research required by the contract; and
(b) Require that all proposed parties to a contract fully disclose
any past, present, or planned future personal or professional
connections with the shellfish industry or public interest groups.
(3) To the degree appropriate, research conducted under this
section should be coordinated with any research efforts by the sea
grant and other university programs related to ocean acidification.
(4) All research commissioned under this section must be subjected
to a rigorous peer review process prior to being accepted and reported
by the sea grant program.
(((4))) (5) In prioritizing and directing research under this
section, the sea grant program shall meet with the department of
ecology at least annually and ((rely on)) consider guidance submitted
by the department of ecology. The department of ecology shall convene
the shellfish aquaculture ((regulatory)) committee created in section
((4, chapter 216, Laws of 2007)) 6 of this act as necessary to serve as
((an oversight)) a steering committee to formulate the guidance
provided to the sea grant program. The objective of the ((oversight))
steering committee, and the resulting guidance provided to the sea
grant program, is to ensure that the research required under this
section ((satisfies)) assists the planning, permitting, and data
management needs of the state, to assist in the prioritization of
research ((given limited funding)), and to help identify any research
that ((is beneficial to complete other than what is listed in
subsection (5) of this section)) helps to develop and maintain a
thriving industry and a healthy ecosystem.
(((5))) (6) To satisfy the minimum requirements of subsection (1)
of this section, the sea grant program shall review all scientific
research that is existing or in progress that examines the possible
effect of currently prevalent geoduck practices((,)) on the natural
environment((,)) and prioritize and conduct new studies as needed, to
measure and assess the following:
(a) The environmental effects of structures commonly used in the
aquaculture industry to protect juvenile geoducks from predation;
(b) The environmental effects of commercial harvesting of geoducks
from intertidal geoduck beds, focusing on current prevalent harvesting
techniques, including a review of the recovery rates for benthic
communities after harvest;
(c) The extent to which geoducks in standard aquaculture tracts
alter the ecological characteristics of overlying waters while the
tracts are submerged, including impacts on species diversity, and the
abundance of other benthic organisms;
(d) Baseline information regarding naturally existing parasites and
diseases in wild and cultured geoducks, including whether and to what
extent commercial intertidal geoduck aquaculture practices impact the
baseline;
(e) Genetic interactions between cultured and wild geoduck,
including measurements of differences between cultured geoducks and
wild geoducks in terms of genetics and reproductive status; and
(f) The impact of the use of sterile triploid geoducks and whether
triploid animals diminish the genetic interactions between wild and
cultured geoducks.
(((6))) (7) If adequate funding is not made available for the
completion of all research required under this section, the sea grant
program shall consult with the shellfish aquaculture ((regulatory))
committee, via the department of ecology, to prioritize which of the
enumerated research projects have the greatest cost/benefit ratio in
terms of providing information important for regulatory decisions;
however, the study identified in subsection (((5))) (6)(b) of this
section shall receive top priority. The prioritization process may
include the addition of any new studies that may be appropriate in
addition to, or in place of, studies listed in this section.
(((7))) (8) When appropriate, all research commissioned under this
section must address localized and cumulative effects of geoduck
aquaculture.
(((8))) (9) The sea grant program and the University of Washington
are prohibited from retaining greater than fifteen percent of any
funding provided to implement this section for administrative overhead
or other deductions not directly associated with conducting the
research required by this section.
(((9))) (10) Individual commissioned contracts under this section
may address single or multiple components listed for study under this
section.
(((10) All)) (11) The research commissioned under this section must
be ((completed and the results)) reported to the ((appropriate
committees of the)) legislature ((by December 1, 2013. In addition,
the sea grant program shall provide the appropriate committees of the
legislature with annual reports updating the status and progress of the
ongoing studies that are completed in advance of the 2013 deadline))
consistent with RCW 43.01.036 periodically upon request.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.20.476 and 2007 c 216 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((geoduck)) shellfish aquaculture research account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from any
legislative appropriations, the aquaculture industry, or any other
private or public source directed to the account must be deposited in
the account. Expenditures from the account may only be used by the sea
grant program for the ((geoduck)) shellfish aquaculture research
projects identified by RCW 28B.20.475. Only the president of the
University of Washington or the president's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.
(2) The sea grant program is not required to commission scientific
research studies under RCW 28B.20.475 if funding is not available in
the shellfish aquaculture research account established in this section
or from another source.

Sec. 6 2007 c 216 s 4 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) The shellfish aquaculture ((regulatory)) committee is
established to, consistent with this section, serve as an advisory body
to the department ((of ecology on regulatory processes and approvals
for all current and new shellfish aquaculture activities, and the
activities conducted pursuant to RCW 90.58.060, as the activities
relate to shellfish)) with regard to the research conducted pursuant to
RCW 28B.20.475. The shellfish aquaculture ((regulatory)) committee is
advisory in nature, and no vote or action of the committee may overrule
existing statutes, regulations, or local ordinances nor bind the
decision-making process required of the University of Washington's sea
grant program under RCW 28B.20.475.
(2) ((The shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee shall develop
recommendations as to:
(a) A regulatory system or permit process for all current and new
shellfish aquaculture projects and activities that integrates all
applicable existing local, state, and federal regulations and is
efficient both for the regulators and the regulated; and
(b) Appropriate guidelines for geoduck aquaculture operations to be
included in shoreline master programs under section 5 of this act.
When developing the recommendations for guidelines under this
subsection, the committee must examine the following:
(i) Methods for quantifying and reducing marine litter; and
(ii) Possible landowner notification policies and requirements for
establishing new geoduck aquaculture farms.
(3)))(a) The members of the shellfish aquaculture ((regulatory))
committee shall be appointed by the director of the department ((of
ecology)) as follows:
(i) Two representatives of county government, one from a county
located on the Puget Sound, and one from a county located on the
Pacific Ocean;
(ii) Two individuals who are professionally engaged in the
commercial aquaculture of shellfish, one who owns or operates an
aquatic farm in Puget Sound, and one who owns or operates an aquatic
farm in state waters other than the Puget Sound;
(iii) Two representatives of organizations representing the
environmental community;
(iv) Two individuals who own shoreline property, one of which does
not have a commercial ((geoduck)) shellfish operation on his or her
property and one of which who does have a commercial ((geoduck))
shellfish operation on his or her property; and
(v) One representative each from the following state agencies: The
department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, the
department of agriculture, and the department of natural resources.
(b) In addition to the other participants listed in this
subsection, the governor shall invite the full participation of two
tribal governments, at least one of which is located within the
drainage of the Puget Sound.
(((4))) (3) The department ((of ecology)) shall provide
administrative and clerical assistance to the shellfish aquaculture
((regulatory)) committee and all agencies listed in subsection (((3)))
(2) of this section shall provide technical assistance.
(((5))) (4) Nonagency members of the shellfish aquaculture
((regulatory)) committee will not be compensated, but are entitled to
be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(((6))) (5) Any participation by a Native American tribe on the
shellfish aquaculture ((regulatory)) committee shall not, under any
circumstances, be viewed as an admission by the tribe that any of its
activities, or those of its members, are subject to any of the
statutes, regulations, ordinances, standards, or permit systems
reviewed, considered, or proposed by the committee.
(((7))) (6) The shellfish aquaculture ((regulatory)) committee is
authorized to form technical advisory panels as needed and appoint to
them members not on the shellfish aquaculture ((regulatory)) committee.
(((8) The department of ecology shall report the recommendations
and findings of the shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007, with a
further report, if necessary, by December 1, 2008.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 6 of this act is codified as a new
section in chapter 43.21A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 43.21A.681 (Geoduck aquaculture
operations -- Guidelines -- Rules) and 2007 c 216 s 5 are each repealed.

--- END ---