BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawfully engaging in a fishing guide
activity if the person holds a game fish guide license as required
under RCW 77.65.480 or has a license issued under RCW 77.65.010 to
operate a charter boat or act as a food fish guide, and the person:
(a) Fails to perform any duty of a charter boat or guide operator
as outlined in RCW 77.32.430; or
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or director regarding the
sale, possession, issuing, or reporting of temporary fishing licenses,
temporary short-term charter stamps, or catch record cards.
(2) Unlawfully engaging in a fishing guide activity is a gross
misdemeanor.

--- END ---