BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A wireless telecommunications provider must provide call
location information concerning the telecommunications device of a user
when requested by a law enforcement agency for the purpose of
responding to a call for emergency services or in an emergency
situation that involves the risk of death or serious physical harm.
(b) A law enforcement agency may not request information under this
section for any purpose other than responding to a call for emergency
services or in an emergency situation that involves the risk of death
or serious physical harm. A law enforcement agency may not convey or
disclose the call location information to any individual except as
strictly necessary for the purposes outlined in this subsection or as
required by an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
(2) Before requesting call location information from a wireless
telecommunications provider, a law enforcement officer must exercise
reasonable judgment in determining whether an emergency is likely to
exist requiring emergency services or involving the risk of death or
serious physical harm, or whether the call or other initiation of the
request for emergency response is pretextual. Unless the law
enforcement officer reasonably determines that the circumstances
require immediate action, in order to determine whether the request for
emergency response is pretextual, the officer or other delegated agent
within the law enforcement agency must check relevant databases before
or concurrently with initiating the request for call location
information from the telecommunications provider. This may include,
but is not necessarily limited to, the following:
(a) Checking the federal bureau of investigation's national crime
information center to identify if the person making the call for
emergency services or initiating the request for emergency response has
a history of domestic violence or other criminal history suggesting
that the call or request is pretextual; and
(b) Checking with the secretary of state's office to identify if
the user for whom the call location information is being requested is
participating in the address confidentiality program established in
chapter 40.24 RCW.
(3) A wireless telecommunications provider may establish protocols
by which the carrier voluntarily discloses call location information to
a law enforcement agency for the purposes outlined in subsection (1) of
this section.
(4) No cause of action may be brought in any court against any
wireless telecommunications provider, its officers, employees, agents,
or other specified persons for providing call location information
while acting in good faith and in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
(5) All wireless telecommunications providers registered to do
business in the state of Washington and all resellers of wireless
telecommunications services shall submit their emergency contact
information to the Washington state patrol in order to facilitate
requests from a law enforcement agency for call location information in
accordance with this section. This contact information must be
submitted immediately upon any change in contact information.
(6) The Washington state patrol must maintain a database containing
emergency contact information for all wireless telecommunications
providers registered to do business in the state of Washington and must
make the information immediately available upon request to facilitate
a request from law enforcement for call location information under this
section.
(7) The Washington state patrol may adopt by rule criteria for
fulfilling the requirements of this section.

--- END ---