BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.045 and 2008 c 86 s 102 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any city pursuant to RCW 35.92.060, of
any county which has created an unincorporated transportation benefit
area pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110, of any public
transportation benefit area pursuant to RCW 36.57A.080 and 36.57A.090,
of any county transportation authority established pursuant to chapter
36.57 RCW, ((and)) of any metropolitan municipal corporation within a
county with a population of one million or more pursuant to chapter
35.58 RCW, and of any enhanced public transportation zone pursuant to
section 2 of this act, may, by resolution or ordinance for the sole
purpose of providing funds for the operation, maintenance, or capital
needs of public transportation systems or public transportation limited
to persons with special needs under RCW 36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, and
in lieu of the excise taxes authorized by RCW 35.95.040, submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters or include such authorization in
a proposition to perform the function of public transportation or
public transportation limited to persons with special needs under RCW
36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, and if approved by a majority of persons
voting thereon, impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms
of this chapter. Where an authorizing proposition is submitted by a
county on behalf of an unincorporated transportation benefit area, it
shall be voted upon by the voters residing within the boundaries of
such unincorporated transportation benefit area and, if approved, the
sales and use tax shall be imposed only within such area.
Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, any
county in which a county public transportation plan has been adopted
pursuant to RCW 36.57.070 and the voters of such county have authorized
the imposition of a sales and use tax pursuant to the provisions of
section 10, chapter 167, Laws of 1974 ex. sess., prior to July 1, 1975,
shall be authorized to fix and impose a sales and use tax as provided
in this section at not to exceed the rate so authorized without
additional approval of the voters of such county as otherwise required
by this section.
The tax authorized by this section shall be in addition to the tax
authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and shall be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within such city, public
transportation benefit area, county, ((or)) metropolitan municipal
corporation, or enhanced public transportation zone as the case may be.
The rate of such tax shall be one-tenth, two-tenths, three-tenths,
four-tenths, five-tenths, six-tenths, seven-tenths, eight-tenths, or
nine-tenths of one percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales
tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use tax). The rate
of such tax shall not exceed the rate authorized by the voters unless
such increase shall be similarly approved.
(2)(a) In the event a metropolitan municipal corporation imposes a
sales and use tax pursuant to this chapter no city, county which has
created an unincorporated transportation benefit area, public
transportation benefit area authority, or county transportation
authority wholly within such metropolitan municipal corporation shall
be empowered to impose and/or collect taxes under RCW 35.95.040 or this
section, but nothing herein shall prevent such city or county from
imposing sales and use taxes pursuant to any other authorization.
(b) In the event a county transportation authority imposes a sales
and use tax under this section, no city, county which has created an
unincorporated transportation benefit area, public transportation
benefit area, or metropolitan municipal corporation, located within the
territory of the authority, shall be empowered to impose or collect
taxes under RCW 35.95.040 or this section.
(c) In the event a public transportation benefit area imposes a
sales and use tax under this section, no city, county which has created
an unincorporated transportation benefit area, or metropolitan
municipal corporation, located wholly or partly within the territory of
the public transportation benefit area, shall be empowered to impose or
collect taxes under RCW 35.95.040 or this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The tax authorized under RCW 82.14.045 may also be imposed
by the legislative body of an enhanced public transportation zone
established under subsection (2) of this section if approved by the
voters in the enhanced public transportation zone in the manner
provided for in this section. The establishing transit agency must
consult with the department on sales tax collection methods when
establishing the boundaries of the enhanced public transportation zone.
(b) A tax imposed under (a) of this subsection, when combined with
the rate of tax imposed by the establishing transit agency under RCW
82.14.045, may not exceed the maximum rate allowed under RCW 82.14.045,
and expires either (i) five years after imposition, unless reauthorized
by the voters in the enhanced public transportation zone in the manner
provided for in this section, or (ii) upon failure of a
reauthorization. Prior to reauthorization, the enhanced public
transportation zone boundaries must be readjusted, if necessary, to
meet the provisions under subsection (2)(c) of this section. A tax
imposed under (a) of this subsection must be imposed only in the
territory of the enhanced public transportation zone. The revenue from
the tax imposed under (a) of this subsection must be expended only for
public transportation service within the enhanced public transportation
zone and must not supplant existing revenues allocated to the enhanced
public transportation zone.
(c) Six months prior to the voter authorization or reauthorization
of the tax authorized under (a) of this subsection, the establishing
transit agency must determine a baseline level of fixed-route public
transportation service. This baseline level of service must be
publicly posted on the web site of the establishing transit agency.
Upon the collection of the tax imposed under (a) of this subsection,
fixed-route public transportation service within the enhanced public
transportation zone must increase proportionally to additional revenue
generated within the enhanced public transportation zone. Service
hours within the enhanced public transportation zone must increase from
the baseline level in accordance with the establishing transit agency's
most recent cost of fixed-route public transportation per service hour,
as approved by the national transit database. A report on the increase
in public transportation service must be publicly posted annually on
the establishing transit agency's web site.
(2)(a) The legislative body of a transit agency may establish an
enhanced public transportation zone within a portion of the boundaries
of the transit agency establishing the enhanced public transportation
zone. An enhanced public transportation zone may include all or a
portion of any county, city, or town as long as all or a portion of the
county, city, or town is within the territory of the establishing
transit agency. However, the legislative body of a city, town, or
county may pass a resolution removing all or a portion of its
jurisdiction from the enhanced public transportation zone, prior to
creation of the zone, or at the time of reauthorization of the zone.
The boundaries of any enhanced public transportation zone must follow
election precinct lines as far as practicable. When creating the zone
boundaries, the establishing transit agency must attempt to include a
significant amount of the population that the establishing transit
agency designated as low income or minority for purposes of Title VI of
the federal civil rights act of 1964. An enhanced public
transportation zone may not include more than forty-nine percent of the
population of the establishing transit agency.
(b) The members of the legislative body of the transit agency
proposing to establish the enhanced public transportation zone, acting
ex officio and independently, constitutes the legislative body of the
enhanced public transportation zone.
(c) An enhanced public transportation zone may establish, finance,
and provide a public transportation system within its boundaries in the
same manner as authorized for the transit agency establishing the
enhanced public transportation zone. However, the establishing transit
agency must adopt a resolution or ordinance finding that the enhanced
public transportation zone warrants consistent and sustainable
transportation service levels of passenger capacity, speed, and service
frequency to serve persons within the enhanced public transportation
zone that would otherwise be substantially disadvantaged if the
enhanced public transportation zone were not created.
(d) An enhanced public transportation zone constitutes a body
corporate and possesses all the usual powers of a corporation for
public purposes as well as all other powers that may be conferred by
statute including, but not limited to, the authority to hire employees,
staff, and services, to enter into contracts, to acquire, hold, and
dispose of real and personal property, and to sue and be sued. Public
works contract limits applicable to the transit agency that established
the enhanced public transportation zone also apply to the enhanced
public transportation zone.
(e) An enhanced public transportation zone may be dissolved by a
majority vote of its legislative body when all contractual obligations
of the enhanced public transportation zone have either been discharged
or assumed by another governmental entity.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Enhanced public transportation zone" means a quasi-municipal
corporation and independent taxing authority within the meaning of
Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a taxing district
within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution,
created by the legislative body of a transit agency.
(b) "Transit agency" means a city-owned transit system, an
unincorporated transportation benefit area, a county transportation
authority, a metropolitan municipal corporation within a county with a
population of one million or more, and a public transportation benefit
area.

--- END ---