BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the
retirement systems operated by the first class cities pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 41.28 RCW each administer retirement funds that
are too small and cost too much to administer relative to the
commingled trust fund administered by the Washington state investment
board for the state-administered retirement plans. Over time, the
higher administrative costs and the more limited investment and
diversification opportunities available to the smaller cities' pension
funds lead to both less investment return and more risk over time.
(2) In order to reduce the cost of the first class cities'
retirement plans over time, the legislature intends to authorize the
board to enter into agreements with the first class cities to manage
the investment of the assets of the first class cities' retirement
systems along with the assets of the state-administered retirement
plans in the commingled trust fund.
(3) The legislature intends that the investment management
agreements between first class cities and the Washington state
investment board be irrevocable after entry, as the investment
strategies that are necessary to best meet the long-term demands of
pension funds require diverse forms of investment, some of which are
incompatible with an investment responsibility of uncertain duration.
(4) The legislature does not intend that the board enter any
agreement for the management of the assets of the first class cities'
retirement systems that is not in the best interests of both the state
and the members and beneficiaries of the Washington state retirement
systems. Any agreement entered must be consistent with the fiduciary
duties of the board as provided in RCW 43.33A.140.
(5) By authorizing the board to enter into asset management
agreements with the first class cities' retirement systems, the
legislature assumes no liability or other responsibility for the
benefits owed by each city to the members and beneficiaries of the
respective systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.33A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state investment board is authorized to enter into
agreements with the city councils or commissions of first class cities
to assume the duties of investing the retirement funds of the first
class cities' retirement systems created in RCW 41.28.070. The board
shall only enter such agreements under terms that are in the best
interests of the members and beneficiaries of the employers that
participate in the state-administered retirement funds which it
invests.
(2) Once entered into, an agreement to assume management of
retirement funds created in RCW 41.28.070 between the board and a first
class city is irrevocable, but may be amended from time to time by
mutual agreement in order to facilitate efficient administration of the
retirement funds for both the board and first class city.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.33A.020 and 2002 c 303 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created the state investment board to consist of
fifteen members to be appointed as provided in this section.
(1) One member who is an active member of the public employees'
retirement system and has been an active member for at least five
years. This member shall be appointed by the governor, subject to
confirmation by the senate, from a list of nominations submitted by
organizations representing active members of the system. The initial
term of appointment shall be one year.
(2) One member who is an active member of the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system and has been an active
member for at least five years. This member shall be appointed by the
governor, subject to confirmation by the senate, from a list of
nominations submitted by organizations representing active members of
the system. The initial term of appointment shall be two years.
(3) One member who is an active member of the teachers' retirement
system and has been an active member for at least five years. This
member shall be appointed by the superintendent of public instruction
subject to confirmation by the senate. The initial term of appointment
shall be three years.
(4) The state treasurer or the assistant state treasurer if
designated by the state treasurer.
(5) A member of the state house of representatives. This member
shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.
(6) A member of the state senate. This member shall be appointed
by the president of the senate.
(7) One member who is a retired member of a state retirement system
shall be appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by the
senate. The initial term of appointment shall be three years.
(8) The director of the department of labor and industries.
(9) The director of the department of retirement systems.
(10) One member who is an active member of the school employees'
retirement system and has at least five years of service credit. This
member shall be appointed by the superintendent of public instruction
subject to confirmation by the senate. The initial term of appointment
shall be three years.
(11) Five nonvoting members appointed by the state investment board
who are considered experienced and qualified in the field of
investments.
(12) Upon reaching agreement with three first class cities for the
management of the assets of pension funds, an additional nonvoting
member who is a member of a first class cities' retirement system with
assets managed by the board shall be appointed by the governor.
The legislative members shall serve terms of two years. The
initial legislative members appointed to the board shall be appointed
no sooner than January 10, 1983. The position of a legislative member
on the board shall become vacant at the end of that member's term on
the board or whenever the member ceases to be a member of the senate or
house of representatives from which the member was appointed.
After the initial term of appointment, all other members of the
state investment board, except ex officio members, shall serve terms of
three years and shall hold office until successors are appointed.
Members' terms, except for ex officio members, shall commence on
January 1 of the year in which the appointments are made.
Members may be reappointed for additional terms. Appointments for
vacancies shall be made for the unexpired terms in the same manner as
the original appointments. Any member may be removed from the board
for cause by the member's respective appointing authority.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.33A.150 and 2007 c 215 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state investment board shall prepare written reports at
least quarterly summarizing the investment activities of the state
investment board, which reports shall be sent to the governor, the
senate ways and means committee, the house appropriations committee,
the department of retirement systems, and other agencies having a
direct financial interest in the investment of funds by the board, and
to other persons on written request. The state investment board shall
provide information to the department of retirement systems necessary
for the preparation of monthly reports.
(2) At least annually, the board shall report on the board's
investment activities for the department of labor and industries'
accident, medical aid, and reserve funds to the senate financial
institutions and insurance committee, the senate economic development
and labor committee, and the house commerce and labor committee, or
appropriate successor committees.
(3) At least annually, the board shall report on the board's
investment activities for the higher education permanent funds to the
house capital budget committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(4) At least annually, the board shall report to the first class
cities' legislative authorities and retirement boards on the board's
investment activities for the first class cities' retirement funds
managed under an agreement reached under section 2 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 35.39.060 and 2009 c 549 s 2076 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Until such time that the city council or city commission enters
an agreement with the Washington state investment board to manage the
retirement fund of that city, any city or town now or hereafter
operating an employees' pension system with the approval of the board
otherwise responsible for management of its respective funds may
invest, reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or exchange investments
acquired. Investments shall be made in accordance with investment
policy duly established and published by the board. In discharging its
duties under this section, the board shall act with the care, skill,
prudence, and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a
prudent man or woman acting in a like capacity and familiar with such
matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a like character
and with like aims; shall diversify the investments of the employees'
pension system so as to minimize the risk of large losses; and shall
act in accordance with the documents and instruments governing the
employees' pension system, insofar as such documents and instruments
are consistent with the provisions of this title.
(2) Upon a city council or city commission's decision to enter an
agreement with the Washington state investment board to manage the
retirement fund of that city, the state investment board shall invest
those funds entrusted to it consistent with the policies and standards
provided in chapter 43.33A RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 35.39.070 and 1982 c 166 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Until such time that the city council or city commission enters an
agreement with the Washington state investment board to manage the
retirement fund of that city, the city treasurer may cause any
securities in which the city retirement system deals to be registered
in the name of a nominee without mention of any fiduciary relationship,
except that adequate records shall be maintained to identify the actual
owner of the security so registered. The securities so registered
shall be held in the physical custody of the city treasurer, the
federal reserve system, the designee of the city treasurer, or at the
election of the designee and upon approval of the city treasurer, the
Pacific Securities Depository Trust Company Inc. or the Depository
Trust Company of New York City or its designees.
With respect to the securities, the nominee shall act only on the
direction of the retirement board. All rights to the dividends,
interest, and sale proceeds from the securities and all voting rights
of the securities shall be vested in the actual owners of the
securities, and not in the nominee.

Sec. 7 RCW 35.39.080 and 1982 c 166 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The retirement board of any city which is responsible for the
management of an employees' retirement system established to provide
retirement benefits for nonpublic safety employees shall appoint an
investment advisory committee consisting of at least three members who
are considered experienced and qualified in the field of investments.
At such time that the Washington state investment board has assumed the
duties of investing the retirement fund of that city under an agreement
reached pursuant to section 2 of this act, the retirement board of that
city shall cease the activities of the investment advisory committee
appointed under this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 35.39.090 and 1982 c 166 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, in
addition to its other powers and duties, the investment advisory
committee shall:
(((1))) (a) Make recommendations as to general investment policies,
practices, and procedures to the retirement board;
(((2))) (b) Review the investment transactions of the retirement
board annually;
(((3))) (c) Prepare a written report of its activities during each
fiscal year. Each report shall be submitted not more than thirty days
after the end of each fiscal year to the retirement board and to any
other person who has submitted a request therefor.
(2) Upon a city council or city commission's decision to enter an
agreement with the Washington state investment board to manage the
retirement fund of that city under section 2 of this act, and the
commencement of the investment duties by the state investment board,
the investment advisory committee shall no longer perform the duties
under subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.28.080 and 2012 c 117 s 47 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby created and established a board of
administration in each city coming under this chapter, which shall,
under the provisions of this chapter and the direction of the city
council or city commission, administer the retirement system and the
retirement fund created by this chapter. Under and pursuant to the
direction of the city council or city commission, the board shall
provide for the proper investment of the moneys in the ((said))
retirement fund until such time that the city council or city
commission enters an agreement with the Washington state investment
board under section 2 of this act to manage the retirement fund of that
city.
(2) The board of administration shall consist of seven members, as
follows: Three members appointed by the regular appointing authority
of the city, and three employees who are eligible to membership in the
retirement system, to be elected by the employees. The above six
members shall appoint the seventh member.
(3) Until such time that the city council or city commission enters
an agreement with the Washington state investment board under section
2 of this act to manage the retirement fund of that city:
(a) the investment of all or any part of the retirement fund shall
be subject to chapter 35.39 RCW((.)); and
(((4))) (b) Subject to such provisions as may be prescribed by law
for the deposit of municipal funds in banks, cash belonging to the
retirement fund may be deposited in any licensed national bank or in
any bank, banks or corporations authorized or licensed to do a banking
business and organized under the laws of the state of Washington.
(((5))) (4) The city treasurer shall be the custodian of the
retirement fund. All payments from said fund shall be made by the city
treasurer but only upon warrant duly executed by the city comptroller.
(((6))) (5) Except as herein provided, no member and no employee of
the board of administration shall have any interest, direct or
indirect, in the making of any investments from the retirement fund, or
in the gains or profits accruing therefrom. And no member or employee
of said board, directly or indirectly, for himself or herself or as an
agent or partner of others, shall borrow any of its funds or deposits
or in any manner use the same except to make such current and necessary
payments as are authorized by said board; nor shall any member or
employee of said board become an endorser or surety or become in any
manner an obligor for moneys invested by the board.

Sec. 10 RCW 41.28.085 and 1969 ex.s. c 211 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Until such time as a city council or city commission enters an
agreement with the Washington state investment board under section 2 of
this act to manage the retirement fund of that city, and in order that
the intent of the legislature may be made clear with respect to
investments, but without restricting the necessary flexibility that
must exist for successful investing of the retirement and pension
funds, the legislature makes this declaration of its desire that the
investment authority shall give primary consideration to dealing with
brokerage firms which maintain offices in the state of Washington so
that the investment programs may make a meaningful contribution to the
economy of the state. It is further the desire of the legislature that
the retirement and pension funds shall be used as much as reasonably
possible to benefit and expand the business and economic climate within
the state of Washington so long as such use would be consistent with
sound investment policy.
(2) Upon a city council or city commission's decision to enter an
agreement with the Washington state investment board under section 2 of
this act to manage the retirement fund of that city, the state
investment board shall invest those funds entrusted to it consistent
with the policies and standards provided in chapter 43.33A RCW.

--- END ---