BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that school district
budgeting and hiring efforts are assisted by the availability of
forecasted enrollment data. The addition of forecasted caseload
estimates of students by school district improves a district's ability
to plan for the number of certificated instructional staff that will be
needed in a given school year.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.88C.010 and 2012 c 217 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The caseload forecast council is hereby created. The council
shall consist of two individuals appointed by the governor and four
individuals, one of whom is appointed by the chairperson of each of the
two largest political caucuses in the senate and house of
representatives. The chair of the council shall be selected from among
the four caucus appointees. The council may select such other officers
as the members deem necessary.
(2) The council shall employ a caseload forecast supervisor to
supervise the preparation of all caseload forecasts. As used in this
chapter, "supervisor" means the caseload forecast supervisor.
(3) Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five members of the
council is required for any decisions regarding employment of the
supervisor. Employment of the supervisor shall terminate after each
term of three years. At the end of the first year of each three-year
term the council shall consider extension of the supervisor's term by
one year. The council may fix the compensation of the supervisor. The
supervisor shall employ staff sufficient to accomplish the purposes of
this section.
(4) The caseload forecast council shall oversee the preparation of
and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four members, the
official state caseload forecasts prepared under RCW 43.88C.020. If
the council is unable to approve a forecast before a date required in
RCW 43.88C.020, the supervisor shall submit the forecast without
approval and the forecast shall have the same effect as if approved by
the council.
(5) A councilmember who does not cast an affirmative vote for
approval of the official caseload forecast may request, and the
supervisor shall provide, an alternative forecast based on assumptions
specified by the member.
(6) Members of the caseload forecast council shall serve without
additional compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council
or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative
members of the council shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(7) "Caseload," as used in this chapter, means:
(a) The number of persons expected to meet entitlement requirements
and require the services of public assistance programs, state
correctional institutions, state correctional noninstitutional
supervision, state institutions for juvenile offenders, ((the common
school system,)) long-term care, medical assistance, foster care, and
adoption support;
(b) The number of students who are eligible for the Washington
college bound scholarship program and are expected to attend an
institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030; and
(c) The number of persons expected to meet entitlement requirements
in the common school system, by school district and in total statewide.
(8) The caseload forecast council shall forecast the temporary
assistance for needy families and the working connections child care
programs as a courtesy.
(9) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
provided in RCW 43.88.020 apply to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2013, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---