BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.24.010 and 2010 c 60 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrative fund" means the volunteer firefighters' and
reserve officers' administrative fund created under RCW 41.24.030.
(2) "Appropriate legislation" means an ordinance when an ordinance
is the means of legislating by any municipality, and resolution in all
other cases.
(3) "Board of trustees" or "local board" means: (a) For matters
affecting firefighters, a firefighter board of trustees created under
RCW 41.24.060; (b) for matters affecting an emergency worker, an
emergency medical service district board of trustees created under RCW
41.24.330; or (c) for matters affecting reserve officers, a reserve
officer board of trustees created under RCW 41.24.460.
(4) "Emergency worker" means any emergency medical service
personnel, regulated by chapters 18.71 and 18.73 RCW, who is a member
of an emergency medical service district but shall not include
emergency medical service personnel who are eligible for participation
in the Washington public employees' retirement system, with respect to
periods of service rendered in such capacity.
(5) "Fire department" means any regularly organized fire department
or emergency medical service district consisting wholly of volunteer
firefighters, or any part-paid and part-volunteer fire department duly
organized and maintained by any municipality: PROVIDED, That any such
municipality wherein a part-paid fire department is maintained may by
appropriate legislation permit the full-paid members of its department
to come under the provisions of chapter 41.16 RCW.
(6) "Firefighter" includes any firefighter or emergency worker who
is a member of any fire department of any municipality but shall not
include firefighters who are eligible for participation in the
Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement
system or the Washington public employees' retirement system, with
respect to periods of service rendered in such capacity.
(7) "Municipal corporation" or "municipality" includes any county,
city, town or combination thereof, fire protection district, local law
enforcement agency, or any emergency medical service district or other
special district, authorized by law to protect life or property within
its boundaries through a fire department, emergency workers, or reserve
officers.
(8) "Participant" means: (a) For purposes of relief, any reserve
officer or support volunteer who is or may become eligible for relief
under this chapter or any firefighter or emergency worker; and (b) for
purposes of retirement pension, any firefighter, emergency worker, or
reserve officer who is or may become eligible to receive a benefit of
any type under the retirement provisions of this chapter, or whose
beneficiary may be eligible to receive any such benefit.
(9) "Performance of duty" or "performance of service" shall be
construed to mean and include any work in and about company quarters,
any fire station, any law enforcement office or precinct, or any other
place under the direction or general orders of the chief or other
officer having authority to order such member to perform such work;
performing other officially assigned duties that are secondary to his
or her duties as a firefighter, emergency worker, or reserve officer
such as maintenance, public education, inspections, investigations,
court testimony, and fund-raising for the benefit of the department;
being on call or on standby under the orders of the chief or designated
officer of the department, except at the individual's home or place of
business; responding to, working at, or returning from an alarm of
fire, emergency call, or law enforcement duties; drill or training; or
any work performed of an emergency nature in accordance with the rules
and regulations of the fire department or local law enforcement agency.
(10) "Principal fund" means the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund created under RCW
41.24.030.
(11) "Relief" for firefighters, emergency workers, or reserve
officers means all medical, death, and disability benefits available
under this chapter that are made necessary from death, sickness,
injury, or disability arising in the performance of duty, including
benefits provided under RCW 41.24.110, 41.24.150, 41.24.160, 41.24.175,
41.24.220, and 41.24.230, but does not include retirement pensions
provided under this chapter. For support volunteers, relief means all
medical and disability benefits available under this chapter that are
made necessary from death, sickness, injury, or disability caused by
and in the performance of duty, including benefits provided under RCW
41.24.110, 41.24.150, and 41.24.220, but does not include retirement or
death benefits provided in this chapter.
(12) "Reserve officer" means the same as defined by the Washington
state criminal justice training commission under chapter 43.101 RCW,
but shall not include enforcement officers who are eligible for
participation in the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system or the Washington public employees'
retirement system, with respect to periods of service rendered in such
capacity.
(13) "Retired participant" means any participant who is at least
sixty-five years of age and has been retired by the board of trustees
under RCW 41.24.170 and has been in receipt of a monthly pension for no
less than three months.
(14) "Retirement pension" means retirement payments for the
performance of service, as provided under RCW 41.24.170, 41.24.172,
41.24.175, 41.24.180, and 41.24.185.
(15) "State board" means the state board for volunteer firefighters
and reserve officers.
(16) "Support volunteer" means any member of the fire department,
emergency medical service district, or law enforcement, but does not
include volunteers who meet the definitions in subsection (4), (6), or
(12) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.24.030 and 2005 c 37 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund is created in the state treasury as a trust fund
for the benefit of the participants covered by this chapter consisting
of:
(a) All bequests, fees, gifts, emoluments, or donations given or
paid to the fund.
(b) An annual fee for each member of its fire department to be paid
by each municipal corporation for the purpose of affording relief
provided in this chapter for firefighters as follows:
(i) Thirty dollars for each volunteer or part-paid member of its
fire department;
(ii) A sum equal to one and one-half of one percent of the annual
salary attached to the rank of each full-paid member of its fire
department, prorated for 1970 on the basis of services prior to March
1, 1970.
(c) An annual fee for each emergency worker of an emergency medical
service district paid by the district that is sufficient to pay the
full costs of covering the emergency worker under the relief provisions
of this chapter, including operating expenses. The state board shall
determine the amount of this fee based on the latest actuarial
valuation of the system.
(d) Where a municipal corporation has elected to make relief
provisions of this chapter available to its reserve officers, an annual
fee for each reserve officer paid by the municipal corporation that is
sufficient to pay the full costs of covering the reserve officer under
the relief provisions of this chapter, including operating expenses.
The state board shall determine the amount of this fee based on the
latest actuarial valuation of the system.
(e) Where a municipal corporation has elected to make relief
provisions of this chapter available to support volunteers, an annual
fee for each support volunteer electing to participate in the relief
provisions must be paid by the support volunteer on or before the first
day of December of each year for coverage during the succeeding year.
The state board shall determine the amount of this fee. Nothing in
this chapter prohibits any municipality from voluntarily paying all or
a portion of the support volunteers' fee for relief coverage.
(f) Where a municipal corporation has elected to make the
retirement pension provisions of this chapter available to members of
its fire department, an annual fee of sixty dollars for each of its
firefighters electing to enroll, thirty dollars of which shall be paid
by the municipality and thirty dollars of which shall be paid by the
firefighter. However, nothing in this section prohibits any
municipality from voluntarily paying the firefighters' fee for this
retirement pension coverage.
(((f))) (g) Where an emergency medical service district has elected
to make the retirement pension provisions of this chapter available to
its emergency workers, for each emergency worker electing to enroll:
(i) An annual fee of thirty dollars shall be paid by the emergency
worker; and (ii) an annual fee paid by the emergency medical service
district that, together with the thirty dollar fee per emergency
worker, is sufficient to pay the full costs of covering the emergency
worker under the retirement pension benefits provided under this
chapter, including operating expenses. The state board shall determine
the amount of this fee based on the latest actuarial valuation of the
system. However, nothing in this section prohibits any emergency
medical service district from voluntarily paying the emergency workers'
fees for this retirement pension coverage.
(((g))) (h) Where a municipal corporation has elected to make the
retirement pension provisions of this chapter available to its reserve
officers, for each reserve officer electing to enroll: (i) An annual
fee of thirty dollars shall be paid by the reserve officer; and (ii) an
annual fee paid by the municipal corporation that, together with the
thirty dollar fee per reserve officer, is sufficient to pay the full
costs of covering the reserve officer under the retirement pension
benefits provided under this chapter, including operating expenses.
The state board shall determine the amount of this fee based on the
latest actuarial valuation of the system. However, nothing in this
section prohibits any municipal corporation from voluntarily paying the
reserve officers' fees for this retirement pension coverage.
(((h))) (i) Moneys transferred from the administrative fund, as
provided under subsection (4) of this section, which may only be used
to pay relief and retirement pensions for firefighters.
(((i))) (j) Earnings from the investment of moneys in the principal
fund.
(2) The state investment board, upon request of the state treasurer
shall have full power to invest, reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or
exchange investments acquired from that portion of the amounts credited
to the principal fund as is not, in the judgment of the state board,
required to meet current withdrawals. Investments shall be made in the
manner prescribed by RCW 43.84.150 and not otherwise.
All bonds, investments, or other obligations purchased by the state
investment board shall be placed in the custody of the state treasurer,
and he or she shall collect the principal thereof and interest thereon
when due.
The state investment board may sell any of the bonds, investments,
or obligations so acquired and the proceeds thereof shall be paid to
the state treasurer.
(3) The interest, earnings, and proceeds from the sale and
redemption of any investments held by the principal fund and invested
by the state investment board shall be credited to and form a part of
the principal fund, less the allocation to the state investment board
expense account pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160.
Subject to restrictions contained in this chapter, all amounts
credited to the principal fund shall be available for making the
benefit payments required by this chapter.
The state treasurer shall make an annual report showing the
condition of the fund.
(4) The volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the
fund, including unanticipated revenues under RCW 43.79.270, may be
spent only after appropriation, and may be used only for operating
expenses of the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief
and pension principal fund, the operating expenses of the volunteer
firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, or for
transfer from the administrative fund to the principal fund.
(a) Forty percent of all moneys received by the state from taxes on
fire insurance premiums shall be paid into the state treasury and
credited to the administrative fund.
(b) The state board shall compute a percentage of the amounts
credited to the administrative fund to be paid into the principal fund.
(c) For the purpose of providing amounts to be used to defray the
cost of administration of the principal and administrative funds, the
state board shall ascertain at the beginning of each biennium and
request from the legislature an appropriation from the administrative
fund sufficient to cover estimated expenses for the biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, any
municipality may adopt appropriate legislation and make payment of the
fees for support volunteers as required by RCW 41.24.030(1) for the
purpose of enrolling support volunteers under the relief provisions of
this chapter.
(2) The relief provisions of this chapter may not be extended to
support volunteers if the municipality has extended industrial
insurance coverage to its support volunteers under Title 51 RCW or any
other provision of law.
(3) A municipality that adopts appropriate legislation extending
the relief provisions to its support volunteers is immune from civil
actions for personal injuries to its support volunteers to the same
extent as if the support volunteers were covered under Title 51 RCW.
(4) Support volunteers are not eligible to receive benefits under
RCW 41.24.160 or 41.24.230, or any retirement provisions of this
chapter.
(5) Credit for service as a support volunteer shall not be included
for purposes of determining retirement pension eligibility or benefits
under RCW 41.24.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a local board of trustees designated to
administer this chapter in every municipal corporation maintaining a
regularly organized department.
(2) Fire departments shall use the boards of trustees created under
RCW 41.24.060, emergency medical service districts shall use the boards
of trustees created under RCW 41.24.330, and law enforcement
departments shall use the boards of trustees created under RCW
41.24.460.
(3) Departments without a local board of trustees as established
under RCW 41.24.060, 41.24.330, or 41.24.460 shall create a local board
of trustees to administer this chapter in every municipality extending
the provisions of this chapter to support volunteers as follows:
(a) A county support volunteer board of trustees shall consist of
the following five members:
(i) Two members of the county legislative authority, or their
designees;
(ii) The county auditor, or a designee;
(iii) The sheriff or the head of the emergency medical service
district; and
(iv) One support volunteer elected by the support volunteers of the
county for an annual one-year term.
(b) A city department support volunteer board of trustees shall
consist of the following five members:
(i) The mayor or the mayor's designee;
(ii) The city clerk, comptroller, or administrator;
(iii) One council member of the city, or a designee;
(iv) The chief of the department; and
(v) One support volunteer elected by the support volunteers of the
city for an annual one-year term.
(4) The board of trustees shall have the same powers and duties as
provided to boards of trustees under RCW 41.24.070 through 41.24.140.

--- END ---