BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.48.130 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 85 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature that all jail inmates
receive appropriate and cost-effective emergency and necessary medical
care. Governing units, the health care authority, and medical care
providers shall cooperate to achieve the best rates consistent with
adequate care.
(2) Payment for emergency or necessary health care shall be by the
governing unit, except that the health care authority shall directly
reimburse the provider pursuant to chapter 74.09 RCW, in accordance
with the rates and benefits established by the authority, if the
confined person is eligible for medicaid and is admitted as an
inpatient in a hospital, nursing facility, juvenile psychiatric
facility, or intermediate care facility that is not part of the state
or local correctional system, or the confined person is otherwise
eligible under the authority's medical care programs as authorized
under chapter 74.09 RCW. After payment by the authority, the financial
responsibility for any remaining balance, including unpaid client
liabilities that are a condition of eligibility or participation under
chapter 74.09 RCW, shall be borne by the medical care provider and the
governing unit as may be mutually agreed upon between the medical care
provider and the governing unit. In the absence of mutual agreement
between the medical care provider and the governing unit, the financial
responsibility for any remaining balance shall be borne equally between
the medical care provider and the governing unit. Total payments from
all sources to providers for care rendered to confined persons
((eligible under chapter 74.09 RCW)) shall not exceed the amounts that
would be paid by the authority for similar services provided under
Title XIX medicaid, unless additional resources are obtained from the
confined person.
(3) Providers of hospital services that are hospitals licensed
under chapter 70.41 RCW shall contract with a correctional facility for
inpatient, outpatient, and ancillary services if deemed appropriate by
the correctional facility. The correctional facility may only
reimburse a provider of hospital services at a rate no more than the
amount payable under the medicaid reimbursement structure, plus any
additional amount provided specifically for this purpose in the state
omnibus appropriations act, regardless of whether the hospital is
located within or outside of Washington. A correctional facility may
contract with the department of corrections, at the correctional
facility's expense, to participate in the provider one system operated
by the Washington state health care authority for payment of hospital
services pursuant to this section.
(4) As part of the screening process upon booking or preparation of
an inmate into jail, general information concerning the inmate's
ability to pay for medical care shall be identified, including
insurance or other medical benefits or resources to which an inmate is
entitled. This information shall be made available to the authority,
the governing unit, and any provider of health care services.
(((4))) (5) The governing unit or provider may obtain reimbursement
from the confined person for the cost of health care services not
provided under chapter 74.09 RCW, including reimbursement from any
insurance program or from other medical benefit programs available to
the confined person. Nothing in this chapter precludes civil or
criminal remedies to recover the costs of medical care provided jail
inmates or paid for on behalf of inmates by the governing unit. As
part of a judgment and sentence, the courts are authorized to order
defendants to repay all or part of the medical costs incurred by the
governing unit or provider during confinement.
(((5))) (6) To the extent that a confined person is unable to be
financially responsible for medical care and is ineligible for the
authority's medical care programs under chapter 74.09 RCW, or for
coverage from private sources, and in the absence of an interlocal
agreement or other contracts to the contrary, the governing unit may
obtain reimbursement for the cost of such medical services from the
unit of government whose law enforcement officers initiated the charges
on which the person is being held in the jail: PROVIDED, That
reimbursement for the cost of such services shall be by the state for
state prisoners being held in a jail who are accused of either escaping
from a state facility or of committing an offense in a state facility.
(((6))) (7) There shall be no right of reimbursement to the
governing unit from units of government whose law enforcement officers
initiated the charges for which a person is being held in the jail for
care provided after the charges are disposed of by sentencing or
otherwise, unless by intergovernmental agreement pursuant to chapter
39.34 RCW.
(((7))) (8) Under no circumstance shall necessary medical services
be denied or delayed because of disputes over the cost of medical care
or a determination of financial responsibility for payment of the costs
of medical care provided to confined persons.
(((8))) (9) Nothing in this section shall limit any existing right
of any party, governing unit, or unit of government against the person
receiving the care for the cost of the care provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
As a condition of licensure, a hospital must contract with a
correctional facility as defined in RCW 70.48.020 if a contract is
requested by a correctional facility pursuant to the provisions of this
act.

--- END ---