BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Actions to reduce the state's greenhouse gas emissions offer
the potential to improve the state's energy independence and
competitiveness and grow many sectors of the state's economy. Many
climate mitigation actions will involve growing clean energy businesses
and technologies, as well as increasing energy efficiency in
manufacturing, transportation, and buildings. The state's farms and
forest landowners will benefit by providing the feedstock for cleaner
energy fuels while also providing a means to offset carbon emissions.
Increasing energy efficiency, with the associated benefit of reducing
carbon emissions, will benefit consumers and ratepayers while growing
jobs in construction and associated sectors;
(b) Action to reduce the state's greenhouse gas emissions is also
needed because Washington state is particularly vulnerable to a warming
climate. Higher winter temperatures are projected to reduce the winter
snow pack and decrease summer streamflows in many watersheds, which in
turn will decrease year-round water supplies for municipal and
individual household drinking water, farms, fish runs, power
generation, and many other uses. Other adverse impacts from climate
disruption are likely to be many, including sea level rise, increased
frequency of severe storms, harm to shellfish and other marine life
with increasing acidification of our state's marine waters, increased
forest mortality due to insect activity and increased severity of
forest fires, increased risk of invasive species becoming established
in the state, and increased human health risks from peak summer
temperatures and exposure to insect-transmitted diseases;
(c) Recognizing these threats to the state and that increased
emissions of greenhouse gases from human activities is the principal
cause of climate change and ocean acidification, in 2008 the
legislature enacted a series of statewide emission limits. These
statewide limits begin with a return to 1990 emission levels by 2020,
a reduction to twenty-five percent below 1990 levels by 2035, and fifty
percent below that level by 2050. As new assessments of climate change
science become available, the department of ecology is required to
report to the legislature summarizing that science and making
recommendations regarding whether the limits need to be updated to be
commensurate with the state's share of emission reductions necessary
globally to avoid far greater climate disruption;
(d) Substantial progress has been made to achieve these reductions
through the implementation of policies, technology advances, and the
choices made by individuals and families to reduce their carbon
footprint. These include increasing the energy efficiency of
appliances, producing more electricity from renewable energy while
phasing out coal-powered electricity generation in the state, requiring
the most efficient technologies for electricity generation from other
fossil fuels, and increasing fuel efficiency in our automobiles which
has the effect of reducing greenhouse gas emissions in the
transportation sector;
(e) While these measures, combined with recent reduced fossil fuel
demand, have lowered the trajectory of statewide emissions, recent
analyses demonstrate that the state will not meet its 2020 emission
limits. Without further reduction measures the state will likely far
exceed its 2035 and 2050 limits; and
(f) There are many examples of adopted programs throughout the
country and in other nations that may provide useful information as the
legislature considers the policies and mechanisms appropriate to
achieve the necessary remaining emission reductions.
(2) Therefore, it is the purpose of this act to commission an
evaluation of existing programs and policies being implemented in other
jurisdictions that seek to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and to
analyze the costs and benefits of differing policies in the context of
Washington state's economy and emission sources. The governor and
members of the senate and house of representatives will use this
evaluation to develop a strategy to ensure achievement of the state's
greenhouse gas emission limits and to recommend additional actions the
governor may take using existing authorities and that the legislature
may take through enactment of new law, as necessary to effectively
implement the strategy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The office of the governor shall
contract with an independent and objective organization to prepare a
credible evaluation of approaches to reducing greenhouse gas emissions,
as outlined in this section. The evaluation must be provided in a
final report by October 15, 2013, to the governor for use by the
climate legislative and executive work group created in section 3 of
this act, and prior to that date may provide selective analyses,
drafts, or portions of the report to the work group.
(2) The evaluation shall include a review of comprehensive
greenhouse gas emission reduction programs being implemented in other
states and countries, including a review of reduction strategies being
implemented in the Pacific Northwest, on the west coast, in neighboring
provinces in Canada, and in other regions of the country. For each
program, the report must include available information about:
(a) The effectiveness in achieving the jurisdiction's emission
reduction objectives, including the cost per ton of emission reduction;
(b) The relative impact upon different sectors of the
jurisdiction's economy, including power rates;
(c) The impacts upon household consumption and spending, including
fuel, food, and housing costs, and program measures to mitigate impacts
to low-income populations;
(d) Displacement of emission sources from the jurisdiction due to
the program; and
(e) Any significant cobenefits to the jurisdiction, such as to
public health, from implementing the program.
(3) The evaluation must also analyze Washington's emissions and
related energy consumption profile, including:
(a) Total expenditures for energy by fuel category;
(b) The sources of the fuels, including imports of oil and other
fossil fuels; and
(c) An evaluation of the options for an emissions reduction
approach that would increase expenditures upon energy sources produced
in state relative to expenditures upon imported energy sources, and how
that increase would affect job growth and economic performance.
(4) The evaluation must also examine and summarize:
(a) Opportunities for new manufacturing infrastructure and other
job producing investments in Washington relating to cleaner energy and
greater energy efficiency;
(b) How other states and countries have created opportunities in
these sectors;
(c) How other jurisdictions have achieved greater independence from
fossil fuels and the costs and benefits to their economy of doing so;
and
(d) Existing studies of the potential costs to Washington consumers
and businesses of unmitigated climate change.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The climate legislative and executive
work group is created. The work group consists of ten members and
includes:
(a)(i) The governor, or the governor's designee, and another
representative of the executive branch appointed by the governor;
(ii) Four members and two alternates from the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, consisting of two members and an alternate from each
major caucus in the house of representatives; and
(iii) Four members and two alternates from the senate, appointed by
the president of the senate, consisting of two members and an alternate
from each major caucus in the senate.
(b) An alternate may serve as a member at a work group meeting only
when a member from that caucus is unable to attend the meeting.
(2) The governor or the governor's designee is the chair of the
work group.
(3) The purpose of the work group is to recommend a state program
of actions and policies to reduce greenhouse gas emissions, that if
implemented would ensure achievement of the state's emission limits in
RCW 70.235.020, including consideration of current best science, the
effectiveness of the program and policies in terms of costs, benefits,
and results, and how best to administer the program and policies. The
work group recommendations must include a timeline for actions and
funding needed to implement the recommendations.
(4) The members and alternates of the work group must be appointed
by July 15, 2013. The work group must meet not less than twice per
month and its first meeting held by August 1, 2013.
(5) The work group shall use the report provided under section 2 of
this act to inform the work group regarding experiences in other
jurisdictions, and may call on the author of the report to respond to
questions. All state agencies shall also cooperate with the work group
in providing information regarding previous and current climate action
reports and analyses.
(6) The work group shall schedule one or more meetings or portions
of meetings at which the views of the public may be provided to the
work group.
(7) The report of the work group must be provided to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 31, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Nothing in this act may be construed to
enhance or diminish any existing authority regarding greenhouse gas
emissions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 and 3 of this act are necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---