BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.65 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must issue a western Washington steelhead guide
stamp to any person who satisfies the conditions of this section. The
western Washington steelhead guide stamp must be purchased in order to
serve as a fishing guide for steelhead in any nonmarine body of water
located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains.
(2) A western Washington steelhead guide stamp may only be
purchased by a person who:
(a) Holds a game fish guide license issued under RCW 77.65.480 or
a charter license issued under RCW 77.65.150;
(b) Pays a western Washington steelhead guide stamp fee set by the
commission under this section; and
(c) Satisfies any prerequisites for purchase established by rule by
the commission under this section.
(3) The commission may adopt rules that:
(a) Establish experience and safety standards that are
prerequisites for purchasing a western Washington steelhead guide
stamp;
(b) Establish fees at an amount adequate to reimburse the
department's administrative expenses for implementing this section,
which may include different fee schedules for Washington residents and
nonresidents; and
(c) Limits the number of western Washington steelhead guide stamps
available for purchase each year if resource conservation goals require
a reduction in fishing pressure.
(4) A western Washington steelhead guide stamp may only be
purchased during the times of the year when steelhead fishing is not
allowed under the rules of the commission.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.65.370 and 2009 c 333 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person shall not offer or perform the services of a food fish
guide without a food fish guide license in the taking of food fish for
personal use in freshwater rivers and streams, except that a charter
boat license is required to operate a vessel from which a person may
for a fee fish for food fish in state waters listed in RCW
77.65.150(4)(b).
(2) The holder of a food fish guide license may only offer or
perform services related to the taking of steelhead in nonmarine bodies
of water located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains if the
license holder also purchases a western Washington steelhead guide
stamp under section 1 of this act.
(3) Only an individual at least sixteen years of age may hold a
food fish guide license. No individual may hold more than one food
fish guide license.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.15.510 and 2009 c 333 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of acting as a game fish guide, food fish
guide, or chartering without a license if:
(a) The person operates a charter boat and does not hold the
charter boat license required for the food fish taken;
(b) The person acts as a food fish guide and does not hold a food
fish guide license; ((or))
(c) The person acts as a game fish guide and does not hold a game
fish guide license; or
(d) The person offers or performs guide services related to the
taking of steelhead in nonmarine bodies of water located west of the
crest of the Cascade mountains without first obtaining a western
Washington steelhead guide stamp under section 1 of this act.
(2) Acting without a game fish guide license, food fish guide
license, or charter license is a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---