BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.473 and 2012 c 219 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person in a residence or commercial establishment which has
an adequate source of heat without burning wood shall:
(a) Not burn wood in any solid fuel burning device whenever the
department has determined under RCW 70.94.715 that any air pollution
episode exists in that area;
(b) Not burn wood in any solid fuel burning device except those
which are either Oregon department of environmental quality phase II or
United States environmental protection agency certified or certified by
the department under RCW 70.94.457(1) or a pellet stove either
certified or issued an exemption by the United States environmental
protection agency in accordance with Title 40, Part 60 of the code of
federal regulations, in the geographical area and for the period of
time that a first stage of impaired air quality has been determined, by
the department or any authority, for that area.
(i) A first stage of impaired air quality is reached when
forecasted meteorological conditions are predicted to cause fine
particulate levels to exceed thirty-five micrograms per cubic meter,
measured on a twenty-four hour average, within forty-eight hours,
except for areas of fine particulate nonattainment or areas at risk for
fine particulate nonattainment;
(ii) A first stage burn ban for impaired air quality may be called
for ((a county containing)) fine particulate nonattainment areas
((or)), areas at risk for fine particulate nonattainment, ((and when
feasible only for the necessary portions of the)) or for easily
identifiable geographic areas narrowly encompassing nonattainment or
at-risk areas, but not for an entire county, when forecasted
meteorological conditions are predicted to cause fine particulate
levels to reach or exceed thirty micrograms per cubic meter, measured
on a twenty-four hour average, within seventy-two hours; and
(c)(i) Not burn wood in any solid fuel burning device in a
geographical area and for the period of time that a second stage of
impaired air quality has been determined by the department or any
authority, for that area. A second stage of impaired air quality is
reached when a first stage of impaired air quality has been in force
and has not been sufficient to reduce the increasing fine particulate
pollution trend, fine particulates are at an ambient level of twenty-five micrograms per cubic meter measured on a twenty-four hour average,
and forecasted meteorological conditions are not expected to allow
levels of fine particulates to decline below twenty-five micrograms per
cubic meter for a period of twenty-four hours or more from the time
that the fine particulates are measured at the trigger level.
(ii) A second stage burn ban may be called without calling a first
stage burn ban only when all of the following occur and shall require
the department or the local air pollution control authority calling a
second stage burn ban under this subsection to comply with the
requirements of subsection (3) of this section:
(A) Fine particulate levels have reached or exceeded twenty-five
micrograms per cubic meter, measured on a twenty-four hour average;
(B) Meteorological conditions have caused fine particulate levels
to rise rapidly;
(C) Meteorological conditions are predicted to cause fine
particulate levels to exceed the thirty-five micrograms per cubic
meter, measured on a twenty-four hour average, within twenty-four
hours; and
(D) Meteorological conditions are highly likely to prevent
sufficient dispersion of fine particulate.
(iii) In fine particulate nonattainment areas or areas at risk for
fine particulate nonattainment, a second stage burn ban may be called
for the ((county containing the)) nonattainment area ((or)), areas at
risk for nonattainment, ((and when feasible only for the necessary
portions of the)) or for easily identifiable geographic areas narrowly
encompassing nonattainment or at-risk areas, but not for an entire
county, without calling a first stage burn ban only when (c)(ii)(A),
(B), and (D) of this subsection have been met and meteorological
conditions are predicted to cause fine particulate levels to reach or
exceed thirty micrograms per cubic meter, measured on a twenty-four
hour average, within twenty-four hours.
(2) Actions of the department and local air pollution control
authorities under this section shall preempt actions of other state
agencies and local governments for the purposes of controlling air
pollution from solid fuel burning devices, except where authorized by
chapter 199, Laws of 1991.
(3) The department or any local air pollution control authority
that has called a second stage burn ban under the authority of
subsection (1)(c)(ii) of this section shall, within ninety days,
prepare a written report describing:
(a) The meteorological conditions that resulted in their calling
the second stage burn ban;
(b) Whether the agency could have taken actions to avoid calling a
second stage burn ban without calling a first stage burn ban; and
(c) Any changes the department or authority is making to its
procedures of calling first stage and second stage burn bans to avoid
calling a second stage burn ban without first calling a first stage
burn ban.
After consulting with affected parties, the department shall
prescribe the format of such a report and may also require additional
information be included in the report. All reports shall be sent to
the department and the department shall keep the reports on file for
not less than five years and available for public inspection and
copying in accordance with RCW 42.56.090.
(4) For the purposes of chapter 219, Laws of 2012, an area at risk
for nonattainment means an area where the three-year average of the
annual ninety-eighth percentile of twenty-four hour fine particulate
values is greater than twenty-nine micrograms per cubic meter, based on
the years 2008 through 2010 monitoring data.

--- END ---