BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.01.435 and 2012 c 66 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall expend federal funds received by the
department, and funds that may be available to the department, under 23
U.S.C. Sec. 140(b) to increase diversity in the highway construction
workforce and prepare individuals interested in entering the highway
construction workforce by conducting activities in subsection (4) of
this section.
(2) The requirements contained in subsection (1) of this section do
not apply to or reduce the federal funds that would be otherwise
allocated to local government agencies.
(3) The department shall, ((to the greatest extent practicable,))
in coordination with the apprenticeship and training council described
in chapter 49.04 RCW, expend ((moneys from other sources)) one million
nine hundred thousand dollars per year, or one-half of one percent of
federal highway surface transportation program capital funds, whichever
is less, for apprenticeship preparation, apprenticeships, and support
services. These funds may be reduced by the amount of funds expended
from sources other than those specified in subsection (1) of this
section for the activities in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The department, in coordination with the department's
apprenticeship utilization advisory committee, shall coordinate with
the apprenticeship and training council to provide any portion of the
following services:
(a) Preapprenticeship programs approved by the apprenticeship and
training council;
(b) Preemployment counseling;
(c) Orientations on the highway construction industry, including
outreach to women, minorities, and other disadvantaged individuals;
(d) Basic skills improvement classes;
(e) Career counseling;
(f) Remedial training;
(g) Entry requirements for training programs;
(h) Supportive services and assistance with transportation;
(i) Child care and special needs;
(j) Job site mentoring and retention services; ((and))
(k) Assistance with tools, protective clothing, and other related
support for employment costs; and
(l) The recruitment of women, veterans, and persons of color to
participate in the apprenticeship program at the department.
(5) The department, in coordination with the apprenticeship and
training council, shall submit a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year beginning in
2012. The report must contain:
(a) An analysis of the results of the activities in subsection (4)
of this section;
(b) The amount available to the department from federal funds for
the activities in subsection (4) of this section and the amount
expended for those activities; and
(c) The performance outcomes achieved from each activity, including
the number of persons receiving services, training, and employment.

--- END ---