BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.450 and 2010 c 127 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may submit an authorizing
proposition to the county voters at a primary or general election and,
if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which
the proposed sales and use tax will be used. The rate of tax under
this section may not exceed three-tenths of one percent of the selling
price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the
case of a use tax.
(2)(a) A city legislative authority may submit an authorizing
proposition to the city voters at a primary or general election and, if
the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose a
sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which
the proposed sales and use tax will be used. The rate of tax under
this subsection may not exceed one-tenth of one percent of the selling
price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the
case of a use tax. A city may not begin imposing a tax approved by the
voters under this subsection prior to January 1, 2011.
(b) If a county adopts an ordinance or resolution to submit a
ballot proposition to the voters to impose the sales and use tax under
subsection (1) of this section prior to a city within the county
adopting an ordinance or resolution to submit a ballot proposition to
the voters to impose the tax under this subsection, the rate of tax by
the city under this subsection may not exceed an amount that would
cause the total county and city tax rate under this section to exceed
three-tenths of one percent. This subsection (2)(b) also applies if
the county and city adopt an ordinance or resolution to impose sales
and use taxes under this section on the same date.
(c) If the city adopts an ordinance or resolution to submit a
ballot proposition to the voters to impose the sales and use tax under
this subsection prior to the county in which the city is located, the
county must provide a credit against its tax under subsection (1) of
this section for the city tax under this subsection to the extent the
total county and city tax rate under this section would exceed three-tenths of one percent.
(3) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other
taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county.
(4) The retail sale or use of motor vehicles, and the lease of
motor vehicles for up to the first thirty-six months of the lease, are
exempt from tax imposed under this section.
(5) One-third of all money received under this section must be used
solely for criminal justice purposes, fire protection purposes, or
both. For the purposes of this subsection, "criminal justice purposes"
has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.14.340.
(6) Money received by a county under subsection (1) of this section
must be shared between the county and the cities as follows: Sixty
percent must be retained by the county and forty percent must be
distributed on a per capita basis to cities in the county.
(7) Tax proceeds received by a city imposing a tax under this
section must be shared between the county and city as follows: Fifteen
percent must be distributed to the county and eighty-five percent is
retained by the city.
(8) On or after the effective date of this section, the legislative
authority of a city or county may impose the tax authorized under this
section without submitting an authorizing proposition to the voters as
provided under subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The authority
under this subsection to councilmanically approve the tax authorized
under this section is discretionary and does not prevent the
legislative authority from submitting an authorizing proposition to the
voters as otherwise required under this section.

--- END ---