BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Asbestos is a known human carcinogen that
causes painful, premature deaths due to diseases such as asbestosis,
mesothelioma, lung and gastrointestinal cancers, and other diseases and
cancers. Activities that can lead to the release of asbestos fibers
include installation, use, maintenance, repair, removal, and disposal
of asbestos-containing building materials.
Many people are unaware that asbestos-containing building materials
are still imported, sold, and used in the United States. Because few
regulations exist that require the disclosure of asbestos in building
materials, people can unknowingly be exposed to asbestos. Asbestos is
generally invisible, odorless, very durable, and highly aerodynamic.
Exposure can occur well after it has been disturbed and long distances
from where the asbestos release occurred.
The purpose of this chapter is to allow people to make informed
decisions regarding whether or not they purchase or use building
materials containing asbestos. More specifically, building materials
that contain asbestos must be clearly labeled as such by manufacturers,
wholesalers, and distributors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Asbestos" includes the asbestiform varieties of actinolite,
amosite (cummingtonite-grunerite), tremolite, chrysotile (serpentine),
crocidolite (riebeckite), anthophyllite, and any of these minerals that
have been chemically treated or altered. The chemical abstracts
service registry number for each is as follows: Asbestos (1332-21-4),
actinolite (13768-00-8), amosite (12172-73-5), tremolite (14567-73-8),
chrysotile (12001-29-5), crocidolite (12001-28-4), and anthophyllite
(17068-78-9).
(2) "Asbestos-containing building material" includes any building
material containing asbestos, as determined using the United States
environmental protection agency method for the determination of
asbestos in building materials, EPA/600/R-93/116, July 1993.
(3) "Building material" includes materials designed for, or used
in, construction, renovation, repair, or maintenance of institutional,
commercial, public, industrial, or residential buildings and
structures. The term does not include automobiles, recreational
vehicles, boats, or other mobile means of transportation.
(4) "Consumer" means any person that acquires a building material
for direct use or ownership, rather than for resale or use in
production and manufacturing.
(5) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(6) "Person" means any individual, firm, public or private
corporation, association, partnership, political subdivision,
municipality, or government agency.
(7) "Retailer" means any person that sells goods or commodities
directly to consumers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Effective January 1, 2014, it is
unlawful to manufacture, wholesale, or distribute for sale an asbestos-containing building material that is not labeled as required by section
4 of this act. The labeling requirement also applies to stock-on-hand,
meaning any asbestos-containing building material in their possession
or control after December 31, 2013, must be labeled. Retailers that do
not manufacture, wholesale, or distribute asbestos-containing building
materials are exempt from this chapter.
(2)(a) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to asbestos-containing building materials that have already been installed,
applied, or used by the consumer.
(b) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to asbestos-containing building materials used solely for United States military
purposes.
(3) Any manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor may submit a
written request for an exemption from the labeling requirements of this
chapter, and the department may grant such an exemption if it
determines that the labeling requirements are technically infeasible or
create an undue economic hardship. Each exemption is in effect for a
period not to exceed three years from the date issued and is subject to
the terms and conditions prescribed by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A label must be placed in a prominent
location adjacent to the product name or description on the exterior of
the wrapping and packaging in which the asbestos-containing building
material is placed for storage, shipment, and sale.
(2) A label must also be placed on the exterior surface of the
asbestos-containing building material itself unless it is sold as a
liquid or paste, is sand or gravel, or an exemption is granted pursuant
to section 3(3) of this act.
(3) Asbestos-containing building materials must have a legible
label that clearly identifies it as containing asbestos. The
department may adopt rules regarding the implementation of this
chapter. At a minimum, the label must state the following:

CAUTION!

This product contains ASBESTOS which is known to cause cancer
and lung disease. Avoid creating dust. Intentionally removing
or tampering with this label is a violation of state law.

(4) It is unlawful for any person to remove, deface, cover, or
otherwise obscure or tamper with a label or sticker that has been
applied in compliance with this section, unless the asbestos-containing
building material is in the possession of the end user.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The provisions of this chapter may be
enforced by the department, local air authorities, or their designees.
(2) A person found in violation of this chapter is subject to the
penalties provided under chapter 70.94 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---