BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Washington state has some of the most
desirable cruising waters in the world for recreational boaters and
Washington's recreational boating industry generates needed general
fund revenue, family wage jobs, as well as dedicated funds for marine-related state accounts. According to a 2010 joint legislative audit
and review committee report entitled, "activities supporting
recreational boating" between 2007 and 2009 Washington collected 70.9
million dollars in boating-related revenues, forty-one million dollars
of which was deposited in the state's general fund. Additionally,
Washington received revenue from more boating-related sources than any
other jurisdiction contributing to the study.
(2) However, between 2006 and 2011 Washington's recreational marine
industry incurred heavy losses both in terms of sales revenue and drops
in employment, jeopardizing its ability to continue generating revenue
for the state and creating jobs for Washington residents. Between 2008
and 2010, total boat sales fell from over one hundred ten million
dollars to eighty million dollars, according to a joint legislative
audit and review committee report entitled "2011 tax preference
performance reviews." Additionally, the joint legislative audit and
review committee has found that the number of employees working in boat
building jobs fell by approximately fifty percent and that the number
of people employed in boat sales jobs in Washington state fell by
approximately thirty-three percent between 2007 and 2010.
(3) It is the legislature's intent that this act increase
employment and enhance the state's economy by encouraging boaters to
call Washington their homeport. The legislature finds that the
increased presence of larger recreational vessels in marine districts
throughout the state will contribute significant revenue to the
jurisdictions in which the vessels are moored and remove disincentives
that discourage Washington resident boaters from purchasing, using, and
mooring their recreational vessels in Washington state.
(4) The legislature finds that Washington's high sales tax rate,
relative to its neighboring states and Canada, creates a disincentive
for Washington resident pleasure boaters to moor, use, and purchase
large recreational vessels in Washington state. Moreover, Washington's
high use tax rate, relative to its neighboring states and Canada,
creates a disincentive for nonresident pleasure boaters to choose
Washington as a location to moor and use large recreational vessels.
As a result of these high taxes, Washington suffered decreased revenues
from sales and use taxes, excise taxes, and vessel registration fees
that could have been collected from large recreational vessels that
would have otherwise been located or purchased in this state.
(5) The legislature further finds that this act will remove a
disincentive for Washington residents to purchase, moor, and use large
pleasure vessels in Washington waters and remove a disincentive for
nonresidents to moor and use large pleasure vessels in Washington
state. The legislature also finds that this act will increase state
revenues on sales and use tax, excise tax, and vessel registrations on
large recreational vessels in Washington state, as well as save jobs,
increase employment, and realize economic benefits related to
maintenance, provisioning, fueling, and other ancillary spending
associated with the presence of large recreational vessels in
Washington waters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020 applies only up to three
hundred thousand dollars of the selling price of a vessel. Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, any amount above three
hundred thousand dollars is not subject to the tax imposed in RCW
82.08.020.
(2) A buyer claiming a partial exemption under subsection (1) of
this section for the purchase of a watercraft is liable for the
additional tax imposed under RCW 82.08.020 on that portion of the
selling price of the watercraft that exceeds three hundred thousand
dollars, if the watercraft is used in a manner inconsistent with the
definition of vessel in this section. The buyer must pay the
additional tax due under this subsection (2), along with any applicable
penalties and interest under chapter 82.32 RCW, directly to the
department. For purposes of the tax imposed under this subsection, the
limitation period on assessments in RCW 82.32.050 begins to run from
the date that the watercraft is first used in a manner inconsistent
with the definition of vessel in this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "vessel" means every
privately owned watercraft used or capable of being used as a means of
transportation on the water, other than a seaplane, and that is used
solely for personal purposes and is not required to be listed and
assessed as provided in RCW 84.40.065.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.700 and 2010 c 106 s 219 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to nonresident
individuals of vessels thirty feet or longer if an individual
purchasing a vessel purchases and displays a valid use permit.
(2) The exemption provided in this section does not apply to the
sale of a vessel, as defined in section 2 of this act, if the selling
price exceeds three hundred thousand dollars.
(3)(a) An individual claiming exemption from retail sales tax under
this section must display proof of his or her current nonresident
status at the time of purchase.
(b) Acceptable proof of a nonresident individual's status includes
one piece of identification such as a valid driver's license from the
jurisdiction in which the out-of-state residency is claimed or a valid
identification card that has a photograph of the holder and is issued
by the out-of-state jurisdiction. Identification under this subsection
(((2))) (3)(b) must show the holder's residential address and have as
one of its legal purposes the establishment of residency in that out-of-state jurisdiction.
(((3))) (4) Nothing in this section requires the vessel dealer to
make tax exempt retail sales to nonresidents. A dealer may choose to
make sales to nonresidents, collect the sales tax, and remit the amount
of sales tax collected to the state as otherwise provided by law. If
the dealer chooses to make a sale to a nonresident without collecting
the sales tax, the vendor must examine the proof of nonresidence,
determine whether the proof is acceptable under subsection (((2)))
(3)(b) of this section, and maintain records for each nontaxable sale
that shows the type of proof accepted, including any identification
numbers where appropriate, and the expiration date, if any.
(((4))) (5) A vessel dealer ((shall)) must issue a use permit to a
buyer if the dealer is satisfied that the buyer is a nonresident. The
use permit must be in a form and manner required by the department and
must include an affidavit, signed by the purchaser, declaring that the
vessel will be used in a manner consistent with this section. The fee
for the issuance of a use permit is five hundred dollars for vessels
fifty feet in length or less and eight hundred dollars for vessels
greater than fifty feet in length. Funds collected under this section
and RCW 82.12.700 must be reported on the dealer's excise tax return
and remitted to the department in accordance with RCW 82.32.045. The
department must transmit the fees to the state treasurer to be
deposited in the state general fund. The use permit must be displayed
on the vessel and is valid for twelve consecutive months from the date
of issuance. A use permit is not renewable. A purchaser at the time
of purchase must make an irrevocable election to take the exemption
authorized in this section or the exemption in either RCW 82.08.0266 or
82.08.02665. A vessel dealer must maintain a copy of the use permit
for the dealer's records. Vessel dealers must provide copies of use
permits issued by the dealer under this section and RCW 82.12.700 to
the department on a quarterly basis.
(((5))) (6) A nonresident who claims an exemption under this
section and who uses a vessel in this state after his or her use permit
for that vessel has expired is liable for the tax imposed under RCW
82.08.020 on the original selling price of the vessel and must pay the
tax directly to the department. Interest at the rate provided in RCW
82.32.050 applies to amounts due under this subsection, retroactively
to the date the vessel was purchased, and accrues until the full amount
of tax due is paid to the department.
(((6))) (7) Any vessel dealer who makes sales without collecting
the tax to a person who does not hold valid identification establishing
out-of-state residency, and any dealer who fails to maintain records of
sales to nonresidents as provided in this section, is personally liable
for the amount of tax due.
(((7))) (8) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the administration of the
fee imposed in this section and RCW 82.12.700.
(((8))) (9) A vessel dealer that issues use permits under this
section and RCW 82.12.700 must file with the department all returns in
an electronic format as provided or approved by the department. As
used in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as "return" in
RCW 82.32.050.
(a) Any return required to be filed in an electronic format under
this subsection is not filed until received by the department in an
electronic format provided or approved by the department.
(b) The electronic filing requirement in this subsection ends when
a vessel dealer no longer issues use permits, and the dealer has
electronically filed all of its returns reporting the fees collected
under this section and RCW 82.12.700.
(c) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
this subsection for good cause shown.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 applies only up to three
hundred thousand dollars of the value of the vessel used. Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, the value of a vessel that
is above three hundred thousand dollars is not subject to the tax
imposed in RCW 82.12.020.
(2) A taxpayer claiming a partial exemption under subsection (1) of
this section for the use of a watercraft is liable for the additional
tax imposed under RCW 82.12.020 on that portion of the value of the
watercraft used that exceeds three hundred thousand dollars, including
any applicable penalties and interest under chapter 82.32 RCW, if the
watercraft is used in a manner inconsistent with the definition of
vessel in this section. This subsection does not apply to a taxpayer
with respect to the use of a watercraft, if the taxpayer is subject to
the additional tax due in section 2(2) of this act with respect to the
watercraft. For purposes of the tax imposed under this subsection, the
limitation period on assessments in RCW 82.32.050 begins to run from
the date that the watercraft is first used in a manner inconsistent
with the definition of vessel in this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "vessel" has the same meaning
as in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.12.700 and 2007 c 22 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of a
vessel thirty feet or longer if a nonresident individual:
(a) Purchased the vessel from a vessel dealer in accordance with
RCW 82.08.700;
(b) Purchased the vessel in the state from a person other than a
vessel dealer, but the nonresident individual purchases and displays a
valid use permit from a vessel dealer under this section within
fourteen days of the date that the vessel is purchased in this state;
or
(c) Acquired the vessel outside the state, but purchases and
displays a valid use permit from a vessel dealer under this section
within fourteen days of the date that the vessel is first brought into
this state.
(2) The exemption provided in subsection (1) of this section does
not apply to the use of a vessel, as defined in section 2 of this act,
if the value of the vessel used exceeds three hundred thousand dollars.
(3) Any vessel dealer that makes tax exempt sales under RCW
82.08.700 ((shall)) must issue use permits under this section. A
vessel dealer shall issue a use permit under this section if the dealer
is satisfied that the individual purchasing the permit is a
nonresident. The use permit is valid for twelve consecutive months
from the date of issuance. A use permit is not renewable, and an
individual may only purchase one use permit for a particular vessel.
A person who has been issued a use permit under RCW 82.08.700 for a
particular vessel may not purchase a use permit under this section for
the same vessel after the use permit issued under RCW 82.08.700
expires. All other requirements and conditions, not inconsistent with
the provisions of this section, relating to use permits in RCW
82.08.700, apply to use permits under this section. A person may not
claim an exemption under RCW 82.12.0251(1) within twenty-four months
after a use permit, issued under this section or RCW 82.08.700, for the
same vessel, has expired.
(((3))) (4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a
nonresident who claims an exemption under this section and who uses a
vessel in this state after his or her use permit for that vessel has
expired is liable for the tax imposed under RCW 82.12.020 based on the
value of the vessel at the time that the vessel was either purchased in
this state under circumstances in which the exemption under RCW
82.08.700 did not apply or was first brought into this state, as the
case may be. Interest at the rate provided in RCW 82.32.050 applies to
amounts due under this subsection, retroactively to the date that the
vessel was purchased in this state or first brought into the state, and
accrues until the full amount of tax due is paid to the department.
(b) A nonresident individual who is exempt under both this section
and RCW 82.08.700 and who uses a vessel in this state after his or her
use permit for that vessel expires is liable for tax and interest as
provided in RCW 82.08.700(((5))) (6).
(((4))) (5) Any vessel dealer that issues a use permit to an
individual who does not hold valid identification establishing out-of-state residency, and any dealer that fails to maintain records for each
use permit issued that shows the type of proof accepted, including any
identification numbers where appropriate, and the expiration date, if
any, is personally liable for the amount of tax due.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of a local sales tax imposed under the authority
of this chapter, RCW 81.104.170, or any other provision of law on the
sale of a vessel, the tax applies in the same manner as in section 2 of
this act.
(2) For purposes of a local use tax imposed under the authority of
this chapter, RCW 81.104.170, or any other provision of law on the use
of a vessel, the tax applies in the same manner as in section 4 of this
act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "vessel" has the same meaning
as in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act expires August 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---