BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.96A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must develop a fully integrated rule that would
permit an agency providing co-occurring treatment for chemical
dependency and mental health disorders to follow one set of
administrative code to facilitate the streamlined and blended provision
of these services.
(2) Any licensed mental health agency which has a waiver from the
department exempting the agency from compliance with chemical
dependency rules for services provided to patients with co-occurring
mental health and chemical dependency disorders as of January 1, 2013,
may request and must receive a three-year renewal of the waiver
exempting the agency from compliance with chemical dependency rules
with respect to such patients if the integrated rule is not in effect
by May 1, 2014.
(3) The department shall report its progress in implementing this
section to the governor and the legislature by December 31, 2013.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must develop a fully integrated rule that would
permit an agency providing co-occurring treatment for chemical
dependency and mental health disorders to follow one set of
administrative code to facilitate the streamlined and blended provision
of these services.
(2) Any licensed mental health agency which has a waiver from the
department exempting the agency from compliance with chemical
dependency rules for services provided to patients with co-occurring
mental health and chemical dependency disorders as of January 1, 2013,
may request and must receive a three-year renewal of the waiver
exempting the agency from compliance with chemical dependency rules
with respect to such patients if the integrated rule is not in effect
by May 1, 2014.
(3) The department shall report its progress in implementing this
section to the governor and the legislature by December 31, 2013.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2017.

--- END ---