BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a hotel
management company from a hotel owner for covered employee costs.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Covered employee" means a person who meets all of the
following conditions:
(i) The person has an employment relationship with a hotel
management company providing hotel operations, management, and/or
promotional services to a hotel owner;
(ii) The person works primarily at a hotel or associated facility
of the hotel owner; and
(iii) The person's duties primarily consist of activities that
directly or indirectly support the operations, management, and/or
promotion of the hotel and associated facilities, including without
limitation renting property units, operating and maintaining the hotel
and associated facilities, collecting fees, and hotel and facilities
promotion.
(b) "Covered employee costs" means the actual cost of wages and
salaries, benefits, workers' compensation, payroll taxes, withholding,
or other assessments paid to or on behalf of a covered employee by the
hotel management company pursuant to a hotel management services
agreement, including without limitation, all amounts paid in cash or in
kind by the hotel management company (i) that are treated for tax
purposes as constituting wages or fringe benefits of a covered
employee, (ii) that are contributions to pensions plans for the benefit
of a covered employee, (iii) that are contributions to insurance plans
for the benefit of a covered employee, and (iv) that are payments
required under collective bargaining agreements for the benefit of a
covered employee. For purposes of this section only, covered employee
costs also include taxes or other governmental assessments imposed on
the hotel management company as a result of the employment of a covered
employee.
(c) "Hotel management services agreement" means a contract by and
between a hotel owner and a hotel management company under which:
(i) The services provided to the hotel owner primarily relate to
the operations, management, and/or promotion of the hotel or associated
facilities including, without limitation, marketing and reservations,
recruitment and supervision of persons operating the hotel and
facilities, centralized services generally supportive of the hotel and
facilities, or any other activity that directly or indirectly supports
the operations, management, and/or promotion of the hotel and
associated facilities;
(ii) The covered employee costs are funded by the hotel owner
through a separate account used exclusively to fund covered employee
costs and, at the option of the hotel owner, other costs associated
with the operation of the hotel, which account is in the name of, and
under the taxpayer identification number of, the hotel owner, but for
which the hotel management company may have signing authority;
(iii) The hotel management company is required to pay the covered
employee costs and must use the funds in the account established under
(c)(ii) of this subsection to either make such payments or recover the
costs of making such payments; and
(iv) The hotel management company does not receive any markup
calculated with respect to the amount of the covered employee costs
paid into the account established under (c)(ii) of this subsection.
(d) "Hotel management company" means any person engaged in the
business of providing operations, management, and/or promotional
services under a hotel management services agreement and:
(i) More than fifty percent of the employees providing services at
a hotel and associated facilities of the hotel owner are covered
employees; and
(ii) The hotel management company is not providing staffing
services as defined under RCW 82.04.540(3)(h).
(e) "Hotel owner" means any person that owns or leases a hotel, as
well as any asset management company acting on behalf of such a person.

--- END ---