BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.32.570 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 10 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every seven hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred forty hours per month. Any monthly
benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the
benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2) Any retired teacher or retired administrator who enters service
in any public educational institution in Washington state at least one
calendar month after his or her accrual date shall ((cease to)) receive
pension payments while engaged in such service((, after the retiree has
rendered service for more than eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a
school year)).
(3) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with
information relevant to the use of this section for the select
committee on pension policy.
(4) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to be employed for more than five hundred twenty-five hours per
year without a reduction of his or her pension.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.32.802 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every seven hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred forty hours per month. Any benefit
reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the
retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2) A retiree who has satisfied the break in employment requirement
of subsection (1) of this section((,)) may work ((up to eight hundred
sixty-seven hours per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined
in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, or as a
firefighter or law enforcement officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, or
in a position covered by annuity and retirement income plans offered by
institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400,)) without
suspension of his or her benefit.
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW
41.32.044, he or she terminates his or her retirement status and
immediately becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue
during the period of membership and the individual shall make
contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have
the right to again retire if eligible.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.32.862 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 14 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every seven hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred forty hours per month. Any benefit
reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the
retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2) A retiree who has satisfied the break in employment requirement
of subsection (1) of this section((,)) may work ((up to eight hundred
sixty-seven hours per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined
in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, or as a
firefighter or law enforcement officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, or
in a position covered by annuity and retirement income plans offered by
institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400,)) without
suspension of his or her benefit.
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW
41.32.044, he or she terminates his or her retirement status and
immediately becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue
during the period of membership and the individual shall make
contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have
the right to again retire if eligible.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.40.037 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 19 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit
reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the
retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2) A retiree from plan 1, plan 2, or plan 3 who enters employment
with an employer at least one calendar month after his or her accrual
date may continue to receive pension payments while engaged in such
service ((for up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours of service in a
calendar year without a reduction of pension)). For purposes of this
section, employment includes positions covered by annuity and
retirement income plans offered by institutions of higher education
pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400.
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW
41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or her retirement status and
becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the
period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and
receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again
retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However, if the
right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has
rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and
survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous
retirement shall be reinstated.
(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with
information relevant to the use of this section for the select
committee on pension policy.
(5) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to be employed for more than five months in a calendar year
without a reduction of his or her pension.

--- END ---