BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.015 and 1999 c 249 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created a "state parks and recreation commission"
consisting of seven citizens of the state. The members of the
commission shall be appointed by the governor by and with the advice
and consent of the senate and shall serve for a term of six years((,
expiring)). For members appointed before 2013, terms expire on
December 31st of even-numbered years, and until their successors are
appointed. For members appointed after 2012, terms expire on June 30th
of odd-numbered years and until their successors are appointed. In
case of a vacancy, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the
unexpired term of the commissioner whose office has become vacant.
In making the appointments to the commission, the governor shall
choose citizens who understand park and recreation needs and interests.
No person shall serve if he or she holds any elective or full-time
appointive state, county, or municipal office. Members of the
commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and in
addition shall be allowed their travel expenses incurred while absent
from their usual places of residence in accordance with RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.
Payment of expenses pertaining to the operation of the commission
shall be made upon vouchers certified to by such persons as shall be
designated by the commission.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.05.030 and 2005 c 373 s 1 and 2005 c 360 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Have the care, charge, control, and supervision of all parks
and parkways acquired or set aside by the state for park or parkway
purposes.
(2) Adopt policies, and adopt, issue, and enforce rules pertaining
to the use, care, and administration of state parks and parkways. The
commission shall cause a copy of the rules to be kept posted in a
conspicuous place in every state park to which they are applicable, but
failure to post or keep any rule posted shall be no defense to any
prosecution for the violation thereof.
(3) Permit the use of state parks and parkways by the public under
such rules as shall be adopted.
(4) Clear, drain, grade, seed, and otherwise improve or beautify
parks and parkways, and erect structures, buildings, fireplaces, and
comfort stations and build and maintain paths, trails, and roadways
through or on parks and parkways.
(5) Grant concessions or leases in state parks and parkways, upon
such rentals, fees, or percentage of income or profits and for such
terms, in no event longer than fifty years, and upon such conditions as
shall be approved by the commission: PROVIDED, That ((leases exceeding
a twenty-year term shall require a unanimous vote of the commission:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That)) if, during the term of any concession or
lease, it is the opinion of the commission that it would be in the best
interest of the state, the commission may, with the consent of the
concessionaire or lessee, alter and amend the terms and conditions of
such concession or lease: PROVIDED FURTHER, That television station
leases shall be subject to the provisions of RCW 79A.05.085, only:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the rates of such concessions or leases, other
than concessions or leases to a public agency as defined in RCW
39.34.020, shall be renegotiated at five-year intervals. No concession
shall be granted which will prevent the public from having free access
to the scenic attractions of any park or parkway.
(6) Employ such assistance as it deems necessary. Commission
expenses relating to its use of volunteer assistance shall be limited
to premiums or assessments for the insurance of volunteers by the
department of labor and industries, compensation of staff who assist
volunteers, materials and equipment used in authorized volunteer
projects, training, reimbursement of volunteer travel as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and other reasonable expenses relating to
volunteer recognition. The commission, at its discretion, may waive
commission fees otherwise applicable to volunteers. The commission
shall not use volunteers to replace or supplant classified positions.
The use of volunteers may not lead to the elimination of any employees
or permanent positions in the bargaining unit.
(7) By majority vote of its authorized membership select and
purchase or obtain options upon, lease, or otherwise acquire for and in
the name of the state such tracts of land, including shore and tide
lands, for park and parkway purposes as it deems proper. If the
commission cannot acquire any tract at a price it deems reasonable, it
may, by majority vote of its authorized membership, obtain title
thereto, or any part thereof, by condemnation proceedings conducted by
the attorney general as provided for the condemnation of rights-of-way
for state highways. Option agreements executed under authority of this
subsection shall be valid only if:
(a) The cost of the option agreement does not exceed one dollar;
and
(b) Moneys used for the purchase of the option agreement are from
(i) funds appropriated therefor, or (ii) funds appropriated for
undesignated land acquisitions, or (iii) funds deemed by the commission
to be in excess of the amount necessary for the purposes for which they
were appropriated; and
(c) The maximum amount payable for the property upon exercise of
the option does not exceed the appraised value of the property.
(8) Cooperate with the United States, or any county or city of this
state, in any matter pertaining to the acquisition, development,
redevelopment, renovation, care, control, or supervision of any park or
parkway, and enter into contracts in writing to that end. All parks or
parkways, to which the state contributed or in whose care, control, or
supervision the state participated pursuant to the provisions of this
section, shall be governed by the provisions hereof.
(9) Within allowable resources, maintain policies that increase the
number of people who have access to free or low-cost recreational
opportunities for physical activity, including noncompetitive physical
activity.
(10) Adopt rules establishing the requirements for a criminal
history record information search for the following: Job applicants,
volunteers, and independent contractors who have unsupervised access to
children or vulnerable adults, or who will be responsible for
collecting or disbursing cash or processing credit/debit card
transactions. These background checks will be done through the
Washington state patrol criminal identification section and may include
a national check from the federal bureau of investigation, which shall
be through the submission of fingerprints. A permanent employee of the
commission, employed as of July 24, 2005, is exempt from the provisions
of this subsection.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.05.335 and 1991 c 107 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that the lands owned and managed by the
((state parks and recreation)) commission are a significant collection
of valuable natural, cultural, and historical((, and cultural))
resources for the citizens of Washington state. The legislature
further finds that if citizens understand and appreciate the ((state
park ecological resources, they will come to appreciate and understand
the ecosystems and natural resources throughout the state)) natural,
cultural, and historical resources present in Washington's state parks,
they will be inspired to conserve this important legacy for future
generations. Therefore, the ((state parks and recreation)) commission
may ((increase the)) use ((of)) its facilities and resources to provide
((environmental)) natural, cultural, or historical resource
interpretation throughout the state parks system.

Sec. 4 RCW 79A.05.340 and 1991 c 107 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((state parks and recreation)) commission may provide
((environmental interpretative)) natural, cultural, or historical
resource interpretive activities for visitors to state parks that:
(1) Explain the functions, history, significance, and cultural
aspects of ecosystems;
(2) Explain the relationship between human needs, human behaviors
and attitudes, and the environment; ((and))
(3) Explain the diverse human heritage and cultural changes over
time in Washington state;
(4) Offer experiences and information to increase citizen
understanding, appreciation, and stewardship of ((the environment and
its multiple uses)) their natural, cultural, ethnic, and artistic
heritage;
(5) Explain the need for natural, cultural, and historical resource
protection and preservation as well as the methods by which these goals
may be achieved.

Sec. 5 RCW 79A.05.345 and 1991 c 107 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((state parks and recreation)) commission may consult and enter
into agreements with and solicit assistance from ((private sector
organizations and other governmental agencies that are interested in
conserving and interpreting Washington's environment. The commission
shall not permit commercial advertising in state park lands or
interpretive centers as a condition of such agreements. Logos or
credit lines for sponsoring organizations may be permitted. The
commission shall maintain an accounting of all monetary gifts provided,
and expenditures of monetary gifts shall not be used to increase
personnel)) the state parks foundation, private sector individuals,
organizations, businesses, employee business units, other public
agencies, and tribes that are interested in stewarding and interpreting
state parks natural, cultural, scenic, and recreational resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By September 1st of each year, the commission shall provide the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives with
a report including a summary of all:
(a) Existing agreements entered into pursuant to RCW 79A.05.345 or
otherwise involving the management of state park lands or facilities by
a public or private entity;
(b) Existing concession or lease agreements entered into pursuant
to RCW 79A.05.030, with a term of two years or more; and
(c) Proposed agreements of the kind included in (a) and (b) of this
subsection that are under negotiation.
(2) For each agreement, the report must include, but is not limited
to, an evaluation of:
(a) The entity's adequate source of available funding to assume or
continue the financial responsibilities of the agreement;
(b) The entity's ability to assume or continue the scope of
responsibilities of the agreement;
(c) The details of the net fiscal impact to the state, including
any subsidies and indirect costs or revenues; and
(d) The extent to which the agreement results in advancement of the
state parks system's public purpose.
(3) The report must include an update on the progress and
satisfaction of the performance measures provided in any existing
agreement described in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall continue its ongoing efforts to evaluate
the agency's mission and options to improve the efficiency and
effectiveness of the agency, which may include the evaluation of
options relating to organizational structure, administrative processes,
land and facility ownership and management, and provision of services.
(2) The evaluation must include development of specific performance
measures relating to the efficiency and effectiveness of the agency,
which may include measures relating to data collection necessary for
future analysis consistent with the purposes of this section.
(3) By September 1st of each even-numbered year, the commission
shall, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, provide the office of financial
management and the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives with an analysis of the commission's progress in
achieving the performance measures during the current biennium and
performance measures for the next biennium that are informed by, and
build on, the commission's previous efforts under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) In developing the initial performance
measures required by section 7 of this act that are due by September 1,
2014, the state parks and recreation commission shall produce and
consider the following:
(a) An inventory of land and facilities owned and managed by state
parks and a process to upgrade the inventory to one capable of
describing primary land and facility uses;
(b) An evaluation of the lands and facilities identified under (a)
of this subsection for lands and facilities surplus to state park needs
and actions taken or planned to dispose of or more advantageously
position these assets;
(c) Current annual visitation categorized by state park and a
process to upgrade the system for collecting parks visitation data to
better understand existing and potential markets for park services;
(d) A process to systematically assess and prioritize the state
park and recreation commission's capital needs, including a financial
analysis;
(e) An inventory of and progress developing ongoing partnerships
with entities including the state parks foundation, state park friends
groups, and other appropriate public and nonprofit entities;
(f) An inventory of existing enterprise activities and agreements
at state parks, including those relating to product sales, concessions,
sponsorships, and advertising, and a process for identifying and
evaluating additional potential enterprise opportunities for generating
revenue or cost savings;
(g) A summary of actions taken and planned for the application of
lean management philosophies and tools throughout the agency; and
(h) A summary of actions taken and planned towards continued
development of a sustained, strategic approach to marketing state
parks.
(2) The information to be produced and considered under subsection
(1) of this section must be provided to the office of financial
management and appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives, concurrently with the performance measures required
under section 7 of this act, by September 1, 2014.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2015.

Sec. 9 RCW 79A.05.320 and 2000 c 11 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state parks and recreation commission shall do the following
with respect to the portion of the Milwaukee Road corridor under its
control:
(1) Manage the corridor as a recreational trail except when closed
under RCW 79A.05.325;
(2) Close the corridor to hunting;
(3) Close the corridor to all motorized vehicles except: (a)
Emergency or law enforcement vehicles; (b) vehicles necessary for
access to utility lines; ((and)) (c) vehicles necessary for maintenance
of the corridor, or construction of the trail; (d) vehicles used by
lessees and concessionaires operating under valid state parks
agreements; and (e) vehicles for agricultural users for periodic
access;
(4) Comply with legally enforceable conditions contained in the
deeds for the corridor;
(5) Control weeds under the applicable provisions of chapters
17.04, 17.06, and 17.10 RCW; and
(6) Clean and maintain culverts.

Sec. 10 RCW 79A.70.005 and 2000 c 25 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) State parks are a valuable asset to the people of the state of
Washington, contributing to their health, education, and well-being;
(2) Well maintained state parks are an attraction and contribute
significantly to the economic well-being of the state of Washington;
(3) Well maintained state parks encourage the appreciation of the
natural resources and natural beauty of the state of Washington;
(4) There is an increasing demand for more state parks and more
state parks services;
(5) There are individuals and groups who desire to contribute to
the continued vitality of the state parks system;
(6) Providing a tax-deductible method for individuals and groups to
contribute is an effective way of increasing available funds to improve
the state parks system; and
(7) It is in the public interest to create a nonprofit foundation
to provide such a method for individuals and groups to contribute to
the preservation, restoration, ((and)) enhancement, and operation of
the state parks system.

Sec. 11 RCW 79A.70.010 and 2000 c 25 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purpose of the Washington state parks ((gift)) foundation is to
solicit support ((for the state parks system, cooperate with other
organizations, and to encourage gifts to support and improve the state
parks)), build constituencies, engage in public outreach, cooperate
with other organizations, and encourage gifts and private sponsorship
activities to support operation, acquisition, and improvement of state
parks. The foundation shall take the lead role in soliciting,
recognizing, and cultivating enduring relationships with private donors
and sponsors.

Sec. 12 RCW 79A.70.020 and 2000 c 25 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Foundation" means the Washington state parks ((gift))
foundation((,)) created in RCW 79A.70.030.
(2) "State parks" means that system of parks administered by the
commission under this title.
(3) "Eligible grant recipients" includes any and all of the
activities of the commission in carrying out the provisions of this
title and friends groups or other cooperating associations established
solely for the benefit of state parks.
(4) "Eligible projects" means any project, action, program, or part
of any project ((or)), action, or program that serves to preserve,
restore, improve, ((or)) enhance ((the)), or otherwise contribute to
the operation of state parks.

Sec. 13 RCW 79A.70.030 and 2000 c 25 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2000, the commission shall file articles of
incorporation in accordance with the Washington nonprofit corporation
act, chapter 24.03 RCW, to establish the Washington state parks
((gift)) foundation. The foundation shall not be an agency,
instrumentality, or political subdivision of the state and shall not
disburse public funds.
(2) The foundation shall have a board of directors consisting of up
to fifteen members((. Initial members of the board shall be appointed
by the governor and collectively have experience in business,
charitable giving, outdoor recreation, and parks administration.
Initial appointments shall be made by September 30, 2000. Subsequent
board members shall be elected by the general membership of the
foundation.
(3) Members of the board shall serve three-year terms, except for
the initial terms, which shall be staggered by the governor to achieve
a balanced mix of terms on the board. Members of the board may serve
up to a maximum of three terms. At the end of a term, a member may
continue to serve until a successor has been elected)), whose terms,
method of appointment, and authority must be in accordance with the
Washington nonprofit corporation act, chapter 24.03 RCW.

Sec. 14 RCW 79A.70.040 and 2000 c 25 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((As soon as practicable, the board of directors shall organize
themselves and the foundation suitably to carry out the duties of the
foundation, including achieving federal tax-exempt status.
(2))) The foundation shall actively solicit contributions from
individuals and groups for the benefit of the state parks. The
foundation shall coordinate with the commission and take the lead role
in appropriately thanking, recognizing, and inviting donors to further
support operation, acquisition, and improvement of state parks and
other purposes of this chapter.
(((3))) (2) The foundation shall develop criteria jointly with the
agency director for guiding ((themselves)) the foundation in either the
creation of an endowment, or the making of grants to eligible grant
recipients and eligible projects in the state parks, or both.
(((4))) (3) A competitive grant process shall be conducted at least
annually by the foundation to award funds ((to the)) for the benefit of
state parks. Competitive grant applications shall only be submitted to
the foundation by the commission, friends groups, or other cooperating
associations established for the benefit of state parks. ((The process
shall be started as soon as practicable.)) Grants shall be awarded to
eligible projects consistent with the criteria developed jointly by the
foundation and ((shall be available only for state parks use on
eligible projects)) the agency director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 RCW 79A.70.050 (Foundation moneys not to
supplant preexisting funding) and 2000 c 25 s 6 are each repealed.

Sec. 16 RCW 79A.80.020 and 2012 c 261 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in ((RCW 79A.80.050, 79A.80.060,
and 79A.80.070)) this chapter, a discover pass is required for any
motor vehicle to:
(a) Park ((or operate on)) at any recreation site or lands((,
except for short-term parking as may be authorized under RCW
79A.80.070)); or
(b) Operate on any recreation site or lands.
(2) Except as provided in section 19 of this act, the cost of a
discover pass is thirty dollars. Every four years the office of
financial management must review the cost of the discover pass and, if
necessary, recommend to the legislature an adjustment to the cost of
the discover pass to account for inflation.
(3) A discover pass is valid for one year beginning from the date
that the discover pass is marked for activation. The activation date
may differ from the purchase date pursuant to any policies developed by
the agencies.
(4) Sales of discover passes must be consistent with RCW
79A.80.100.
(5) The discover pass must contain space for two motor vehicle
license plate numbers. A discover pass is valid only for those vehicle
license plate numbers written on the pass. However, the agencies may
offer for sale a family discover pass that is fully transferable among
vehicles and does not require the placement of a license plate number
on the pass to be valid. The agencies must collectively set a price
for the sale of a family discover pass that is no more than fifty
dollars. A discover pass is valid only for use with one motor vehicle
at any one time.
(6)(a) One complimentary discover pass must be provided to a
volunteer who performed twenty-four hours of service on agency-sanctioned volunteer projects in a year. The agency must provide
vouchers to volunteers identifying the number of volunteer hours they
have provided for each project. The vouchers may be brought to an
agency to be redeemed for a discover pass.
(b) Married spouses under chapter 26.04 RCW may present an agency
with combined vouchers demonstrating the collective performance of
twenty-four hours of service on agency-sanctioned volunteer projects in
a year to be redeemed for a single complimentary discover pass.

Sec. 17 RCW 79A.80.030 and 2012 c 261 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person may purchase a day-use permit to meet the requirements
of RCW 79A.80.080. Except as provided in section 19 of this act, a
day-use permit is ten dollars per day and must be available for
purchase from each agency. A day-use permit is valid for one calendar
day.
(2) The agencies may provide short-term parking under RCW
79A.80.070 where a day-use permit is not required.
(3) Every four years the office of financial management must review
the cost of the day-use permit and, if necessary, recommend to the
legislature an adjustment to the cost of the day-use permit to account
for inflation.
(4) Sales of day-use permits must be consistent with RCW
79A.80.100.

Sec. 18 RCW 79A.80.080 and 2012 c 261 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A discover pass, vehicle access pass, or day-use permit must be
visibly displayed in the front windshield, or otherwise in a prominent
location for motor vehicles without a windshield, of any motor vehicle
((or otherwise in a prominent location for vehicles without a
windshield)):
(a) Operating on ((a)) any recreation site or lands; or
(b) Parking at ((a)) any recreation site or lands.
(2) The discover pass, the vehicle access pass, or the day-use
permit is not required:
(a) On private lands, state-owned aquatic lands other than water
access areas, or at agency offices, hatcheries, or other facilities
where public business is conducted((.
(3) The discover pass, the vehicle access pass, or the day-use
permit is not required for:
(a)));
(b) For persons who use, possess, or enter lands owned or managed
by the agencies for nonrecreational purposes consistent with a written
authorization from the agency, including but not limited to leases,
contracts, and easements; ((or
(b))) (c) On department of fish and wildlife lands only, for
persons possessing a current vehicle access pass pursuant to RCW
79A.80.040; or
(d) When operating on a road managed by the department of fish and
wildlife or the department of natural resources, including a forest or
land management road, that is not blocked by a gate.
(((4))) (3)(a) An agency may waive the requirements of this section
for any person who has secured the ability to access specific
recreational land through the provision of monetary consideration to
the agency or for any person attending an event or function that
required the provision of monetary compensation to the agency.
(b) Special events and group activities are core recreational
activities and major public service opportunities within state parks.
When waiving the requirements of this section for special events, the
state parks and recreation commission must consider the direct and
indirect costs and benefits to the state, local market rental rates,
the public service functions of the event sponsor, and other public
interest factors when setting appropriate fees for each event or
activity.
(((5))) (4) Failure to comply with subsection (1) of this section
is a natural resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW. An agency is
authorized to issue a notice of infraction to any person who fails to
comply with subsection (1)(a) of this section or to any motor vehicle
that fails to comply with subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(((6))) (5) The penalty for failure to comply with the requirements
of this section is ninety-nine dollars. This penalty must be reduced
to fifty-nine dollars if an individual provides proof of purchase of a
discover pass to the court within fifteen days after the issuance of
the notice of violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 79A.80
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By mutual agreement, the agencies may sell discounted discover
passes at a rate below that established under RCW 79A.80.020 or
discounted day-use permits at a rate below that established under RCW
79A.80.030 for purposes of bulk sales to retailers, agency license and
permit product bundling, and partnership opportunities in order to
expand accessibility and visibility of the discover pass and
recreational opportunities on agency-managed lands.
(2) In exercising this authority, the agencies must prioritize
opportunities for discounted sales that result in a net revenue gain.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 This act may be known and cited as the
state parks and recreation centennial act.

--- END ---