BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Council" means the student achievement council.
(2) "High employer demand program of study" means an
apprenticeship, or an undergraduate or graduate certificate or degree
program in which the number of students prepared for employment per
year from in-state institutions is substantially less than the number
of projected job openings per year in that field, statewide or in a
substate region.
(3) "High-demand occupation" means an occupation with a substantial
number of current or projected employment opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The meeting industry demand program is
established. The program has a dual purpose to:
(a) Meet the higher education needs of industry by expanding high-cost, high employer demand programs of study and postsecondary programs
that prepare students for high demand occupations; and
(b) Incentivize institutions of higher education to expand high-cost postsecondary programs that meet industry demands.
(2)(a) Postsecondary programs that qualify for program grants are
as follows:
(i) High employer demand programs of study that are considered
high-cost programs relative to other postsecondary programs;
(ii) Postsecondary programs that prepare individuals for high
demand occupations that are considered high-cost programs relative to
other postsecondary programs; or
(iii) Postsecondary program prerequisites or programs that form
part of the pathway for programs under (a)(i) or (ii) of this
subsection.
(b) In awarding grants priority must be given to programs that can
demonstrate industry support.
(3) The council must administer the program, including the
following duties:
(a) Manage the solicitation of competitive requests for proposals
from the four-year institutions of higher education and the selection
process;
(b) Enter into an interagency agreement with the state board for
community and technical colleges who shall manage the solicitation of
competitive requests for proposals from the community and technical
colleges and manage the selection process; and
(c) Identify the appropriate programs and course codes that qualify
for grants under subsection (2) of this section every two years and
based on the most recent assessment of the number and type of higher
education and training credentials required to match employer demand
for a skilled and educated workforce as in RCW 28B.77.080; and
(d) By December 1, 2014, and every two years thereafter, and in
compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the council must submit a report to the
governor and the higher education and appropriation committees of the
legislature that details: (i) The grants awarded; and (ii) the level
of expansion in high employer demand programs of study and programs
that prepare individuals for high demand occupations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By May 1, 2015, and by May 1st of every year thereafter, the
department must annually estimate the increase in state revenue for the
current fiscal year resulting from the expiration of the research and
development tax credit in RCW 82.04.4452 and certify the estimated
amount to the state treasurer.
(2)(a) By July 1, 2015, and by July 1st of every year thereafter,
the state treasurer must transfer the amount certified by the
department under subsection (1) of this section into the meeting
industry demand account hereby created in the custody of the state
treasurer.
(b) Money in the account must be used solely for the purposes
specified in section 2 of this act with fifty percent of the moneys
solely for meeting industry demand program grants at two-year
institutions of higher education and fifty percent of the moneys solely
for meeting industry demand program grants at the four-year
institutions of higher education.
(c) Only the director of the council or the director's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures. The account may retain all of the
interest earnings.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2012 c 198 s 8, 2012 c 196 s 6, 2012 c
187 s 13, and 2012 c 114 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury
for cash management and cash balance purposes.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment
program account, the accessible communities account, the community and
technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the
American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the foster care scholarship
endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the
basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the contract
harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive
account, the commemorative works account, the county enhanced 911
excise tax account, the toll collection account, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the family leave insurance account, the food animal veterinarian
conditional scholarship account, the fruit and vegetable inspection
account, the future teachers conditional scholarship account, the game
farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science
scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and
product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the
industrial insurance rainy day fund, the juvenile accountability
incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan
2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the meeting
industry demand account, the multiagency permitting team account, the
pilotage account, the produce railcar pool account, the regional
transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation
account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic
facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual
development account program account, the Washington horse racing
commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse racing
commission operating account must be credited to the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, ((and))
the reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the center for
childhood deafness and hearing loss account, ((and)) the school for the
blind account, the Millersylvania park trust fund, the public
employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund, and the radiation
perpetual maintenance fund.
(c) The following accounts and funds must receive eighty percent of
their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high
occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account,
and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the
state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the
custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office
of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for
the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---