BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.28.080 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 437 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every person who sells or gives, or permits to be sold or
given, to any person under the age of eighteen years any cigar,
cigarette, cigarette paper or wrapper, ((or)) tobacco in any form, or
a vapor product is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) It shall be no defense to a prosecution for a violation of this
section that the person acted, or was believed by the defendant to act,
as agent or representative of another.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "vapor product" means a
noncombustible tobacco-derived product containing nicotine that employs
a mechanical heating element, battery, or circuit, regardless of shape
or size, that can be used to heat a liquid nicotine solution contained
in cartridges. Vapor product does not include any product that is
regulated by the United States food and drug administration under
chapter V of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act.

--- END ---