BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any purchase of goods or services using a competitive bid
process, the department must give a ten percent preference to bids from
responsible and responsive bidders from in-state businesses. The
preference is applied by lowering the dollar amount of the bid by ten
percent of the actual bid submitted. If the in-state business is
awarded the contract, the contract amount must be based on the original
bid. In the event of a tie bid between an in-state and out-of-state
business, the contract must be awarded to the in-state business.
(2) This section does not apply to the following:
(a) Purchases through community rehabilitation programs under RCW
39.26.230;
(b) Purchases from inmate work programs under RCW 39.26.250 and
39.26.251;
(c) Purchases of electronic products meeting environmental
performance standards under RCW 39.26.265;
(d) Purchases of goods and services made with federal funds; and
(e) Cooperative purchasing under RCW 39.26.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.26 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of enterprise services must post and regularly
update a list of businesses that have a contract for the provision of
goods and services. The list must include the beginning date of the
contract, the contract amount, and any changes to the contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 39.26.260 (Preferences -- In-state procurement) and 1983 c
183 s 1; and
(2) RCW 39.26.271 (Rules for reciprocity in bidding) and 2011 1st
sp.s. c 43 s 241 & 1983 c 183 s 3.

--- END ---