BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.320 and 2000 c 11 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state parks and recreation commission shall do the following
with respect to the portion of the Milwaukee Road corridor under its
control:
(1) Manage the corridor as a recreational trail except when closed
under RCW 79A.05.325;
(2) Close the corridor to hunting;
(3) Close the corridor to all motorized vehicles except: (a)
Emergency or law enforcement vehicles; (b) vehicles necessary for
access to utility lines; ((and)) (c) vehicles necessary for maintenance
of the corridor, or construction of the trail; (d) vehicles used by
lessees and concessionaires operating under valid state parks
agreements; and (e) vehicles for agricultural users for temporary
access;
(4) Comply with legally enforceable conditions contained in the
deeds for the corridor;
(5) Control weeds under the applicable provisions of chapters
17.04, 17.06, and 17.10 RCW; and
(6) Clean and maintain culverts.

--- END ---