BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Caseload," as used in this chapter, means the number of
persons expected to meet entitlement requirements and require the
services of public assistance programs, state correctional
institutions, state correctional noninstitutional supervision, state
institutions for juvenile offenders, the common school system, long-term care, medical assistance, foster care, adoption support, and the
number of students who are eligible for the Washington college bound
scholarship program and are expected to attend an institution of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030.
(2) "Council" means the forecast council.
(3) "Director" means the director of the office of the forecast
council.
(4) "Office" means the office of the forecast council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The office is headed by a director
appointed by the council. The council shall develop a process for the
selection of the director. Approval by an affirmative vote of at least
five members of the council is required for any decisions regarding
employment of the director. The director must be employed for a term
of three years. At the end of the first year of each three-year term
the council shall consider extension of the director's term by one
year. The council may fix the compensation of the director.
(2) The director may employ staff as necessary to perform the
duties imposed by this chapter and to perform the duties necessary to
support the work of the council.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.33.010 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 8 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The ((economic and revenue)) office of the forecast council is
hereby created. The council ((shall)) consists of two individuals
appointed by the governor, the state treasurer, and four individuals,
one of whom is appointed by the chairperson of each of the two largest
political caucuses in the senate and house of representatives. The
chair of the council ((shall)) must be selected from among the four
caucus appointees. The council may select such other officers as the
members deem necessary.
(2) The ((council)) director shall ((employ an economic and revenue
forecast supervisor to)) supervise the preparation of all economic and
revenue forecasts ((and)) under RCW 82.33.020 (as recodified by this
act), the presentation of the state budget outlook((s)) under RCW
82.33.060 (as recodified by this act), and the preparation of all
caseload forecasts under RCW 43.88C.020 (as recodified by this act).
((As used in this chapter, "supervisor" means the economic and revenue
forecast supervisor. Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five
members of the council is required for any decisions regarding
employment of the supervisor. Employment of the supervisor shall
terminate after each term of three years. At the end of the first year
of each three-year term the council shall consider extension of the
supervisor's term by one year. The council may fix the compensation of
the supervisor. The supervisor shall employ staff sufficient to
accomplish the purposes of this section.))
(3) The ((economic and revenue forecast)) council ((shall))
oversees the preparation of and ((approve)) approves the forecasts and
outlooks under subsection (2) of this section, by an affirmative vote
of at least five members, the official, optimistic, and pessimistic
state economic and revenue forecasts prepared under RCW 82.33.020 (as
recodified by this act), the state budget outlook under RCW 82.33.060
(as recodified by this act), and the caseload forecasts under RCW
43.88C.020 (as recodified by this act). If the council is unable to
approve a forecast before a date required in RCW 82.33.020 (as
recodified by this act), or a budget outlook, the ((supervisor))
director shall submit the forecast or outlook without approval and the
forecast ((shall have)) or outlook has the same effect as if approved
by the council.
(4) ((The economic and revenue forecast council shall oversee the
preparation of and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least five
members, the state budget outlook prepared under RCW 43.88.060. If the
council is unable to approve a state budget outlook before a date
required in RCW 43.88.060, the supervisor shall submit the outlook
prepared under RCW 43.88.060 without approval and the outlook shall
have the same effect as if approved by the council.
(5))) A councilmember who does not cast an affirmative vote for
approval of the official economic and revenue forecast, the caseload
forecast, or the state budget outlook may request, and the
((supervisor)) director shall provide, an alternative economic and
revenue forecast, caseload forecast, or state budget outlook based on
assumptions specified by the member including, for purposes of the
state budget outlook, revenues to and expenditures from additional
funds.
(((6))) (5) Members of the ((economic and revenue forecast))
council ((shall)) serve without additional compensation but ((shall
be)) are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council or on official
business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative members of the
council ((shall be)) are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.33.020 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 8 s 3 and 2012 c 182 s
1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Four times each year the ((supervisor)) director must prepare,
subject to the approval of the ((economic and revenue forecast))
council under RCW 82.33.010 (as recodified by this act):
(a) An official state economic and revenue forecast;
(b) An unofficial state economic and revenue forecast based on
optimistic economic and revenue projections; and
(c) An unofficial state economic and revenue forecast based on
pessimistic economic and revenue projections.
(2) The ((supervisor)) director must submit forecasts prepared
under this section, along with any unofficial forecasts provided under
RCW 82.33.010 (as recodified by this act), to the governor and the
members of the committees on ways and means and the chairs of the
committees on transportation of the senate and house of
representatives, including one copy to the staff of each of the
committees, on or before November 20th, February 20th in the even-numbered years, March 20th in the odd-numbered years, June 27th, and
September 27th. All forecasts must include both estimated receipts and
estimated revenues in conformance with generally accepted accounting
principles as provided by RCW 43.88.037. In odd-numbered years, the
period covered by forecasts for the state general fund and related
funds must cover the current fiscal biennium and the next ensuing
fiscal biennium. In even-numbered years, the period covered by the
forecasts for the state general fund and related funds shall be current
fiscal and the next two ensuing fiscal biennia.
(3) All agencies of state government must provide to the
((supervisor)) director immediate access to all information relating to
economic and revenue forecasts. Revenue collection information must be
available to the ((supervisor)) director the first business day
following the conclusion of each collection period.
(4) The ((economic and revenue forecast supervisor)) director and
staff must ((co-locate and)) share information, data, and files with
the tax research section of the department of revenue but may not
duplicate the duties and functions of one another.
(5) As part of its forecasts under subsection (1) of this section,
the ((supervisor)) director must provide estimated revenue from tuition
fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020.
(6) The ((economic and revenue forecast)) council must, in
consultation with the economic and revenue forecast work group created
in RCW 82.33.040 (as recodified by this act), review the existing
((economic and revenue forecast)) council revenue model, data, and
methodologies and in light of recent economic changes, engage outside
experts if necessary, and recommend changes to the ((economic and
revenue forecast)) council ((revenue)) forecasting process to increase
confidence and promote accuracy in the revenue forecast. The
recommendations are due by September 30, 2012, and every five years
thereafter.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.33.030 and 1984 c 138 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator of the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee may request, and the ((supervisor)) director shall
provide, alternative economic and revenue forecasts based on
assumptions specified by the administrator.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.88C.020 and 1997 c 168 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In consultation with the caseload forecast work group
established under RCW 43.88C.030 (as recodified by this act), and
subject to the approval of the ((caseload forecast)) council ((under
RCW 43.88C.010)), the ((supervisor)) director shall prepare:
(a) An official state caseload forecast; and
(b) Other caseload forecasts based on alternative assumptions as
the council may determine.
(2) The ((supervisor)) director shall submit caseload forecasts
prepared under this section((, along with any unofficial forecasts
provided under RCW 43.88C.010,)) to the governor and the members of the
legislative fiscal committees, including one copy to the staff of each
of the committees. The forecasts ((shall)) must be submitted at least
three times each year and on such dates as the council determines will
facilitate the development of budget proposals by the governor and the
legislature.
(3) All agencies of state government shall provide to the
((supervisor)) director immediate access to all information relating to
caseload forecasts.
(4) The administrator of the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee may request, and the ((supervisor))
director shall provide, alternative caseload forecasts based on
assumptions specified by the administrator.
(5) The official state caseload forecast under this section
((shall)) must be the basis of the governor's budget document as
provided in RCW 43.88.030 and utilized by the legislature in the
development of the omnibus biennial appropriations act.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.88.120 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Each agency engaged in the collection of revenues shall prepare
estimated revenues and estimated receipts for the current and ensuing
biennium and shall submit the estimates to the director of financial
management and the director of revenue at times and in the form
specified by the directors, along with any other information which the
directors may request. For those agencies required to develop six-year
programs and financial plans under RCW 44.40.070, six-year revenue
estimates shall be submitted to the director of financial management
and the transportation committees of the senate and the house of
representatives unless the responsibility for reporting these revenue
estimates is assumed elsewhere.
(2) A copy of such revenue estimates shall be simultaneously
submitted to the economic and revenue forecast work group when required
by the office of the ((economic and revenue)) forecast council.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.06.087 and 1997 c 168 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, this
chapter does not apply to the ((economic and revenue forecast
supervisor and staff employed under RCW 82.33.010 or the caseload
forecast supervisor and staff employed under RCW 43.88C.010)) director
and staff of the office of the forecast council under section 2 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The economic and revenue forecast
council is hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are
hereby transferred to the office of the forecast council. All
references to the director or the economic and revenue forecast council
in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the
director or the office of the forecast council.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the economic and
revenue forecast council shall be delivered to the custody of the
office of the forecast council. All cabinets, furniture, office
equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the
economic and revenue forecast council shall be made available to the
office of the forecast council. All funds, credits, or other assets
held by the economic and revenue forecast council shall be assigned to
the office of the forecast council.
(b) Any appropriations made to the economic and revenue forecast
council shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred
and credited to the office of the forecast council.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the economic and revenue forecast council are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the office of the forecast council.
All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil
service law, are assigned to the office of the forecast council to
perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any
loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate
thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil
service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the economic and
revenue forecast council shall be continued and acted upon by the
office of the forecast council. All existing contracts and obligations
shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the office of the
forecast council.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the economic and revenue forecast council shall not affect the validity
of any act performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The caseload forecast council is hereby
abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby transferred
to the office of the forecast council. All references to the director
or the caseload forecast council in the Revised Code of Washington
shall be construed to mean the director or the office of the forecast
council.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the caseload forecast
council shall be delivered to the custody of the office of the forecast
council. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles,
and other tangible property employed by the caseload forecast council
shall be made available to the office of the forecast council. All
funds, credits, or other assets held by the caseload forecast council
shall be assigned to the office of the forecast council.
(b) Any appropriations made to the caseload forecast council shall,
on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to
the office of the forecast council.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the caseload forecast council are transferred
to the jurisdiction of the office of the forecast council. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service
law, are assigned to the office of the forecast council to perform
their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in
accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the caseload forecast
council shall be continued and acted upon by the office of the forecast
council. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full
force and shall be performed by the office of the forecast council.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the caseload forecast council shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1, 2, 9, and 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 All provisions of chapters 43.88C and 82.33
RCW are recodified in chapter 43.--- RCW (the new chapter created under
section 11 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 RCW 43.88C.010 (Caseload forecast council--Caseload forecast supervisor -- Oversight and approval of official
caseload forecast -- Alternative forecast -- Travel reimbursement--Definitions) and 2012 c 217 s 3, 2011 c 304 s 2, 2000 c 90 s 1, & 1997
c 168 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---