BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.20.410 and 1965 c 149 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of any disability insurance
contract, ((benefits shall not be denied thereunder for any eye care
service rendered by a holder of a license issued pursuant to chapter
18.53 RCW, provided, that (1) the service rendered was within the
lawful scope of such person's license, and (2) such contract would have
provided the benefits for such service if rendered by a holder of a
license issued pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW)) for an insurance plan
that includes medical eye care or vision care benefits including, but
not limited to, a health maintenance organization, a health care
service contractor, a preferred provider organization, a managed care
organization, an accountable care organization, a medical home
organization, or a contract of insurance through any medical or
hospital service contracts, services may not be denied for any eye care
service and there may be no discrimination in the amount of either (a)
medical eye care or vision care benefits available to an insured,
participant, or other person entitled to such benefits, whether
provided by an optometrist or another physician, in instances where the
services performed are within the lawful scope of practice of those
professions; and (b) reimbursements or payments to the provider of such
medical eye care or vision care services, whether performed by an
optometrist or another physician, in instances where the services
performed are within the lawful scope of practice of those professions.
The services must be provided by an optometrist or another physician
operating within the scope of their license.
(2) A licensed optometrist is entitled to participate in contracts
or plans providing for medical eye care or vision care services as a
health care provider or otherwise, to the same extent as other licensed
physicians, and there may be no discrimination against any provider,
whether an optometrist or another physician, who is located within the
geographic area of the health maintenance organization, preferred
provider organization, managed care organization, accountable care
organization, or plan or contract of insurance. A health maintenance
organization, preferred provider organization, managed care
organization, accountable care organization, or plan or contract of
insurance or any medical or hospital service contract may not impose a
copayment, coinsurance amount, or any other fee on a covered
participant or insured that is greater than the amount charged for the
same service when provided by an allopathic physician or an osteopathic
physician.
(3) It is unlawful for a health maintenance organization, preferred
provider organization, managed care organization, accountable care
organization, or plan or contract of insurance to require a licensed
optometrist to participate as a provider in another medical or vision
care plan or contract as a condition of or requirement for
participation by a licensed optometrist as a provider in any medical or
vision care plan or contract.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.21.140 and 1965 c 149 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of any group disability insurance
contract or blanket disability insurance contract, ((benefits shall not
be denied thereunder for any eye care service rendered by a holder of
a license issued pursuant to chapter 18.53 RCW, provided, that (1) the
service rendered was within the lawful scope of such person's license,
and (2) such contract would have provided the benefits for such service
if rendered by a holder of a license issued pursuant to chapter 18.71
RCW)) for an insurance plan that includes medical eye care or vision
care benefits including, but not limited to, a health maintenance
organization, a health care service contractor, a preferred provider
organization, a managed care organization, an accountable care
organization, a medical home organization, or a contract of insurance
through any medical or hospital service contracts, services may not be
denied for any eye care service and there may be no discrimination in
the amount of either (a) medical eye care or vision care benefits
available to an insured, participant, or other person entitled to such
benefits, whether provided by an optometrist or another physician, in
instances where the services performed are within the lawful scope of
practice of those professions; and (b) reimbursements or payments to
the provider of such medical eye care or vision care services, whether
performed by an optometrist or another physician, in instances where
the services performed are within the lawful scope of practice of those
professions. The services must be provided by an optometrist or
another physician operating within the scope of their license.
(2) A licensed optometrist is entitled to participate in contracts
or plans providing for medical eye care or vision care services as a
health care provider or otherwise, to the same extent as other licensed
physicians, and there may be no discrimination against any provider,
whether an optometrist or another physician, who is located within the
geographic area of the health maintenance organization, preferred
provider organization, managed care organization, accountable care
organization, or plan or contract of insurance. A health maintenance
organization, preferred provider organization, managed care
organization, accountable care organization, or plan or contract of
insurance or any medical or hospital service contract may not impose a
copayment, coinsurance amount, or any other fee on a covered
participant or insured that is greater than the amount charged for the
same service when provided by an allopathic physician or an osteopathic
physician.
(3) It is unlawful for a health maintenance organization, preferred
provider organization, managed care organization, accountable care
organization, or plan or contract of insurance to require a licensed
optometrist to participate as a provider in another medical or vision
care plan or contract as a condition of or requirement for
participation by a licensed optometrist as a provider in any medical or
vision care plan or contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of a health care service
contract, for a contract that includes medical eye care or vision care
benefits, services may not be denied for any eye care service and there
may be no discrimination in the amount of either (a) medical eye care
or vision care benefits available to an insured, participant, or other
person entitled to such benefits, whether provided by an optometrist or
another physician, in instances where the services performed are within
the lawful scope of practice of those professions; and (b)
reimbursements or payments to the provider of such medical eye care or
vision care services, whether performed by an optometrist or another
physician, in instances where the services performed are within the
lawful scope of practice of those professions. The services must be
provided by an optometrist or another physician operating within the
scope of their license.
(2) A licensed optometrist is entitled to participate in contracts
or plans providing for medical eye care or vision care services as a
health care provider or otherwise, to the same extent as other licensed
physicians, and there may be no discrimination against any provider,
whether an optometrist or another physician, who is located within the
geographic area of the health care service contractor. A health care
service contractor may not impose a copayment, coinsurance amount, or
any other fee on a covered participant or insured that is greater than
the amount charged for the same service when provided by an allopathic
physician or an osteopathic physician.
(3) It is unlawful for a health care service contractor to require
a licensed optometrist to participate as a provider in another medical
or vision care plan or contract as a condition of or requirement for
participation by a licensed optometrist as a provider in any medical or
vision care plan or contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of a health maintenance
agreement, for an agreement that includes medical eye care or vision
care benefits, services may not be denied for any eye care service and
there may be no discrimination in the amount of either (a) medical eye
care or vision care benefits available to an insured, participant, or
other person entitled to such benefits, whether provided by an
optometrist or another physician, in instances where the services
performed are within the lawful scope of practice of those professions;
and (b) reimbursements or payments to the provider of such medical eye
care or vision care services, whether performed by an optometrist or
another physician, in instances where the services performed are within
the lawful scope of practice of those professions. The services must
be provided by an optometrist or another physician operating within the
scope of their license.
(2) A licensed optometrist is entitled to participate in contracts
or plans providing for medical eye care or vision care services as a
health care provider or otherwise, to the same extent as other licensed
physicians, and there may be no discrimination against any provider,
whether an optometrist or another physician, who is located within the
geographic area of the health maintenance organization. A health
maintenance organization may not impose a copayment, coinsurance
amount, or any other fee on a covered participant or insured that is
greater than the amount charged for the same service when provided by
an allopathic physician or an osteopathic physician.
(3) It is unlawful for a health maintenance organization to require
a licensed optometrist to participate as a provider in another medical
or vision care plan or contract as a condition of or requirement for
participation by a licensed optometrist as a provider in any medical or
vision care plan or contract.

--- END ---