BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
The clinical review criteria used by an insurer or a utilization
review entity acting on its behalf shall: (1) Adhere to the federal
food and drug administration prescription drug labeling; and (2) not
require failure on the same American hospital formulary service
medication class on more than one occasion for patients continuously
enrolled in any plan offered by said insurer. Nothing in this section
may be construed to prevent health care providers from prescribing a
medication for an off-label use or from prescribing a medication on
more than one occasion when they determine it is medically appropriate.

--- END ---