BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.19.030 and 2010 c 161 s 704 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall design special license plates for persons
with disabilities, parking placards, and year tabs displaying the
international symbol of access.
(2) Special license plates for persons with disabilities must be
displayed on the motor vehicle as standard issue license plates as
described in RCW 46.16A.200.
(3) Parking placards must include both a serial number and the
expiration date on the face of the placard. The expiration date and
serial number must be of sufficient size as to be easily visible from
a distance of ten feet from where the placard is displayed.
(4) Parking placards must be displayed when the motor vehicle is
parked by suspending it from the rearview mirror. In the absence of a
rearview mirror, the parking placard must be displayed on the
dashboard. Parking placards must be displayed in a manner that allows
the entire placard to be viewed through the vehicle windshield.
(((4))) (5) Special year tabs for persons with disabilities must be
displayed on license plates as defined by the department.
(((5))) (6) Persons who have been issued special license plates for
persons with disabilities, parking placards, or special license plates
with a special year tab for persons with disabilities may park in
places reserved for persons with physical disabilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.19.050 and 2011 c 171 s 74 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) False information. Knowingly providing false information in
conjunction with the application for special parking privileges for
persons with disabilities is a gross misdemeanor punishable under
chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2) Unauthorized use. Any unauthorized use of ((the special)) a
parking placard, special license (([plate])) plate, or identification
card issued under this chapter is a parking infraction with a monetary
penalty of two hundred fifty dollars. In addition to any penalty or
fine imposed under this subsection, two hundred dollars must be
assessed. For the purposes of this subsection, "unauthorized use"
includes the use of a parking placard or special license plate that is
expired, faked, forged, or counterfeited, and any use of the placard or
special license plate of another holder if the initial holder of the
placard or license plate is no longer eligible to use or receive it.
(3) Inaccessible access. It is a parking infraction, with a
monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars, for a person to park in,
block, or otherwise make inaccessible the access aisle located next to
a space reserved for persons with physical disabilities. In addition
to any penalty or fine imposed under this subsection, two hundred
dollars must be assessed. The clerk of the court shall report all
violations related to this subsection to the department.
(4) Parking without placard/plate. It is a parking infraction,
with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars, for any person to
park a vehicle in a parking place provided on private property without
charge or on public property reserved for persons with physical
disabilities without a placard or special license plate issued under
this chapter. In addition to any penalty or fine imposed under this
subsection, two hundred dollars must be assessed. If a person is
charged with a violation, the person will not be determined to have
committed an infraction if the person produces in court or before the
court appearance the placard or special license plate issued under this
chapter as required under this chapter. A local jurisdiction providing
nonmetered, on-street parking places reserved for persons with physical
disabilities may impose by ordinance time restrictions of no less than
four hours on the use of these parking places.
(5) Improper display of placard/plate. It is a parking infraction,
with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars, to fail to fully
display a placard or special license plate issued under this chapter
while parked in a parking place on private property without charge or
on public property reserved for persons with physical disabilities. In
addition to any penalty or fine imposed under this subsection, two
hundred dollars must be assessed, for a total of four hundred fifty
dollars. For the purposes of this subsection, "fully display" means
hanging or placing the placard or special license plate so that the
full face of the placard or license plate is visible, including the
serial number and expiration date of the license plate or placard. If
a person is charged with a violation of this subsection, the person
will not be determined to have committed an infraction if the person
produces in court or before the court appearance an identification card
validly issued to that person under RCW 46.19.010.
(6) Time restrictions. A local jurisdiction may impose by
ordinance time restrictions of no less than four hours on the use of
nonreserved, on-street parking spaces by vehicles displaying the
special parking placards or special license plates issued under this
chapter. All time restrictions must be clearly posted.
(((6))) (7) Allocation and use of funds - reimbursement. (a) The
assessment imposed under subsections (2), (3), ((and)) (4), and (5) of
this section must be allocated as follows:
(i) One hundred dollars must be deposited in the accessible
communities account created in RCW 50.40.071; and
(ii) One hundred dollars must be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account under RCW 47.66.070 for the sole purpose of
supplementing a grant program for special needs transportation provided
by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of transportation that is
administered by the department of transportation.
(b) Any reduction in any penalty or fine and assessment imposed
under subsections (2), (3), ((and)) (4), and (5) of this section must
be applied proportionally between the penalty or fine and the
assessment. When a reduced penalty is imposed under subsection (2),
(3), ((or)) (4), or (5) of this section, the amount deposited in the
accounts identified in (a) of this subsection must be reduced equally
and proportionally.
(c) The penalty or fine amounts must be used by that local
jurisdiction exclusively for law enforcement. The court may also
impose an additional penalty sufficient to reimburse the local
jurisdiction for any costs that it may have incurred in the removal and
storage of the improperly parked vehicle.
(((7))) (8) Illegal obtainment. Except as provided in subsection
(1) of this section, it is a traffic infraction with a monetary penalty
of two hundred fifty dollars for any person willfully to obtain a
special license plate, placard, or identification card issued under
this chapter in a manner other than that established under this
chapter. It is a violation of this subsection to make a
misrepresentation to a medical professional in order to obtain a
special license plate or placard, to steal the special license plate or
placard of another holder, or, unless transporting the person to whom
the special license plate or placard was issued or when using a placard
or special license plate issued under RCW 46.19.020, to use the special
license plate or placard issued to another holder even if permitted to
do so by the holder.
(((8))) (9) Volunteer appointment. A law enforcement agency
authorized to enforce parking laws may appoint volunteers, with a
limited commission, to issue notices of infractions for violations of
((RCW 46.19.010)) this section and RCW 46.19.030 or 46.61.581.
Volunteers must be at least twenty-one years of age. The law
enforcement agency appointing volunteers may establish any other
qualifications that the agency deems desirable.
(a) An agency appointing volunteers under this section must provide
training to the volunteers before authorizing them to issue notices of
infractions.
(b) A notice of infraction issued by a volunteer appointed under
this subsection has the same force and effect as a notice of infraction
issued by a police officer for the same offense.
(c) A police officer or a volunteer may request a person to show
the person's identification card or special parking placard when
investigating the possibility of a violation of this section. If the
request is refused, the person in charge of the vehicle may be issued
a notice of infraction for a violation of this section.
(((9))) (10) Community restitution. For second or subsequent
violations of this section, in addition to a monetary penalty, the
violator must complete a minimum of forty hours of:
(a) Community restitution for a nonprofit organization that serves
persons with disabilities or disabling diseases; or
(b) Any other community restitution that may sensitize the violator
to the needs and obstacles faced by persons with disabilities.
(((10))) (11) Fine suspension. The court may not suspend more than
one-half of any fine imposed under subsection (2), (3), (4), (5), or
(((7))) (8) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.19.020 and 2012 c 10 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following organizations may apply for special parking
privileges:
(a) Public transportation authorities;
(b) Nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW;
(c) Assisted living facilities licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW;
(d) Senior citizen centers;
(e) Accessible van rental companies registered under RCW 46.87.023;
(f) Private nonprofit corporations, as defined in RCW 24.03.005;
and
(((f))) (g) Cabulance companies that regularly transport persons
with disabilities who have been determined eligible for special parking
privileges under this section and who are registered with the
department under chapter 46.72 RCW.
(2) An organization that qualifies for special parking privileges
may receive, upon application, parking license plates or placards, or
both, for persons with disabilities as defined by the department.
(3) Public transportation authorities, nursing homes, assisted
living facilities, senior citizen centers, accessible van rental
companies, private nonprofit corporations, and cabulance services are
responsible for ensuring that the special placards and license plates
are not used improperly and are responsible for all fines and penalties
for improper use.
(4) The department shall adopt rules to determine organization
eligibility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Within existing resources, the
department of licensing must convene a work group to examine the use of
parking placards and special license plates for persons with
disabilities and develop a strategic plan for ending any abuse. In
developing this plan, the department must work with the department of
health, disabled citizen advocacy groups, and representatives from
local government.
(2) The work group must be composed of no more than two
representatives from each of the entities listed in subsection (1) of
this section. The work group may, when appropriate, consult with any
other public or private entity in order to complete the strategic plan.
(3) The strategic plan must include:
(a) Oversight measures to ensure that parking placards and special
license plates for persons with disabilities are being properly issued,
including: (i) The entity responsible for coordinating a randomized
review of applications for special parking privileges; (ii) a volunteer
panel of medical professionals to conduct such reviews; (iii) a means
to protect the anonymity of both the medical professional conducting a
review and the medical professional under review; (iv) a means to
protect the privacy of applicants by removing any personally
identifiable information; and (v) possible sanctions against a medical
professional for repeated improper issuances of parking placards or
special license plates for persons with disabilities, including those
sanctions listed in chapter 18.130 RCW; and
(b) The creation of a publicly accessible system in which the
validity of parking placards and special license plates for persons
with disabilities may be verified. This system must not allow the
public to access any personally identifiable information or protected
health information of a person who has been issued a parking placard or
special license plate.
(4) The work group must convene August 1, 2013, and terminate
January 31, 2014.
(5) By January 31, 2014, the work group must deliver to the
legislature and the appropriate legislative committees the strategic
plan required under this section, together with its findings,
recommendations, and draft legislation in order to implement the
strategic plan.

--- END ---