BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Additive transportation funding is
hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the several
amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish
the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several
accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices
for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and
for other specified purposes for the period ending June 30, 2015.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this act:
(a) "Lapse" means the amount shall return to unappropriated status.
(b) "LEAP" means the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee.
(c) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in
this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified
purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and
limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--OPERATING
Sec. 2 2013 c 306 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,409,000
State Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $885,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($156,679,000))
$156,817,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,392,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($76,819,000))
$88,947,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $467,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,544,000
Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,656,000
Department of Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,959,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($253,844,000))
$266,110,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,235,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute
House Bill No. 1752), Laws of 2013 (requirements for the operation of
commercial motor vehicles in compliance with federal regulations). If
chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1752), Laws of 2013 is not
enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection
lapses.
(2) $1,000,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
is provided solely for information technology field system
modernization.
(3) $201,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5152), Laws of 2013 (Sounders FC and Seahawks license
plates). If chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5152), Laws of
2013 is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this
subsection lapses.
(4) $425,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5182), Laws of 2013 (vehicle owner information). If
chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5182), Laws of 2013 is not
enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection
lapses.
(5) $172,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Senate Bill
No. 5775), Laws of 2013 (veterans/drivers' licenses). If chapter . . .
(Senate Bill No. 5775), Laws of 2013 is not enacted by June 30, 2013,
the amount provided in this subsection lapses.
(6) $652,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5785), Laws of 2013 (license plates). If
chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5785), Laws of 2013
is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection
lapses.
(7) $78,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation and
$3,707,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5857), Laws of 2013 (vehicle-related fees).
If chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5857), Laws of
2013 is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this
subsection lapses.
(8) The appropriation in this section reflects the department
charging an amount sufficient to cover the full cost of providing the
data requested under RCW 46.12.630(1)(b).
(9)(a) The department must convene a work group to examine the use
of parking placards and special license plates for persons with
disabilities and develop a strategic plan for ending any abuse. In
developing this plan, the department must work with the department of
health, disabled citizen advocacy groups, and representatives from
local government.
(b) The work group must be composed of no more than two
representatives from each of the entities listed in (a) of this
subsection. The work group may, when appropriate, consult with any
other public or private entity in order to complete the strategic plan.
(c) The strategic plan must include:
(i) Oversight measures to ensure that parking placards and special
license plates for persons with disabilities are being properly issued,
including: (A) The entity responsible for coordinating a randomized
review of applications for special parking privileges; (B) a volunteer
panel of medical professionals to conduct such reviews; (C) a means to
protect the anonymity of both the medical professional conducting a
review and the medical professional under review; (D) a means to
protect the privacy of applicants by removing any personally
identifiable information; and (E) possible sanctions against a medical
professional for repeated improper issuances of parking placards or
special license plates for persons with disabilities, including those
sanctions listed in chapter 18.130 RCW; and
(ii) The creation of a publicly accessible system in which the
validity of parking placards and special license plates for persons
with disabilities may be verified. This system must not allow the
public to access any personally identifiable information or protected
health information of a person who has been issued a parking placard or
special license plate.
(d) The work group must convene by July 1, 2013, and terminate by
December 1, 2013.
(e) By December 1, 2013, the work group must deliver to the
legislature and the appropriate legislative committees the strategic
plan required under this subsection, together with its findings,
recommendations, and any necessary draft legislation in order to
implement the strategic plan.
(10) $3,082,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
is provided solely for exam and licensing activities, including the
workload associated with providing driver record abstracts, and is
subject to the following additional conditions and limitations:
(a) The department may furnish driving record abstracts only to
those persons or entities expressly authorized to receive the abstracts
under Title 46 RCW;
(b) The department may furnish driving record abstracts only for an
amount that does not exceed the specified fee amounts in RCW 46.52.130
(2)(e)(v) and (4); and
(c) The department may not enter into a contract, or otherwise
participate in any arrangement, with a third party or other state
agency for any service that results in an additional cost, in excess of
the fee amounts specified in RCW 46.52.130 (2)(e)(v) and (4), to
statutorily authorized persons or entities purchasing a driving record
abstract.
(11) $7,414,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for replacing prorate and fuel tax computer systems
used to administer interstate licensing and the collection of fuel tax
revenues.
(12) $4,714,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
and $138,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation are
provided solely for the administration of the tax and fee changes
required by the enactment of either chapter . . . (Substitute House
Bill No. 1954), Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. or chapter . . . (Senate
Bill No. 5920), Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Sec. 3 2013 c 306 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS -- PROGRAM K
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $570,000
Connecting Washington Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,570,000

The appropriations in this section ((is)) are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(1) The legislature finds that the efforts started in the 2011-2013
fiscal biennium regarding the transition to a road usage charge system
represent an important first step in the policy and conceptual
development of potential alternative systems to fund transportation
projects, but that the governance for the development needs
clarification. The legislature also finds that significant amounts of
research and public education are occurring in similar efforts in
several states and that these efforts can and should be leveraged to
advance the evaluation in Washington. The legislature intends,
therefore, that the transportation commission and its staff lead the
policy development of the business case for a road usage charge system,
with the goal of providing the business case to the governor and the
legislative committees of the legislature in time for inclusion in the
2014 supplemental omnibus transportation appropriations act. The
legislature intends for additional oversight in the business case
development, with guidance from a steering committee as provided in
chapter 86, Laws of 2012 for the transportation commission, augmented
with participation by the joint transportation committee. The
legislature further intends that, through the economic partnerships
program, the department continue to address administrative, technical,
and conceptual operational issues related to road usage charge systems,
and that the department serve as a resource for information gleaned
from other states on this topic for the transportation commission's
efforts.
(2) The economic partnerships program must continue to explore
retail partnerships at state-owned park-and-ride facilities, as
authorized in RCW 47.04.295.
(3)(a) $6,000,000 of the connecting Washington account--state
appropriation is provided solely to capitalize the Washington electric
vehicle infrastructure bank for the purpose of providing revolving
loans.
(b) Prior to providing any financial assistance for electric
vehicle infrastructure projects, the department must submit a business
plan to the house of representatives and senate transportation
committees and to the governor's office. Expenditures for development
of the business plan must not exceed thirty-five thousand dollars.
(c) Annual progress reports must be transmitted to the legislature
and governor by December 1, 2013, and December 1, 2014.

Sec. 4 2013 c 306 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,040,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Connecting Washington Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($407,040,000))
$442,140,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $377,779,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
and $10,000,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation are
provided solely for the maintenance program to achieve specific levels
of service on the thirty maintenance targets listed by statewide
priority in LEAP Transportation Document 2013-4 as developed April 23,
2013. Beginning in February 2014, the department shall report to the
legislature annually on its updated maintenance accountability process
targets and whether or not the department was able to achieve its
targets.
(2) $8,450,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department's compliance with its national
pollution discharge elimination system permit.
(3) $1,305,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for utility fees assessed by local governments as
authorized under RCW 90.03.525 for the mitigation of storm water runoff
from state highways.
(4) The department shall submit a budget decision for the 2014
legislative session package that details all costs associated with
utility fees assessed by local governments as authorized under RCW
90.03.525.
(5) $50,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for clearing and pruning dangerous trees along state
route number 542 between mile markers 43 and 48 to prevent safety
hazards and delays.
(6) $2,277,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to replace or rehabilitate critical equipment needed to
perform snow and ice removal activities and roadway maintenance. These
funds may not be used to purchase passenger cars as defined in RCW
46.04.382.

Sec. 5 2013 c 306 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION PLANNING,
DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,109,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,885,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $662,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,809,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Connecting Washington Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $190,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,565,000))
$48,755,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within available resources, the department must collaborate
with the affected metropolitan planning organizations, regional
transportation planning organizations, transit agencies, and private
transportation providers to develop a plan to reduce vehicle demand,
increase public transportation options, and reduce vehicle miles
traveled on corridors affected by growth at Joint Base Lewis-McChord.
(2) $190,000 of the connecting Washington account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the regional transportation
planning organizations across the state to continue the implementation
of forward Washington.

Sec. 6 2013 c 306 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V
State Vehicle Parking Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
Regional Mobility Grant Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,948,000
Rural Mobility Grant Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,057,000))
$89,057,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,280,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($109,737,000))
$159,737,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $25,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs
transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of
transportation. Of this amount:
(a) $5,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of
special needs transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers must be
based on need, including the availability of other providers of service
in the area, efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders,
and the cost effectiveness of trips provided.
(b) $19,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to transit agencies to
transport persons with special transportation needs. To receive a
grant, the transit agency must, to the greatest extent practicable,
have a maintenance of effort for special needs transportation that is
no less than the previous year's maintenance of effort for special
needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies must be prorated
based on the amount expended for demand response service and route
deviated service in calendar year 2011 as reported in the "Summary of
Public Transportation - 2011" published by the department of
transportation. No transit agency may receive more than thirty percent
of these distributions.
(2) $17,000,000 of the rural mobility grant program account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to aid small cities in
rural areas as prescribed in RCW 47.66.100.
(3)(a) $6,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (a)
Public transit agencies to add vanpools or replace vans; and (b)
incentives for employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant
program for public transit agencies will cover capital costs only;
operating costs for public transit agencies are not eligible for
funding under this grant program. Additional employees may not be
hired from the funds provided in this section for the vanpool grant
program, and supplanting of transit funds currently funding vanpools is
not allowed. The department shall encourage grant applicants and
recipients to leverage funds other than state funds.
(b) At least $1,600,000 of the amount provided in this subsection
must be used for vanpool grants in congested corridors.
(c) $520,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is provided
solely for the purchase of additional vans for use by vanpools serving
soldiers and civilian employees at Joint Base Lewis-McChord.
(4) $9,948,000 of the regional mobility grant program account--state appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the
regional mobility grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation
Document 2013-2 ALL PROJECTS - Public Transportation - Program (V) as
developed April 23, 2013.
(5)(a) $40,000,000 of the regional mobility grant program account--state appropriation is provided solely for the regional mobility grant
projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2013-2 ALL PROJECTS
- Public Transportation - Program (V) as developed April 23, 2013. The
department shall review all projects receiving grant awards under this
program at least semiannually to determine whether the projects are
making satisfactory progress. Any project that has been awarded funds,
but does not report activity on the project within one year of the
grant award, must be reviewed by the department to determine whether
the grant should be terminated. The department shall promptly close
out grants when projects have been completed, and any remaining funds
must be used only to fund projects identified in the LEAP
transportation document referenced in this subsection. The department
shall provide annual status reports on December 15, 2013, and December
15, 2014, to the office of financial management and the transportation
committees of the legislature regarding the projects receiving the
grants. It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate funds
through the regional mobility grant program only for projects that will
be completed on schedule. A grantee may not receive more than twenty-five percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection. The
department shall not approve any increases or changes to the scope of
a project for the purpose of a grantee expending remaining funds on an
awarded grant.
(b) In order to be eligible to receive a grant under (a) of this
subsection during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, a transit agency must
establish a process for private transportation providers to apply for
the use of park and ride facilities. For purposes of this subsection,
(i) "private transportation provider" means: An auto transportation
company regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; a passenger charter carrier
regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch
limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under
department of licensing rules; a private nonprofit transportation
provider regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; or a private employer
transportation service provider; and (ii) "private employer
transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route
transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit
of its employees.
(6) Funds provided for the commute trip reduction (CTR) program may
also be used for the growth and transportation efficiency center
program.
(7) $6,122,000 of the total appropriation in this section is
provided solely for CTR grants and activities. Of this amount:
(a) $3,900,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to local jurisdictions,
selected by the CTR board, for the purpose of assisting employers meet
CTR goals;
(b) $1,770,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for state costs associated with CTR.
The department shall develop more efficient methods of CTR assistance
and survey procedures; and
(c) $452,000 of the state vehicle parking account--state
appropriation is provided solely for CTR-related expenditures,
including all expenditures related to the guaranteed ride home program
and the STAR pass program.
(8) An affected urban growth area that has not previously
implemented a commute trip reduction program as of the effective date
of this section is exempt from the requirements in RCW 70.94.527.
(9) $200,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is contingent on the timely development of an annual
report summarizing the status of public transportation systems as
identified under RCW 35.58.2796.
(10) $50,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for, and is intended to continue to be
used in future biennia for the purpose of completing, the projects
listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2013-L2 TRANSIT PROJECTS, as
developed June 23, 2013.

Sec. 7 2013 c 306 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,737,000))
$8,762,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,567,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,304,000))
$11,329,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $25,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely to Wahkiakum county for
additional operating and maintenance costs of the Puget Island-Westport
ferry.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--CAPITAL
Sec. 8 2013 c 306 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD
Freight Mobility Investment Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,794,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,736,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,320,000
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,450,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,250,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,634,000))
$35,134,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the total
appropriation in this section is provided solely for the implementation
of chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1256), Laws of 2013
(addressing project selection by the freight mobility strategic
investment board). If chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1256),
Laws of 2013 is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in
this section lapse.
(2) $6,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to help address bottlenecks and for
other roadway improvements that would benefit freight movement.

Sec. 9 2013 c 306 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- FACILITIES -- PROGRAM D -- (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,425,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,106,000))
$13,106,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,531,000))
$26,531,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The legislature recognizes that the Marginal Way site (King
county parcel numbers 3024049182 & 5367202525) is surplus state-owned
real property under the jurisdiction of the department and that the
public would benefit significantly if this site is used to provide
important social services. Therefore, the legislature declares that
committing the Marginal Way site to this use is consistent with the
public interest.
Pursuant to RCW 47.12.063, the department shall work with the owner
of King county parcel number 7643400010, which abuts both parcels of
the Marginal Way site, and shall convey the Marginal Way site to that
abutting property owner for the appraised fair market value of the
parcels, the proceeds of which must be deposited in the motor vehicle
fund. The conveyance is conditional upon the purchaser's agreement to
commit the use of the Marginal Way site to operations with the goal of
ending hunger in western Washington. The department may not make this
conveyance before September 1, 2013, and may not make this conveyance
after January 15, 2014.
The Washington department of transportation is not responsible for
any costs associated with the cleanup or transfer of the Marginal Way
site.
(2) $13,425,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the construction of a new traffic
management and emergency operations center on property owned by the
department on Dayton Avenue in Shoreline (project 100010T). Consistent
with the office of financial management's 2012 study, it is the intent
of the legislature to appropriate no more than $15,000,000 for the
total construction costs. The department shall report to the
transportation committees of the legislature and the office of
financial management by June 30, 2014, on the progress of the
construction of the traffic management and emergency operations center,
including a schedule for terminating the current lease of the Goldsmith
building in Seattle.
(3) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the planning and design work necessary to
consolidate and expand the existing maintenance facility at Corson
Avenue South in Seattle, Washington. The office of financial
management shall hold this amount in unallotted status until the
transfer authorized in subsection (1) of this section is completed.

Sec. 10 2013 c 306 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,536,032,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,508,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $473,359,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,452,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $242,253,000
State Route Number 520 Corridor Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $737,205,000
State Route Number 520 Corridor Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $124,000
Connecting Washington Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $534,400,000
Connecting Washington Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,559,933,000))
$4,195,733,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire
transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation and the
entire transportation partnership account appropriation are provided
solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and
amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2013-1 as developed April 23,
2013, Program - Highway Improvement Program (I). However, limited
transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur
between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and
limitations in section 603 of this act.
(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor
vehicle account--state appropriation and motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities
listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2013-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed
April 23, 2013, Program - Highway Improvement Program (I). It is the
intent of the legislature to direct the department to give first
priority of federal funds gained through efficiencies or the
redistribution process to the "Contingency (Unfunded) Highway
Preservation Projects" as identified in LEAP Transportation Document
2013-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed April 23, 2013, Program - Highway
Preservation Program (P). However, no additional federal funds may be
allocated to the I-5/Columbia River Crossing project (400506A).
(3) Within the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
motor vehicle account -- federal appropriation, the department may
transfer funds between programs I and P, except for funds that are
otherwise restricted in this act.
(4) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account) -- state
appropriation includes up to $217,604,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.861.
(5) The transportation partnership account -- state appropriation
includes up to $1,156,217,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized in RCW 47.10.873.
(6) The motor vehicle account -- state appropriation includes up to
$30,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW
47.10.843.
(7) The connecting Washington account--state appropriation includes
up to $389,639,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1956), Laws of 2013 2nd sp.
sess. or chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 5922), Laws of 2013 2nd sp.
sess. or other legislation authorizing the sale of bonds to be
deposited in the connecting Washington account.
(8)(a) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account -- federal
appropriation and $200,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the I-90 Comprehensive Tolling
Study and Environmental Review project (100067T). The department shall
prepare a detailed environmental impact statement that complies with
the national environmental policy act regarding tolling Interstate 90
between Interstate 5 and Interstate 405 for the purposes of both
managing traffic and providing funding for the construction of the
unfunded state route number 520 from Interstate 5 to Medina project.
As part of the preparation of the statement, the department must review
any impacts to the network of highways and roads surrounding Lake
Washington. In developing this statement, the department must provide
significant outreach to potential affected communities. The department
may consider traffic management options that extend as far east as
Issaquah.
(b)(i) As part of the project in this subsection (8), the
department shall perform a study of all funding alternatives to tolling
Interstate 90 to provide funding for construction of the unfunded state
route number 520 and explore and evaluate options to mitigate the
effect of tolling on affected residents and all other users of the
network of highways and roads surrounding Lake Washington including,
but not limited to:
(A) Allowing all Washington residents to traverse a portion of the
tolled section of Interstate 90 without paying a toll. Residents may
choose either (I) the portion of Interstate 90 between the easternmost
landing west of Mercer Island and the westernmost landing on Mercer
Island, or (II) the portion of Interstate 90 between the westernmost
landing east of Mercer Island and the easternmost landing on Mercer
Island;
(B) Assessing a toll only when a driver traverses, in either
direction, the entire portion of Interstate 90 between the easternmost
landing west of Mercer Island and the westernmost landing east of
Mercer Island; and
(C) Allowing affected residents to choose one portion of the tolled
section of Interstate 90 upon which they may travel without paying a
toll. Residents may choose either (I) the portion of Interstate 90
between the easternmost landing west of Mercer Island and the
westernmost landing on Mercer Island, or (II) the portion of Interstate
90 between the westernmost landing east of Mercer Island and the
easternmost landing on Mercer Island.
(ii) The department may also consider any alternative mitigation
options that conform to the purpose of this subsection (8).
(iii) For the purposes of this subsection (8), "affected resident"
means anyone who must use a portion of Interstate 90 west of Interstate
405 upon which tolling is considered in order to access necessary
medical services, such as a hospital.
(9) $541,901,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation, $144,954,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation, $129,779,000 of the motor vehicle account--private/local
appropriation, and $78,004,000 of the transportation 2003 account
(nickel account)--state appropriation are provided solely for the SR
99/Alaskan Way Viaduct - Replacement project (809936Z).
(10) The department shall reconvene an expert review panel of no
more than three members as described under RCW 47.01.400 for the
purpose of updating the work that was previously completed by the panel
on the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project and to ensure that an
appropriate and viable financial plan is created and regularly
reviewed. The expert review panel must be selected cooperatively by
the chairs of the senate and house of representatives transportation
committees, the secretary of transportation, and the governor. The
expert review panel must report findings and recommendations to the
transportation committees of the legislature, the governor's Alaskan
Way viaduct project oversight committee, and the transportation
commission annually until the project is operationally complete. This
subsection takes effect if chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No.
1957), Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. is not enacted by June 30, 2013.
(11) $7,408,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation, $14,594,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel
account)--state appropriation, $3,730,000 of the motor vehicle
account--state appropriation, $1,000,000 of the multimodal
transportation account--state appropriation, and $41,395,000 of the
motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are provided solely for
the US 395/North Spokane Corridor projects (600010A & 600003A). Any
future savings on the projects must stay on the US 395/Interstate 90
corridor and be made available to the current phase of the North
Spokane corridor projects or any future phase of the projects.
(12) $114,369,000 of the transportation partnership account -- state
appropriation and $53,755,000 of the transportation 2003 account
(nickel account) -- state appropriation are provided solely for the I-405/Kirkland Vicinity Stage 2 - Widening project (8BI1002). This
project must be completed as soon as practicable as a design-build
project. Any future savings on this project or other Interstate 405
corridor projects must stay on the Interstate 405 corridor and be made
available to either the I-405/SR 167 Interchange - Direct Connector
project (140504C) or the I-405 Renton to Bellevue project.
(13)(a) The SR 520 Bridge Replacement and HOV project (0BI1003) is
supported over time from multiple sources, including a $300,000,000
TIFIA loan, $819,524,625 in Garvee bonds, toll revenues, state bonds,
interest earnings, and other miscellaneous sources.
(b) The state route number 520 corridor account--state
appropriation includes up to $668,142,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.879 and 47.10.886.
(c) The state route number 520 corridor account--federal
appropriation includes up to $300,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.879 and 47.10.886.
(d) $153,124,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation, $300,000,000 of the state route number 520 corridor
account--federal appropriation, and $737,205,000 of the state route
number 520 corridor account--state appropriation are provided solely
for the SR 520 Bridge Replacement and HOV project (0BI1003). Of the
amounts appropriated in this subsection (13)(d), $105,085,000 of the
state route number 520 corridor account--federal appropriation and
$227,415,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account--state
appropriation must be put into unallotted status and are subject to
review by the office of financial management. The director of the
office of financial management shall consult with the joint
transportation committee prior to making a decision to allot these
funds.
(e) When developing the financial plan for the project, the
department shall assume that all maintenance and operation costs for
the new facility are to be covered by tolls collected on the toll
facility and not by the motor vehicle account.
(14) $1,100,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for the 31st Ave SW Overpass Widening and
Improvement project (L1100048).
(15) $22,602,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely to advance the design, preliminary engineering, and
rights-of-way acquisition for the priority projects identified in LEAP
Transportation Document 2013-3 as developed April 23, 2013. Funds must
be used to advance the emergent, initial development of these projects
for the purpose of expediting delivery of the associated major
investments when funding for such investments becomes available.
Funding may be reallocated between projects to maximize the
accomplishment of design and preliminary engineering work and
rights-of-way acquisition, provided that all projects are addressed.
It is the intent of the legislature that, while seeking to maximize the
outcomes in this section, the department shall provide for continuity
of both the state and consulting engineer workforce, while
strategically utilizing private sector involvement to ensure
consistency with the department's business plan for staffing in the
highway construction program in the current fiscal biennium.
(16) If a planned roundabout in the vicinity of state route number
526 and 84th Street SW would divert commercial traffic onto
neighborhood streets, the department may not proceed with improvements
at state route number 526 and 84th Street SW until the traffic impacts
in the vicinity of state route number 526 and 40th Avenue West are
addressed.
(17) The legislature finds that there are sixteen companies
involved in wood preserving in the state that employ four hundred
workers and have an annual payroll of fifteen million dollars. Prior
to the department's switch to steel guardrails, ninety percent of the
twenty-five hundred mile guardrail system was constructed of preserved
wood and one hundred ten thousand wood guardrail posts were produced
annually for state use. Moreover, the policy of using steel posts
requires the state to use imported steel. Given these findings, where
practicable, and until June 30, 2015, the department shall include the
design option to use wood guardrail posts, in addition to steel posts,
in new guardrail installations. The selection of posts must be
consistent with the agency design manual policy that existed before
December 2009.
(18) The legislature finds that "right-sizing" is a lean,
metric-based approach to determining project investments. This concept
entails compromise between project cost and design, incorporating local
community needs, desired outcomes, and available funding. Furthermore,
the legislature finds that the concepts and principles the department
has utilized in the safety analyst program have been effective tools to
prioritize projects and reduce project costs. Therefore, the
department shall establish a pilot project on the SR 3/Belfair Bypass
- New Alignment (300344C) to begin implementing the concept of
"right-sizing" in the highway construction program.
(19) For urban corridors that are all or partially within a
metropolitan planning organization boundary, for which the department
has not initiated environmental review, and that require an
environmental impact statement, at least one alternative must be
consistent with the goals set out in RCW 47.01.440.
(20) The department shall itemize all future requests for the
construction of buildings on a project list and submit them through the
transportation executive information system as part of the department's
2014 budget submittal. It is the intent of the legislature that new
facility construction must be transparent and not appropriated within
larger highway construction projects.
(21) $28,963,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for improvement program support activities
(095901X). $18,000,000 of this amount must be held in unallotted
status until the office of financial management certifies that the
department's 2014 supplemental budget request conforms to the terms of
subsection (20) of this section.
(((23))) (22) Any new advisory group that the department convenes
during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium must be representative of the
interests of the entire state of Washington.
(23)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the entire
connecting Washington account--state appropriation is provided solely
for the Program I projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation
Document 2013-L1, as developed June 23, 2013, and for the SR 520/148th
Avenue NE Overlake Access Ramp project and the SR 520 Regional Trail
Grade Separation at NE 40th Street project, and for the Interstate
5/Marvin Road/SR 510 Interchange project, and is subject to the
limitations in chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1957), Laws of
2013 2nd sp. sess.
(b) $100,000,000 of the connecting Washington account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the SR 509/I-5/SR 167 Freight
Corridor project (M00600R). The secretary of transportation must work
with the freight mobility strategic investment board to ensure that the
project is a priority project within the state freight mobility plan
required under the federal moving ahead for progress in the 21st
century act.
(c) $200,000 of the connecting Washington account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the study of the state route
number 162 and state route number 410 corridors (L1100068). The study
must look at state route number 162 and state route number 410 and
their relationship to state route number 167, corridor improvements to
accommodate planned growth, and the identification of multimodal
options to alleviate congestion and transit demands in eastern Pierce
county communities.
(d) $200,000 of the connecting Washington account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to study the
feasibility of added high occupancy vehicles lanes on Interstate 5
between Joint Base Lewis-McChord and South 38th Street in Tacoma
(L1100069). The study must include a cost estimate and be submitted to
the transportation committees of the legislature by January 2015.
(e) In the development of projects within the US 395/North Spokane
corridor, the associated planning staff shall review the department's
project design plans in any draft environmental impact statement for
conformance with the following legislative goals regarding the final
design for additional projects within the corridor:
(i) Minimization of the project impact on surrounding
neighborhoods, including minimizing any increases in additional traffic
volumes through such neighborhoods; and
(ii) Incorporation of the recommendations of a health impact
assessment to calculate the project's impact on air quality, carbon
emissions, and other public health issues, conducted by the Spokane
regional transportation council and the Spokane county public health
department.
(24)(a) $26,000,000 of the connecting Washington account--state
appropriation is provided solely for storm water retrofits, including
enhanced treatment retrofits, to build on and expand the department's
storm water program. In completing storm water retrofits, the
department shall use low-impact development (LID) techniques when
feasible. Advance treatment and LID storm water retrofits shall be
integrated with improvement project life-cycle, ranking, and
construction, where such retrofits geographically coincide with planned
improvement projects. To accomplish this directive, the department
must develop LID retrofit project lists and incorporate project lists
into relevant capital plans. The department must consult with the
Washington state department of ecology to certify that the retrofit
projects have high water quality and environmental benefits.
(b) The department, in consultation with the Washington state
department of ecology, shall develop comprehensive criteria to
coordinate, rate, and rank improvement projects and storm water
retrofit projects. The system must be designed to provide a funding
preference to LID retrofit projects that reduce water pollution from
existing transportation infrastructure.
(c) The department must incorporate statewide storm water retrofit
project lists into ten-year capital project plans and create a biennial
project list for the design and construction of LID storm water
retrofit projects. The department will coordinate the design and
construction of improvement and storm water retrofit projects to ensure
efficient and effective use of funds. By December 31, 2013, and
biennially thereafter, the department shall provide to the legislature
a storm water retrofit project list to maintain and enhance the
capacity of the department's storm water program and construct LID
retrofits. The department must also provide a report regarding how
much funding is allocated to improvement and storm water retrofit
projects, identifying the water quality and environmental benefits
created from the storm water projects, and summarizing how improvement
and storm water retrofit projects are coordinated and integrated.
(25) $161,000,000 of the connecting Washington account--state
appropriation and $101,400,000 of the connecting Washington account--federal appropriation are provided solely for the I-5/Columbia River
crossing project (M00200R). It is the intent of the legislature that
no amounts other than the amounts provided in this subsection be
expended for the I-5/Columbia River crossing project until the
following requirements are met: (a) The United States coast guard
approves the I-5/Columbia River crossing project's permit; and (b) C-TRAN and TriMet enter into the necessary agreement or agreements for
the ownership, operations, and maintenance of the light rail service to
be jointly provided by C-TRAN and TriMet upon the completion of the I-5/Columbia River crossing project, which agreement or agreements must
ensure that C-TRAN is not responsible for any preexisting debt,
pensions, or other obligations of TriMet and that C-TRAN only pays for
the operations and maintenance of the light rail service from
Vancouver, Washington to the Washington border.
(26) The department shall prioritize storm water retrofit projects
based on the projected benefit for compliance with the department's
national pollution discharge elimination system permit.
(27) $20,000,000 of the connecting Washington account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the purposes of removing fish
passage barriers related to the transportation system that are
identified by the department pursuant to any legal obligation.

Sec. 11 2013 c 306 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,480,000
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,503,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $580,062,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,270,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,285,000
Connecting Washington Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($698,600,000))
$847,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire
transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation and the
entire transportation partnership account appropriation are provided
solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and
amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2013-1 as developed April 23,
2013, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). However, limited
transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur
between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and
limitations in section 603 of this act.
(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor
vehicle account--state appropriation and motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities
listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2013-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed
April 23, 2013, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). It is the
intent of the legislature to direct the department to give first
priority of federal funds gained through efficiencies or the
redistribution process to the "Contingency (Unfunded) Highway
Preservation Projects" as identified in LEAP Transportation Document
2013-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed April 23, 2013, Program - Highway
Preservation Program (P). However, no additional federal funds may be
allocated to the I-5/Columbia River Crossing project (400506A).
(3) Within the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and motor
vehicle account -- federal appropriation, the department may transfer
funds between programs I and P, except for funds that are otherwise
restricted in this act.
(4) $27,278,000 of the motor vehicle account -- federal appropriation
and $1,141,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation are
provided solely for the SR 167/Puyallup River Bridge Replacement
project (316725A). This project must be completed as a design-build
project. The department must work with local jurisdictions and the
community during the environmental review process to develop
appropriate esthetic design elements, at no additional cost to the
department, and traffic management plans pertaining to this project.
The department must report to the transportation committees of the
legislature on estimated cost and/or time savings realized as a result
of using the design-build process.
(5) The department shall examine the use of electric arc furnace
slag for use as an aggregate for new roads and paving projects in high
traffic areas and report back to the legislature on its current use in
other areas of the country and any characteristics that can provide
greater wear resistance and skid resistance in new pavement
construction.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature that sufficient funds be
spent on highway bridge preservation to achieve a statewide bridge
condition in excess of ninety-seven percent fair and good.
(7) The entire connecting Washington account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the Program P projects and activities listed in
LEAP Transportation Document 2013-L1, as developed June 23, 2013, and
is subject to the limitations in chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill
No. 1957), Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.
(8) $33,300,000 of the connecting Washington account--state
appropriation is provided solely for, and is intended to continue to be
used in future biennia for the purpose of, highway preservation
activities in addition to those listed in LEAP Transportation Document
2013-L1, as developed June 23, 2013.

Sec. 12 2013 c 306 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,036,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,692,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,145,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,534,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $143,941,000
Connecting Washington Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $132,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($291,348,000))
$423,548,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire
appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and
activities as listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2013-2 ALL
PROJECTS as developed April 23, 2013, Program - Washington State
Ferries Capital Program (W).
(2) The Puget Sound capital construction account -- state
appropriation includes up to $20,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.843.
(3) $143,633,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel
account) -- state appropriation is provided solely for the acquisition of
two 144-car vessels (projects L2200038 and L2200039). The department
shall use as much already procured equipment as practicable on the 144-car vessels.
(4) $8,270,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account--federal appropriation, $3,935,000 of the Puget Sound capital
construction account--state appropriation, and $1,534,000 of the
multimodal transportation account--state appropriation are provided
solely for the Mukilteo ferry terminal (project 952515P). To the
greatest extent practicable, the department shall seek additional
federal funding for this project.
(5) $4,000,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account -- state appropriation is provided solely for emergency capital repair
costs (project 999910K). Funds may only be spent after approval by the
office of financial management.
(6) Consistent with RCW 47.60.662, which requires the Washington
state ferry system to collaborate with passenger-only ferry and transit
providers to provide service at existing terminals, the department
shall ensure that multimodal access, including for passenger-only
ferries and transit service providers, is not precluded by any future
modifications at the terminal.
(7) $3,800,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account--state appropriation is provided solely for the reservation and
communications system projects (L200041 & L200042).
(8) $4,210,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account--state appropriation is provided solely for the capital program share of
$7,259,000 in lease payments for the ferry division's headquarters
building. Consistent with the 2012 facilities oversight plan, the
department shall strive to consolidate office space in downtown Seattle
by the end of 2015. The department shall consider renewing the lease
for the ferry division's current headquarters building only if the
lease rate is reduced at least fifty percent and analysis shows that
this is the least cost and risk option for the department.
Consolidation with other divisions or state agencies, or a reduction in
leased space, must also be considered as part of any headquarters lease
renewal analysis.
(9) $21,950,000 of the total appropriation is for preservation work
on the Hyak super class vessel (project 944431D), including
installation of a power management system and more efficient propulsion
systems, that in combination are anticipated to save up to twenty
percent in fuel and reduce maintenance costs. Upon completion of this
project, the department shall provide a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature on the fuel and maintenance savings
achieved for this vessel and the potential to save additional funds
through other vessel conversions.
(10)(a) The entire connecting Washington account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Program W projects and
activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2013-L1, as developed
June 23, 2013, and is subject to the limitations in chapter
. . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1957), Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.
(b) $110,300,000 of the connecting Washington account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the purposes of constructing a
ferry boat vessel with a carrying capacity of at least one hundred
forty-four cars (0NRC017).
(c) $21,900,000 of the connecting Washington account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Mukilteo and Seattle terminal
replacement projects of the Washington state ferry system (NMUKTML and
NSTMLRE). The amount provided in this subsection represents the first
portion of a ten-year state funding plan as described in LEAP
Transportation Document 2013-L1, as developed June 23, 2013. This LEAP
transportation document identifies: (i) $119,000,000 in state funds to
be provided over ten years to complete the Mukilteo terminal
replacement project; and (ii) $278,200,000 in state funds to be
provided over ten years for substantial advancement of the Seattle
terminal replacement project, including: (A) Design work and selection
of a preferred plan; (B) replacing timber pilings with pilings
sufficient to support a selected terminal design; (C) replacing the
timber portion of the dock with a new and reconfigured steel and
concrete dock; and (D) other staging and construction work as the
amount allows.

Sec. 13 2013 c 306 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL
Essential Rail Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($861,000))
$3,061,000
Transportation Infrastructure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,582,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,156,000))
$40,156,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $333,881,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($376,480,000))
$385,680,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire
appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and
activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation
Document 2013-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed April 23, 2013, Program -Rail Capital Program (Y).
(b) Within the amounts provided in this section, $7,332,000 of the
transportation infrastructure account -- state appropriation is for low-interest loans through the freight rail investment bank program
identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in (a) of
this subsection. The department shall issue freight rail investment
bank program loans with a repayment period of no more than ten years,
and only so much interest as is necessary to recoup the department's
costs to administer the loans.
(c) Within the amounts provided in this section, $2,439,000 of the
multimodal transportation account -- state appropriation, $1,250,000 of
the transportation infrastructure account--state appropriation, and
$311,000 of the essential rail assistance account -- state appropriation
are for statewide emergent freight rail assistance projects identified
in the LEAP transportation document referenced in (a) of this
subsection.
(2) Unsuccessful 2012 freight rail assistance program grant
applicants may be awarded freight rail investment bank program loans,
if eligible. If any funds remain in the freight rail investment bank
or freight rail assistance program reserves (projects F01001A and
F01000A), or any approved grants or loans are terminated, the
department shall issue a call for projects for the freight rail
investment bank loan program and the freight rail assistance grant
program, and shall evaluate the applications in a manner consistent
with past practices as specified in section 309, chapter 367, Laws of
2011. By November 1, 2013, the department shall submit a prioritized
list of recommended projects to the office of financial management and
the transportation committees of the legislature.
(3) $314,647,000 of the multimodal transportation account--federal
appropriation and $4,867,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation are provided solely for expenditures related to
passenger high-speed rail grants. The multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation funds reflect one and one-half percent of
the total project funds, and are provided solely for expenditures that
are not eligible for federal reimbursement.
(4) As allowable under federal rail authority rules and existing
competitive bidding practices, when purchasing new train sets, the
department shall give preference to bidders that propose train sets
with characteristics and maintenance requirements most similar to those
currently owned by the department.
(5) The department shall provide quarterly reports to the office of
financial management and the transportation committees of the
legislature regarding applications that the department submits for
federal funds and the status of such applications.
(6)(a) $550,000 of the essential rail assistance account -- state
appropriation and $1,893,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of
rehabilitation and maintenance of the Palouse river and Coulee City
railroad line. The department shall complete an evaluation and
assessment of future maintenance needs on the line to ensure
appropriate levels of state investment.
(b) Expenditures from the essential rail assistance account--state
appropriation in this section may not exceed the combined total of:
(i) Revenues deposited into the essential rail assistance account
from leases and sale of property pursuant to RCW 47.76.290; and
(ii) Revenues transferred from the miscellaneous program account to
the essential rail assistance account, pursuant to RCW 47.76.360, for
the purpose of sustaining the grain train program by maintaining the
Palouse river and Coulee City railroad line.
(7) $31,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--federal
appropriation is provided solely for the purchase of two new train sets
for the state-supported intercity passenger rail service. The
department must apply for any federal waivers required to purchase the
new train sets, as allowable under existing competitive bidding
practices, and seek federal funds in addition to those available from
the high-speed rail grants.
(8)(a) $7,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for reliability and slope
stabilization projects on the Cascades passenger rail corridor
(L1100070).
(b) $2,200,000 of the essential rail assistance account--state
appropriation is provided solely for newly selected projects for the
freight rail assistance program (L1100072).
(c) The amounts provided in this subsection (8) are provided solely
for the Program Y projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation
Document 2013-L1, as developed June 23, 2013, and are subject to the
limitations in chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1957), Laws of
2013 2nd sp. sess.

Sec. 14 2013 c 306 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL
Highway Infrastructure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000
Freight Mobility Investment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,794,000
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,214,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,255,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,918,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,413,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,736,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,320,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,913,000))
$89,273,000
Pedestrian, Bicycle, and Safe Routes to School
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($92,372,000))
$188,732,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire
appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and
activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation
Document 2013-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed April 23, 2013, Program -Local Programs (Z).
(2) With each department budget submittal, the department shall
provide an update on the status of the repayment of the twenty million
dollars of unobligated federal funds authority advanced by the
department in September 2010 to the city of Tacoma for the Murray
Morgan/11th Street bridge project. The department may negotiate with
the city of Tacoma an agreement for repayment of the funds over a
period of up to twenty-five years at terms agreed upon by the
department and the city. The funds previously advanced by the
department to the city are not to be considered a general obligation of
the city but instead an obligation payable from identified revenues set
aside for the repayment of the funds.
(3) The amounts identified in the LEAP transportation document
referenced under subsection (1) of this section for pedestrian
safety/safe routes to school are as follows:
(a) $12,160,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation, $6,824,000 of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation, and $62,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation are provided solely for pedestrian and bicycle safety
program projects.
(b) $11,700,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation, $5,200,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation, and $6,750,000 of the highway safety account--state
appropriation are provided solely for newly selected safe routes to
school projects, and $3,400,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation and $2,055,000 of the highway safety account--state
appropriation are reappropriated for safe routes to school projects
selected in the previous biennia. The amount provided for new projects
is consistent with federal funding levels from the 2011-2013 omnibus
transportation appropriations act and the intent of the fee increases
in chapter 74, Laws of 2012 and chapter 80, Laws of 2012. ((The motor
vehicle account--state appropriation in this subsection (3)(b) is the
amount made available by the repeal of the deduction from motor vehicle
fuel tax liability for handling losses of motor vehicle fuel, as
identified in chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 2041), Laws of
2013 (handling losses of motor vehicle fuel). If chapter . . .
(Substitute House Bill No. 2041), Laws of 2013 is not enacted by June
30, 2013, the motor vehicle account--state appropriation in this
subsection (3)(b) lapses.))
(4) $84,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation,
$3,250,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation,
$2,450,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation,
$11,794,000 of the freight mobility investment account--state
appropriation, $9,736,000 of the freight mobility multimodal account--state appropriation, and $1,320,000 of the freight mobility multimodal
account--private/local appropriation are provided solely for the
projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP
Transportation Document 2013-B as developed April 23, 2013. If chapter
. . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1256), Laws of 2013 is enacted by June
30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection lapse.
(5) The department may enter into contracts and make expenditures
for projects on behalf of and selected by the freight mobility
strategic investment board from the amounts provided in section 301 of
this act.
(6) The department shall submit a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2013, and December 1,
2014, on the status of projects funded as part of the pedestrian
safety/safe routes to school grant program (0LP600P). The report must
include, but is not limited to, a list of projects selected and a brief
description of each project's status.
(7) $50,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the installation of a guard rail on Deer Harbor
Road in San Juan county (L2220054).
(8) $16,800,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to local governments under
the complete streets grant program (L1100073). Of the amounts provided
in this subsection (8), $3,300,000 is provided solely for the Mountlake
Terrace main street project.
(9)(a) $21,000,000 of the pedestrian, bicycle, and safe routes to
school account--state appropriation is provided solely for, and is
intended to continue to be used in future biennia for the purpose of,
newly selected projects for the pedestrian and bicycle safety program
(L1100074). The amount provided in this subsection (9)(a) is for the
projects listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2013-L3, as developed
June 23, 2013, Pedestrian and Bicycle Safety Projects.
(b) The amount appropriated in this subsection from the pedestrian,
bicycle, and safe routes to school account--state appropriation for
newly selected pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects is to be
considered in addition to and is not intended to supplant the level of
funding for the programs as was enacted in chapter 86, Laws of 2012.
(c) In addition to the amount provided in this subsection for newly
selected pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects, it is the
intent of the legislature that the $5,200,000 of the motor vehicle
account--state appropriation for newly selected safe routes to school
projects in chapter 306, Laws of 2013 continue to be used in future
biennia for the purpose of newly selected safe routes to school
projects.
(10) The amounts provided in subsections (8) and (9) of this
section are provided solely for the Program Z projects and activities
listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2013-L1, as developed June 23,
2013, and are subject to the limitations in chapter . . . (Substitute
House Bill No. 1957), Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.
(11) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Northup way connection to the
SR 520 trail project.
(12) $150,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the SR 99/SR 516 missing sidewalk
project.
(13) $1,115,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the south 228th street roadway
project.
(14) $1,437,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Pacific highway east (SR 99)
pedestrian and bicycle safety improvements project.
(15) $1,197,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the James street bicycle corridor
project.
(16) $176,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Kent regional trails connector
project.
(17) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the lake-to-sound trail, segment
B construction project.
(18) $1,297,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the cross Kirkland corridor
project.
(19) $735,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the 112th avenue southeast
pedestrian improvements project.
(20) $600,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the 6th avenue south (multi-use
trail) Spokane street to E-3 busway project.
(21) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the center city cycle track
project.
(22) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Elliott Bay trail emergency
repair project.
(23) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Holgate bike and stairway
safety improvement project.
(24) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Lake City way pedestrian
safety improvements project.
(25) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Rainier avenue pedestrian
safety improvements project.
(26) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the west Seattle bridge trail
upgrades, crossing, safety, surfacing project.
(27) $635,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Westlake cycle track project.
(28) $600,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the 1st avenue northeast and 6th
avenue northeast Shoreline project.
(29) $638,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the pedestrian-bicycle Snoqualmie
river bridge project.
(30) $195,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Boeing access road corridor
study and Ryan way improvements project.
(31) $300,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the SR 900/68th avenue south
sidewalk improvements project.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
Sec. 15 2013 c 306 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT
TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,406,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
State Route Number 520 Corridor Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,866,000
Highway Bond Retirement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,074,580,000))
$1,122,374,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,824,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,267,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,825,000
Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,050,000
Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,982,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,958,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Connecting Washington Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,507,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,282,210,000))
$1,333,511,000

Sec. 16 2013 c 306 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL
AGENT CHARGES
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,156,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
State Route Number 520 Corridor Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $531,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $218,000
Connecting Washington Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $389,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,955,000))
$2,344,000

Sec. 17 2013 c 306 s 408 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER: FOR DISTRIBUTION TO TRANSIT ENTITIES
Public Transportation Grant Program Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000,000

The appropriations in this section ((is)) are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(1) One-eighth of the appropriation in this section must be
distributed quarterly to transit authorities according to the
distribution formula in subsection (2) of this section. Funding must
be used for operations.
(2) Of the amounts provided in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) One-third must be distributed based on vehicle miles of service
provided;
(b) One-third must be distributed based on the number of vehicle
hours of service provided; and
(c) One-third must be distributed based on the number of passenger
trips.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Transit authorities" has the same meaning as in RCW
9.91.025(2)(c).
(b) "Vehicle miles of service," "vehicle hours of service," and
"passenger trips" are transit service metrics as reported by the public
transportation program of the department of transportation in the
annual report required in RCW 35.58.2796 for calendar year 2011.

MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If neither chapter . . . (Substitute House
Bill No. 1954), Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. nor chapter . . . (Senate
Bill No. 5920), Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. is enacted by July 31, 2013,
the appropriations in this act are null and void.

--- END ---