BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The governing board of a metropolitan
park district may by resolution, as authorized and approved by the
voters, for district purposes authorized by law, fix and impose a
benefit charge on real property that is located within the district on
the date specified and which have received or will receive the benefits
provided by the district, to be paid by the owners of the properties.
The aggregate amount of these benefit charges in any one year may not
exceed an amount equal to the maximum amount that could be collected
under RCW 35.61.210, not subject to the limitations in RCW 84.52.043 or
84.52.050, in any one year. It is the duty of the county legislative
authority or authorities of the county or counties in which the
metropolitan park district is located to make any necessary adjustments
on at least an annual basis to assure compliance with this limitation
and to immediately notify the governing board of a district of any
changes thereof.
(2) A benefit charge imposed must be reasonably proportioned to the
measurable benefits to property resulting from the proximity of parks,
parkways, boulevards, and recreational facilities maintained by the
district. Any method that reasonably apportions the benefit charges to
the actual benefits resulting from the degree of benefit, which may
include but is not limited to the distance from regularly maintained
parks, parkways, boulevards, and recreational facilities, may be
specified in the resolution and is subject to contest on the grounds of
unreasonable or capricious action or action in excess of the measurable
benefits to the property resulting from the district. The governing
board of a district may determine that certain properties or types or
classes of properties are not receiving measurable benefits based on
criteria they establish by resolution.
(3) For administrative purposes, the benefit charge imposed on any
individual property may be compiled into a single charge, provided that
the district, upon request of the property owner, provide an itemized
list of charges for each measurable benefit included in the charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 All property not assessed and subjected to
ad valorem taxation under this title is exempt from the benefit charge
imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The resolution establishing benefit
charges as specified in section 1 of this act must specify, by legal
geographical areas or other specific designations, the charge to apply
to each property by location, type, or other designation, or other
information that is necessary to the proper computation of the benefit
charge to be charged to each property owner subject to the resolution.
(2) The county assessor of each county in which the metropolitan
park district is located must determine and identify the property that
is subject to a benefit charge in each district and must furnish and
deliver to the county treasurer of that county a listing of the
properties with information describing the location, legal description,
and address of the person to whom the statement of benefit charges is
to be mailed, the name of the owner, and the value of the property,
together with the benefit charge to apply to each.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Each metropolitan park district must
contract, prior to the imposition of a benefit charge, for the
administration and collection of the benefit charge by each county
treasurer, who must deduct a percentage, as provided by contract to
reimburse the county for expenses incurred by the county assessor and
county treasurer in the administration of the resolution and this
chapter. The county treasurer must make distributions each year, as
the charges are collected, in the amount of the benefit charges imposed
on behalf of each district, less the deduction provided for in the
contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Notwithstanding any other provision in
this chapter to the contrary, any benefit charge authorized by this
chapter is not effective unless a proposition to impose the benefit
charge is approved by a majority of the voters of the metropolitan park
district voting at a general election or at a special election called
by the district for that purpose, held within the district. An
election held under this section must be held not more than twelve
months prior to the date on which the first charge is to be assessed.
A benefit charge approved at an election expires in six years or fewer
as authorized by the voters, unless subsequently reapproved by the
voters.
(2) The ballot must be submitted so as to enable the voters
favoring the authorization of a metropolitan park district benefit
charge to vote "Yes" and those opposed to vote "No." The ballot
question is as follows:

"Shall the metropolitan park district be authorized to impose
benefit charges each year for . . . . (insert number of years
not to exceed six) years, not to exceed an amount equal to the
maximum amount that could be collected under RCW 35.61.210, and
be prohibited from imposing an additional property tax under
RCW 84.52.120.

Yes . . . . . . . . . . . . □

No . . . . . . . . . . . . □ "

(3) Districts renewing the benefit charge may elect to use the
following alternative ballot:

"Shall the metropolitan park district be authorized to continue
voter-authorized benefit charges each year for . . . . (insert

number of years not to exceed six) years and not
to exceed an amount equal to the maximum amount
that could be collected under RCW 35.61.210?

Yes . . . . . . . . . . . . □

No . . . . . . . . . . . . □ "

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Not fewer than ten days nor more than
six months before the election at which the proposition to impose the
benefit charge is submitted as provided in this chapter, the governing
board of the metropolitan park district must hold a public hearing
specifically setting forth its proposal to impose benefit charges for
the support of its legally authorized activities that will maintain or
improve the access to parks, parkways, boulevards, and recreational
facilities. A report of the public hearing must be filed with the
county treasurer of each county in which the property is located and be
available for public inspection.
(2) Prior to November 15th of each year the governing board of the
district must hold a public hearing to review and establish the
metropolitan park district benefit charges for the subsequent year.
(3) All resolutions imposing or changing the benefit charges must
be filed with the county treasurer or treasurers of each county in
which the property is located, together with the record of each public
hearing, before November 30th immediately preceding the year in which
the benefit charges are to be collected on behalf of the district.
(4) After the benefit charges have been established, the owners of
the property subject to the charge must be notified of the amount of
the charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 After notice has been given to the property
owners of the amount of the benefit charge, the governing board of a
metropolitan park district imposing a benefit charge under this chapter
must form a review board for at least a two-week period and must, upon
complaint in writing of an aggrieved party owning property in the
district, reduce the charge of a person who, in their opinion, has been
charged too large a sum, to a sum or amount as they believe to be the
true, fair, and just amount.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A person who is receiving the exemption
contained in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 is exempt from any legal
obligation to pay a portion of the benefit charge imposed under this
chapter as follows:
(1) A person who meets the income limitation contained in RCW
84.36.381(5)(a) and does not meet the income limitation contained in
RCW 84.36.381(5)(b) (i) or (ii) is exempt from twenty-five percent of
the charge;
(2) A person who meets the income limitation contained in RCW
84.36.381(5)(b)(i) is exempt from fifty percent of the charge; and
(3) A person who meets the income limitation contained in RCW
84.36.381(5)(b)(ii) is exempt from seventy-five percent of the charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 84 RCW.

--- END ---