BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the adoption and
implementation of Initiative No. 1183 has had certain unanticipated
adverse consequences for former contract store owners who elected to
continue operations as private liquor store owners. Many of those
former contract store owners believe they were misled by the liquor
control board with respect to the applicability of the seventeen
percent retailer license issuance fee established by the initiative in
part because RCW 66.24.630(1) exempts such stores from the twenty-four
liter limit applicable to retail sales to restaurants.
The legislature further finds that, to mitigate the hardships
suffered by former contract store owners, to support small business
owners in less populous regions of the state, in partial satisfaction
of claims that former contract store owners have asserted or may assert
against the state based on alleged misrepresentations by the liquor
control board, it is appropriate to modify certain of the rights and
obligations of former contract store owners.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.630 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 401 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There is a spirits retail license to: Sell spirits in original
containers to consumers for consumption off the licensed premises and
to permit holders; sell spirits in original containers to retailers
licensed to sell spirits for consumption on the premises, for resale at
their licensed premises according to the terms of their licenses,
although no single sale may exceed twenty-four liters, unless the sale
is by a licensee that was a contract liquor store manager of a contract
liquor store at the location of its spirits retail licensed premises
from which it makes such sales; and export spirits.
(2) For the purposes of this title, a spirits retail license is a
retail license, and a sale by a spirits retailer is a retail sale only
if not for resale. Nothing in this title authorizes sales by on-sale
licensees to other retail licensees. The board must establish by rule
an obligation of on-sale spirits retailers to:
(a) Maintain a schedule by stock-keeping unit of all their
purchases of spirits from spirits retail licensees, indicating the
identity of the seller and the quantities purchased; and
(b) Provide, not more frequently than quarterly, a report for each
scheduled item containing the identity of the purchasing on-premise
licensee and the quantities of that scheduled item purchased since any
preceding report to:
(i) A distributor authorized by the distiller to distribute a
scheduled item in the on-sale licensee's geographic area; or
(ii) A distiller acting as distributor of the scheduled item in the
area.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this subsection, the
board may issue spirits retail licenses only for premises comprising at
least ten thousand square feet of fully enclosed retail space within a
single structure, including storerooms and other interior auxiliary
areas but excluding covered or fenced exterior areas, whether or not
attached to the structure, and only to applicants that the board
determines will maintain systems for inventory management, employee
training, employee supervision, and physical security of the product
substantially as effective as those of stores currently operated by the
board with respect to preventing sales to or pilferage by underage or
inebriated persons.
(b) License issuances and renewals are subject to RCW 66.24.010 and
the regulations promulgated thereunder, including without limitation
rights of cities, towns, county legislative authorities, the public,
churches, schools, and public institutions to object to or prevent
issuance of local liquor licenses. However, existing grocery premises
licensed to sell beer and/or wine are deemed to be premises "now
licensed" under RCW 66.24.010(9)(a) for the purpose of processing
applications for spirits retail licenses.
(c) The board may not deny a spirits retail license to an otherwise
qualified contract liquor store at its contract location or to the
holder of former state liquor store operating rights sold at auction
under RCW 66.24.620 on the grounds of location, nature, or size of the
premises to be licensed. The board may not deny a spirits retail
license to applicants that are not contract liquor stores or operating
rights holders on the grounds of the size of the premises to be
licensed, if such applicant is otherwise qualified and the board
determines that:
(i) There is no retail spirits license holder in the trade area
that the applicant proposes to serve;
(ii) The applicant meets, or upon licensure will meet, the
operational requirements established by the board by rule; and
(iii) The licensee has not committed more than one public safety
violation within the three years preceding application.
(d) A retailer authorized to sell spirits for consumption on or off
the licensed premises may accept delivery of spirits at its licensed
premises or at one or more warehouse facilities registered with the
board, which facilities may also warehouse and distribute nonliquor
items, and from which the retailer may deliver to its own licensed
premises and, pursuant to sales permitted under subsection (1) of this
section:
(i) To other retailer premises licensed to sell spirits for
consumption on the licensed premises;
(ii) To other registered facilities; or
(iii) To lawful purchasers outside the state. The facilities may
be registered and utilized by associations, cooperatives, or comparable
groups of retailers, including at least one retailer licensed to sell
spirits.
(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) and (c) of this
subsection, each spirits retail licensee must pay to the board, for
deposit into the liquor revolving fund, a license issuance fee
equivalent to seventeen percent of all spirits sales revenues under the
license, exclusive of taxes collected by the licensee and of sales of
items on which a license fee payable under this section has otherwise
been incurred. The board must establish rules setting forth the timing
of such payments and reporting of sales dollar volume by the licensee,
with payments required quarterly in arrears. The first payment is due
October 1, 2012.
(b) This subsection (4) does not apply to craft distilleries.
(c) This subsection (4) does not apply to a spirits retail licensee
that was a contract liquor store manager with respect to sales from the
location of its spirits retail licensed premises to retailers licensed
to sell spirits for consumption on the premises, for resale at their
licensed premises according to the terms of their licenses. The
exemption created by this subsection (4)(c) attaches to any successor,
by purchase or otherwise, to the spirits retail licensee, except that
it will not attach to any such successor that owns, directly or
indirectly, any interest in a spirits retail licensee that is not
derived directly from a former contract liquor store manager.
(5) In addition to the payment required under subsection (4) of
this section, each licensee must pay an annual license renewal fee of
one hundred sixty-six dollars. The board must periodically review and
adjust the renewal fee as may be required to maintain it as comparable
to annual license renewal fees for licenses to sell beer and wine not
for consumption on the licensed premises. If required by law at the
time, any increase of the annual renewal fee becomes effective only
upon ratification by the legislature.
(6) As a condition to receiving and renewing a retail spirits
license the licensee must provide training as prescribed by the board
by rule for individuals who sell spirits or who manage others who sell
spirits regarding compliance with laws and regulations regarding sale
of spirits, including without limitation the prohibitions against sale
of spirits to individuals who are underage or visibly intoxicated. The
training must be provided before the individual first engages in the
sale of spirits and must be renewed at least every five years. The
licensee must maintain records documenting the nature and frequency of
the training provided. An employee training program is presumptively
sufficient if it incorporates a "responsible vendor program"
promulgated by the board.
(7) The maximum penalties prescribed by the board in WAC 314-29-020
through 314-29-040 relating to fines and suspensions are doubled for
violations relating to the sale of spirits by retail spirits licensees.
(8)(a) The board must promulgate regulations concerning the
adoption and administration of a compliance training program for
spirits retail licensees, to be known as a "responsible vendor
program," to reduce underage drinking, encourage licensees to adopt
specific best practices to prevent sales to minors, and provide
licensees with an incentive to give their employees ongoing training in
responsible alcohol sales and service.
(b) Licensees who join the responsible vendor program under this
section and maintain all of the program's requirements are not subject
to the doubling of penalties provided in this section for a single
violation in any period of twelve calendar months.
(c) The responsible vendor program must be free, voluntary, and
self-monitoring.
(d) To participate in the responsible vendor program, licensees
must submit an application form to the board. If the application
establishes that the licensee meets the qualifications to join the
program, the board must send the licensee a membership certificate.
(e) A licensee participating in the responsible vendor program must
at a minimum:
(i) Provide ongoing training to employees;
(ii) Accept only certain forms of identification for alcohol sales;
(iii) Adopt policies on alcohol sales and checking identification;
(iv) Post specific signs in the business; and
(v) Keep records verifying compliance with the program's
requirements.

--- END ---