BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Master real estate plan" or "plan" means a plan of a public
agency for the timely use or disposal of properties that were obtained
by foreclosure.
(2) "Public agency" means: (a) Any state board, commission,
committee, department, educational institution, or other state agency
created by or pursuant to statute, other than courts and the
legislature; and (b) any county, city, school district, special purpose
district, or other municipal corporation or political subdivision of
the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By December 31, 2013, each public agency
that owns property that was obtained by foreclosure must develop a list
of these properties by parcel number.
(2)(a) By July 1, 2014, the public agencies subject to subsection
(1) of this section must develop, adopt, and implement a master real
estate plan to use or dispose of the properties on the list required by
subsection (1) of this section. For each property, the plan must:
(i) Describe the use or application of the property as of the date
of the list;
(ii) Include the dollar amount of the property tax assessments for
the three years prior to foreclosure; and
(iii) Include, if the property is to be retained by the public
entity, a detailed description of what the property is to be used for
and when it is to be used.
(b) Unless the plan provides a specific use for a property that is
consistent with the authority and objectives of the public agency, the
plan may not allow for a property to be owned by the public agency for
five years beyond the adoption of the plan for the specified property,
or five years beyond the date the foreclosed property becomes property
of the public agency, whichever is later.
(3) Public agencies that acquire property through foreclosure after
the initial adoption of the plan must add each property to the plan and
comply with subsection (2) of this section within two years of
acquisition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The master real estate plan required by
section 2 of this act must provide a specific use for each property
that is consistent with the authority and objectives of the public
agency. If the master plan provisions for a specific property are not
implemented in accordance with the requirements of the plan for that
property, the authority of the public agency to retain ownership of the
property is extinguished five years after the adoption of the plan, or
five years after the date the foreclosed property becomes property of
the public agency, whichever is later.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Upon extinguishment of the authority to
retain ownership of a property under section 3 of this act, the public
agency must take all appropriate actions to expeditiously dispose of
the property to a market-rate purchaser. In disposing of the property,
priority must be given to purchasers who will return the property to
the tax rolls.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 42 RCW.

--- END ---