BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.52.220 and 2005 c 153 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No primary may be held for any single position in any ((city,
town, district, or district court, as required by RCW 29A.52.210))
nonpartisan office, if, after the last day allowed for candidates to
withdraw, there are no more than two candidates filed for the position.
The county auditor shall, as soon as possible, notify all the
candidates so affected that the office for which they filed will not
appear on the primary ballot.
(2) No primary may be held for nonpartisan offices in any first-class city if the city:
(a) Is a qualifying city that has been certified to participate in
the pilot project authorized by RCW 29A.53.020; and
(b) Is conducting an election using the instant runoff voting
method for the pilot project authorized by RCW 29A.53.020.
(c) This subsection (2) expires July 1, 2013.
(3) No primary may be held for the office of commissioner of a park
and recreation district or for the office of cemetery district
commissioner.
(4) Names of candidates for offices that do not appear on the
primary ballot shall be printed upon the general election ballot in the
manner specified by RCW 29A.36.131.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.72.010 and 2003 c 111 s 1802 are each amended to
read as follows:
If any legal voter of the state, either individually or on behalf
of an organization, desires to petition the legislature to enact a
proposed measure, or submit a proposed initiative measure to the
people, or order that a referendum of all or part of any act, bill, or
law, passed by the legislature be submitted to the people, he or she
shall file with the secretary of state:
(1) A legible copy of the measure proposed, or the act or part of
such act on which a referendum is desired((, accompanied by an));
(2) A signed affidavit, or electronic submission, that the sponsor
is a ((legal)) registered voter; and
(3) A filing fee prescribed under RCW 43.07.120.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.72.070 and 2003 c 111 s 1808 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the filing of ((the)) a ballot title and summary for a state
initiative or referendum measure in the office of secretary of state,
the secretary of state shall notify ((by telephone and by mail, and, if
requested, by other electronic means,)) the person proposing the
measure, ((the prime sponsor of a referendum bill or alternative to an
initiative to the legislature, the chief clerk of the house of
representatives, the secretary of the senate,)) and any other
individuals who have made written request for such notification of the
exact language of the ballot title and summary.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.72.090 and 2003 c 111 s 1810 are each amended to
read as follows:
When the ballot title and summary are finally established, the
secretary of state shall file the instrument establishing it with the
proposed measure and transmit a copy thereof ((by mail)) to the person
proposing the measure, ((the chief clerk of the house of
representatives, the secretary of the senate,)) and to any other
individuals who have made written request for such notification.
Thereafter such ballot title shall be the title of the measure in all
petitions, ballots, and other proceedings in relation thereto. The
summary shall appear on all petitions directly following the ballot
title.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.135.041 and 2010 c 4 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) After July 1, 2011, if legislative action raising taxes as
defined by RCW 43.135.035 is blocked from a public vote or is not
referred to the people by a referendum petition found to be sufficient
under RCW 29A.72.250, a measure for an advisory vote of the people is
required and shall be placed on the next general election ballot under
chapter 1, Laws of 2008.
(b) If legislative action raising taxes enacted after July 1, 2011,
involves more than one revenue source, each tax being increased shall
be subject to a separate measure for an advisory vote of the people
under the requirements of chapter 1, Laws of 2008.
(2) No later than the first of ((August)) July, the attorney
general will send written notice to the secretary of state of any tax
increase that is subject to an advisory vote of the people, under the
provisions and exceptions provided by chapter 1, Laws of 2008. Within
five days of receiving such written notice from the attorney general,
the secretary of state will assign a serial number for a measure for an
advisory vote of the people and transmit one copy of the measure
bearing its serial number to the attorney general as required by RCW
29A.72.040, for any tax increase identified by the attorney general as
needing an advisory vote of the people for that year's general election
ballot. Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays are not counted in
calculating the time limits in this subsection.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "blocked from a public vote"
includes adding an emergency clause to a bill increasing taxes, bonding
or contractually obligating taxes, or otherwise preventing a referendum
on a bill increasing taxes.
(4) If legislative action raising taxes is referred to the people
by the legislature or is included in an initiative to the people found
to be sufficient under RCW 29A.72.250, then the tax increase is exempt
from an advisory vote of the people under chapter 1, Laws of 2008.

--- END ---