BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.210 and 2006 c 265 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of
fire protection, shall have the power and it shall be his or her duty:
(1) In consultation with the director and with the advice and
assistance of persons representative of the various type agencies to be
licensed, to adopt recognized minimum standard requirements pertaining
to each category of agency established pursuant to this chapter
necessary to protect all persons residing therein from fire hazards;
(2) To adopt licensing minimum standard requirements to allow
children who attend classes in a school building during school hours to
remain in the same building to participate in before-school or after-school programs;
(3) To make or cause to be made such inspections and investigations
of agencies as he or she deems necessary;
(((3))) (4) To make a periodic review of requirements under RCW
43.215.200(5) and to adopt necessary changes after consultation as
required in subsection (1) of this section;
(((4))) (5) To issue to applicants for licenses under this chapter
who comply with the requirements, a certificate of compliance, a copy
of which shall be presented to the department before a license shall be
issued, except that an initial license may be issued as provided in RCW
43.215.280.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The chief of the Washington state patrol,
through the director of fire protection, shall have the power and it
shall be his or her duty to adopt licensing minimum standard
requirements for before-school and after-school programs in existing
buildings approved by the state fire marshal.

--- END ---