BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.155 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to assist local governments, the board:
(a) Must manage the public works assistance account in such a way
as to ensure its sustainability;
(b) Must execute contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds
from the public works assistance account for projects approved for
funding by the board;
(c) May approve public works projects for financial assistance
under the following programs:
(i) Construction;
(ii) Preconstruction;
(iii) Capital facilities planning;
(iv) Emergency;
(v) Energy or water efficiency;
(vi) Water system acquisition and rehabilitation as created by RCW
70.119A.190; and
(vii) Any other program authorized by the legislature;
(d) Must, before November 1st of each year, develop and submit to
the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives a ranked list of qualified public works projects which
have been evaluated by the board and are recommended for funding by the
legislature. The board must establish the ranked list based, at a
minimum, on the factors provided in section 2 of this act. The maximum
amount of funding that the board may recommend for any one project is
ten million dollars. For each project on the ranked list, as well as
for eligible projects not recommended for funding, the board must
document the numerical ranking that was assigned;
(e) May not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds
from the public works assistance account before the legislature has
appropriated funds for a specific list of public works projects. The
legislature may remove projects from the ranked list recommended by the
board. The legislature may not change the ranked order of the projects
recommended for funding by the board;
(f) May provide grants for water system acquisition and
rehabilitation projects;
(g) May require such terms and conditions and may charge such rates
of interest on its loans as it deems necessary or convenient to carry
out the purposes of this chapter. Money received from local
governments in repayment of loans made under this section must be paid
into the public works assistance account for uses consistent with this
chapter;
(h) May not refinance existing debt or financial obligations of
local governments, except for short-term debt associated with
construction projects approved by the board or other cases as defined
in rule by the board; and
(i) Must provide technical assistance as defined in RCW 43.155.020.
(2) Subsection (1)(d) and (e) of this section do not apply to
financial assistance provided through the preconstruction, capital
facilities planning, emergency, energy or water efficiency programs,
water system acquisition and rehabilitation, or any other programs
authorized by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.155 RCW
to read as follows:
The intent of the project selection process is to promote state
policy objectives as identified in this chapter and to maximize the
value of projects financed under this chapter. The board must develop
a process for numerically ranking the applications submitted by local
governments. The board must consider, at a minimum and in any order,
the following factors in assigning a numerical ranking to a project:
(1) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of many people;
(2) The extent to which the project leverages nonstate funds;
(3) The extent to which the project is ready to proceed to
construction;
(4) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment,
compared to the average state unemployment;
(5) Whether the project promotes the sustainable use of resources
and environmental quality;
(6) Whether the project consolidates or regionalizes systems;
(7) Whether the project encourages economic development through
mixed-use and mixed-income development consistent with chapter 36.70A
RCW;
(8) Whether the system is being well-managed in the present and for
long-term sustainability;
(9) Achieving equitable distribution of funds by geography and
population;
(10) The extent to which the project meets state policy objectives
identified in this chapter; and
(11) Other criteria that the board considers necessary to achieve
the purposes of this chapter.

--- END ---