BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.06.280 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 419 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury,
designated as the "personnel service fund," to be used by the office of
financial management ((and the department of enterprise services)) as
a revolving fund for the payment of salaries, wages, and operations
required for the administration of the provisions of this chapter,
applicable provisions of chapter 41.04 RCW, and chapter 41.60 RCW. An
amount not to exceed one and one-half percent of the salaries and wages
for all positions in the classified service in each of the agencies
subject to this chapter, except the institutions of higher education,
shall be charged to the operations appropriations of each agency and
credited to the personnel service fund as the allotments are approved
pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW. Subject to the above limitations, the
amount shall be charged against the allotments pro rata, at a rate to
be fixed by the director from time to time which, together with income
derived from services rendered under RCW 41.06.080, will provide the
office of financial management ((and the department of enterprise
services)) with funds to meet its anticipated expenditures during the
allotment period, including the training requirements in RCW 41.06.500
and 41.06.530.
The director shall fix the terms and charges for services rendered
by ((the department of enterprise services and)) the office of
financial management pursuant to RCW 41.06.080, which amounts shall be
credited to the personnel service fund and charged against the proper
fund or appropriation of the recipient of such services on a monthly
basis. Payment for services so rendered under RCW 41.06.080 shall be
made on a monthly basis to the state treasurer and deposited in the
personnel service fund.
Moneys from the personnel service fund shall be disbursed by the
state treasurer by warrants on vouchers duly authorized by the office
of financial management ((and the department of enterprise services)).

Sec. 2 RCW 43.19.025 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 202 are each
amended to read as follows:
The enterprise services account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer and shall be used for the operations of all enterprise
activities ((previously budgeted and accounted for in the following
internal service funds: The motor transport account, the enterprise
services management fund, the enterprise services facilities and
services revolving fund, the central stores revolving fund, the surplus
property purchase revolving fund, and the energy efficiency services
account)) conducted by the department, except information technology
services. All receipts from public printing must be deposited into the
account. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 43.19.730 (Public printing revolving
account) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 307 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Any residual balance of funds remaining in
the public printing revolving account eliminated by section 3 of this
act on the effective date of this section shall be transferred to the
enterprise services account.

--- END ---