BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.120 and 2012 c 80 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant for a new or renewed driver's license must
successfully pass a driver licensing examination to qualify for a
driver's license. The department must ensure that examinations are
given at places and times reasonably available to the people of this
state. If the department does not administer driver licensing
examinations as a routine part of its licensing services within a
department region because adequate testing sites are provided by driver
training schools or school districts within that region, the department
shall, at a minimum, administer driver licensing examinations by
appointment to applicants eighteen years of age and older in at least
one licensing office within that region.
(1) Waiver. The department may waive:
(a) All or any part of the examination of any person applying for
the renewal of a driver's license unless the department determines that
the applicant is not qualified to hold a driver's license under this
title; or
(b) All or any part of the examination involving operating a motor
vehicle if the applicant:
(i) Surrenders a valid driver's license issued by the person's
previous home state; or
(ii) Provides for verification a valid driver's license issued by
a foreign driver licensing jurisdiction with which the department has
an informal agreement under RCW 46.20.125; and
(iii) Is otherwise qualified to be licensed.
(2) Fee. Except as otherwise provided in this section, each
applicant for a new license must pay an examination fee of thirty-five
dollars.
(a) The examination fee is in addition to the fee charged for
issuance of the license.
(b) "New license" means a license issued to a driver:
(i) Who has not been previously licensed in this state; or
(ii) Whose last previous Washington license has been expired for
more than six years.
(3) An application for driver's license renewal may be submitted by
means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; or
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her license by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired.
(4) A person whose license expired or will expire while he or she
is living outside the state, may:
(a) Apply to the department to extend the validity of his or her
license for no more than twelve months. If the person establishes to
the department's satisfaction that he or she is unable to return to
Washington before the date his or her license expires, the department
shall extend the person's license. The department may grant
consecutive extensions, but in no event may the cumulative total of
extensions exceed twelve months. An extension granted under this
section does not change the expiration date of the license for purposes
of RCW 46.20.181. The department shall charge a fee of five dollars
for each license extension;
(b) Apply to the department to renew his or her license by mail or,
if permitted by rule of the department, by electronic commerce even if
subsection (3)(b) of this section would not otherwise allow renewal by
that means. If the person establishes to the department's satisfaction
that he or she is unable to return to Washington within twelve months
of the date that his or her license expires, the department shall renew
the person's license by mail or, if permitted by rule of the
department, by electronic commerce.
(5) If a qualified person submits an application for renewal under
subsection (3)(b) or (4)(b) of this section, he or she is not required
to pass an examination nor provide an updated photograph. A license
renewed by mail or by electronic commerce that does not include a
photograph of the licensee must be labeled "not valid for
identification purposes."
(6) Driver training schools licensed by the department under
chapter 46.82 RCW may administer the portions of the driver licensing
examination that test the applicant's knowledge of traffic laws and
ability to safely operate a motor vehicle.
(7) School districts that offer a traffic safety education program
under chapter 28A.220 RCW may administer the portions of the driver
licensing examination that test the applicant's knowledge of traffic
laws and ability to safely operate a motor vehicle.
(8) An applicant that has completed or will complete the portions
of the driver licensing examination that test the applicant's knowledge
of traffic laws and ability to safely operate a motor vehicle under
subsection (6) or (7) of this section must pay a fee of five dollars
for the vision test and the other portions of the driver licensing
examination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---