BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.70.020 and 2005 c 297 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Employers in this state who are taxable under chapter 82.04 or
82.16 RCW and provide financial incentives to their own or other
employees for ride sharing, for using public transportation, for using
car sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting before July 1,
((2013)) 2017, are allowed a credit against taxes payable under
chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW for amounts paid to or on behalf of
employees for ride sharing in vehicles carrying two or more persons,
for using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using
nonmotorized commuting, not to exceed sixty dollars per employee per
fiscal year.
(2) Property managers who are taxable under chapter 82.04 or 82.16
RCW and provide financial incentives to persons employed at a worksite
in this state managed by the property manager for ride sharing, for
using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using
nonmotorized commuting before July 1, ((2013)) 2017, are allowed a
credit against taxes payable under chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW for
amounts paid to or on behalf of these persons for ride sharing in
vehicles carrying two or more persons, for using public transportation,
for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting, not to
exceed sixty dollars per person per fiscal year.
(3) The credit under this section is equal to the amount paid to or
on behalf of each employee multiplied by fifty percent, but may not
exceed sixty dollars per employee per fiscal year. No refunds may be
granted for credits under this section.
(4) A person may not receive credit under this section for amounts
paid to or on behalf of the same employee under both chapters 82.04 and
82.16 RCW.
(5) A person may not take a credit under this section for amounts
claimed for credit by other persons.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.70.040 and 2005 c 297 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall keep a running total of all credits
allowed under RCW 82.70.020 during each fiscal year. The department
shall not allow any credits that would cause the total amount allowed
to exceed two million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars in any
fiscal year. This limitation includes any deferred credits carried
forward under subsection (2)(b)(i) of this section from prior years.
(b) If the total amount of credit applied for by all applicants in
any year exceeds the limit in this subsection, the department shall
ratably reduce the amount of credit allowed for all applicants so that
the limit in this subsection is not exceeded. If a credit is reduced
under this subsection, the amount of the reduction may not be carried
forward and claimed in subsequent fiscal years.
(2)(a) Tax credits under RCW 82.70.020 may not be claimed in excess
of the amount of tax otherwise due under chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW.
(b)(i) Through June 30, 2005, a person with taxes equal to or in
excess of the credit under RCW 82.70.020, and therefore not subject to
the limitation in (a) of this subsection, may elect to defer tax
credits for a period of not more than three years after the year in
which the credits accrue. No credits deferred under this subsection
(2)(b)(i) may be used after June 30, 2008. A person deferring tax
credits under this subsection (2)(b)(i) must submit an application as
provided in RCW 82.70.025 in the year in which the deferred tax credits
will be used. This application is subject to the provisions of
subsection (1) of this section for the year in which the tax credits
will be applied. If a deferred credit is reduced under subsection
(1)(b) of this section, the amount of deferred credit disallowed
because of the reduction may be carried forward as long as the period
of deferral does not exceed three years after the year in which the
credit was earned.
(ii) For credits approved by the department after June 30, 2005,
the approved credit may be carried forward to subsequent years until
used. Credits carried forward as authorized by this subsection are
subject to the limitation in subsection (1)(a) of this section for the
fiscal year for which the credits were originally approved.
(3) No person shall be approved for tax credits under RCW 82.70.020
in excess of two hundred thousand dollars in any fiscal year. This
limitation does not apply to credits carried forward from prior years
under subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(4) No person may claim tax credits after June 30, ((2013)) 2017.
(5) Credits may not be carried forward other than as authorized in
subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(6) No person is eligible for tax credits under RCW 82.70.020 if
the additional revenues for the multimodal transportation account
created by Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2231 are terminated.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.70.900 and 2003 c 364 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter expires July 1, ((2013)) 2017, except for RCW
82.70.050, which expires January 1, ((2014)) 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---