BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.29.010 and 2006 c 334 s 48 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the public-private transportation
initiatives act created under chapter 47.46 RCW has not met the needs
and expectations of the public or private sectors for the development
of transportation projects. The legislature intends to phase out
chapter 47.46 RCW coincident with the completion of the Tacoma Narrows
Bridge - SR 16 public-private partnership. From July 24, 2005, this
chapter will provide a more desirable and effective approach to
developing transportation projects in partnership with the private
sector by applying lessons learned from other states and from this
state's ten-year experience with chapter 47.46 RCW.
(2) It is the legislature's intent to achieve the following goals
through the creation of this new approach to public-private
partnerships:
(a) To provide a well-defined mechanism to facilitate the
collaboration between public and private entities in transportation;
(b) To bring innovative thinking from the private sector and other
states to bear on public projects within the state;
(c) To provide greater flexibility in achieving the transportation
projects; and
(d) To allow for creative cost and risk sharing between the public
and private partners.
(3) The legislature intends that the powers granted in this chapter
to the commission or department are in addition to any powers granted
under chapter 47.56 RCW.
(4) It is further the intent of the legislature that an expert
review panel be established for each project developed under chapter
334, Laws of 2006. Expert review panels shall be responsible for
reviewing selected proposals, analyzing and reviewing tentative
agreements, and making recommendations to the governor and the
transportation commission on the advisability of executing agreements
under chapter 334, Laws of 2006.
(5) The legislature intends that the review process, criteria, and
approvals for public-private partnership projects involving
toll-related facilities remain unchanged, but that the review and
approval process for nontoll projects be modified so that the criteria
and review process can be more closely tailored to the specific type of
proposed nontoll project or program.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.29.030 and 2005 c 317 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the powers it now possesses, the commission shall:
(1) Approve or review contracts or agreements authorized in this
chapter;
(2) Adopt rules to carry out this chapter and govern the program,
which at a minimum must address the following issues:
(a) The types of projects allowed; ((however, all allowed projects
must be included in the Washington transportation plan or identified by
the authority as being a priority need for the state;))
(b) The types of contracts allowed, with consideration given to the
best practices available;
(c) For toll projects, the composition of the team responsible for
the evaluation of proposals to include:
(i) Washington state department of transportation staff;
(ii) An independent representative of a consulting or contracting
field with no interests in the project that is prohibited from becoming
a project manager for the project and bidding on any part of the
project;
(iii) An observer from the state auditor's office or the joint
legislative audit and review committee;
(iv) A person appointed by the commission, if the secretary of
transportation is a cabinet member, or appointed by the governor if the
secretary of transportation is not a cabinet member; and
(v) A financial expert;
(d) Minimum standards and criteria required of all proposals;
(e) Procedures for the proper solicitation, acceptance, review, and
evaluation of projects;
(f) Criteria to be considered in the evaluation and selection of
proposals ((that includes)). For toll projects, this must include:
(i) Comparison with the department's internal ability to complete
the project that documents the advantages of completing the project as
a partnership versus solely as a public venture; and
(ii) Factors such as, but not limited to: Priority, cost, risk
sharing, scheduling, and management conditions;
(g) The protection of confidential proprietary information while
still meeting the need for public disclosure that is consistent with
RCW 47.29.190;
(h) Protection for local contractors to participate in
subcontracting opportunities;
(i) Specifying that maintenance issues must be resolved in a manner
consistent with the personnel system reform act, chapter 41.80 RCW;
(j) Specifying that provisions regarding patrolling and law
enforcement on a public facility are subject to approval by the
Washington state patrol;
(3) Adopt guidelines to address security and performance issues.
Preliminary rules and guidelines developed under this section must
be submitted to the chairs and ranking members of both transportation
committees by November 30, 2005, for review and comment. All final
rules and guidelines must be submitted to the full legislature during
the 2006 session for review.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.29.060 and 2008 c 122 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in this section, the department may,
in connection with the evaluation of eligible projects, consider any
financing mechanisms identified under subsections (3) through (5) of
this section or any other lawful source, either integrated as part of
a project proposal or as a separate, stand-alone proposal to finance a
project. Financing may be considered for all or part of a proposed
project. A project may be financed in whole or in part with:
(a) The proceeds of grant anticipation revenue bonds authorized by
23 U.S.C. Sec. 122 and applicable state law. Legislative authorization
and appropriation is required in order to use this source of financing;
(b) Grants, loans, loan guarantees, lines of credit, revolving
lines of credit, or other financing arrangements available under the
Transportation Infrastructure Finance and Innovation Act under 23
U.S.C. Sec. 181 et seq., or any other applicable federal law;
(c) Infrastructure loans or assistance from the state
infrastructure bank established by RCW 82.44.195;
(d) Federal, state, or local revenues, subject to appropriation by
the applicable legislative authority;
(e) User fees, tolls, fares, lease proceeds, rents, gross or net
receipts from sales, proceeds from the sale or exchange of development
rights, franchise fees, equivalent value exchanges of property, or any
other lawful form of consideration. However, projects financed by
tolls or equivalent funding sources must first be authorized by the
legislature under RCW 47.56.820.
(2) As security for the payment of financing described in this
section, the revenues from the project may be pledged, but no such
pledge of revenues constitutes in any manner or to any extent a general
obligation of the state. Any financing described in this section may
be structured on a senior, parity, or subordinate basis to any other
financing.
(3) For any toll transportation project developed under this
chapter that is owned, leased, used, or operated by the state, as a
public facility, if indebtedness is issued, it must be issued by the
state treasurer for the toll transportation project.
(4) For other public projects defined in RCW 47.29.050(2) that are
developed in conjunction with a transportation project, financing
necessary to develop, construct, or operate ((the)) a toll public
project must be approved by the state finance committee or by the
governing board of a public benefit corporation as provided in the
federal Internal Revenue Code section 63-20. Financing necessary to
develop, construct, or operate a nontoll public project that does not
pledge the state's credit must be approved by the state transportation
commission;
(5) For projects that are developed in conjunction with a
transportation project but are not themselves a public facility or
public project, any lawful means of financing may be used.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.29.140 and 2005 c 317 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following provisions must be included in any agreement to
which the state is a party:
(a) For any project that proposes terms for stand-alone maintenance
or asset management services for a public facility, those services must
be provided in a manner consistent with any collective bargaining
agreements, the personnel system reform act (chapter 41.80 RCW), and
civil service laws that are in effect for the public facility;
(b) Toll transportation projects that are selected for development
under this chapter must be identified in the Washington transportation
plan or be identified by the authority as being a priority need for the
state;
(c) If there is a tolling component to the project, then it must be
specified that tolling technology used in the project must be
consistent with tolling technology standards adopted by the department
for transportation-related projects;
(d) Provisions for bonding, financial guarantees, deposits, or the
posting of other security to secure the payment of laborers,
subcontractors, and suppliers who perform work or provide materials as
part of the project;
(e) All projects must be financed in a manner consistent with RCW
47.29.060. This chapter is null and void if this subsection or RCW
47.29.060 fails to become law or is held invalid by a court of final
jurisdiction.
(2) Agreements between the state and private sector partners
entered into under this section must specifically include the following
contractual elements:
(a) The point in the project at which public and private sector
partners will enter the project and which partners will assume
responsibility for specific project elements;
(b) How the partners will share management of the risks of the
project;
(c) How the partners will share the costs of development of the
project;
(d) How the partners will allocate financial responsibility for
cost overruns;
(e) The penalties for nonperformance;
(f) The incentives for performance;
(g) The accounting and auditing standards to be used to evaluate
work on the project;
(h) For any project that reverts to public ownership, the
responsibility for reconstruction or renovations that are required in
order for a facility to meet all applicable government standards upon
reversion of the facility to the state; and
(i) Provisions for patrolling and law enforcement on transportation
projects that are public facilities.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.29.150 and 2005 c 317 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before final approval of any toll projects, agreements entered
into under this chapter must include a process that provides for public
involvement and participation with respect to the development of the
toll projects. This plan must be submitted along with the proposed
agreement, and both must be approved under RCW 47.29.160 before the
state may enter a binding agreement.
(2) All workshops, forums, open houses, meetings, public hearings,
or similar public gatherings must be administered and attended by
representatives of the state and any other public entities that are
party to an agreement authorized by this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.29.170 and 2011 c 367 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before accepting any unsolicited toll project proposals, the
commission must adopt rules to facilitate the acceptance, review,
evaluation, and selection of unsolicited toll project proposals. These
rules must include the following:
(1) Provisions that specify unsolicited proposals must meet
predetermined criteria;
(2) Provisions governing procedures for the cessation of
negotiations and consideration;
(3) Provisions outlining that unsolicited proposals are subject to
a two-step process that begins with concept proposals and would only
advance to the second step, which are fully detailed proposals, if the
commission so directed;
(4) Provisions that require concept proposals to include at least
the following information: Proposers' qualifications and experience;
description of the proposed project and impact; proposed project
financing; and known public benefits and opposition; and
(5) Provisions that specify the process to be followed if the
commission is interested in the concept proposal, which must include
provisions:
(a) Requiring that information regarding the potential project
would be published for a period of not less than thirty days, during
which time entities could express interest in submitting a proposal;
(b) Specifying that if letters of interest were received during the
thirty days, then an additional sixty days for submission of the fully
detailed proposal would be allowed; and
(c) Procedures for what will happen if there are insufficient
proposals submitted or if there are no letters of interest submitted in
the appropriate time frame.
The commission may adopt other rules as necessary to avoid
conflicts with existing laws, statutes, or contractual obligations of
the state.
The commission may not accept or consider any unsolicited proposals
before July 1, 2013.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.29.180 and 2005 c 317 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
For toll projects with costs, including financing costs, of three
hundred million dollars or greater, advisory committees are required.
(1) The commission must establish an advisory committee to advise
with respect to eligible projects. An advisory committee must consist
of not fewer than five and not more than nine members, as determined by
the public partners. Members must be appointed by the commission, or
for projects with joint public sector participation, in a manner agreed
to by the commission and any participating unit of government. In
making appointments to the committee, the commission shall consider
persons or organizations offering a diversity of viewpoints on the
project.
(2) An advisory committee shall review concepts or proposals for
eligible projects and submit comments to the public sector partners.
(3) An advisory committee shall meet as necessary at times and
places fixed by the department, but not less than twice per year. The
state shall provide personnel services to assist the advisory committee
within the limits of available funds. An advisory committee may adopt
rules to govern its proceedings and may select officers.
(4) An advisory committee must be dissolved once the project has
been fully constructed and debt issued to pay for the project has been
fully retired.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.29.280 and 2006 c 334 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For projects that involve toll facilities, the department shall
establish an expert review panel to review, analyze, and make
recommendations to the governor and the transportation commission on
whether to approve, reject, or continue negotiations on a proposed
project agreement under this chapter. The department shall provide
staff to support the expert review panel, if requested by the panel.
The expert review panel may utilize any of the consultants under
contract for the department, and the expert review panel may contract
for consulting expertise in specific areas as it deems necessary to
ensure a thorough and critical review of any proposed project
agreement.
(2) The governor shall appoint members of an expert review panel
that have experience in large capital project delivery, public-private
partnerships, public financing of infrastructure improvements, or other
areas of expertise that will benefit the panel. The panel shall
consist of no less than three, but no more than five members, as
determined by the governor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 47.29 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission must review and approve any project that proposes to
(1) sell or otherwise permanently dispose of assets owned by the
department as part of a larger transaction involving a private entity;
or (2) incur obligations that would significantly bind future state
legislative appropriations including, but not limited to, long-term
lease agreements or assumption of significant facility maintenance or
preservation costs, as part of a larger transaction involving a private
entity.

Sec. 10 RCW 39.10.300 and 2009 c 75 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the process in RCW 39.10.270 or 39.10.280, public
bodies may utilize the design-build procedure for public works projects
in which the total project cost is over ten million dollars and where:
(a) The design and construction activities, technologies, or
schedule to be used are highly specialized and a design-build approach
is critical in developing the construction methodology or implementing
the proposed technology; or
(b) The project design is repetitive in nature and is an incidental
part of the installation or construction; or
(c) Regular interaction with and feedback from facilities users and
operators during design is not critical to an effective facility
design.
(2) Subject to the process in RCW 39.10.270 or 39.10.280, public
bodies may use the design-build procedure for parking garages,
regardless of cost.
(3) The design-build procedure may be used for the construction or
erection of preengineered metal buildings or prefabricated modular
buildings, regardless of cost and is not subject to approval by the
committee.
(4) Except for utility projects and approved demonstration
projects, the design-build procedure may not be used to procure
operations and maintenance services for a period longer than three
years. State agency projects that propose to use the design-build-operate-maintain procedure shall submit cost estimates for the
construction portion of the project consistent with the office of
financial management's capital budget requirements. Operations and
maintenance costs must be shown separately and must not be included as
part of the capital budget request.
(5) Subject to the process in RCW 39.10.280, public bodies may use
the design-build procedure for public works projects in which the total
project cost is between two million and ten million dollars and that
meet one of the criteria in subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c) of this
section.
(6) Subject to the process in RCW 39.10.280, a public body may seek
committee approval for a design-build demonstration project that
includes procurement of operations and maintenance services for a
period longer than three years.
(7) For projects proposed under RCW 47.29.090, the department of
transportation may use the design-build procedure for public works
projects in which the total project cost is under ten million dollars
and that meet one of the criteria in subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c) of
this section.

Sec. 11 RCW 39.08.010 and 2007 c 218 s 88 and 2007 c 210 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Except as provided under RCW 47.29.140(1)(d), whenever any board,
council, commission, trustees, or body acting for the state or any
county or municipality or any public body shall contract with any
person or corporation to do any work for the state, county, or
municipality, or other public body, city, town, or district, such
board, council, commission, trustees, or body shall require the person
or persons with whom such contract is made to make, execute, and
deliver to such board, council, commission, trustees, or body a good
and sufficient bond, with a surety company as surety, conditioned that
such person or persons shall faithfully perform all the provisions of
such contract and pay all laborers, mechanics, and subcontractors and
material suppliers, and all persons who supply such person or persons,
or subcontractors, with provisions and supplies for the carrying on of
such work, which bond in cases of cities and towns shall be filed with
the clerk or comptroller thereof, and any person or persons performing
such services or furnishing material to any subcontractor shall have
the same right under the provisions of such bond as if such work,
services, or material was furnished to the original contractor:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the provisions of RCW 39.08.010 through
39.08.030 shall not apply to any money loaned or advanced to any such
contractor, subcontractor or other person in the performance of any
such work: PROVIDED FURTHER, That on contracts of thirty-five thousand
dollars or less, at the option of the contractor the respective public
entity may, in lieu of the bond, retain fifty percent of the contract
amount for a period of thirty days after date of final acceptance, or
until receipt of all necessary releases from the department of revenue
and the department of labor and industries and settlement of any liens
filed under chapter 60.28 RCW, whichever is later: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That for contracts of one hundred thousand dollars or less, the public
entity may accept a full payment and performance bond from an
individual surety or sureties: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the surety
must agree to be bound by the laws of the state of Washington and
subjected to the jurisdiction of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 39.10 RCW
to read as follows:
The transportation commission may develop guidelines for, and
oversee, a project review and approval process that allows the
department of transportation to enter into predevelopment agreements
for the possible construction or delivery of projects or programs under
chapter 47.29 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of transportation may competitively procure a
potential development partner solely on the basis of that development
partner's qualifications to successfully develop a nontoll road
transportation project under chapter 47.29 RCW. The transportation
commission must develop guidelines for, and oversee, a project review
and approval process for projects proposed for development under this
pilot program.
(2) At a minimum, the transportation commission guidelines must
include the following:
(a) No more than five projects may enter into predevelopment
agreements; and
(b) The value of a single project under this pilot program may not
exceed ten million dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Nothing in this act shall be construed to
affect the collective bargaining rights of employees provided in
chapter 41.80 RCW.

--- END ---