BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as Dylan's
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 68.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who has actual knowledge of the location of human
remains has a duty to report this information to a law enforcement
agency or officer.
(2) The duty to notify a law enforcement agency or officer under
this section is met if a person provides or attempts to provide such
notice by telephone or any other means within a reasonable amount of
time not to exceed three days.
(3) Failure to report the location of human remains as required by
subsection (1) of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---