BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) It is in the public's interest, health, and safety to require
licensure of massage therapy establishments;
(2) Each massage therapy establishment should be licensed by the
department of health;
(3) Except for certain exemptions, massage therapy should be
offered or delivered only at a location or any portion thereof that
hold a valid massage therapy establishment license issued by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Licensed massage practitioner" means any person with a valid
license to practice massage as defined in RCW 18.108.030.
(3) "Massage therapy establishment" means a place of business that
advertises or offers massage as defined in RCW 18.108.010(2) on a
regular basis and which employs one or more persons to perform massage.
(4) "Owner" means any sole practitioner, partnership, or
corporation that allows massage to be offered for compensation on a
premises owned, leased, or controlled by that individual or entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 An owner is not required to be a licensed
massage practitioner so long as his or her license massage
establishment is affiliated with a national massage franchise whose
major massage therapy protocols are set by a licensed massage therapist
employed by the national franchisor and which does not participate in
third-party billing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This chapter does not apply to:
(1) Those individuals and entities listed in RCW 18.108.050;
(2) Licensed massage practitioners who own and operate a massage
business in which he or she is the only practitioner;
(3) Any practice owned by a medical professional with a valid
Washington license issued by the department to practice his or her
medical specialty where one or more licensed massage practitioners are
employed;
(4) Student clinics operated by department-approved massage
training schools;
(5) Locations at which chair massage is exclusively performed; and
(6) Locations in which massage is offered for no more than twenty-four hours in a one week period every six months at a public or
charitable event with a primary purpose unrelated directly to massage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The applicant for licensure of the
massage therapy establishment must be the owner, lessee, or legal
possessor of the establishment.
(2) An application for licensure must be submitted in the name of
the owner or owners of the massage therapy establishment. If the owner
is a corporation, the application must be submitted in the name of the
owner or owners of the corporation and must be signed by an authorized
corporate representative.
(3) An owner may operate a massage therapy establishment under a
name other than that of the owner if the other name is included in the
license application.
(4) Every massage therapy establishment shall prominently display
its massage therapy establishment license, together with original or
copies of the licenses of all persons employed by the massage therapy
establishment to perform massage.
(5) Every owner must ensure that all persons employed to perform
massage hold valid licenses from the department to perform massage.
(6) Every owner is responsible for maintaining safe and sanitary
conditions at all times in the massage therapy establishment. However,
this directive does not relieve an individual licensed massage
practitioner of his or her responsibility for sanitary and safe
conditions of the space or the equipment used in performing massage.
(7) Every owner shall ensure that no licensed massage practitioner
practices beyond his or her scope of practice.
(8) An initial license is valid for two years. Licenses may be
renewable every two years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 An initial fee of two hundred fifty dollars
must accompany the initial license application. A fee of one hundred
fifty dollars must accompany a license renewal application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Every owner shall properly maintain and
secure, for each client, records related to his or her initial intake
visit, subsequent sessions, and related billing records.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) an owner may change the name of his or
her massage therapy establishment, or transfer the license from one
location to another by submitting a completed written request to the
department. The request must be made at least thirty days prior to
such a change and prior to revising any printed materials or
advertisements.
(2) When a massage therapy establishment is sold, or ownership is
transferred to another individual or entity, or the corporate legal
organizational status is substantially changed, the owner must apply
for a license for the new or changed entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A massage therapy establishment owner,
lessee, or legal possessor may not knowingly engage in or permit any
person or persons to engage in any sexual activity in that owner's
establishment or to use that establishment to make arrangements to
engage in sexual activity in any other place. For the purposes of this
section, sexual activity must be defined in rule by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---