BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall submit a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature detailing engineering errors on highway
construction projects resulting in project cost increases in excess of
five hundred thousand dollars. The department must submit an initial
report of an engineering error within thirty days of the engineering
error occurring. A full report must be submitted within ninety days of
the engineering error occurring.
(2) The department's full report must include an assessment and
review of:
(a) How the engineering error happened;
(b) The department of the employee or employees responsible for the
engineering error, without disclosing the name of the employee or
employees;
(c) What corrective action was taken;
(d) The estimated total cost of the engineering error and how the
department plans to mitigate that cost;
(e) Whether the cost of the engineering error will impact the
overall project financial plan; and
(f) What action the secretary has recommended to avoid similar
engineering errors in the future. If the legislature finds that the
actions taken by the secretary were inadequate, the legislature may
take additional action to correct the problem.
(3) Within ninety days of the effective date of this section, a
report must be submitted on engineering errors that have occurred on
projects that are currently under construction and not yet
operationally complete.

--- END ---