BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.20.780 and 2007 c 152 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of transportation shall develop a process for
awarding competitively bid highway construction contracts for projects
over ((ten)) five million dollars. ((that may)) All highway
construction projects over five million dollars must be constructed
using a design-build procedure to ensure that all risk is properly
allocated to the contractor. As used in this section and RCW
47.20.785, "design-build procedure" means a method of contracting under
which the department of transportation contracts with another party for
the party to both design and build the structures, facilities, and
other items specified in the contract.
The process developed by the department must, at a minimum, include
the scope of services required under the design-build procedure,
contractor prequalification requirements, criteria for evaluating
technical information and project costs, contractor selection criteria,
and issue resolution procedures.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.20.785 and 2006 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) The department of transportation ((may)) must use the
design-build procedure for all public works projects over ((ten)) five
million dollars ((where:
(a) The construction activities are highly specialized and a
design-build approach is critical in developing the construction
methodology; or
(b) The projects selected provide opportunity for greater
innovation and efficiencies between the designer and the builder; or
(c) Significant savings in project delivery time would be realized.
(2) To test the applicability of the design-build procedure on
smaller projects and specialty projects, the department may conduct up
to five pilot projects on projects that cost between two and ten
million dollars. The department shall evaluate these pilot projects
with respect to cost, time to complete, efficiencies gained, if any,
and other pertinent information to facilitate analysis regarding the
further use of the design-build process on projects of this size)).
All risk must be allocated to the contractor.

--- END ---