BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that "right-sizing" is a lean, metric-based approach to determining project
investments. This concept entails a compromise between project cost
and design, incorporating local community needs, desired outcomes, and
available funding. Furthermore, the legislature finds that the
concepts and principles that the department of transportation has
utilized in the safety analyst program have been effective tools to
prioritize projects and reduce project costs.
(2) In collaboration with the Washington state transportation
commission, the department of transportation shall report to the house
of representatives and senate transportation committees on right-sizing
by January 1, 2014. This report must include:
(a) When and where the concept has been applied or is intended to
be applied within the department; and
(b) An assessment of the feasibility of extending the concept to
all capital programs, including costs and implications.

--- END ---