BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.42.020 and 1971 ex.s. c 184 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness shall be issued by
the state finance committee. They may be issued at one time or in a
series from time to time. The maturity date of each series shall be
determined by the state finance committee, but in no case shall any
bonds mature later than thirty years from the date of issue, except in
the case of bonds issued for transportation purposes, which in no case
shall mature later than fifteen years from the date of issue. All
evidences of indebtedness shall be signed in the name of the state by
the governor and the treasurer. The facsimile signature of said
officials is authorized and said evidences of indebtedness may be
issued notwithstanding that any of the officials signing them or whose
facsimile signatures appear on such evidences of indebtedness has
ceased to hold office at the time of issue or at the time of delivery
to the purchaser.

--- END ---