BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.60.814 and 2001 c 226 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Subject to legislative appropriation for the procurement of
vessels, the department shall issue a request for proposals to
interested parties that must include, at least, the following:
(1) Solicitation of a proposal to participate in a design and build
partnership with the department to design and construct the auto
ferries;
(2) Instructions on the prequalification process and procedures;
(3) A description of the modified request for proposals process.
Under this process, the department may modify any component of the
request for proposals, including the outline specifications, by
addendum at any time before the submittal of bids in phase three;
(4) A description of the design and build partnership process to be
used for procurement of the vessels;
(5) Outline specifications that provide the requirements for the
vessels including, but not limited to, items such as length, beam,
displacement, speed, propulsion requirements, capacities for autos and
passengers, passenger space characteristics, and crew size. The
department will produce notional line drawings depicting hull geometry
that will interface with Washington state ferries terminal facilities.
Notional lines may be modified in phase two, subject to approval by the
department;
(6) Instructions for the development of technical proposals in
phase two, and information regarding confidentiality of technical
proposals;
(7) The vessel delivery schedule, identification of the port on
Puget Sound where delivery must take place, and the location where
acceptance trials must be held;
(8) The estimated price range for the contract;
(9) The form and amount of the required bid deposit and contract
security;
(10) A copy of the contract that will be signed by the successful
proposer;
(11) The date by which proposals in phase one must be received by
the department in order to be considered;
(12) A description of information to be submitted in the proposals
in phase one concerning each proposer's qualifications, capabilities,
and experience;
(13) A statement of the maximum number of proposers that may be
selected in phase one for development of technical proposals in phase
two;
(14) Criteria that will be used for the phase one selection of
proposers to participate in the phase two development of technical
proposals;
(15) A description of the process that will be used for the phase
three submittal and evaluation of bids, award of the contract, and
postaward administrative activities;
(16) A requirement that the contractor comply with all applicable
laws, rules, and regulations including but not limited to those
pertaining to the environment, worker health and safety, and prevailing
wages; and
(17) ((A requirement that the vessels be constructed within the
boundaries of the state of Washington except that equipment furnished
by the state and components, products, and systems that are standard
manufactured items are not subject to the in-state requirement under
this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, "constructed"
means the fabrication, by the joining together by welding or fastening
of all steel parts from which the total vessel is constructed,
including, but not limited to, all shell frames, longitudinals,
bulkheads, webs, piping runs, wire ways, and ducting. "Constructed"
also means the installation of all components and systems, including,
but not limited to, equipment and machinery, castings, electrical,
electronics, deck covering, lining, paint, and joiner work required by
the contract. "Constructed" also means the interconnection of all
equipment, machinery, and services, such as piping, wiring, and
ducting; and
(18))) A requirement that all warranty work on the vessel must be
performed within the boundaries of the state of Washington, insofar as
practical.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
Whenever reasonably possible, the department is directed to obtain
at least three bids on any contract offered for the construction of a
new ferry vessel or on any contract for substantial alterations of an
existing ferry vessel. For purposes of this section, "substantial
alteration" means any change that is anticipated to cost more than
twenty-five percent of the replacement value of the ferry vessel to be
altered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 47.56.780 (New ferry vessel construction
for service on routes that require a vessel that carries no more than
one hundred motor vehicles -- How constructed -- Warranty work) and 2008 c
4 s 2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---