BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.50.325 and 2013 c 3 s 4 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) There shall be a marijuana producer's license to produce
marijuana for sale at wholesale to marijuana processors and other
marijuana producers, regulated by the state liquor control board and
subject to annual renewal. The production, possession, delivery,
distribution, and sale of marijuana in accordance with the provisions
of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 and the rules adopted to implement and
enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana producer, shall not be a
criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana
producer's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall
specify the location at which the marijuana producer intends to
operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder
thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The
application fee for a marijuana producer's license shall be two hundred
fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana
producer's license shall be one thousand dollars. A separate license
shall be required for each location at which a marijuana producer
intends to produce marijuana.
(b) In adopting rules regulating the licensing of marijuana
producers, the state liquor control board is encouraged to structure
its regulatory scheme so as to give strong preference to the licensing
of those proposed or existing marijuana production operations located
in rural areas on unenclosed, outdoor agricultural lands, as opposed to
indoor growing operations such as greenhouses, warehouses, or other
constructed, industrial style growing facilities. The implementation
of a regulatory scheme that promotes the development of marijuana
production operations located on unenclosed, outdoor agricultural lands
will yield environmental, social, and economic benefits, including
greatly reduced energy consumption, the reduction of adverse
environmental impacts likely to result from indoor, industrial style
growing operations, and the creation of new and promising economic
opportunities for small farmers in this state.
(c) In order to provide an incentive for the production of
marijuana in rural areas on unenclosed, outdoor agricultural lands, as
set forth in (b) of this subsection, the state liquor control board is
encouraged to adopt rules authorizing the inclusion of labeling on
retail packaging certifying that the marijuana was produced on such
outdoor agricultural lands. The state liquor control board is
authorized to issue the rules necessary for such certification, as well
as the design and textual content of the certification labeling.
(2) There shall be a marijuana processor's license to process,
package, and label useable marijuana and marijuana-infused products for
sale at wholesale to marijuana retailers, regulated by the state liquor
control board and subject to annual renewal. The processing,
packaging, possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana,
useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in accordance with
the provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 and the rules adopted to
implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana processor,
shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law.
Every marijuana processor's license shall be issued in the name of the
applicant, shall specify the location at which the licensee intends to
operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder
thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The
application fee for a marijuana processor's license shall be two
hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a
marijuana processor's license shall be one thousand dollars. A
separate license shall be required for each location at which a
marijuana processor intends to process marijuana.
(3) There shall be a marijuana retailer's license to sell useable
marijuana and marijuana-infused products at retail in retail outlets,
regulated by the state liquor control board and subject to annual
renewal. The possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of useable
marijuana and marijuana-infused products in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 and the rules adopted to
implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana retailer,
shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law.
Every marijuana retailer's license shall be issued in the name of the
applicant, shall specify the location of the retail outlet the licensee
intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and
the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license.
The application fee for a marijuana retailer's license shall be two
hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a
marijuana retailer's license shall be one thousand dollars. A separate
license shall be required for each location at which a marijuana
retailer intends to sell useable marijuana and marijuana-infused
products.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.50.345 and 2013 c 3 s 10 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
The state liquor control board, subject to the provisions of
chapter 3, Laws of 2013, must adopt rules by December 1, 2013, that
establish the procedures and criteria necessary to implement the
following:
(1) Licensing of marijuana producers, marijuana processors, and
marijuana retailers, including prescribing forms and establishing
application, reinstatement, and renewal fees;
(2) Creating a regulatory scheme for marijuana producers that gives
strong preference to the licensing of those proposed or existing
marijuana production operations located in rural areas on unenclosed,
outdoor agricultural lands, as required under RCW 69.50.325(1)(b);
(3) Determining, in consultation with the office of financial
management, the maximum number of retail outlets that may be licensed
in each county, taking into consideration:
(a) Population distribution;
(b) Security and safety issues; and
(c) The provision of adequate access to licensed sources of useable
marijuana and marijuana-infused products to discourage purchases from
the illegal market;
(((3))) (4) Determining the maximum quantity of marijuana a
marijuana producer may have on the premises of a licensed location at
any time without violating Washington state law;
(((4))) (5) Determining the maximum quantities of marijuana,
useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products a marijuana processor
may have on the premises of a licensed location at any time without
violating Washington state law;
(((5))) (6) Determining the maximum quantities of useable marijuana
and marijuana-infused products a marijuana retailer may have on the
premises of a retail outlet at any time without violating Washington
state law;
(((6))) (7) In making the determinations required by subsections
(((3))) (4) through (((5))) (6) of this section, the state liquor
control board shall take into consideration:
(a) Security and safety issues;
(b) The provision of adequate access to licensed sources of
marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products to
discourage purchases from the illegal market; and
(c) Economies of scale, and their impact on licensees' ability to
both comply with regulatory requirements and undercut illegal market
prices;
(((7))) (8) Determining the nature, form, and capacity of all
containers to be used by licensees to contain marijuana, useable
marijuana, and marijuana-infused products, and their labeling
requirements, to include but not be limited to:
(a) The business or trade name and Washington state unified
business identifier number of the licensees that grew, processed, and
sold the marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product;
(b) Lot numbers of the marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product;
(c) THC concentration of the marijuana, useable marijuana, or
marijuana-infused product;
(d) Medically and scientifically accurate information about the
health and safety risks posed by marijuana use; and
(e) Language required by RCW 69.04.480;
(((8))) (9) In consultation with the department of agriculture,
establishing classes of marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products according to grade, condition, cannabinoid profile,
THC concentration, or other qualitative measurements deemed appropriate
by the state liquor control board;
(((9))) (10) Establishing reasonable time, place, and manner
restrictions and requirements regarding advertising of marijuana,
useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products that are not
inconsistent with the provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2013, taking
into consideration:
(a) Federal laws relating to marijuana that are applicable within
Washington state;
(b) Minimizing exposure of people under twenty-one years of age to
the advertising; and
(c) The inclusion of medically and scientifically accurate
information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use in
the advertising;
(((10))) (11) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when,
and the manner, methods, and means by which, licensees shall transport
and deliver marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused
products within the state;
(((11))) (12) In consultation with the department and the
department of agriculture, establishing accreditation requirements for
testing laboratories used by licensees to demonstrate compliance with
standards adopted by the state liquor control board, and prescribing
methods of producing, processing, and packaging marijuana, useable
marijuana, and marijuana-infused products; conditions of sanitation;
and standards of ingredients, quality, and identity of marijuana,
useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products produced, processed,
packaged, or sold by licensees;
(((12))) (13) Specifying procedures for identifying, seizing,
confiscating, destroying, and donating to law enforcement for training
purposes all marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused
products produced, processed, packaged, labeled, or offered for sale in
this state that do not conform in all respects to the standards
prescribed by chapter 3, Laws of 2013 or the rules of the state liquor
control board.

--- END ---