BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.50.342 and 2013 c 3 s 9 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
For the purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of chapter
3, Laws of 2013 according to their true intent or of supplying any
deficiency therein, the state liquor control board may adopt rules not
inconsistent with the spirit of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 as are deemed
necessary or advisable. Without limiting the generality of the
preceding sentence, the state liquor control board is empowered to
adopt rules regarding the following:
(1) The equipment and management of retail outlets and premises
where marijuana is produced or processed, and inspection of the retail
outlets and premises;
(2) The books and records to be created and maintained by
licensees, the reports to be made thereon to the state liquor control
board, and inspection of the books and records;
(3)(a) Methods of producing, processing, and packaging marijuana,
useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products; conditions of
sanitation; and standards of ingredients, quality, and identity of
marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products produced,
processed, packaged, or sold by licensees;
(b) In evaluating marijuana production methods, consulting with the
department of ecology in order to study and examine the environmental
impacts associated with the various methods of producing marijuana. In
conducting such an examination the state liquor control board, in
conjunction with the department of ecology, must consider issues that
include, but are not limited to: Energy utilization and conservation,
water quality, air quality, land use, and other environmental factors;
(4) Security requirements for retail outlets and premises where
marijuana is produced or processed, and safety protocols for licensees
and their employees;
(5) Screening, hiring, training, and supervising employees of
licensees;
(6) Retail outlet locations and hours of operation;
(7) Labeling requirements and restrictions on advertisement of
marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products;
(8) Forms to be used for purposes of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 or the
rules adopted to implement and enforce it, the terms and conditions to
be contained in licenses issued under chapter 3, Laws of 2013, and the
qualifications for receiving a license issued under chapter 3, Laws of
2013, including a criminal history record information check. The state
liquor control board may submit any criminal history record information
check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division
of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may
search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the
individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The state liquor
control board shall require fingerprinting of any applicant whose
criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal
bureau of investigation;
(9) Application, reinstatement, and renewal fees for licenses
issued under chapter 3, Laws of 2013, and fees for anything done or
permitted to be done under the rules adopted to implement and enforce
chapter 3, Laws of 2013;
(10) The manner of giving and serving notices required by chapter
3, Laws of 2013 or rules adopted to implement or enforce it;
(11) Times and periods when, and the manner, methods, and means by
which, licensees shall transport and deliver marijuana, useable
marijuana, and marijuana-infused products within the state;
(12) Identification, seizure, confiscation, destruction, or
donation to law enforcement for training purposes of all marijuana,
useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products produced, processed,
sold, or offered for sale within this state which do not conform in all
respects to the standards prescribed by chapter 3, Laws of 2013 or the
rules adopted to implement and enforce it: PROVIDED, That nothing in
chapter 3, Laws of 2013 shall be construed as authorizing the state
liquor control board to seize, confiscate, destroy, or donate to law
enforcement marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products
produced, processed, sold, offered for sale, or possessed in compliance
with the Washington state medical use of cannabis act, chapter 69.51A
RCW.

--- END ---