BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For any ferry to be acquired by contracts advertised for bid
after August 1, 2013, the department must develop a process for
awarding competitively bid contracts for ferry construction projects
using a design–build procedure. As used in this section, "design–build
procedure" means a method of contracting under which the department
contracts with another party for the party to both design and build the
items specified in the contract. The process developed by the
department must, at a minimum, include the scope of services required
under the design-build procedure, contractor prequalification
requirements, criteria for evaluating technical information and project
costs, contractor selection criteria, and issue resolution procedures.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, the
department may not participate in or contribute to the design of a
ferry acquired pursuant to this section.
(b) The department may offer a change to the design of a ferry only
when the change provides cost savings in the design, construction, or
operation of the ferry and only when the risks associated with the
design remain exclusively with the contractor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In performing pursuant to any contract to construct a ferry,
change orders are allowable, but should be used on a very limited basis
to accomplish important objectives, including cost savings, safety
improvements, and operational efficiencies.
(2) To accommodate change orders, the department must request that
the legislative appropriation for any ferry construction project
include up to, but no more than, a five percent price contingency.
This contingency must be identified in the funding request to the
legislature and held in reserve until the office of financial
management approves the expenditure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
For ferries acquired by the department pursuant to a contract
advertised for bid prior to August 1, 2013, the department may not make
or design a substantial alteration to such ferries unless the
department has sought and received approval for the alteration from the
legislature, if the legislature is in session. If the legislature is
not in session, the department must seek and receive approval for such
an alteration from the office of financial management. For the
purposes of this section, "substantial alteration" means any project
that is anticipated to cost more than twenty-five percent of the
replacement value of the ferry to be altered at the time of alteration.
The department may seek to make such an alteration to a ferry only if
the alteration is necessary to assure continued operation or to provide
operational or long-term cost savings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 47.60.810 (Design-build ferries -- Authorized -- Phases
defined) and 2001 c 226 s 4;
(2) RCW 47.60.812 (Design-build ferries -- Notice of request for
proposals) and 2001 c 226 s 5;
(3) RCW 47.60.814 (Design-build ferries -- Issuance of request for
proposals) and 2001 c 226 s 6;
(4) RCW 47.60.816 (Design-build ferries -- Phase one) and 2001 c 226
s 7;
(5) RCW 47.60.818 (Design-build ferries -- Phase two) and 2001 c 226
s 8;
(6) RCW 47.60.820 (Design-build ferries -- Phase three) and 2001 c
226 s 9;
(7) RCW 47.60.822 (Design-build ferries -- Notice to proposers not
selected -- Appeal) and 2001 c 226 s 10;
(8) RCW 47.60.824 (Design-build ferries -- Single best-qualified
proposer -- Incentives -- Proposal negotiations -- Compensation) and 2007 c
481 s 2; and
(9) RCW 47.60.8241 (Findings -- Single proposal process for new ferry
vessel construction) and 2007 c 481 s 1.

--- END ---