BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, call
center services performed under a personal services contract with an
agency, or under any subcontract for call center services awarded under
the personal services contract, may not be performed at a location
outside the United States.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if the director
of the office of financial management determines that the only
practicable location where the call center services may be performed is
clearly and justifiably a location outside the United States.
(3) A contractor or subcontractor performing call center services
under a personal services contract with the state that relocates call
center services under the contract outside the United States must
notify the department at least one hundred twenty days before such
relocation. In notifying the department, the contractor or
subcontractor must report:
(a) The percent of call center services under the contract or
subcontract that will move from the state to a location outside the
United States; and
(b) Whether call center employees will have access to personal
information about Washington state residents including, but not limited
to, information such as a resident's name, address, social security
number, birthdate, medical records, credit records, and if so, what
types of employees will have access to this information.
(4) A contractor or subcontractor that fails to notify the
department under subsection (3) of this section is subject to a civil
penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars for each day of such
violation except that the director may reduce the amount for just cause
shown.
(5) The department shall compile a semiannual list of all the
contractors or subcontractors that have notified the department under
subsection (3) of this section, including the information specified in
subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section, and post the list on the
department web site. A contractor or subcontractor that notifies the
department must remain on the list for four semiannual postings.
(6) A contractor or subcontractor that notifies the department
under subsection (3) of this section is not eligible for any tax
preference as defined in RCW 43.136.021 for two years from the date of
relocation and the department of revenue must declare the tax
preferences the contractor or subcontractor received for the two
calendar years previous to the date of relocation to be immediately
due.
(7) For purposes of this section, "call center" means a physical or
electronic operation that uses telephonic or electronic communications
in one or more of the following activities: (a) Providing customer
services, including information about customer accounts; (b) soliciting
sales; (c) reactivating dormant accounts; (d) conducting surveys or
research; (e) collecting receivables or debts; (f) answering questions
about or registering for benefits; (g) taking or receiving
reservations; or (h) taking or receiving orders.
(8) This section applies to contracts entered into or renewed after
the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---