BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.050 and 2011 c 174 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of
tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who:
(i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(iv) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; or
(v) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065; or
(vi) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an
ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty
without intervening use by such person.
(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that
is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any
activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though
such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (vi) of
this subsection following such use.
(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to
persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280(1)
(a), (b), and (g), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of
or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor
and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities,
and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and also includes the sale of services or charges made
for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the mere
leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure
upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys
the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person
performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of
performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property
is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the
original owner;
(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but does not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" means those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel,
rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of
any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the
renting or leasing of real property, and it is presumed that the
occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more
constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license
to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it is
presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging
for a continuous period of one month or more to a person is a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) The installing, repairing, altering, or improving of digital
goods for consumers;
(h) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of
this subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and
services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons
in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or
"retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be
resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section may be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of
or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; and
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.
(4)(a) The term also includes the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property to consumers.
(b) The term does not include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of
sublease or subrent.
(5) The term also includes the providing of "competitive telephone
service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary services," as
those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6)(a) The term also includes the sale of prewritten computer
software to a consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end
user. For purposes of this subsection (6)(a), the sale of prewritten
computer software includes the sale of or charge made for a key or an
enabling or activation code, where the key or code is required to
activate prewritten computer software and put the software into use.
There is no separate sale of the key or code from the prewritten
computer software, regardless of how the sale may be characterized by
the vendor or by the purchaser.
The term "retail sale" does not include the sale of or charge made
for:
(i) Custom software; or
(ii) The customization of prewritten computer software.
(b)(i) The term also includes the charge made to consumers for the
right to access and use prewritten computer software, where possession
of the software is maintained by the seller or a third party,
regardless of whether the charge for the service is on a per use, per
user, per license, subscription, or some other basis.
(ii)(A) The service described in (b)(i) of this subsection (6)
includes the right to access and use prewritten computer software to
perform data processing.
(B) For purposes of this subsection (6)(b)(ii), "data processing"
means the systematic performance of operations on data to extract the
required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to
usable information. Data processing includes check processing, image
processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing,
claim processing, and similar activities.
(7)(a) The term also includes the sale of or charge made to a
consumer for an extended warranty ((to a consumer. For purposes of
this subsection,)) or a home service contract. The term "retail sale"
does not include any fee or other charge, whether labeled a trade
service call fee or otherwise, that applies under a home service
contract when a contractor, technician, repair person, or other service
provider comes to a residence to diagnose the problem or provide
services covered by the home service contract.
(b) The following definitions apply throughout this subsection
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(i) "Extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration
to perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at
no additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal
property, labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the
replacement or repair of tangible personal property, based on the
occurrence of specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not
include an agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended
warranty in this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the
agreement and the value of the agreement is included in the sales price
of the tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For
purposes of this subsection (7)(b)(i), "sales price" has the same
meaning as in RCW 82.08.010.
(ii) "Home service contract" means a contract or agreement for a
separately stated consideration for any duration to perform the
service, repair, replacement, or maintenance of property or
indemnification for service, repair, replacement, or maintenance, for
the operational or structural failure of any residential property due
to a defect in materials, workmanship, inherent defect or normal wear
and tear, with or without additional provisions for incidental payment
or indemnity under limited circumstances. The term "home service
contract" does not include a contract or agreement, otherwise meeting
the definition of home service contract in this subsection, if:
(A) The sale to the customer occurred before the effective date of
this section;
(B) The sale is to a person that is not subject to the retail sales
tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020 or is exempt from that tax on all
purchases; or
(C) The contract or agreement also meets the definition of
"extended warranty" in this subsection and is not associated with any
contract or agreement to perform the service, repair, replacement, or
maintenance of residential property.
(8)(a) The term also includes the following sales to consumers of
digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services:
(i) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right
of permanent use;
(ii) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of
use that is less than permanent;
(iii) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make
continued payment as a condition of the sale; and
(iv) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of the sale.
(b) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital
automated services under this subsection (8) includes any services
provided by the seller exclusively in connection with the digital
goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a
separate charge is made for such services.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, "permanent" means perpetual or
for an indefinite or unspecified length of time. A right of permanent
use is presumed to have been granted unless the agreement between the
seller and the purchaser specifies or the circumstances surrounding the
transaction suggest or indicate that the right to use terminates on the
occurrence of a condition subsequent.
(9) The term also includes the charge made for providing tangible
personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate
period of time. A consideration of this is that the operator is
necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed.
For the purpose of this subsection (9), an operator must do more than
maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.
(10) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(11) The term also does not include sales of chemical sprays or
washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for
the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor does it include
sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or
the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or
improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.
(12) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor does the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
does the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning
up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste
and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and
development.
(13) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for
labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements
providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway
equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the
labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency,
as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.
(14) The term does not include the sale for resale of any service
described in this section if the sale would otherwise constitute a
"sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.190 and 2010 c 111 s 202 and 2010 c 106 s 204
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
"Consumer" means the following:
(1) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any
article of tangible personal property irrespective of the nature of the
person's business and including, among others, without limiting the
scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve,
construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers
other than for the purpose of:
(a) Resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of
business;
(b) Incorporating such property as an ingredient or component of
real or personal property when installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, imprinting, improving, constructing, or decorating such real
or personal property of or for consumers;
(c) Consuming such property in producing for sale as a new article
of tangible personal property or a new substance, of which such
property becomes an ingredient or component or as a chemical used in
processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a
chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new
article being produced for sale;
(d) Consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon
which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the
primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction
directly through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or
(e) Satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty
or home service contract as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7), if such
tangible personal property replaces or becomes an ingredient or
component of property covered by the extended warranty or home service
contract, without intervening use by such person;
(2)(a) Any person engaged in any business activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.290 or 82.04.2908; (b) any person who purchases, acquires, or
uses any competitive telephone service, ancillary services, or
telecommunications service as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065,
other than for resale in the regular course of business; (c) any person
who purchases, acquires, or uses any service defined in RCW
82.04.050(2) (a) or (g), other than for resale in the regular course of
business or for the purpose of satisfying the person's obligations
under an extended warranty or home service contract as defined in RCW
82.04.050(7); (d) any person who purchases, acquires, or uses any
amusement and recreation service defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a), other
than for resale in the regular course of business; (e) any person who
purchases or acquires an extended warranty or home service contract as
defined in RCW 82.04.050(7) other than for resale in the regular course
of business; and (f) any person who is an end user of software. For
purposes of this subsection (2)(f) and RCW 82.04.050(6), a person who
purchases or otherwise acquires prewritten computer software, who
provides services described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(b) and who will charge
consumers for the right to access and use the prewritten computer
software, is not an end user of the prewritten computer software;
(3) Any person engaged in the business of contracting for the
building, repairing or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington or by
the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or
vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind as
defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when
such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of
such publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement,
right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility,
bridge, tunnel, or trestle by installing, placing or spreading the
property in or upon the right-of-way of such street, place, road,
highway, easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in or upon the site of
such mass public transportation terminal or parking facility;
(4) Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of
possession to or an easement in real property which is being
constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or otherwise altered by a
person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal corporations
or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and services
rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road
purposes, ((and)) (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and
county and city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82
RCW in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property,
and (c) a person in respect to labor and services rendered to real
property when the labor and services are covered under the terms of a
home service contract as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7). Nothing
contained in this or any other subsection of this definition ((shall))
may be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";
(5) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession to personal property which is being constructed, repaired,
improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered by a person engaged
in business, except that "consumer" does not include such a person when
the constructing, repairing, improving, imprinting, or altering is
covered under the terms of a home service contract as defined in RCW
82.04.050(7);
(6) Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created
pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing land
and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality
thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to
chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person is a consumer within the meaning of
this subsection in respect to tangible personal property incorporated
into, installed in, or attached to such building or other structure by
such person, except that consumer does not include any person engaged
in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving
new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above
real property of or for the United States, or any instrumentality
thereof, if the investment project would qualify for sales and use tax
deferral under chapter 82.63 RCW if undertaken by a private entity;
(7) Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment, the
rental of which is exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under
RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or charge made for
tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the
machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful
life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other
subsection of this section may be construed to modify any other
definition of "consumer";
(8) Any person engaged in the business of cleaning up for the
United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other
by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development;
(9) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession of tangible personal property that, under the terms of an
extended warranty or home service contract as defined in RCW
82.04.050(7), has been repaired or is replacement property, but only
with respect to the sale of or charge made for the repairing of the
tangible personal property or the replacement property;
(10) Any person who purchases, acquires, or uses services described
in RCW 82.04.050(6)(b) other than:
(a) For resale in the regular course of business; or
(b) For purposes of consuming the service described in RCW
82.04.050(6)(b) in producing for sale a new product, but only if such
service becomes a component of the new product. For purposes of this
subsection (10), "product" means a digital product, an article of
tangible personal property, or the service described in RCW
82.04.050(6)(b);
(11)(a) Any end user of a digital product or digital code.
"Consumer" does not include any person who is not an end user of a
digital product or a digital code and purchases, acquires, owns, holds,
or uses any digital product or digital code for purposes of consuming
the digital product or digital code in producing for sale a new
product, but only if the digital product or digital code becomes a
component of the new product. A digital code becomes a component of a
new product if the digital good or digital automated service acquired
through the use of the digital code becomes incorporated into a new
product. For purposes of this subsection, "product" has the same
meaning as in subsection (10) of this section.
(b)(i) For purposes of this subsection, "end user" means any
taxpayer as defined in RCW 82.12.010 other than a taxpayer who receives
by contract a digital product for further commercial broadcast,
rebroadcast, transmission, retransmission, licensing, relicensing,
distribution, redistribution or exhibition of the product, in whole or
in part, to others. A person that purchases digital products or
digital codes for the purpose of giving away such products or codes
will not be considered to have engaged in the distribution or
redistribution of such products or codes and will be treated as an end
user;
(ii) If a purchaser of a digital code does not receive the
contractual right to further redistribute, after the digital code is
redeemed, the underlying digital product to which the digital code
relates, then the purchaser of the digital code is an end user. If the
purchaser of the digital code receives the contractual right to further
redistribute, after the digital code is redeemed, the underlying
digital product to which the digital code relates, then the purchaser
of the digital code is not an end user. A purchaser of a digital code
who has the contractual right to further redistribute the digital code
is an end user if that purchaser does not have the right to further
redistribute, after the digital code is redeemed, the underlying
digital product to which the digital code relates; and
(12) Any person who provides services described in RCW
82.04.050(9). Any such person is a consumer with respect to the
purchase, acquisition, or use of the tangible personal property that
the person provides along with an operator in rendering services
defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(9). Any such person may also
be a consumer under other provisions of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.010 and 2010 c 106 s 210 are each amended to
read as follows:
((For the purposes of this chapter:)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1)(a)(i) "Selling price" includes "sales price." "Sales price"
means the total amount of consideration, except separately stated
trade-in property of like kind, including cash, credit, property, and
services, for which tangible personal property, home service contract,
extended warranties, digital goods, digital codes, digital automated
services, or other services or anything else defined as a "retail sale"
under RCW 82.04.050 are sold, leased, or rented, valued in money,
whether received in money or otherwise. No deduction from the total
amount of consideration is allowed for the following: (((i))) (A) The
seller's cost of the property sold; (((ii))) (B) the cost of materials
used, labor or service cost, interest, losses, all costs of
transportation to the seller, all taxes imposed on the seller, and any
other expense of the seller; (((iii))) (C) charges by the seller for
any services necessary to complete the sale, other than delivery and
installation charges; (((iv))) (D) delivery charges; and (((v))) (E)
installation charges.
(ii) When tangible personal property is rented or leased under
circumstances that the consideration paid does not represent a
reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or leased, the
"selling price" ((shall)) must be determined as nearly as possible
according to the value of such use at the places of use of similar
products of like quality and character under such rules as the
department may prescribe;
(b) "Selling price" or "sales price" does not include: Discounts,
including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third
party that are allowed by a seller and taken by a purchaser on a sale;
interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the
sale of tangible personal property, home service contract, extended
warranties, digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services,
or other services or anything else defined as a retail sale in RCW
82.04.050, if the amount is separately stated on the invoice, bill of
sale, or similar document given to the purchaser; and any taxes legally
imposed directly on the consumer that are separately stated on the
invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser;
(c) "Selling price" or "sales price" includes consideration
received by the seller from a third party if:
(i) The seller actually receives consideration from a party other
than the purchaser, and the consideration is directly related to a
price reduction or discount on the sale;
(ii) The seller has an obligation to pass the price reduction or
discount through to the purchaser;
(iii) The amount of the consideration attributable to the sale is
fixed and determinable by the seller at the time of the sale of the
item to the purchaser; and
(iv) One of the criteria in this subsection (1)(c)(iv) is met:
(A) The purchaser presents a coupon, certificate, or other
documentation to the seller to claim a price reduction or discount
where the coupon, certificate, or documentation is authorized,
distributed, or granted by a third party with the understanding that
the third party will reimburse any seller to whom the coupon,
certificate, or documentation is presented;
(B) The purchaser identifies himself or herself to the seller as a
member of a group or organization entitled to a price reduction or
discount, however a "preferred customer" card that is available to any
patron does not constitute membership in such a group; or
(C) The price reduction or discount is identified as a third party
price reduction or discount on the invoice received by the purchaser or
on a coupon, certificate, or other documentation presented by the
purchaser;
(2)(a) "Seller" means every person, including the state and its
departments and institutions, making sales at retail or retail sales to
a buyer, purchaser, or consumer, whether as agent, broker, or
principal, except "seller" does not mean:
(i) The state and its departments and institutions when making
sales to the state and its departments and institutions; or
(ii) A professional employer organization when a covered employee
coemployed with the client under the terms of a professional employer
agreement engages in activities that constitute a sale at retail that
is subject to the tax imposed by this chapter. In such cases, the
client, and not the professional employer organization, is deemed to be
the seller and is responsible for collecting and remitting the tax
imposed by this chapter.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, the terms "client,"
"covered employee," "professional employer agreement," and
"professional employer organization" have the same meanings as in RCW
82.04.540;
(3) "Buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" include, without limiting
the scope hereof, every individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in
bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club,
company, joint stock company, business trust, corporation, association,
society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual,
cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise, municipal corporation,
quasi municipal corporation, and also the state, its departments and
institutions and all political subdivisions thereof, irrespective of
the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed, and
also the United States or any instrumentality thereof;
(4) "Delivery charges" means charges by the seller of personal
property or services for preparation and delivery to a location
designated by the purchaser of personal property or services including,
but not limited to, transportation, shipping, postage, handling,
crating, and packing;
(5) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed
by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or
to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the
direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed
directly to the recipients. "Direct mail" includes tangible personal
property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct
mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed
material. "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed
material delivered to a single address;
(6) The meaning attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax
year," "taxable year," "person," "company," "sale," "sale at
wholesale," "wholesale," "business," "engaging in business," "cash
discount," "successor," "consumer," "in this state" and "within this
state" applies equally to the provisions of this chapter;
(7) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and
under chapter 82.12 RCW, "tangible personal property" means personal
property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched, or that
is in any other manner perceptible to the senses. Tangible personal
property includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten
computer software;
(8) "Extended warranty" ((has)) and "home service warrantee" have
the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.050(7);
(9) The definitions in RCW 82.04.192 apply to this chapter;
(10) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and
chapter 82.12 RCW, whenever the terms "property" or "personal property"
are used, those terms must be construed to include digital goods and
digital codes unless:
(a) It is clear from the context that the term "personal property"
is intended only to refer to tangible personal property;
(b) It is clear from the context that the term "property" is
intended only to refer to tangible personal property, real property, or
both; or
(c) To construe the term "property" or "personal property" as
including digital goods and digital codes would yield unlikely, absurd,
or strained consequences; and
(11) "Retail sale" or "sale at retail" means any sale, lease, or
rental for any purpose other than for resale, sublease, or subrent.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.08.020 and 2011 c 171 s 120 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected a tax equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state
of:
(a) Tangible personal property, unless the sale is specifically
excluded from the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;
(b) Digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services,
if the sale is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail
sale;
(c) Services, other than digital automated services, included
within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;
(d) Extended warranties to consumers; ((and))
(e) Home service contracts to consumers; and
(f) Anything else, the sale of which is included within the RCW
82.04.050 definition of retail sale.
(2) There is levied and collected an additional tax on each retail
car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this
state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The
revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the
multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.365, nonhighway vehicles as
defined in RCW 46.09.310, and snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.04.546.
(5) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section must be dedicated to
funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470.
The revenue identified in this subsection must be deposited in the
performance audits of government account created in RCW 43.09.475.
(6) The taxes imposed under this chapter apply to successive retail
sales of the same property.
(7) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under
chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.12.010 and 2010 c 127 s 4 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
((For the purposes of this chapter:)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and
82.08 RCW, insofar as applicable, has full force and effect with
respect to taxes imposed under the provisions of this chapter.
"Consumer," in addition to the meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04
and 82.08 RCW insofar as applicable, also means any person who
distributes or displays, or causes to be distributed or displayed, any
article of tangible personal property, except newspapers, the primary
purpose of which is to promote the sale of products or services. With
respect to property distributed to persons within this state by a
consumer as defined in this subsection (1), the use of the property is
deemed to be by such consumer.
(2) "Extended warranty" ((has)) and "home service contract" have
the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.050(7).
(3) "Purchase price" means the same as sales price as defined in
RCW 82.08.010.
(4)(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection (4),
"retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010 and every
person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property at
retail and every person required to collect from purchasers the tax
imposed under this chapter.
(ii) "Retailer" does not include a professional employer
organization when a covered employee coemployed with the client under
the terms of a professional employer agreement engages in activities
that constitute a sale of tangible personal property, extended
warranty, digital good, digital code, or a sale of any digital
automated service or service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050
(2)(a) or (g), (3)(a), or (6)(b) that is subject to the tax imposed by
this chapter. In such cases, the client, and not the professional
employer organization, is deemed to be the retailer and is responsible
for collecting and remitting the tax imposed by this chapter.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, the terms "client,"
"covered employee," "professional employer agreement," and
"professional employer organization" have the same meanings as in RCW
82.04.540.
(5) "Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included within
the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word "consumer" as defined in
chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW.
(6) "Use," "used," "using," or "put to use" have their ordinary
meaning, and mean:
(a) With respect to tangible personal property, except for natural
gas and manufactured gas, the first act within this state by which the
taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of
tangible personal property (as a consumer), and include installation,
storage, withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act
preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption within this state;
(b) With respect to a service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), the
first act within this state after the service has been performed by
which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the
article of tangible personal property upon which the service was
performed (as a consumer), and includes installation, storage,
withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act preparatory to
subsequent actual use or consumption of the article within this state;
(c) With respect to an extended warranty or home service contract,
the first act within this state after the extended warranty or home
service contract has been acquired by which the taxpayer takes or
assumes dominion or control over ((the article of tangible personal))
any of the property to which the extended warranty or home service
contract applies, and includes installation, storage, withdrawal from
storage, distribution, or any other act preparatory to subsequent
actual use or consumption of the ((article)) property within this
state;
(d) With respect to a digital good or digital code, the first act
within this state by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, views,
accesses, downloads, possesses, stores, opens, manipulates, or
otherwise uses or enjoys the digital good or digital code;
(e) With respect to a digital automated service, the first act
within this state by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, uses, enjoys,
or otherwise receives the benefit of the service;
(f) With respect to a service defined as a retail sale in RCW
82.04.050(6)(b), the first act within this state by which the taxpayer,
as a consumer, accesses the prewritten computer software;
(g) With respect to a service defined as a retail sale in RCW
82.04.050(2)(g), the first act within this state after the service has
been performed by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, views, accesses,
downloads, possesses, stores, opens, manipulates, or otherwise uses or
enjoys the digital good upon which the service was performed; and
(h) With respect to natural gas or manufactured gas, the use of
which is taxable under RCW 82.12.022, including gas that is also
taxable under the authority of RCW 82.14.230, the first act within this
state by which the taxpayer consumes the gas by burning the gas or
storing the gas in the taxpayer's own facilities for later consumption
by the taxpayer.
(7)(a) "Value of the article used" is the purchase price for the
article of tangible personal property, the use of which is taxable
under this chapter. The term also includes, in addition to the
purchase price, the amount of any tariff or duty paid with respect to
the importation of the article used. In case the article used is
acquired by lease or by gift or is extracted, produced, or manufactured
by the person using the same or is sold under conditions wherein the
purchase price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of
the article used is determined as nearly as possible according to the
retail selling price at place of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.
(b) In case the articles used are acquired by bailment, the value
of the use of the articles so used must be in an amount representing a
reasonable rental for the use of the articles so bailed, determined as
nearly as possible according to the value of such use at the places of
use of similar products of like quality and character under such rules
as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case any such articles
of tangible personal property are used in respect to the construction,
repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become or are to
become an ingredient or component of, new or existing buildings or
other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the
United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing or attaching of any such articles therein or thereto,
whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by
virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such articles so
used is determined according to the retail selling price of such
articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of
similar products of like quality and character or, in the absence of
either of these selling price measures, such value may be determined
upon a cost basis, in any event under such rules as the department of
revenue may prescribe.
(c) In the case of articles owned by a user engaged in business
outside the state which are brought into the state for no more than one
hundred eighty days in any period of three hundred sixty-five
consecutive days and which are temporarily used for business purposes
by the person in this state, the value of the article used must be an
amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the articles,
unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW
upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this
subsection.
(d) In the case of articles manufactured or produced by the user
and used in the manufacture or production of products sold or to be
sold to the department of defense of the United States, the value of
the articles used is determined according to the value of the
ingredients of such articles.
(e) In the case of an article manufactured or produced for purposes
of serving as a prototype for the development of a new or improved
product, the value of the article used is determined by: (i) The
retail selling price of such new or improved product when first offered
for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into the
prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered
for sale.
(f) In the case of an article purchased with a direct pay permit
under RCW 82.32.087, the value of the article used is determined by the
purchase price of such article if, but for the use of the direct pay
permit, the transaction would have been subject to sales tax.
(8) "Value of the digital good or digital code used" means the
purchase price for the digital good or digital code, the use of which
is taxable under this chapter. If the digital good or digital code is
acquired other than by purchase, the value of the digital good or
digital code must be determined as nearly as possible according to the
retail selling price at place of use of similar digital goods or
digital codes of like quality and character under rules the department
may prescribe.
(9) "Value of the ((extended)) warranty used" means the purchase
price for the extended warranty or home service contract, the use of
which is taxable under this chapter. If the extended warranty or home
service contract is received by gift or under conditions wherein the
purchase price does not represent the true value of the extended
warranty or home service contract, the value of the ((extended))
warranty used is determined as nearly as possible according to the
retail selling price at place of use of similar extended warranties or
home service contracts of like quality and character under rules the
department may prescribe.
(10) "Value of the service used" means the purchase price for the
digital automated service or other service, the use of which is taxable
under this chapter. If the service is received by gift or under
conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value
thereof, the value of the service used is determined as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of
similar services of like quality and character under rules the
department may prescribe.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.12.020 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 206 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected from every person in this state
a tax or excise for the privilege of using within this state as a
consumer any:
(a) Article of tangible personal property acquired by the user in
any manner, including tangible personal property acquired at a casual
or isolated sale, and including by-products used by the manufacturer
thereof, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, irrespective of
whether the article or similar articles are manufactured or are
available for purchase within this state;
(b) Prewritten computer software, regardless of the method of
delivery, but excluding prewritten computer software that is either
provided free of charge or is provided for temporary use in viewing
information, or both;
(c) Services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or
(g), (3)(a), or (6)(b), excluding services defined as a retail sale in
RCW 82.04.050(6)(b) that are provided free of charge;
(d) Extended warranty or home service contract; or
(e)(i) Digital good, digital code, or digital automated service,
including the use of any services provided by a seller exclusively in
connection with digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated
services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.
(ii) With respect to the use of digital goods, digital automated
services, and digital codes acquired by purchase, the tax imposed in
this subsection (1)(e) applies in respect to:
(A) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right
of permanent use;
(B) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of
use that is less than permanent;
(C) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of the sale; and
(D) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of the sale.
(iii) With respect to digital goods, digital automated services,
and digital codes acquired other than by purchase, the tax imposed in
this subsection (1)(e) applies regardless of whether or not the
consumer has a right of permanent use or is obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of use.
(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property, extended warranty, or
home service contract, digital good, digital code, digital automated
service, or service taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (g), (3)(a),
or (6)(b), if the sale to, or the use by, the present user or the
present user's bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax
under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by
the present user or by the present user's bailor or donor.
(3)(a) Except as provided in this section, payment of the tax
imposed by this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW by one purchaser or user
of tangible personal property, extended warranty, or home service
contract, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or
other service does not have the effect of exempting any other purchaser
or user of the same property, extended warranty, or home service
contract, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or
other service from the taxes imposed by such chapters.
(b) The tax imposed by this chapter does not apply:
(i) If the sale to, or the use by, the present user or his or her
bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter
82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user
or by his or her bailor or donor;
(ii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal
property acquired by bailment and the tax has once been paid based on
reasonable rental as determined by RCW 82.12.060 measured by the value
of the article at time of first use multiplied by the tax rate imposed
by chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter as of the time of first use;
(iii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal
property acquired by bailment, if the property was acquired by a
previous bailee from the same bailor for use in the same general
activity and the original bailment was prior to June 9, 1961; or
(iv) To the use of digital goods or digital automated services,
which were obtained through the use of a digital code, if the sale of
the digital code to, or the use of the digital code by, the present
user or the present user's bailor or donor has already been subjected
to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been
paid by the present user or by the present user's bailor or donor.
(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection (4), the tax is
levied and must be collected in an amount equal to the value of the
article used, value of the digital good or digital code used, value of
the ((extended)) warranty used, or value of the service used by the
taxpayer, multiplied by the applicable rates in effect for the retail
sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.
(b) In the case of a seller required to collect use tax from the
purchaser, the tax must be collected in an amount equal to the purchase
price multiplied by the applicable rate in effect for the retail sales
tax under RCW 82.08.020.
(5) For purposes of the tax imposed in this section, "person"
includes anyone within the definition of "buyer," "purchaser," and
"consumer" in RCW 82.08.010.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.12.0255 and 2009 c 535 s 610 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of any article of tangible personal property, extended warranty, home
service contract, digital good, digital code, digital automated
service, or other service which the state is prohibited from taxing
under the Constitution of the state or under the Constitution or laws
of the United States.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.12.035 and 2009 c 535 s 1107 are each amended to
read as follows:
A credit is allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter upon
the use in this state of tangible personal property, extended warranty,
or home service contract, digital good, digital code, digital automated
service, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a)
or (g), (3)(a), or (6)(b), in the amount that the present user thereof
or his or her bailor or donor has paid a legally imposed retail sales
or use tax with respect to such property, extended warranty, digital
good, digital code, digital automated service, or service defined as a
retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g), (3)(a), or (6)(b) to any
other state, possession, territory, or commonwealth of the United
States, any political subdivision thereof, the District of Columbia,
and any foreign country or political subdivision thereof.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.32.020 and 2009 c 535 s 1111 are each amended to
read as follows:
((For the purposes of this chapter:)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) The meaning attributed in chapters 82.01 through 82.27 RCW to
the words and phrases "tax year," "taxable year," "person," "company,"
"gross proceeds of sales," "gross income of the business," "business,"
"engaging in business," "successor," "gross operating revenue," "gross
income," "taxpayer," "retail sale," "seller," "buyer," "purchaser,"
"extended warranty," "home service contract," and "value of products"
((shall)) apply equally to the provisions of this chapter.
(2) Whenever "property" or "personal property" is used, those terms
must be construed to include digital goods and digital codes unless:
(a) It is clear from the context that the term "personal property" is
intended only to refer to tangible personal property; (b) it is clear
from the context that the term "property" is intended only to refer to
tangible personal property, real property, or both; or (c) to construe
the term "property" or "personal property" as including digital goods
and digital codes would yield unlikely, absurd, or strained
consequences.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Agreement" means the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.
(b) "Associate member" means a petitioning state that is found to
be in compliance with the agreement and changes to its laws, rules, or
other authorities necessary to bring it into compliance are not in
effect, but are scheduled to take effect on or before January 1, 2008.
The petitioning states, by majority vote, may also grant associate
member status to a petitioning state that does not receive an
affirmative vote of three-fourths of the petitioning states upon a
finding that the state has achieved substantial compliance with the
terms of the agreement as a whole, but not necessarily each required
provision, measured qualitatively, and there is a reasonable
expectation that the state will achieve compliance by January 1, 2008.
(c) "Certified automated system" means software certified under the
agreement to calculate the tax imposed by each jurisdiction on a
transaction, determine the amount of tax to remit to the appropriate
state, and maintain a record of the transaction.
(d) "Certified service provider" means an agent certified under the
agreement to perform all of the seller's sales and use tax functions,
other than the seller's obligation to remit tax on its own purchases.
(e)(i) "Member state" means a state that:
(A) Has petitioned for membership in the agreement and submitted a
certificate of compliance; and
(B) Before the effective date of the agreement, has been found to
be in compliance with the requirements of the agreement by an
affirmative vote of three-fourths of the other petitioning states; or
(C) After the effective date of the agreement, has been found to be
in compliance with the agreement by a three-fourths vote of the entire
governing board of the agreement.
(ii) Membership by reason of (e)(i)(A) and (B) of this subsection
is effective on the first day of a calendar quarter at least sixty days
after at least ten states comprising at least twenty percent of the
total population, as determined by the 2000 federal census, of all
states imposing a state sales tax have petitioned for membership and
have either been found in compliance with the agreement or have been
found to be an associate member under section 704 of the agreement.
(iii) Membership by reason of (e)(i)(A) and (C) of this subsection
is effective on the state's proposed date of entry or the first day of
the calendar quarter after its petition is approved by the governing
board, whichever is later, and is at least sixty days after its
petition is approved.
(f) "Model 1 seller" means a seller that has selected a certified
service provider as its agent to perform all the seller's sales and use
tax functions, other than the seller's obligation to remit tax on its
own purchases.
(g) "Model 2 seller" means a seller that has selected a certified
automated system to perform part of its sales and use tax functions,
but retains responsibility for remitting the tax.
(h) "Model 3 seller" means a seller that has sales in at least five
member states, has total annual sales revenue of at least five hundred
million dollars, has a proprietary system that calculates the amount of
tax due each jurisdiction, and has entered into a performance agreement
with the member states that establishes a tax performance standard for
the seller. As used in this subsection (3)(h), a seller includes an
affiliated group of sellers using the same proprietary system.
(i) "Source" means the location in which the sale or use of
tangible personal property, a digital good or digital code, an extended
warranty, or home service contract, or a digital automated service or
other service, subject to tax under chapter 82.08, 82.12, 82.14, or
82.14B RCW, is deemed to occur.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.32.730 and 2010 c 106 s 229 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (5) through (8) of this
section, for purposes of collecting or paying sales or use taxes to the
appropriate jurisdictions, all sales at retail ((shall)) must be
sourced in accordance with this subsection and subsections (2) through
(4) of this section.
(a) When tangible personal property, an extended warranty, or home
service contract, a digital good, digital code, digital automated
service, or other service defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050
is received by the purchaser at a business location of the seller, the
sale is sourced to that business location.
(b) When the tangible personal property, extended warranty, or home
service contract, digital good, digital code, digital automated
service, or other service defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050
is not received by the purchaser at a business location of the seller,
the sale is sourced to the location where receipt by the purchaser or
the purchaser's donee, designated as such by the purchaser, occurs,
including the location indicated by instructions for delivery to the
purchaser or donee, known to the seller.
(c) When (a) and (b) of this subsection do not apply, the sale is
sourced to the location indicated by an address for the purchaser that
is available from the business records of the seller that are
maintained in the ordinary course of the seller's business when use of
this address does not constitute bad faith.
(d) When (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection do not apply, the
sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the
purchaser obtained during the consummation of the sale, including the
address of a purchaser's payment instrument, if no other address is
available, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith.
(e) When (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection do not apply,
including the circumstance where the seller is without sufficient
information to apply those provisions, then the location ((shall)) must
be determined by the address from which tangible personal property was
shipped, from which the digital good or digital code or the computer
software delivered electronically was first available for transmission
by the seller, or from which the extended warranty, home service
contract, or digital automated service or other service defined as a
retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 was provided, disregarding for these
purposes any location that merely provided the digital transfer of the
product sold.
(2) The lease or rental of tangible personal property, other than
property identified in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, ((shall))
must be sourced as provided in this subsection.
(a) For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic
payments, the first periodic payment is sourced the same as a retail
sale in accordance with subsection (1) of this section. Periodic
payments made subsequent to the first payment are sourced to the
primary property location for each period covered by the payment. The
primary property location ((shall)) must be as indicated by an address
for the property provided by the lessee that is available to the lessor
from its records maintained in the ordinary course of business, when
use of this address does not constitute bad faith. The property
location is not altered by intermittent use at different locations,
such as use of business property that accompanies employees on business
trips and service calls.
(b) For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic
payments, the payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
(c) This subsection (2) does not affect the imposition or
computation of sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump
sum or accelerated basis, or on the acquisition of property for lease.
(3) The lease or rental of motor vehicles, trailers, semitrailers,
or aircraft that do not qualify as transportation equipment ((shall))
must be sourced as provided in this subsection.
(a) For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic
payments, each periodic payment is sourced to the primary property
location. The primary property location is as indicated by an address
for the property provided by the lessee that is available to the lessor
from its records maintained in the ordinary course of business, when
use of this address does not constitute bad faith. This location is
not altered by intermittent use at different locations.
(b) For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic
payments, the payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
(c) This subsection does not affect the imposition or computation
of sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump sum or
accelerated basis, or on the acquisition of property for lease.
(4) The retail sale, including lease or rental, of transportation
equipment ((shall)) must be sourced the same as a retail sale in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
(5) This subsection applies to direct mail transactions not
governed by subsection (6) of this section.
(a) This subsection (5)(a) applies to sales of advertising and
promotional direct mail.
(i) A purchaser of advertising and promotional direct mail may
provide the seller with either:
(A) A direct pay permit;
(B) A streamlined sales and use tax agreement certificate of
exemption claiming direct mail (or other written statement approved,
authorized, or accepted by the department); or
(C) Information showing the jurisdictions to which the advertising
and promotional direct mail is to be delivered to recipients.
(ii) If the purchaser provides the permit, certificate, or
statement referred to in (a)(i)(A) or (B) of this subsection (5), the
seller, in the absence of bad faith, is relieved of all obligations to
collect, pay, or remit any tax on any transaction involving advertising
and promotional direct mail to which the permit, certificate, or
statement applies. The purchaser must source the sale to the
jurisdictions to which the advertising and promotional direct mail is
to be delivered to the recipients and must report and pay any
applicable tax due.
(iii) If the purchaser provides the seller information showing the
jurisdictions to which the advertising and promotional direct mail is
to be delivered to recipients, the seller must source the sale to the
jurisdictions to which the advertising and promotional direct mail is
to be delivered and must collect and remit the applicable tax. In the
absence of bad faith, the seller is relieved of any further obligation
to collect any additional tax on the sale of advertising and
promotional direct mail where the seller has sourced the sale according
to the delivery information provided by the purchaser.
(iv) If the purchaser does not provide the seller with any of the
items listed in (a)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection (5), the sale
must be sourced according to subsection (1)(e) of this section.
(b) This subsection (5)(b) applies to sales of other direct mail.
(i) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (5)(b), sales
of other direct mail are sourced in accordance with subsection (1)(c)
of this section.
(ii) A purchaser of other direct mail may provide the seller with
either:
(A) A direct pay permit; or
(B) A streamlined sales and use tax agreement certificate of
exemption claiming direct mail (or other written statement approved,
authorized, or accepted by the department).
(iii) If the purchaser provides the permit, certificate, or
statement referred to in (b)(ii)(A) or (B) of this subsection (5), the
seller, in the absence of bad faith, is relieved of all obligations to
collect, pay, or remit any tax on any transaction involving other
direct mail to which the permit, certificate, or statement applies.
Notwithstanding (b)(i) of this subsection (5), the sale must be sourced
to the jurisdictions to which the other direct mail is to be delivered
to the recipients, and the purchaser must report and pay any applicable
tax due.
(6)(a) This subsection applies only with respect to transactions in
which direct mail is delivered or distributed from a location within
this state to a location within this state.
(b) If the purchaser of direct mail provides the seller with a
direct pay permit or a streamlined sales and use tax agreement
certificate of exemption claiming direct mail (or other written
statement approved, authorized, or accepted by the department), the
seller, in the absence of bad faith, is relieved of all obligations to
collect, pay, or remit the applicable tax on any transaction involving
direct mail to which the permit, certificate, or statement applies.
The purchaser must report and pay any applicable tax due. A
streamlined sales and use tax agreement certificate of exemption
claiming direct mail will remain in effect for all future sales of
direct mail by the seller to the purchaser until it is revoked in
writing.
(c)(i) Except as provided in (b), (c)(ii), and (c)(iii) of this
subsection (6), the seller must collect the tax according to subsection
(1)(e) of this section.
(ii) To the extent the seller knows that a portion of the sale of
direct mail will be delivered or distributed to locations in another
state, the seller must collect the tax on that portion according to
subsection (5) of this section.
(iii) Notwithstanding (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection (6), a
seller may elect to use the provisions of subsection (5) of this
section to source all sales of advertising and promotional direct mail.
(7) The following are sourced to the location at or from which
delivery is made to the consumer:
(a) A retail sale of watercraft;
(b) A retail sale of a modular home, manufactured home, or mobile
home;
(c) A retail sale, excluding the lease and rental, of a motor
vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or aircraft, that do not qualify as
transportation equipment; and
(d) Florist sales. In the case of a sale in which one florist
takes an order from a customer and then communicates that order to
another florist who delivers the items purchased to the place
designated by the customer, the location at or from which the delivery
is made to the consumer is deemed to be the location of the florist
originally taking the order.
(8)(a) A retail sale of the providing of telecommunications
services, as that term is defined in RCW 82.04.065, is sourced in
accordance with RCW 82.32.520.
(b) A retail sale of the providing of ancillary services, as that
term is defined in RCW 82.04.065, is sourced to the customer's place of
primary use of the telecommunications services in respect to which the
ancillary services are associated with or incidental to. The
definitions of "customer" and "place of primary use" in RCW 82.32.520
apply to this subsection (8)(b).
(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Advertising and promotional direct mail" means printed
material that meets the definition of direct mail, the primary purpose
of which is to attract public attention to a product, person, business,
or organization, or to attempt to sell, popularize, or secure financial
support for a product, person, business, or organization. As used in
this subsection (9)(a), the word "product" means tangible personal
property, a product transferred electronically, or a service.
(b) "Delivered electronically" means delivered to the purchaser by
means other than tangible storage media.
(c) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed
by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or
to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the
direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed
directly to the recipients. "Direct mail" includes tangible personal
property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct
mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed
material. "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed
material delivered to a single address.
(d)(i) "Other direct mail" means any direct mail that is not
advertising and promotional direct mail, regardless of whether
advertising and promotional direct mail is included in the same
mailing. The term includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Transactional direct mail that contains personal information
specific to the addressee including, but not limited to, invoices,
bills, statements of account, and payroll advices;
(B) Any legally required mailings including, but not limited to,
privacy notices, tax reports, and stockholder reports; and
(C) Other nonpromotional direct mail delivered to existing or
former shareholders, customers, employees, or agents including, but not
limited to, newsletters and informational pieces.
(ii) Other direct mail does not include the development of billing
information or the provision of any data processing service that is
more than incidental.
(e) "Florist sales" means the retail sale of tangible personal
property by a florist. For purposes of this subsection (9)(e),
"florist" means a person whose primary business activity is the retail
sale of fresh cut flowers, potted ornamental plants, floral
arrangements, floral bouquets, wreaths, or any similar products, used
for decorative and not landscaping purposes.
(f) "Receive" and "receipt" mean taking possession of tangible
personal property, making first use of digital automated services or
other services, or taking possession or making first use of digital
goods or digital codes, whichever comes first. "Receive" and "receipt"
do not include possession by a shipping company on behalf of the
purchaser.
(g) "Transportation equipment" means:
(i) Locomotives and railcars that are used for the carriage of
persons or property in interstate commerce;
(ii) Trucks and truck tractors with a gross vehicle weight rating
of ten thousand one pounds or greater, trailers, semitrailers, or
passenger buses that are:
(A) Registered through the international registration plan; and
(B) Operated under authority of a carrier authorized and
certificated by the United States department of transportation or
another federal authority to engage in the carriage of persons or
property in interstate commerce;
(iii) Aircraft that are operated by air carriers authorized and
certificated by the United States department of transportation or
another federal or foreign authority to engage in the carriage of
persons or property in interstate or foreign commerce; or
(iv) Containers designed for use on and component parts attached or
secured on the items described in (g)(i) through (iii) of this
subsection.
(10) In those instances where there is no obligation on the part of
a seller to collect or remit this state's sales or use tax, the use of
tangible personal property, digital good, digital code, or of a digital
automated service or other service, subject to use tax, is sourced to
the place of first use in this state. The definition of use in RCW
82.12.010 applies to this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The tax changes in this act apply
prospectively only to home service contracts sold on or after the
effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---