BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many American
youth arrive in this country and this state through the decision of
their parents to relocate in search of opportunities to improve their
lives and futures.
On June 15, 2012, President Obama introduced the deferred action
for childhood arrivals process. Building on this directive, this act
is intended to provide a more affordable and attainable route to
college for children granted deferred action for childhood arrival
status who reside in Washington state. While extending in-state
tuition to these youth has helped them better afford higher education
in this state, financial aid is necessary to extend to them the full
American dream. The extension of financial aid to these aspiring young
Americans is also necessary to position everyone for economic success
and strengthen Washington state's competitive edge in the world
economy.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.92.010 and 2004 c 275 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purposes of this chapter are to establish the principles upon
which the state financial aid programs will be based and to establish
the state of Washington state need grant program, thus assisting
financially needy or disadvantaged students domiciled in Washington to
obtain the opportunity of attending an accredited institution of higher
education. State need grants under this chapter are available only to
students who are resident students as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a)
through (d) or any person who has completed the full senior year of
high school and obtained a high school diploma, either at a Washington
public high school or private high school approved under chapter
28A.195 RCW, or a person who has received the equivalent of a diploma;
who has lived in Washington state for at least three years immediately
before receiving the diploma or its equivalent; who has continuously
lived in the state of Washington after receiving the diploma or its
equivalent and until such time as the individual is admitted to an
eligible institution of higher education and has been granted deferred
action for childhood arrival status pursuant to the rules and
regulations adopted by the United States citizenship and immigration
services.

--- END ---