BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.01.300 and 2012 c 62 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall, in cooperation with environmental regulatory
authorities:
(1) Identify and document environmental resources in the
development of the statewide multimodal plan under RCW 47.06.040;
(2) Allow for public comment regarding changes to the criteria used
for prioritizing projects under chapter 47.05 RCW before final adoption
of the changes by the commission;
(3) Use an environmental review as part of the project prospectus
identifying potential environmental impacts, mitigation, the
utilization of the mitigation option available in RCW 90.74.040, and
costs during the early project identification and selection phase,
submit the prospectus to the relevant environmental regulatory
authorities, and maintain a record of comments and proposed revisions
received from the authorities;
(4) Actively work with the relevant environmental regulatory
authorities during the design alternative analysis process and seek
written concurrence from the authorities that they agree with the
preferred design alternative selected;
(5) Develop a uniform methodology, in consultation with relevant
environmental regulatory authorities, for submitting plans and
specifications detailing project elements that impact environmental
resources, and proposed mitigation measures including the mitigation
option available in RCW 90.74.040, to the relevant environmental
regulatory authorities during the preliminary specifications and
engineering phase of project development;
(6) Use available technologies to minimize permit delays for,
inform and interact with interested parties including relevant
environmental regulatory authorities regarding, and optimize the
effectiveness of proposed compensatory mitigation projects;
(7) Screen construction projects to determine which projects will
require complex or multiple permits. The permitting authorities shall
develop methods for initiating review of the permit applications for
the projects before the final design of the projects;
(((7))) (8) Conduct special prebid meetings for those projects that
are environmentally complex; and
(((8))) (9) Review environmental considerations related to
particular projects during the preconstruction meeting held with the
contractor who is awarded the bid.

--- END ---