BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 For decades, the citizens of Washington
state have been plagued with the unwanted social and fiscal
consequences of an illicit, yet flourishing marketplace involving the
unlawful sale of marijuana. Despite the best efforts of law
enforcement and the expenditure of countless millions of tax dollars to
eliminate this illicit, underground market, it has continued to operate
almost unchecked, while at the same time continuing to absorb scarce
financial and criminal justice resources in an apparently endless
effort to eliminate the unlawful sale and use of marijuana.
Weary of the crime and wasted resources associated with the
unsuccessful effort to bring the marijuana market under control, the
citizens of this state, through the passage of Initiative Measure No.
502, have given voice to their desire for an altogether different
approach to regulating marijuana and eliminating the illicit market.
In passing Initiative Measure No. 502, our citizens have clearly
expressed their wish to eliminate the underground marketplace and
implement a regulatory system by which marijuana production,
processing, and sales can finally be monitored, controlled, and tightly
regulated, while at the same time creating opportunities for raising
much needed public revenue through the imposition of fees and taxes on
those that participate in the marketplace.
The legislature recognizes that implementing a regulatory scheme
for the creation of a regulated market for the legal sale of marijuana
is a very complex process involving uncharted legal territory; a task
that is made all the more challenging by the fact that historically no
state has yet created such a market. Accordingly, it is important that
the legislature very carefully analyze and consider the requirements
set forth in Initiative Measure No. 502 in order to determine those
technical changes necessary to create a viable regulatory system that
will ensure the intent of the voters is implemented in a timely and
efficient manner.
Therefore, in making the technical changes embodied in this act, it
is the intent of the legislature to make them as minimal as possible
and to ensure that such changes serve to better enable the timely
development of a practical, viable regulatory scheme that continues to
reflect the will of the voters. Furthermore, by virtue of this act,
the legislature intends to facilitate the successful creation of a
carefully regulated and taxed marijuana market and in so doing mark the
end of the violent and lawless criminal element that has dominated the
market for so many years.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.50.331 and 2013 c 3 s 6 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of considering any application for a license to
produce, process, or sell marijuana, or for the renewal of a license to
produce, process, or sell marijuana, the state liquor control board may
cause an inspection of the premises to be made, and may inquire into
all matters in connection with the construction and operation of the
premises. For the purpose of reviewing any application for a license
and for considering the denial, suspension, revocation, or renewal or
denial thereof, of any license, the state liquor control board may
consider any prior criminal conduct of the applicant including an
administrative violation history record with the state liquor control
board and a criminal history record information check. The state
liquor control board may submit the criminal history record information
check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division
of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may
search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the
individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The state liquor
control board shall require fingerprinting of any applicant whose
criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal
bureau of investigation. The provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of chapter
9.96A RCW shall not apply to these cases. Subject to the provisions of
this section, the state liquor control board may, in its discretion,
grant or deny the renewal or license applied for. Denial may be based
on, without limitation, the existence of chronic illegal activity
documented in objections submitted pursuant to subsections (7)(c) and
(9) of this section. Authority to approve an uncontested or unopposed
license may be granted by the state liquor control board to any staff
member the board designates in writing. Conditions for granting this
authority shall be adopted by rule. No license of any kind may be
issued to:
(a) A person under the age of twenty-one years;
(b) A person doing business as a sole proprietor who has not
lawfully resided in the state for at least three months prior to
applying to receive a license;
(c) A partnership, employee cooperative, association, nonprofit
corporation, or corporation unless formed under the laws of this state,
and unless all of the members thereof are qualified to obtain a license
as provided in this section; or
(d) A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager or
agent, unless the manager or agent possesses the same qualifications
required of the licensee.
(2)(a) The state liquor control board may, in its discretion,
subject to the provisions of RCW 69.50.334, suspend or cancel any
license; and all protections of the licensee from criminal or civil
sanctions under state law for producing, processing, or selling
marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products thereunder
shall be suspended or terminated, as the case may be.
(b) The state liquor control board shall immediately suspend the
license of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320
by the department of social and health services as a person who is not
in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to
meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension,
reissuance of the license shall be automatic upon the state liquor
control board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social
and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the
order.
(c) The state liquor control board may request the appointment of
administrative law judges under chapter 34.12 RCW who shall have power
to administer oaths, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses
and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and
testimony, examine witnesses, and to receive testimony in any inquiry,
investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, under
rules and regulations the state liquor control board may adopt.
(d) Witnesses shall be allowed fees and mileage each way to and
from any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding at the rate
authorized by RCW 34.05.446. Fees need not be paid in advance of
appearance of witnesses to testify or to produce books, records, or
other legal evidence.
(e) In case of disobedience of any person to comply with the order
of the state liquor control board or a subpoena issued by the state
liquor control board, or any of its members, or administrative law
judges, or on the refusal of a witness to testify to any matter
regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, the judge of
the superior court of the county in which the person resides, on
application of any member of the board or administrative law judge,
shall compel obedience by contempt proceedings, as in the case of
disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from said court
or a refusal to testify therein.
(3) Upon receipt of notice of the suspension or cancellation of a
license, the licensee shall forthwith deliver up the license to the
state liquor control board. Where the license has been suspended only,
the state liquor control board shall return the license to the licensee
at the expiration or termination of the period of suspension. The
state liquor control board shall notify all other licensees in the
county where the subject licensee has its premises of the suspension or
cancellation of the license; and no other licensee or employee of
another licensee may allow or cause any marijuana, useable marijuana,
or marijuana-infused products to be delivered to or for any person at
the premises of the subject licensee.
(4) Every license issued under chapter 3, Laws of 2013 shall be
subject to all conditions and restrictions imposed by chapter 3, Laws
of 2013 or by rules adopted by the state liquor control board to
implement and enforce chapter 3, Laws of 2013. All conditions and
restrictions imposed by the state liquor control board in the issuance
of an individual license shall be listed on the face of the individual
license along with the trade name, address, and expiration date.
(5) Every licensee shall post and keep posted its license, or
licenses, in a conspicuous place on the premises.
(6) No licensee shall employ any person under the age of twenty-one
years.
(7)(a) Before the state liquor control board issues a new or
renewed license to an applicant it shall give notice of the application
to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town, if the
application is for a license within an incorporated city or town, or to
the county legislative authority, if the application is for a license
outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns.
(b) The incorporated city or town through the official or employee
selected by it, or the county legislative authority or the official or
employee selected by it, shall have the right to file with the state
liquor control board within twenty days after the date of transmittal
of the notice for applications, or at least thirty days prior to the
expiration date for renewals, written objections against the applicant
or against the premises for which the new or renewed license is asked.
The state liquor control board may extend the time period for
submitting written objections.
(c) The written objections shall include a statement of all facts
upon which the objections are based, and in case written objections are
filed, the city or town or county legislative authority may request,
and the state liquor control board may in its discretion hold, a
hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If the
state liquor control board makes an initial decision to deny a license
or renewal based on the written objections of an incorporated city or
town or county legislative authority, the applicant may request a
hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If a
hearing is held at the request of the applicant, state liquor control
board representatives shall present and defend the state liquor control
board's initial decision to deny a license or renewal.
(d) Upon the granting of a license under this title the state
liquor control board shall send written notification to the chief
executive officer of the incorporated city or town in which the license
is granted, or to the county legislative authority if the license is
granted outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns.
(8) The state liquor control board shall not issue a license for
any premises within ((one thousand)) five hundred feet of the perimeter
of the grounds of any elementary or secondary school, playground,
recreation center or facility, child care center, public park, public
transit center, or library, or any game arcade admission to which is
not restricted to persons aged twenty-one years or older. This
distance shall be measured by the shortest straight line distance from
the main entrance of the building of the elementary or secondary
school, playground, recreation center or facility, child care center,
public park, public transit center, library, or any game arcade
admission to which is not restricted to persons under twenty-one years
of age, to the main entrance of the proposed licensed location.
(9) In determining whether to grant or deny a license or renewal of
any license, the state liquor control board shall give substantial
weight to objections from an incorporated city or town or county
legislative authority based upon chronic illegal activity associated
with the applicant's operations of the premises proposed to be licensed
or the applicant's operation of any other licensed premises, or the
conduct of the applicant's patrons inside or outside the licensed
premises. "Chronic illegal activity" means (a) a pervasive pattern of
activity that threatens the public health, safety, and welfare of the
city, town, or county including, but not limited to, open container
violations, assaults, disturbances, disorderly conduct, or other
criminal law violations, or as documented in crime statistics, police
reports, emergency medical response data, calls for service, field
data, or similar records of a law enforcement agency for the city,
town, county, or any other municipal corporation or any state agency;
or (b) an unreasonably high number of citations for violations of RCW
46.61.502 associated with the applicant's or licensee's operation of
any licensed premises as indicated by the reported statements given to
law enforcement upon arrest.

Sec. 3 RCW 69.50.342 and 2013 c 3 s 9 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
For the purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of chapter
3, Laws of 2013 according to their true intent or of supplying any
deficiency therein, the state liquor control board may adopt rules not
inconsistent with the spirit of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 as are deemed
necessary or advisable. Without limiting the generality of the
preceding sentence, the state liquor control board is empowered to
adopt rules regarding the following:
(1) The equipment and management of retail outlets and premises
where marijuana is produced or processed, and inspection of the retail
outlets and premises;
(2) The books and records to be created and maintained by
licensees, the reports to be made thereon to the state liquor control
board, and inspection of the books and records;
(3) Methods of producing, processing, and packaging marijuana,
useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products; conditions of
sanitation; and standards of ingredients, quality, and identity of
marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products produced,
processed, packaged, or sold by licensees;
(4) Security requirements for retail outlets and premises where
marijuana is produced or processed, and safety protocols for licensees
and their employees;
(5) Screening, hiring, training, and supervising employees of
licensees;
(6) Retail outlet locations and hours of operation;
(7) Labeling requirements and restrictions on advertisement of
marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products;
(8) Forms to be used for purposes of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 or the
rules adopted to implement and enforce it, the terms and conditions to
be contained in licenses issued under chapter 3, Laws of 2013, and the
qualifications for receiving a license issued under chapter 3, Laws of
2013, including a criminal history record information check. The state
liquor control board may submit any criminal history record information
check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division
of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may
search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the
individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The state liquor
control board shall require fingerprinting of any applicant whose
criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal
bureau of investigation;
(9) Application, reinstatement, and renewal fees for licenses
issued under chapter 3, Laws of 2013, and fees for anything done or
permitted to be done under the rules adopted to implement and enforce
chapter 3, Laws of 2013. The fees shall cover the cost of
administration and enforcement of the license;
(10) The authority to suspend a license. In suspending any
license, the board may further provide in the order of suspension that
such suspension shall be vacated upon payment to the board by the
licensee of a monetary penalty in an amount to be fixed by the board;
(11) The manner of giving and serving notices required by chapter
3, Laws of 2013 or rules adopted to implement or enforce it;
(((11))) (12) Times and periods when, and the manner, methods, and
means by which, licensees shall transport and deliver marijuana,
useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products within the state;
(((12))) (13) Identification, seizure, confiscation, destruction,
or donation to law enforcement for training purposes of all marijuana,
useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products produced, processed,
sold, or offered for sale within this state which do not conform in all
respects to the standards prescribed by chapter 3, Laws of 2013 or the
rules adopted to implement and enforce it: PROVIDED, That nothing in
chapter 3, Laws of 2013 shall be construed as authorizing the state
liquor control board to seize, confiscate, destroy, or donate to law
enforcement marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products
produced, processed, sold, offered for sale, or possessed in compliance
with the Washington state medical use of cannabis act, chapter 69.51A
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The eligibility of any person or entity seeking to legally
participate in the marketing of marijuana or marijuana-based products
in this state, as authorized under this act, requires that the state
liquor control board formally approve market participation by the
person or entity seeking such eligibility. The board shall develop
rules establishing the criteria and processes by which market
participation of an applicant may be authorized. Once the board has
approved an applicant for participation in the market, the board shall
issue a certificate to the applicant formally establishing such
authorization. The certificate providing authorization for a person or
entity to participate in the market shall be officially designated as
a "502 marketing certificate." The ownership of a 502 marketing
certificate makes the owner eligible to apply for a license as provided
in RCW 69.50.325, but does not in itself authorize such owner to engage
in the production, processing, or sale of marijuana or marijuana-based
products absent the requisite license. For the purposes of this
section, the following definitions apply:
(i) "Certificate" means the 502 marketing certificate as
established under this subsection (1)(a); and
(ii) "Marketing" means either the production, processing, or retail
sales of marijuana or marijuana-based products as authorized under RCW
69.50.325.
(b) Before an entity or person may be eligible to obtain a license
to produce, process, or engage in the retail sale of marijuana under
RCW 69.50.325, the entity or person must first be the owner of a
certificate issued under this section. A separate certificate is
required for each license for which the entity or person applies under
RCW 69.50.325.
(2) The 502 marketing certificate established under this section
provides the owner with a commercial property right that is separate
and distinct from the marketing licenses authorized under RCW
69.50.325. This certificate remains the property of the owner
regardless of whether the state liquor control board subsequently
determines that the owner is ineligible for a license or the owner
subsequently chooses not to operate in the market. The owner of a
certificate may resell the certificate to a subsequent purchaser
subject to board approval, or to the board itself. The board may
reissue a previously owned certificate to a qualified purchaser.
(3) The issuance of a certificate by the state liquor control board
must be by public sale and by a means that results in a selling price
that yields no less than the fair market value of the certificate, as
determined by the board. In obtaining fair market value, the board
shall utilize a process that will yield the greatest financial return
from the sale of the certificate.
(4) Within one hundred eighty days of a certificate being issued,
the owner of the certificate must apply for a license under RCW
69.50.325 and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. If an
owner of a certificate fails to qualify for a license, such owner must
return the certificate to the state liquor control board and fully
relinquish his or her property rights in the certificate. Upon doing
so, the former owner of the certificate is entitled to a refund from
the board of the certificate's purchase price, minus reasonable
administrative costs incurred by the board in processing the ownership
transfer.

Sec. 5 RCW 69.50.325 and 2013 c 3 s 4 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a marijuana producer's license to produce
marijuana for sale at wholesale to marijuana processors and other
marijuana producers, regulated by the state liquor control board and
subject to annual renewal. The production, possession, delivery,
distribution, and sale of marijuana in accordance with the provisions
of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 and the rules adopted to implement and
enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana producer, shall not be a
criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana
producer's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall
specify the location at which the marijuana producer intends to
operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder
thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. ((The
application fee for a marijuana producer's license shall be two hundred
fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana
producer's license shall be one thousand dollars.)) A separate license
shall be required for each location at which a marijuana producer
intends to produce marijuana.
(2) There shall be a marijuana processor's license to process,
package, and label useable marijuana and marijuana-infused products for
sale at wholesale to marijuana retailers, regulated by the state liquor
control board and subject to annual renewal. The processing,
packaging, possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana,
useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in accordance with
the provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 and the rules adopted to
implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana processor,
shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law.
Every marijuana processor's license shall be issued in the name of the
applicant, shall specify the location at which the licensee intends to
operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder
thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. ((The
application fee for a marijuana processor's license shall be two
hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a
marijuana processor's license shall be one thousand dollars.)) A
separate license shall be required for each location at which a
marijuana processor intends to process marijuana.
(3) There shall be a marijuana retailer's license to sell useable
marijuana and marijuana-infused products at retail in retail outlets,
regulated by the state liquor control board and subject to annual
renewal. The possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of useable
marijuana and marijuana-infused products in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 and the rules adopted to
implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana retailer,
shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law.
Every marijuana retailer's license shall be issued in the name of the
applicant, shall specify the location of the retail outlet the licensee
intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and
the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license.
((The application fee for a marijuana retailer's license shall be two
hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a
marijuana retailer's license shall be one thousand dollars.)) A
separate license shall be required for each location at which a
marijuana retailer intends to sell useable marijuana and marijuana-infused products.

Sec. 6 RCW 69.50.357 and 2013 c 3 s 14 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Retail outlets shall sell no products or services other than
useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or paraphernalia
intended for the storage or use of useable marijuana or marijuana-infused products.
(2) Licensed marijuana retailers shall not employ persons under
twenty-one years of age or allow persons under twenty-one years of age
to enter or remain on the premises of a retail outlet.
(3) Licensed marijuana retailers shall not display any signage in
a window, on a door, or on the outside of the premises of a retail
outlet that is visible to the general public from a public right-of-way, other than a single sign no larger than one thousand six hundred
square inches identifying the retail outlet by the licensee's business
or trade name.
(4) Licensed marijuana retailers shall not display useable
marijuana or marijuana-infused products in a manner that is visible to
the general public from a public right-of-way.
(5) No licensed marijuana retailer or employee of a retail outlet
shall open or consume, or allow to be opened or consumed, any useable
marijuana or marijuana-infused product on the outlet premises.
(((6) The state liquor control board shall fine a licensee one
thousand dollars for each violation of any subsection of this section.
Fines collected under this section must be deposited into the dedicated
marijuana fund created under RCW 69.50.530.))

Sec. 7 RCW 69.50.369 and 2013 c 3 s 18 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) No licensed marijuana producer, processor, or retailer shall
place or maintain, or cause to be placed or maintained, an
advertisement of marijuana, useable marijuana, or a marijuana-infused
product in any form or through any medium whatsoever:
(a) Within one thousand feet of the perimeter of a school grounds,
playground, recreation center or facility, child care center, public
park, or library, or any game arcade admission to which is not
restricted to persons aged twenty-one years or older;
(b) On or in a public transit vehicle or public transit shelter; or
(c) On or in a publicly owned or operated property.
(2) Merchandising within a retail outlet is not advertising for the
purposes of this section.
(3) This section does not apply to a noncommercial message.
(((4) The state liquor control board shall fine a licensee one
thousand dollars for each violation of subsection (1) of this section.
Fines collected under this subsection must be deposited into the
dedicated marijuana fund created under RCW 69.50.530.))

--- END ---