BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.09.520 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 936 and 2010 c 161
s 222 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state
treasurer ((shall)) must refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent
of the motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36
RCW, based on a tax rate ((of: (a) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor
vehicle fuel from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (b) twenty cents
per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30,
2007; (c) twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July
1, 2007, through June 30, 2009; (d) twenty-two cents per gallon of
motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011; and (e)
twenty-three cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1,
2011, and thereafter)) equal to the motor vehicle fuel tax rate in
current use during the calendar year under determination, as provided
in RCW 82.36.025, less proper deductions for refunds and costs of
collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090.
(2) The treasurer ((shall)) must place these funds in the general
fund as follows:
(a) Thirty-six percent ((shall)) must be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of
natural resources solely for acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities, and information programs and maintenance of
nonhighway roads;
(b) Three and one-half percent ((shall)) must be credited to the
ORV and nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department
of fish and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and the maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(c) Two percent ((shall)) must be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the parks and recreation
commission solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities; and
(d) Fifty-eight and one-half percent ((shall)) must be credited to
the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account to be
administered by the board for planning, acquisition, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and for education, information, and law
enforcement programs. The funds under this subsection ((shall)) must
be expended in accordance with the following limitations:
(i) Not more than thirty percent may be expended for education,
information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than seventy percent may be expended for ORV,
nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities. Except as
provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, of this amount:
(A) Not less than thirty percent, together with the funds the board
receives under RCW 46.68.045, may be expended for ORV recreation
facilities;
(B) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonmotorized
recreation facilities. Funds expended under this subsection
(2)(d)(ii)(B) shall be known as Ira Spring outdoor recreation
facilities funds; and
(C) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities;
(iii) The board may waive the minimum percentage cited in (d)(ii)
of this subsection due to insufficient requests for funds or projects
that score low in the board's project evaluation. Funds remaining
after such a waiver must be allocated in accordance with board policy.
(3) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.68.045, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.
(4) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
appropriate such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the NOVA
account to the department of natural resources to install consistent
off-road vehicle signage at department-managed recreation sites, and to
implement the recreation opportunities on department-managed lands in
the Reiter block and Ahtanum state forest, and to the state parks and
recreation commission. The legislature finds that the appropriation of
funds from the NOVA account during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium for
maintenance and operation of state parks or to improve accessibility
for boaters and off-road vehicle users at state parks will benefit
boaters and off-road vehicle users and others who use nonhighway and
nonmotorized recreational facilities. The appropriations under this
subsection are not required to follow the specific distribution
specified in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.10.530 and 2003 c 361 s 408 are each amended to
read as follows:
From time to time, but at least once each four years, the
department ((shall)) must determine the amount of moneys paid to it as
motor vehicle fuel tax that is tax on snowmobile fuel. ((Such)) This
determination ((shall)) must use one hundred thirty-five gallons as the
average yearly fuel usage per snowmobile, the number of registered
snowmobiles during the calendar year under determination, and a fuel
tax rate ((of: (1) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel
from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (2) twenty cents per gallon
of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; (3)
twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2007,
through June 30, 2009; (4) twenty-two cents per gallon of motor vehicle
fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011; and (5) twenty-three
cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1, 2011, and
thereafter)) equal to the motor vehicle fuel tax rate in current use
during the calendar year under determination, as provided in RCW
82.36.025.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.25.070 and 2010 c 23 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon expiration of the time limited by RCW 82.36.330 for claiming
of refunds of tax on marine fuel, the state of Washington ((shall))
succeeds to the right to such refunds. The director of licensing,
after taking into account past and anticipated claims for refunds from
and deposits to the marine fuel tax refund account, ((shall)) must
request the state treasurer to transfer monthly from the marine fuel
tax refund account an amount equal to the proportion of the moneys in
the account representing a motor vehicle fuel tax rate ((of: (1)
Nineteen cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2003,
through June 30, 2005; (2) twenty cents per gallon of motor vehicle
fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; (3) twenty-one cents per
gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2009;
(4) twenty-two cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1,
2009, through June 30, 2011; and (5) twenty-three cents per gallon of
motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1, 2011, and thereafter)) equal to
the motor vehicle fuel tax rate in current use during the calendar year
under determination, as provided in RCW 82.36.025, to the recreation
resource account and the remainder to the motor vehicle fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---