BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.405.210 and 2010 c 235 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
No teacher, principal, supervisor, superintendent, or other
certificated employee, holding a position as such with a school
district, hereinafter referred to as "employee", shall be employed
except by written order of a majority of the directors of the district
at a regular or special meeting thereof, nor unless he or she is the
holder of an effective teacher's certificate or other certificate
required by law or the Washington professional educator standards board
for the position for which the employee is employed.
The board shall make with each employee employed by it a written
contract, which shall be in conformity with the laws of this state, and
except as otherwise provided by law, limited to a term of not more than
one year. Every such contract shall be made in duplicate, one copy to
be retained by the school district superintendent or secretary and one
copy to be delivered to the employee. No contract shall be offered by
any board for the employment of any employee who has previously signed
an employment contract for that same term in another school district of
the state of Washington unless such employee shall have been released
from his or her obligations under such previous contract by the board
of directors of the school district to which he or she was obligated.
Any contract signed in violation of this provision shall be void.
In the event it is determined that there is probable cause or
causes that the employment contract of an employee should not be
renewed by the district for the next ensuing term such employee shall
be notified in writing on or before May 15th preceding the commencement
of such term of that determination, or if the omnibus appropriations
act has not passed the legislature by ((May 15th)) the end of the
regular legislative session for that year, then notification shall be
no later than June 15th, which notification shall specify the cause or
causes for nonrenewal of contract. Such determination of probable
cause for certificated employees, other than the superintendent, shall
be made by the superintendent. Such notice shall be served upon the
employee personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by leaving
a copy of the notice at the house of his or her usual abode with some
person of suitable age and discretion then resident therein. Every
such employee so notified, at his or her request made in writing and
filed with the president, chair or secretary of the board of directors
of the district within ten days after receiving such notice, shall be
granted opportunity for hearing pursuant to RCW 28A.405.310 to
determine whether there is sufficient cause or causes for nonrenewal of
contract: PROVIDED, That any employee receiving notice of nonrenewal
of contract due to an enrollment decline or loss of revenue may, in his
or her request for a hearing, stipulate that initiation of the
arrangements for a hearing officer as provided for by RCW
28A.405.310(4) shall occur within ten days following July 15 rather
than the day that the employee submits the request for a hearing. If
any such notification or opportunity for hearing is not timely given,
the employee entitled thereto shall be conclusively presumed to have
been reemployed by the district for the next ensuing term upon
contractual terms identical with those which would have prevailed if
his or her employment had actually been renewed by the board of
directors for such ensuing term.
This section shall not be applicable to "provisional employees" as
so designated in RCW 28A.405.220; transfer to a subordinate
certificated position as that procedure is set forth in RCW 28A.405.230
or 28A.405.245 shall not be construed as a nonrenewal of contract for
the purposes of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.405.220 and 2012 c 35 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 28A.405.210, every person
employed by a school district in a teaching or other nonsupervisory
certificated position shall be subject to nonrenewal of employment
contract as provided in this section during the first three years of
employment by such district, unless: (a) The employee has previously
completed at least two years of certificated employment in another
school district in the state of Washington, in which case the employee
shall be subject to nonrenewal of employment contract pursuant to this
section during the first year of employment with the new district; or
(b) the employee has received an evaluation rating below level 2 on the
four-level rating system established under RCW 28A.405.100 during the
third year of employment, in which case the employee shall remain
subject to the nonrenewal of the employment contract until the employee
receives a level 2 rating; or (c) the school district superintendent
may make a determination to remove an employee from provisional status
if the employee has received one of the top two evaluation ratings
during the second year of employment by the district. Employees as
defined in this section shall hereinafter be referred to as
"provisional employees."
(2) In the event the superintendent of the school district
determines that the employment contract of any provisional employee
should not be renewed by the district for the next ensuing term such
provisional employee shall be notified thereof in writing on or before
May 15th preceding the commencement of such school term, or if the
omnibus appropriations act has not passed the legislature by ((May
15th)) the end of the regular legislative session for that year, then
notification shall be no later than June 15th, which notification shall
state the reason or reasons for such determination. Such notice shall
be served upon the provisional employee personally, or by certified or
registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the place of his
or her usual abode with some person of suitable age and discretion then
resident therein. The determination of the superintendent shall be
subject to the evaluation requirements of RCW 28A.405.100.
(3) Every such provisional employee so notified, at his or her
request made in writing and filed with the superintendent of the
district within ten days after receiving such notice, shall be given
the opportunity to meet informally with the superintendent for the
purpose of requesting the superintendent to reconsider his or her
decision. Such meeting shall be held no later than ten days following
the receipt of such request, and the provisional employee shall be
given written notice of the date, time and place of meeting at least
three days prior thereto. At such meeting the provisional employee
shall be given the opportunity to refute any facts upon which the
superintendent's determination was based and to make any argument in
support of his or her request for reconsideration.
(4) Within ten days following the meeting with the provisional
employee, the superintendent shall either reinstate the provisional
employee or shall submit to the school district board of directors for
consideration at its next regular meeting a written report recommending
that the employment contract of the provisional employee be nonrenewed
and stating the reason or reasons therefor. A copy of such report
shall be delivered to the provisional employee at least three days
prior to the scheduled meeting of the board of directors. In taking
action upon the recommendation of the superintendent, the board of
directors shall consider any written communication which the
provisional employee may file with the secretary of the board at any
time prior to that meeting.
(5) The board of directors shall notify the provisional employee in
writing of its final decision within ten days following the meeting at
which the superintendent's recommendation was considered. The decision
of the board of directors to nonrenew the contract of a provisional
employee shall be final and not subject to appeal.
(6) This section applies to any person employed by a school
district in a teaching or other nonsupervisory certificated position
after June 25, 1976. This section provides the exclusive means for
nonrenewing the employment contract of a provisional employee and no
other provision of law shall be applicable thereto, including, without
limitation, RCW 28A.405.210 and chapter 28A.645 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.405.230 and 2010 c 235 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any certificated employee of a school district employed as an
assistant superintendent, director, principal, assistant principal,
coordinator, or in any other supervisory or administrative position,
hereinafter in this section referred to as "administrator", shall be
subject to transfer, at the expiration of the term of his or her
employment contract, to any subordinate certificated position within
the school district. "Subordinate certificated position" as used in
this section, shall mean any administrative or nonadministrative
certificated position for which the annual compensation is less than
the position currently held by the administrator.
Every superintendent determining that the best interests of the
school district would be served by transferring any administrator to a
subordinate certificated position shall notify that administrator in
writing on or before May 15th preceding the commencement of such school
term of that determination, or if the omnibus appropriations act has
not passed the legislature by ((May 15th)) the end of the regular
legislative session for that year, then notification shall be no later
than June 15th, which notification shall state the reason or reasons
for the transfer, and shall identify the subordinate certificated
position to which the administrator will be transferred. Such notice
shall be served upon the administrator personally, or by certified or
registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the place of his
or her usual abode with some person of suitable age and discretion then
resident therein.
Every such administrator so notified, at his or her request made in
writing and filed with the president or chair, or secretary of the
board of directors of the district within ten days after receiving such
notice, shall be given the opportunity to meet informally with the
board of directors in an executive session thereof for the purpose of
requesting the board to reconsider the decision of the superintendent.
Such board, upon receipt of such request, shall schedule the meeting
for no later than the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board,
and shall notify the administrator in writing of the date, time and
place of the meeting at least three days prior thereto. At such
meeting the administrator shall be given the opportunity to refute any
facts upon which the determination was based and to make any argument
in support of his or her request for reconsideration. The
administrator and the board may invite their respective legal counsel
to be present and to participate at the meeting. The board shall
notify the administrator in writing of its final decision within ten
days following its meeting with the administrator. No appeal to the
courts shall lie from the final decision of the board of directors to
transfer an administrator to a subordinate certificated position:
PROVIDED, That in the case of principals such transfer shall be made at
the expiration of the contract year and only during the first three
consecutive school years of employment as a principal by a school
district; except that if any such principal has been previously
employed as a principal by another school district in the state of
Washington for three or more consecutive school years the provisions of
this section shall apply only to the first full school year of such
employment.
This section applies to any person employed as an administrator by
a school district on June 25, 1976, and to all persons so employed at
any time thereafter, except that RCW 28A.405.245 applies to persons
first employed after June 10, 2010, as a principal by a school district
meeting the criteria of RCW 28A.405.245. This section provides the
exclusive means for transferring an administrator subject to this
section to a subordinate certificated position at the expiration of the
term of his or her employment contract.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.405.245 and 2010 c 235 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any certificated employee of a school district under this
section who is first employed as a principal after June 10, 2010, shall
be subject to transfer as provided under this section, at the
expiration of the term of his or her employment contract, to any
subordinate certificated position within the school district.
"Subordinate certificated position" as used in this section means any
administrative or nonadministrative certificated position for which the
annual compensation is less than the position currently held by the
administrator. This section applies only to school districts with an
annual average student enrollment of more than thirty-five thousand
full-time equivalent students.
(2) During the first three consecutive school years of employment
as a principal by the school district, or during the first full school
year of such employment in the case of a principal who has been
previously employed as a principal by another school district in the
state for three or more consecutive school years, the transfer of the
principal to a subordinate certificated position may be made by a
determination of the superintendent that the best interests of the
school district would be served by the transfer.
(3) Commencing with the fourth consecutive school year of
employment as a principal, or the second consecutive school year of
such employment in the case of a principal who has been previously
employed as a principal by another school district in the state for
three or more consecutive school years, the transfer of the principal
to a subordinate certificated position shall be based on the
superintendent's determination that the results of the evaluation of
the principal's performance using the evaluative criteria and rating
system established under RCW 28A.405.100 provide a valid reason for the
transfer without regard to whether there is probable cause for the
transfer. If a valid reason is shown, it shall be deemed that the
transfer is reasonably related to the principal's performance. No
probationary period is required. However, provision of support and an
attempt at remediation of the performance of the principal, as defined
by the superintendent, are required for a determination by the
superintendent under this subsection that the principal should be
transferred to a subordinate certificated position.
(4) Any superintendent transferring a principal under this section
to a subordinate certificated position shall notify that principal in
writing on or before May 15th before the beginning of the school year
of that determination, or if the omnibus appropriations act has not
passed the legislature by ((May 15th)) the end of the regular
legislative session for that year, then notification shall be no later
than June 15th. The notification shall state the reason or reasons for
the transfer and shall identify the subordinate certificated position
to which the principal will be transferred. The notification shall be
served upon the principal personally, or by certified or registered
mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the place of his or her
usual abode with some person of suitable age and discretion then
resident therein.
(5) Any principal so notified may request to the president or chair
of the board of directors of the district, in writing and within ten
days after receiving notice, an opportunity to meet informally with the
board of directors in an executive session for the purpose of
requesting the board to reconsider the decision of the superintendent,
and shall be given such opportunity. The board, upon receipt of such
request, shall schedule the meeting for no later than the next
regularly scheduled meeting of the board, and shall give the principal
written notice at least three days before the meeting of the date,
time, and place of the meeting. At the meeting the principal shall be
given the opportunity to refute any evidence upon which the
determination was based and to make any argument in support of his or
her request for reconsideration. The principal and the board may
invite their respective legal counsel to be present and to participate
at the meeting. The board shall notify the principal in writing of its
final decision within ten days following its meeting with the
principal. No appeal to the courts shall lie from the final decision
of the board of directors to transfer a principal to a subordinate
certificated position.
(6) This section provides the exclusive means for transferring a
certificated employee first employed by a school district under this
section as a principal after June 10, 2010, to a subordinate
certificated position at the expiration of the term of his or her
employment contract.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.310.250 and 2009 c 57 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
No certificated employee of an educational service district shall
be employed as such except by written contract, which shall be in
conformity with the laws of this state. Every such contract shall be
made in duplicate, one copy of which shall be retained by the
educational service district superintendent and the other shall be
delivered to the employee.
Every educational service district superintendent or board
determining that there is probable cause or causes that the employment
contract of a certificated employee thereof is not to be renewed for
the next ensuing term shall be notified in writing on or before May
15th preceding the commencement of such term of that determination or
if the omnibus appropriations act has not passed the legislature by
((May 15th)) the end of the regular legislative session for that year,
then notification shall be no later than June 15th, which notification
shall specify the cause or causes for nonrenewal of contract. Such
notice shall be served upon that employee personally, or by certified
or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the house of
his or her usual abode with some person of suitable age and discretion
then resident therein. The procedure and standards for the review of
the decision of the hearing officer, superintendent or board and appeal
therefrom shall be as prescribed for nonrenewal cases of teachers in
RCW 28A.405.210, 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380, and 28A.645.010.
Appeals may be filed in the superior court of any county in the
educational service district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---