BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that sediment removal
from streams, ponds, wetlands, and lakes is of paramount importance in
order to restore salmon habitat in streams that have been degraded by
urban development and surface water runoff. Due to the economic
downturn, state agencies and local governments have limited resources
to accomplish such restoration work. Citizen volunteers can be
effectively utilized using portable gas-powered mini-suction dredges
that are specifically designed to remove sediment with minimum water
quality disturbance. Currently, there are regulatory impediments to
volunteer organizations undertaking this restoration work. It is the
legislature's intent to create a pamphlet hydraulic project approval
permit that allows citizen volunteers to remove these nutrient rich
sediments without having to undertake a burdensome regulatory
permitting process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any activity conducted solely for the removal of accumulated
organic and nutrient laden sediment from fresh waters of the state,
including through the use of small gas-powered portable dredges, does
not require a permit under this chapter if the activity is conducted in
accordance with rules established by the department.
(2) By December 31, 2014, the department shall adopt rules
applicable to sediment removal subject to this section.
(3) Following the adoption of the rules required under subsection
(2) of this section, the department shall produce and distribute a
pamphlet describing the activities approved under the rules. The
pamphlet serves as the permit for any project that is conducted solely
for the purposes of removing accumulated organic and nutrient laden
sediment from fresh waters of the state.

--- END ---