BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a significant
percentage of pregnancies are unintended and could be averted with
broader access to health care and effective contraception. Providing
broader access to contraceptive drugs for women covered by medicaid
programs could avert up to twenty-six percent of unintended pregnancies
and result in an estimated four million dollars in savings for health
care programs. Research suggests that moving from twenty-eight day
dispensing of contraceptive drugs to one year dispensing improves
adherence to maintenance drugs and effective use of the prescribed
contraceptives. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to
require the health care authority and all medicaid programs, fee-for-service and managed care, to require dispensing of contraceptive drugs
with up to a one-year supply provided at one time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The authority must make arrangements for all medicaid programs
offered through managed care plans or fee-for-service to require
dispensing of contraceptive drugs with a one-year supply provided at
one time unless a patient requests a smaller supply or the prescribing
physician instructs that the patient must receive a smaller supply.
Contracts with managed care plans must allow on-site dispensing of the
prescribed contraceptive drugs at family planning clinics. Dispensing
practices must follow clinical guidelines for appropriate prescribing
and dispensing to ensure the health of the patient while maximizing
access to effective contraceptive drugs.

--- END ---