BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington jobs act of 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that start-up
companies play a critical role in creating new jobs and revenues.
Crowdfunding, or raising money through small contributions from a large
number of investors, allows smaller enterprises to access the capital
they need to get new businesses off the ground. The legislature
further finds that the costs of state securities registration often
outweigh the benefits to Washington start-ups seeking to make small
securities offerings and that the use of crowdfunding for business
financing in Washington is significantly restricted by state securities
laws. Helping new businesses access equity crowdfunding within certain
boundaries will democratize venture capital and facilitate investment
by Washington residents in Washington start-ups while protecting
consumers and investors. For these reasons, the legislature intends to
provide Washington businesses and investors the opportunity to benefit
from equity crowdfunding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 21.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any offer or sale of a security is exempt from RCW 21.20.040
through 21.20.300 and 21.20.327, except as expressly provided, if:
(a) The offering is first declared exempt by the director after:
(i) The issuer files the offering with the director; or
(ii) A portal working in collaboration with the director files the
offering with the director on behalf of the issuer under section 4 of
this act;
(b) The offering is conducted in accordance with the requirements
of section 3(a)(11) of the securities act of 1933 and securities and
exchange commission rule 147, 17 C.F.R. Sec. 230.147;
(c) The issuer is an entity organized and doing business in the
state of Washington;
(d) Each investor provides evidence or certification of residency
in the state of Washington at the time of purchase;
(e) The issuer files with the director an escrow agreement either
directly or through a portal providing that all offering proceeds will
be released to the issuer only when the aggregate capital raised from
all investors equals or exceeds the minimum target offering, as
determined by the director;
(f) The aggregate purchase price of all securities sold by an
issuer pursuant to the exemption provided by this section does not
exceed one million dollars during any twelve-month period;
(g) The aggregate amount sold to any investor by one or more
issuers during the twelve-month period preceding the date of the sale
does not exceed:
(i) The greater of two thousand dollars or five percent of the
annual income or net worth of the investor, as applicable, if either
the annual income or the net worth of the investor is less than one
hundred thousand dollars; or
(ii) Ten percent of the annual income or net worth of the investor,
as applicable, up to one hundred thousand dollars, if either the annual
income or net worth of the investor is one hundred thousand dollars or
more;
(h) The investor acknowledges by electronic signature the following
statement conspicuously presented at the time of sale on a page
separate from other information relating to the offering: "I
acknowledge that I am investing in a high-risk, speculative business
venture, that I may lose all of my investment, and that I can afford
the loss of my investment";
(i) The issuer reasonably believes that all purchasers are
purchasing for investment and not for sale in connection with a
distribution of the security; and
(j) The issuer and investor provide any other information
reasonably requested by the director.
(2) Attempted compliance with the exemption provided by this
section does not act as an exclusive election. The issuer may claim
any other applicable exemption.
(3) If the issuer elects to use a portal under section 4 of this
act, for as long as securities issued under the exemption provided by
this section are outstanding, the issuer shall provide a quarterly
report within forty-five days of the end of each fiscal quarter to the
director and to the portal that the issuer used. The issuer must also
provide the report to the issuer's shareholders by making such report
publicly accessible, free of charge, at the issuer's internet web site
address. The report must contain the following information:
(a) Executive officer and director compensation, including
specifically the cash compensation earned by the executive officers and
directors since the previous report and on an annual basis, and any
bonuses or other compensation, including stock options or other rights
to receive equity securities of the issuer or any affiliate of the
issuer, received by them;
(b) A brief analysis by management of the issuer of the business
operations and financial condition of the issuer;
(c) A summary of the employment positions created in Washington,
not to include names of employees, since and attributable to receiving
funding under this section. The summary must include:
(i) The number of employment positions;
(ii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater;
(iii) The nature of benefits, including medical, dental, and
retirement benefits, provided to a majority of the employment
positions; and
(d) For an issuer receiving public benefits or resources such as
tax incentives, a description of the public resources received.
(4) Securities issued under the exemption provided by this section
may not be transferred by the purchaser during a one-year period
beginning on the date of purchase, unless the securities are
transferred:
(a) To the issuer of the securities;
(b) To an accredited investor;
(c) As part of a registered offering; or
(d) To a member of the family of the purchaser or the equivalent,
or in connection with the death or divorce or other similar
circumstances, in the discretion of the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 21.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Only an economic development organization may work in
collaboration with the director to act as a portal under this chapter.
For the purposes of this section, "economic development organization"
means any local associate development organization, as defined in RCW
43.330.010, or port district.
(2) An economic development organization shall require, at a
minimum, the following information from an applicant for exemption
prior to offering services to the applicant or forwarding the
applicant's materials to the director:
(a) A description of the issuer, including type of entity,
location, and business plan, if any;
(b) The applicant's intended use of proceeds from an offering under
this act;
(c) Identities of officers, directors, managing members, and ten
percent beneficial owners, as applicable;
(d) A description of any outstanding securities; and
(e) A description of any litigation or legal proceedings involving
the applicant, its officers, directors, managing members, or ten
percent beneficial owners, as applicable.
(3) Upon receipt of the information described in subsection (2) of
this section, the economic development organization may offer services
to the applicant that the economic development organization deems
appropriate or necessary to meet the criteria for exemption under
sections 3 and 5 of this act. Such services may include assistance
with development of a business plan, referral to legal services, and
other technical assistance in preparation for a public securities
offering.
(4) The economic development organization shall forward the
materials necessary for the applicant to qualify for exemption to the
director for filing when the economic development organization is
satisfied that the applicant has assembled the necessary information
and materials to meet the criteria for exemption under sections 3 and
5 of this act.
(5) The economic development organization shall work in
collaboration with the director for the purposes of executing the
offering upon filing with the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 21.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The director must adopt rules to implement sections 2 and 3 of this
act subject to RCW 21.20.450 including, but not limited to:
(1) Adopting rules for filing with the director under sections 3
and 4 of this act by October 1, 2014;
(2) Establishing filing and transaction fees sufficient to cover
the costs of administering this section and sections 2 through 4 of
this act by January 1, 2015; and
(3) Adopting any other rules to implement sections 3 and 4 of this
act by April 1, 2015.
The director shall take steps and adopt rules to implement this
section by the dates specified in this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 42.56.270 and 2013 c 305 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.325, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and
43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(b) Internal control documents, independent auditors' reports and
financial statements, and supporting documents: (i) Of house-banked
social card game licensees required by the gambling commission pursuant
to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW; or (ii) submitted by tribes
with an approved tribal/state compact for class III gaming;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
commerce:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce pursuant to RCW
43.330.050(8); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce or the office of the
governor in connection with the siting, recruitment, expansion,
retention, or relocation of that person's business and until a siting
decision is made, identifying information of any person supplying
information under this subsection and the locations being considered
for siting, relocation, or expansion of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of commerce based on
information as described in (a)(i) of this subsection, any work product
is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of commerce from a person connected with siting,
recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's
business, information described in (a)(ii) of this subsection will be
available to the public under this chapter;
(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained
by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter
70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information;
(15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to
the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or
19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does
not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel
licensees;
(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;
(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless
permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or
operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit;
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to
RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;
(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and
services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under
RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
providers of this information;
(19) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328
that can be identified to a particular business;
(20) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained
by the University of Washington, other than information the university
is required to disclose under RCW 28B.20.150, when the information
relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such
information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in
loss to the University of Washington consolidated endowment fund or to
result in private loss to the providers of this information;
(21) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by innovate Washington in
applications for, or delivery of, grants and loans under chapter 43.333
RCW, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably
be expected to result in private loss to the providers of this
information; ((and))
(22) Market share data submitted by a manufacturer under RCW
70.95N.190(4); and
(23) Financial information supplied to the department of financial
institutions or to a portal under section 4 of this act, when filed by
or on behalf of an issuer of securities for the purpose of obtaining
the exemption from state securities registration for small securities
offerings provided under section 3 of this act or when filed by or on
behalf of an investor for the purpose of purchasing such securities.

--- END ---