BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the design
alternative selected by the state department of transportation, the
federal highway administration, and the federal transit administration
for a new Interstate 5 bridge that connects Vancouver, Washington to
Portland, Oregon is not acceptable as currently designed.
(2) The legislature further finds that:
(a) The United States coast guard has not approved the design
alternative due to a lack of clearance between the Columbia river and
the bridge deck, which will adversely affect the free movement of
maritime freight and future economic development;
(b) The inclusion of light rail in the design alternative results
in a cost increase to the project of over nine hundred twenty-five
million dollars for taxpayers, while imposing a commute time penalty of
one hundred twenty-five percent for Vancouver transit riders;
(c) The citizens of Clark county voted in November 2012 not to fund
the costs of operating and maintaining light rail; and
(d) The current design alternative will not reduce congestion as it
only offers three full span vehicular lanes in each direction, which is
the same as the current Interstate 5 bridge.
(3) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature that no funds be
spent to further the selected design alternative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department is prohibited from expending funds on the design
or construction of any project that replaces the bridges on Interstate
5 between Vancouver, Washington and Portland, Oregon as designed in the
December 7, 2011, record of decision.
(2)(a) The department must prepare a new design alternative that
includes the following:
(i) A clearance height between the bridge deck and the Columbia
river that accommodates all existing and future river users and
accommodates those river users' reasonable and foreseeable future
needs; and
(ii) A third bridge in addition to the Interstate 5 and Interstate
205 bridges to accommodate more lanes of traffic.
(b) The design alternative must not include light rail.
(3) Any new design must either expand general lane capacity or
create a measurable improvement of congestion and commute times.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---