BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that adoption and
implementation of Initiative Measure No. 1183 has had certain
unanticipated adverse consequences for the successful bidders for the
former state-owned liquor stores. Many of those successful bidders
believe that they were misled by the liquor control board with respect
to the continued viability of such liquor stores following
implementation of Initiative Measure No. 1183 in part because of their
proximity to other larger stores holding spirits retail licenses, their
inability to secure new leases at affordable rents, uncertainty
concerning the inventory to be purchased, and the application of fees
on certain sales and other factors.
(2) The legislature further finds that in order to mitigate the
hardships suffered by the successful bidders of former state liquor
stores, to support small business owners, and to satisfy claims that
the successful bidders of former state liquor stores have asserted or
may assert against the state based on alleged misrepresentations by the
liquor control board, it is appropriate and necessary to modify the
rights and obligations of the successful bidders of former state liquor
stores.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Until July 30, 2013, any party that was a successful bidder for
a former state liquor store may apply to the Washington state liquor
control board for a refund of the total amount of the successful bid
for such location. A refund under this section must be granted upon
verification by the board that the refund applicant was the successful
bidder for the state-owned store. If the rights secured by a
successful bid have been sold to another party, no application for
refund under this section may be submitted. A refund under this
section may not include direct sales expenses and other transition
costs incurred by the board that were not deposited into the liquor
revolving fund following the initial sale.
(2) A successful bidder of a former state liquor store may sell any
remaining inventory of spirits from the former state liquor store to
any holder of a spirits retail license at the same price that the
product was acquired by the successful bidder of the former state
liquor store. The sale of such inventory is not considered to be
spirits sales revenue for the purposes of RCW 66.24.630(4).

--- END ---