BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.5249 and 2012 c 183 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) A person is guilty of negligent driving in the first degree
if he or she operates a motor vehicle in a manner that is both
negligent and endangers or is likely to endanger any person or
property, and exhibits the effects of having consumed liquor,
marijuana, or an illegal drug or exhibits the effects of having inhaled
or ingested any chemical, whether or not a legal substance, for its
intoxicating or hallucinatory effects.
(b) It is an affirmative defense to negligent driving in the first
degree by means of exhibiting the effects of having consumed an illegal
drug that must be proved by the defendant by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the driver has a valid prescription for the drug
consumed, and has been consuming it according to the prescription
directions and warnings.
(c) Negligent driving in the first degree is a misdemeanor.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Negligent" means the failure to exercise ordinary care, and is
the doing of some act that a reasonably careful person would not do
under the same or similar circumstances or the failure to do something
that a reasonably careful person would do under the same or similar
circumstances.
(b) "Exhibiting the effects of having consumed liquor" means that
a person has the odor of liquor on his or her breath, or that by
speech, manner, appearance, behavior, lack of coordination, or
otherwise exhibits that he or she has consumed liquor, and either:
(i) Is in possession of or in close proximity to a container that
has or recently had liquor in it; or
(ii) Is shown by other evidence to have recently consumed liquor.
(c) "Exhibiting the effects of having consumed marijuana" means
that a person has the odor of marijuana on his or her person, or by
speech, manner, appearance, behavior, lack of coordination, or
otherwise exhibits that he or she has consumed marijuana and either:
(i) Is in possession of or in close proximity to a container that
has or recently had marijuana in it; or
(ii) Is shown by other evidence to have recently consumed
marijuana.
(d) "Exhibiting the effects of having consumed an illegal drug"
means that a person by speech, manner, appearance, behavior, lack of
coordination, or otherwise exhibits that he or she has consumed an
illegal drug and either:
(i) Is in possession of an illegal drug; or
(ii) Is shown by other evidence to have recently consumed an
illegal drug.
(((d))) (e) "Exhibiting the effects of having inhaled or ingested
any chemical, whether or not a legal substance, for its intoxicating or
hallucinatory effects" means that a person by speech, manner,
appearance, behavior, or lack of coordination or otherwise exhibits
that he or she has inhaled or ingested a chemical and either:
(i) Is in possession of the canister or container from which the
chemical came; or
(ii) Is shown by other evidence to have recently inhaled or
ingested a chemical for its intoxicating or hallucinatory effects.
(((e))) (f) "Illegal drug" means a controlled substance under
chapter 69.50 RCW for which the driver does not have a valid
prescription or that is not being consumed in accordance with the
prescription directions and warnings, or a legend drug under chapter
69.41 RCW for which the driver does not have a valid prescription or
that is not being consumed in accordance with the prescription
directions and warnings.
(3) Any act prohibited by this section that also constitutes a
crime under any other law of this state may be the basis of prosecution
under such other law notwithstanding that it may also be the basis for
prosecution under this section.
(4) A person convicted of negligent driving in the first degree who
has one or more prior offenses as defined in RCW 46.61.5055(14) within
seven years shall be required, under RCW 46.20.720, to install an
ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person.

--- END ---