BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to enact legislation
concerning funding K-12 basic education and higher education by
narrowing or eliminating certain state tax exemptions, deductions,
credits, and preferential rates.

--- END ---