BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.29002 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1101 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((Beginning May 1, 2010, through June 30, 2013,)) An additional
rate of tax of 0.30 percent is added to the rate provided for in RCW
82.04.255, 82.04.285, and 82.04.290(2)(a). Revenue collected from the
additional rate of tax under this subsection (1) must be deposited in
the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230.
(2)(a) The additional rate in subsection (1) of this section does
not apply to persons engaging within this state in business as a
hospital. "Hospital" has the meaning provided in chapter 70.41 RCW but
also includes any hospital that comes within the scope of chapter 71.12
RCW if the hospital is also licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.
(b) The additional rate in subsection (1) of this section does not
apply to amounts received from performing scientific research and
development services including but not limited to research and
development in the physical, engineering, and life sciences (such as
agriculture, bacteriological, biotechnology, chemical, life sciences,
and physical science research and development laboratories or
services).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---