BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 82.36.029 (Deductions -- Handling losses -- Reports) and 1998
c 176 s 10; and
(2) RCW 82.38.083 (Deductions -- Handling losses -- Reports) and 2013
c 225 s 205.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---