BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.201 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 923 are each
amended to read as follows:
The legislative authority of a county may elect, by giving written
notice to the director and the treasurer prior to January 1st of any
year, to obtain for the following year an amount in lieu of real
property taxes on game lands as provided in RCW 77.12.203. Upon the
election, the county ((shall)) must keep a record of all fines,
forfeitures, reimbursements, and costs assessed and collected, in whole
or in part, under this title for violations of law or rules adopted
pursuant to this title, ((with the exception of the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium,)) and ((shall)) must monthly remit an amount equal to the
amount collected to the state treasurer for deposit in the state
general fund. The election ((shall)) must continue until the
department is notified differently prior to January 1st of any year.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.203 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 924 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section and))
Notwithstanding RCW 84.36.010 or other statutes to the contrary, the
director ((shall)) must pay by April 30th of each year on game lands in
each county, if requested by an election under RCW 77.12.201, an amount
in lieu of real property taxes equal to ((that amount paid on similar
parcels of open space land taxable under chapter 84.34 RCW or the
greater of seventy cents)) one dollar and one cent per acre per year
((or the amount paid in 1984)), with this amount increasing one percent
each calendar year beginning in 2015, plus an additional amount for
control of noxious weeds equal to that which would be paid if such
lands were privately owned. This amount ((shall)) may not be assessed
or paid on department buildings, structures, facilities, game farms,
fish hatcheries, tidelands, or public fishing areas of less than one
hundred acres.
(2) "Game lands," as used in this section and RCW 77.12.201, means
those tracts one hundred acres or larger owned in fee by the department
and used for wildlife habitat and public recreational purposes. All
lands purchased for wildlife habitat, public access or recreation
purposes with federal funds in the Snake River drainage basin ((shall
be)) are considered game lands regardless of acreage.
(3) This section ((shall)) does not apply to lands transferred
after April 23, 1990, to the department from other state agencies.
(4) The county ((shall)) must distribute the amount received under
this section in lieu of real property taxes to all property taxing
districts except the state in appropriate tax code areas the same way
it would distribute local property taxes from private property. The
county ((shall)) must distribute the amount received under this section
for weed control to the appropriate weed district.
(((5) For the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the director shall pay by
April 30th of each year on game lands in each county, if requested by
an election under RCW 77.12.201, an amount in lieu of real property
taxes and shall be distributed as follows:

County

Adams . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,909

Asotin . . . . . . . . . . . . 36,123

Chelan . . . . . . . . . . . . 24,757

Columbia . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,795

Ferry . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,781

Garfield . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,840

Grant . . . . . . . . . . . . 37,443

Grays Harbor . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,264

Kittitas . . . . . . . . . . . . 143,974

Klickitat . . . . . . . . . . . . 21,906

Lincoln . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,535

Okanogan . . . . . . . . . . . . 151,402

Pend Oreille . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,309

Yakima . . . . . . . . . . . . 126,225

These amounts shall not be assessed or paid on department buildings,
structures, facilities, game farms, fish hatcheries, tidelands, or
public fishing areas of less than one hundred acres.))

--- END ---