BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The state treasurer shall transfer four
hundred eight million dollars or as much as is available from the
budget stabilization account to the state general fund for fiscal year
2014.
(2) The state treasurer shall transfer one hundred sixty-seven
million dollars or as much as is available from the budget
stabilization account to the state general fund for fiscal year 2015.

--- END ---