BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
reduce the overall costs of the state assessment system by implementing
assessments of English language arts and mathematics developed by a
multistate consortium in which Washington took part beginning in the
2014-15 school year, combining assessments of reading and writing into
an English language arts assessment, maximizing use of the consortium
assessments in adapting the high school English language arts and end-of-course mathematics assessments, and reducing to three the number of
assessments that will be required for students to graduate beginning
with the class of 2015.
It is the further intent of the legislature that the tenth grade
English language arts assessment and the end-of-course mathematics and
biology assessments be used to assess foundational skills that are
needed for graduation. The new college and career readiness consortium
assessments, which will be administered at the end of the eleventh
grade, are intended to demonstrate the level of a student's readiness
for first-year college-level coursework.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 22 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the statewide student assessment, opportunities for a
student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which the
student was not successful, and, if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or more objective
alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of
state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for
each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the statewide student
assessment for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045 or 28A.655.0611, acquisition of the certificate is required
for graduation from a public high school but is not the only
requirement for graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school statewide student assessment shall
earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a student does not
successfully meet the state standards in one or more content areas
required for the certificate of academic achievement, then the student
may retake the assessment in the content area up to four times at no
cost to the student. If the student successfully meets the state
standards on a retake of the assessment then the student shall earn a
certificate of academic achievement. Once objective alternative
assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection (10) of this section,
a student may use the objective alternative assessments to demonstrate
that the student successfully meets the state standards for that
content area if the student has taken the statewide student assessment
at least once. If the student successfully meets the state standards
on the objective alternative assessments then the student shall earn a
certificate of academic achievement.
(4) Beginning with the graduating class of 2015, a student must
meet the state standards in English language arts, mathematics, and
science ((in addition to the other)) instead of the content areas
required under subsection (3) of this section on the statewide student
assessment or the objective alternative assessments in order to earn a
certificate of academic achievement. Students may use results from the
high school reading and writing assessments offered through the 2013-14
school year to demonstrate that they meet the standard in English
language arts.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) School districts must make available to students the following
options:
(a) To retake the statewide student assessment up to four times in
the content areas in which the student did not meet the state standards
if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the statewide student assessment up to four times in
the content areas in which the student did not meet the state standards
if the student is enrolled in a high school completion program at a
community or technical college. The superintendent of public
instruction and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall jointly identify means by which students in these programs can be
assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year
shall be available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process for students' scores,
for students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic
standards. The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable
in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate
on the statewide student assessment and be objective in its
determination of student achievement of the state standards. Before
any objective alternative assessments in addition to those authorized
in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a student to
demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in a content
area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall formally
approve the use of any objective alternative assessments through the
omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution.
(b)(i) A student's score on the mathematics, reading or English, or
writing portion of the SAT or the ACT may be used as an objective
alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a
student has met or exceeded the state standards for the certificate of
academic achievement. The state board of education shall identify the
scores students must achieve on the relevant portion of the SAT or ACT
to meet or exceed the state standard in the relevant content area on
the statewide student assessment. A student's score on the science
portion of the ACT or the science subject area tests of the SAT may be
used as an objective alternative assessment under this section as soon
as the state board of education determines that sufficient data is
available to identify reliable equivalent scores for the science
content area of the statewide student assessment. After the first
scores are established, the state board may increase but not decrease
the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state standards.
(ii) A student who scores at least a three on the grading scale of
one to five for selected AP examinations may use the score as an
objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating
that a student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate
of academic achievement. A score of three on the AP examinations in
calculus or statistics may be used as an alternative assessment for the
mathematics portion of the statewide student assessment. A score of
three on the AP examinations in English language and composition may be
used as an alternative assessment for the writing portion of the
statewide student assessment or the English language arts portion of
the assessment once established for the class of 2015. A score of
three on the AP examinations in English literature and composition,
macroeconomics, microeconomics, psychology, United States history,
world history, United States government and politics, or comparative
government and politics may be used as an alternative assessment for
the reading portion of the statewide student assessment or the English
language arts portion of the assessment once established for the class
of 2015. A score of three on the AP examination in biology, physics,
chemistry, or environmental science may be used as an alternative
assessment for the science portion of the statewide student assessment.
(iii) The college and career readiness assessment in English
language arts established under RCW 28A.655.071 may be used as an
alternative assessment for the English language arts portion of the
statewide student assessment. The college and career readiness
assessment in mathematics established under RCW 28A.655.071 may be used
as an alternative assessment for the mathematics portion of the
statewide student assessment.
(11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and senate
education committees shall obtain information and conclusions from
recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(12) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for and notify students and their parents or legal guardians as
provided in this subsection. Student learning plans are required for
eighth grade students who were not successful on any or all of the
content areas of the state assessment during the previous school year
or who may not be on track to graduate due to credit deficiencies or
absences. The parent or legal guardian shall be notified about the
information in the student learning plan, preferably through a parent
conference and at least annually. To the extent feasible, schools
serving English language learner students and their parents shall
translate the plan into the primary language of the family. The plan
shall include the following information as applicable:
(a) The student's results on the state assessment;
(b) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the
score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;
(c) Any credit deficiencies;
(d) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;
(e) The student's progress toward meeting state and local
graduation requirements;
(f) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken
by the student to meet state academic standards and stay on track for
graduation;
(g) Remediation strategies and alternative education options
available to students, including informing students of the option to
continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve or until
the age of twenty-one;
(h) The alternative assessment options available to students under
this section and RCW 28A.655.065;
(i) School district programs, high school courses, and career and
technical education options available for students to meet graduation
requirements; and
(j) Available programs offered through skill centers or community
and technical colleges, including the college high school diploma
options under RCW 28B.50.535.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.070 and 2008 c 163 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
essential academic learning requirements that identify the knowledge
and skills all public school students need to know and be able to do
based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, develop student
assessments, and implement the accountability recommendations and
requests regarding assistance, rewards, and recognition of the state
board of education.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Periodically revise the essential academic learning
requirements, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW
28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. To the
maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four
and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the essential
academic learning requirements; and
(b) Review and prioritize the essential academic learning
requirements and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the
grade level content expectations to be assessed on the ((Washington))
statewide student assessment ((of student learning)) and used for state
or federal accountability purposes. The review, prioritization, and
identification shall result in more focus and targeting with an
emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade level content
expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level content
expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence of
expectations and performances that are logical, build with increasing
depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and
reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within seven
working days, shall post on its web site any grade level content
expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in constructing
the ((Washington)) statewide student assessment ((of student
learning)).
(3)(a) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall maintain and continue to
develop and revise a statewide academic assessment system in the
content areas of reading, writing, mathematics, and science for use in
the elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if
each student has mastered the essential academic learning requirements
identified in subsection (1) of this section. The superintendent of
public instruction shall modify the assessment system by the 2014-15
school year in accordance with RCW 28A.655.071. School districts shall
administer the assessments under guidelines adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction. The academic assessment system
may include a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.
(b) Effective with the 2009 administration of the Washington
assessment of student learning and continuing with the statewide
student assessment, the superintendent shall redesign the assessment in
the content areas of reading, mathematics, and science in all grades
except high school by shortening test administration and reducing the
number of short answer and extended response questions.
(4) If the superintendent proposes any modification to the
essential academic learning requirements or the statewide assessments,
then the superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
to review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential
academic learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.
(5) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results
under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate
instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational
support for students who have not mastered the essential academic
learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development.
(6) By September 2007, the results for reading and mathematics
shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to
determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content
areas from one school year to the next.
(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide
educational support to individual students, the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance
information as possible within the constraints of the assessment
system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school
districts:
(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may
provide additional achievement information for individual students; and
(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to
evaluate the academic status of individual students. The tools shall
be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and
easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily
shared with parents and students.
(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall
integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.
(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall
be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly
related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(11) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of special education students when developing the
assessments under this section.
(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments
under this section.
(13) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's web site
lists of resources and model assessments in social studies, the arts,
and health and fitness.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.655.066 and 2011 c 25 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall develop statewide end-of-course assessments for high school mathematics that measure student
achievement of the state mathematics standards. The superintendent
shall take steps to ensure that the language of the assessments is
responsive to a diverse student population. The assessments shall be
implemented statewide in the 2010-11 school year.
(b) The superintendent shall develop end-of-course assessments for
the first year of high school mathematics that include the standards
common to algebra I and integrated mathematics I and for the second
year of high school mathematics that include the standards common to
geometry and integrated mathematics II. The assessments under this
subsection (1)(b) shall be used to demonstrate that a student meets the
state standard on the mathematics content area of the high school
((Washington)) statewide student assessment ((of student learning)) for
purposes of RCW 28A.655.061. The geometry and integrated II
assessments shall not be administered by the superintendent of public
instruction or schools after the 2012-13 school year.
(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall also develop
subtests for the end-of-course assessments that measure standards for
the first two years of high school mathematics that are unique to
algebra I, integrated mathematics I, geometry, and integrated
mathematics II. The results of the subtests shall be reported at the
student, teacher, school, and district level. The geometry and
integrated mathematics II subtests shall not be administered by the
superintendent of public instruction or schools after the 2012-13
school year.
(2) ((For)) Beginning with the graduating ((classes)) class of 2013
((and 2014)) and for purposes of the certificate of academic
achievement under RCW 28A.655.061, a student may use: (a) Results from
the end-of-course assessment for the first year of high school
mathematics or the results from the end-of-course assessment for the
second year of high school mathematics, offered through the 2012-13
school year; or (b) results from a retake of a high school mathematics
((retake)) assessment.
(3) ((Beginning with the graduating class of 2015 and for purposes
of the certificate of academic achievement under RCW 28A.655.061, the
mathematics content area of the Washington assessment of student
learning shall be assessed using the end-of-course assessment for the
first year of high school mathematics plus the end-of-course assessment
for the second year of high school mathematics, or results from a high
school mathematics retake assessment for the end-of-course assessments
in which the student did not meet the standard.
(4))) All of the objective alternative assessments available to
students under RCW 28A.655.061 and 28A.655.065 shall be available to
any student who has taken the ((sequence of)) end-of-course
assessment((s)) once but does not meet the state mathematics standard
on the ((sequence of)) end-of-course assessment((s)).
(((5))) (4) The superintendent of public instruction shall report
at least annually or more often if necessary to keep the education
committees of the legislature informed on each step of the development
and implementation process under this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.655.071 and 2010 c 235 s 601 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By August 2, 2010, the superintendent of public instruction may
revise the state essential academic learning requirements authorized
under RCW 28A.655.070 for mathematics, reading, writing, and
communication by provisionally adopting a common set of standards for
students in grades kindergarten through twelve. The revised state
essential academic learning requirements may be substantially identical
with the standards developed by a multistate consortium in which
Washington participated, must be consistent with the requirements of
RCW 28A.655.070, and may include additional standards if the additional
standards do not exceed fifteen percent of the standards for each
content area. ((However, the superintendent of public instruction
shall not take steps to implement the provisionally adopted standards
until the education committees of the house of representatives and the
senate have an opportunity to review the standards.
(2) By January 1, 2011, the superintendent of public instruction
shall submit to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate:
(a) A detailed comparison of the provisionally adopted standards
and the state essential academic learning requirements as of June 10,
2010, including the comparative level of rigor and specificity of the
standards and the implications of any identified differences; and
(b) An estimated timeline and costs to the state and to school
districts to implement the provisionally adopted standards, including
providing necessary training, realignment of curriculum, adjustment of
state assessments, and other actions.
(3) The superintendent may implement the revisions to the essential
academic learning requirements under this section after the 2011
legislative session unless otherwise directed by the legislature.))
(2) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the state board of education, shall modify the statewide student
assessment system and implement assessments developed with a multistate
consortium to assess student proficiency in English language arts and
mathematics, including college and career readiness assessments to be
administered for high school students and used as an alternative
assessment, but not required for graduation. The superintendent shall
also maximize use of the consortium assessments in adapting the state
high school English language arts and end-of-course mathematics
assessments used for purposes of RCW 28A.655.061. The assessments must
be implemented in the 2014-15 school year.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.655.185 and 2005 c 495 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature, through the creation of
the apple award, to honor and reward students in Washington's public
elementary schools who have shown significant improvement in their
school's results on the ((Washington)) statewide student assessment
((of student learning)).
(2) The apple award program is created to honor and reward public
elementary schools that have the greatest combined average increase in
the percentage of students meeting the fourth grade reading,
mathematics, and writing standards on the ((Washington)) statewide
student assessment ((of student learning)) each school year. Beginning
in the 2014-15 school year, the award will be based on the percentage
of students meeting the fourth grade English language arts and
mathematics standards. The program shall be administered by the
((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction.
(3) Within the amounts appropriated for this purpose, each school
that receives an apple award shall be provided with a twenty-five
thousand dollar grant to be used for capital construction purposes that
have been selected by students in the school and approved by the
district's school directors. The funds may be used exclusively for
capital construction projects on school property or on other public
property in the community, city, or county in which the school is
located.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.105.010 and 2007 c 214 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The GET ready for math and science scholarship program is
established. The purpose of the program is to provide scholarships to
students who achieve level four on the mathematics or science portions
of the ((tenth grade Washington)) high school statewide student
assessment ((of student learning)) or achieve a score in the math
section of the SAT or the math section of the ACT that is above the
ninety-fifth percentile, major in a mathematics, science, or related
field in college, and commit to working in mathematics, science, or a
related field for at least three years in Washington following
completion of their bachelor's degree. The program shall be
administered by the nonprofit organization selected as the private
partner in the public-private partnership.
(2) The total annual amount of each GET ready for math and science
scholarship may vary, but shall not exceed the annual cost of resident
undergraduate tuition fees and mandatory fees at the University of
Washington. An eligible recipient may receive a GET ready for math and
science scholarship for up to one hundred eighty quarter credits, or
the semester equivalent, or for up to five years, whichever comes
first.
(3) Scholarships shall be awarded only to the extent that state
funds and private matching funds are available for that purpose in the
GET ready for math and science (([scholarship])) scholarship account
established in RCW 28B.105.110.

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.105.030 and 2007 c 214 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An eligible student is a student who:
(a) Is eligible for resident tuition and fee rates as defined in
RCW 28B.15.012;
(b) Achieved level four on the mathematics or science portion of
the ((tenth grade Washington)) high school statewide student assessment
((of student learning)) or achieved a score in the math section of the
SAT or the math section of the ACT that is above the ninety-fifth
percentile;
(c) Has a family income at or below one hundred twenty-five percent
of the state median family income at the time the student applies for
a GET ready for math and science scholarship and for up to the two
previous years;
(d) Has declared an intention to complete a qualified program or
qualified major or has entered a qualified program or declared a
qualified major at an institution of higher education;
(e) Has declared an intention to work in a mathematics, science, or
related field in Washington for at least three years immediately
following completion of a bachelor's degree or higher degree.
(2) An eligible recipient is an eligible student who:
(a) Has been awarded a scholarship in accordance with the selection
criteria and process established by the ((board)) student achievement
council and the program administrator;
(b) Enrolls at an institution of higher education within one year
of graduating from high school;
(c) Maintains satisfactory academic progress, as defined by the
institution of higher education where the student is enrolled;
(d) Takes at least one college-level mathematics or science course
each term since enrolling in an institution of higher education; and
(e) Enters a qualified program or qualified major no later than the
end of the first term in which the student has junior level standing.

Sec. 9 RCW 28B.105.060 and 2007 c 214 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:
(1) Notify elementary, middle, junior high, high school, and school
district staff and administrators, and the children's administration of
the department of social and health services about the GET ready for
math and science scholarship program using methods in place for
communicating with schools and school districts; and
(2) Provide data showing the race, ethnicity, income, and other
available demographic information of students who achieve level four
((of)) on the math and science ((Washington)) high school statewide
student assessment ((of student learning in the tenth grade.)); compare
those data with comparable information on the ((tenth grade)) student
population as a whole((.)); and submit a report with the analysis to
the committees responsible for education and higher education in the
legislature on December 1st of even-numbered years.

--- END ---