BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.77 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The new economy scholars fund is established in section 4 of
this act with the purpose of expanding high employer demand programs of
study at institutions of higher education to meet the needs of the new
economy. The fund shall be administered by the council.
(2) The council's administration duties include the following:
(a) Recommend to the higher education and appropriation committees
of the legislature the number of additional enrollments needed for each
high employer demand program of study at each level of higher education
based on the most recent assessment of the number and type of higher
education and training credentials required to match employer demand
for a skilled and educated workforce as in RCW 28B.77.080. The
legislature may base new economy fund allocations to the four-year
institutions of higher education on these recommendations. The council
must include these recommendations in their short-term strategic action
plan;
(b) Identify the appropriate course codes that qualify for
allocations from the new economy scholars fund;
(c) Enter into an interagency agreement with the state board for
community and technical colleges who shall manage new economy scholars
fund allocations through a solicitation of competitive requests for
proposals from the community and technical colleges; and
(d) By December 1, 2015, and every two years thereafter, and in
compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the council must submit a report to the
governor and the higher education and appropriation committees of the
legislature that details expansion in high employer demand programs of
study resulting from the new economy scholars fund.
(3) The state board for community and technical colleges and the
four-year institutions of higher education receiving an allocation from
the new economy scholars fund shall establish program baselines and
demonstrate enrollment increases in high employer demand programs of
study for which they receive funds and provide this data to the council
for inclusion in the report in subsection (2)(d) of this section.
(4) For the purposes of the new economy scholars fund, "high
employer demand program of study" means an undergraduate or graduate
certificate or degree program in which the number of students prepared
for employment per year from in-state institutions is substantially
less than the number of projected job openings per year in that field,
statewide, or in a substate region.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.4452 and 2010 c 114 s 114 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person whose research and development spending during
the year in which the credit is claimed exceeds 0.92 percent of the
person's taxable amount during the same calendar year.
(2)(a) The credit is calculated as follows:
(((a))) (i) Determine the greater of the amount of qualified
research and development expenditures of a person or eighty percent of
amounts received by a person other than a public educational or
research institution in compensation for the conduct of qualified
research and development;
(((b))) (ii) Subtract 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount
from the amount determined under (a)(i) of this subsection;
(((c))) (iii) Multiply the amount determined under (((b))) (a)(ii)
of this subsection by ((the following:
(i) For the period June 10, 2004, through December 31, 2006, the
person's average tax rate for the calendar year for which the credit is
claimed;
(ii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2007, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 0.75 percent;
(iii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2008, the greater
of the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.0 percent;
(iv) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2009, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.25 percent;
(v) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2010, and
thereafter,)) 1.50 percent.
(b) For purposes of calculating the credit, if a person's reporting
period is less than annual, the person may use an estimated average tax
rate for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed by using the
person's average tax rate for each reporting period. A person who uses
an estimated average tax rate must make an adjustment to the total
credit claimed for the calendar year using the person's actual average
tax rate for the calendar year when the person files its last return
for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(3) Any person entitled to the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section as a result of qualified research and development
conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of the credit to
the person contracting for the performance of the qualified research
and development.
(4) The credit, including any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section, must be claimed against taxes due for
the same calendar year in which the qualified research and development
expenditures are incurred. The credit, including any credit assigned
to a person under subsection (3) of this section, for each calendar
year may not exceed the lesser of two million dollars or the amount of
tax otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar year.
(5) For any person claiming the credit, including any credit
assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this section, whose
research and development spending during the calendar year in which the
credit is claimed fails to exceed 0.92 percent of the person's taxable
amount during the same calendar year or who is otherwise ineligible,
the department must declare the taxes against which the credit was
claimed to be immediately due and payable. The department must assess
interest, but not penalties, on the taxes against which the credit was
claimed. Interest must be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent
excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the date the
credit was claimed, and accrues until the taxes against which the
credit was claimed are repaid. Any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section that is disallowed as a result of this
section may be claimed by the person who performed the qualified
research and development subject to the limitations set forth in
subsection (4) of this section.
(6) A person may not claim a credit under this section if the
person reported an annual gross amount of ten million dollars or more
in the prior calendar year. Taxpayers disallowed from claiming the
credit under this subsection are not required to refund any credit
claimed in calendar year 2013 prior to the effective date of this
section.
(7) A person claiming the credit provided in this section must file
a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(((7) For the purpose of this section:)) The definitions in this
subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(8)(a) "Average tax rate" means a person's total tax liability
under this chapter for the calendar year for which the credit is
claimed divided by the taxpayer's total taxable amount under this
chapter for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(b) "Qualified research and development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined under rules adopted by the
department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly
incurred in qualified research and development by a person claiming the
credit provided in this section. The term does not include amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development. Nor does
the term include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land,
structures, or depreciable property.
(c) "Qualified research and development" ((shall have)) has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 82.63.010.
(d) "Research and development spending" means qualified research
and development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts paid to a
person other than a public educational or research institution to
conduct qualified research and development.
(e) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's
combined excise tax returns for the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under
RCW 82.04.440.
(((8))) (9) This section expires January 1, 2015.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.63.030 and 2008 c 15 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for
state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12,
and 82.14 RCW on each eligible investment project.
(2) No certificate may be issued for an investment project that has
already received a deferral under chapter 82.60 RCW or this chapter,
except that an investment project for qualified research and
development that has already received a deferral may also receive an
additional deferral certificate for adapting the investment project for
use in pilot scale manufacturing.
(3) ((This section shall expire January 1, 2015.)) The department
may not issue a certificate under this section on or after July 1,
2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By August 31, 2014, the department must estimate the increase
in state revenue resulting from the termination of the research and
development tax credit or deferral in RCW 82.04.4452 and 82.63.030 for
the prior fiscal year and certify the estimated amount to the state
treasurer.
(2) By September 30, 2014, and by September 30th of every year
thereafter, the state treasurer must transfer the amount certified by
the department under subsection (1) of this section from the state
general fund into the new economy scholars account.
(3) The new economy scholars account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. Money in the account must be used solely for the
purposes specified in section 1 of this act with fifty percent of the
moneys solely for two-year institutions of higher education and fifty
percent of the moneys solely for the four-year institutions of higher
education. Only the director of the council or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures. The account may retain all of the
interest earnings.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2012 c 198 s 8, 2012 c 196 s 6, 2012 c
187 s 13, and 2012 c 114 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury
for cash management and cash balance purposes.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment
program account, the accessible communities account, the community and
technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the
American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the foster care scholarship
endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the
basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the contract
harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive
account, the commemorative works account, the county enhanced 911
excise tax account, the toll collection account, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the family leave insurance account, the food animal veterinarian
conditional scholarship account, the fruit and vegetable inspection
account, the future teachers conditional scholarship account, the game
farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science
scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and
product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the
industrial insurance rainy day fund, the juvenile accountability
incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan
2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the new economy
scholars account, the multiagency permitting team account, the pilotage
account, the produce railcar pool account, the regional transportation
investment district account, the rural rehabilitation account, the
stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility
account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the children's trust fund,
the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus
fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse racing commission
class C purse fund account, the individual development account program
account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account
(earnings from the Washington horse racing commission operating account
must be credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C
purse fund account), the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington
state heritage center account, ((and)) the reduced cigarette ignition
propensity account, the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss
account, ((and)) the school for the blind account, the Millersylvania
park trust fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve
fund, and the radiation perpetual maintenance fund.
(c) The following accounts and funds must receive eighty percent of
their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high
occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account,
and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the
state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the
custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office
of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for
the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---