BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.729 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The term of the sentence of an offender committed to a
correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by
earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and adopted by the correctional agency having jurisdiction in
which the offender is confined. The earned release time shall be for
good behavior and good performance, as determined by the correctional
agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency shall not credit
the offender with earned release credits in advance of the offender
actually earning the credits.
(b) Any program established pursuant to this section shall allow an
offender to earn early release credits for presentence incarceration.
If an offender is transferred from a county jail to the department, the
administrator of a county jail facility shall certify to the department
the amount of time spent in custody at the facility and the ((amount))
number of days of ((earned)) early release ((time)) credits lost or not
earned. The department may approve a jail certification from a
correctional agency that calculates ((earned)) early release time based
on the actual amount of confinement time served by the offender before
sentencing when an erroneous calculation of confinement time served by
the offender before sentencing appears on the judgment and sentence.
The department must adjust an offender's rate of early release listed
on the jail certification to be consistent with the rate applicable to
offenders in the department's facilities. However, the department is
not authorized to adjust the number of presentence early release days
that the jail has certified as lost or not earned.
(2) An offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after
July 23, 1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements
under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good
time credits or earned release time for that portion of his or her
sentence that results from any deadly weapon enhancements.
(3) An offender may earn early release time as follows:
(a) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence.
(b) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed
ten percent of the sentence.
(c) An offender is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time if he or she:
(i) Is not classified as an offender who is at a high risk to
reoffend as provided in subsection (4) of this section;
(ii) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(iii) Has no prior conviction for the offenses listed in (c)(ii) of
this subsection;
(iv) Participates in programming or activities as directed by the
offender's individual reentry plan as provided under RCW 72.09.270 to
the extent that such programming or activities are made available by
the department; and
(v) Has not committed a new felony after July 22, 2007, while under
community custody.
(d) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence.
(4) The department shall perform a risk assessment of each offender
who may qualify for earned early release under subsection (3)(c) of
this section utilizing the risk assessment tool recommended by the
Washington state institute for public policy. Subsection (3)(c) of
this section does not apply to offenders convicted after July 1, 2010.
(5)(a) A person who is eligible for earned early release as
provided in this section and who will be supervised by the department
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.501 or 9.94A.5011, shall be transferred to
community custody in lieu of earned release time;
(b) The department shall, as a part of its program for release to
the community in lieu of earned release, require the offender to
propose a release plan that includes an approved residence and living
arrangement. All offenders with community custody terms eligible for
release to community custody in lieu of earned release shall provide an
approved residence and living arrangement prior to release to the
community;
(c) The department may deny transfer to community custody in lieu
of earned release time if the department determines an offender's
release plan, including proposed residence location and living
arrangements, may violate the conditions of the sentence or conditions
of supervision, place the offender at risk to violate the conditions of
the sentence, place the offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk
to victim safety or community safety. The department's authority under
this section is independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence
or statutory provision regarding conditions for community custody;
(d) If the department is unable to approve the offender's release
plan, the department may do one or more of the following:
(i) Transfer an offender to partial confinement in lieu of earned
early release for a period not to exceed three months. The three
months in partial confinement is in addition to that portion of the
offender's term of confinement that may be served in partial
confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728(5);
(ii) Provide rental vouchers to the offender for a period not to
exceed three months if rental assistance will result in an approved
release plan. The voucher must be provided in conjunction with
additional transition support programming or services that enable an
offender to participate in services including, but not limited to,
substance abuse treatment, mental health treatment, sex offender
treatment, educational programming, or employment programming;
(e) For each offender who is the recipient of a rental voucher, the
department shall include, concurrent with the data that the department
otherwise obtains and records, the housing status of the offender for
the duration of the offender's supervision.
(6) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under RCW
9.94A.670(5)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits under this
section.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.92.151 and 2009 c 28 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
sentence of a prisoner confined in a county jail facility for a felony,
gross misdemeanor, or misdemeanor conviction may be reduced by earned
release credits in accordance with procedures that shall be developed
and promulgated by the correctional agency having jurisdiction. The
earned early release time shall be for good behavior and good
performance as determined by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction. Any program established pursuant to this section shall
allow an offender to earn early release credits for presentence
incarceration. The correctional agency shall not credit the offender
with earned early release credits in advance of the offender actually
earning the credits. In the case of an offender convicted of a serious
violent offense or a sex offense that is a class A felony committed on
or after July 1, 1990, the aggregate earned early release time may not
exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In no other case may the
aggregate earned early release time exceed one-third of the total
sentence.
(2) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under RCW
9.94A.670(5)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits under this
section.
(3) If an offender is transferred from a county jail to the
department, the administrator of a county jail facility shall certify
to the department the amount of time spent in custody at the facility
and the number of days of early release credits lost or not earned.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Pursuant to section 1 of this act, the
department shall recalculate the earned release date for any offender
currently serving a term in a facility or institution either operated
by the state or utilized under contract. The earned release date shall
be recalculated whether the offender is currently incarcerated or is
sentenced after the effective date of this section, and regardless of
the offender's date of offense. For offenders whose offense was
committed prior to the effective date of this section, the
recalculation shall not extend a term of incarceration beyond that to
which an offender is currently subject.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The legislature declares that section 3 of
this act does not create any liberty interest. The department is
authorized to take the time reasonably necessary to complete the
recalculations of section 3 of this act after the effective date of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---