BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.44.110 and 1995 c 369 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Smoke detection devices shall be installed inside all dwelling
units:
(a) Occupied by persons other than the owner on and after December
31, 1981; or
(b) Built or manufactured in this state after December 31, 1980.
(2) The smoke detection devices shall be designed, manufactured,
and installed inside dwelling units in conformance with:
(a) Nationally accepted standards; and
(b) As provided by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW, rules and regulations promulgated by the chief of the Washington
state patrol, through the director of fire protection.
(3) Installation of smoke detection devices shall be the
responsibility of the owner. Maintenance of smoke detection devices,
including the replacement of batteries where required for the proper
operation of the smoke detection device, shall be the responsibility of
the tenant, who shall maintain the device as specified by the
manufacturer. At the time of a vacancy, the owner shall insure that
the smoke detection device is operational prior to the reoccupancy of
the dwelling unit.
(4) Any owner or tenant failing to comply with this section shall
be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars.
(5) After January 1, 2014, when installing a new smoke detection
device or replacing an existing smoke detection device, an owner or
tenant must install a tamper-resistant, ten-year lithium battery smoke
detection device. A landlord is not required to install a tamper-resistant, ten-year lithium battery smoke detection device as required
by this subsection if:
(a) The dwelling unit is equipped with a hardwired smoke detection
device with a battery backup; or
(b) The dwelling unit is equipped with a smoke detection device
combined with a carbon monoxide alarm.
(6) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Dwelling unit" means a single unit providing complete,
independent living facilities for one or more persons including
permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, and
sanitation; and
(b) "Smoke detection device" means an assembly incorporating in one
unit a device which detects visible or invisible particles of
combustion, the control equipment, and the alarm-sounding device,
operated from a power supply either in the unit or obtained at the
point of installation.

--- END ---