BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.86.080 and 2007 c 66 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The attorney general may bring an action in the name of the
state, or as parens patriae on behalf of persons residing in the state,
against any person to restrain and prevent the doing of any act herein
prohibited or declared to be unlawful; and the attorney general, if the
prevailing party, may, in the discretion of the court, recover the
costs of said action including a reasonable ((attorney's)) attorneys'
fee.
(2) The court may make such additional orders or judgments as may
be necessary to restore to any person in interest any moneys or
property, real or personal, which may have been acquired by means of
any act herein prohibited or declared to be unlawful.
(3) Upon a violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or
19.86.060, the court may also make such additional orders or judgments
as may be necessary to restore to any person in interest any moneys or
property, real or personal, which may have been acquired, regardless of
whether such person purchased or transacted for goods or services
directly with the defendant or indirectly through resellers. The court
shall exclude from the amount of monetary relief awarded in an action
pursuant to this subsection any amount that duplicates amounts that
have been awarded for the same violation. The court should consider
consolidation or coordination with other related actions, to the extent
practicable, to avoid duplicate recovery.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.270.060 and 2008 c 66 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any other remedies provided by this chapter or
any other provision of law, the attorney general, or a provider of
computer software or owner of a web site or trademark who is adversely
affected by reason of a violation of this chapter, and whose action
arises directly out of such person's status as a provider or owner, may
bring an action against a person who violates this chapter to enjoin
further violations and to recover either actual damages or one hundred
thousand dollars per violation, whichever is greater.
(2) In an action under subsection (1) of this section, a court may
increase the damages up to three times the damages allowed under
subsection (1) of this section if the defendant has engaged in a
pattern and practice of violating this chapter. The court may also
award costs and reasonable attorneys' fees to the prevailing party,
except that in an action brought by the attorney general, costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees may only be awarded to the attorney general
as prevailing party, and may not be awarded to the defendant.
(3) The amount of damages determined under subsection (1) or (2) of
this section may not exceed two million dollars.

--- END ---