BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.29A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon request of a nonresidential electric customer, an
investor-owned utility shall create a tariff that includes a standard
contract to allow the customer and other interested nonresidential
customers to purchase voluntarily renewable resources in one megawatt-hour units.
(2) The commission may approve a tariff and standard contract that
ensures that:
(a) The costs of procuring, administering, and delivering the
renewable resource is paid for by the requesting customer and not
passed onto other customers of the investor-owned utility;
(b) The investor-owned utility provides an integrated service that
includes the electricity generated by the dedicated renewable resource
facility and a supplemental shaping service, if needed;
(c) The requesting customer has the authority to designate and
approve the renewable resource that they wish to procure;
(d) Nonpower attributes associated with the renewable resource are
transferred to the requesting customer bundled with the power; and
(e) Except for the price, cost, or fees associated with
interconnecting the renewable resource to the grid, the price of
procuring and delivering the eligible renewable resource is transparent
to the requesting customer and any additional costs or fees, including
those required by federal energy regulatory commission rules, are
specified before the requesting customer enters into an agreement for
the renewable resource.
(3) The renewable resources procured under this section are in
addition to the eligible renewable resources requirements under RCW
19.285.040.
(4) The renewable resources procured under this section must be
procured under a separate process other than the process used by the
utility to procure energy resources to meet customer load.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "renewable resource" means an
eligible renewable resource as defined in RCW 19.285.030 or any other
energy resource recognized as a renewable resource or a low-carbon
energy resource by any government recognized by the United States
government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.29A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon request by an electric customer of a consumer-owned
utility, the governing board of a consumer-owned utility shall create
a tariff schedule or contract that allows the customer to purchase
voluntarily renewable resources in one megawatt-hour units.
(2) A tariff or standard contract approved by the governing board
must ensure that:
(a) The costs of procuring, administering, and delivering the
renewable resource is paid for by the requesting customer and not
passed onto other customers of the consumer-owned utility;
(b) The consumer-owned utility provides an integrated service that
includes the electricity generated by the dedicated renewable resource
facility and supplemental shaping services, if needed;
(c) The requesting customer has the authority to designate and
approve the renewable resource that they wish to procure;
(d) Nonpower attributes associated with the renewable resource are
transferred to the requesting customer bundled with the power; and
(e) Except for the price, cost, or fees associated with
interconnecting the renewable resource to the grid, the price of
procuring and delivering the renewable resource is transparent to the
requesting customer and any additional costs or fees, including those
required by federal energy regulatory commission rules, are specified
before the requesting customer enters into an agreement for the
renewable resource.
(3) The renewable resources procured under this section are in
addition to the eligible renewable resources requirements under RCW
19.285.040.
(4) The renewable resources procured under this section must be
procured under a separate process other than the process used by the
utility to procure energy resources to meet customer load.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "renewable resource" means an
eligible renewable resource as defined in RCW 19.285.030 or any other
energy resource recognized as a renewable resource or a low-carbon
energy resource by any government recognized by the United States
government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.29A RCW
to read as follows:
A customer requesting to purchase voluntarily renewable resources
under section 1 or 2 of the act must make a deposit with the utility to
cover the cost of work hours at the electric utility to develop the
tariff. If the customer accepts the proposed tariff, the deposit shall
be made to cover the costs of severing the tariff agreement.

--- END ---