BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Expanding educational opportunities, improving the quality of
educational services within the state, and ensuring that all parents
may exercise and enjoy their basic right to educate their children are
valid public purposes; and
(b) Expanding educational opportunities for children and promoting
healthy competition among education providers to serve children are
critical to improving the quality of education in the state and
ensuring that all children have the opportunity to receive a high
quality education.
(2) The legislature intends to:
(a) Allow maximum freedom to parents to provide for the educational
needs of children;
(b) Promote the general welfare by expanding educational
opportunities for children;
(c) Enable children in this state to achieve a higher level of
excellence in their education; and
(d) Improve the quality of education in this state, both by
expanding educational opportunities for children and by creating
incentives for schools to achieve excellence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Approved private school" means a school that is an approved
private school for purposes of RCW 28A.225.010(3).
(2) "Contribution receipt" means a document submitted by a
scholarship organization to the department and to the person who made
a contribution to the scholarship organization, which contains:
(a) The name, address, and federal taxpayer identification number
of the person who made the contribution;
(b) The scholarship organization's name and address; and
(c) The contribution amount and date received.
(3) "Educational expenses" means the total amount of money charged
for the cost of an eligible student to be educated at an approved
private school, including, but not limited to: Tuition, education-related transportation fees, and other instruction-related expenses,
subject to the approval of the scholarship organization.
(4) "Eligible student" means a Washington resident who:
(a) Is at least five years of age and no more than twenty-one years
of age;
(b) Has not graduated from high school; and
(c) Meets at least one of the following requirements:
(i) Has an annual household income of less than or equal to two
hundred twenty-five percent of the federal poverty guidelines as
updated annually by the United States department of health and human
services under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9902(2) and either is enrolled in
kindergarten at an approved private school or attended a public primary
or secondary school as a full-time student in the preceding fiscal year
and transferred from such school to an approved private school;
(ii) Received a scholarship pursuant to (c)(i) of this subsection
(4) or pursuant to this subsection (4)(c)(ii) in the prior fiscal year
and has an annual household income of less than or equal to two hundred
seventy-five percent of the federal poverty guidelines as updated
annually by the United States department of health and human services
under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9902(2);
(iii) Has been identified as having a disability under 29 U.S.C.
Sec. 794 or has been identified at any time by a school district as a
child with a disability for purposes of RCW 28A.155.020;
(iv) Has an annual household income of less than or equal to two
hundred twenty-five percent of the federal poverty guidelines as
updated annually by the United States department of health and human
services under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9902(2); or
(v) Received a scholarship pursuant to (c)(iv) of this subsection
(4) or pursuant to this subsection (4)(c)(v) in the prior fiscal year
and has an annual household income of less than or equal to two hundred
seventy-five percent of the federal poverty guidelines as updated
annually by the United States department of health and human services
under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9902(2).
(5) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period from July 1st of
the calendar year to June 30th of the next calendar year.
(6) "Parent" means the natural or adoptive parent or legal guardian
of a child.
(7) "Scholarship organization" means an entity that is exempt from
taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue
code of 1986, as amended, as of January 1, 2013, and that does not
discriminate on the basis of race, color, disability, or national
origin.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The education investment tax credit
program is created. Under this program, beginning January 1, 2014, a
credit is allowed against the tax imposed under chapter 82.04 RCW for
approved contributions made by a person to a scholarship organization.
(2) Prior to claiming a credit under this section, a person must
submit an application to the department, in the form and manner
determined by the department, which includes the requested contribution
amount. No applications may be accepted under this section prior to
January 1, 2014. Applications must be approved by the department
within thirty days on a first-come basis, subject to the limits
provided in this subsection. Notice of the approval must be provided
to the applicant and include the approved contribution amount and the
date of the approval. Partial credit approval is permitted if the
partial credit approval is necessary to prevent exceeding the aggregate
tax credit amount allowable under this subsection.
(a) In calendar year 2014, the department may not approve any
credits under this section that would cause the total amount of credits
claimed under this section to exceed one hundred million dollars. In
subsequent calendar years, the total amount of credits that may be
claimed under this section must be the same as in the prior calendar
year, except as provided otherwise under (b) of this subsection (2).
(b) If the total amount of credits claimed under this section in
any calendar year exceeds ninety percent of the total amount of credits
allowed during that year, the total amount of credits that may be
claimed under this section during subsequent calendar years must be
increased by forty percent.
(c) To receive a tax credit under this section, a person must make
a contribution within thirty days from the date of application approval
by the department. Contributions may be made to multiple scholarship
organizations, but a tax credit is only available under this section
for the total amount contributed by the person, up to the amount
approved by the department. Any credit amount approved by the
department under this section, or any portion thereof, that is not
contributed to a scholarship organization within thirty days from the
date of application approval may not be counted towards the aggregate
tax credit amount under this subsection (2).
(3) To participate in the education investment tax credit program,
a scholarship organization must:
(a) Have submitted to the department a notice of intent to
participate in the education investment tax credit program, in the form
and manner determined by the department, certifying that the
scholarship organization is a tax exempt entity under 26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code;
(b) Provide scholarships to eligible students for educational
expenses. An eligible student may not receive more than one
scholarship in a single fiscal year and may not receive a scholarship
from more than one scholarship organization in a single fiscal year.
Scholarships may not extend beyond a single fiscal year, and an
eligible student with a scholarship must reapply for a scholarship in
subsequent fiscal years;
(c)(i) In fiscal years 2013 and 2014, limit the highest value of
any scholarship awarded to:
(A) Five thousand dollars or less for an eligible student, other
than an eligible student defined under section 2(4)(c)(iii) of this
act; and
(B) Ten thousand three hundred fifty dollars or less for an
eligible student defined under section 2(4)(c)(iii) of this act.
(ii) Beginning in fiscal year 2015, the department must annually
adjust the limits in (c)(i) of this subsection (3) for inflation as
provided in the consumer price index for all urban consumers, northwest
region, using the "services less medical care services" special
aggregate index, as published by the United States department of labor,
bureau of labor statistics;
(d) In fiscal years 2013 and 2014, award one hundred percent of all
scholarships funded with contributions received under this section as
scholarships to eligible students defined under section 2(4)(c) (i) and
(ii) of this act. Beginning in fiscal year 2015, the percentage of
scholarships funded with contributions required to be awarded to
eligible students defined under section 2(4)(c)(i) of this act must be
reduced ten percentage points annually. Beginning in fiscal year 2024,
there is no required minimum percentage of scholarships reserved only
for eligible students defined under section 2(4)(c) (i) and (ii) of
this act;
(e) Provide scholarships for use at a minimum of two different
approved private schools and not restrict or reserve contributions for
the use of specific students;
(f) Verify a student's eligibility to apply for and receive a
scholarship. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
must assist scholarship organizations, upon request, in assessing a
student's eligibility under section 2(4)(c)(i) of this act by verifying
the student's attendance at a public primary or secondary school as a
full-time student;
(g) Within fifteen days of receiving a contribution from a person
pursuant to this section, send a contribution receipt to the department
and to the person who made the contribution;
(h) Not have a director, officer, or employee who:
(i) Owns or operates an approved private school that enrolls
children who have received scholarships under this section; or
(ii) Has filed within the previous seven years for personal
bankruptcy or corporate bankruptcy in a business of which he or she
owned more than twenty percent;
(i) Maintain a separate account for contributions received under
this section;
(j) Not award a scholarship to any lineal descendent or equivalent
stepchild of any of its directors, officers, or employees;
(k) Use at least ninety percent of the revenue received from
contributions under this section in each fiscal year to fund
scholarships under this section during the same fiscal year in which
the contributions were received or in the next succeeding fiscal year;
(l) Require that students receiving a scholarship under this
section use the scholarship on a full-time basis. If a student ceases
to attend an approved private school before completing an entire school
year, the school must refund a prorated amount of the scholarship to
the scholarship organization that awarded the scholarship. The
scholarship organization must use any refunds it receives under this
subsection to fund scholarships under this section;
(m) Allow the parents of a student who receives a scholarship under
this section to choose any approved private school at which the
scholarship organization allows its scholarships to be used and that
has enrolled the student or accepted the student for enrollment;
(n) On or before September 30th of each year, submit a scholarship
organization report, in the form and manner as determined by the
department, to the department, which is a public document and must
contain the following, at a minimum:
(i) The total number and total dollar amount of contributions
received under this section during the previous fiscal year;
(ii) The total number and total dollar amount of scholarships
granted under this section during the previous fiscal year, with a
subtotal itemizing the number and dollar amount of such scholarships
that were granted under section 2(4)(c) (i) through (v) of this act;
and
(iii) Itemized for each school that enrolled an eligible student
who received a scholarship from a scholarship organization under this
section during the previous fiscal year, the name and address of the
school, the number of such students who attended the school, and the
total dollar amount of such scholarships.
(4) Credits earned under this section may be claimed against taxes
due for the calendar year in which the contribution is made. The
amount of credit claimed under this section for a reporting period may
not exceed the tax otherwise due under chapter 82.04 RCW for that
reporting period.
(5) The amount of credit that may be earned by a person in each
calendar year under this section may not exceed the amount of approved
contributions made by the person to a scholarship organization during
that calendar year.
(6) Unused credit may be carried over and used in subsequent tax
reporting periods, except that no credit may be claimed more than three
years from the end of the calendar year in which the credit was earned.
Credits carried over must be applied to tax liability before new
credits. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(7) No credit may be received for any contribution that is
directed, assigned, or restricted for the use of a particular student
or a particular approved private school.
(8) A person claiming the credit under this section is subject to
the provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW in such manner and to such extent
as indicated in chapter 82.04 RCW.
(9) To claim a credit under this section, a person must
electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and any
other information required by the department, in an electronic format
as provided or approved by the department. Any return, form, or
information required to be filed in an electronic format under this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format. As used in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as
"return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(10) Any contribution made by a person to a scholarship
organization for which the person does not seek a tax credit under this
section is not subject to the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1)(a) The department must create and
maintain a public list of all scholarship organizations that meet the
requirements of this chapter. The department must post this list on
the department's web site and update the list as frequently as the
department determines necessary. The department must provide the list
created under this section to the office of the superintendent of
public institution, which must post the list on its web site, including
any updates made by the department.
(b) The department must create, maintain, and post on its web site
any forms and reports necessary for the administration of this chapter.
Any reports published under this section are subject to all applicable
public disclosure laws.
(c) The department must post an up-to-date total of the amount of
credits available during the current calendar year on its web site.
(2) Within fifteen days of receiving a contribution receipt from a
scholarship organization, the department must notify the scholarship
organization and the person who made the contribution to that
scholarship organization as to how much of the contribution was within
the amount approved under section 3 of this act.
(3)(a) The department must send written notice by certified mail or
electronically to a scholarship organization not in compliance with the
provisions of this chapter.
(b) A scholarship organization that receives a notice of
noncompliance under this subsection has ninety days to correct the
violation identified in the notice. If a scholarship organization
fails or refuses to comply after ninety days, the department may revoke
the scholarship organization's approval and remove the organization
from the list of approved scholarship organizations posted on the
department's web site under this section. A scholarship organization
whose approval is revoked must notify any person who attempts to make
a contribution to the scholarship organization under this chapter that
the contribution is not eligible for a tax credit under this chapter
and offer to refund any contribution received under this chapter after
the department's revocation of approval.
(c) Upon request by the department, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction must assist the department in
determining noncompliance by a scholarship organization under this
chapter.
(4) The department may adopt rules, as the department deems
necessary, to implement this chapter.
(5) The administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, applies to
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 An approved private school is not considered
an agent of the state or federal government as a result of accepting a
student who has received a scholarship from a scholarship organization
under this chapter. An approved private school's acceptance of a
student who has received a scholarship from a scholarship organization
does not provide any state or local governmental entity the authority
to regulate the educational program of that school. The provisions of
this chapter regarding the relationship of approved private schools and
scholarship organizations apply only to approved private schools that
choose to accept students with scholarships provided under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---