BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) In 2005, to address an unexpected
significant loss of tax revenue resulting from the Estate of Hemphill
decision and to provide additional funding for public education, the
legislature enacted a stand-alone estate and transfer tax, effective
May 17, 2005. The stand-alone estate and transfer tax applies to the
transfer of property at death. By defining the term "transfer" to mean
a "transfer as used in section 2001 of the internal revenue code," the
legislature clearly expressed its intent that a "transfer" for purposes
of determining the federal taxable estate is also a "transfer" for
purposes of determining the Washington taxable estate.
(2) In In re Estate of Bracken, Docket No. 84114-4, the Washington
supreme court narrowly construed the term "transfer" as defined in the
Washington estate tax code.
(3) The legislature finds that it is well established that the term
"transfer" as used in the federal estate tax code is construed broadly
and extends to the "shifting from one to another of any power or
privilege incidental to the ownership or enjoyment of property" that
occurs at death. Fernandez v. Wiener, 326 U.S. 340, 352 (1945).
(4) The legislature further finds that: The Bracken decision held
certain qualified terminable interest property (QTIP) of married
couples was transferred without incurring Washington state estate tax
liability, which: (a) Creates an inequity never intended by the
legislature because unmarried individuals did not enjoy any similar
opportunities to avoid or greatly reduce their potential Washington
estate tax liability; and (b) may create disparate treatment between
QTIP property and other property transferred between spouses that is
eligible for the marital deduction.
(5) Therefore, the legislature finds that it is necessary to
reinstate the legislature's intended meaning when it enacted the estate
tax, restore parity between married couples and unmarried individuals,
restore parity between QTIP property and other property eligible for
the marital deduction, and prevent the adverse fiscal impacts of the
Bracken decision by reaffirming its intent that the term "transfer" as
used in the Washington estate and transfer tax is to be given its
broadest possible meaning consistent with established United States
supreme court precedents, subject only to the limits and exceptions
expressly provided by the legislature.
(6) As curative, clarifying, and remedial, the legislature intends
for this act to apply both prospectively and retroactively to estates
of decedents dying on or after May 17, 2005.

Sec. 2 RCW 83.100.020 and 2013 c 23 s 341 are each amended to
read as follows:
((As used in this chapter:)) The following definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Decedent" means a deceased individual((;)).
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue, the director of
that department, or any employee of the department exercising authority
lawfully delegated to him or her by the director((;)).
(3) "Federal return" means any tax return required by chapter 11 of
the internal revenue code((;)).
(4) "Federal tax" means a tax under chapter 11 of the internal
revenue code((;)).
(5) "Gross estate" means "gross estate" as defined and used in
section 2031 of the internal revenue code((;)).
(6) "Person" means any individual, estate, trust, receiver,
cooperative association, club, corporation, company, firm, partnership,
joint venture, syndicate, or other entity and, to the extent permitted
by law, any federal, state, or other governmental unit or subdivision
or agency, department, or instrumentality thereof((;)).
(7) "Person required to file the federal return" means any person
required to file a return required by chapter 11 of the internal
revenue code, such as the personal representative of an estate((;)).
(8) "Property" means property included in the gross estate((;)).
(9) "Resident" means a decedent who was domiciled in Washington at
time of death((;)).
(10) "Taxpayer" means a person upon whom tax is imposed under this
chapter, including an estate or a person liable for tax under RCW
83.100.120((;)).
(11) "Transfer" means "transfer" as used in section 2001 of the
internal revenue code and includes any shifting upon death of the
economic benefit in property or any power or legal privilege incidental
to the ownership or enjoyment of property. However, "transfer" does
not include a qualified heir disposing of an interest in property
qualifying for a deduction under RCW 83.100.046 or ceasing to use the
property for farming purposes((;)).
(12) "Internal revenue code" means((, for the purposes of this
chapter and RCW 83.110.010,)) the United States internal revenue code
of 1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2005((;)).
(13) "Washington taxable estate" means the federal taxable estate
and includes, but is not limited to, the value of any property included
in the gross estate under section 2044 of the internal revenue code,
regardless of whether the decedent's interest in such property was
acquired before May 17, 2005, (a) plus amounts required to be added to
the Washington taxable estate under RCW 83.100.047, (b) less: (((a)))
(i) One million five hundred thousand dollars for decedents dying
before January 1, 2006; and (((b))) (ii) two million dollars for
decedents dying on or after January 1, 2006; and (((c))) (iii) the
amount of any deduction allowed under RCW 83.100.046; and (iv) amounts
allowed to be deducted from the Washington taxable estate under RCW
83.100.047.
(14) "Federal taxable estate" means the taxable estate as
determined under chapter 11 of the internal revenue code without regard
to: (a) The termination of the federal estate tax under section 2210
of the internal revenue code or any other provision of law, and (b) the
deduction for state estate, inheritance, legacy, or succession taxes
allowable under section 2058 of the internal revenue code.

Sec. 3 RCW 83.100.047 and 2005 c 516 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the federal taxable estate on the federal return is
determined by making an election under section 2056 or 2056A of the
internal revenue code, or if no federal return is required to be filed,
the department may provide by rule for a separate election on the
Washington return, consistent with section 2056 or 2056A of the
internal revenue code, for the purpose of determining the amount of tax
due under this chapter. The election ((shall be)) is binding on the
estate and the beneficiaries, consistent with the internal revenue
code. All other elections or valuations on the Washington return
((shall)) must be made in a manner consistent with the federal return,
if a federal return is required, and such rules as the department may
provide.
(2) Amounts deducted for federal income tax purposes under section
642(g) of the internal revenue code of 1986((, shall)) are not ((be))
allowed as deductions in computing the amount of tax due under this
chapter.
(3) Notwithstanding any department rule, if a taxpayer makes an
election consistent with section 2056 of the internal revenue code as
permitted under this section, the taxpayer's Washington taxable estate,
and the surviving spouse's Washington taxable estate, must be adjusted
as follows:
(a) For the taxpayer that made the election, any amount deducted by
reason of section 2056(b)(7) of the internal revenue code is added to,
and the value of property for which a Washington election under this
section was made is deducted from, the Washington taxable estate.
(b) For the estate of the surviving spouse, the amount included in
the estate's gross estate pursuant to section 2044 (a) and (b)(1)(A) of
the internal revenue code is deducted from, and the value of any
property for which an election under this section was previously made
is added to, the Washington taxable estate.

Sec. 4 RCW 83.100.047 and 2009 c 521 s 192 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) If the federal taxable estate on the federal return is
determined by making an election under section 2056 or 2056A of the
internal revenue code, or if no federal return is required to be filed,
the department may provide by rule for a separate election on the
Washington return, consistent with section 2056 or 2056A of the
internal revenue code and (b) of this subsection, for the purpose of
determining the amount of tax due under this chapter. The election
((shall be)) is binding on the estate and the beneficiaries, consistent
with the internal revenue code and (b) of this subsection. All other
elections or valuations on the Washington return ((shall)) must be made
in a manner consistent with the federal return, if a federal return is
required, and such rules as the department may provide.
(b) The department ((shall)) must provide by rule that a state
registered domestic partner is deemed to be a surviving spouse and
entitled to a deduction from the Washington taxable estate for any
interest passing from the decedent to his or her domestic partner,
consistent with section 2056 or 2056A of the internal revenue code but
regardless of whether such interest would be deductible from the
federal gross estate under section 2056 or 2056A of the internal
revenue code.
(2) Amounts deducted for federal income tax purposes under section
642(g) of the internal revenue code of 1986 ((shall)) are not ((be))
allowed as deductions in computing the amount of tax due under this
chapter.
(3) Notwithstanding any department rule, if a taxpayer makes an
election consistent with section 2056 of the internal revenue code as
permitted under this section, the taxpayer's Washington taxable estate,
and the surviving spouse's Washington taxable estate, must be adjusted
as follows:
(a) For the taxpayer that made the election, any amount deducted by
reason of section 2056(b)(7) of the internal revenue code is added to,
and the value of property for which a Washington election under this
section was made is deducted from, the Washington taxable estate.
(b) For the estate of the surviving spouse, the amount included in
the estate's gross estate pursuant to section 2044 (a) and (b)(1)(A) of
the internal revenue code is deducted from, and the value of any
property for which an election under this section was previously made
is added to, the Washington taxable estate.

Sec. 5 RCW 83.100.120 and 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.120 are
each amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any
personal representative who distributes any property without first
paying, securing another's payment of, or furnishing security for
payment of the taxes due under this chapter is personally liable for
the taxes due to the extent of the value of any property that may come
or may have come into the possession of the personal representative.
Security for payment of the taxes due under this chapter ((shall)) must
be in an amount equal to or greater than the value of all property that
is or has come into the possession of the personal representative, as
of the time the security is furnished.
(b) For the estates of decedents dying prior to April 9, 2006, a
personal representative is not personally liable for taxes due on the
value of any property included in the gross estate and the Washington
taxable estate as a result of section 2044 of the internal revenue code
unless the property is located in the state of Washington or the
property has or will come into the possession or control of the
personal representative.
(2) Any person who has the control, custody, or possession of any
property and who delivers any of the property to the personal
representative or legal representative of the decedent outside
Washington without first paying, securing another's payment of, or
furnishing security for payment of the taxes due under this chapter is
liable for the taxes due under this chapter to the extent of the value
of the property delivered. Security for payment of the taxes due under
this chapter ((shall)) must be in an amount equal to or greater than
the value of all property delivered to the personal representative or
legal representative of the decedent outside Washington by such a
person.
(3) For the purposes of this section, persons who do not have
possession of a decedent's property include anyone not responsible
primarily for paying the tax due under this section or their
transferees, which includes but is not limited to mortgagees or
pledgees, stockbrokers or stock transfer agents, banks and other
depositories of checking and savings accounts, safe-deposit companies,
and life insurance companies.
(4) For the purposes of this section, any person who has the
control, custody, or possession of any property and who delivers any of
the property to the personal representative or legal representative of
the decedent may rely upon the release certificate or the release of
nonliability certificate, furnished by the department to the personal
representative, as evidence of compliance with the requirements of this
chapter, and make such deliveries and transfers as the personal
representative may direct without being liable for any taxes due under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 and 3 of this act apply both
prospectively and retroactively to all estates of decedents dying on or
after May 17, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act does not affect any final judgment,
no longer subject to appeal, entered by a court of competent
jurisdiction before the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 3 of this act expires January 1,
2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for section 4 of this act which takes effect
January 1, 2014.

--- END ---