BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
At such time as the amount of funds distributed annually to the
general fund pursuant to RCW 69.50.540 is determined, the legislature
shall prioritize funding for an integrated high quality continuum of
early learning, called early start, for children birth-to-five years of
age. Components of early start include, but are not limited to, the
following:
(1) Home visiting and parent education and support programs;
(2) The early achievers program described in RCW 43.215.100;
(3) Integrated full-day, high quality early learning programs; and
(4) High quality preschool for children whose family income is at
or below one hundred ten percent of the federal poverty level.

--- END ---