BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In an effort to reduce unfunded mandates on
the secretary of state's office and allow efficiencies to be
implemented, the legislature finds a potential cost savings and reduced
impacts on the environment by removing the requirement that the
complete text of initiatives be published in voters' pamphlets. The
legislature expects the secretary of state to continue to post the
complete text of a measure in the online voter's guide and to provide
information in the voters' pamphlet about how a voter may view the text
on the internet or request that a copy be electronically or physically
mailed to the voter.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.32.070 and 2009 c 415 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall determine the format and layout of the
voters' pamphlet published under RCW 29A.32.010. The secretary of
state shall print the pamphlet in clear, readable type on a size,
quality, and weight of paper that in the judgment of the secretary of
state best serves the voters. The pamphlet must contain a table of
contents. Measures and arguments must be printed in the order
specified by RCW 29A.72.290.
The voters' pamphlet must provide the following information for
each statewide issue on the ballot except measures for an advisory vote
of the people whose requirements are provided in subsection (11) of
this section:
(1) The legal identification of the measure by serial designation
or number;
(2) The official ballot title of the measure;
(3) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining the law
as it presently exists;
(4) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining the
effect of the proposed measure if it becomes law;
(5) The fiscal impact statement prepared under RCW 29A.72.025;
(6) The total number of votes cast for and against the measure in
the senate and house of representatives, if the measure has been passed
by the legislature;
(7) An argument advocating the voters' approval of the measure
together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;
(8) An argument advocating the voters' rejection of the measure
together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;
(9) Each argument or rebuttal statement must be followed by the
names of the committee members who submitted them, and may be followed
by a telephone number that citizens may call to obtain information on
the ballot measure;
(10) The full text of the measure, or the first two sections of the
measure and information about how to view or obtain a copy of the full
text of the measure;
(11) Two pages shall be provided in the general election voters'
pamphlet for each measure for an advisory vote of the people under RCW
43.135.041 and shall consist of the serial number assigned by the
secretary of state under RCW 29A.72.040, the short description
formulated by the attorney general under RCW 29A.72.283, the tax
increase's most up-to-date ten-year cost projection, including a
year-by-year breakdown, by the office of financial management under RCW
43.135.031, and the names of the legislators, and their contact
information, and how they voted on the increase upon final passage so
they can provide information to, and answer questions from, the public.
For the purposes of this subsection, "names of legislators, and their
contact information" includes each legislator's position (senator or
representative), first name, last name, party affiliation (for example,
Democrat or Republican), city or town they live in, office phone
number, and office e-mail address.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.32.080 and 2003 c 111 s 808 are each amended to
read as follows:
If statewide ballot measures that amend existing law ((must be))
are printed in the voters' pamphlet ((so that)), the language proposed
for deletion ((is)) must be enclosed by double parentheses and ((has))
have a line through it((.)), and proposed new language must be
underlined. A statement explaining the deletion and addition of
language must appear as follows: "Any language in double parentheses
with a line through it is existing state law and will be taken out of
the law if this measure is approved by voters. Any underlined language
does not appear in current state law but will be added to the law if
this measure is approved by voters."

--- END ---