BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.08.190 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to making distribution((s)) described in subsection
(((2))) (3) of this section, ((amounts)) sufficient moneys must be
retained to ((support)) fund the allotments under RCW 43.88.110 from
any legislative appropriation for ((municipal)) city research and
services. The legislative appropriation for such services ((must be in
the amount specified)) may not be less than the amount required under
RCW 66.24.065.
(2) Prior to making distributions described in subsection (3) of
this section, the quarterly portion of the ten million dollar amount
specified in RCW 66.24.065 must be disbursed to local jurisdictions.
(3)(a) When excess funds are distributed during the months of June,
September, December, and March of each year, all moneys subject to
distribution must be disbursed ((to border areas, counties, cities, and
towns as provided in RCW 66.24.065.
(3) The amount remaining after distributions under subsections (1)
and (2) of this section must be deposited into the general fund)) as
follows:
(i) Three-tenths of one percent to border areas under RCW
66.08.195;
(ii) Except as provided otherwise in (a)(iii), (iv), and (v) of
this subsection, from the amount remaining after distribution under
(a)(i) of this subsection:
(A) Fifty percent to the general fund of the state;
(B) Ten percent to the counties of the state; and
(C) Forty percent to the incorporated cities and towns of the
state;
(iii) During fiscal year 2016 and fiscal year 2017, from the amount
remaining after distribution under (a)(i) of this subsection:
(A) Sixty-five percent to the general fund of the state;
(B) Seven percent to the counties of the state; and
(C) Twenty-eight percent to the incorporated cities and towns of
the state;
(iv) During fiscal year 2018 and fiscal year 2019, from the amount
remaining after distribution under (a)(i) of this subsection:
(A) Sixty percent to the general fund of the state;
(B) Eight percent to the counties of the state; and
(C) Thirty-two percent to the incorporated cities and towns of the
state;
(v) During fiscal year 2020 and fiscal year 2021, from the amount
remaining after distribution under (a)(i) of this subsection:
(A) Fifty-five percent to the general fund of the state;
(B) Nine percent to the counties of the state; and
(C) Thirty-six percent to the incorporated cities and towns of the
state.
(b) The total annual distributions to local governments under this
subsection (3) may not be less than the amount required under RCW
66.24.065.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---