BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35A.14.295 and 2013 c 333 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a code city may resolve to annex
territory to the city if there is within the city, unincorporated
territory:
(a) Containing less than one hundred seventy-five acres and having
all of the boundaries of such area contiguous to the code city; or
(b) Of any size containing residential property owners and having
at least eighty percent of the boundaries of such area contiguous to
the city((, and is)). Territory annexed under this subsection (1)(b)
must be within the same county and within the same urban growth area
designated under RCW 36.70A.110, and the city ((is planning)) must plan
under chapter 36.70A RCW.
(2) The resolution shall describe the boundaries of the area to be
annexed, state the number of voters residing therein as nearly as may
be, and set a date for a public hearing on such resolution for
annexation. Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication of the
resolution at least once a week for two weeks prior to the date of the
hearing, in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
code city and one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
area to be annexed.
(3) For purposes of subsection (1)(b) of this section, territory
bounded by a river, lake, or other body of water is considered
contiguous to a city that is also bounded by the same river, lake, or
other body of water.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 28, 2013.

--- END ---