BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that including the
separate collection of organic waste material, such as yard and food
waste, for eventual composting in a city's or county's solid waste
management plan has laudable social and environmental benefits,
including the diversion of waste from our state's landfills.
(2) The legislature further finds that the net environmental and
social benefits of municipal composting decreases with an increase in
shipping distance from the collection locations and the eventual
storage and processing location. Using fossil fuels to truck
compostable materials from one county to another increases the carbon
footprint of our garbage and changes the nature of composting from a
potentially environmentally beneficial activity to an activity that may
work counter to the state's greenhouse emissions goals.
(3) The legislature further finds that an increase in truck traffic
due to the hauling of compostable waste on the state's highways may
work counter to the state's traffic reduction goals. Increases in
truck hauling of compostable waste may increase traffic congestion,
traffic-related accidents, and damage to the state's highway
infrastructure.
(4) The legislature further finds that there must be a careful
balance between encouraging the benefits of municipal composting
programs while ensuring that the potential negative consequences do not
outweigh those benefits. An important element of that balancing
formula is to require cities and counties that choose municipal
composting programs to also invest in local facilities where the
collected materials can be stored and processed.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.95.092 and 1989 c 431 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Levels of service shall be defined in the waste reduction and
recycling element of each local comprehensive solid waste management
plan and shall include the services set forth in RCW 70.95.090. In
determining which service level is provided to residential and
nonresidential waste generators in each community, counties and cities
shall develop clear criteria for designating areas as urban or rural.
In designating urban areas, local governments shall consider the
planning guidelines adopted by the department, total population,
population density, and any applicable land use or utility service
plans.
(2) Any county or city that, with or without exceptions, mandates
compostable waste separation or collection as part of the level of
service for customers of curbside or alley residential solid waste
services must provide for the collected materials pursuant to section
3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a city or county
that meets the conditions of RCW 70.95.092(2) must provide for the
storage and processing of at least fifty percent of all collected
compostable waste in the county where the materials are collected or
pursuant to a contractual agreement that specifically provides for the
storage and processing of compostable waste in a different county if
performance of the contract has begun prior to the effective date of
this section.
(2) The requirement for locally collected compostable waste storage
and processing created in subsection (1) of this section is temporarily
modified as follows:
(a) Until July 1, 2014, a city or county may export up to seventy
percent of collected compostable waste to a different county for
storage and processing; and
(b) Until July 1, 2015, a city or county may export up to sixty
percent of collected compostable waste to a different county for
storage and processing.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.95.090 and 1991 c 298 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each county and city comprehensive solid waste management plan
shall include the following:
(1) A detailed inventory and description of all existing solid
waste handling facilities including an inventory of any deficiencies in
meeting current solid waste handling needs.
(2) The estimated long-range needs for solid waste handling
facilities projected twenty years into the future.
(3) A program for the orderly development of solid waste handling
facilities in a manner consistent with the plans for the entire county
which shall:
(a) Meet the minimum functional standards for solid waste handling
adopted by the department and all laws and regulations relating to air
and water pollution, fire prevention, flood control, and protection of
public health;
(b) Take into account the comprehensive land use plan of each
jurisdiction;
(c) Contain a six year construction and capital acquisition program
for solid waste handling facilities; and
(d) Contain a plan for financing both capital costs and operational
expenditures of the proposed solid waste management system.
(4) A program for surveillance and control.
(5) A current inventory and description of solid waste collection
needs and operations within each respective jurisdiction which shall
include:
(a) Any franchise for solid waste collection granted by the
utilities and transportation commission in the respective jurisdictions
including the name of the holder of the franchise and the address of
his or her place of business and the area covered by the franchise;
(b) Any city solid waste operation within the county and the
boundaries of such operation;
(c) The population density of each area serviced by a city
operation or by a franchised operation within the respective
jurisdictions;
(d) The projected solid waste collection needs for the respective
jurisdictions for the next six years.
(6) A comprehensive waste reduction and recycling element that, in
accordance with the priorities established in RCW 70.95.010, provides
programs that (a) reduce the amount of waste generated, (b) provide
incentives and mechanisms for source separation, and (c) establish
recycling opportunities for the source separated waste.
(7) The waste reduction and recycling element shall include the
following:
(a) Waste reduction strategies;
(b) Source separation strategies, including:
(i) Programs for the collection of source separated materials from
residences in urban and rural areas. In urban areas, these programs
shall include collection of source separated recyclable materials from
single and multiple-family residences, unless the department approves
an alternative program, according to the criteria in the planning
guidelines. Such criteria shall include: Anticipated recovery rates
and levels of public participation, availability of environmentally
sound disposal capacity, access to markets for recyclable materials,
unreasonable cost impacts on the ratepayer over the six-year planning
period, utilization of environmentally sound waste reduction and
recycling technologies, and other factors as appropriate. In rural
areas, these programs shall include but not be limited to drop-off
boxes, buy-back centers, or a combination of both, at each solid waste
transfer, processing, or disposal site, or at locations convenient to
the residents of the county. The drop-off boxes and buy-back centers
may be owned or operated by public, nonprofit, or private persons;
(ii) Programs to monitor the collection of source separated waste
at nonresidential sites where there is sufficient density to sustain a
program;
(iii) Programs to collect yard waste, if the county or city
submitting the plan finds that there are adequate markets or capacity
for composted yard waste within ((or near)) the service area to consume
((the majority)), pursuant to section 3 of this act, at least fifty
percent of the material collected; and
(iv) Programs to educate and promote the concepts of waste
reduction and recycling;
(c) Recycling strategies, including a description of markets for
recyclables, a review of waste generation trends, a description of
waste composition, a discussion and description of existing programs
and any additional programs needed to assist public and private sector
recycling, and an implementation schedule for the designation of
specific materials to be collected for recycling, and for the provision
of recycling collection services;
(d) Other information the county or city submitting the plan
determines is necessary.
(8) An assessment of the plan's impact on the costs of solid waste
collection. The assessment shall be prepared in conformance with
guidelines established by the utilities and transportation commission.
The commission shall cooperate with the Washington state association of
counties and the association of Washington cities in establishing such
guidelines.
(9) A review of potential areas that meet the criteria as outlined
in RCW 70.95.165.

--- END ---