BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No fee may be charged by a health care provider for reproducing
health care information or any clerical activities associated with
reproducing and delivering health care information, except as provided
in this chapter.
(2) No fee may be charged by a health care provider for responding
to a request for documentation for purposes of determining amounts owed
by a patient and furnishing payment for those referenced charges owing
by the patient to that provider.

--- END ---