BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) In 2005, to address an unexpected
significant loss of tax revenue resulting from the Estate of Hemphill
decision and to provide additional funding for public education, the
legislature enacted a stand-alone estate and transfer tax, effective
May 17, 2005. The stand-alone estate and transfer tax applies to the
transfer of property at death. By defining the term "transfer" to mean
a "transfer as used in section 2001 of the internal revenue code," the
legislature clearly expressed its intent that a "transfer" for purposes
of determining the federal taxable estate is also a "transfer" for
purposes of determining the Washington taxable estate.
(2) In In re Estate of Bracken, Docket No. 84114-4, the Washington
supreme court narrowly construed the term "transfer" as defined in the
Washington estate tax code.
(3) The legislature finds that it is well established that the term
"transfer" as used in the federal estate tax code is construed broadly
and extends to the "shifting from one to another of any power or
privilege incidental to the ownership or enjoyment of property" that
occurs at death. Fernandez v. Wiener, 326 U.S. 340, 352 (1945).
(4) The legislature further finds that: The Bracken decision held
certain qualified terminable interest property (QTIP) of married
couples was transferred without incurring Washington state estate tax
liability, which: (a) Creates an inequity never intended by the
legislature because unmarried individuals did not enjoy any similar
opportunities to avoid or greatly reduce their potential Washington
estate tax liability; and (b) may create disparate treatment between
QTIP property and other property transferred between spouses that is
eligible for the marital deduction.
(5) Therefore, the legislature finds that it is necessary to
reinstate the legislature's intended meaning when it enacted the estate
tax, restore parity between married couples and unmarried individuals,
restore parity between QTIP property and other property eligible for
the marital deduction, and prevent the adverse fiscal impacts of the
Bracken decision by reaffirming its intent that the term "transfer" as
used in the Washington estate and transfer tax is to be given its
broadest possible meaning consistent with established United States
supreme court precedents, subject only to the limits and exceptions
expressly provided by the legislature.
(6) As curative, clarifying, and remedial, the legislature intends
for this act to apply both prospectively and retroactively to estates
of decedents dying on or after May 17, 2005.

Sec. 2 RCW 83.100.020 and 2013 c 23 s 341 are each amended to
read as follows:
((As used in this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Applicable exclusion amount" means:
(i) One million five hundred thousand dollars for decedents dying
before January 1, 2006;
(ii) Two million dollars for estates of decedents dying on or after
January 1, 2006, and before January 1, 2014; and
(iii) For estates of decedents dying in calendar year 2014 and each
calendar year thereafter, the amount in (a)(ii) of this subsection must
be adjusted annually, except as otherwise provided in this subsection
(1)(a)(iii). The annual adjustment is determined by multiplying two
million dollars by one plus the percentage by which the most recent
October consumer price index exceeds the consumer price index for
October 2012, and rounding the result to the nearest one thousand
dollars. No adjustment is made for a calendar year if the adjustment
would result in the same or a lesser applicable exclusion amount than
the applicable exclusion amount for the immediately preceding calendar
year. The applicable exclusion amount under this subsection
(1)(a)(iii) for the decedent's estate is the applicable exclusion
amount in effect as of the date of the decedent's death.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "consumer price index" means
the consumer price index for all urban consumers, all items, for the
Seattle-Tacoma-Bremerton metropolitan area as calculated by the United
States bureau of labor statistics.
(2) "Decedent" means a deceased individual((;)).
(((2))) (3) "Department" means the department of revenue, the
director of that department, or any employee of the department
exercising authority lawfully delegated to him or her by the
director((;)).
(((3))) (4) "Federal return" means any tax return required by
chapter 11 of the internal revenue code((;)).
(((4))) (5) "Federal tax" means a tax under chapter 11 of the
internal revenue code((;)).
(((5))) (6) "Gross estate" means "gross estate" as defined and used
in section 2031 of the internal revenue code((;)).
(((6))) (7) "Person" means any individual, estate, trust, receiver,
cooperative association, club, corporation, company, firm, partnership,
joint venture, syndicate, or other entity and, to the extent permitted
by law, any federal, state, or other governmental unit or subdivision
or agency, department, or instrumentality thereof((;)).
(((7))) (8) "Person required to file the federal return" means any
person required to file a return required by chapter 11 of the internal
revenue code, such as the personal representative of an estate((;)).
(((8))) (9) "Property" means property included in the gross
estate((;)).
(((9))) (10) "Resident" means a decedent who was domiciled in
Washington at time of death((;)).
(((10))) (11) "Taxpayer" means a person upon whom tax is imposed
under this chapter, including an estate or a person liable for tax
under RCW 83.100.120((;)).
(((11))) (12) "Transfer" means "transfer" as used in section 2001
of the internal revenue code and includes any shifting upon death of
the economic benefit in property or any power or legal privilege
incidental to the ownership or enjoyment of property. However,
"transfer" does not include a qualified heir disposing of an interest
in property qualifying for a deduction under RCW 83.100.046 or ceasing
to use the property for farming purposes((;)).
(((12))) (13) "Internal revenue code" means((, for the purposes of
this chapter and RCW 83.110.010,)) the United States internal revenue
code of 1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2005((;)).
(((13))) (14) "Washington taxable estate" means the federal taxable
estate((, less: (a) One million five hundred thousand dollars for
decedents dying before January 1, 2006; and (b) two million dollars for
decedents dying on or after January 1, 2006; and (c) the amount of any
deduction allowed under RCW 83.100.046; and)) and includes, but is not
limited to, the value of any property included in the gross estate
under section 2044 of the internal revenue code, regardless of whether
the decedent's interest in such property was acquired before May 17,
2005, (a) plus amounts required to be added to the Washington taxable
estate under RCW 83.100.047, (b) less: (i) The applicable exclusion
amount; (ii) the amount of any deduction allowed under RCW 83.100.046;
(iii) amounts allowed to be deducted from the Washington taxable estate
under RCW 83.100.047; and (iv) the amount of any deduction allowed
under section 3 of this act.
(((14))) (15) "Federal taxable estate" means the taxable estate as
determined under chapter 11 of the internal revenue code without regard
to: (a) The termination of the federal estate tax under section 2210
of the internal revenue code or any other provision of law, and (b) the
deduction for state estate, inheritance, legacy, or succession taxes
allowable under section 2058 of the internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 83.100 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of determining the tax due under this chapter,
a deduction is allowed for the value of the decedent's qualified
family-owned business interests, not to exceed two million five hundred
thousand dollars, if:
(a) The value of the decedent's qualified family-owned business
interests exceed fifty percent of the decedent's Washington taxable
estate determined without regard to the deduction for the applicable
exclusion amount;
(b) During the eight-year period ending on the date of the
decedent's death, there have been periods aggregating five years or
more during which:
(i) Such interests were owned by the decedent or a member of the
decedent's family;
(ii) There was material participation, within the meaning of
section 2032A(e)(6) of the internal revenue code, by the decedent or a
member of the decedent's family in the operation of the trade or
business to which such interests relate;
(c) The qualified family-owned business interests are acquired by
any qualified heir from, or passed to any qualified heir from, the
decedent, within the meaning of RCW 83.100.046(2), and the decedent was
at the time of his or her death a citizen or resident of the United
States; and
(d) The value of the decedent's qualified family-owned business
interests is not more than six million dollars.
(2)(a) Only amounts included in the decedent's federal taxable
estate may be deducted under this subsection.
(b) Amounts deductible under RCW 83.100.046 may not be deducted
under this section.
(3)(a) There is imposed an additional estate tax on a qualified
heir if, within three years of the decedent's death and before the date
of the qualified heir's death:
(i) The material participation requirements described in section
2032A(c)(6)(b)(ii) of the internal revenue code are not met with
respect to the qualified family-owned business interest which was
acquired or passed from the decedent;
(ii) The qualified heir disposes of any portion of a qualified
family-owned business interest, other than by a disposition to a member
of the qualified heir's family or a person with an ownership interest
in the qualified family-owned business or through a qualified
conservation contribution under section 170(h) of the internal revenue
code;
(iii) The qualified heir loses United States citizenship within the
meaning of section 877 of the internal revenue code or with respect to
whom section 877(e)(1) applies, and such heir does not comply with the
requirements of section 877(g) of the internal revenue code; or
(iv) The principal place of business of a trade or business of the
qualified family-owned business interest ceases to be located in the
United States.
(b) The amount of the additional estate tax imposed under this
subsection is equal to the amount of tax savings under this section
with respect to the qualified family-owned business interest acquired
or passed from the decedent.
(c) Interest applies to the tax due under this subsection for the
period beginning on the date that the estate tax liability was due
under this chapter and ending on the date the additional estate tax due
under this subsection is paid. Interest under this subsection must be
computed as provided in RCW 83.100.070(2).
(d) The tax imposed by this subsection is due the day that is six
months after any taxable event described in (a) of this subsection
occurred and must be reported on a return as provided by the
department.
(e) The qualified heir is personally liable for the additional tax
imposed by this subsection unless he or she has furnished a bond in
favor of the department for such amount and for such time as the
department determines necessary to secure the payment of amounts due
under this subsection. The qualified heir, on furnishing a bond
satisfactory to the department, is discharged from personal liability
for any additional tax and interest under this subsection and is
entitled to a receipt or writing showing such discharge.
(f) Amounts due under this subsection attributable to any qualified
family-owned business interest are secured by a lien in favor of the
state on the property in respect to which such interest relates. The
lien under this subsection (3)(f) arises at the time the Washington
return is filed on which a deduction under this section is taken and
continues in effect until: (i) The tax liability under this subsection
has been satisfied or has become unenforceable by reason of lapse of
time; or (ii) the department is satisfied that no further tax liability
will arise under this subsection.
(g) Security acceptable to the department may be substituted for
the lien imposed by (f) of this subsection.
(h) For purposes of the assessment or correction of an assessment
for additional taxes and interest imposed under this subsection, the
limitations period in RCW 83.100.095 begins to run on the due date of
the return required under (d) of this subsection.
(i) For purposes of this subsection, a qualified heir may not be
treated as disposing of an interest described in section 2057(e)(1)(A)
of the internal revenue code by reason of ceasing to be engaged in a
trade or business so long as the property to which such interest
relates is used in a trade or business by any member of the qualified
heir's family.
(4)(a) The department may require a taxpayer claiming a deduction
under this section to provide the department with the names and contact
information of all qualified heirs.
(b) The department may also require any qualified heir to submit to
the department on an ongoing basis such information as the department
determines necessary or useful in determining whether the qualified
heir is subject to the additional tax imposed in subsection (3) of this
section. The department may not require such information more
frequently than twice per year. The department may impose a penalty on
a qualified heir who fails to provide the information requested within
thirty days of the date the department's written request for the
information was sent to the qualified heir. The amount of the penalty
under this subsection is five hundred dollars and may be collected in
the same manner as the tax imposed under subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) For purposes of this section, references to section 2057 of the
internal revenue code refer to section 2057 of the internal revenue
code, as existing on December 31, 2003.
(6) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Member of the decedent's family" and "member of the qualified
heir's family" have the same meaning as "member of the family" in RCW
83.100.046(10).
(b) "Qualified family-owned business interest" has the same meaning
as provided in section 2057(e) of the internal revenue code of 1986.
(c) "Qualified heir" has the same meaning as provided in section
2057(i) of the internal revenue code of 1986.
(7) This section applies to the estates of decedents dying on or
after January 1, 2014.

Sec. 4 RCW 83.100.040 and 2010 c 106 s 234 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A tax in an amount computed as provided in this section is
imposed on every transfer of property located in Washington. For the
purposes of this section, any intangible property owned by a resident
is located in Washington.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the amount of
tax is the amount provided in the following table:

If Washington Taxable

The amount of Tax Equals
Of Washington
Taxable Estate Value
Greater than

Estate is at least But Less Than Initial Tax Amount Plus Tax Rate %

$0 $1,000,000 $0 10.00% $0

$1,000,000 $2,000,000 $100,000 14.00% $1,000,000

$2,000,000 $3,000,000 $240,000 15.00% $2,000,000

$3,000,000 $4,000,000 $390,000 16.00% $3,000,000

$4,000,000 $6,000,000 $550,000 ((17.00%))
18.00% $4,000,000

$6,000,000 $7,000,000 (($890,000))
$910,000 ((18.00%))
19.00% $6,000,000

$7,000,000 $9,000,000 (($1,070,000))
$1,100,000 ((18.50%))
19.50% $7,000,000

$9,000,000 (($1,440,000))
$1,490,000 ((19.00%))
20.00% $9,000,000

(b) If any property in the decedent's estate is located outside of
Washington, the amount of tax is the amount determined in (a) of this
subsection multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is
the value of the property located in Washington. The denominator of
the fraction is the value of the decedent's gross estate. Property
qualifying for a deduction under RCW 83.100.046 must be excluded from
the numerator and denominator of the fraction.
(3) The tax imposed under this section is a stand-alone estate tax
that incorporates only those provisions of the internal revenue code as
amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2005, that do not conflict with
the provisions of this chapter. The tax imposed under this chapter is
independent of any federal estate tax obligation and is not affected by
termination of the federal estate tax.

Sec. 5 RCW 83.100.047 and 2005 c 516 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the federal taxable estate on the federal return is
determined by making an election under section 2056 or 2056A of the
internal revenue code, or if no federal return is required to be filed,
the department may provide by rule for a separate election on the
Washington return, consistent with section 2056 or 2056A of the
internal revenue code, for the purpose of determining the amount of tax
due under this chapter. The election ((shall be)) is binding on the
estate and the beneficiaries, consistent with the internal revenue
code. All other elections or valuations on the Washington return
((shall)) must be made in a manner consistent with the federal return,
if a federal return is required, and such rules as the department may
provide.
(2) Amounts deducted for federal income tax purposes under section
642(g) of the internal revenue code of 1986((, shall)) are not ((be))
allowed as deductions in computing the amount of tax due under this
chapter.
(3) Notwithstanding any department rule, if a taxpayer makes an
election consistent with section 2056 of the internal revenue code as
permitted under this section, the taxpayer's Washington taxable estate,
and the surviving spouse's Washington taxable estate, must be adjusted
as follows:
(a) For the taxpayer that made the election, any amount deducted by
reason of section 2056(b)(7) of the internal revenue code is added to,
and the value of property for which a Washington election under this
section was made is deducted from, the Washington taxable estate.
(b) For the estate of the surviving spouse, the amount included in
the estate's gross estate pursuant to section 2044 (a) and (b)(1)(A) of
the internal revenue code is deducted from, and the value of any
property for which an election under this section was previously made
is added to, the Washington taxable estate.

Sec. 6 RCW 83.100.047 and 2009 c 521 s 192 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) If the federal taxable estate on the federal return is
determined by making an election under section 2056 or 2056A of the
internal revenue code, or if no federal return is required to be filed,
the department may provide by rule for a separate election on the
Washington return, consistent with section 2056 or 2056A of the
internal revenue code and (b) of this subsection, for the purpose of
determining the amount of tax due under this chapter. The election
((shall be)) is binding on the estate and the beneficiaries, consistent
with the internal revenue code and (b) of this subsection. All other
elections or valuations on the Washington return ((shall)) must be made
in a manner consistent with the federal return, if a federal return is
required, and such rules as the department may provide.
(b) The department ((shall)) must provide by rule that a state
registered domestic partner is deemed to be a surviving spouse and
entitled to a deduction from the Washington taxable estate for any
interest passing from the decedent to his or her domestic partner,
consistent with section 2056 or 2056A of the internal revenue code but
regardless of whether such interest would be deductible from the
federal gross estate under section 2056 or 2056A of the internal
revenue code.
(2) Amounts deducted for federal income tax purposes under section
642(g) of the internal revenue code of 1986 ((shall)) are not ((be))
allowed as deductions in computing the amount of tax due under this
chapter.
(3) Notwithstanding any department rule, if a taxpayer makes an
election consistent with section 2056 of the internal revenue code as
permitted under this section, the taxpayer's Washington taxable estate,
and the surviving spouse's Washington taxable estate, must be adjusted
as follows:
(a) For the taxpayer that made the election, any amount deducted by
reason of section 2056(b)(7) of the internal revenue code is added to,
and the value of property for which a Washington election under this
section was made is deducted from, the Washington taxable estate.
(b) For the estate of the surviving spouse, the amount included in
the estate's gross estate pursuant to section 2044 (a) and (b)(1)(A) of
the internal revenue code is deducted from, and the value of any
property for which an election under this section was previously made
is added to, the Washington taxable estate.

Sec. 7 RCW 83.100.120 and 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.120 are
each amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any
personal representative who distributes any property without first
paying, securing another's payment of, or furnishing security for
payment of the taxes due under this chapter is personally liable for
the taxes due to the extent of the value of any property that may come
or may have come into the possession of the personal representative.
Security for payment of the taxes due under this chapter ((shall)) must
be in an amount equal to or greater than the value of all property that
is or has come into the possession of the personal representative, as
of the time the security is furnished.
(b) For the estates of decedents dying prior to April 9, 2006, a
personal representative is not personally liable for taxes due on the
value of any property included in the gross estate and the Washington
taxable estate as a result of section 2044 of the internal revenue code
unless the property is located in the state of Washington or the
property has or will come into the possession or control of the
personal representative.
(2) Any person who has the control, custody, or possession of any
property and who delivers any of the property to the personal
representative or legal representative of the decedent outside
Washington without first paying, securing another's payment of, or
furnishing security for payment of the taxes due under this chapter is
liable for the taxes due under this chapter to the extent of the value
of the property delivered. Security for payment of the taxes due under
this chapter ((shall)) must be in an amount equal to or greater than
the value of all property delivered to the personal representative or
legal representative of the decedent outside Washington by such a
person.
(3) For the purposes of this section, persons who do not have
possession of a decedent's property include anyone not responsible
primarily for paying the tax due under this section or their
transferees, which includes but is not limited to mortgagees or
pledgees, stockbrokers or stock transfer agents, banks and other
depositories of checking and savings accounts, safe-deposit companies,
and life insurance companies.
(4) For the purposes of this section, any person who has the
control, custody, or possession of any property and who delivers any of
the property to the personal representative or legal representative of
the decedent may rely upon the release certificate or the release of
nonliability certificate, furnished by the department to the personal
representative, as evidence of compliance with the requirements of this
chapter, and make such deliveries and transfers as the personal
representative may direct without being liable for any taxes due under
this chapter.

Sec. 8 RCW 83.100.210 and 2010 c 106 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The following provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW have full force
and application with respect to the taxes imposed under this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise: RCW 82.32.110,
82.32.120, 82.32.130, 82.32.320, 82.32.330, and 82.32.340. The
definitions in this chapter have full force and application with
respect to the application of chapter 82.32 RCW to this chapter unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(2) In addition to the provisions stated in subsection (1) of this
section, the following provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW have full force
and application with respect to the taxes, penalties, and interest
imposed under section 3 of this act: RCW 82.32.090, 82.32.117,
82.32.135, 82.32.210, 82.32.220, 82.32.230, 82.32.235, 82.32.237,
82.32.245, and 82.32.265.
(3) The department may enter into closing agreements as provided in
RCW 82.32.350 and 82.32.360.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 and 5 of this act apply both
prospectively and retroactively to all estates of decedents dying on or
after May 17, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act does not affect any final
judgment, no longer subject to appeal, entered by a court of competent
jurisdiction before the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 4 of this act applies to estates of
decedents dying on or after January 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Section 5 of this act expires January 1,
2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for sections 3, 4, and 6 of this act which take
effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---