BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the supreme
court's decision in William Rogers v. Tacoma, while clarifying the
taxation of temporary staffing agencies, resulted in differing
interpretations of regulatory requirements in order to qualify for a
pass-through exclusion from Washington B&O taxes for payroll
reimbursements made within an affiliated group.
(2) The legislature passed Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6143 during the 2010 legislative session that directed the
department of revenue to conduct a review and provide a report on the
state's tax policies with respect to the taxation of intercompany
transactions. The report affirms that centralized payroll reporting
systems can result in an unintended additional layer of tax for
Washington businesses. Exclusions for payroll reimbursements allow
businesses to have efficient administrative costs without incurring an
additional tax obligation resulting exclusively from streamlining
payroll processes. Further, this treatment of allowing for an
exclusion of payroll cost reimbursements within a centralized payroll
system is consistent with historical tax practices of the department of
revenue prior to the William Rogers decision.
(3) The department of revenue continues to work with taxpayers to
study taxation of transactions within and between affiliated business
organizations in order to determine the appropriate policies and to
identify areas where statutory and regulatory changes may be necessary.
(4) The legislature finds that the tax policy of allowing
exclusions for payroll cost reimbursements within a centralized payroll
reporting system is appropriate and should be affirmed. The
legislature adopts the historical tax policy of allowing exclusions for
payroll cost reimbursements within a centralized payroll reporting
system of an affiliated group and requires the implementation of such
tax policy from the effective date of this section. The legislature
does not intend for this act to retroactively create a right of refund
for taxes paid on payroll cost reimbursements prior to the enactment of
this statute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts that a qualified
employer of record engaged in providing paymaster services receives
from an affiliated business to cover employee costs of a qualified
employee. However, no exclusion is allowed under this section for any
employee costs incurred in connection with a contractual obligation of
the taxpayer to provide services, including staffing services as
defined in RCW 82.04.540.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Affiliated" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.32.655(7).
(b) "Employee costs" are the actual cost of wages and salaries,
benefits, workers' compensation, payroll taxes, withholding, or other
assessments paid to or on behalf of an employee.
(c) "Functional employment relationship" means having control over
the work schedule and activities of the employees and control over all
employment decisions such as salary, discipline, hiring, or layoffs.
(d) "Paymaster services" means providing payroll and related human
resource services.
(e) "Qualified employee" means an employee with whom the affiliated
business has a functional employment relationship. Neither the
employer of record, nor any other affiliate, may have a functional
employment relationship with the employee.
(f) "Qualified employer of record" is a person who:
(i) Has no functional employment relationship with a qualified
employee; and
(ii) Has no contractual liability with a qualified employee for the
employee costs. A qualified employer of record may have statutory or
common law liability to the qualified employees or to third parties for
employee costs.

--- END ---