BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.56.360 and 2006 c 277 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person commits retail theft with extenuating circumstances if
he or she commits theft of property from a mercantile establishment
with one of the following extenuating circumstances:
(a) To facilitate the theft, the person leaves the mercantile
establishment through a designated emergency exit;
(b) The person was, at the time of the theft, in possession of an
item, article, implement, or device designed to overcome security
systems including, but not limited to, lined bags or tag removers; or
(c) The person committed within a one hundred eighty-day period
either (i) theft at three or more separate and distinct mercantile
establishments ((within a one hundred eighty-day period)) or (ii) theft
on three or more separate and distinct occasions from one or more
mercantile establishments.
(2) A person is guilty of retail theft with extenuating
circumstances in the first degree if the theft involved constitutes
theft in the first degree. Retail theft with extenuating circumstances
in the first degree is a class B felony.
(3) A person is guilty of retail theft with extenuating
circumstances in the second degree if the theft involved constitutes
theft in the second degree. Retail theft with extenuating
circumstances in the second degree is a class C felony.
(4) A person is guilty of retail theft with extenuating
circumstances in the third degree if the theft involved constitutes
theft in the third degree. Retail theft with extenuating circumstances
in the third degree is a class C felony.

--- END ---