BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.350 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 16 are each amended
to read as follows:
A county required or choosing to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 may
establish a process as part of its urban growth areas, that are
designated under RCW 36.70A.110, for reviewing proposals to authorize
new fully contained communities located outside of the initially
designated urban growth areas.
(1) A new fully contained community may be approved in a county
planning under this chapter if criteria including but not limited to
the following are met:
(a) New infrastructure is provided for through the fully contained
community permitting and planning process and impact fees ((are)) may
be established consistent with the requirements of RCW 82.02.050 that
apply only to the fully contained community and support system
improvements reasonably related to the development;
(b) Transit-oriented site planning and traffic demand management
programs are implemented;
(c) Buffers are provided between the new fully contained
communities and adjacent urban development;
(d) A mix of uses is provided to offer jobs, housing, and services
to the residents of the new community;
(e) Affordable housing is provided within the new community for a
broad range of income levels;
(f) Environmental protection has been addressed and provided for;
(g) Development regulations are established to ensure urban growth
will not occur in adjacent nonurban areas;
(h) Provision is made to mitigate impacts on designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands;
(i) The plan for the new fully contained community is consistent
with the development regulations established for the protection of
critical areas by the county pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170.
(2) New fully contained communities may be approved outside
established urban growth areas only if a county reserves a portion of
the twenty-year population projection and offsets the urban growth area
accordingly for allocation to new fully contained communities that meet
the requirements of this chapter. Any county electing to establish a
new community reserve shall do so no more often than once every five
years as a part of the designation or review of urban growth areas
required by this chapter. The new community reserve shall be allocated
on a project-by-project basis, only after specific project approval
procedures have been adopted pursuant to this chapter as a development
regulation. When a new community reserve is established, urban growth
areas designated pursuant to this chapter shall accommodate the
unreserved portion of the twenty-year population projection.
Final approval of an application for a new fully contained
community shall be considered an adopted amendment to the comprehensive
plan prepared pursuant to RCW 36.70A.070 designating the new fully
contained community as an urban growth area.

--- END ---