BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.105D.--- and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 10 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The environmental legacy stewardship account is created in the
state treasury. Beginning July 1, 2013, and every fiscal year
thereafter, the annual amount received from the tax imposed by RCW
82.21.030 that exceeds one hundred forty million dollars must be
deposited into the environmental legacy stewardship account. The state
treasurer may make periodic deposits into the environmental legacy
stewardship account based on forecasted revenue. Moneys in the account
may only be spent after appropriation.
(2) Moneys in the environmental legacy stewardship account may be
spent on:
(a) Grants or loans to local governments for performance and
outcome-based projects, model remedies, ((demonstrated technologies))
demonstration projects, procedures, contracts, and project management
and oversight that result in significant reductions in the time to
complete compared to baseline averages ((for:
(a)));
(b) Purposes authorized under RCW 70.105D.070 (3) and (4);
(((b) Storm water low-impact retrofit projects and other projects
with significant environmental benefits that reduce storm water
pollution from existing infrastructure and development;))
(c) Grants or loans awarded through a competitive grant program
administered by the department to fund design and construction of low-impact development retrofit projects and other high quality projects
that reduce storm water pollution from existing infrastructure. The
competitive grant program must apply criteria to review, rank, and
prioritize projects for funding based on their water quality benefits,
ecological benefits, and effectiveness at reducing environmental
degradation; and
(d) Cleanup and disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or
derelict vessels, defined for the purposes of this section as vessels
that have little or no value and either have no identified owner or
have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean up and
dispose of the vessel, that pose a threat to human health or the
environment((; and
(d) Appropriations to the state and local toxics control accounts
created in RCW 70.105D.070 if the legislature determines that
priorities for spending exceed available funds in those accounts)).
(3) Except as provided under RCW 70.105D.070(3) (k) and (q),
nothing in this act expands the ability of a potentially liable person
to receive public funding.

--- END ---