BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.23 RCW
to read as follows:
A life insurer may issue and deliver an individual life insurance
policy where the minimum death benefit under the policy does not equal
or exceed the cumulative premiums for the policy if the amount of the
minimum death benefit equals or exceeds five thousand dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.24 RCW
to read as follows:
A life insurer may issue and deliver coverage under a group life
insurance policy where the minimum death benefit provided under the
policy or certificate does not equal or exceed the cumulative premiums
for the policy if the amount of the minimum death benefit equals or
exceeds five thousand dollars. The group life policy may be offered
and sold whether or not the insured will pay all or substantially all
of the premiums for the coverage if the policy is converted from
coverage under the group policy to an individual policy.

--- END ---