BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
Any term used in this chapter has the same meaning as when used in a
comparable context in the internal revenue code unless provided
otherwise.
(1) "Capital assets" has the same meaning as provided by section
1221 of the internal revenue code.
(2) "Capital gains" means the excess of the gains from sales or
exchanges of capital assets over the losses from such sales or
exchanges received by a person.
(3) "Department" means the state department of revenue.
(4) "Internal revenue code" means the United States internal
revenue code of 1986 and amendments thereto, as existing and in effect
as of the effective date of this section.
(5) "Nonresident" means a person whose domicile is not in this
state and who does not reside in this state for more than one hundred
eighty-three days during the tax year.
(6) "Person" means a natural person.
(7)(a) "Resident" means a person whose domicile is in this state or
whose domicile is not in this state but who resides in this state for
more than one hundred eighty-three days during the tax year.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, once a person is a resident,
residency continues for three years, notwithstanding changes in
domicile.
(8) "Taxable year" means the taxpayer's taxable year as defined
under the internal revenue code.
(9) "Taxpayer" means a person receiving capital gains subject to
tax under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Beginning January 1, 2014, a tax is
imposed on every person for the privilege of selling or exchanging
capital assets. The tax equals six and one-half percent multiplied by
a person's capital gains for each taxable year.
(2) For resident persons, all capital gains must be allocated to
this state.
(3) For nonresident persons, capital gains must be derived from
sources within this state and allocated to this state.
(4) The following threshold exemptions are allowed in determining
the tax under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Fifty thousand dollars; or
(b) One hundred thousand dollars for persons filing joint returns
under section 9 of this act.
(5) Capital gains must be reported in the taxable year they are
received. Losses from the sale or exchange of capital assets may only
be used to offset gains from other sales or exchanges of capital assets
in the same taxable year.
(6) Receipts from this tax must be deposited into the education
legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This chapter does not apply to gain from
the sale of a principal residence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This chapter does not apply to amounts
received by any person for the sale or exchange of property as
authorized under the condemnation proceedings as provided by law for
the exercise of the power of eminent domain under Title 8 RCW,
regardless of whether the parties have settled the matter prior to
filing an action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The intent of this section is to prevent
the multiple taxation of capital gains in both Washington and another
taxing jurisdiction.
(2) As used in this section, "taxing jurisdiction" means any of the
states, the District of Columbia, or any territory or possession of the
United States; any municipality, city, county, township, parish,
transportation district, or assessment jurisdiction; or other political
subdivision within the territorial limits of the United States with the
authority to impose a tax, charge, or fee.
(3) A resident person is allowed a credit against the tax imposed
in section 2 of this act equal to the amount of tax paid to another
taxing jurisdiction on capital gains derived from sources within the
other taxing jurisdiction.
(4) The amount of tax credits received by any resident person under
this section may not exceed the total amount of tax due under this
chapter, and there may be no carryback or carryforward of any unused
credits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Any person who knowingly attempts to
evade the tax imposed under this title or payment thereof is guilty of
a class C felony as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2) Any person who knowingly fails to pay tax, make returns, keep
records, or supply information, as required under this title, is guilty
of a gross misdemeanor as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) All taxpayers must file with the
department, on forms prescribed by the department, a capital gains tax
return for each taxable year. A person owing no tax for a taxable year
is not required to file a return for that year. Each person required
to file a return under this title must, without assessment, notice, or
demand, pay any tax due thereon to the department on or before the date
fixed for the filing of the return.
(2) The department may by rule require that certain taxpayers file,
on forms prescribed by the department, informational returns for any
period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The due date of a return required to be
filed with the department must be the due date of the federal income
tax return or informational return for federal income tax purposes,
except as otherwise required by the department. The department may
grant extensions of times by which returns required to be filed by this
title may be submitted. The department may grant extensions of time to
pay tax with regard to taxes imposed by this title. Interest at the
rate as specified in RCW 82.32.050 must accrue during any extension
period and the interest and penalty provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW
apply to late payments and deficiencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) If the federal income tax liabilities of
both spouses are determined on a joint federal return for the taxable
year, they must file a joint return under this title.
(2) If neither spouse is required to file a federal income tax
return for the taxable year, a joint return is required to be filed
under this title under the same conditions under which a joint return
may be filed for purposes of the federal income tax.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, if the
federal income tax liability of either spouse is determined on a
separate federal return for the taxable year, they must file separate
returns under this title.
(4) In any case in which a joint return is filed under this
section, the liability of the husband and wife or partners is joint and
several, unless the spouse or partner is relieved of liability under 26
U.S.C. Sec. 6013 of the internal revenue code.
(5) Partners in a state registered domestic partnership or who have
a marriage licensed under chapter 26.04 RCW may file a joint return
under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Every person required to pay the tax
imposed under this title must keep records, render statements, make
returns, file reports, and perform other acts as the department
requires by rule. Each return must be made under penalty of perjury
and on forms prescribed by the department. The department may require
other statements and reports be made under penalty of perjury and on
forms prescribed by the department. The department may require any
taxpayer to furnish to the department a correct copy of any return or
document that the taxpayer has filed with the internal revenue service
or received from the internal revenue service.
(2) All books and records and other papers and documents required
to be kept under this title are subject to inspection by the department
at all times during business hours of the day.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) To the extent possible without being
inconsistent with this chapter, all of the provisions of the internal
revenue code relating to the time and manner of making returns,
extensions of time for filing returns, verification of returns, and the
time when a return is deemed filed apply to this chapter.
(2) The department by rule may provide modifications and exceptions
to requirements of subsection (1) of this section, if reasonably
necessary to facilitate the prompt, efficient, and equitable collection
of tax under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The department must refund all taxes
improperly paid or collected.
(2) The following sections apply to the administration of taxes
imposed under this title: RCW 82.32.050, 82.32.055, 82.32.060,
82.32.070, 82.32.080, 82.32.085, 82.32.090, 82.32.100, 82.32.105,
82.32.110, 82.32.117, 82.32.120, 82.32.130, 82.32.135, 82.32.145,
82.32.150, 82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.32.180, 82.32.190, 82.32.200,
82.32.210, 82.32.212, 82.32.220, 82.32.230, 82.32.235, 82.32.237,
82.32.240, 82.32.245, 82.32.265, 82.32.300, 82.32.310, 82.32.320,
82.32.330, 82.32.340, 82.32.350, 82.32.360, 82.32.380, and 82.32.410.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The department may adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW for the administration and enforcement of this
chapter. The rules, to the extent possible without being inconsistent
with this chapter, must follow the internal revenue code and the
regulations and rulings of the United States treasury department with
respect to the federal income tax. The department may adopt as a part
of these rules any portions of the internal revenue code and treasury
department regulations and rulings, in whole or in part.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) An authorized agent providing closing
and settlement services in a conveyance is required to withhold from
consideration payable to a transferor an amount equal to the tax due
imposed under section 2 of this act.
(2) An authorized agent is not required to withhold amounts under
this section if:
(a) The conveyance is in lieu of foreclosure of a mortgage, trust
deed, or other security instrument or a land sale contract with no
additional monetary consideration;
(b) The transferor is a personal representative, executor,
conservator, bankruptcy trustee, or other person acting under judicial
review;
(c) The transferor delivers to the authorized agent a written
assurance that the sale or exchange qualifies for exclusion of gain
under section 3 or 4 of this act.
(3)(a) An authorized agent must electronically report the tax
withheld on forms prescribed by the department and remit electronic
payment of the tax to the department under the methods provided in RCW
82.32.080. An authorized agent must electronically file and make
payment under this subsection within twenty-five days after the end of
the month in which the conveyance occurred.
(b) The amount of tax due is a specific lien upon each parcel of
real property located in this state that is sold by a transferor. The
lien attached from the time of sale until the tax is withheld and paid
as provided by this section. The lien may be enforced in the manner
prescribed for the foreclosure of mortgages.
(c) Amounts withheld pursuant to this section are held in trust for
Washington. If an authorized agent fails to remit an amount withheld
by the agent under this section by the time remittance is required, the
department may recover from the authorized agent the amount withheld,
plus interest and penalties as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW. The tax
collection provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply to the collection of
amounts withheld pursuant to this section but not remitted to the
department as required under this section.
(4) A transferor may claim the amount withheld by an authorized
agent on the transferor's tax return.
(5) An authorized agent may withhold funds under this section
without written instructions to withhold from the transferor.
(6) A written affidavit must be executed by the transferor or the
transferor's tax advisor under penalty of perjury and must contain the
transferor's taxpayer identification number. The authorized agent must
retain for six years from the date of the closing of the conveyance any
written affirmation obtained by the agent in connection with the
conveyance. The department must prescribe by rule the form and content
of the written affidavit.
(7) It is a defense to any claim by the department or by a
transferor against an agent that the agent has acted in reasonable
reliance upon representations made by the transferor or the
transferor's tax advisor.
(8) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Authorized agent" means an agent who is responsible for
closing and settlement services in a conveyance;
(b) "Closing and settlement services" means services that are
provided by:
(i) A licensed escrow agent in a real estate closing escrow; or
(ii) An attorney for the benefit of a transferor or a transferee in
a conveyance, if, simultaneously with the conveyance, the attorney
deposits the unpaid purchase price into the attorney's client trust
account for disbursal pursuant to the written instructions of, or the
agreement between, the transferor and transferee;
(c) "Consideration" includes the amount of cash paid for a
conveyance and the amount of any lien, mortgage, contract, indebtedness
or other encumbrance existing against the property conveyed to which
the property remains subject or which the purchaser agrees to pay or
assume;
(d) "Conveyance" means a sale or exchange of any real estate
located in Washington;
(e) "Net proceeds" means the net amount to be disbursed to the
transferor, prior to reduction for withholding, as shown on the
transferor's settlement statement for the conveyance; and
(f) "Transferor" means a person, as defined in section 1 of this
act, on the closing date of the conveyance.

Sec. 15 RCW 82.45.090 and 2009 c 350 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for a sale of a beneficial interest in real property
((where)) when no instrument evidencing the sale is recorded in the
official real property records of the county in which the property is
located, the tax imposed by this chapter ((shall)) and the tax withheld
under section 14 of this act must be paid to and collected by the
treasurer of the county within which is located the real property which
was sold.
(2) In collecting the tax under this section the treasurer
((shall)) must act as agent for the state.
(a) The county treasurer ((shall)) must cause a verification of
payment evidencing satisfaction of the lien to be affixed to the
instrument of sale or conveyance prior to its recording or to the real
estate excise tax affidavit in the case of used mobile home sales and
used floating home sales.
(i) A receipt issued by the county treasurer for the payment of the
tax imposed under this chapter ((shall be)) is evidence of the
satisfaction of the lien imposed hereunder and may be recorded in the
manner prescribed for recording satisfactions of mortgages.
(ii) No instrument of sale or conveyance evidencing a sale subject
to the tax ((shall)) may be accepted by the county auditor for filing
or recording until the tax ((shall have)) has been paid and the
verification of payment affixed thereto; in case the tax is not due on
the transfer, the instrument ((shall)) may not be so accepted until
suitable notation of such fact has been made on the instrument by the
treasurer.
(iii) Any time there is a sale of a used mobile home, used
manufactured home, used park model, or used floating home that has not
been title eliminated, property taxes must be current in order to
complete the processing of the real estate excise tax affidavit or
other documents transferring title.
(iv) Verification that the property taxes are current must be noted
on the mobile home real estate excise tax affidavit or on a form
approved by the county treasurer.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (2), "mobile home,"
"manufactured home," and "park model" have the same meaning as provided
in RCW 59.20.030.
(((2))) (3) For a sale of a beneficial interest in real property
((where)) when a tax is due under this chapter and ((where)) when no
instrument is recorded in the official real property records of the
county in which the property is located, the sale ((shall)) must be
reported to the department of revenue within five days from the date of
the sale on such returns or forms and according to such procedures as
the department may prescribe. Such forms or returns ((shall)) must be
signed by both the transferor and the transferee and shall be
accompanied by payment of the tax due.
(((3))) (4) Any person who intentionally makes a false statement on
any return or form required to be filed with the department under this
chapter is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

Sec. 16 RCW 82.45.150 and 1996 c 149 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All of chapter 82.32 RCW, except RCW 82.32.030, 82.32.050,
82.32.140, 82.32.270, and 82.32.090 (1) and (((8))) (10), applies to
the tax imposed by this chapter, in addition to any other provisions of
law for the payment and enforcement of the tax imposed by this chapter.
The department of revenue ((shall)) must provide by rule ((provide))
for the effective administration of this chapter. The rules ((shall))
must prescribe and furnish a real estate excise tax affidavit form
verified by both the seller and the buyer, or agents of each, to be
used by each county, or the department, as the case may be, in the
collection of the tax imposed by this chapter, except that an affidavit
given in connection with grant of an easement or right-of-way to a gas,
electrical, or telecommunications company, as defined in RCW 80.04.010,
or to a public utility district or cooperative that distributes
electricity, need be verified only on behalf of the company, district,
or cooperative. The department of revenue ((shall)) must annually
conduct audits of transactions and affidavits filed under this chapter.
(2) The department may combine the form required in section 7 of
this act with the real estate excise tax affidavit form required in
this section.

Sec. 17 RCW 83.100.230 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 10 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The education legacy trust account is created in the state
treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Except as otherwise provided in this section, expenditures from the
account may be used only for support of the common schools, and for
expanding access to higher education through funding for new
enrollments and financial aid, and other educational improvement
efforts.
(2) The first one hundred fifty million dollars per fiscal year of
moneys deposited into this account from the tax imposed under section
2 of this act must be used for early learning purposes, as defined in
RCW 43.215.010, and cannot supplant existing state funding for these
purposes. The next one hundred million dollars deposited in the
account each fiscal year must be used to fund the state need grant. By
July 1, 2015, and by July 1st of every year thereafter, the state
treasurer must transfer an amount, as provided in this subsection, into
the budget stabilization account. The amount is equal to the tax
revenue deposited into the account under section 2 of this act for the
prior fiscal year in excess of two hundred fifty million dollars.
However, if the balance in the budget stabilization account as of the
date of transfer under this subsection (2) is in excess of ten percent
of general state revenues, then the money must be transferred to the
state general fund and used for the state need grant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 14 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 This act, being necessary for the welfare
of the state and its inhabitants, must be liberally construed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---