BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s. c
4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $8,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for increasing high demand aerospace
enrollments by an additional one thousand full-time equivalent students
for the 2014-15 academic year in programs and at sites recommended by
the Washington aerospace and advanced manufacturing pipeline advisory
committee or its successor committee. It is the intent of the
legislature for funding to be ongoing or until there is no longer a
demonstrated need.
(2) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for developing a fabrication composite
wing incumbent worker training program to be housed at the Washington
aerospace training and research center. It is the intent of the
legislature for development and planning funds to continue in fiscal
year 2016 and for the training program to serve incumbent workers
starting with the 2015-16 academic year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s. c
4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for the department of commerce local government and
infrastructure division to provide grants to local governments to
assist a county or city in paying for the cost of preparing an
environmental analysis that advances environmental permitting
activities in and around current and future large manufacturing sites
for aerospace and other key economic growth centers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s. c
19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Renton Aerospace Training Center Construction (92000151)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for construction of the Renton aerospace training
center. This funding is in addition to funding provided in section
1077, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. (uncodified).

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s. c
19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Washington Aerospace Training and
Research Center (30000979)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for building modifications and acquisition of
specialized equipment for the purpose of developing a fabrication
composite wing incumbent worker training program at the Washington
aerospace training and research center located at Paine Field.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

--- END ---