BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that provisions and
directives adopted by the legislature in chapter 347, Laws of 1995,
landmark regulatory reform legislation that represented a consensus of
diverse interests and eighteen months of effort by the governor's task
force on regulatory reform, remain valid and unrealized in 2013.
The legislature reasserts that: (1) The project review process
must be used to make individual project decisions and may not be used
to make land use planning decisions; (2) the permitting process may not
be used as a comprehensive planning process; and (3) proposed projects
are subject to numerous laws, regulations, and plans that provide
environmental analysis, and that these projects should not be subjected
to duplicative environmental review under the state environmental
policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Development proposals, or any portion thereof, in counties and
cities planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that are consistent with the
applicable comprehensive plan and development regulations adopted or
amended under chapter 36.70A RCW are categorically exempt from the
requirements of this chapter.
(2) This section applies to counties and cities with comprehensive
plans adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW that were, prior to adoption,
subject to environmental analysis through an environmental impact
statement under RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Development proposals, or any portion thereof, in shorelines of
the state that are consistent with the applicable master programs
adopted or amended under chapter 90.58 RCW are categorically exempt
from the requirements of this chapter.
(2) This section applies to counties and cities with master
programs adopted under chapter 90.58 RCW that were, prior to adoption,
subject to environmental analysis through an environmental impact
statement under RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c).
(3) For purposes of this section, "development" has the same
meaning as defined in RCW 90.58.030.

--- END ---