BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.19.642 and 2013 c 306 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Effective June 1, 2006, for agencies complying with the ultra-low sulfur diesel mandate of the United States environmental protection
agency for on-highway diesel fuel, agencies shall use biodiesel as an
additive to ultra-low sulfur diesel for lubricity, provided that the
use of a lubricity additive is warranted and that the use of biodiesel
is comparable in performance and cost with other available lubricity
additives. The amount of biodiesel added to the ultra-low sulfur
diesel fuel shall be not less than two percent.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, effective
June 1, 2009, state agencies are required to use a minimum of twenty
percent biodiesel as compared to total volume of all diesel purchases
made by the agencies for the operation of the agencies' diesel-powered
vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment.
(3) All state agencies using biodiesel fuel shall, beginning on
July 1, 2006, file biannual reports with the department of enterprise
services documenting the use of the fuel and a description of how any
problems encountered were resolved.
(4) By December 1, 2009, the department of enterprise services
shall:
(a) Report to the legislature on the average true price
differential for biodiesel by blend and location; and
(b) Examine alternative fuel procurement methods that work to
address potential market barriers for in-state biodiesel producers and
report these findings to the legislature.
(5) ((During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, the
Washington state ferries is required to use a minimum of five percent
biodiesel as compared to total volume of all diesel purchases made by
the Washington state ferries for the operation of the Washington state
ferries diesel-powered vessels, as long as the price of a B5 biodiesel
blend does not exceed the price of conventional diesel fuel by five
percent or more.)) Beginning July 1, 2014, the department of
transportation and the Washington state patrol are exempt from the
biodiesel requirements under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.19.648 and 2013 c 328 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Effective June 1, 2015, all state agencies, to the extent
determined practicable by the rules adopted by the department of
commerce pursuant to RCW 43.325.080, are required to satisfy one
hundred percent of their fuel usage for operating publicly owned
vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment from electricity or
biofuel. Compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas, or propane may
be substituted for electricity or biofuel if the department of commerce
determines that electricity and biofuel are not reasonably available.
(2)(a) Effective June 1, 2018, all local government subdivisions of
the state, to the extent determined practicable by the rules adopted by
the department of commerce pursuant to RCW 43.325.080, are required to
satisfy one hundred percent of their fuel usage for operating publicly
owned vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment from electricity or
biofuel. The department of commerce shall convene an advisory
committee of representatives of local government subdivisions,
representatives from organizations representing each local government
subdivision, and either (i) an electric utility or (ii) a natural gas
utility, or both, to work with the department to develop the rules.
The department may invite additional stakeholders to participate in the
advisory committee as needed and determined by the department.
(b) The following are exempt from this requirement: (i) Transit
agencies using compressed natural gas on June 1, 2018, and (ii) engine
retrofits that would void warranties. Nothing in this section is
intended to require the replacement of equipment before the end of its
useful life. Compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas, or propane
may be substituted for electricity or biofuel if the department of
commerce determines that electricity and biofuel are not reasonably
available.
(c)(i) Rules adopted pursuant to RCW 43.325.080 must provide the
authority for local government subdivisions to elect to exempt police,
fire, and other emergency response vehicles, including utility vehicles
frequently used for emergency response, from the fuel usage requirement
in (a) of this subsection.
(ii) Prior to executing its authority under (c)(i) of this
subsection, a local government subdivision must provide notice to the
department of commerce of the exemption. The notice must include the
rationale for the exemption and an explanation of how the exemption is
consistent with rules adopted by the department of commerce.
(d) Before June 1, 2018, local government subdivisions purchasing
vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment capable of using
biodiesel must request warranty protection for the highest level of
biodiesel the vessel, vehicle, or construction equipment is capable of
using, up to one hundred percent biodiesel, as long as the costs are
reasonably equal to a vessel, vehicle, or construction equipment that
is not warranted to use up to one hundred percent biodiesel.
(3) In order to phase in this transition for the state, all state
agencies, to the extent determined practicable by the department of
commerce by rules adopted pursuant to RCW 43.325.080, are required to
achieve forty percent fuel usage for operating publicly owned vessels,
vehicles, and construction equipment from electricity or biofuel by
June 1, 2013. Compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas, or
propane may be substituted for electricity or biofuel if the department
of commerce determines that electricity and biofuel are not reasonably
available. The department of enterprise services, in consultation with
the department of commerce, shall report to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2013, on what percentage of the state's fuel
usage is from electricity or biofuel.
(4) Except for cars owned or operated by the Washington state
patrol, when tires on vehicles in the state's motor vehicle fleet are
replaced, they must be replaced with tires that have the same or better
rolling resistance as the original tires.
(5) By December 31, 2015, the state must, to the extent
practicable, install electrical outlets capable of charging electric
vehicles in each of the state's fleet parking and maintenance
facilities.
(6) The department of transportation(('s obligations under
subsection (3) of this section are subject to the availability of
amounts appropriated for the specific purpose identified in
subsection)) and the Washington state patrol are exempt from the
requirements under subsections (1) and (3) of this section.
(7) The department of transportation's obligations under subsection
(5) of this section are subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for the specific purpose identified in subsection (5) of
this section unless the department receives federal or private funds
for the specific purpose identified in subsection (5) of this section.
(8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component
assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to
charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and
consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.
(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility
that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter
a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged
battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and
consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.

--- END ---