BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
Transportation projects delineated in programs required under RCW
36.81.121, 35.77.010, or 35.58.2795 in counties and cities with
comprehensive plans adopted under chapter 36.70A, 36.70, 35.63, or
35A.63 RCW that were, prior to adoption, subject to environmental
analysis through an environmental impact statement under RCW
43.21C.030(2)(c) are exempt from compliance with this chapter.

--- END ---