BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) New construction, or normal maintenance or repair activities,
for streets, roads, highways, and Washington state ferries facilities
are exempt from compliance with this chapter.
(2) This section applies to new construction, or normal maintenance
or repair activities, for streets, roads, highways, and Washington
state ferries facilities conducted by or for counties, cities, or the
Washington state department of transportation in accordance with best
management practices required under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Guidelines adopted by the department and master programs
developed or amended by local governments under RCW 90.58.080 do not
require modification of or limit new construction, or normal
maintenance or repair activities, for streets, roads, highways, and
Washington state ferries facilities.
(2) This section applies to new construction, or normal maintenance
or repair activities, for streets, roads, highways, and Washington
state ferries facilities conducted by or for counties, cities, or the
Washington state department of transportation in accordance with best
management practices required under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Comprehensive plans and development regulations do not require
modification of or limit new construction, or normal maintenance or
repair activities, for streets, roads, highways, and Washington state
ferries facilities.
(2) This section applies to new construction, or normal maintenance
or repair activities, for streets, roads, highways, and Washington
state ferries facilities conducted by or for counties, cities, or the
Washington state department of transportation in accordance with best
management practices required under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.28 RCW
to read as follows:
Compliance with applicable environmental standards is presumed,
unless site specific information demonstrates that new construction, or
normal maintenance or repair activities, for streets, roads, highways,
and Washington state ferries facilities conducted by or for the
department causes or contributes to a violation of applicable
environmental standards, when the department is fully implementing
maintenance or repair activity best management practices contained in
maintenance or repair activity manuals approved by the department and
subject to any required environmental review or practices that are
demonstrably equivalent to practices contained in maintenance or repair
activity manuals approved by the department and subject to any required
environmental review.

--- END ---