BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.33.088 and 2010 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A purchaser of privately owned timber in an amount in excess of
two hundred thousand board feet in a voluntary sale made in the
ordinary course of business ((shall)) must, on or before the last day
of the month following the purchase of the timber, report the
particulars of the purchase to the department as required in subsection
(2) of this section.
(2) The report required in subsection (1) of this section must
contain all information relevant to the value of the timber purchased
including, but not limited to, the following, as applicable:
Purchaser's name, address, and contact information; seller's name,
address, and contact information; sale date; termination date in sale
agreement; total sale price; legal description of sale area, sale name
if applicable; forest practice application/harvest permit number if
available; total acreage involved in the sale; estimated net volume of
timber purchased by tree species and log grade; and description and
value of property improvements. For the purposes of this subsection
property improvements may include, but are not limited to: Road
construction or road improvements, reforestation, land clearing, stock
piling of rock, or any other agreed upon property improvement. A
report may be submitted in any reasonable form or, at the purchaser's
option, by submitting relevant excerpts of the timber sales contract.
A purchaser may comply by submitting the information in the following
form:

Purchaser's name, address, and contact information: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Seller's name, address, and contact information: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Sale date: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Termination date: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total sale price: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Legal description of sale area: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Sale name (if applicable): . . . . . . . . . . . .
Forest practice application/Harvest permit
number (if available): . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total acreage involved: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Estimated net volume of timber purchased by tree species
and log grade: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Description and value of property improvements, such as road
construction or road improvements, reforestation, land clearing, stock
piling of rock, or any other agreed upon property improvement: . . . . . . . . . . . .

(3) A purchaser of privately owned timber involved in a purchase
described in subsection (1) of this section, who fails to report a
purchase as required, may be liable for a penalty of two hundred fifty
dollars for each failure to report, as determined by the department.
(4) Privately purchased timber reports are confidential taxpayer
information under RCW 82.32.330.
(5) This section expires July 1, ((2014)) 2018.

--- END ---