BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person convicted and confined for any of the offenses set
forth in subsection (3) of this section must, prior to commencing any
civil action in state court against the victim of such offense, or the
victim's family, first obtain an order authorizing such action to
proceed from the sentencing judge, if available, or the presiding judge
in the county of conviction.
(2) This section does not apply to an action brought under Title 26
RCW.
(3) This section applies to persons convicted and confined for any
serious violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.
(4) A court may refuse to authorize an action, or a claim contained
therein, to proceed if the court finds that the action, or claim, is
frivolous or malicious. In determining whether an action, or a claim
asserted therein, is frivolous or malicious, the court may consider,
among other things, whether:
(a) The claim's realistic chance of ultimate success is slight;
(b) The claim has no arguable basis in law or in fact;
(c) It is clear that the party cannot prove facts in support of the
claim;
(d) The claim has been brought with the intent to harass the
opposing party; or
(e) The claim is substantially similar to a previous claim filed by
the inmate because the claim arises from the same operative facts.
(5) For purposes of this section, "victim's family" includes a
victim's spouse, domestic partner, children, parents, and siblings.
(6) Failure to obtain the authorization required by this section
prior to commencing an action shall result in loss of early release
time or other privileges. The department shall adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this subsection.

--- END ---