BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to promote
transparency in government and strengthen the Washington's open public
meetings act. The legislature finds that it is in the best interest of
citizens for public agencies with governing bodies to post meeting
agendas on web sites before meetings. Full public review and
inspection of meeting agendas will promote a greater exchange of
information so the public can provide meaningful input related to
government decisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.30 RCW
to read as follows:
Public agencies with governing bodies must make the agenda of each
regular meeting of the governing body available online no later than
twenty-four hours in advance of the published start time of the
meeting. An agency subject to provisions of this section is not
required to post an agenda if it does not have a web site or if it
employs fewer than ten full-time equivalent employees. Nothing in this
section prohibits subsequent modifications to agendas nor invalidates
any otherwise legal action taken at a meeting where the agenda was not
posted in accordance with this section. Nothing in this section
modifies notice requirements or shall be construed as establishing that
a public body or agency's online posting of an agenda as required by
this section is sufficient notice to satisfy public notice requirements
established under other laws. Failure to post an agenda in accordance
with this section shall not provide a basis for awarding attorney fees
under RCW 42.30.120 or commencing an action for mandamus or injunction
under RCW 42.30.130.

--- END ---