BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.52.112 and 2013 c 11 s 50 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A primary is a first stage in the public process by which
voters elect candidates to public office.
(2) Whenever candidates for a partisan office are to be elected,
the general election must be preceded by a primary conducted under this
chapter. Based upon votes cast at the primary, the top two candidates
will be certified as qualified to appear on the general election
ballot, unless only one candidate qualifies as provided in RCW
29A.36.170.
(3) No primary may be held for any single county partisan office to
fill an unexpired term if, after the last day allowed for candidates to
withdraw, only one candidate has filed for the position.
(4) For partisan office, if a candidate has expressed a party
preference on the declaration of candidacy, then that preference will
be shown after the name of the candidate on the primary and general
election ballots as set forth in rules of the secretary of state. A
candidate may choose to express no party preference. Any party
preferences are shown for the information of voters only and may in no
way limit the options available to voters.

--- END ---