BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In passing this act, the legislature intends
to remove specific mention of the human immunodeficiency virus from the
criminal statutes of the state to reflect that the human
immunodeficiency virus should not be treated differently from other
similar diseases and to reduce the stigma that such disparate treatment
brings upon those infected with the human immunodeficiency virus. The
legislature does not intend to narrow or broaden the statute defining
assault in the first degree, RCW 9A.36.011, from current law.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.36.011 and 1997 c 196 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of assault in the first degree if he or she,
with intent to inflict great bodily harm:
(a) Assaults another with a firearm or any deadly weapon or by any
force or means likely to produce great bodily harm or death; or
(b) Administers, exposes, or transmits to or causes to be taken by
another, poison((, the human immunodeficiency virus as defined in
chapter 70.24 RCW,)) or any other destructive or noxious substance; or
(c) Assaults another and inflicts great bodily harm.
(2)(a) For the purpose of this section, "destructive or noxious
substance" includes, but is not limited to, any blood-borne pathogen,
the normal course of which if untreated is death or great bodily injury
or harm, except as described in (b) of this subsection.
(b) A blood-borne pathogen is not a destructive or noxious
substance for the purpose of this section if, at the time of exposure,
there is no substantial risk of transmission. A court may not find
substantial risk of transmission if the defendant:
(i) Is in substantial compliance with a treatment regimen
prescribed by the infected person's health care provider that
measurably limits the risk of transmission of the blood-borne pathogen;
(ii) Is in substantial compliance with behavioral recommendations
of the infected person's health care provider or a public health
official to measurably limit to risk of transmission of the blood-borne
pathogen; or
(iii) Utilizes other methods generally accepted by the medical
profession to measurably limit the risk of transmission of the blood-borne pathogen, such as the use of a prophylactic device.
(3) Assault in the first degree is a class A felony.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.24.140 and 1988 c 206 s 917 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is unlawful for any person who has a sexually transmitted
disease, ((except HIV infection,)) when such person knows he or she is
infected with such a disease and when such person has been informed
that he or she may communicate the disease to another person through
sexual intercourse, to have sexual intercourse with any other person,
unless such other person has been informed of the presence of the
sexually transmitted disease.

--- END ---