BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes there is a
severe shortage of family medicine physicians that persists in rural
and underserved areas of the state, and that there are challenges in
recruiting and retaining family practice physicians, in addition to
other health care providers in these areas.
(2) The legislature acknowledges that one factor limiting the
ability to recruit physicians is the lack of residencies available in
the state and in certain rural and underserved areas.
(3) The legislature recognizes that partnerships between the
University of Washington school of medicine and licensed hospitals or
medical clinics willing to sponsor residencies will support the
development and expansion of and expanding access to family medicine
residencies in rural and underserved areas such as southeastern
Washington, and throughout the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.112.020 and 2012 c 117 s 426 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is established a statewide medical education system for
the purpose of training resident physicians in family practice. The
((dean of the)) school of medicine shall be responsible for
implementing the development and expansion of residency programs in
cooperation with the medical profession, hospitals, and clinics located
throughout the state. The ((chair of the department of family medicine
in the)) school of medicine shall ((determine where affiliated
residency programs shall exist)) support development of high quality
accredited affiliated residency programs; giving consideration to
communities in the state where the population, hospital facilities,
number of physicians, and interest in medical education indicate the
potential success of the residency program. The medical education
system shall provide financial support for residents in training for
those programs which are affiliated with the school of medicine and
shall establish positions for appropriate faculty to staff these
programs. The number of programs shall be determined by the board and
be in keeping with the needs of the state.
(2) For the purpose of recruiting and retaining primary care
physicians in rural communities in southeastern Washington and in other
rural and underserved areas of the state, and aligned with subsection
(1) of this section, the school of medicine shall support the
development of residency training programs in southeastern Washington
in partnership with a qualified hospital licensed in the state that is
willing to sponsor primary care training.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.112.010 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 41 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) "Affiliated" means established or developed in cooperation with
the school of medicine.
(2) "Family practice unit" means the community facility or
classroom used for training of ambulatory health skills within a
residency training program.
(3) "Residency programs" ((mean[s])) means community-based family
practice residency educational programs either in existence or
established under this chapter.
(4) "School of medicine" means the University of Washington school
of medicine located in Seattle, Washington or the Pacific Northwest
University of Health Sciences located in Yakima, Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of six million six hundred thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2015, from the general fund to the
University of Washington school of medicine. Of the amount
appropriated in this section, four million dollars is for the purpose
of expanding family medicine residencies in southeastern Washington and
two million six hundred thousand dollars is for the purpose of
expanding family medicine residencies throughout the state.

--- END ---