BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.260 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 202 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of
the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of ((0.138)) 0.2904 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied
by the rate of ((0.138)) 0.2904 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(c)(i) Beginning July 1, 2015, dairy products; or selling dairy
products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or
purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in
the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax
imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross
proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))
0.2904 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state
or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the
manufacturing of a dairy product.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products"
means:
(A) Products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21
C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from
the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and
(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy
products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by
weight or volume.
(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this
subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after
July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an
ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy
product;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2015, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the
gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of
((0.138)) 0.2904 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for
the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were
transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of
this state;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of
((0.138)) 0.2904 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas
split or processed, multiplied by the rate of ((0.138)) 0.2904 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from
such sales multiplied by the rate of ((0.138)) 0.2904 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross
income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))
0.2904 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of ((0.275)) 0.2904 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of ((0.275)) 0.2904 percent. Persons subject to taxation
under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by
chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to
taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities
pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne
interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a
labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or
unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a
wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or
similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in
import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be
stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to
such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed
under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of ((3.3)) 0.2904
percent.
(b) If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to
activities both within and without this state, the gross income
attributable to this state must be determined in accordance with the
methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or
a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such
persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities
is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of
((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied
by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and ((1.5)) 0.2904
percent thereafter.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the
value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of
the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal
to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale,
of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the
gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of
processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane"
and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11)
must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534.
(e) This subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2024.
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products,
including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for
hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate
of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904
percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from
July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products
multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber"
means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is
required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the
original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber
and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer
waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as
solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12)
must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW
82.32.585.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.
(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the
amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.365 percent through June 30, 2013,
and beginning July 1, 2013, multiplied by the rate of ((0.35)) 0.2904
percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (14) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.260 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 203 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of
the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of ((0.138)) 0.2904 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied
by the rate of ((0.138)) 0.2904 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(c)(i) Beginning July 1, 2015, dairy products; or selling dairy
products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or
purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in
the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax
imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross
proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))
0.2904 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state
or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the
manufacturing of a dairy product.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products"
means:
(A) Products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21
C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from
the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and
(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy
products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by
weight or volume.
(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this
subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after
July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an
ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy
product;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2015, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the
gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of
((0.138)) 0.2904 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for
the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were
transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of
this state;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of
((0.138)) 0.2904 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas
split or processed, multiplied by the rate of ((0.138)) 0.2904 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from
such sales multiplied by the rate of ((0.138)) 0.2904 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross
income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))
0.2904 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of ((0.275)) 0.2904 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of ((0.275)) 0.2904 percent. Persons subject to taxation
under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by
chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to
taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities
pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne
interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a
labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or
unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a
wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or
similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in
import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be
stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to
such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed
under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of ((3.3)) 0.2904
percent.
(b) If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to
activities both within and without this state, the gross income
attributable to this state must be determined in accordance with the
methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or
a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such
persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities
is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of
((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied
by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and ((1.5)) 0.2904
percent thereafter.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the
value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of
the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal
to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale,
of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the
gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of
processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane"
and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11)
must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534.
(e) This subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2024.
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products,
including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for
hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate
of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904
percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from
July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products
multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber"
means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is
required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the
original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber
and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer
waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as
solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12)
must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW
82.32.585.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.
(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the
amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (14) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.260 and 2013 3rd sp.s. c ... (ESSB 5952) s 5 are
each amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of
the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of ((0.138)) 0.2904 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied
by the rate of ((0.138)) 0.2904 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(c)(i) Beginning July 1, 2015, dairy products; or selling dairy
products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or
purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in
the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax
imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross
proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))
0.2904 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state
or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the
manufacturing of a dairy product.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products"
means:
(A) Products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21
C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from
the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and
(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy
products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by
weight or volume.
(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this
subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after
July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an
ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy
product;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2015, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the
gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of
((0.138)) 0.2904 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for
the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were
transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of
this state;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of
((0.138)) 0.2904 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas
split or processed, multiplied by the rate of ((0.138)) 0.2904 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from
such sales multiplied by the rate of ((0.138)) 0.2904 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross
income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))
0.2904 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of ((0.275)) 0.2904 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of ((0.275)) 0.2904 percent. Persons subject to taxation
under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by
chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to
taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities
pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne
interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a
labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or
unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a
wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or
similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in
import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be
stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to
such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed
under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of ((3.3)) 0.2904
percent.
(b) If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to
activities both within and without this state, the gross income
attributable to this state must be determined in accordance with the
methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or
a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such
persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities
is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of
((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied
by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and ((1.5)) 0.2904
percent thereafter.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the
value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of
the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal
to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale,
of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the
gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of
processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane"
and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11)
must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534.
(e)(i) Except as provided in (e)(ii) of this subsection (11), this
subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.
(ii) With respect to the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or
making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes, this
subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in
which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or
wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that
is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane
manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.--- (section 2,
chapter ... (ESSB 5952), Laws of 2013 3rd sp. sess.) has been sited
outside the state of Washington. This subsection (11)(e)(ii) only
applies to the manufacturing or sale of commercial airplanes that are
the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane
manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.--- (section 2,
chapter ... (ESSB 5952), Laws of 2013 3rd sp. sess.).
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products,
including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for
hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate
of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904
percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from
July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products
multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber"
means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is
required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the
original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber
and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer
waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as
solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12)
must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW
82.32.585.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.
(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the
amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.365 percent through June 30, 2013,
and beginning July 1, 2013, multiplied by the rate of ((0.35)) 0.2904
percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (14) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.260 and 2013 3rd sp.s. c ... (ESSB 5952) s 6 are
each amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of
the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of ((0.138)) 0.2904 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied
by the rate of ((0.138)) 0.2904 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(c)(i) Beginning July 1, 2015, dairy products; or selling dairy
products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or
purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in
the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax
imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross
proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of ((0.138))
0.2904 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state
or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the
manufacturing of a dairy product.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products"
means:
(A) Products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21
C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from
the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and
(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy
products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by
weight or volume.
(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this
subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after
July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an
ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy
product;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2015, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the
gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of
((0.138)) 0.2904 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for
the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were
transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of
this state;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of
((0.138)) 0.2904 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas
split or processed, multiplied by the rate of ((0.138)) 0.2904 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from
such sales multiplied by the rate of ((0.138)) 0.2904 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross
income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))
0.2904 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of ((0.275)) 0.2904 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of ((0.275)) 0.2904 percent. Persons subject to taxation
under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by
chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to
taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities
pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne
interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a
labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or
unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a
wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or
similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in
import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be
stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to
such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed
under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of ((3.3)) 0.2904
percent.
(b) If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to
activities both within and without this state, the gross income
attributable to this state must be determined in accordance with the
methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or
a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such
persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities
is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of
((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied
by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and ((1.5)) 0.2904
percent thereafter.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the
value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of
the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal
to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale,
of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the
gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of
processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane"
and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11)
must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534.
(e)(i) Except as provided in (e)(ii) of this subsection (11), this
subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.
(ii) With respect to the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or
making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes, this
subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in
which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or
wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that
is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane
manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.--- (section 2,
chapter ... (ESSB 5952), Laws of 2013 3rd sp. sess.) has been sited
outside the state of Washington. This subsection (11)(e)(ii) only
applies to the manufacturing or sale of commercial airplanes that are
the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane
manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.--- (section 2,
chapter ... (ESSB 5952), Laws of 2013 3rd sp. sess.).
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products,
including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for
hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate
of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904
percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from
July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products
multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber"
means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is
required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the
original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber
and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer
waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as
solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12)
must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW
82.32.585.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.
(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the
amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (14) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.04.290 and 2013 c 23 s 314 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall be))
is equal to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business
multiplied by a rate of ((0.275)) 0.2904 percent.
(2)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business
activity other than or in addition to an activity taxed explicitly
under another section in this chapter or subsection (1) or (3) of this
section; as to such persons the amount of tax on account of such
activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of ((1.5)) 0.2904 percent.
(b) This subsection (2) includes, among others, and without
limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to materials used in
the performance of such business passes to another by accession,
confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged in the
business of rendering any type of service which does not constitute a
"sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of advertising,
demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials furnished to an
agent by his or her principal or supplier to be used for informational,
educational, and promotional purposes ((shall)) is not ((be))
considered a part of the agent's remuneration or commission and
((shall)) is not ((be)) subject to taxation under this section.
(3)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of performing aerospace product development for
others, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by a rate of 0.9 percent.
(b) "Aerospace product development" has the meaning as provided in
RCW 82.04.4461.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.04.290 and 2013 3rd sp.s. c . . . (ESSB 5952) s 8
are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to
the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business multiplied
by a rate of ((0.275)) 0.2904 percent.
(2)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business
activity other than or in addition to an activity taxed explicitly
under another section in this chapter or subsection (1) or (3) of this
section; as to such persons the amount of tax on account of such
activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by
the rate of ((1.5)) 0.2904 percent.
(b) This subsection (2) includes, among others, and without
limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to materials used in
the performance of such business passes to another by accession,
confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged in the
business of rendering any type of service which does not constitute a
"sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of advertising,
demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials furnished to an
agent by his or her principal or supplier to be used for informational,
educational, and promotional purposes is not considered a part of the
agent's remuneration or commission and is not subject to taxation under
this section.
(3)(a) Until July 1, 2040, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of performing aerospace product development for
others, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by a
rate of 0.9 percent.
(b) "Aerospace product development" has the meaning as provided in
RCW 82.04.4461.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.04.230 and 2006 c 300 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
extractor, except persons taxable as an extractor under any other
provision in this chapter; as to such persons the amount of the tax
with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of the
products, including by-products, extracted for sale or for commercial
or industrial use, multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.
(2) The measure of the tax is the value of the products, including
by-products, so extracted, regardless of the place of sale or the fact
that deliveries may be made to points outside the state.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.04.240 and 2004 c 24 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
manufacturer, except persons taxable as manufacturers under other
provisions of this chapter; as to such persons the amount of the tax
with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of the
products, including byproducts, manufactured, multiplied by the rate of
((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.
(2) The measure of the tax is the value of the products, including
byproducts, so manufactured regardless of the place of sale or the fact
that deliveries may be made to points outside the state.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.04.240 and 2010 c 114 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
manufacturer, except persons taxable as manufacturers under other
provisions of this chapter; as to such persons the amount of the tax
with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products,
including byproducts, manufactured, multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))
0.2904 percent.
(2)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of manufacturing semiconductor materials, as to such persons the amount
of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers,
equal to the value of the product manufactured, or, in the case of
processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of ((0.275)) 0.2904 percent. For the purposes
of this subsection "semiconductor materials" means silicon crystals,
silicon ingots, raw polished semiconductor wafers, compound
semiconductors, integrated circuits, and microchips.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (2) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.534.
(c) This subsection (2) expires twelve years after the effective
date of this act.
(3) The measure of the tax is the value of the products, including
byproducts, so manufactured regardless of the place of sale or the fact
that deliveries may be made to points outside the state.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.04.2404 and 2010 c 114 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing or processing for hire semiconductor materials, as to
such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the
case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured,
or, in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of
the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.275)) 0.2904 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section "semiconductor materials"
means silicon crystals, silicon ingots, raw polished semiconductor
wafers, and compound semiconductor wafers.
(3) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534.
(4) This section expires December 1, 2018.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.04.255 and 2011 c 322 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within the state in the business of
providing real estate brokerage services; as to such persons, the
amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((1.5)) 0.2904
percent.
(2) The measure of the tax on real estate commissions earned by the
real estate firm is the gross commission earned by the particular real
estate firm including that portion of the commission paid to brokers,
including designated and managing brokers, in the same firm on a
particular transaction. However, when a real estate commission on a
particular transaction is divided among real estate firms at the
closing of the transaction, including a firm located out of state, each
firm must pay the tax only upon its respective shares of said
commission. Moreover, when the real estate firm has paid the tax as
provided herein, brokers, including designated and managing brokers,
within the same real estate firm may not be required to pay a similar
tax upon the same transaction. If any firm located out of state
receives a share of commission on a particular transaction, that
company or broker must pay the tax based on the requirements of this
section and RCW 82.04.067.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "broker," "designated
broker," "managing broker," and "real estate firm" have the same
meaning as provided in RCW 18.85.011.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.04.257 and 2010 c 111 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, upon
every person engaging within this state in the business of making sales
at retail or wholesale of digital goods, digital codes, digital
automated services, or services described in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or
(6)(b), as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business,
multiplied by the rate of ((0.471)) 0.2904 percent ((in the case of))
for both retail sales and ((by the rate of 0.484 percent in the case
of)) wholesale sales.
(2) Persons providing subscription television services or
subscription radio services are subject to tax under RCW 82.04.290(2)
on the gross income of the business received from providing such
services.
(3) For purposes of this section, a person is considered to be
engaging within this state in the business of making sales of digital
goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services described
in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(b), if the person makes sales of digital
goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services described
in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(b) and the sales are sourced to this
state under RCW 82.32.730 for sales tax purposes or would have been
sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 if the sale had been taxable
under chapter 82.08 RCW.
(4) A person subject to tax under this section is subject to the
mandatory electronic filing and payment requirements in RCW 82.32.080.

Sec. 13 RCW 82.04.263 and 2009 c 469 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other by-products of weapons production and
nuclear research and development; as to such persons the amount of the
tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross
income of the business multiplied by the rate of ((0.471)) 0.2904
percent.
(2) For the purposes of this chapter, "cleaning up radioactive
waste and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research
and development" means:
(a) The activities of handling, storing, treating, immobilizing,
stabilizing, or disposing of radioactive waste, radioactive tank waste
and capsules, nonradioactive hazardous solid and liquid wastes, or
spent nuclear fuel;
(b) Spent nuclear fuel conditioning;
(c) Removal of contamination in soils and groundwater;
(d) Decontamination and decommissioning of facilities; and
(e) Services supporting the performance of cleanup. For the
purposes of this subsection (2)(e), a service supports the performance
of cleanup if it:
(i) Is within the scope of work under a clean-up contract with the
United States department of energy; or
(ii) Assists in the accomplishment of a requirement of a clean-up
project undertaken by the United States department of energy under a
subcontract entered into with the prime contractor or another
subcontractor in furtherance of a clean-up contract between the United
States department of energy and a prime contractor.
(3) A service does not assist in the accomplishment of a
requirement of a clean-up project undertaken by the United States
department of energy if the same services are routinely provided to
businesses not engaged in clean-up activities, except that the
following services are always deemed to contribute to the
accomplishment of a requirement of a clean-up project undertaken by the
United States department of energy:
(a) Information technology and computer support services;
(b) Services rendered in respect to infrastructure; and
(c) Security, safety, and health services.
(4) The legislature intends that the examples provided in this
subsection be used as a guideline when determining whether a service is
"routinely provided to businesses not engaged in clean-up activities"
as that phrase is used in subsection (3) of this section.
(a) The radioactive waste clean-up classification does not apply to
general accounting services but does apply to performance audits
performed for persons cleaning up radioactive waste.
(b) The radioactive waste clean-up classification does not apply to
general legal services but does apply to those legal services that
assist in the accomplishment of a requirement of a clean-up project
undertaken by the United States department of energy. Thus, legal
services provided to contest any local, state, or federal tax liability
or to defend a company against a workers' compensation claim arising
from a worksite injury do not qualify for the radioactive waste clean-up classification. But, legal services related to the resolution of a
contractual dispute between the parties to a clean-up contract between
the United States department of energy and a prime contractor do
qualify.
(c) General office janitorial services do not qualify for the
radioactive waste clean-up classification, but the specialized cleaning
of equipment exposed to radioactive waste does qualify.

Sec. 14 RCW 82.04.270 and 2004 c 24 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at wholesale, except persons taxable as wholesalers under
other provisions of this chapter; as to such persons the amount of tax
with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of such business multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))
0.2904 percent.

Sec. 15 RCW 82.04.272 and 2013 c 19 s 127 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
warehousing and reselling drugs for human use pursuant to a
prescription; as to such persons, the amount of the tax ((shall be)) is
equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of
((0.138)) 0.2904 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Prescription" and "drug" have the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.0281; and
(b) "Warehousing and reselling drugs for human use pursuant to a
prescription" means the buying of drugs for human use pursuant to a
prescription from a manufacturer or another wholesaler, and reselling
of the drugs to persons selling at retail or to hospitals, clinics,
health care providers, or other providers of health care services, by
a wholesaler or retailer who is registered with the federal drug
enforcement administration and licensed by the pharmacy quality
assurance commission.

Sec. 16 RCW 82.04.280 and 2010 c 106 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of: (a) Printing materials other than newspapers, and of publishing
periodicals or magazines; (b) building, repairing or improving any
street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of
the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used,
primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation
vehicles of any kind and including any readjustment, reconstruction or
relocation of the facilities of any public, private or cooperatively
owned utility or railroad in the course of such building, repairing or
improving, the cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or
relocation, is the responsibility of the public authority whose street,
place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
is being built, repaired or improved; (c) extracting for hire or
processing for hire, except persons taxable as extractors for hire or
processors for hire under another section of this chapter; (d)
operating a cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse, but not
including the rental of cold storage lockers; (e) representing and
performing services for fire or casualty insurance companies as an
independent resident managing general agent licensed under the
provisions of chapter 48.17 RCW; (f) radio and television broadcasting,
excluding network, national and regional advertising computed as a
standard deduction based on the national average thereof as annually
reported by the federal communications commission, or in lieu thereof
by itemization by the individual broadcasting station, and excluding
that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state audience
computed as a ratio to the station's total audience as measured by the
100 micro-volt signal strength and delivery by wire, if any; (g)
engaging in activities which bring a person within the definition of
consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount
of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse used to
store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables, meat,
seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination thereof, at a
desired temperature to maintain the quality of the product for orderly
marketing.
(b) "Storage warehouse" means a building or structure, or any part
thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are received for storage
for compensation, except field warehouses, fruit warehouses, fruit
packing plants, warehouses licensed under chapter 22.09 RCW, public
garages storing automobiles, railroad freight sheds, docks and wharves,
and "self-storage" or "mini storage" facilities whereby customers have
direct access to individual storage areas by separate entrance.
"Storage warehouse" does not include a building or structure, or that
part of such building or structure, in which an activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
(c) "Periodical or magazine" means a printed publication, other
than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated intervals at least once
every three months, including any supplement or special edition of the
publication.

Sec. 17 RCW 82.04.280 and 2010 c 106 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of: (a) Printing materials other than newspapers, and of publishing
periodicals or magazines; (b) building, repairing or improving any
street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of
the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used,
primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation
vehicles of any kind and including any readjustment, reconstruction or
relocation of the facilities of any public, private or cooperatively
owned utility or railroad in the course of such building, repairing or
improving, the cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or
relocation, is the responsibility of the public authority whose street,
place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
is being built, repaired or improved; (c) extracting for hire or
processing for hire, except persons taxable as extractors for hire or
processors for hire under another section of this chapter; (d)
operating a cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse, but not
including the rental of cold storage lockers; (e) representing and
performing services for fire or casualty insurance companies as an
independent resident managing general agent licensed under the
provisions of chapter 48.17 RCW; (f) radio and television broadcasting,
excluding network, national and regional advertising computed as a
standard deduction based on the national average thereof as annually
reported by the federal communications commission, or in lieu thereof
by itemization by the individual broadcasting station, and excluding
that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state audience
computed as a ratio to the station's total audience as measured by the
100 micro-volt signal strength and delivery by wire, if any; (g)
engaging in activities which bring a person within the definition of
consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount
of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse used to
store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables, meat,
seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination thereof, at a
desired temperature to maintain the quality of the product for orderly
marketing.
(b) "Storage warehouse" means a building or structure, or any part
thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are received for storage
for compensation, except field warehouses, fruit warehouses, fruit
packing plants, warehouses licensed under chapter 22.09 RCW, public
garages storing automobiles, railroad freight sheds, docks and wharves,
and "self-storage" or "mini storage" facilities whereby customers have
direct access to individual storage areas by separate entrance.
"Storage warehouse" does not include a building or structure, or that
part of such building or structure, in which an activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
(c) "Periodical or magazine" means a printed publication, other
than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated intervals at least once
every three months, including any supplement or special edition of the
publication.

Sec. 18 RCW 82.04.285 and 2005 c 369 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
operating contests of chance; as to such persons, the amount of tax
with respect to the business of operating contests of chance is equal
to the gross income of the business derived from contests of chance
multiplied by the rate of ((1.5)) 0.2904 percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed on those persons subject to tax in
subsection (1) of this section. The amount of the additional tax with
respect to the business of operating contests of chance is equal to the
gross income of the business derived from contests of chance multiplied
by the rate of 0.1 percent through June 30, 2006, and 0.13 percent
thereafter. The money collected under this subsection (2) shall be
deposited in the problem gambling account created in RCW 43.20A.892.
This subsection does not apply to businesses operating contests of
chance when the gross income from the operation of contests of chance
is less than fifty thousand dollars per year.
(3) For the purpose of this section, "contests of chance" means any
contests, games, gaming schemes, or gaming devices, other than the
state lottery as defined in RCW 67.70.010, in which the outcome depends
in a material degree upon an element of chance, notwithstanding that
skill of the contestants may also be a factor in the outcome. The term
includes social card games, bingo, raffle, and punchboard games, and
pull-tabs as defined in chapter 9.46 RCW. The term does not include
race meets for the conduct of which a license must be secured from the
Washington horse racing commission, or "amusement game" as defined in
RCW 9.46.0201.
(4) "Gross income of the business" does not include the monetary
value or actual cost of any prizes that are awarded, amounts paid to
players for winning wagers, accrual of prizes for progressive jackpot
contests, or repayment of amounts used to seed guaranteed progressive
jackpot prizes.

Sec. 19 RCW 82.04.286 and 2005 c 369 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
conducting race meets for the conduct of which a license must be
secured from the Washington horse racing commission; as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to the business of parimutuel
wagering is equal to the gross income of the business derived from
parimutuel wagering multiplied by the rate of 0.1 percent through June
30, 2006, and ((0.13)) 0.2904 percent thereafter. The money collected
under this section ((shall)) must be deposited in the problem gambling
account created in RCW 43.20A.892.
(2) For purposes of this section, "gross income of the business"
does not include amounts paid to players for winning wagers, or taxes
imposed or other distributions required under chapter 67.16 RCW.
(3) The tax imposed under this section is in addition to any tax
imposed under chapter 67.16 RCW.

Sec. 20 RCW 82.04.2905 and 1998 c 312 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing child care for periods of less than twenty-four hours; as to
such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall
be)) is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied
by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.

Sec. 21 RCW 82.04.2906 and 2003 c 343 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing intensive inpatient or recovery house residential treatment
services for chemical dependency, certified by the department of social
and health services, for which payment from the United States or any
instrumentality thereof or from the state of Washington or any
municipal corporation or political subdivision thereof is received as
compensation for or to support those services; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to
the gross income from such services multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))
0.2904 percent.
(2) If the persons described in subsection (1) of this section
receive income from sources other than those described in subsection
(1) of this section or provide services other than those named in
subsection (1) of this section, that income and those services are
subject to tax as otherwise provided in this chapter.

Sec. 22 RCW 82.04.2907 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 107 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
receiving income from royalties, the amount of tax with respect to the
business is equal to the gross income from royalties multiplied by the
rate of ((0.484)) 0.2904 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "gross income from royalties"
means compensation for the use of intangible property, including
charges in the nature of royalties, regardless of where the intangible
property will be used. For purposes of this subsection, "intangible
property" includes copyrights, patents, licenses, franchises,
trademarks, trade names, and similar items. "Gross income from
royalties" does not include compensation for any natural resource, the
licensing of prewritten computer software to the end user, or the
licensing of digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated
services to the end user as defined in RCW 82.04.190(11).

Sec. 23 RCW 82.04.2908 and 2012 c 10 s 70 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing room and domiciliary care to residents of an assisted living
facility licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, the amount of tax with
respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income of
the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.275)) 0.2904 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "domiciliary care" has the
meaning provided in RCW 18.20.020.

Sec. 24 RCW 82.04.294 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 902 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules or
stirling converters, or of manufacturing solar grade silicon, silicon
solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film solar devices, or compound
semiconductor solar wafers to be used exclusively in components of such
systems; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the
product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.275))
0.2904 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at wholesale of solar energy systems using photovoltaic
modules or stirling converters, or of solar grade silicon, silicon
solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film solar devices, or compound
semiconductor solar wafers to be used exclusively in components of such
systems, manufactured by that person; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules or
stirling converters, or of the solar grade silicon to be used
exclusively in components of such systems, multiplied by the rate of
((0.275)) 0.2904 percent.
(3) Silicon solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film solar
devices, solar grade silicon, or compound semiconductor solar wafers
are "semiconductor materials" for the purposes of RCW 82.08.9651 and
82.12.9651.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Compound semiconductor solar wafers" means a semiconductor
solar wafer composed of elements from two or more different groups of
the periodic table.
(b) "Module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained
physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and
providing a single direct current electrical output.
(c) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(d) "Silicon solar cells" means a photovoltaic cell manufactured
from a silicon solar wafer.
(e) "Silicon solar wafers" means a silicon wafer manufactured for
solar conversion purposes.
(f) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
for use in the generation of electricity.
(g) "Solar grade silicon" means high-purity silicon used
exclusively in components of solar energy systems using photovoltaic
modules to capture direct sunlight. "Solar grade silicon" does not
include silicon used in semiconductors.
(h) "Stirling converter" means a device that produces electricity
by converting heat from a solar source utilizing a stirling engine.
(i) "Thin film solar devices" means a nonparticipating substrate on
which various semiconducting materials are deposited to produce a
photovoltaic cell that is used to generate electricity.
(5) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section
must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW
82.32.585.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2017.

Sec. 25 RCW 82.04.298 and 2011 c 2 s 204 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The amount of tax with respect to a qualified grocery
distribution cooperative's sales of groceries or related goods for
resale, excluding items subject to tax under RCW 82.04.260(4), to
customer-owners of the grocery distribution cooperative is equal to the
gross proceeds of sales of the grocery distribution cooperative
multiplied by the rate of ((one and one-half)) 0.2904 percent.
(2) A qualified grocery distribution cooperative is allowed a
deduction from the gross proceeds of sales of groceries or related
goods for resale, excluding items subject to tax under RCW
82.04.260(4), to customer-owners of the grocery distribution
cooperative that is equal to the portion of the gross proceeds of sales
for resale that represents the actual cost of the merchandise sold by
the grocery distribution cooperative to customer-owners.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Grocery distribution cooperative" means an entity that sells
groceries and related items to customer-owners of the grocery
distribution cooperative and has customer-owners, in the aggregate, who
own a majority of the outstanding ownership interests of the grocery
distribution cooperative or of the entity controlling the grocery
distribution cooperative. "Grocery distribution cooperative" includes
an entity that controls a grocery distribution cooperative.
(b) "Qualified grocery distribution cooperative" means:
(i) A grocery distribution cooperative that has been determined by
a court of record of the state of Washington to be not engaged in
wholesaling or making sales at wholesale, within the meaning of RCW
82.04.270 or any similar provision of a municipal ordinance that
imposes a tax on gross receipts, gross proceeds of sales, or gross
income, with respect to purchases made by customer-owners, and
subsequently changes its form of doing business to make sales at
wholesale of groceries or related items to its customer-owners; or
(ii) A grocery distribution cooperative that has acquired
substantially all of the assets of a grocery distribution cooperative
described in (b)(i) of this subsection.
(c) "Customer-owner" means a person who has an ownership interest
in a grocery distribution cooperative and purchases groceries and
related items at wholesale from that grocery distribution cooperative.
(d) "Controlling" means holding fifty percent or more of the voting
interests of an entity and having at least equal power to direct or
cause the direction of the management and policies of the entity,
whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, or
otherwise.

Sec. 26 RCW 82.32.790 and 2010 c 114 s 201 and 2010 c 106 s 401
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Sections 9 and 17, chapter . . ., Laws of 2013 4th sp. sess.
(sections 9 and 17 of this act), section 206, chapter 106, Laws of
2010, sections 104, 110, 117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114,
Laws of 2010, section 3, chapter 461, Laws of 2009, section 7, chapter
300, Laws of 2006, and section 4, chapter 149, Laws of 2003 are
contingent upon the siting and commercial operation of a significant
semiconductor microchip fabrication facility in the state of
Washington.
(b) For the purposes of this section:
(i) "Commercial operation" means the same as "commencement of
commercial production" as used in RCW 82.08.965.
(ii) "Semiconductor microchip fabrication" means "manufacturing
semiconductor microchips" as defined in RCW 82.04.426.
(iii) "Significant" means the combined investment of new buildings
and new machinery and equipment in the buildings, at the commencement
of commercial production, will be at least one billion dollars.
(2) Chapter 149, Laws of 2003 takes effect the first day of the
month in which a contract for the construction of a significant
semiconductor fabrication facility is signed, as determined by the
director of the department of revenue.
(3)(a) The department of revenue must provide notice of the
effective date of sections 9 and 17, chapter . . ., Laws of 2013 4th
sp. sess. (sections 9 and 17 of this act), sections 104, 110, 117, 123,
125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws of 2010(([,])), section 3,
chapter 461, Laws of 2009, section 7, chapter 300, Laws of 2006, and
section 4, chapter 149, Laws of 2003 to affected taxpayers, the
legislature, and others as deemed appropriate by the department.
(b) If, after making a determination that a contract has been
signed and chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is effective, the department
discovers that commencement of commercial production did not take place
within three years of the date the contract was signed, the department
must make a determination that chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is no longer
effective, and all taxes that would have been otherwise due are deemed
deferred taxes and are immediately assessed and payable from any person
reporting tax under RCW 82.04.240(2) or claiming an exemption or credit
under section 2 or 5 through 10, chapter 149, Laws of 2003. The
department is not authorized to make a second determination regarding
the effective date of chapter 149, Laws of 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2015,
subject to the contingency stated in section 2, chapter . . . (ESSB
5952), Laws of 2013 3rd sp. sess.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1,
2015, subject to the contingency stated in section 2, chapter . . .
(ESSB 5952), Laws of 2013 3rd sp. sess.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 Section 6 of this act takes effect subject
to the contingency stated in section 2, chapter . . . (ESSB 5952), Laws
of 2013 3rd sp. sess.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 Section 5 of this act expires on the date
that section 6 of this act takes effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 Section 8 of this act expires on the date
that section 9 of this act takes effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 Section 16 of this act expires on the date
that section 17 of this act takes effect.

--- END ---