BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.27.090 and 2013 c 23 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The registration provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(1) An authorized representative of the United States government,
the state of Washington, or any incorporated city, town, county,
township, irrigation district, reclamation district, or other municipal
or political corporation or subdivision of this state;
(2) Officers of a court when they are acting within the scope of
their office;
(3) Public utilities operating under the regulations of the
utilities and transportation commission in construction, maintenance,
or development work incidental to their own business;
(4) Any construction, repair, or operation incidental to the
discovering or producing of petroleum or gas, or the drilling, testing,
abandoning, or other operation of any petroleum or gas well or any
surface or underground mine or mineral deposit when performed by an
owner or lessee;
(5) The sale of any finished products, materials, or articles of
merchandise that are not fabricated into and do not become a part of a
structure under the common law of fixtures;
(6) Any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair of
personal property performed by the registered or legal owner, or by a
mobile/manufactured home retail dealer or manufacturer licensed under
chapter 46.70 RCW who shall warranty service and repairs under chapter
46.70 RCW;
(7) Any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair carried on
within the limits and boundaries of any site or reservation under the
legal jurisdiction of the federal government;
(8) Any person who only furnished materials, supplies, or equipment
without fabricating them into, or consuming them in the performance of,
the work of the contractor;
(9) Any work or operation on one undertaking or project by one or
more contracts, the aggregate contract price of which for labor and
materials and all other items is less than ((five)) one thousand two
hundred dollars, such work or operations being considered as of a
casual, minor, or inconsequential nature. The exemption prescribed in
this subsection does not apply in any instance wherein the work or
construction is only a part of a larger or major operation, whether
undertaken by the same or a different contractor, or in which a
division of the operation is made into contracts of amounts less than
((five)) one thousand two hundred dollars for the purpose of evasion of
this chapter or otherwise. The exemption prescribed in this subsection
does not apply to a person who advertises or puts out any sign or card
or other device which ((might indicate to the public)) states that he
or she is a contractor((, or that he or she is qualified to engage in
the business of contractor));
(10) Any construction or operation incidental to the construction
and repair of irrigation and drainage ditches of regularly constituted
irrigation districts or reclamation districts; or to farming, dairying,
agriculture, viticulture, horticulture, or stock or poultry raising; or
to clearing or other work upon land in rural districts for fire
prevention purposes; except when any of the above work is performed by
a registered contractor;
(11) An owner who contracts for a project with a registered
contractor, except that this exemption shall not deprive the owner of
the protections of this chapter against registered and unregistered
contractors. The exemption prescribed in this subsection does not
apply to a person who performs the activities of a contractor for the
purpose of leasing or selling improved property he or she has owned for
less than twelve months;
(12) Any person working on his or her own property, whether
occupied by him or her or not, and any person working on his or her
personal residence, whether owned by him or her or not but this
exemption shall not apply to any person who performs the activities of
a contractor on his or her own property for the purpose of selling,
demolishing, or leasing the property;
(13) An owner who performs maintenance, repair, and alteration work
in or upon his or her own properties, or who uses his or her own
employees to do such work;
(14) A licensed architect or civil or professional engineer acting
solely in his or her professional capacity, an electrician certified
under the laws of the state of Washington, or a plumber certified under
the laws of the state of Washington or licensed by a political
subdivision of the state of Washington while operating within the
boundaries of such political subdivision. The exemption provided in
this subsection is applicable only when the person certified is
operating within the scope of his or her certification;
(15) Any person who engages in the activities herein regulated as
an employee of a registered contractor with wages as his or her sole
compensation or as an employee with wages as his or her sole
compensation;
(16) Contractors on highway projects who have been prequalified as
required by RCW 47.28.070, with the department of transportation to
perform highway construction, reconstruction, or maintenance work;
(17) A mobile/manufactured home dealer or manufacturer who
subcontracts the installation, set-up, or repair work to actively
registered contractors. This exemption only applies to the
installation, set-up, or repair of the mobile/manufactured homes that
were manufactured or sold by the mobile/manufactured home dealer or
manufacturer;
(18) An entity who holds a valid electrical contractor's license
under chapter 19.28 RCW that employs a certified journey level
electrician, a certified residential specialty electrician, or an
electrical trainee meeting the requirements of chapter 19.28 RCW to
perform plumbing work that is incidentally, directly, and immediately
appropriate to the like-in-kind replacement of a household appliance or
other small household utilization equipment that requires limited
electric power and limited waste and/or water connections. An
electrical trainee must be supervised by a certified electrician while
performing plumbing work.

--- END ---