BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.330 and 2012 c 68 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to public utilities and
transportation is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission
or attorney general under RCW 80.04.095 that a court has determined are
confidential under RCW 80.04.095;
(2) The ((residential)) addresses ((and residential)), telephone
numbers, electronic contact information, and customer-specific utility
usage and billing information in increments less than a billing cycle
or monthly, whichever is greater, of the customers of a public utility
contained in the records or lists held by the public utility of which
they are customers, except that this information may be released to the
division of child support or the agency or firm providing child support
enforcement for another state under Title IV-D of the federal social
security act, for the establishment, enforcement, or modification of a
support order;
(3) The names, residential addresses, residential telephone
numbers, and other individually identifiable records held by an agency
in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or other ride-sharing program or
service; however, these records may be disclosed to other persons who
apply for ride-matching services and who need that information in order
to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share rides;
(4) The personally identifying information of current or former
participants or applicants in a paratransit or other transit service
operated for the benefit of persons with disabilities or elderly
persons;
(5) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transit passes or other fare payment media including, but not
limited to, stored value smart cards and magnetic strip cards, except
that an agency may disclose personally identifying information to a
person, employer, educational institution, or other entity that is
responsible, in whole or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring
or using a transit pass or other fare payment media for the purpose of
preventing fraud, or to the news media when reporting on public
transportation or public safety. As used in this subsection,
"personally identifying information" includes acquisition or use
information pertaining to a specific, individual transit pass or fare
payment media.
(a) Information regarding the acquisition or use of transit passes
or fare payment media may be disclosed in aggregate form if the data
does not contain any personally identifying information.
(b) Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies if the request is accompanied by a court order;
(6) Any information obtained by governmental agencies that is
collected by the use of a motor carrier intelligent transportation
system or any comparable information equipment attached to a truck,
tractor, or trailer; however, the information may be given to other
governmental agencies or the owners of the truck, tractor, or trailer
from which the information is obtained. As used in this subsection,
"motor carrier" has the same definition as provided in RCW 81.80.010;
(7) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transponders or other technology to facilitate payment of
tolls. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form as long as
the data does not contain any personally identifying information. For
these purposes aggregate data may include the census tract of the
account holder as long as any individual personally identifying
information is not released. Personally identifying information may be
released to law enforcement agencies only for toll enforcement
purposes. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies for other purposes only if the request is
accompanied by a court order; and
(8) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use a driver's license or identicard that includes a radio
frequency identification chip or similar technology to facilitate
border crossing. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form
as long as the data does not contain any personally identifying
information. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies only for United States customs and border
protection enforcement purposes. Personally identifying information
may be released to law enforcement agencies for other purposes only if
the request is accompanied by a court order.

--- END ---