BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The tourist industry is a vital part of
the state's economy. Palouse falls has visitors numbering averaging
over eighty thousand to one hundred thousand per year. The falls drop
one hundred ninety-eight feet identifying them as the last remaining
year-round waterfalls left by the ice age floods.
(2) Palouse falls was named sixth on the top ten best United States
waterfalls list, tenth on the list of the world's most amazing
waterfalls, and the site of the world record breaking kayak drop.
(3) Palouse falls surrounding area is the location for the oldest
documented remains found in the western hemisphere; home of the Palouse
Native American culture; birthplace of the Appaloosa horse; and
documented in Lewis and Clark's journals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Palouse falls is hereby designated as the official waterfall of the
state of Washington.

--- END ---