BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the rights of
citizens to observe the actions of their public officials and to have
timely access to public records are the underpinnings of democracy and
are essential for meaningful citizen participation in the democratic
process. All too often, however, violations of the requirements of the
public records act and the open public meetings act by public officials
and agencies result in citizens being denied this important information
and materials to which they are legally entitled. Such violations are
often the result of inadvertent error or a lack of knowledge on the
part of officials and agencies regarding their legal duties to the
public pursuant to these acts. Also, whether due to error or
ignorance, violations of the public records act and open public
meetings act are very costly for state and local governments, both in
terms of litigation expenses and administrative costs. The legislature
also finds that the implementation of simple, cost-effective training
programs will greatly increase the likelihood that public officials and
agencies will better serve the public by improving citizen access to
public records and encouraging public participation in governmental
deliberations. Such improvements in public service will, in turn,
enhance the public's trust in its government and result in significant
cost savings by reducing the number of violations of the public records
act and open public meetings act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every member of the governing body of a public agency must
complete training on the requirements of this chapter no later than
ninety days after the date the member either:
(a) Takes the oath of office, if the member is required to take an
oath of office to assume his or her duties as a public official; or
(b) Otherwise assumes his or her duties as a public official.
(2) In addition to the training required under subsection (1) of
this section, every member of the governing body of a public agency
must complete training at intervals of no more than four years as long
as the individual is a member of the governing body or public agency.
(3) Training may be completed remotely with technology including
but not limited to internet-based training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each elected state or local official, and each person appointed
to fill a vacancy in elective office, who is subject to the
requirements of this chapter must complete a training course regarding
the provisions of this chapter, and also chapter 40.14 RCW for records
retention.
(2) Elected officials may complete their training before assuming
office but must:
(a) Complete training no later than ninety days after the date the
official either:
(i) Takes the oath of office, if the official is required to take
an oath of office to assume his or her duties as a public official; or
(ii) Otherwise assumes his or her duties as a public official; and
(b) Complete refresher training at intervals of no more than four
years for as long as he or she holds the office.
(3) Training must be consistent with the attorney general's model
rules for compliance with the public records act.
(4) Training may be completed remotely with technology including
but not limited to internet-based training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Public records officers designated under RCW 42.56.580 and
records officers designated under RCW 40.14.040 must complete a
training course regarding the provisions of this chapter, and also
chapter 40.14 RCW for records retention.
(2) Public records officers must:
(a) Complete training no later than ninety days after assuming
responsibilities as a public records officer or records manager; and
(b) Complete refresher training at intervals of no more than four
years as long as they maintain the designation.
(3) Training must be consistent with the attorney general's model
rules for compliance with the public records act.
(4) Training may be completed remotely with technology including
but not limited to internet-based training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The attorney general's office may provide information, technical
assistance, and training on the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each elected state or local official, and each person appointed
to fill a vacancy in elective office, must complete a training course
regarding the records retention provisions of this chapter.
(2) Elected officials may complete their training before assuming
office but must:
(a) Complete training no later than ninety days after the date the
official either:
(i) Takes the oath of office, if the official is required to take
an oath of office to assume his or her duties as a public official; or
(ii) Otherwise assumes his or her duties as a public official; and
(b) Complete refresher training at intervals of no more than four
years for as long as he or she holds the office.
(3) Training must be provided by the secretary of state, or
consistent with the records retention training provided by the
secretary of state.
(4) Training may be completed remotely with technology including
but not limited to internet-based training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Public records officers designated under RCW 42.56.580 and
records officers designated under RCW 40.14.040 must complete a
training course regarding the records retention provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Public records officers must:
(a) Complete training no later than ninety days after assuming
responsibilities as a public records officer or records manager; and
(b) Complete refresher training at intervals of no more than four
years as long as they maintain the designation.
(3) Training must be provided by the secretary of state, or
consistent with the records retention training provided by the
secretary of state.
(4) Training may be completed remotely with technology including
but not limited to internet-based training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act may be known and cited as the open
government trainings act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---