BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.52.010 and 2007 c 292 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Emergency management" or "comprehensive emergency management"
means the preparation for and the carrying out of all emergency
functions, other than functions for which the military forces are
primarily responsible, to mitigate, prepare for, respond to, and
recover from emergencies and disasters, and to aid victims suffering
from injury or damage, resulting from disasters caused by all hazards,
whether natural, technological, or human caused, and to provide support
for search and rescue operations for persons and property in distress.
However, "emergency management" or "comprehensive emergency management"
does not mean preparation for emergency evacuation or relocation of
residents in anticipation of nuclear attack.
(2) "Local organization for emergency services or management" means
an organization created in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter by state or local authority to perform local emergency
management functions.
(3) "Political subdivision" means any county, city or town.
(4) "Emergency worker" means any person who is registered with a
local emergency management organization or the department and holds an
identification card issued by the local emergency management director
or the department for the purpose of engaging in authorized emergency
management activities or is an employee of the state of Washington or
any political subdivision thereof who is called upon to perform
emergency management activities.
(5) "Injury" as used in this chapter shall mean and include
accidental injuries and/or occupational diseases arising out of
emergency management activities.
(6)(a) "Emergency or disaster" as used in all sections of this
chapter except RCW 38.52.430 shall mean an event or set of
circumstances which: (i) Demands immediate action to preserve public
health, protect life, protect public property, or to provide relief to
any stricken community overtaken by such occurrences, or (ii) reaches
such a dimension or degree of destructiveness as to warrant the
governor declaring a state of emergency pursuant to RCW 43.06.010.
(b) "Emergency" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means an incident that
requires a normal police, coroner, fire, rescue, emergency medical
services, or utility response as a result of a violation of one of the
statutes enumerated in RCW 38.52.430.
(7) "Search and rescue" means the acts of searching for, rescuing,
or recovering by means of ground, marine, or air activity any person
who becomes lost, injured, or is killed while outdoors or as a result
of a natural, technological, or human caused disaster, including
instances involving searches for downed aircraft when ground personnel
are used. Nothing in this section shall affect appropriate activity by
the department of transportation under chapter 47.68 RCW.
(8) "Executive head" and "executive heads" means the county
executive in those charter counties with an elective office of county
executive, however designated, and, in the case of other counties, the
county legislative authority. In the case of cities and towns, it
means the mayor in those cities and towns with mayor-council or
commission forms of government, where the mayor is directly elected,
and it means the city manager in those cities and towns with council
manager forms of government. Cities and towns may also designate an
executive head for the purposes of this chapter by ordinance.
(9) "Director" means the adjutant general.
(10) "Local director" means the director of a local organization of
emergency management or emergency services.
(11) "Department" means the state military department.
(12) "Emergency response" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means a public
agency's use of emergency services during an emergency or disaster as
defined in subsection (6)(b) of this section.
(13) "Expense of an emergency response" as used in RCW 38.52.430
means reasonable costs incurred by a public agency in reasonably making
an appropriate emergency response to the incident, but shall only
include those costs directly arising from the response to the
particular incident. Reasonable costs shall include the costs of
providing police, coroner, firefighting, rescue, emergency medical
services, or utility response at the scene of the incident, as well as
the salaries of the personnel responding to the incident.
(14) "Public agency" means the state, and a city, county, municipal
corporation, district, town, or public authority located, in whole or
in part, within this state which provides or may provide firefighting,
police, ambulance, medical, or other emergency services.
(15) "Incident command system" means: (a) An all-hazards, on-scene
functional management system that establishes common standards in
organization, terminology, and procedures; provides a means (unified
command) for the establishment of a common set of incident objectives
and strategies during multiagency/multijurisdiction operations while
maintaining individual agency/jurisdiction authority, responsibility,
and accountability; and is a component of the national interagency
incident management system; or (b) an equivalent and compatible all-hazards, on-scene functional management system.
(16) "Radio communications service company" has the meaning
ascribed to it in RCW 82.14B.020.
(17) "Continuity of operations planning" means the internal effort
of an organization to assure that the capability exists to continue
essential functions and services in response to a comprehensive array
of potential emergencies or disasters.

Sec. 2 RCW 38.52.020 and 1986 c 266 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Because of the existing and increasing possibility of the
occurrence of disasters of unprecedented size and destructiveness as
defined in RCW 38.52.010(6), and in order to insure that preparations
of this state will be adequate to deal with such disasters, to insure
the administration of state and federal programs providing disaster
relief to individuals, and further to insure adequate support for
search and rescue operations, and generally to protect the public
peace, health, and safety, and to preserve the lives and property of
the people of the state, it is hereby found and declared to be
necessary:
(a) To provide for emergency management by the state, and to
authorize the creation of local organizations for emergency management
in the political subdivisions of the state;
(b) To confer upon the governor and upon the executive heads of the
political subdivisions of the state the emergency powers provided
herein;
(c) To provide for the rendering of mutual aid among the political
subdivisions of the state and with other states and to cooperate with
the federal government with respect to the carrying out of emergency
management functions;
(d) To provide a means of compensating emergency management workers
who may suffer any injury, as herein defined, or death; who suffer
economic harm including personal property damage or loss; or who incur
expenses for transportation, telephone or other methods of
communication, and the use of personal supplies as a result of
participation in emergency management activities; ((and))
(e) To provide programs, with intergovernmental cooperation, to
educate and train the public to be prepared for emergencies; and
(f) To provide for the development and exercise of continuity of
operations plans by the state.
(2) It is further declared to be the purpose of this chapter and
the policy of the state that all emergency management functions of this
state and its political subdivisions be coordinated to the maximum
extent with the comparable functions of the federal government
including its various departments and agencies of other states and
localities, and of private agencies of every type, to the end that the
most effective preparation and use may be made of the nation's
manpower, resources, and facilities for dealing with any disaster that
may occur.

Sec. 3 RCW 38.52.030 and 1997 c 49 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may employ such personnel and may make such
expenditures within the appropriation therefor, or from other funds
made available for purposes of emergency management, as may be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(2) The director, subject to the direction and control of the
governor, shall be responsible to the governor for carrying out the
program for emergency management of this state. The director shall
coordinate the activities of all organizations for emergency management
within the state, and shall maintain liaison with and cooperate with
emergency management agencies and organizations of other states and of
the federal government, and shall have such additional authority,
duties, and responsibilities authorized by this chapter, as may be
prescribed by the governor.
(3) The director shall develop and maintain a comprehensive, all-hazard emergency plan for the state which shall include an analysis of
the natural, technological, or human caused hazards which could affect
the state of Washington, and shall include the procedures to be used
during emergencies for coordinating local resources, as necessary, and
the resources of all state agencies, departments, commissions, and
boards. The comprehensive emergency management plan shall direct the
department in times of state emergency to administer and manage the
state's emergency operations center. This will include representation
from all appropriate state agencies and be available as a single point
of contact for the authorizing of state resources or actions, including
emergency permits. The comprehensive emergency management plan must
specify the use of the incident command system for
multiagency/multijurisdiction operations. The comprehensive, all-hazard emergency plan authorized under this subsection may not include
preparation for emergency evacuation or relocation of residents in
anticipation of nuclear attack. This plan shall be known as the
comprehensive emergency management plan.
(4) In accordance with the comprehensive emergency management plans
and the programs for the emergency management of this state, the
director shall procure supplies and equipment, institute training
programs and public information programs, and shall take all other
preparatory steps, including the partial or full mobilization of
emergency management organizations in advance of actual disaster, to
insure the furnishing of adequately trained and equipped forces of
emergency management personnel in time of need.
(5) The director shall make such studies and surveys of the
industries, resources, and facilities in this state as may be necessary
to ascertain the capabilities of the state for emergency management,
and shall plan for the most efficient emergency use thereof.
(6) The emergency management council shall advise the director on
all aspects of the communications and warning systems and facilities
operated or controlled under the provisions of this chapter.
(7) The director, through the state enhanced 911 coordinator, shall
coordinate and facilitate implementation and operation of a statewide
enhanced 911 emergency communications network.
(8) The director shall appoint a state coordinator of search and
rescue operations to coordinate those state resources, services and
facilities (other than those for which the state director of
aeronautics is directly responsible) requested by political
subdivisions in support of search and rescue operations, and on request
to maintain liaison with and coordinate the resources, services, and
facilities of political subdivisions when more than one political
subdivision is engaged in joint search and rescue operations.
(9) The director, subject to the direction and control of the
governor, shall prepare and administer a state program for emergency
assistance to individuals within the state who are victims of a
natural, technological, or human caused disaster, as defined by RCW
38.52.010(6). Such program may be integrated into and coordinated with
disaster assistance plans and programs of the federal government which
provide to the state, or through the state to any political subdivision
thereof, services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of
gift, grant, or loan for purposes of assistance to individuals affected
by a disaster. Further, such program may include, but shall not be
limited to, grants, loans, or gifts of services, equipment, supplies,
materials, or funds of the state, or any political subdivision thereof,
to individuals who, as a result of a disaster, are in need of
assistance and who meet standards of eligibility for disaster
assistance established by the department of social and health services:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing herein shall be construed in any manner
inconsistent with the provisions of Article VIII, section 5 or section
7 of the Washington state Constitution.
(10) The director shall appoint a state coordinator for radioactive
and hazardous waste emergency response programs. The coordinator shall
consult with the state radiation control officer in matters relating to
radioactive materials. The duties of the state coordinator for
radioactive and hazardous waste emergency response programs shall
include:
(a) Assessing the current needs and capabilities of state and local
radioactive and hazardous waste emergency response teams on an ongoing
basis;
(b) Coordinating training programs for state and local officials
for the purpose of updating skills relating to emergency mitigation,
preparedness, response, and recovery;
(c) Utilizing appropriate training programs such as those offered
by the federal emergency management agency, the department of
transportation and the environmental protection agency; and
(d) Undertaking other duties in this area that are deemed
appropriate by the director.
(11) The director is responsible to the governor for developing and
implementing a program for interagency coordination of continuity of
operations planning by state agencies, boards, and commissions. Each
state agency, board, and commission is responsible for developing an
organizational continuity of operations plan that is updated and
exercised annually in compliance with the program for interagency
coordination of continuity of operations planning.

--- END ---