BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.16.270 and 2004 c 246 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon making a determination that an individual or licensee has
violated a commission rule, the board of stewards may assess a fine,
suspend or revoke a person's license, or any combination of these
penalties. The commission must adopt by rule standard penalties for a
rules violation. All fines collected must be deposited in the
Washington horse racing commission ((class C purse fund account,
created in RCW 67.16.285, and used as authorized in RCW 67.16.105(3).))
operating account. The funds accrued by the assessed fines will be
used to support nonprofit race meets as authorized in RCW 67.16.280(2).
If no dates for nonprofit racing are requested or approved, the fines
will remain in the Washington horse racing commission operating
account.

--- END ---