BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79.155 RCW
to read as follows:
The community forest trust account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All moneys received for the acquisition, sale,
management, and administration of the department's duties under this
chapter for community forest trust lands including, but not limited to,
proceeds from the sale of valuable materials from community forest
trust lands, interest earned on investments in the account, and all
other revenue related to community forest trust lands created or
acquired pursuant to this chapter must be deposited into the account.
The account is authorized to receive fund transfers and appropriations
from the general fund, as well as gifts, grants, and endowments from
public or private sources as may be made from time to time.
Expenditures from the account may be used to reimburse management costs
incurred by the department on community forest trust lands, for the
acquisition of interests in land or other real property to be managed
as community forest trust lands, for technical assistance grants
pursuant to RCW 79.155.120, and for all other purposes consistent with
this chapter. Only the commissioner or the commissioner's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. However, the board must
authorize any expenditures made to: (1) Reimburse state and local
governmental entities' eligible financial contributions for the
acquisition of community forest trust lands under RCW 79.155.090; or
(2) acquire real property for the community forest trust under RCW
79.155.040(3). The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.30.385 and 2012 c 166 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The park land trust revolving fund is to be utilized by the
department for the purpose of acquiring real property, including all
reasonable costs associated with these acquisitions, as a replacement
for the property transferred to the state parks and recreation
commission, as directed by the legislature in order to maintain the
land base of the affected trusts or under RCW 79.22.060 and to receive
voluntary contributions for the purpose of operating and maintaining
public use and recreation facilities, including trails, managed by the
department.
(2) ((In addition to the other purposes identified in this section,
the park land trust revolving fund may be utilized by the department to
hold funding for future acquisition of lands for the community forest
trust program from willing sellers under RCW 79.155.040.
(3)))(a) Proceeds from transfers of real property to the state
parks and recreation commission or other proceeds identified from
transfers of real property as directed by the legislature shall be
deposited in the park land trust revolving fund.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the proceeds
from real property transferred or disposed under RCW 79.22.060 must be
used solely to purchase replacement forest land, that must be actively
managed as a working forest, within the same county as the property
transferred or disposed. If the real property was transferred under
RCW 79.22.060 (1)(c) and (2)(c) from within a county participating in
the state forest land pool created under RCW 79.22.140, replacement
forest land may be located within any county participating in the land
pool.
(c) Disbursement from the park land trust revolving fund to acquire
replacement property and for operating and maintaining public use and
recreation facilities shall be on the authorization of the department.
(d) The proceeds from the recreation access pass account created in
RCW 79A.80.090 must be solely used for the purpose of operating and
maintaining public use and recreation facilities, including trails,
managed by the department.
(((4))) (3) In order to maintain an effective expenditure and
revenue control, the park land trust revolving fund is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to
permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.
(((5))) (4) The department is authorized to solicit and receive
voluntary contributions for the purpose of operating and maintaining
public use and recreation facilities, including trails, managed by the
department. The department may seek voluntary contributions from
individuals and organizations for this purpose. Voluntary
contributions will be deposited into the park land trust revolving fund
and used solely for the purpose of public use and recreation facilities
operations and maintenance. Voluntary contributions are not considered
a fee for use of these facilities.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.64.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1000 are each
amended to read as follows:
A resource management cost account in the state treasury is created
to be used solely for the purpose of defraying the costs and expenses
necessarily incurred by the department in managing and administering
state lands, ((community forest trust lands, and)) aquatic lands, and
the making and administering of leases, sales, contracts, licenses,
permits, easements, and rights-of-way as authorized under the
provisions of this title. Appropriations from the resource management
cost account to the department shall be expended for no other purposes.
Funds in the resource management cost account may be appropriated or
transferred by the legislature for the benefit of all of the trusts
from which the funds were derived. During the 2013-2015 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the aquatics revenues in
the resources management cost account to the marine resources
stewardship trust account for the purposes of chapter 43.372 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.64.040 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1001 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall determine the amount deemed necessary in order
to achieve the purposes of this chapter and shall provide by rule for
the deduction of this amount from the moneys received from all leases,
sales, contracts, licenses, permits, easements, and rights-of-way
issued by the department and affecting state lands((, community forest
trust lands,)) and aquatic lands, provided that no deduction shall be
made from the proceeds from agricultural college lands.
(2) Moneys received as deposits from successful bidders, advance
payments, and security under RCW 79.15.100, 79.15.080, and 79.11.150
prior to December 1, 1981, which have not been subjected to deduction
under this section are not subject to deduction under this section.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection((s (4) and (6))) (5)
of this section, the deductions authorized under this section shall not
exceed twenty-five percent of the moneys received by the department in
connection with any one transaction pertaining to state lands and
aquatic lands other than second-class tide and shore lands and the beds
of navigable waters, and fifty percent of the moneys received by the
department pertaining to second-class tide and shore lands and the beds
of navigable waters.
(4) ((Deductions authorized under this section for transactions
pertaining to community forest trust lands must be established at a
level sufficient to defray over time the management costs for
activities prescribed in a parcel's management plan adopted pursuant to
RCW 79.155.080, and, if deemed appropriate by the board consistent with
RCW 79.155.090, to reimburse the state and any local entities' eligible
financial contributions for acquisition of the parcel.
(5))) In the event that the department sells logs using the
contract harvesting process described in RCW 79.15.500 through
79.15.530, the moneys received subject to this section are the net
proceeds from the contract harvesting sale.
(((6))) (5) During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, the
twenty-five percent limitation on deductions set in subsection (3) of
this section may be increased up to thirty percent by the board.

Sec. 5 RCW 79.155.090 and 2011 c 216 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any revenue produced on community forest trust lands must be((,
consistent with RCW 79.64.040,)) allocated as follows:
(a) All costs incurred by the department in managing the parcel
must be fully reimbursed; and
(b) After the department's management costs are reimbursed, any
remaining revenue must then be prioritized to fulfill the management
objectives for the specific parcel as identified in the postacquisition
management plan developed under RCW 79.155.080 consistent with the
management principles outlined in RCW 79.155.030.
(2)(a) If, by the determination of the board, there is revenue
remaining in any given biennium after fulfilling the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section, then the board has the discretion to
reimburse any local entities' eligible financial contributions for
acquisition of the parcel under RCW 79.155.070(2) and any state
contribution to the acquisition of the parcel up to an amount that
represents fifty percent of the difference between the parcel's
original appraised fair market value and the parcel's timber and forest
land value. However, any funds used as part of the local contribution
may not be reimbursed if the funds were originally provided through a
state or federal grant, provided through a fully compensated transfer
of development rights at fair market value, or provided by a donation
of funds or property.
(b) If the board decides to reimburse the state and local
contribution, then it must allocate the reimbursement so that fifty
percent is provided to the state general fund and fifty percent is
provided to any eligible partnering local entities.
(c) Nothing in this section creates an expectation, requirement, or
fiduciary duty for the board or the associated community forest trust
lands to generate revenue in excess of amounts as provided in
subsection (1)(a) of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2013 c 251 s 5 and 2013 c 88 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury
for cash management and cash balance purposes.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment
program account, the accessible communities account, the community and
technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the
American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the foster care scholarship
endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the county
enhanced 911 excise tax account, the toll collection account, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account,
the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the food animal
veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and vegetable
inspection account, the future teachers conditional scholarship
account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and
science scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies
and product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund,
the industrial insurance rainy day fund, the juvenile accountability
incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan
2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the multiagency
permitting team account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar pool
account, the regional transportation investment district account, the
rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing
commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards
account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund
account, the individual development account program account, the
Washington horse racing commission operating account, the life sciences
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the
reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the center for childhood
deafness and hearing loss account, the school for the blind account,
the Millersylvania park trust fund, the public employees' and retirees'
insurance reserve fund, ((and)) the radiation perpetual maintenance
fund, and the community forest trust account.
(c) The following accounts and funds must receive eighty percent of
their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high
occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account,
and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the
state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the
custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office
of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for
the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---