BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.71.212 and 1990 c 269 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of the department of health, in conjunction with
the state emergency medical services and trauma care committee, shall
evaluate, certify and terminate certification of medical program
directors, and prescribe minimum standards defining duties and
responsibilities and performance of duties and responsibilities.
(2) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section establishes the
authority for a medical program director to independently impose
restrictions on the certification or employment status of a certified
physician's trained emergency medical service intermediate life support
technician and paramedic, emergency medical technician, or first
responder if the department of health has not imposed any restrictions
on the individual's certification pursuant to an action taken under
chapter 18.130 RCW.

--- END ---