BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.08.065 and 2007 c 95 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
There shall be in the county of Grant, three judges of the superior
court; in the county of Okanogan, two judges of the superior court; in
the county of Mason, ((two)) three judges of the superior court; in the
county of Thurston, eight judges of the superior court; in the counties
of Pacific and Wahkiakum jointly, one judge of the superior court; in
the counties of Ferry, Pend Oreille, and Stevens jointly, two judges of
the superior court; in the county of San Juan, one judge of the
superior court; and in the county of Island, two judges of the superior
court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The additional judicial position created by
section 1 of this act in Mason county becomes effective only if the
county, through its duly constituted legislative authority, documents
its approval of the additional position and its agreement that it will
pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the
expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by statute.

--- END ---