BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.525
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Each contract entered into by a school district for the
construction or renovation of a school where funding for the project is
provided through voter-approved capital levies, voter-approved bonds,
or where the state has contributed matching funds, must contain a
clause stating that the architectural plans for the design or
modification of a school or any modifications of those plans are public
property and may be reproduced, modified, or used by the state or any
school district in the state. This applies to contracts entered into
after the effective date of this section.
(2) Each school district board of directors shall file the
architectural plans under subsection (1) of this section with the
superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent of public
instruction shall maintain these plans and make them available to
school districts throughout the state.

--- END ---