BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature affirms that students
have a right to privacy for their educational records. The legislature
finds that in an effort to standardize and nationalize K-12 education
the federal government has demonstrated a disregard for student privacy
rights, including through amendments to administrative regulations
under the family educational rights and privacy act that broaden access
to student records without the written consent of students and their
parents or guardians. The legislature also finds that Washington
state's participation in the multistate smarter balanced assessment
consortium that is developing common academic assessments may further
threaten the privacy rights of Washington state students.
(2) Therefore, to provide greater protection of student privacy,
the legislature intends to direct the joint legislative audit and
review committee to scrutinize the revised rules under the family
educational rights and privacy act and documents and agreements by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the office of
financial management, and school districts related to collection,
sharing, storage, security, dissemination, and access to personally
identifiable student data or student-level data to determine the extent
to which student privacy rights may be violated.
(3) If the analysis indicates any possibility of such a violation,
it is the legislature's intent to withdraw Washington state from
membership of and participation in any multistate assessment consortium
that disseminates or provides access to personally identifiable student
data or student-level data to the federal government, any for profit or
nonprofit nongovernmental organization, or any agency or organization
outside the state of Washington without the written consent of students
or their parents or guardians.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct
a detailed analysis of documents and agreements by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the office of financial
management, and school districts related to collection, sharing,
storage, security, dissemination, and access to personally identifiable
student data or student-level data to determine the extent to which,
and under what circumstances, the agreements require or permit
dissemination and sharing of personally identifiable student data or
student-level data from Washington state students without the written
consent of students or their parents or guardians. The analysis shall
include but not be limited to documents, agreements, and applications
related to the state fiscal stabilization fund; the federal race to the
top assessment program grant; the race to the top grant application
submitted by the state of Washington; the cooperative agreement between
the United States department of education and the smarter balanced
assessment consortium and the state of Washington (fiscal agent); the
evergreen state P-20 longitudinal data system federal grant; the
comprehensive education data and research system; the elementary and
secondary education act waiver application submitted by the state of
Washington; the longitudinal student data system established under RCW
28A.300.500; and the operations and activities of the education data
center under RCW 43.41.400.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall also
analyze the 2011 amendments to federal regulations under the family
educational rights and privacy act (34 C.F.R. Sec. 99) to determine the
extent to which the revised regulations permit the sharing of
personally identifiable student data or student-level data under the
documents, agreements, and applications in subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall submit
the analysis and findings to the education committees of the
legislature by September 1, 2014, to allow an opportunity for the
legislature to scrutinize the results and, if necessary, direct the
withdrawal of Washington state from membership of and participation in
any multistate assessment consortium that disseminates personally
identifiable student data or student-level data to the federal
government, any for profit or nonprofit nongovernmental organization,
or any agency or organization outside the state of Washington without
the written consent of students and their parents or guardians.
(4) If Washington state remains a member of the smarter balanced
assessment consortium after the 2015 legislative session or becomes a
member of any other multistate assessment consortium after the
effective date of this section, the joint legislative audit and review
committee shall annually review any documents and agreements by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the office of
financial management, and school districts related to collection,
sharing, storage, security, dissemination, and access to personally
identifiable student data or student-level data. If the joint
legislative audit and review committee finds that new or amended
documents, agreements, or applications revise the results of the
analysis and findings submitted under subsection (3) of this section,
the committee shall immediately forward the revised analysis and
findings to the education committees of the legislature.

--- END ---