BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.140 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 12 are each amended
to read as follows:
((Whenever the load upon any vehicle extends to the rear four feet
or more beyond the bed or body of such vehicle there shall be displayed
at the extreme rear end of the load, at the times specified in RCW
46.37.020, two red lamps, visible from a distance of at least five
hundred feet to the rear, two red reflectors visible at night from all
distances within six hundred feet to one hundred feet to the rear when
directly in front of lawful lower beams of headlamps, and located so as
to indicate maximum width, and on each side one red lamp, visible from
a distance of at least five hundred feet to the side, located so as to
indicate maximum overhang. There shall be displayed at all other
times))
(1) On any vehicle having a load ((which)) that extends more than
four inches beyond its sides or more than four feet beyond its rear,
there must be displayed red or orange fluorescent warning flags, not
less than ((twelve)) eighteen inches square, marking the extremities of
such loads((, at each point where a lamp would otherwise be required by
this section, under RCW 46.37.020)).
(2) Whenever the load upon any vehicle extends to the rear four
feet or more beyond the bed or body of the vehicle, there must be
displayed at the extreme rear end of the load at the times specified in
RCW 46.37.020:
(a) Two red lamps, visible from a distance of at least five hundred
feet to the rear;
(b) Two red reflectors, visible at night from all distances within
six hundred feet to one hundred feet to the rear when directly in front
of lawful lower beams of headlamps, and located so as to indicate
maximum width; and
(c) A red lamp on each side, visible from a distance of at least
five hundred feet to the side, and located so as to indicate maximum
overhang.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.48.170 and 1988 c 81 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state patrol acting by and through the chief of
the Washington state patrol ((shall have)) has the authority to adopt
and enforce the regulations promulgated by the United States department
of transportation, ((Title)) 49 C.F.R. Parts 100 through 199,
transportation of hazardous materials, as these regulations apply to
motor carriers offering, accepting, storing, or transporting hazardous
materials and to persons that inspect, certify, test, or repair cargo
tank motor vehicles. "Motor carrier" means any person engaged in the
transportation of passengers or property operating interstate and
intrastate upon the public highways of this state, except ((farmers))
certain agricultural operations as outlined in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 173.5.
(2) The chief of the Washington state patrol ((shall)) may confer
with the emergency management council under RCW 38.52.040 and may make
rules and regulations pertaining thereto, sufficient to protect persons
and property from unreasonable risk of harm or damage. The chief of
the Washington state patrol ((shall)) may establish such additional
rules not inconsistent with ((Title)) 49 C.F.R. Parts 100 through 199,
transportation of hazardous materials, which for compelling reasons
make necessary the reduction of risk associated with the transportation
of hazardous materials.
(3) No such rules may lessen a standard of care; however, the chief
of the Washington state patrol may, after conferring with the emergency
management council, establish a rule imposing a more stringent standard
of care. The chief of the Washington state patrol ((shall)) must
appoint the necessary qualified personnel to carry out the provisions
of ((RCW 46.48.170 through 46.48.190)) this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.61.350 and 2011 c 151 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The driver of any of the following vehicles must stop before
the stop line, if present, and otherwise within fifty feet but not less
than fifteen feet from the nearest rail at a railroad grade crossing
unless exempt under subsection (3) of this section:
(i) A school bus or private carrier bus carrying any school child
or other passenger;
(ii) A commercial motor vehicle transporting passengers;
(iii) A cargo tank, whether loaded or empty, used for transporting
any hazardous material as defined in the hazardous materials
regulations of the United States department of transportation in 49
C.F.R. Parts 107 through 180 as it existed on June 10, 2010, or such
subsequent date as may be provided by the state patrol by rule,
consistent with the purposes of this section. For the purposes of this
section, a cargo tank is any commercial motor vehicle designed to
transport any liquid or gaseous materials within a tank that is either
permanently or temporarily attached to the vehicle or the chassis;
(iv) A cargo tank, whether loaded or empty, transporting a
commodity under exemption in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Part 107,
Subpart B as it existed on June 10, 2010, or such subsequent date as
may be provided by the state patrol by rule, consistent with the
purposes of this section;
(v) A cargo tank transporting a commodity that at the time of
loading has a temperature above its flashpoint as determined by the
United States department of transportation in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 173.120 as
it existed on June 10, 2010, or such subsequent date as may be provided
by the state patrol by rule, consistent with the purposes of this
section; or
(vi) A commercial motor vehicle that is required to be marked or
placarded with any one of the following classifications by the United
States department of transportation in 49 C.F.R. Part 172 as it existed
on June 10, 2010, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
state patrol by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section:
(A) Division 1.1, Division 1.2, Division 1.3, or Division 1.4;
(B) Division 2.1, Division 2.2, Division 2.2 oxygen, Division 2.3
poison gas, or Division 2.3 chlorine;
(C) Division 4.1 or Division 4.3;
(D) Division 5.1 or Division 5.2;
(E) Division 6.1 poison;
(F) Class 3 combustible liquid or Class 3 flammable;
(G) Class 7;
(H) Class 8.
(b) While stopped, the driver must listen and look in both
directions along the track for any approaching train and for signals
indicating the approach of a train. The driver may not proceed until
he or she can do so safely.
(2) After stopping at a railroad grade crossing and upon proceeding
when it is safe to do so, the driver must cross only in a gear that
permits the vehicle to traverse the crossing without changing gears.
The driver may not shift gears while crossing the track or tracks.
(3) This section does not apply at any railroad grade crossing
where:
(a) Traffic is controlled by a police officer or flagger.
(b) A functioning traffic control signal is transmitting a green
light.
(c) The tracks are used exclusively for a streetcar or industrial
switching purposes.
(d) The utilities and transportation commission has approved the
installation of an "exempt" sign in accordance with the procedures and
standards under RCW 81.53.060.
(e) The crossing is abandoned and is marked with a sign indicating
it is out-of-service.
(f) The ((state patrol)) utilities and transportation commission
has((, by rule,))identified a crossing where stopping is not required
under RCW 81.53.060.
(((g) The superintendent of public instruction has, by rule,
identified a circumstance under which a school bus or private carrier
bus carrying any school child or other passenger is not required to
stop.))
(4) For the purpose of this section, "commercial motor vehicle"
means: Any vehicle with a manufacturer's seating capacity for eight or
more passengers, including the driver, that transports passengers for
hire; any private carrier bus; any vehicle used to transport property
that has a gross vehicle weight rating, gross combination weight
rating, gross vehicle weight, or gross combination weight of 4,536 kg
(10,001 pounds) or more; and any vehicle used in the transportation of
hazardous materials as defined in RCW 46.25.010.

--- END ---