BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.838 and 2009 c 170 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((After January 1, 1988, and)) Notwithstanding any provision of
RCW 43.43.700 through 43.43.810 to the contrary, the state patrol
((shall)) must furnish a transcript of the conviction record pertaining
to any person for whom the state patrol or the federal bureau of
investigation has a record upon the written request of:
(a) The subject of the inquiry;
(b) Any business or organization for the purpose of conducting
evaluations under RCW 43.43.832;
(c) The department of social and health services;
(d) Any law enforcement agency, prosecuting authority, or the
office of the attorney general;
(e) The department of social and health services for the purpose of
meeting responsibilities set forth in chapter 74.15, 18.51, 18.20, or
72.23 RCW, or any later-enacted statute which purpose is to regulate or
license a facility which handles vulnerable adults. However, access to
conviction records pursuant to this subsection (1)(e) does not limit or
restrict the ability of the department to obtain additional information
regarding conviction records and pending charges as set forth in RCW
74.15.030(2)(b); or
(f) The department of early learning for the purpose of meeting
responsibilities in chapter 43.215 RCW.
(2) The state patrol shall by rule establish fees ((for
disseminating records)) to cover, as nearly as practicable, the direct
and indirect costs to the state patrol of disseminating the records:
(a) Under this section to recipients identified in subsection
(1)(a) and (b) of this section((. The state patrol shall also by rule
establish fees for disseminating records));
(b) In the custody of the national crime information center((. The
revenue from the fees shall cover, as nearly as practicable, the direct
and indirect costs to the state patrol of disseminating the records.
No fee shall be charged to a nonprofit organization for the records
check. Record checks));
(c) Requested by nonprofit organizations, school districts, and
educational service districts using only name and date of birth will be
provided free of charge.
(3) No employee of the state, employee of a business or
organization, or the business or organization is liable for defamation,
invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with
any lawful dissemination of information under RCW 43.43.830 through
43.43.840 or 43.43.760.
(4) ((Before July 26, 1987,)) The state patrol ((shall)) may adopt
rules and forms to implement this section and to provide for security
and privacy of information disseminated under this section, giving
first priority to the criminal justice requirements of this chapter.
The rules may include requirements for users, audits of users, and
other procedures to prevent use of civil adjudication record
information or criminal history record information inconsistent with
this chapter.
(5) Nothing in RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.840 shall authorize an
employer to make an inquiry not specifically authorized by this
chapter, or be construed to affect the policy of the state declared in
chapter 9.96A RCW.

--- END ---