BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature considers physicians and
physician assistants as lifelong learners. The legislature further
recognizes the nature of this learning, practice correction, and
practice improvement typically occurs in an environment that is
conducive to learning but not without consequence. This learning or
guidance occurs at the direction of more learned peers. Historically,
this would occur through the actions of professional associations
intended to maintain and improve levels of competency through
instruction and guidance. It was through this process that senior
members of the association identified and addressed potentially harmful
practice deficits before these deficits developed into habits that
could harm the patient and by extension the profession. As not all
licensed practitioners in the state of Washington are members of
professional associations, but all medical practitioners are licensed
by the medical quality assurance commission, it is appropriate that the
commission fulfill the role of providing practice correction to those
practitioners in need.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout sections 3 through 9 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Nondisciplinary resolution" means a resolution authorized by
sections 3 through 9 of this act.
(2) "Practitioner" means a person licensed under this chapter or
chapter 18.71A RCW.
(3) "Quality improvement program" means a program that seeks to
educate and improve practitioner proficiency with regard to quality of
care, professional standards, ethical guidelines, and other practice
standard issues established by the commission pursuant to sections 3
through 9 of this act. The quality improvement program consists of
nondisciplinary and nonreportable tools for use by the commission at
its discretion to resolve issues relating to medical practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The commission shall conduct a pilot
project to evaluate the efficacy of a nondisciplinary quality
improvement program for its license holders. The purpose of the
program is to address concerns in practice that do not constitute
unprofessional conduct or pose a threat to patient safety. The goal of
the program is to improve the care of practitioners in a nonpunitive
environment that will result in safer and higher quality care to the
citizens of this state. The quality improvement program is educational
and nondisciplinary. The commission may initiate one or more elements
of the quality improvement program with a practitioner at any time,
including during the complaint process prior to the commission filing
charges or allegations against a respondent.
(2) The commission may initiate one or more elements of the quality
improvement program with a practitioner through the formal complaint
process, the investigative process, or concerns shared informally with
the commission by peers, employers, or other concerned parties
associated with the practitioner.
(3) A nondisciplinary resolution may not:
(a) Revoke, suspend, limit, or restrict a license or other
authorization to practice medicine;
(b) Assess an administrative penalty; or
(c) Resolve a complaint:
(i) Concerning a patient death or the commission of a felony;
(ii) Concerning a matter in which the practitioner engaged in
inappropriate sexual behavior or contact with a patient or became
financially or personally involved with a patient in an inappropriate
manner; or
(iii) For which the appropriate resolution may involve a
restriction on the manner in which the practitioner practices medicine.
(4) A nondisciplinary resolution is not a disciplinary action or
adjudication. No failure to adhere to the applicable standard of care
or violation of this chapter or chapter 18.71A RCW may be implied by
participation in the quality improvement program or the adoption of a
nondisciplinary resolution. A nondisciplinary resolution and entity
records and findings pursuant to this section and sections 4 through 9
of this act are not admissible in any civil, criminal, or
administrative action, except that a nondisciplinary resolution is
admissible in any disciplinary proceeding by the commission.
(5) A meeting of the commission for the purpose of discussing or
adopting a nondisciplinary resolution under this section is not subject
to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, or the open
public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The establishment of the quality improvement
program authorizes the commission to perform any or all of the
following:
(1) Entering into relationships supportive of the quality
improvement program with professionals who provide the following
services: Evaluation, education, or quality care improvement;
(2) Receiving and assessing reports from any source raising issues
with a practitioner's care or conduct that may need improvement;
(3) Intervening in cases of questionable behavior or care, or in
cases where there is reasonable cause to suspect there is a quality of
care or behavior issue but not unprofessional conduct as set forth in
RCW 18.130.180;
(4) Upon reasonable cause, referring a practitioner for education
or quality improvement;
(5) Monitoring the education and quality improvement of a
practitioner through meetings with the practitioner and individuals
assisting the practitioner pursuant to this section;
(6) Providing monitoring and continuing rehabilitative support of
practitioners;
(7) Performing such other activities as agreed upon by the
commission and the practitioner; and
(8) Providing education, prevention, or guidance where appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The commission may enter into a written
agreement with a practitioner for a professional development plan to
resolve a concern, complaint, or investigation of a complaint received
by the commission.
(2) The commission may issue a professional development plan to
resolve a complaint against a practitioner only if the practitioner has
not previously entered into a professional development plan within the
last five years.
(3) The practitioner participating in a professional development
plan shall cover the cost of any education or other course of action
required by the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The commission may issue a letter of
guidance to a practitioner to resolve a concern, complaint, or
investigation of a complaint received by the commission. The letter of
guidance may detail alleged areas of concern relating to medical
practice of a practitioner and possible remedies the practitioner may
undertake to educate himself or herself on the subject.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The commission may compel a practitioner
to attend an informal interview to resolve a concern, complaint, or
investigation of a complaint received by the commission.
(2) The purpose of the informal interview is to conduct a candid
discussion between medical professionals regarding a specific area of
practice or situation of concern relating to practice.
(3) The practitioner may choose to attend the informal interview
with legal representation.
(4) An informal interview does not preclude the commission from
proceeding with further investigation and disciplinary actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The commission shall adopt rules necessary
to implement sections 2 through 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 By December 1, 2015, the department of
health and the commission shall submit a joint report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the results of the pilot
project. The report must include a recommendation of whether the
quality improvement program should be extended to all health care
professions listed in RCW 18.130.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 2 through 9 of this act are each
added to chapter 18.71 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act expires July 1, 2016.

--- END ---