BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter may be known and cited as the
debt settlement services act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Affiliate" means:
(a) A person that controls, is controlled by, or is under common
control with the provider;
(b) An executive officer of or individual performing similar
functions with respect to the provider;
(c) A director of or individual performing similar functions with
respect to the provider; and
(d) An executive officer or director of or an individual performing
similar functions with respect to a person described in (a) of this
subsection.
(2) "Agreement" means a contract between a provider and an
individual for the performance of debt settlement services.
(3) "Concessions" means assent to repayment of a debt on terms more
favorable to an individual than the terms of the contract between the
individual and a creditor.
(4) "Control" means the right to control ten percent or more of the
voting power of another person.
(5) "Debt settlement services" means services as an intermediary
between an individual and one or more unsecured creditors of the
individual for the purpose of obtaining concessions involving a
reduction in principal of the individual's unsecured debt. "Debt
settlement services" does not include the following, so long as debt
settlement services are not the primary business purpose of the person
described below:
(a) Legal services provided in an attorney-client relationship by
an attorney licensed or otherwise authorized to practice law in this
state;
(b) Accounting services provided in an accountant-client
relationship by a certified public accountant licensed to provide
accounting services in this state; or
(c) Financial planning services provided in a financial
planner-client relationship by a licensed member of a financial
planning profession.
(6) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(7) "Financial institution" means any person doing business under
the laws of any state or the United States relating to commercial
banks, bank holding companies, savings banks, savings and loan
associations, trust companies, or credit unions.
(8) "Good faith" means honesty in fact and the observance of
reasonable standards of fair dealing.
(9) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, or any other legal or commercial entity. "Person" does
not include a public corporation, government or governmental
subdivision, agency or instrumentality.
(10) "Principal amount of the debt" means the amount of a debt at
the time of the execution of an agreement for debt settlement services.
(11) "Program" means a plan or strategy in which a provider
furnishes debt settlement services.
(12) "Provider" means a person required to be registered pursuant
to this chapter and that provides, offers to provide, or agrees to
provide debt settlement services for compensation.
(13) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible
medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is
retrievable in perceivable form.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This chapter does not apply to the following
persons or their employees when the person or the employee is engaged
in the regular course of the person's business or profession:
(1) A judicial officer, a person acting under an order of a court
or an administrative agency, or an assignee for the benefit of
creditors;
(2) A financial institution; or
(3) A title insurer, escrow company, or other person that provides
bill-paying services if the provision of debt settlement services is
incidental to the bill-paying services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) On or after the effective date of this
section, a provider may not provide debt settlement services to an
individual who it reasonably should know resides in this state at the
time it agrees to provide the services, unless the provider is
registered under this chapter.
(2) The department shall maintain and publicize a list of the names
of all registered providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) An application for registration as a
provider must be in a form prescribed by the department.
(2) An application for registration as a provider must be
accompanied by:
(a) The fee established by the department;
(b) Evidence of minimum insurance in an amount specified by the
department;
(c) In lieu of the aggregate umbrella insurance required by (b) of
this subsection, a surety bond filed with the department, in a form
approved by the department, for a term no less than the expiration of
the term of registration and in the amount of not less than ten
thousand dollars or other larger amount that the department determines
is warranted by the financial condition and business experience of the
provider, the history of the provider in performing debt settlement
services, the risk to individuals, and any other factor the department
considers appropriate, but in no event greater than fifty thousand
dollars. The surety bond runs to the state for the benefit of this
state and of individuals who reside in this state when they agree to
receive debt settlement services from the provider, as their interests
may appear, payment of which is conditioned upon noncompliance of the
provider or its agent with this chapter; and
(d) Proof that the provider is authorized by the laws of this state
to conduct business in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) An application for registration must be
signed by the applicant and declare as true any material matter
pursuant to the application for registration. The application form
must contain a statement informing the applicant that a false or
dishonest answer to a question may be grounds for denial or subsequent
suspension or revocation of the applicant's registration.
(2) An application must include the following:
(a) The applicant's name, principal business address and telephone
number, all other business addresses in this state, electronic mail
addresses, and internet web site addresses;
(b) All names under which the applicant conducts business in this
state;
(c) The address of each location in this state at which the
applicant will provide debt settlement services or a statement that the
applicant will have no such location;
(d) A copy of each form of agreement that the applicant will use
with individuals who reside in this state;
(e) The schedule of fees and charges that the applicant will use
with individuals who reside in this state; and
(f) Such other information that the department may reasonably
require.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 An applicant or provider shall notify the
department no later than sixty days after a material change in the
information provided in an application for registration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department shall make available to the
public the information in an application for registration and renewal
of registration as a provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (2) of this section, the department shall issue a
certificate of registration as a provider to a person that complies
with sections 5 and 6 of this act.
(2) The department may deny registration if:
(a) The application contains information that is materially
erroneous or incomplete;
(b) An officer, director, or owner of the applicant has suffered a
civil judgment or been convicted of a crime involving dishonesty or the
violation of federal or state securities laws; or
(c) The application is not accompanied by the fee established by
the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The department shall approve or deny an
initial registration as a provider no later than sixty days after an
application is filed. The department may extend the sixty-day period
for not more than forty-five days. No later than seven days after
denying an application, the department, in a record, shall inform the
applicant of the reasons for the denial.
(2) If the department denies an application for registration as a
provider or does not act on an application within the time prescribed
in subsection (1) of this section, the applicant may appeal and request
a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) Subject to section 11(4) of this act, a registration as a
provider is valid for one year.
(4) Upon submission of an application for registration and until
such time as an application, or any appeal filed pursuant to subsection
(2) of this section, is approved or denied, the applicant may continue
to provide debt settlement services, but a denial of registration
terminates any further power to provide services unless approved by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) A provider shall obtain a renewal of
its registration annually.
(2) An application for renewal of a registration as a provider must
be in a form prescribed by the department, signed under penalty of
perjury, and:
(a) Be filed not less than thirty days nor more than sixty days
before the registration expires;
(b) Be accompanied by the fee established by the department;
(c) Disclose any changes in the information contained in the
applicant's application for registration or its immediately previous
application for renewal, as applicable; and
(d) Provide any other information that the department may
reasonably require to perform the department's duties under this
section.
(3) If a provider files a timely and complete application for
renewal of registration, the registration remains effective until the
department, in a record, notifies the applicant of a denial and states
the reasons for the denial.
(4) If the department denies an application for renewal of
registration as a provider, the applicant, no later than thirty days
after receiving notice of the denial, may appeal and request a hearing
under chapter 34.05 RCW. While the appeal is pending, the applicant
shall continue to provide debt settlement services to individuals with
whom it has agreements. If the denial is affirmed, the applicant shall
continue to provide debt settlement services to individuals with whom
it has agreements until, with the approval of the department, it
transfers the agreements to another registered provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If a provider holds a license or
certificate of registration in another state authorizing it to provide
debt settlement services, the provider may submit a copy of that
license or certificate of registration and the application for it
instead of an application in the form prescribed by section 5(1), 6, or
11(2) of this act. The department shall accept the application and the
license or certificate from the other state as an application for
registration as a provider or for renewal of registration as a
provider, as appropriate, in this state if:
(1) The application in the other state contains information
substantially similar to or more comprehensive than that required in an
application submitted in this state; and
(2) The applicant, under penalty of perjury, certifies that the
information contained in the application is current or, to the extent
it is not current, supplements the application to make the information
current.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A person registered as a provider under
this chapter is exempt from chapter 18.28 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A provider shall act in good faith in all
matters under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) Before an individual consents to pay
for goods or services offered, a provider shall disclose truthfully, in
a clear and conspicuous manner, the following material information:
(a) A good faith estimate of the amount of time necessary to
achieve the represented results;
(b) To the extent the debt settlement services may include a
settlement offer to any of the individual's creditors or debt
collectors:
(i) A good faith estimate of the time by which the provider will
start to make bona fide settlement offers to the individual's
creditors;
(ii) A good faith estimate of the amount of money or the percentage
of each outstanding debt that the individual will need to accumulate
before the provider will make a bona fide settlement offer to one or
more of such creditors;
(iii) The cost to the individual for providing debt settlement
services;
(c) To the extent that any aspect of the debt settlement services
relies upon or results in the individual's failure to make timely
payments to creditors or debt collectors, that the use of the debt
settlement services will likely adversely affect the individual's
creditworthiness, may result in the individual being subject to
collection actions or sued by creditors or debt collectors, and may
increase the amount of money the individual owes due to the accrual of
fees and interest; and
(d) To the extent that the provider requests or requires the
individual to place funds in an account at a financial institution,
that the individual owns the funds held in the account and that the
individual may withdraw from the debt settlement services at any time
without penalty.
(2) A provider may not misrepresent, directly or by implication,
any material aspect of any debt settlement services, including but not
limited to: The amount of money or the percentage of the debt amount
that an individual may save by using such service; the effect of the
service on the individual's creditworthiness; the effect of the service
on collection efforts of the individual's creditors or debt collectors;
the percentage or number of individuals who attain the represented
results; and whether debt settlement services are offered or provided
by a nonprofit entity.
(3) A provider may not receive payment of any fee or consideration
for any debt settlement services until and unless:
(a) The provider has renegotiated, settled, reduced, or otherwise
altered the terms of at least one debt under a debt settlement program;
(b) The individual has made at least one payment to a creditor in
furtherance of a settlement with that creditor; and
(c) The fee or consideration for settling each individual debt
enrolled in a debt settlement plan either:
(i) Bears the same proportional relationship to the total fee for
settling the entire debt balance as the individual debt amount bears to
the entire debt amount. The individual debt amount and the entire debt
amount are amounts owed at the time the debt was enrolled on the debt
relief service; or
(ii) Is a percentage of the amount saved as a result of the
settlement. The percentage charged may not change from one individual
debt to another. The amount saved is the difference between the amount
owed at the time the debt was enrolled in the debt relief service and
the amount actually paid to satisfy the debt.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits requesting or requiring the
individual to place funds in an account to be used for payment of the
provider's fees and for payments to creditors or debt collectors in
connection with the renegotiation, settlement, reduction, or other
alteration of the terms of payment or other terms of debt if:
(a) The funds are held in a specifically designated account at a
financial institution;
(b) The individual, not the provider, owns and controls the funds
held in the account and is paid accrued interest on the account, if
any;
(c) If the provider does not administer the account, the entity
administering the account is not owned or controlled by the provider
and is not an affiliate of the provider;
(d) The entity administering the account does not give or accept
any money or other compensation in exchange for referrals of business
by the provider; and
(e) The individual may withdraw from the debt settlement services
at any time without penalty, and receives all funds in the account,
other than funds earned by the provider in compliance with this
section, as specified in the account agreement between the individual
and the financial institution.
(5) If a provider is not registered as required by this chapter
when an individual assents to an agreement, the agreement is voidable
by the individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) The department may act on its own
initiative or in response to complaints and may receive complaints,
take action to obtain voluntary compliance with this chapter, and seek
or provide remedies as provided in this chapter.
(2) To determine compliance with this chapter, the department may
investigate and examine, in this state or elsewhere, by subpoena or
otherwise, the activities, books, accounts, and records of a person
that provides or offers to provide debt settlement services or of a
person to which a provider has delegated its obligations under an
agreement or this chapter. Information that identifies individuals who
have agreements with the provider may not be disclosed to the public.
In connection with the investigation, the department may:
(a) Charge the person the reasonable expenses necessarily incurred
to conduct the examination; and
(b) Require or permit a person to file a statement under oath as to
all the facts and circumstances of a matter to be investigated.
(3) The department may enforce violations of this chapter by taking
one or more of the following actions:
(a) Ordering a provider or a director, employee, or other agent of
a provider to cease and desist from any violations;
(b) Ordering a provider or a person that has caused a violation to
correct the violation, including making restitution of money or
property to a person aggrieved by a violation;
(c) Imposing on a provider or a person that has caused a violation
a civil penalty not exceeding one thousand dollars for each violation;
and
(d) Prosecuting a civil action to enforce an order or to obtain
restitution or an injunction or other equitable relief, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) The department may suspend, revoke, or
deny renewal of a provider's registration if:
(a) The provider has committed a material violation of this
chapter; or
(b) The provider is insolvent.
(2) If the department suspends or revokes a provider's
registration, the provider may appeal and request a hearing pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The director shall establish reasonable
fees by rule sufficient to cover the costs of administering this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 This chapter modifies, limits, and
supersedes the electronic signatures in global and national commerce
act (P.L. 106-229, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq.), but does not modify,
limit, or supersede section 101(c) of the electronic signatures in
global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c), or authorize
electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b)
of the electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15
U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

Sec. 20 RCW 18.28.010 and 2012 c 56 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the
following words and phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter shall
have the following meanings:
(1) "Debt adjuster," which includes any person known as a debt
pooler, debt manager, debt consolidator, debt prorater, or credit
counselor, is any person engaging in or holding himself or herself out
as engaging in the business of debt adjusting for compensation. The
term shall not include:
(a) Attorneys-at-law, escrow agents, accountants, broker-dealers in
securities, or investment advisors in securities, while performing
services solely incidental to the practice of their professions;
(b) Any person, partnership, association, or corporation doing
business under and as permitted by any law of this state or of the
United States relating to banks, consumer finance businesses, consumer
loan companies, trust companies, mutual savings banks, savings and loan
associations, building and loan associations, credit unions, crop
credit associations, development credit corporations, industrial
development corporations, title insurance companies, insurance
companies, or third-party account administrators;
(c) Persons who, as employees on a regular salary or wage of an
employer not engaged in the business of debt adjusting, perform credit
services for their employer;
(d) Public officers while acting in their official capacities and
persons acting under court order;
(e) Any person while performing services incidental to the
dissolution, winding up or liquidation of a partnership, corporation,
or other business enterprise;
(f) Nonprofit organizations dealing exclusively with debts owing
from commercial enterprises to business creditors;
(g) Nonprofit organizations engaged in debt adjusting and which do
not assess against the debtor a service charge in excess of fifteen
dollars per month;
(h) Persons registered as providers of debt settlement services
under chapter 18.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 23 of this
act).
(2) "Debt adjusting" means the managing, counseling, settling,
adjusting, prorating, or liquidating of the indebtedness of a debtor,
((or)) and receiving funds for the purpose of distributing said funds
among creditors in payment or partial payment of obligations of a
debtor.
(3) "Debt adjusting agency" is any partnership, corporation, or
association engaging in or holding itself out as engaging in the
business of debt adjusting.
(4) "Financial institution" means any person doing business under
the laws of any state or the United States relating to commercial
banks, bank holding companies, savings banks, savings and loan
associations, trust companies, or credit unions.
(5) "Third-party account administrator" means an independent entity
that holds or administers a dedicated bank account for fees and
payments to creditors, debt collectors, debt adjusters, or debt
adjusting agencies in connection with the renegotiation, settlement,
reduction, or other alteration of the terms of payment or other terms
of a debt.

Sec. 21 RCW 42.56.230 and 2013 c 220 s 1 and 2013 c 336 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following personal information is exempt from public inspection
and copying under this chapter:
(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients;
(2)(a) Personal information:
(i) For a child enrolled in licensed child care in any files
maintained by the department of early learning; or
(ii) For a child enrolled in a public or nonprofit program serving
or pertaining to children, adolescents, or students, including but not
limited to early learning or child care services, parks and recreation
programs, youth development programs, and after-school programs.
(b) Emergency contact information under this subsection (2) may be
provided to appropriate authorities and medical personnel for the
purpose of treating the individual during an emergency situation;
(3) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;
(4) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would: (a) Be prohibited to such persons
by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, 84.40.340, or any ordinance
authorized under RCW 35.102.145; or (b) violate the taxpayer's right to
privacy or result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer;
(5) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by
other law;
(6) Personal and financial information related to a small loan or
any system of authorizing a small loan in RCW 31.45.093; and
(7)(a) Any record used to prove identity, age, residential address,
social security number, or other personal information required to apply
for a driver's license or identicard.
(b) Information provided under RCW 46.20.111 that indicates that an
applicant declined to register with the selective service system.
(c) Any record pertaining to a vehicle license plate, driver's
license, or identicard issued under RCW 46.08.066 that, alone or in
combination with any other records, may reveal the identity of an
individual, or reveal that an individual is or was, performing an
undercover or covert law enforcement, confidential public health work,
public assistance fraud, or child support investigative activity. This
exemption does not prevent the release of the total number of vehicle
license plates, drivers' licenses, or identicards that, under RCW
46.08.066, an agency or department has applied for, been issued,
denied, returned, destroyed, lost, and reported for misuse.
(d) Any record pertaining to a vessel registration issued under RCW
88.02.330 that, alone or in combination with any other records, may
reveal the identity of an individual, or reveal that an individual is
or was, performing an undercover or covert law enforcement activity.
This exemption does not prevent the release of the total number of
vessel registrations that, under RCW 88.02.330, an agency or department
has applied for, been issued, denied, returned, destroyed, lost, and
reported for misuse. (((e))) Upon request by the legislature, the
department of licensing shall provide a report to the legislature
containing all of the information in (c) ((and (d))) of this subsection
and this subsection (7)(d) that is subject to public disclosure.
(8) Information obtained by the department of financial
institutions that identifies individuals who have agreements with a
provider of debt settlement services, as provided in section 16 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 This act does not invalidate or make
unlawful contracts executed prior to the effective date of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 Sections 1 through 19 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---