BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that nature has
provided little to the people of the Pacific Northwest with a greater
cultural, ecological, and economic value as the native runs of wild
salmon that nurse in our local waters and, after an unimaginable
journey, return home to repeat the ageless cycle. Although the natural
rhythm of the salmonid pulses without human intervention, choices made
by the residents of Washington can have a dramatic effect on the
continuance of the very species that has served as a cornerstone of
northwest culture for countless generations.
(2) The legislature further finds that the value of salmon exceeds
culture, economy, and even the environment. Salmon, as a food source,
represent a very need of human existence. So much so that an important
and well-intended industry has taken to Washington waters and harnessed
its clean, cool properties to raise salmon and other finfish in net
pens.
(3) The legislature further finds that, although great investments
continue to be made in net pen technology to avoid escapes, the use of
genetically modified finfish in net pens create an unacceptable risk to
the native salmon of the Pacific Northwest; genetics that are developed
specifically and irreplaceably for each individual run of salmon.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.125.020 and 2001 c 86 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For the purposes of this chapter,)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Genetically engineered" means any organism or organisms in
which the genetic material of the organism or organisms has been
changed through the application of in vitro nucleic acid techniques or
the direct injection of nucleic acid into cells or organelles of the
organism or organisms.
(2) "Marine aquatic farming location" means a complete complex that
may be composed of various marine enclosures, net pens, or other
rearing vessels, food handling facilities, or other facilities related
to the rearing of Atlantic salmon or other finfish in marine waters.
A marine aquatic farming location is distinguished from the individual
facilities that collectively compose the location.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.125 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No person may produce genetically engineered finfish in state
waters.
(2) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor. Each
instance of a genetically engineered salmonid being produced is an
individual violation of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 69.04.932 and 2013 c 290 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commercially caught" means wild or hatchery-raised salmon
harvested in the wild by commercial fishers. The term does not apply
to farmed fish raised exclusively by private sector aquaculture.
(2) "Food fish" means fresh or saltwater finfish and other forms of
aquatic animal life other than crustaceans, mollusks, birds, and
mammals where the animal life is intended for human consumption.
(3) "Genetically engineered" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
77.125.020.
(4) "Salmon" means all species of the genus Oncorhynchus, except
those classified as game fish in RCW 77.08.020, and includes:

SCIENTIFIC NAME COMMON NAME

Oncorhynchus tshawytscha Chinook salmon or king salmon

Oncorhynchus kisutch Coho salmon or silver salmon

Oncorhynchus keta Chum or "keta" salmon

Oncorhynchus gorbuscha Pink salmon

Oncorhynchus nerka Sockeye or "red" salmon

Salmo salar (in other than Atlantic salmon

its landlocked form)

(((4))) (5) "Shellfish" means crustaceans and all mollusks where
the animal life is intended for human consumption.

Sec. 5 RCW 69.04.934 and 2013 c 290 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful to knowingly sell or offer for sale at wholesale
or retail any fresh, frozen, or processed salmon without identifying:
(a) Private sector cultured aquatic salmon or salmon products as
farm-raised salmon((, or identifying));
(b) Commercially caught salmon or salmon products as commercially
caught salmon; or
(c) Genetically engineered salmon or salmon products as being
genetically engineered.
(2) Identification of the products under subsection (1) of this
section must be made to the buyer at the point of sale such that the
buyer can make an informed purchasing decision for his or her
protection, health, and safety.
(3) A violation of this section constitutes misbranding under RCW
69.04.938 and is punishable as a misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor, or
felony depending on the fair market value of the fish or shellfish
involved in the violation.
(4) Subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section does not apply to
salmon that is minced, pulverized, coated with batter, or breaded.
(5) This section does not apply to a commercial fisher properly
licensed under chapter 77.65 RCW and lawfully engaged in the sale of
fish to a fish buyer.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes using additional descriptive
language or trade names to describe food fish or shellfish as long as
the labeling requirements of this section are met.

--- END ---