BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.50.530 and 2013 c 3 s 26 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) ((There shall be)) (a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of
this subsection, there must be a fund, known as the dedicated marijuana
fund, which ((shall)) consists of all marijuana excise taxes, license
fees, penalties, forfeitures, and all other moneys, income, or revenue
received by the state liquor control board from marijuana-related
activities. The state treasurer ((shall)) must be custodian of the
fund.
(b) There must be a fund, known as the dedicated local jurisdiction
marijuana fund, which consists of marijuana excise taxes collected
under RCW 69.50.535(3). The state treasurer must be custodian of the
fund.
(2) All moneys received by the state liquor control board or any
employee thereof from marijuana-related activities ((shall)) must be
deposited each day in a depository approved by the state treasurer and
transferred to the state treasurer to be credited to the dedicated
marijuana fund or the dedicated local jurisdiction marijuana fund.
(3) Disbursements from the dedicated marijuana fund ((shall)) or
the dedicated local jurisdiction marijuana fund must be on
authorization of the state liquor control board or a duly authorized
representative thereof.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.50.535 and 2013 c 3 s 27 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected a marijuana excise tax equal to
twenty-five percent of the selling price on each wholesale sale in this
state of marijuana by a licensed marijuana producer to a licensed
marijuana processor or another licensed marijuana producer. This tax
is the obligation of the licensed marijuana producer.
(2) There is levied and collected a marijuana excise tax equal to
twenty-five percent of the selling price on each wholesale sale in this
state of useable marijuana or marijuana-infused product by a licensed
marijuana processor to a licensed marijuana retailer. This tax is the
obligation of the licensed marijuana processor.
(3) There is levied and collected a marijuana excise tax equal to
twenty-five percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this
state of useable marijuana and marijuana-infused products. This tax is
the obligation of the licensed marijuana retailer, is separate and in
addition to general state and local sales and use taxes that apply to
retail sales of tangible personal property, and is part of the total
retail price to which general state and local sales and use taxes
apply.
(4) All revenues collected from the marijuana excise taxes imposed
under subsections (1) through (3) of this section ((shall)) must be
deposited each day in a depository approved by the state treasurer and
transferred to the state treasurer ((to be credited to the dedicated
marijuana fund)) as follows:
(a) Ninety percent of the revenue collected from the marijuana
excise tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section must be
credited to the dedicated marijuana fund, and ten percent of the
revenue collected under subsection (1) of this section must be credited
to the dedicated local jurisdiction marijuana fund.
(b) All revenue collected from the marijuana excise tax imposed
under subsection (2) of this section must be credited to the dedicated
marijuana fund.
(c) Eighty percent of the revenue collected from the marijuana
excise tax imposed under subsection (3) of this section must be
credited to the dedicated marijuana fund, and twenty percent of the
revenue collected under subsection (3) of this section must be credited
to the dedicated local jurisdiction marijuana fund.
(5) The state liquor control board ((shall)) must regularly review
the tax levels established under this section and make recommendations
to the legislature as appropriate regarding adjustments that would
further the goal of discouraging use while undercutting illegal market
prices.

Sec. 3 RCW 69.50.540 and 2013 c 3 s 28 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) All marijuana excise taxes collected from sales of marijuana,
useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products under RCW 69.50.535,
and the license fees, penalties, and forfeitures derived under chapter
3, Laws of 2013 from marijuana producer, marijuana processor, and
marijuana retailer licenses ((shall)) deposited in the dedicated
marijuana fund must every three months be disbursed by the state liquor
control board as follows:
(((1))) (a) One hundred twenty-five thousand dollars to the
department of social and health services to design and administer the
Washington state healthy youth survey, analyze the collected data, and
produce reports, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, department of health, department of commerce,
family policy council, and state liquor control board. The survey
((shall)) must be conducted at least every two years and include
questions regarding, but not necessarily limited to, academic
achievement, age at time of substance use initiation, antisocial
behavior of friends, attitudes toward antisocial behavior, attitudes
toward substance use, laws and community norms regarding antisocial
behavior, family conflict, family management, parental attitudes toward
substance use, peer rewarding of antisocial behavior, perceived risk of
substance use, and rebelliousness. Funds disbursed under this
subsection may be used to expand administration of the healthy youth
survey to student populations attending institutions of higher
education in Washington;
(((2))) (b) Fifty thousand dollars to the department of social and
health services for the purpose of contracting with the Washington
state institute for public policy to conduct the cost-benefit
evaluation and produce the reports described in RCW 69.50.550. This
appropriation ((shall)) ends after production of the final report
required by RCW 69.50.550;
(((3))) (c) Five thousand dollars to the University of Washington
alcohol and drug abuse institute for the creation, maintenance, and
timely updating of web-based public education materials providing
medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and
safety risks posed by marijuana use;
(((4))) (d) An amount not exceeding one million two hundred fifty
thousand dollars to the state liquor control board as is necessary for
administration of chapter 3, Laws of 2013;
(((5))) (e)(i) Of the funds remaining after the disbursements
identified in subsections (((1))) (a) through (((4))) (d) of this
((section)) subsection:
(((a))) (A) Fifteen percent to the department of social and health
services division of behavioral health and recovery for implementation
and maintenance of programs and practices aimed at the prevention or
reduction of maladaptive substance use, substance-use disorder,
substance abuse or substance dependence, as these terms are defined in
the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, among middle
school and high school age students, whether as an explicit goal of a
given program or practice or as a consistently corresponding effect of
its implementation; PROVIDED, That:
(((i))) (I) Of the funds disbursed under (((a))) (e)(i)(A) of this
subsection, at least eighty-five percent must be directed to evidence-based and cost-beneficial programs and practices that produce
objectively measurable results; and
(((ii))) (II) Up to fifteen percent of the funds disbursed under
(((a))) (e)(i)(A) of this subsection may be directed to research-based
and emerging best practices or promising practices.
(ii) In deciding which programs and practices to fund, the
secretary of the department of social and health services ((shall))
must consult, at least annually, with the University of Washington's
social development research group and the University of Washington's
alcohol and drug abuse institute;
(((b))) (B) Ten percent to the department of health for the
creation, implementation, operation, and management of a marijuana
education and public health program that contains the following:
(((i))) (I) A marijuana use public health hotline that provides
referrals to substance abuse treatment providers, utilizes evidence-based or research-based public health approaches to minimizing the
harms associated with marijuana use, and does not solely advocate an
abstinence-only approach;
(((ii))) (II) A grants program for local health departments or
other local community agencies that supports development and
implementation of coordinated intervention strategies for the
prevention and reduction of marijuana use by youth; and
(((iii))) (III) Media-based education campaigns across television,
internet, radio, print, and out-of-home advertising, separately
targeting youth and adults, that provide medically and scientifically
accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by
marijuana use;
(((c))) (C) Six-tenths of one percent to the University of
Washington and four-tenths of one percent to Washington State
University for research on the short and long-term effects of marijuana
use, to include but not be limited to formal and informal methods for
estimating and measuring intoxication and impairment, and for the
dissemination of such research;
(((d))) (D) Fifty percent to the state basic health plan trust
account to be administered by the Washington basic health plan
administrator and used as provided under chapter 70.47 RCW;
(((e))) (E) Five percent to the Washington state health care
authority to be expended exclusively through contracts with community
health centers to provide primary health and dental care services,
migrant health services, and maternity health care services as provided
under RCW 41.05.220;
(((f))) (F) Three-tenths of one percent to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to fund grants to building bridges
programs under chapter 28A.175 RCW; and
(((g))) (G) The remainder to the general fund.
(2) All marijuana excise taxes from sales of marijuana, useable
marijuana, and marijuana-infused products that are collected and
deposited under RCW 69.50.535 in the dedicated local jurisdiction
marijuana fund must be disbursed every three months by the state liquor
control board as follows:
(a) All marijuana excise taxes collected and deposited under RCW
69.50.535(1) in the dedicated local jurisdiction marijuana fund must be
disbursed to the local jurisdiction where the marijuana producer is
physically located. Each local jurisdiction must receive revenue
distributions based on the proportional share of the total revenues in
the dedicated local jurisdiction marijuana fund from the taxes
collected under RCW 69.50.535(1) from producers physically located in
each local jurisdiction; and
(b) All marijuana excise taxes collected and deposited under RCW
69.50.535(3) in the dedicated local jurisdiction marijuana fund must be
disbursed to the local jurisdiction where the retail sale originated.
Each local jurisdiction with retail sales must receive revenue
distributions based on its proportional amount of the total revenues
from the excise tax imposed under RCW 69.50.535(3) in the dedicated
local jurisdiction marijuana fund from retail sales in its
jurisdiction.

Sec. 4 RCW 69.50.608 and 1989 c 271 s 601 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state of Washington fully occupies and preempts the entire
field of the regulation of controlled substances under this chapter and
setting penalties for violations of the controlled substances act.
This preemption also includes, but is not limited to, statutory
provisions pertaining to licensing, marketing, taxation, production,
processing, and retail sale of marijuana.
(2) Cities, towns, and counties or other municipalities may enact
only those laws and ordinances relating to controlled substances that
are consistent with this chapter. Such local ordinances shall have the
same penalties, rules, and requirements as provided for by state law.
Local laws and ordinances that are inconsistent with the requirements
of state law, or that in any way have the effect of interfering with
the development, implementation, or maintenance of a state regulated
market regarding the production, processing, possession, or use of
legal marijuana, shall not be enacted and are preempted and
((repealed)) unenforceable, regardless of the nature of the code,
charter, or home rule status of the city, town, county, or
municipality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---