BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.87.120 and 2008 c 181 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall appoint and employ inspectors, as may be
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, under the
provisions of the rules adopted by the Washington personnel resources
board in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the department
shall cause all conveyances to be inspected and tested at least once
each year. Inspectors have the right during reasonable hours to enter
into and upon any building or premises in the discharge of their
official duties, for the purpose of making any inspection or testing
any conveyance contained thereon or therein. Inspections and tests
shall conform with the rules adopted by the department. The department
shall inspect all installations before it issues any initial permit for
operation. Permits shall not be issued until the fees required by this
chapter have been paid.
(b)(i) Private residence conveyances operated exclusively for
single-family use shall be inspected and tested only when required
under RCW 70.87.100 or as necessary for the purposes of subsection (4)
of this section and shall be exempt from RCW 70.87.090 unless an annual
inspection and operating permit are requested by the owner.
(ii) The department may perform additional inspections of a private
residence conveyance at the request of the owner of the conveyance.
Fees for these inspections shall be in accordance with the schedule of
fees adopted for operating permits pursuant to RCW 70.87.030. An
inspection requested under this subsection (2)(b)(ii) shall not be
performed until the required fees have been paid.
(iii) Dumbwaiters shall be tested and inspected as provided in this
subsection (2)(b)(iii). Inspectors shall give owners at least ten
days' notice of an inspection. The department shall inspect
dumbwaiters no more often than every two years unless an inspection
shows a dumbwaiter to be in an unsafe condition, in which case the
department shall conduct an annual inspection until the dumbwaiter has
passed inspection for two successive inspections.
(3) If inspection shows a conveyance to be in an unsafe condition,
the department shall issue an inspection report in writing requiring
the repairs or alterations to be made to the conveyance that are
necessary to render it safe and may also suspend or revoke a permit
pursuant to RCW 70.87.125 or order the operation of a conveyance
discontinued pursuant to RCW 70.87.145.
(a) A penalty may be assessed under RCW 70.87.185 for failure to
correct a violation within ninety days after the owner is notified in
writing of inspection results.
(b) The owner may be assessed a penalty under RCW 70.87.185 for
failure to submit official notification in writing to the department
that all corrections have been completed.
(4) The department may investigate accidents and alleged or
apparent violations of this chapter.
(5) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the governor may waive or suspend the collection of fees under this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

--- END ---