BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.27.250 and 2011 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A violation designated as an infraction under this chapter shall be
heard and determined by an administrative law judge of the office of
administrative hearings. If a party desires to contest the notice of
infraction, the party shall file a notice of appeal with the department
specifying the grounds of the appeal within thirty days of service of
the infraction in a manner provided by this chapter. The appeal must
be accompanied by a certified check for two hundred dollars or ten
percent of the penalty amount, whichever is less, but in no event less
than one hundred dollars, which shall be returned to the assessed party
if the decision of the department is not sustained following the final
decision in the appeal. If the final decision sustains the decision of
the department, the department must apply the ((two hundred dollars))
amount of the check to the payment of the expenses of the appeal,
including costs charged by the office of administrative hearings. The
administrative law judge shall conduct hearings in these cases at
locations in the county where the infraction occurred.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.28.131 and 2011 c 301 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Until July 1, 2007, the department shall issue a written warning to
any specialty contractor, performing the scope of work defined by rule
for the pump and irrigation or domestic pump specialties, not having a
valid electrical contractor license. The warning will state that the
contractor must be qualified for and apply for a specialty electrical
contractor license under the requirements in RCW 19.28.041 within
thirty calendar days of the warning. Only one warning will be issued
to any contractor. If the contractor fails to comply with this
section, the department shall issue a penalty or penalties as
authorized in this section to the contractor. Any person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the
provisions of RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through
19.28.361 shall be assessed a penalty of not less than fifty dollars or
more than ten thousand dollars. The department shall set by rule a
schedule of penalties for violating RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and
19.28.311 through 19.28.361. The department shall notify the person,
firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the
provisions of RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through
19.28.361 of the amount of the penalty and of the specific violation
using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can
be confirmed sent to the last known address of the assessed party. Any
penalty is subject to review by an appeal to the board. The filing of
an appeal stays the effect of the penalty until the board makes its
decision. The appeal shall be filed within twenty days after notice of
the penalty is given to the assessed party using a method by which the
mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed, sent to the
last known address of the assessed party and shall be made by filing a
written notice of appeal with the department. The notice shall be
accompanied by a certified check for two hundred dollars or ten percent
of the penalty amount, whichever is less, but in no event less than one
hundred dollars, which shall be returned to the assessed party if the
decision of the department is not sustained by the board. If the board
sustains the decision of the department, the ((two hundred dollars))
amount of the check shall be applied by the department to the payment
of the per diem and expenses of the members of the board incurred in
the matter, and any balance remaining after payment of per diem and
expenses shall be paid into the electrical license fund. The hearing
and review procedures shall be conducted in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW. The board shall assign its hearings to an administrative
law judge to conduct the hearing and issue a proposed decision and
order. The board shall be allowed a minimum of twenty days to review
a proposed decision and shall issue its decision no later than the next
regularly scheduled board meeting.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.28.381 and 1996 c 241 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department may deny renewal of a certificate or license issued
under this chapter, if the applicant for renewal owes outstanding
penalties for a final judgment under this chapter. The department
shall notify the applicant of the denial by registered mail, return
receipt requested, to the address on the application. The applicant
may appeal the denial within twenty days by filing a notice of appeal
with the department accompanied by a certified check for two hundred
dollars ((which)) or ten percent of the amount of the outstanding
penalties, whichever is less, but in no event less than one hundred
dollars. The check shall be returned to the applicant if the decision
of the department is not upheld by the board. The office of
administrative hearings shall conduct the hearing under chapter 34.05
RCW. The electrical board shall review the proposed decision at the
next regularly scheduled board meeting. If the board sustains the
decision of the department, the ((two hundred dollars)) amount of the
check must be applied to the cost of the hearing.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.28.490 and 2011 c 301 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
violating any of the provisions of this chapter may be assessed a
penalty of not less than one hundred dollars or more than ten thousand
dollars per violation. The department, after consulting with the board
and receiving the board's recommendations, shall set by rule a schedule
of penalties for violating this chapter. The department shall notify
the person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating
any of these provisions of the amount of the penalty and of the
specific violation. The notice shall be sent using a method by which
the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the last
known address of the assessed party. Penalties are subject to review
by an appeal to the board. The filing of an appeal stays the effect of
the penalty until the board makes its decision. The appeal shall be
filed within twenty days after notice of the penalty is given to the
assessed party, and shall be made by filing a written notice of appeal
with the department. The notice shall be accompanied by a certified
check for two hundred dollars((, that)) or ten percent of the penalty
amount, whichever is less, but in no event less than one hundred
dollars. The check shall be returned to the assessed party if the
decision of the department is not sustained by the board. If the board
sustains the decision of the department, the ((two hundred dollars))
amount of the check shall be applied by the department to the payment
of the per diem and expenses of the members of the board incurred in
the matter, and any balance remaining after payment of per diem and
expenses shall be paid into the electrical license fund. The hearing
and review procedures shall be conducted in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW. The board shall assign its hearings to an administrative
law judge to conduct the hearing and issue a proposed decision and
order. The board shall be allowed a minimum of twenty days to review
a proposed decision and shall issue its decision no later than the next
regularly scheduled board meeting.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.87.170 and 2003 c 143 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person aggrieved by an order or action of the department
denying, suspending, revoking, or refusing to renew a permit or
license; assessing a penalty for a violation of this chapter; or
ordering the operation of a conveyance to be discontinued, may request
a hearing within fifteen days after notice of the department's order or
action is received. The date the hearing was requested shall be the
date the request for hearing was postmarked.
(2) The party requesting the hearing must accompany the request
with a certified or cashier's check for two hundred dollars payable to
the department, except that if a penalty assessment is the issue for
the hearing, the check amount shall be ten percent of the penalty
amount or two hundred dollars, whichever is less, but in no event less
than one hundred dollars. The department shall refund the ((two
hundred dollars)) amount of the check if the party requesting the
hearing prevails at the hearing; otherwise, the department shall retain
the ((two hundred dollars)) amount of the check.
(3) If the department does not receive a timely request for
hearing, the department's order or action is final and may not be
appealed.
(((2))) (4) If the aggrieved party requests a hearing, the
department shall ask an administrative law judge to preside over the
hearing. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW.

--- END ---