BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Beginning September 1, 2014, a person
who regularly and customarily performs services at a location other
than the person's own fixed business location may apply for an
independent contractor exemption certificate.
(2) To obtain an independent contractor exemption certificate, an
applicant must submit an application under oath on a form prescribed by
the department and containing the following:
(a) The applicant's name, address, and social security number;
(b) Each trade, occupation, business, or profession for which the
applicant is seeking certification;
(c) A statement that the applicant:
(i) Has been and will continue to be free from direction or control
over the performance of the applicant's own services, both under
contract and in fact; and
(ii) Is engaged in an independently established trade, occupation,
business, or profession;
(d) The following documentation that the applicant has an
independently established trade, occupation, business, or profession:
(i) An active and valid account with the department of revenue;
(ii) Any active and valid license, registration, or certificate,
including any insurance and bonding, required by the state for the
trade, occupation, business, or profession; and
(iii) Registration with the secretary of state, if required for the
particular trade, occupation, business, or profession;
(e) A statement that the applicant understands that he or she is
not eligible for benefits under this title while working under an
approved independent contractor exemption certificate unless the
applicant elects coverage; and
(f) A fee of not more than one hundred twenty-five dollars.
(3) The department must approve an independent contractor exemption
certificate if the applicant meets the requirements of this section.
(4) An approved independent contractor exemption certificate
remains active and valid for two years unless it is:
(a) Suspended or revoked under section 3 of this act; or
(b) Canceled by the holder of the certificate.
(5) A holder of an active and valid independent contractor
exemption certificate who applies for renewal of the certificate is
presumed to meet the requirements of this section. The renewal fee
must be not more than one hundred twenty-five dollars.
(6) The holder of an independent contractor exemption certificate
that has been revoked under section 3 of this act or who has been found
in violation of section 4 of this act may not reapply for a certificate
for two years from the date of revocation or finding of a violation.
(7) If the department denies an initial or renewal application for
an independent contractor exemption certificate, the applicant may
appeal the denial to the board of industrial insurance appeals under
chapter 51.52 RCW.
(8) A person who holds an independent contractor exemption
certificate may elect to be covered under this title in accordance with
RCW 51.32.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A holder of an active and valid
independent contractor exemption certificate who is working under the
certificate is conclusively presumed to be an independent contractor
and not a worker covered under this title.
(2) A person is working under an independent contractor exemption
certificate if:
(a) The person is performing work in the trade, occupation,
business, or profession listed on the certificate; and
(b) The employer and the certificate holder do not have a written
agreement described in subsection (3) of this section that the
certificate holder's status with respect to that employer is as a
worker.
(3) For a certificate holder working in the trade, occupation,
business, or profession listed on the certificate to be a worker, the
holder and the entity engaging the certificate holder must file an
agreement with the department at the time and in the form prescribed by
the department.
(4) The decision of the department, subject to appeal, is
determinative as to whether a person is working under an active and
valid independent contractor exemption certificate for the purposes of
this title and RCW 39.12.100, 49.46.010, 82.04.360, and section 10 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department may suspend an
independent contractor exemption certificate for a specific business
relationship if the department determines that the entity engaging the
certificate holder exerts or retains a right to control to a degree
that causes the certificate holder to violate section 1(2)(c)(i) of
this act.
(2) The department may revoke an independent contractor exemption
certificate if it finds that the certificate holder:
(a) Made misrepresentations in the application or renewal form;
(b) Altered or amended the application or renewal form, supporting
documentation, or the independent contractor exemption certificate;
(c) Failed to cooperate with the department in providing
information relevant to the continued validity of the holder's
certificate; or
(d) Does not have an independently established trade, occupation,
business, or profession as required under section 1(2)(c)(ii) of this
act.
(3) A decision by the department to suspend or revoke an
independent contractor exemption certificate takes effect upon issuance
of the decision, subject to appeal. A suspension or revocation of the
certificate does not invalidate the holder's ineligibility for benefits
under this title for the period prior to the notice to the holder of
the department's decision to suspend or revoke the certificate.
(4) The department's decision to suspend or revoke an independent
contractor exemption certificate may be appealed under chapter 51.52
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A person may not:
(a) Transfer to another person or allow another person to use an
independent contractor exemption certificate;
(b) Alter or falsify an independent contractor exemption
certificate; or
(c) Misrepresent the person's status as the holder of an
independent contractor exemption certificate.
(2) An employer may not:
(a) Require a person through coercion, misrepresentation, or
fraudulent means to apply for an independent contractor exemption
certificate to avoid the employer's obligations under this title; or
(b) Exert control to a degree that causes the holder of an
independent contractor exemption certificate to violate section
1(2)(c)(i) of this act.
(3) In addition to any other penalty provided under this title, a
person or employer who violates this section is subject to a fine of up
to one thousand dollars for each violation.
(4) A person or employer may appeal a fine under chapter 51.52 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 51.08.070 and 2008 c 102 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Employer" means any person, body of persons, corporate or
otherwise, and the legal representatives of a deceased employer, all
while engaged in this state in any work covered by the provisions of
this title, by way of trade or business, or who contracts with one or
more workers, the essence of which is the personal labor of such worker
or workers. Or as an exception to the definition of employer, persons
or entities are not employers when they contract or agree to remunerate
the services performed by an individual who:
(1) Meets the tests set forth in ((subsections (1) through (6) of))
RCW 51.08.195 (1) through (6) or the separate tests set forth in RCW
51.08.181 for work performed that requires registration under chapter
18.27 RCW or licensing under chapter 19.28 RCW; or
(2) Is working under an active and valid independent contractor
exemption certificate.

Sec. 6 RCW 51.08.180 and 2008 c 102 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Worker" means every person in this state who is engaged in the
employment of an employer under this title, whether by way of manual
labor or otherwise in the course of his or her employment; also every
person in this state who is engaged in the employment of or who is
working under an independent contract, the essence of which is his or
her personal labor for an employer under this title, whether by way of
manual labor or otherwise, in the course of his or her employment, or
as an exception to the definition of worker, a person is not a worker
if he or she:
(a) Meets the tests set forth in ((subsections (1) through (6) of))
RCW 51.08.195 (1) through (6) or the separate tests set forth in RCW
51.08.181 for work performed that requires registration under chapter
18.27 RCW or licensing under chapter 19.28 RCW((: PROVIDED, That)); or
(b) Is working under an active and valid independent contractor
exemption certificate.
(2) A person is not a worker for the purpose of this title, with
respect to his or her activities attendant to operating a truck which
he or she owns, and which is leased to a common or contract carrier.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 51.44 RCW
to read as follows:
The independent contractor exemption certificate account is created
in the state treasury. All receipts from fees under section 1 of this
act and fines under section 4 of this act must be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for purposes of the
independent contractor exemption certificate program.

Sec. 8 RCW 39.12.100 and 2009 c 63 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, an individual employed on a
public works project is not considered to be a laborer, worker, or
mechanic when:
(1)(a) The individual has been and is free from control or
direction over the performance of the service, both under the contract
of service and in fact;
(((2))) (b) The service is either outside the usual course of
business for the contractor or contractors for whom the individual
performs services, or the service is performed outside all of the
places of business of the enterprise for which the individual performs
services, or the individual is responsible, both under the contract and
in fact, for the costs of the principal place of business from which
the service is performed;
(((3))) (c) The individual is customarily engaged in an
independently established trade, occupation, profession, or business,
of the same nature as that involved in the contract of service, or the
individual has a principal place of business for the business the
individual is conducting that is eligible for a business deduction for
federal income tax purposes other than that furnished by the employer
for which the business has contracted to furnish services;
(((4))) (d) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is responsible for filing at the next applicable filing
period, both under the contract of service and in fact, a schedule of
expenses with the internal revenue service for the type of business the
individual is conducting;
(((5))) (e) On the effective date of the contract of service, or
within a reasonable period after the effective date of the contract of
service, the individual has an active and valid certificate of
registration with the department of revenue, and an active and valid
account with any other state agencies as required by the particular
case, for the business the individual is conducting for the payment of
all state taxes normally paid by employers and businesses and has
registered for and received a unified business identifier number from
the state of Washington;
(((6))) (f) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is maintaining a separate set of books or records that
reflect all items of income and expenses of the business which the
individual is conducting; and
(((7))) (g) On the effective date of the contract of service, if
the nature of the work performed requires registration under chapter
18.27 RCW or licensure under chapter 19.28 RCW, the individual has a
valid contractor registration pursuant to chapter 18.27 RCW or an
electrical contractor license pursuant to chapter 19.28 RCW; or
(2) The individual is working under an active and valid independent
contractor exemption certificate approved by the department of labor
and industries.

Sec. 9 RCW 49.46.010 and 2013 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Director" means the director of labor and industries;
(2) "Employ" includes to permit to work;
(3) "Employee" includes any individual employed by an employer, but
shall not include:
(a) Any individual (i) employed as a hand harvest laborer and paid
on a piece rate basis in an operation which has been, and is generally
and customarily recognized as having been, paid on a piece rate basis
in the region of employment; (ii) who commutes daily from his or her
permanent residence to the farm on which he or she is employed; and
(iii) who has been employed in agriculture less than thirteen weeks
during the preceding calendar year;
(b) Any individual employed in casual labor in or about a private
home, unless performed in the course of the employer's trade, business,
or profession;
(c) Any individual employed in a bona fide executive,
administrative, or professional capacity or in the capacity of outside
salesperson as those terms are defined and delimited by rules of the
director. However, those terms shall be defined and delimited by the
human resources director pursuant to chapter 41.06 RCW for employees
employed under the director of personnel's jurisdiction;
(d) Any individual engaged in the activities of an educational,
charitable, religious, state or local governmental body or agency, or
nonprofit organization where the employer-employee relationship does
not in fact exist or where the services are rendered to such
organizations gratuitously. If the individual receives reimbursement
in lieu of compensation for normally incurred out-of-pocket expenses or
receives a nominal amount of compensation per unit of voluntary service
rendered, an employer-employee relationship is deemed not to exist for
the purpose of this section or for purposes of membership or
qualification in any state, local government, or publicly supported
retirement system other than that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;
(e) Any individual employed full time by any state or local
governmental body or agency who provides voluntary services but only
with regard to the provision of the voluntary services. The voluntary
services and any compensation therefor shall not affect or add to
qualification, entitlement, or benefit rights under any state, local
government, or publicly supported retirement system other than that
provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;
(f) Any newspaper vendor, carrier, or delivery person selling or
distributing newspapers on the street, to offices, to businesses, or
from house to house and any freelance news correspondent or "stringer"
who, using his or her own equipment, chooses to submit material for
publication for free or a fee when such material is published;
(g) Any carrier subject to regulation by Part 1 of the Interstate
Commerce Act;
(h) Any individual engaged in forest protection and fire prevention
activities;
(i) Any individual employed by any charitable institution charged
with child care responsibilities engaged primarily in the development
of character or citizenship or promoting health or physical fitness or
providing or sponsoring recreational opportunities or facilities for
young people or members of the armed forces of the United States;
(j) Any individual whose duties require that he or she reside or
sleep at the place of his or her employment or who otherwise spends a
substantial portion of his or her work time subject to call, and not
engaged in the performance of active duties;
(k) Any resident, inmate, or patient of a state, county, or
municipal correctional, detention, treatment or rehabilitative
institution;
(l) Any individual who holds a public elective or appointive office
of the state, any county, city, town, municipal corporation or quasi
municipal corporation, political subdivision, or any instrumentality
thereof, or any employee of the state legislature;
(m) All vessel operating crews of the Washington state ferries
operated by the department of transportation;
(n) Any individual employed as a seaman on a vessel other than an
American vessel;
(o) Any individual working under an active and valid independent
contractor exemption certificate approved by the department of labor
and industries;
(4) "Employer" includes any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, business trust, or any person or group of persons acting
directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an
employee;
(5) "Occupation" means any occupation, service, trade, business,
industry, or branch or group of industries or employment or class of
employment in which employees are gainfully employed;
(6) "Retail or service establishment" means an establishment
seventy-five percent of whose annual dollar volume of sales of goods or
services, or both, is not for resale and is recognized as retail sales
or services in the particular industry;
(7) "Wage" means compensation due to an employee by reason of
employment, payable in legal tender of the United States or checks on
banks convertible into cash on demand at full face value, subject to
such deductions, charges, or allowances as may be permitted by rules of
the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Except for services subject to RCW 50.44.010, 50.44.020, 50.44.030,
or 50.50.010, and notwithstanding RCW 50.04.140 and 50.04.145,
"employment" does not include services performed by a person working
under an active and valid independent contractor exemption certificate
approved by the department of labor and industries.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.04.360 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 702 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to any person in respect to his or
her employment in the capacity of an employee or servant as
distinguished from that of an independent contractor. For the purposes
of this section, the definition of employee includes those persons that
are defined in section 3121(d)(3)(B) of the federal internal revenue
code of 1986, as amended through January 1, 1991.
(2) Until July 1, 2010, this chapter does not apply to amounts
received by an individual from a corporation as compensation for
serving as a member of that corporation's board of directors.
Beginning on July 1, 2010, such amounts are taxable under RCW
82.04.290(2).
(3) A booth renter is an independent contractor for purposes of
this chapter. For purposes of this section, "booth renter" means any
person who:
(a) Performs cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or manicuring
services for which a license is required under chapter 18.16 RCW; and
(b) Pays a fee for the use of salon or shop facilities and receives
no compensation or other consideration from the owner of the salon or
shop for the services performed.
(4) A person working under an active and valid independent
contractor exemption certificate approved by the department of labor
and industries is an independent contractor for purposes of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The department shall maintain on its web
site a searchable database of holders of independent contractor
exemption certificates and the trade, occupation, business, or
profession listed on each certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The department of labor and industries may
adopt rules to implement sections 1 through 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 4 of this act may be
known and cited as the independent contractor certification act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 4 and 12 of this act are
each added to chapter 51.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

--- END ---