BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.24.210 and 2012 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) ((or (4))) of
this section, any public or private landowners, hydroelectric project
owners, or others in lawful possession and control of any lands whether
designated resource, rural, or urban, or water areas or channels and
lands adjacent to such areas or channels, who allow members of the
public to use them for the purposes of outdoor recreation, which term
includes, but is not limited to, the cutting, gathering, and removing
of firewood by private persons for their personal use without
purchasing the firewood from the landowner, hunting, fishing, camping,
picnicking, swimming, hiking, bicycling, skateboarding or other
nonmotorized wheel-based activities, aviation activities including, but
not limited to, the operation of airplanes, ultra-light airplanes, hang
gliders, parachutes, and paragliders, rock climbing, the riding of
horses or other animals, clam digging, pleasure driving of off-road
vehicles, snowmobiles, and other vehicles, boating, kayaking, canoeing,
rafting, nature study, winter or water sports, viewing or enjoying
historical, archaeological, scenic, or scientific sites, without
charging a fee of any kind therefor, shall not be liable for
unintentional injuries to such users.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) ((or (4))) of
this section, any public or private landowner or others in lawful
possession and control of any lands whether rural or urban, or water
areas or channels and lands adjacent to such areas or channels, who
offer or allow such land to be used for purposes of a fish or wildlife
cooperative project, or allow access to such land for cleanup of litter
or other solid waste, shall not be liable for unintentional injuries to
any volunteer group or to any other users.
(3) ((Any public or private landowner, or others in lawful
possession and control of the land, may charge an administrative fee of
up to twenty-five dollars for the cutting, gathering, and removing of
firewood from the land.
(4)(a))) Nothing in this section shall prevent the liability of a
landowner or others in lawful possession and control for injuries
sustained to users by reason of a known dangerous artificial latent
condition for which warning signs have not been conspicuously posted.
(((i))) (a) A fixed anchor used in rock climbing and put in place
by someone other than a landowner is not a known dangerous artificial
latent condition and a landowner under subsection (1) of this section
shall not be liable for unintentional injuries resulting from the
condition or use of such an anchor((.
(ii)));
(b) Releasing water or flows and making waterways or channels
available for kayaking, canoeing, or rafting purposes pursuant to and
in substantial compliance with a hydroelectric license issued by the
federal energy regulatory commission, and making adjacent lands
available for purposes of allowing viewing of such activities, does not
create a known dangerous artificial latent condition and hydroelectric
project owners under subsection (1) of this section shall not be liable
for unintentional injuries to the recreational users and observers
resulting from such releases and activities.
(((b))) (4) Nothing in RCW 4.24.200 and this section limits or
expands in any way the doctrine of attractive nuisance.
(((c))) (5) Usage by members of the public, volunteer groups, or
other users is permissive and does not support any claim of adverse
possession.
(((5))) (6) Nothing in this section prevents a landowner from
excluding individuals who violate rules or conditions of access
established by the landowner.
(7) For purposes of this section, the following are not fees:
(a) A license or permit issued for statewide use under authority of
chapter 79A.05 RCW or Title 77 RCW;
(b) A pass or permit issued under RCW 79A.80.020, 79A.80.030, or
79A.80.040; ((and))
(c) A daily charge not to exceed twenty dollars per person, per
day, for access to a publicly owned ORV sports park, as defined in RCW
46.09.310, or other public facility accessed by a highway, street, or
nonhighway road for the purposes of off-road vehicle use;
(d) Payments from state or local governments to a landowner to
facilitate or manage public access;
(e) A daily charge of up to twenty-five dollars for the cutting,
gathering, and removing of firewood; and
(f) An annual charge of up to twenty-five dollars per person for
recreation, including hunting and fishing access, on contiguous parcels
owned by a single private landowner if the land is subject to current
use valuation under chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW and no limits are placed
on the number of participants granted recreational access to the
parcels.

--- END ---