BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each health benefit plan offered to public employees and their
covered dependents under this chapter that is not subject to chapter
48.43 RCW and that is issued or renewed after December 31, 2015, must
offer benefits or coverage for medically necessary elemental formula,
regardless of delivery method, when a licensed physician or other
health care provider with prescriptive authority:
(a) Diagnoses a patient with an eosinophilic gastrointestinal
associated disorder; and
(b) Orders and supervises the use of the elemental formula.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a health benefit plan from
requiring prior authorization or imposing other appropriate utilization
controls in approving coverage for medically necessary elemental
formula.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each health benefit plan issued or renewed after December 31,
2015, must offer benefits or coverage for medically necessary elemental
formula, regardless of delivery method, when a licensed physician or
other health care provider with prescriptive authority:
(a) Diagnoses a patient with an eosinophilic gastrointestinal
associated disorder; and
(b) Orders and supervises the use of the elemental formula.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a health benefit plan from
requiring prior authorization or imposing other appropriate utilization
controls in approving coverage for medically necessary elemental
formula.

--- END ---