BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the procedural requirements of subsection (3) of
this section, the board is authorized to regulate spirits retailers
licensed under RCW 66.24.630 for the purpose of reducing the theft of
spirits from the premises of such retailers. The authority of the
board to implement the regulatory measures set forth in this section
requires a finding by the board that a licensee is experiencing an
unacceptable rate of spirits theft from its premises. For the purposes
of this section, "unacceptable rate of spirits theft" means two or more
thefts of spirits from a licensee in a six-month period and that result
in a minor unlawfully using or gaining possession of spirits, or that
involves, or results in, adults unlawfully providing spirits to minors,
and where such thefts result in an incident report being generated by
a law enforcement agency.
(2) The regulatory measures that may be considered and implemented
under this section may require the imposition of one or more of the
following requirements on licensees who are experiencing an
unacceptable rate of spirits theft:
(a) Participation in one or more consultations with an authorized
representative of the board to discuss and analyze spirits theft
issues;
(b) The implementation of inventory control and/or other
recordkeeping system designed to reveal and track spirits theft;
(c) The structural modification or relocation of the areas where
spirits are displayed or stored;
(d) The installation of adequate in store security systems;
(e) The employment of a sufficient number of staff for the purpose
of monitoring display, checkout, and storage areas; and
(f) Requiring additional training for the licensee's staff.
(3) The imposition of the regulatory provisions authorized under
subsection (2) of this section are subject to the following procedural
steps and requirements:
(a) If a state or local law enforcement agency obtains information
indicating that a licensee is experiencing an unacceptable rate of
spirits theft, the law enforcement agency is granted the discretionary
authority to initiate and participate in, on a voluntary basis, the
procedures outlined in this subsection (3). Should the law enforcement
agency opt to initiate the investigative and consultation procedures
set forth in this subsection (3), the law enforcement agency must first
contact the licensee's manager and/or owner to inform him or her of
such alleged theft and arrange a meeting with the licensee's manager or
owner to discuss theft issues and possible solutions. This first
contact by the law enforcement agency with the licensee must occur
prior to the law enforcement agency informing the board of the alleged
theft issues and thus initiating the procedures set forth in (c)
through (h) of this subsection. At this early stage of the law
enforcement consultation process, the board may not be involved in the
investigation of the theft allegation until such time as the law
enforcement agency has had an opportunity to consult with the
licensee's manager or owner as provided under this subsection (3)(a).
(b) Following the initial consultation between the law enforcement
agency and the licensee as required under (a) of this subsection, the
law enforcement agency is granted the discretionary authority to forego
any further consultation with the licensee and may terminate its
investigation of the theft allegation. However, if the law enforcement
agency opts to continue the consultation process with the licensee and
proceed with its investigation, the law enforcement agency must
endeavor to work with the licensee to identify theft issues and reach
cooperative agreements regarding measures that should be taken to
eliminate spirits theft problems.
(c) If during the consultation process outlined under (a) and (b)
of this subsection the law enforcement agency determines that no
spirits theft problem exists at the premises of the licensee, or that
the licensee has taken the steps necessary to adequately address the
theft problem, then the procedural processes outlined in this section
may be terminated at the discretion of the law enforcement agency
without the involvement of the board. However, if the law enforcement
agency finds that a spirits theft problem exists at the licensee's
premises and the licensee either refuses or fails to implement remedial
measures adequate to address the theft problem, or otherwise fails to
cooperate with the law enforcement agency, then the law enforcement
agency must formally inform the board in writing regarding the
licensee's lack of cooperation in resolving its spirits theft problem.
(d) Upon the receipt of law enforcement agency notification as
required under (c) of this subsection, the board must provide written
notification to the licensee of the alleged theft problem and may
demand that the licensee participate in a consultation process
involving a representative of the board and the licensee. The
reporting law enforcement agency may be included in this consultation
process at the discretion of the board and upon the agreement of the
law enforcement agency. The licensee's participation in the
consultation process is mandatory and the licensee is entitled to at
least thirty days' notice by the board. In the event a licensee fails
to attend or otherwise cooperate in initial or subsequent
consultations, the board is authorized to suspend the licensee's
spirits retail license until such time as the retailer is in compliance
with the requirements of this subsection (3)(d).
(e) At the consultation, the board must provide the licensee with
any information or evidence pertinent to any allegation that the
retailer has an unacceptable spirits theft rate. The licensee must be
provided with a reasonable opportunity to respond and present evidence,
and, if necessary, the consultation may be continued at the discretion
of the board to allow adequate time for the licensee to prepare such
response.
(f) At the conclusion of the initial consultation process, if the
board finds that the licensee has an unacceptable spirits theft rate,
it may develop a corrective action plan outlining the remedial measures
that must be taken by the licensee pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section. In developing the plan, the board must make a concerted
effort to obtain voluntary participation in the plan by the licensee.
At every step in the consultation and corrective action plan process,
the board is encouraged to work with the licensee in a cooperative
manner and, where possible, to strive for voluntary agreements with the
licensee. However, in the absence of licensee cooperation or
agreement, the board is authorized to unilaterally develop and enforce
a corrective action plan as authorized under this section. Once the
plan is finalized, it must be filed with the board and a copy provided
to the licensee either personally or through certified mail.
(g) Not more than thirty days after the filing and service of the
original corrective action plan, the board must schedule one or more
follow up consultations with the licensee. The purpose of these
consultations is to review the licensee's performance with respect to
the requirements of the corrective action plan and to generally assess
the licensee's progress in addressing spirits theft issues. If the
licensee is following the corrective action plan but is continuing to
experience an unacceptable spirits theft rate, then the board and the
licensee may review and revise the plan as deemed necessary by the
board. Following the filing of a revised plan, the board may schedule
one or more follow-up consultations at its discretion.
(h) During the review process established in (g) of this
subsection, if the board finds that the licensee has failed to comply
with the requirements of the original or revised corrective action plan
the board may:
(i) Demand that the licensee take remedial steps so as to be
compliant with the corrective action plan and schedule an additional
follow-up consultation at the board's discretion; or
(ii) If the licensee's noncompliance is deemed to be willful,
suspend the retailer's spirits retail license for a period to be
determined by the board by rule.
(i) If a licensee remains consistently noncompliant with the
original corrective action plan and any revised plans for a period of
at least nine months, then the board is authorized to suspend or revoke
the licensee's spirits retail license.
(4) The board is granted the rule-making authority necessary to
implement and enforce the provisions of this section pertaining to the
regulation of licensees deemed to have unacceptable spirits theft
rates.
(5) If the board suspends or revokes a licensee's spirits retail
license under this section, the licensee may appeal and request a
hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.08.030 and 2012 c 2 s 204 are each amended to read
as follows:
The power of the board to make regulations under chapter 34.05 RCW
extends to:
(1) Prescribing the duties of the employees of the board, and
regulating their conduct in the discharge of their duties;
(2) Prescribing an official seal and official labels and stamps and
determining the manner in which they must be attached to every package
of liquor sold or sealed under this title, including the prescribing of
different official seals or different official labels for different
classes of liquor;
(3) Prescribing forms to be used for purposes of this title or the
regulations, and the terms and conditions to be contained in permits
and licenses issued under this title, and the qualifications for
receiving a permit or license issued under this title, including a
criminal history record information check. The board may submit the
criminal history record information check to the Washington state
patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of
investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for
prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who
filled out the forms. The board must require fingerprinting of any
applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted
to the federal bureau of investigation;
(4) Prescribing the fees payable in respect of permits and licenses
issued under this title for which no fees are prescribed in this title,
and prescribing the fees for anything done or permitted to be done
under the regulations;
(5) Prescribing the kinds and quantities of liquor which may be
kept on hand by the holder of a special permit for the purposes named
in the permit, regulating the manner in which the same is kept and
disposed of, and providing for the inspection of the same at any time
at the instance of the board;
(6) Regulating the sale of liquor kept by the holders of licenses
which entitle the holder to purchase and keep liquor for sale;
(7) Prescribing the records of purchases or sales of liquor kept by
the holders of licenses, and the reports to be made thereon to the
board, and providing for inspection of the records so kept;
(8) Prescribing the kinds and quantities of liquor for which a
prescription may be given, and the number of prescriptions which may be
given to the same patient within a stated period;
(9) Prescribing the manner of giving and serving notices required
by this title or the regulations, where not otherwise provided for in
this title;
(10) Regulating premises in which liquor is kept for export from
the state, or from which liquor is exported, prescribing the books and
records to be kept therein and the reports to be made thereon to the
board, and providing for the inspection of the premises and the books,
records and the liquor so kept;
(11) Prescribing the conditions and qualifications requisite for
the obtaining of club licenses and the books and records to be kept and
the returns to be made by clubs, prescribing the manner of licensing
clubs in any municipality or other locality, and providing for the
inspection of clubs;
(12) Prescribing the conditions, accommodations, and qualifications
requisite for the obtaining of licenses to sell beer, wines, and
spirits, and regulating the sale of beer, wines, and spirits
thereunder;
(13) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when, and the
manner, methods and means by which manufacturers must deliver liquor
within the state; and the time and periods when, and the manner,
methods and means by which liquor may lawfully be conveyed or carried
within the state;
(14) Providing for the making of returns by brewers of their sales
of beer shipped within the state, or from the state, showing the gross
amount of such sales and providing for the inspection of brewers' books
and records, and for the checking of the accuracy of any such returns;
(15) Providing for the making of returns by the wholesalers of beer
whose breweries are located beyond the boundaries of the state;
(16) Providing for the making of returns by any other liquor
manufacturers, showing the gross amount of liquor produced or
purchased, the amount sold within and exported from the state, and to
whom so sold or exported, and providing for the inspection of the
premises of any such liquor manufacturers, their books and records, and
for the checking of any such return;
(17) Providing for the giving of fidelity bonds by any or all of
the employees of the board. However, the premiums therefor must be
paid by the board;
(18) Providing for the shipment of liquor to any person holding a
permit and residing in any unit which has, by election pursuant to this
title, prohibited the sale of liquor therein;
(19) Prescribing methods of manufacture, conditions of sanitation,
standards of ingredients, quality and identity of alcoholic beverages
manufactured, sold, bottled, or handled by licensees and the board; and
conducting from time to time, in the interest of the public health and
general welfare, scientific studies and research relating to alcoholic
beverages and the use and effect thereof;
(20) Seizing, confiscating and destroying all alcoholic beverages
manufactured, sold or offered for sale within this state which do not
conform in all respects to the standards prescribed by this title or
the regulations of the board. However, nothing herein contained may be
construed as authorizing the liquor board to prescribe, alter, limit or
in any way change the present law as to the quantity or percentage of
alcohol used in the manufacturing of wine or other alcoholic beverages;
(21) Monitoring and regulating the practices of license holders as
necessary in order to prevent the theft and illegal trafficking of
liquor pursuant to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.08.050 and 2012 c 2 s 107 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board, subject to the provisions of this title and the rules,
must:
(1) Determine the nature, form and capacity of all packages to be
used for containing liquor kept for sale under this title;
(2) Execute or cause to be executed, all contracts, papers, and
documents in the name of the board, under such regulations as the board
may fix;
(3) Pay all customs, duties, excises, charges and obligations
whatsoever relating to the business of the board;
(4) Require bonds from all employees in the discretion of the
board, and to determine the amount of fidelity bond of each such
employee;
(5) Perform services for the state lottery commission to such
extent, and for such compensation, as may be mutually agreed upon
between the board and the commission;
(6) Accept and deposit into the general fund-local account and
disburse, subject to appropriation, federal grants or other funds or
donations from any source for the purpose of improving public awareness
of the health risks associated with alcohol consumption by youth and
the abuse of alcohol by adults in Washington state. The board's
alcohol awareness program must cooperate with federal and state
agencies, interested organizations, and individuals to effect an active
public beverage alcohol awareness program;
(7) Monitor and regulate the practices of licensees as necessary in
order to prevent the theft and illegal trafficking of liquor pursuant
to section 1 of this act;
(8) Perform all other matters and things, whether similar to the
foregoing or not, to carry out the provisions of this title, and has
full power to do each and every act necessary to the conduct of its
regulatory functions, including all supplies procurement, preparation
and approval of forms, and every other undertaking necessary to perform
its regulatory functions whatsoever, subject only to audit by the state
auditor. However, the board has no authority to regulate the content
of spoken language on licensed premises where wine and other liquors
are served and where there is not a clear and present danger of
disorderly conduct being provoked by such language or to restrict
advertising of lawful prices.

--- END ---