BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.80.080 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 15 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A discover pass, vehicle access pass, or day-use permit must be
visibly displayed in the front windshield, or otherwise in a prominent
location for motor vehicles without a windshield, of any motor vehicle:
(a) Operating on any recreation site or lands; or
(b) Parking at any recreation site or lands.
(2) The discover pass, the vehicle access pass, or the day-use
permit is not required:
(a) On private lands, state-owned aquatic lands other than water
access areas, or at agency offices, hatcheries, or other facilities
where public business is conducted;
(b) For persons who use, possess, or enter lands owned or managed
by the agencies for nonrecreational purposes consistent with a written
authorization from the agency, including but not limited to leases,
contracts, and easements;
(c) On department of fish and wildlife lands only, for persons
possessing a current vehicle access pass pursuant to RCW 79A.80.040; or
(d) When operating on a road managed by the department of natural
resources or the department of fish and wildlife, including a forest or
land management road, that is not blocked by a gate.
(3)(a) An agency may waive the requirements of this section for any
person who has secured the ability to access specific recreational land
through the provision of monetary consideration to the agency or for
any person attending an event or function that required the provision
of monetary compensation to the agency.
(b) Special events and group activities are core recreational
activities and major public service opportunities within state parks.
When waiving the requirements of this section for special events, the
state parks and recreation commission must consider the direct and
indirect costs and benefits to the state, local market rental rates,
the public service functions of the event sponsor, and other public
interest factors when setting appropriate fees for each event or
activity.
(4) Failure to comply with subsection (1) of this section is a
natural resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW. An agency is
authorized to issue a notice of infraction to any person who fails to
comply with subsection (1)(a) of this section or to any motor vehicle
that fails to comply with subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(5) The penalty for failure to comply with the requirements of this
section is ninety-nine dollars. This penalty must be reduced to fifty-nine dollars if an individual provides proof of purchase of a discover
pass to the court within fifteen days after the issuance of the notice
of violation.
(6) A penalty assessed under subsection (5) of this section must be
waived by the court if an individual provides proof that he or she
possessed a discover pass, vehicle access pass, or day-use permit that
was valid at the time of the infraction and the appropriate pass or
permit had been activated for the motor vehicle cited in the notice of
infraction. If the court waives the penalty assessed under subsection
(5) of this section, it may assess court administrative costs of up to
twenty-five dollars.

--- END ---