BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that educational
service districts are uniquely positioned to play an important role in
convening school districts and other partners to develop and deliver
dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement services throughout
their region. The legislature intends that these activities be
considered a basic core service for all educational service districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
In fulfillment of their mission under RCW 28A.310.340 to assist in
providing pupils with equal educational opportunities, each educational
service district must, as a basic core service:
(1) Coordinate and convene school, family, and community
partnerships to develop and implement comprehensive K-12 dropout
prevention, intervention, and reengagement systems as defined under RCW
28A.175.074;
(2) Facilitate and assist local partnerships in using dropout
prevention, intervention, and reengagement system assessment tools; and
(3) Develop dropout reengagement programs to be offered under
contract with school districts as provided under RCW 28A.175.100
through 28A.175.110.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.310.350 and 2007 c 402 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The basic core services and cost upon which educational service
districts are budgeted shall include, but not be limited to, the
following:
(1) Educational service district administration and facilities such
as office space, maintenance, and utilities;
(2) Cooperative administrative services such as assistance in
carrying out procedures to abolish sex and race bias in school
programs, fiscal services, grants management services, special
education services, and transportation services;
(3) Personnel services such as certification/registration services;
(4) Learning resource services such as audiovisual aids;
(5) Cooperative curriculum services such as health promotion and
health education services, in-service training, workshops, and
assessment;
(6) Professional development services identified by statute or the
omnibus appropriations act; ((and))
(7) Special needs of local education agencies; and
(8) Dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement services
under section 2 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.230.125 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 130 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the four-year institutions as defined in RCW 28B.76.020, the state
board for community and technical colleges, and the workforce training
and education coordinating board, shall develop for use by all public
school districts and educational service districts under section 5 of
this act a standardized high school transcript. The superintendent
shall establish clear definitions for the terms "credits" and "hours"
so that school programs operating on the quarter, semester, or
trimester system can be compared.
(2) The standardized high school transcript shall include a
notation of whether the student has earned a certificate of individual
achievement or a certificate of academic achievement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.310
RCW to read as follows:
An educational service district that offers a dropout reengagement
program under contract with one or more school districts as provided
under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.110 may, with the agreement of
the contracting district, award high school credit to students residing
in that district who successfully complete courses eligible for credit
under the program, based on the standards for award of credit adopted
by the state board of education, to be recorded using the standardized
high school transcript under RCW 28A.230.125.

--- END ---