BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.74 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations of this section, a physical
therapist may perform spinal manipulation only after being issued a
spinal manipulation endorsement by the secretary. The secretary, upon
approval by the board, shall issue an endorsement to a physical
therapist who has at least one year of full-time, orthopedic,
postgraduate practice experience that consists of direct patient care
and averages at least thirty-six hours a week and who provides evidence
in a manner acceptable to the board of all of the following additional
requirements:
(a) Training in differential diagnosis of no less than one hundred
hours outlined within a course curriculum;
(b) Didactic and practical training related to the delivery of
spinal manipulative procedures of no less than two hundred fifty hours
clearly delineated and outlined in a course curriculum;
(c) Specific training in spinal diagnostic imaging of no less than
one hundred fifty hours outlined in a course curriculum; and
(d) At least three hundred hours of supervised clinical practical
experience in spinal manipulative procedures. The supervised clinical
practical experience must:
(i) Be supervised by a clinical supervisor who:
(A) Holds a spinal manipulation endorsement under this section;
(B) Is a licensed chiropractor or osteopathic physician and
surgeon; or
(C) Holds an endorsement or advanced certification the training
requirements for which are commensurate with the training requirements
in this section;
(ii) Be under the close supervision of the clinical supervisor for
a minimum of the first one hundred fifty hours of the supervised
clinical practical experience, after which the supervised clinical
practical experience must be under the direct supervision of the
clinical supervisor;
(iii) Be completed within eighteen months of completing the
educational requirements in (a) through (c) of this subsection, unless
the physical therapist has completed the educational requirements in
(a) through (c) of this subsection prior to the effective date of this
section, in which case the supervised clinical practical experience
must be completed by January 1, 2017.
(2) A physical therapist holding a spinal manipulation endorsement
under subsection (1) of this section shall consult with a health care
practitioner, other than a physical therapist, authorized to perform
spinal manipulation if spinal manipulative procedures are required
beyond six treatments.
(3) A physical therapist holding a spinal manipulation endorsement
under subsection (1) of this section may not:
(a) Have a practice in which spinal manipulation constitutes the
majority of the services provided;
(b) Practice or utilize chiropractic manipulative therapy in any
form;
(c) Delegate spinal manipulation; or
(d) Bill a health carrier for spinal manipulation separately from,
or in addition to, other physical therapy procedures.
(4) A physical therapist holding a spinal manipulation endorsement
under this section shall complete at least ten hours of continuing
education per continuing competency reporting period directly related
to spinal manipulation. At least five hours of the training required
under this subsection must be related to procedural technique and
application of spinal manipulation.
(5) If a physical therapist is intending to perform spinal
manipulation on a patient who the physical therapist knows is being
treated by a chiropractor for the same diagnosis, the physical
therapist shall make reasonable efforts to coordinate patient care with
the chiropractor to prevent conflict or duplication of services.
(6) By November 15, 2019, the board shall report to the legislature
any disciplinary actions taken against physical therapists whose
performance of spinal manipulation and manipulative mobilization of the
spine and its immediate articulations resulted in physical harm to a
patient. Prior to finalizing the report required under this
subsection, the board shall consult with the chiropractic quality
assurance commission.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.74.--- and 2014 c ... s 1 (section 1 of this act)
are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations of this section, a physical
therapist may perform spinal manipulation only after being issued a
spinal manipulation endorsement by the secretary. The secretary, upon
approval by the board, shall issue an endorsement to a physical
therapist who has at least one year of full-time, orthopedic,
postgraduate practice experience that consists of direct patient care
and averages at least thirty-six hours a week and who provides evidence
in a manner acceptable to the board of all of the following additional
requirements:
(a) Training in differential diagnosis of no less than one hundred
hours outlined within a course curriculum;
(b) Didactic and practical training related to the delivery of
spinal manipulative procedures of no less than two hundred fifty hours
clearly delineated and outlined in a course curriculum;
(c) Specific training in spinal diagnostic imaging of no less than
one hundred fifty hours outlined in a course curriculum; and
(d) At least three hundred hours of supervised clinical practical
experience in spinal manipulative procedures. The supervised clinical
practical experience must:
(i) Be supervised by a clinical supervisor who:
(A) Holds a spinal manipulation endorsement under this section; or
(B) Is a licensed chiropractor or osteopathic physician and
surgeon((; or
(C) Holds an endorsement or advanced certification the training
requirements for which are commensurate with the training requirements
in this section));
(ii) Be under the close supervision of the clinical supervisor for
a minimum of the first one hundred fifty hours of the supervised
clinical practical experience, after which the supervised clinical
practical experience must be under the direct supervision of the
clinical supervisor;
(iii) Be completed within eighteen months of completing the
educational requirements in (a) through (c) of this subsection, unless
the physical therapist has completed the educational requirements in
(a) through (c) of this subsection prior to the effective date of this
section, in which case the supervised clinical practical experience
must be completed by January 1, 2017.
(2) A physical therapist holding a spinal manipulation endorsement
under subsection (1) of this section shall consult with a health care
practitioner, other than a physical therapist, authorized to perform
spinal manipulation if spinal manipulative procedures are required
beyond six treatments.
(3) A physical therapist holding a spinal manipulation endorsement
under subsection (1) of this section may not:
(a) Have a practice in which spinal manipulation constitutes the
majority of the services provided;
(b) Practice or utilize chiropractic manipulative therapy in any
form;
(c) Delegate spinal manipulation; or
(d) Bill a health carrier for spinal manipulation separately from,
or in addition to, other physical therapy procedures.
(4) A physical therapist holding a spinal manipulation endorsement
under this section shall complete at least ten hours of continuing
education per continuing competency reporting period directly related
to spinal manipulation. At least five hours of the training required
under this subsection must be related to procedural technique and
application of spinal manipulation.
(5) If a physical therapist is intending to perform spinal
manipulation on a patient who the physical therapist knows is being
treated by a chiropractor for the same diagnosis, the physical
therapist shall make reasonable efforts to coordinate patient care with
the chiropractor to prevent conflict or duplication of services.
(6) By November 15, 2019, the board shall report to the legislature
any disciplinary actions taken against physical therapists whose
performance of spinal manipulation and manipulative mobilization of the
spine and its immediate articulations resulted in physical harm to a
patient. Prior to finalizing the report required under this
subsection, the board shall consult with the chiropractic quality
assurance commission.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.74.010 and 2007 c 98 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the board of physical therapy created by RCW
18.74.020.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Physical therapy" means the care and services provided by or
under the direction and supervision of a physical therapist licensed by
the state. Except as provided in section 1 of this act, the use of
Roentgen rays and radium for diagnostic and therapeutic purposes, the
use of electricity for surgical purposes, including cauterization, and
the use of spinal manipulation, or manipulative mobilization of the
spine and its immediate articulations, are not included under the term
"physical therapy" as used in this chapter.
(4) "Physical therapist" means a person who meets all the
requirements of this chapter and is licensed in this state to practice
physical therapy.
(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(6) Words importing the masculine gender may be applied to females.
(7) "Authorized health care practitioner" means and includes
licensed physicians, osteopathic physicians, chiropractors,
naturopaths, podiatric physicians and surgeons, dentists, and advanced
registered nurse practitioners: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing herein
shall be construed as altering the scope of practice of such
practitioners as defined in their respective licensure laws.
(8) "Practice of physical therapy" is based on movement science and
means:
(a) Examining, evaluating, and testing individuals with mechanical,
physiological, and developmental impairments, functional limitations in
movement, and disability or other health and movement-related
conditions in order to determine a diagnosis, prognosis, plan of
therapeutic intervention, and to assess and document the ongoing
effects of intervention;
(b) Alleviating impairments and functional limitations in movement
by designing, implementing, and modifying therapeutic interventions
that include therapeutic exercise; functional training related to
balance, posture, and movement to facilitate self-care and
reintegration into home, community, or work; manual therapy including
soft tissue and joint mobilization and manipulation; therapeutic
massage; assistive, adaptive, protective, and devices related to
postural control and mobility except as restricted by (c) of this
subsection; airway clearance techniques; physical agents or modalities;
mechanical and electrotherapeutic modalities; and patient-related
instruction;
(c) Training for, and the evaluation of, the function of a patient
wearing an orthosis or prosthesis as defined in RCW 18.200.010.
Physical therapists may provide those direct-formed and prefabricated
upper limb, knee, and ankle-foot orthoses, but not fracture orthoses
except those for hand, wrist, ankle, and foot fractures, and assistive
technology devices specified in RCW 18.200.010 as exemptions from the
defined scope of licensed orthotic and prosthetic services. It is the
intent of the legislature that the unregulated devices specified in RCW
18.200.010 are in the public domain to the extent that they may be
provided in common with individuals or other health providers, whether
unregulated or regulated under Title 18 RCW, without regard to any
scope of practice;
(d) Performing wound care services that are limited to sharp
debridement, debridement with other agents, dry dressings, wet
dressings, topical agents including enzymes, hydrotherapy, electrical
stimulation, ultrasound, and other similar treatments. Physical
therapists may not delegate sharp debridement. A physical therapist
may perform wound care services only by referral from or after
consultation with an authorized health care practitioner;
(e) Reducing the risk of injury, impairment, functional limitation,
and disability related to movement, including the promotion and
maintenance of fitness, health, and quality of life in all age
populations; and
(f) Engaging in administration, consultation, education, and
research.
(9)(a) "Physical therapist assistant" means a person who meets all
the requirements of this chapter and is licensed as a physical
therapist assistant and who performs physical therapy procedures and
related tasks that have been selected and delegated only by the
supervising physical therapist. However, a physical therapist may not
delegate sharp debridement to a physical therapist assistant.
(b) "Physical therapy aide" means a person who is involved in
direct physical therapy patient care who does not meet the definition
of a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant and receives
ongoing on-the-job training.
(c) "Other assistive personnel" means other trained or educated
health care personnel, not defined in (a) or (b) of this subsection,
who perform specific designated tasks related to physical therapy under
the supervision of a physical therapist, including but not limited to
licensed massage practitioners, athletic trainers, and exercise
physiologists. At the direction of the supervising physical therapist,
and if properly credentialed and not prohibited by any other law, other
assistive personnel may be identified by the title specific to their
training or education.
(10) "Direct supervision" means the ((supervising physical
therapist)) supervisor must (a) be continuously on-site and present in
the department or facility where ((assistive personnel or holders of
interim permits are)) the person being supervised is performing
services; (b) be immediately available to assist the person being
supervised in the services being performed; and (c) maintain continued
involvement in appropriate aspects of each treatment session in which
a component of treatment is delegated to assistive personnel or is
required to be directly supervised under section 1 of this act.
(11) "Indirect supervision" means the supervisor is not on the
premises, but has given either written or oral instructions for
treatment of the patient and the patient has been examined by the
physical therapist at such time as acceptable health care practice
requires and consistent with the particular delegated health care task.
(12) "Sharp debridement" means the removal of devitalized tissue
from a wound with scissors, scalpel, and tweezers without anesthesia.
"Sharp debridement" does not mean surgical debridement. A physical
therapist may perform sharp debridement, to include the use of a
scalpel, only upon showing evidence of adequate education and training
as established by rule. Until the rules are established, but no later
than July 1, 2006, physical therapists licensed under this chapter who
perform sharp debridement as of July 24, 2005, shall submit to the
secretary an affidavit that includes evidence of adequate education and
training in sharp debridement, including the use of a scalpel.
(13) "Spinal manipulation" includes spinal manipulation, spinal
manipulative therapy, high velocity thrust maneuvers, and grade five
mobilization of the spine and its immediate articulations.
(14) "Close supervision" means that the supervisor has personally
diagnosed the condition to be treated and has personally authorized the
procedures to be performed. The supervisor is continuously on-site and
physically present in the operatory while the procedures are performed
and capable of responding immediately in the event of an emergency.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.74.035 and 2007 c 98 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All qualified applicants for a license as a physical therapist
shall be examined by the board at such time and place as the board may
determine. The board may approve an examination prepared or
administered by a private testing agency or association of licensing
authorities. The examination shall embrace the following subjects:
The applied sciences of anatomy, neuroanatomy, kinesiology, physiology,
pathology, psychology, physics; physical therapy, as defined in this
chapter, applied to medicine, neurology, orthopedics, pediatrics,
psychiatry, surgery; medical ethics; technical procedures in the
practice of physical therapy as defined in this chapter; and such other
subjects as the board may deem useful to test the applicant's fitness
to practice physical therapy((, but not including the adjustment or
manipulation of the spine or use of a thrusting force as
mobilization)). Examinations shall be held within the state at least
once a year, at such time and place as the board shall determine. An
applicant who fails an examination may apply for reexamination upon
payment of a reexamination fee determined by the secretary.
(2) All qualified applicants for a license as a physical therapist
assistant must be examined by the board at such a time and place as the
board may determine. The board may approve an examination prepared or
administered by a private testing agency or association of licensing
authorities.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.74.085 and 1988 c 185 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Physical therapists shall not advertise that they perform
spinal manipulation ((or)), manipulative mobilization of the spine,
chiropractic adjustment, spinal adjustment, maintenance or wellness
manipulation, or chiropractic care of any kind.
(2) A violation of this section is unprofessional conduct under
this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Except for section 2 of this act, this act
takes effect July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2020.

--- END ---