BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
Cities may impose mitigation fees for traffic impacts under this
chapter for proposals located outside of their jurisdictional
boundaries only if the city imposing the fee or fees has an agreement
under chapter 39.34 RCW with the county or city within which the
proposal is located governing the fee imposition.

--- END ---