BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.300.010 and 2009 c 412 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter and
RCW 5.40.050 and 70.54.340 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Body art" means the practice of invasive cosmetic adornment
including the use of branding and scarification. "Body art" also
includes the intentional production of scars upon the body. "Body art"
does not include any health-related procedures performed by licensed
health care practitioners under their scope of practice.
(2) "Body piercing" means the process of penetrating the skin or
mucous membrane to insert an object, including jewelry, for cosmetic
purposes. "Body piercing" also includes any scar tissue resulting from
or relating to the piercing. "Body piercing" does not include the use
of stud and clasp piercing systems to pierce the earlobe in accordance
with the manufacturer's directions and applicable United States food
and drug administration requirements. "Body piercing" does not include
any health-related procedures performed by licensed health care
practitioners under their scope of practice, nor does anything in
((chapter 412, Laws of 2009)) this chapter authorize a person
registered to engage in the business of body piercing to implant or
embed foreign objects into the human body or otherwise engage in the
practice of medicine.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing or
his or her designee.
(4) "Individual license" means a body art, body piercing, ((or))
tattoo, or permanent cosmetics practitioner license issued under this
chapter.
(5) "Internship training program" means a training program provided
by an individual licensed in good standing under this chapter who has
seven consecutive years of documented experience in the profession of
body art, body piercing, tattooing, or permanent cosmetics.
(6) "Location license" means a license issued under this chapter
for a shop or business.
(((6))) (7) "Permanent cosmetics" means a cosmetic technique that
includes tattoos as a means of producing designs that resemble makeup,
such as eyelining and other permanent enhancing colors to the skin of
the face, lips, eyelids, and eyebrows. It is also used to restore or
enhance the skin of the body after surgery.
(8) "Shop or business" means a body art, body piercing, ((or))
tattooing, or permanent cosmetics shop or business.
(((7))) (9) "Tattoo artist" means a person who pierces or punctures
the human skin with a needle or other instrument for the purpose of
implanting an indelible mark, or pigment, into the skin for a fee.
(((8))) (10) "Tattooing" means to pierce or puncture the human skin
with a needle or other instrument for the purpose of implanting an
indelible mark, or pigment, into the skin.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.300.020 and 2009 c 412 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other duties imposed by law, including RCW
18.235.030 and 18.235.040, the director has the following powers and
duties:
(1) To set all license, examination, and renewal fees in accordance
with RCW 43.24.086;
(2) To adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter;
(3) To prepare and administer or approve the preparation and
administration of licensing;
(4) To establish minimum safety and sanitation standards for
practitioners of body art, body piercing, ((or)) tattooing, or
permanent cosmetics as determined by the department of health;
(5) To maintain the official department record of applicants and
licensees;
(6) To set license expiration dates and renewal periods for all
licenses consistent with this chapter;
(7) To ensure that all informational notices produced and mailed by
the department regarding statutory and regulatory changes affecting any
particular class of licensees are mailed to each licensee in good
standing in the affected class whose mailing address on record with the
department has not resulted in mail being returned as undeliverable for
any reason; ((and))
(8) To make information available to the department of revenue to
assist in collecting taxes from persons and businesses required to be
licensed under this chapter; and
(9) To establish advisory committees and ad hoc advisory committees
to advise the director on testing procedures, professional standards,
disciplinary activities, or any other matters deemed necessary.
Advisory committee or ad hoc advisory committee members must include
representatives of the professional tattoo industry, permanent
cosmetics industry, and body piercing industry. Advisory committee or
ad hoc advisory committee members may receive reimbursement for travel
expenses while engaged in official business as provided by RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.300.030 and 2009 c 412 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to engage in a practice listed in
subsection (2) of this section unless the person has a license in good
standing as required by this chapter. A license issued under this
chapter is considered to be "in good standing" except when:
(a) The license has expired ((or has been canceled)) and has not
been renewed in accordance with RCW 18.300.050;
(b) The license has been denied, revoked, or suspended under RCW
18.300.110 or 18.300.130, and has not been reinstated; or
(c) The license is held by a person who has not fully complied with
an order of the director issued under RCW 18.300.110 requiring the
licensee to pay restitution or a fine, or to acquire additional
training.
(2) The director may take action under RCW 18.235.150 and
18.235.160 against any person who does any of the following without
first obtaining, and maintaining in good standing, the license required
by this chapter:
(a) Engages in the practice of body art, body piercing, ((or))
tattooing, or permanent cosmetics; or
(b) Operates a shop or business.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.300.050 and 2009 c 412 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall issue the appropriate license to any
applicant who meets the requirements as outlined in this chapter. The
director has the authority to set appropriate licensing fees for body
art, body piercing, ((and)) tattooing, and permanent cosmetics shops
and businesses and body art, body piercing, ((and)) tattooing, and
permanent cosmetics individual practitioners. Licensing fees for
individual practitioners must be set in an amount less than licensing
fees for shops and businesses.
(2) Failure to renew a license by its expiration date subjects the
holder to a penalty fee and payment of each year's renewal fee, at the
current rate.
(3) ((A person whose license has not been renewed within one year
after its expiration date must have his or her license canceled and
must be required to submit an application, pay the license fee, meet
current licensing requirements, and pass any applicable examination or
examinations, in addition to the other requirements of this chapter,
before the license may be reinstated.
(4))) An applicant for an individual license must meet the
following requirements:
(a) Be at least eighteen years of age;
(b) Provide proof of:
(i) Completion of an internship training program. The internship
training program must consist of training in the profession of body
art, body piercing, tattooing, or permanent cosmetics that is completed
in accordance with rules adopted by the director; or
(ii) One year documented experience, providing body art, body
piercing, tattooing services, or permanent cosmetics in another state,
territory, or possession of the United States, or foreign country
within the last three years;
(c) Hold a current certification of blood-borne pathogen training;
(d) Pay the appropriate license fee; and
(e) Pass an examination approved or administered by the director.
(4) The director may issue a guest artist license to a nonresident
of Washington state who intends to engage in the practice of body art,
body piercing, tattooing, or permanent cosmetics in this state. Guest
artists must meet the requirements of subsection (3) of this section or
provide proof of licensure in any state, territory, or possession of
the United States, or foreign country. A license in any jurisdiction
other than this state must be current and in good standing. Guest
artists must practice in accordance with rules adopted by the director
and are subject to this chapter. Guest artist licenses may be issued
for a period of up to thirty days. The director may adopt rules
relating to renewal or reissuance of guest artist licenses.
(5) Nothing in this section authorizes a person whose license has
expired to engage in a practice prohibited under RCW 18.300.030 until
the license is renewed or reinstated.
(((5))) (6) Upon request and payment of an additional fee to be
established by rule by the director, the director shall issue a
duplicate license to an applicant.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.300.060 and 2009 c 412 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, licenses issued
under this chapter expire as follows:
(a) A body art, body piercing, ((or)) tattooing, or permanent
cosmetics shop or business location license expires one year from
issuance or when the insurance required by RCW 18.300.070(1)(g)
expires, whichever occurs first; and
(b) Body art, body piercing, ((or)) tattooing, or permanent
cosmetics practitioner individual licenses expire one year from
issuance.
(2) The director may provide for expiration dates other than those
set forth in subsection (1) of this section for the purpose of
establishing staggered renewal periods.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.300.070 and 2009 c 412 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A body art, body piercing, ((or)) tattooing, or permanent
cosmetics shop or business shall meet the following minimum
requirements:
(a) Maintain an outside entrance separate from any rooms used for
sleeping or residential purposes;
(b) Provide and maintain for the use of its customers adequate
toilet facilities located within or adjacent to the shop or business;
(c) Any room used wholly or in part as a shop or business may not
be used for residential purposes, except that toilet facilities may be
used for both residential and business purposes;
(d) Meet the zoning requirements of the county, city, or town, as
appropriate;
(e) Provide for safe storage and labeling of equipment and
substances used in the practices under this chapter;
(f) Meet all applicable local and state fire codes; and
(g) Certify that the shop or business is covered by a public
liability insurance policy in an amount not less than one hundred
thousand dollars for combined bodily injury and property damage
liability.
(2) The director may by rule determine other requirements that are
necessary for safety and sanitation of shops or businesses. The
director may consult with the state board of health and the department
of labor and industries in establishing minimum shop and business
safety requirements.
(3) Upon receipt of a written complaint that a shop or business has
violated any provisions of this chapter, chapter 18.235 RCW, or the
rules adopted under either chapter, or at least once every two years
for an existing shop or business, the director or the director's
designee shall inspect each shop or business. If the director
determines that any shop or business is not in compliance with this
chapter, the director shall send written notice to the shop or
business. A shop or business which fails to correct the conditions to
the satisfaction of the director within a reasonable time is, upon due
notice, subject to the penalties imposed by the director under RCW
18.235.110. The director may enter any shop or business during
business hours for the purpose of inspection. The director may
contract with health authorities of local governments to conduct the
inspections under this subsection.
(4) A shop or business shall obtain a certificate of registration
from the department of revenue.
(5) Shop or business location licenses issued by the ((department))
director must be posted in the shop or business's reception area.
(6) Body art, body piercing, ((and)) tattooing, and permanent
cosmetics practitioner individual licenses issued by the department
must be posted at the licensed person's work station.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.300.090 and 2009 c 412 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is a violation of this chapter for any person to engage in the
commercial practice of body art, body piercing, ((or)) tattooing, or
permanent cosmetics except in a licensed shop or business with the
appropriate individual body art, body piercing, ((or)) tattooing, or
permanent cosmetics license.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.300.130 and 2009 c 412 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((department)) director shall immediately suspend the license
of a person who has been certified under RCW ((74.20A.320)) 74.20A.324
by the department of social and health services as a person who is not
in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to
meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension,
reissuance of the license is automatic upon the ((department's))
director's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and
health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the
order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 18.300 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Examination for initial licensure under this chapter shall be
conducted at such times and places as the director determines
appropriate. Examinations must consist of tests designed to reasonably
measure the applicant's knowledge of safe and sanitary practices.
Examinations may also include the applicant's knowledge of this chapter
and rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.
(2) The director shall establish the minimum passing score for all
examinations and requirements. The director may allow an independent
provider to conduct the examinations at the expense of the applicants.
(3) The director must take steps to ensure that after completion of
the required course or internship training program, applicants may
promptly take the examination and receive the results of the
examination.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.300.080 and 2009 c 412 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director shall prepare and provide to all licensed shops or
businesses a notice to consumers. At a minimum, the notice must state
that body art, body piercing, ((and)) tattooing, and permanent
cosmetics shops or businesses are required to be licensed, that shops
or businesses are required to maintain minimum safety and sanitation
standards, that customer complaints regarding shops or businesses may
be reported to the ((department)) director, and a telephone number and
address where complaints may be made.
(2) An approved internship training program shop must post a notice
to consumers in the reception area of the shop stating that services
may be provided by an intern. At a minimum, the notice must state:
"This shop is a participant in a state-approved internship training
program. Interns in this program are in training and have not yet
received a license."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 18.300
RCW to read as follows:
The director shall suspend the license of any person who has been
certified by a lending agency and reported to the director for
nonpayment or default on a federally or state-guaranteed educational
loan or service-conditional scholarship. Prior to the suspension, the
director must provide the person an opportunity for a brief
adjudicative proceeding under RCW 34.05.485 through 34.05.494 and issue
a finding of nonpayment or default on a federally or state-guaranteed
educational loan or service-conditional scholarship. The person's
license may not be reissued until the person provides the director a
written release issued by the lending agency stating that the person is
making payments on the loan in accordance with a repayment agreement
approved by the lending agency. If the person has continued to meet
all other requirements for licensure during the suspension,
reinstatement is automatic upon receipt of the notice and payment of
any reinstatement fee the director may impose.

Sec. 12 RCW 28C.10.030 and 2012 c 229 s 576 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to:
(1) Bona fide trade, business, professional, or fraternal
organizations sponsoring educational programs primarily for that
organization's membership or offered by that organization on a no-fee
basis;
(2) Entities offering education that is exclusively avocational or
recreational;
(3) Education not requiring payment of money or other consideration
if this education is not advertised or promoted as leading toward
educational credentials;
(4) Entities that are established, operated, and governed by this
state or its political subdivisions under this title or Title 28A((,))
or 28B((, or 28C)) RCW;
(5) Degree-granting programs in compliance with the rules of the
student achievement council;
(6) Any other entity to the extent that it has been exempted from
some or all of the provisions of this chapter under RCW 28C.10.100;
(7) Entities not otherwise exempt that are of a religious
character, but only as to those educational programs exclusively
devoted to religious or theological objectives and represented
accurately in institutional catalogs or other official publications;
(8) Entities offering only courses certified by the federal
aviation administration;
(9) Barber and cosmetology schools licensed under chapter 18.16
RCW;
(10) Internship training programs approved by the director of the
department of licensing for professions licensed under chapter 18.300
RCW;
(11) Entities which only offer courses approved to meet the
continuing education requirements for licensure under chapter 18.04,
18.79, or 48.17 RCW; and
(((11))) (12) Entities not otherwise exempt offering only workshops
or seminars lasting no longer than three calendar days.

--- END ---