BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.40.193 and 2003 c 53 s 100 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a respondent is found to have been in possession of a
firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(iii), the court shall impose
a minimum disposition of ten days of confinement. If the offender's
standard range of disposition for the offense as indicated in RCW
13.40.0357 is more than thirty days of confinement, the court shall
commit the offender to the department for the standard range
disposition. The offender shall not be released until the offender has
served a minimum of ten days in confinement.
(2)(a) If a respondent is found to have been in possession of a
firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.040, the disposition must include a
requirement that the respondent participate in a qualifying program as
described in (b) of this subsection, when available, unless the court
makes a written finding based on the outcome of the juvenile court risk
assessment that participation in a qualifying program would not be
appropriate. The finding must be based on factors other than the
respondent's overall risk level classification.
(b) For purposes of this section, "qualifying program" means an
aggression replacement training program, a functional family therapy
program, or another program applicable to the juvenile firearm offender
population that has been identified as evidence-based or research-based
and cost-beneficial in the current list prepared at the direction of
the legislature by the Washington state institute for public policy.
(3) If the court finds that the respondent or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm, the court shall determine the standard range
disposition for the offense pursuant to RCW 13.40.160. If the offender
or an accomplice was armed with a firearm when the offender committed
any felony other than possession of a machine gun, possession of a
stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful
possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, or use of a
machine gun in a felony, the following periods of total confinement
must be added to the sentence: For a class A felony, six months; for
a class B felony, four months; and for a class C felony, two months.
The additional time shall be imposed regardless of the offense's
juvenile disposition offense category as designated in RCW 13.40.0357.
(((3))) (4) When a disposition under this section would effectuate
a manifest injustice, the court may impose another disposition. When
a judge finds a manifest injustice and imposes a disposition of
confinement exceeding thirty days, the court shall commit the juvenile
to a maximum term, and the provisions of RCW 13.40.030(2) shall be used
to determine the range. When a judge finds a manifest injustice and
imposes a disposition of confinement less than thirty days, the
disposition shall be comprised of confinement or community supervision
or both.
(((4))) (5) Any term of confinement ordered pursuant to this
section shall run consecutively to any term of confinement imposed in
the same disposition for other offenses.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.40.127 and 2013 c 179 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A juvenile is eligible for deferred disposition unless he or
she:
(a) Is charged with a sex or violent offense;
(b) Has a criminal history which includes any felony;
(c) Has a prior deferred disposition or deferred adjudication; or
(d) Has two or more adjudications.
(2) The juvenile court may, upon motion at least fourteen days
before commencement of trial and, after consulting the juvenile's
custodial parent or parents or guardian and with the consent of the
juvenile, continue the case for disposition for a period not to exceed
one year from the date the juvenile is found guilty. The court shall
consider whether the offender and the community will benefit from a
deferred disposition before deferring the disposition. The court may
waive the fourteen-day period anytime before the commencement of trial
for good cause.
(3) Any juvenile who agrees to a deferral of disposition shall:
(a) Stipulate to the admissibility of the facts contained in the
written police report;
(b) Acknowledge that the report will be entered and used to support
a finding of guilt and to impose a disposition if the juvenile fails to
comply with terms of supervision;
(c) Waive the following rights to: (i) A speedy disposition; and
(ii) call and confront witnesses; and
(d) Acknowledge the direct consequences of being found guilty and
the direct consequences that will happen if an order of disposition is
entered.
The adjudicatory hearing shall be limited to a reading of the
court's record.
(4) Following the stipulation, acknowledgment, waiver, and entry of
a finding or plea of guilt, the court shall defer entry of an order of
disposition of the juvenile.
(5) Any juvenile granted a deferral of disposition under this
section shall be placed under community supervision. The court may
impose any conditions of supervision that it deems appropriate
including posting a probation bond. Payment of restitution under RCW
13.40.190 shall be a condition of community supervision under this
section.
The court may require a juvenile offender convicted of animal
cruelty in the first degree to submit to a mental health evaluation to
determine if the offender would benefit from treatment and such
intervention would promote the safety of the community. After
consideration of the results of the evaluation, as a condition of
community supervision, the court may order the offender to attend
treatment to address issues pertinent to the offense.
The court may require the juvenile to undergo a mental health or
substance abuse assessment, or both. If the assessment identifies a
need for treatment, conditions of supervision may include treatment for
the assessed need that has been demonstrated to improve behavioral
health and reduce recidivism.
The court shall require a juvenile granted a deferral of
disposition for unlawful possession of a firearm in violation of RCW
9.41.040 to participate in a qualifying program as described in RCW
13.40.193(2)(b), when available, unless the court makes a written
finding based on the outcome of the juvenile court risk assessment that
participation in a qualifying program would not be appropriate. The
finding must be based on factors other than the juvenile's overall risk
level classification.
(6) A parent who signed for a probation bond has the right to
notify the counselor if the juvenile fails to comply with the bond or
conditions of supervision. The counselor shall notify the court and
surety of any failure to comply. A surety shall notify the court of
the juvenile's failure to comply with the probation bond. The state
shall bear the burden to prove, by a preponderance of the evidence,
that the juvenile has failed to comply with the terms of community
supervision.
(7)(a) Anytime prior to the conclusion of the period of
supervision, the prosecutor or the juvenile's juvenile court community
supervision counselor may file a motion with the court requesting the
court revoke the deferred disposition based on the juvenile's lack of
compliance or treat the juvenile's lack of compliance as a violation
pursuant to RCW 13.40.200.
(b) If the court finds the juvenile failed to comply with the terms
of the deferred disposition, the court may:
(i) Revoke the deferred disposition and enter an order of
disposition; or
(ii) Impose sanctions for the violation pursuant to RCW 13.40.200.
(8) At any time following deferral of disposition the court may,
following a hearing, continue supervision for an additional one-year
period for good cause.
(9)(a) At the conclusion of the period of supervision, the court
shall determine whether the juvenile is entitled to dismissal of the
deferred disposition only when the court finds:
(i) The deferred disposition has not been previously revoked;
(ii) The juvenile has completed the terms of supervision;
(iii) There are no pending motions concerning lack of compliance
pursuant to subsection (7) of this section; and
(iv) The juvenile has either paid the full amount of restitution,
or, made a good faith effort to pay the full amount of restitution
during the period of supervision.
(b) If the court finds the juvenile is entitled to dismissal of the
deferred disposition pursuant to (a) of this subsection, the juvenile's
conviction shall be vacated and the court shall dismiss the case with
prejudice, except that a conviction under RCW 16.52.205 shall not be
vacated. Whenever a case is dismissed with restitution still owing,
the court shall enter a restitution order pursuant to RCW 13.40.190 for
any unpaid restitution. Jurisdiction to enforce payment and modify
terms of the restitution order shall be the same as those set forth in
RCW 13.40.190.
(c) If the court finds the juvenile is not entitled to dismissal of
the deferred disposition pursuant to (a) of this subsection, the court
shall revoke the deferred disposition and enter an order of
disposition. A deferred disposition shall remain a conviction unless
the case is dismissed and the conviction is vacated pursuant to (b) of
this subsection or sealed pursuant to RCW 13.50.050.
(10)(a)(i) Any time the court vacates a conviction pursuant to
subsection (9) of this section, if the juvenile is eighteen years of
age or older and the full amount of restitution ordered has been paid,
the court shall enter a written order sealing the case.
(ii) Any time the court vacates a conviction pursuant to subsection
(9) of this section, if the juvenile is not eighteen years of age or
older and full restitution ordered has been paid, the court shall
schedule an administrative sealing hearing to take place no later than
thirty days after the respondent's eighteenth birthday, at which time
the court shall enter a written order sealing the case. The
respondent's presence at the administrative sealing hearing is not
required.
(iii) Any deferred disposition vacated prior to June 7, 2012, is
not subject to sealing under this subsection.
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a juvenile from
petitioning the court to have the records of his or her deferred
dispositions sealed under RCW 13.50.050 (11) and (12).
(c) Records sealed under this provision shall have the same legal
status as records sealed under RCW 13.50.050.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.40.210 and 2009 c 187 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall set a release date for each juvenile
committed to its custody. The release date shall be within the
prescribed range to which a juvenile has been committed under RCW
13.40.0357 or 13.40.030 except as provided in RCW 13.40.320 concerning
offenders the department determines are eligible for the juvenile
offender basic training camp program. Such dates shall be determined
prior to the expiration of sixty percent of a juvenile's minimum term
of confinement included within the prescribed range to which the
juvenile has been committed. The secretary shall release any juvenile
committed to the custody of the department within four calendar days
prior to the juvenile's release date or on the release date set under
this chapter. Days spent in the custody of the department shall be
tolled by any period of time during which a juvenile has absented
himself or herself from the department's supervision without the prior
approval of the secretary or the secretary's designee.
(2) The secretary shall monitor the average daily population of the
state's juvenile residential facilities. When the secretary concludes
that in-residence population of residential facilities exceeds one
hundred five percent of the rated bed capacity specified in statute, or
in absence of such specification, as specified by the department in
rule, the secretary may recommend reductions to the governor. On
certification by the governor that the recommended reductions are
necessary, the secretary has authority to administratively release a
sufficient number of offenders to reduce in-residence population to one
hundred percent of rated bed capacity. The secretary shall release
those offenders who have served the greatest proportion of their
sentence. However, the secretary may deny release in a particular case
at the request of an offender, or if the secretary finds that there is
no responsible custodian, as determined by the department, to whom to
release the offender, or if the release of the offender would pose a
clear danger to society. The department shall notify the committing
court of the release at the time of release if any such early releases
have occurred as a result of excessive in-residence population. In no
event shall an offender adjudicated of a violent offense be granted
release under the provisions of this subsection.
(3)(a) Following the release of any juvenile under subsection (1)
of this section, the secretary may require the juvenile to comply with
a program of parole to be administered by the department in his or her
community which shall last no longer than eighteen months, except that
in the case of a juvenile sentenced for rape in the first or second
degree, rape of a child in the first or second degree, child
molestation in the first degree, or indecent liberties with forcible
compulsion, the period of parole shall be twenty-four months and, in
the discretion of the secretary, may be up to thirty-six months when
the secretary finds that an additional period of parole is necessary
and appropriate in the interests of public safety or to meet the
ongoing needs of the juvenile. A parole program is mandatory for
offenders released under subsection (2) of this section and for
offenders who receive a juvenile residential commitment sentence of
theft of a motor vehicle, possession of a stolen motor vehicle, or
taking a motor vehicle without permission 1. A juvenile adjudicated of
unlawful possession of a firearm, possession of a stolen firearm, theft
of a firearm, or drive-by shooting may participate in aggression
replacement training, functional family therapy, or functional family
parole aftercare if the juvenile meets eligibility requirements for
these services. The decision to place an offender ((on)) in an
evidence-based parole program shall be based on an assessment by the
department of the offender's risk for reoffending upon release and an
assessment of the ongoing treatment needs of the juvenile. The
department shall prioritize available parole resources to provide
supervision and services to offenders at moderate to high risk for
reoffending.
(b) The secretary shall, for the period of parole, facilitate the
juvenile's reintegration into his or her community and to further this
goal shall require the juvenile to refrain from possessing a firearm or
using a deadly weapon and refrain from committing new offenses and may
require the juvenile to: (i) Undergo available medical, psychiatric,
drug and alcohol, sex offender, mental health, and other offense-related treatment services; (ii) report as directed to a parole officer
and/or designee; (iii) pursue a course of study, vocational training,
or employment; (iv) notify the parole officer of the current address
where he or she resides; (v) be present at a particular address during
specified hours; (vi) remain within prescribed geographical boundaries;
(vii) submit to electronic monitoring; (viii) refrain from using
illegal drugs and alcohol, and submit to random urinalysis when
requested by the assigned parole officer; (ix) refrain from contact
with specific individuals or a specified class of individuals; (x) meet
other conditions determined by the parole officer to further enhance
the juvenile's reintegration into the community; (xi) pay any court-ordered fines or restitution; and (xii) perform community restitution.
Community restitution for the purpose of this section means compulsory
service, without compensation, performed for the benefit of the
community by the offender. Community restitution may be performed
through public or private organizations or through work crews.
(c) The secretary may further require up to twenty-five percent of
the highest risk juvenile offenders who are placed on parole to
participate in an intensive supervision program. Offenders
participating in an intensive supervision program shall be required to
comply with all terms and conditions listed in (b) of this subsection
and shall also be required to comply with the following additional
terms and conditions: (i) Obey all laws and refrain from any conduct
that threatens public safety; (ii) report at least once a week to an
assigned community case manager; and (iii) meet all other requirements
imposed by the community case manager related to participating in the
intensive supervision program. As a part of the intensive supervision
program, the secretary may require day reporting.
(d) After termination of the parole period, the juvenile shall be
discharged from the department's supervision.
(4)(a) The department may also modify parole for violation thereof.
If, after affording a juvenile all of the due process rights to which
he or she would be entitled if the juvenile were an adult, the
secretary finds that a juvenile has violated a condition of his or her
parole, the secretary shall order one of the following which is
reasonably likely to effectuate the purpose of the parole and to
protect the public: (i) Continued supervision under the same
conditions previously imposed; (ii) intensified supervision with
increased reporting requirements; (iii) additional conditions of
supervision authorized by this chapter; (iv) except as provided in
(a)(v) and (vi) of this subsection, imposition of a period of
confinement not to exceed thirty days in a facility operated by or
pursuant to a contract with the state of Washington or any city or
county for a portion of each day or for a certain number of days each
week with the balance of the days or weeks spent under supervision; (v)
the secretary may order any of the conditions or may return the
offender to confinement for the remainder of the sentence range if the
offense for which the offender was sentenced is rape in the first or
second degree, rape of a child in the first or second degree, child
molestation in the first degree, indecent liberties with forcible
compulsion, or a sex offense that is also a serious violent offense as
defined by RCW 9.94A.030; and (vi) the secretary may order any of the
conditions or may return the offender to confinement for the remainder
of the sentence range if the youth has completed the basic training
camp program as described in RCW 13.40.320.
(b) The secretary may modify parole and order any of the conditions
or may return the offender to confinement for up to twenty-four weeks
if the offender was sentenced for a sex offense as defined under RCW
9A.44.130 and is known to have violated the terms of parole.
Confinement beyond thirty days is intended to only be used for a small
and limited number of sex offenders. It shall only be used when other
graduated sanctions or interventions have not been effective or the
behavior is so egregious it warrants the use of the higher level
intervention and the violation: (i) Is a known pattern of behavior
consistent with a previous sex offense that puts the youth at high risk
for reoffending sexually; (ii) consists of sexual behavior that is
determined to be predatory as defined in RCW 71.09.020; or (iii)
requires a review under chapter 71.09 RCW, due to a recent overt act.
The total number of days of confinement for violations of parole
conditions during the parole period shall not exceed the number of days
provided by the maximum sentence imposed by the disposition for the
underlying offense pursuant to RCW 13.40.0357. The department shall
not aggregate multiple parole violations that occur prior to the parole
revocation hearing and impose consecutive twenty-four week periods of
confinement for each parole violation. The department is authorized to
engage in rule making pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, to implement this
subsection, including narrowly defining the behaviors that could lead
to this higher level intervention.
(c) If the department finds that any juvenile in a program of
parole has possessed a firearm or used a deadly weapon during the
program of parole, the department shall modify the parole under (a) of
this subsection and confine the juvenile for at least thirty days.
Confinement shall be in a facility operated by or pursuant to a
contract with the state or any county.
(5) A parole officer of the department of social and health
services shall have the power to arrest a juvenile under his or her
supervision on the same grounds as a law enforcement officer would be
authorized to arrest the person.
(6) If so requested and approved under chapter 13.06 RCW, the
secretary shall permit a county or group of counties to perform
functions under subsections (3) through (5) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The juvenile rehabilitation administration of the department
of social and health services must compile and analyze data regarding
juvenile offenders who have been found to have committed the offense of
unlawful possession of a firearm under RCW 9.41.040 and made their
initial contact with the criminal justice system between January 1,
2005, and December 31, 2013. Information compiled and analyzed must
include:
(i) Previous and subsequent criminal offenses committed by the
offenders as juveniles or adults;
(ii) Where applicable, treatment interventions provided to the
offenders as juveniles, including the nature of provided interventions
and whether the offenders completed the interventions, if known; and
(iii) Gang association of the offenders, if known.
(b) The department of corrections and the caseload forecast council
must provide any information necessary to assist the juvenile
rehabilitation administration in compiling the data required for this
purpose. Information provided may include individual identifier level
data, however such data must remain confidential and must not be
disseminated for purposes other than as identified in this section or
otherwise permitted by law.
(2) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall report its
findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than
October 1, 2014.

--- END ---