BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that, nationally,
nearly two million students are from military families, where one or
more parent or guardian serves in the United States armed forces,
reserves, or national guard. There are approximately one hundred
thirty-six thousand military families in Washington state.
(2) The legislature further finds that a United States government
accountability office study in 2011 identified that it is not possible
to monitor educational outcomes for students from military families due
to the lack of a student identifier in state educational data systems.
Such an identifier is needed to allow educators and policymakers to
monitor critical elements of education success, including academic
progress and proficiency, special and advanced program participation,
mobility and dropout rates, and patterns over time across states and
school districts. Reliable information about student performance will
assist educators in more effectively transitioning students to a new
school and enable school districts to discover and implement best
practices.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.300.505 and 2007 c 401 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop standards for school data systems that focus on validation and
verification of data entered into the systems to ensure accuracy and
compatibility of data. The standards shall address but are not limited
to the following topics:
(a) Date validation;
(b) Code validation, which includes gender, race or ethnicity, and
other code elements;
(c) Decimal and integer validation; and
(d) Required field validation as defined by state and federal
requirements.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop a
reporting format and instructions for school districts to collect and
submit data that must include:
(a) Data on student demographics that is disaggregated by distinct
ethnic categories within racial subgroups so that analyses may be
conducted on student achievement using the disaggregated data; and
(b) Starting no later than the 2015-16 school year, for all newly
enrolled students, including transfer students, data on students from
military families. The K-12 data governance group established in RCW
28A.300.507 must develop best practice guidelines for the collection
and regular updating of this data on students from military families.
(3) For the purposes of this section "students from military
families" means the following categories of students, with data to be
collected and submitted separately for each category:
(i) Students with a parent or guardian who is a member of the
active duty United States armed forces; and
(ii) Students with a parent or guardian who is a member of the
reserves of the United States armed forces or a member of the
Washington national guard.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Using the definitions in RCW 28A.300.505,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct an
analysis of the average number of students from military families who
are special education students. The data reported must include state,
district, and school-level information. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall report its analysis to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2014, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---