BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 SCOPE OF APPLICATION. (1) This chapter
applies to international commercial arbitration, subject to any
agreement between the United States and any other country or countries.
(2) The provisions of this chapter, except sections 9, 10, 26, 27,
28, 46, and 47 of this act, apply only if the place of arbitration is
in the territory of this state.
(3) An arbitration is international if:
(a) The parties to an arbitration agreement have, at the time of
the conclusion of that agreement, their places of business in different
countries;
(b) One of the following places is situated outside the country or
countries in which the parties have their places of business:
(i) The place of arbitration if determined in, or pursuant to, the
arbitration agreement; or
(ii) Any place where a substantial part of the obligations of the
commercial relationship is to be performed or the place with which the
subject matter of the dispute is most closely connected; or
(c) The parties have expressly agreed that the subject matter of
the arbitration agreement relates to more than one country.
(4) For the purposes of subsection (3) of this section:
(a) If a party has more than one place of business, the place of
business is that which has the closest relationship to the arbitration
agreement; and
(b) If a party does not have a place of business, reference is to
be made to the party's habitual residence.
(5) This chapter shall not affect any other law of this state by
virtue of which certain disputes may not be submitted to arbitration or
may be submitted to arbitration only according to provisions other than
those of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS AND RULES OF INTERPRETATION.
For the purpose of this chapter:
(1) "Arbitration" means any arbitration whether or not administered
by a permanent arbitral institution;
(2) "Arbitral tribunal" means a sole arbitrator or a panel of
arbitrators;
(3) "Commercial" means matters arising from all relationships of a
commercial nature, whether contractual or not, including, but not
limited to, any of the following transactions:
(a) A transaction for the supply or exchange of goods or services;
(b) A distribution agreement;
(c) A commercial representation or agency;
(d) An exploitation agreement or concession;
(e) A joint venture or other related form of industrial or business
cooperation;
(f) The carriage of goods or passengers by air, sea, rail, or road;
(g) Construction;
(h) Insurance;
(i) Licensing;
(j) Factoring;
(k) Leasing;
(l) Consulting;
(m) Engineering;
(n) Financing;
(o) Banking;
(p) The transfer of data or technology;
(q) Intellectual or industrial property, including trademarks,
patents, copyrights, and software programs; and
(r) Professional services;
(4) "Court" means a body or organ of the judicial system of this
state;
(5) Where a provision of this chapter, except section 39 of this
act, leaves the parties free to determine a certain issue, such freedom
includes the right of the parties to authorize a third party, including
an institution, to make that determination;
(6) Where a provision of this chapter refers to the fact that the
parties have agreed, that they may agree, or in any other way refers to
an agreement of the parties, such agreement includes any arbitration
rules referred to in that agreement;
(7) Where a provision of this chapter, other than in sections 36(1)
and 43(2)(a) of this act, refers to a claim, it also applies to a
counter-claim, and where it refers to a defense, it also applies to a
defense to such counter-claim;
(8) For the purpose of interpreting this chapter, recourse may be
had, in addition to aids of interpretation ordinarily available under
the law of this state, to:
(a) The report of the United Nations commission on international
trade law on the work of its eighteenth session (June 3-21, 1985);
(b) The analytical commentary contained in the report of the
secretary general to the eighteenth session of the United Nations
commission on international trade law; and
(c) The explanatory note by the UNCITRAL Secretariat on the 1985
Model Law on international commercial arbitration as amended in 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 INTERNATIONAL ORIGIN AND GENERAL PRINCIPLES.
(1) In the interpretation of this chapter, regard is to be had to its
international origin and to the need to promote uniformity in its
application and the observance of good faith.
(2) Questions concerning matters governed by this chapter which are
not expressly settled in it are to be settled in conformity with the
general principles on which this chapter is based.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RECEIPT OF WRITTEN COMMUNICATIONS. (1)
Unless otherwise agreed by the parties:
(a) Any written communication is deemed to have been received if it
is delivered to the addressee personally or if it is delivered at the
addressee's place of business, habitual residence, or mailing address.
If none of these can be found after making a reasonable inquiry, a
written communication is deemed to have been received if it is sent to
the addressee's last-known place of business, habitual residence, or
mailing address by registered letter or any other means which provides
a record of the attempt to deliver it; and
(b) The communication is deemed to have been received on the day it
is so delivered.
(2) The provisions of this section do not apply to communications
in court proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 WAIVER OF RIGHT TO OBJECT. A party who
knows that any provision of this chapter from which the parties may
derogate or any requirement under the arbitration agreement has not
been complied with and yet proceeds with the arbitration without
stating the party's objection to such noncompliance without undue delay
or, if a time limit is provided therefore, within such period of time,
shall be deemed to have waived the party's right to object.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 EXTENT OF COURT INTERVENTION. In matters
governed by this chapter, no court shall intervene except where so
provided in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 COURT AUTHORITY FOR CERTAIN FUNCTIONS OF
ARBITRATION ASSISTANCE AND SUPERVISION. (1) The functions referred to
in sections 12 (3) and (4), 14(3), 15, 17(3), and 45(2) of this act
shall be performed by the superior court of the county in which the
agreement to arbitrate is to be performed or was made.
(2) If the arbitration agreement does not specify a county where
the agreement to arbitrate is to be performed and the agreement was not
made in any county in the state of Washington, the functions referred
to in sections 12 (3) and (4), 14(3), 15, 17(3), and 45(2) of this act
shall be performed in the county where any party to the court
proceeding resides or has a place of business.
(3) In any case not covered by subsections (1) or (2) of this
section, the functions referred to in sections 12 (3) and (4), 14(3),
15, 17(3), and 45(2) of this act shall be performed in any county in
the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 DEFINITION AND FORM OF ARBITRATION
AGREEMENT. (1) For the purposes of this chapter, "arbitration
agreement" is an agreement by the parties to submit to arbitration all
or certain disputes which have arisen or which may arise between them
in respect of a defined legal relationship, whether contractual or not.
An arbitration agreement may be in the form of an arbitration clause in
a contract or in the form of a separate agreement.
(2) The arbitration agreement shall be in writing.
(3) An arbitration agreement is in writing if its content is
recorded in any form, whether or not the arbitration agreement or
contract has been concluded orally, by conduct, or by other means.
(4) The requirement that an arbitration agreement be in writing is
met by an electronic communication if the information contained therein
is accessible so as to be useable for subsequent reference. For the
purposes of this section, "electronic communication" means any
communication that the parties make by means of data messages; and
"data message" means information generated, sent, received, or stored
by electronic, magnetic, optical, or similar means, including, but not
limited to, electronic data interchange (EDI), electronic mail,
telegram, telex, or telecopy.
(5) An arbitration agreement is in writing if it is contained in an
exchange of statements of claim and defense in which the existence of
an agreement is alleged by one party and not denied by the other.
(6) The reference in a contract to any document containing an
arbitration clause constitutes an arbitration agreement in writing,
provided that the reference is such as to make that clause part of the
contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 ARBITRATION AGREEMENT AND SUBSTANTIVE CLAIM
BEFORE COURT. (1) A court before which an action is brought in a
matter which is the subject of an arbitration agreement shall, if a
party so requests not later than when submitting the party's first
statement on the substance of the dispute, refer the parties to
arbitration unless it finds that the agreement is null and void,
inoperative, or incapable of being performed.
(2) Where an action referred to in subsection (1) of this section
has been brought, arbitral proceedings may nevertheless be commenced or
continued, and an award made, while the issue is pending before the
court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 ARBITRATION AGREEMENT AND INTERIM MEASURES
BY COURT. It is not incompatible with an arbitration agreement for a
party to request, before or during arbitral proceedings, from a court
an interim measure of protection and for a court to grant such measure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 NUMBER OF ARBITRATORS; IMMUNITY. (1) The
parties are free to determine the number of arbitrators.
(2) Failing such determination, the number of arbitrators shall be
three.
(3) An arbitrator has the immunity of a judicial officer from civil
liability when acting in the capacity of arbitrator under any statute
or contract. The immunity afforded by this section shall supplement,
and not supplant, any otherwise applicable common law or statutory
immunity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 APPOINTMENT OF ARBITRATORS. (1) No person
shall be precluded by reason of the person's nationality from acting as
an arbitrator, unless otherwise agreed by the parties.
(2) The parties are free to agree on a procedure of appointing the
arbitrator or arbitrators, subject to the provisions of subsections (4)
and (5) of this section.
(3) Failing such agreement:
(a) In an arbitration with three arbitrators, each party shall
appoint one arbitrator, and the two arbitrators thus appointed shall
appoint the third arbitrator; if a party fails to appoint the
arbitrator within thirty days of receipt of a request to do so from the
other party, or if the two arbitrators fail to agree on the third
arbitrator within thirty days of their appointment, the appointment
shall be made, upon request of a party, by the court specified in
section 7 of this act; and
(b) In an arbitration with a sole arbitrator, if the parties are
unable to agree on the arbitrator, the arbitrator shall be appointed,
upon request of a party, by the court specified in section 7 of this
act.
(4) Where, under an appointment procedure agreed upon by the
parties:
(a) A party fails to act as required under such procedure;
(b) The parties, or two arbitrators, are unable to reach an
agreement expected of them under such procedure; or
(c) A third party, including an institution, fails to perform any
function entrusted to it under such procedure;
Any party may request the court specified in section 7 of this act
to take the necessary measure, unless the agreement on the appointment
procedure provides other means for securing the appointment.
(5) A decision on a matter entrusted by subsection (3) or (4) of
this section to the court specified in section 7 of this act shall be
subject to no appeal. The court, in appointing an arbitrator, shall
have due regard to any qualifications required of the arbitrator by the
agreement of the parties and to such considerations as are likely to
secure the appointment of an independent and impartial arbitrator and,
in the case of a sole or third arbitrator, shall take into account as
well the advisability of appointing an arbitrator of a nationality
other than those of the parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 GROUNDS FOR CHALLENGE. (1) When a person
is approached in connection with the person's possible appointment as
an arbitrator, the person shall disclose any circumstances likely to
give rise to justifiable doubts as to the person's impartiality or
independence. An arbitrator, from the time of the arbitrator's
appointment and throughout the arbitral proceedings, shall without
delay disclose any such circumstances to the parties unless they have
already been informed of them by the arbitrator.
(2) An arbitrator may be challenged only if circumstances exist
that give rise to justifiable doubts as to the arbitrator's
impartiality or independence, or if the arbitrator does not possess
qualifications agreed to by the parties. A party may challenge an
arbitrator appointed by the party, or in whose appointment the party
has participated, only for reasons of which the party becomes aware
after the appointment has been made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 CHALLENGE PROCEDURE. (1) The parties are
free to agree on a procedure for challenging an arbitrator, subject to
the provisions of subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Failing such agreement, a party who intends to challenge an
arbitrator shall, within fifteen days after becoming aware of the
constitution of the arbitral tribunal or after becoming aware of any
circumstance referred to in section 13(2) of this act, send a written
statement of the reasons for the challenge to the arbitral tribunal.
Unless the challenged arbitrator withdraws from the arbitrator's office
or the other party agrees to the challenge, the arbitral tribunal shall
decide on the challenge.
(3) If a challenge under any procedure agreed upon by the parties
or under the procedure of subsection (2) of this section is not
successful, the challenging party may request, within thirty days after
having received notice of the decision rejecting the challenge, the
court specified in section 7 of this act to decide on the challenge,
which decision shall be subject to no appeal. While such a request is
pending, the arbitral tribunal, including the challenged arbitrator,
may continue the arbitral proceedings and make an award.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 FAILURE OR IMPOSSIBILITY TO ACT. (1) If an
arbitrator becomes de jure or de facto unable to perform the
arbitrator's functions or for other reasons fails to act without undue
delay, the arbitrator's mandate terminates if the arbitrator withdraws
from the arbitrator's office or if the parties agree on the
termination. Otherwise, if a controversy remains concerning any of
these grounds, any party may request the court specified in section 7
of this act to decide on the termination of the mandate, which decision
shall be subject to no appeal.
(2) If, under this section or section 14(2) of this act, an
arbitrator withdraws from the arbitrator's office or a party agrees to
the termination of the mandate of an arbitrator, this does not imply
acceptance of the validity of any ground referred to in this section or
section 13(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 APPOINTMENT OF SUBSTITUTE ARBITRATOR.
Where the mandate of an arbitrator terminates under section 14 or 15 of
this act or because of the arbitrator's withdrawal from office for any
other reason or because of the revocation of the arbitrator's mandate
by agreement of the parties or in any other case of termination of the
arbitrator's mandate, a substitute arbitrator shall be appointed
according to the rules that were applicable to the appointment of the
arbitrator being replaced.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 COMPETENCE OF ARBITRAL TRIBUNAL TO RULE ON
ITS OWN JURISDICTION. (1) The arbitral tribunal may rule on its own
jurisdiction, including any objections with respect to the existence or
validity of the arbitration agreement. For that purpose, an
arbitration clause which forms part of a contract shall be treated as
an agreement independent of the other terms of the contract. A
decision by the arbitral tribunal that the contract is null and void
shall not entail ipso jure the invalidity of the arbitration clause.
(2) A plea that the arbitral tribunal does not have jurisdiction
shall be raised not later than the submission of the statement of
defense. A party is not precluded from raising such a plea by the fact
that the party has appointed, or participated in the appointment of, an
arbitrator. A plea that the arbitral tribunal is exceeding the scope
of its authority shall be raised as soon as the matter alleged to be
beyond the scope of its authority is raised during the arbitral
proceedings. The arbitral tribunal may, in either case, admit a later
plea if it considers the delay justified.
(3) The arbitral tribunal may rule on a plea referred to in
subsection (2) of this section either as a preliminary question or in
an award on the merits. If the arbitral tribunal rules as a
preliminary question that it has jurisdiction, any party may request,
within thirty days after having received notice of that ruling, the
court specified in section 7 of this act to decide the matter, which
decision shall be subject to no appeal. While such a request is
pending, the arbitral tribunal may continue the arbitral proceedings
and make an award.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 POWER OF ARBITRAL TRIBUNAL TO ORDER INTERIM
MEASURES. (1) Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, the arbitral
tribunal may, at the request of a party, grant interim measures.
(2) An interim measure is any temporary measure, whether in the
form of an award or in another form, by which, at any time prior to the
issuance of the award by which the dispute is finally decided, the
arbitral tribunal orders a party to:
(a) Maintain or restore the status quo pending determination of the
dispute;
(b) Take action that would prevent, or refrain from taking action
that is likely to cause, current or imminent harm or prejudice to the
arbitral process itself;
(c) Provide a means of preserving assets out of which a subsequent
award may be satisfied; or
(d) Preserve evidence that may be relevant and material to the
resolution of the dispute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 CONDITIONS OF GRANTING INTERIM MEASURES.
(1) The party requesting an interim measure under section 18(2) (a),
(b), and (c) of this act shall satisfy the arbitral tribunal that:
(a) Harm not adequately reparable by an award of damages is likely
to result if the measure is not ordered, and such harm substantially
outweighs the harm that is likely to result to the party against whom
the measure is directed if the measure is granted; and
(b) There is a reasonable possibility that the requesting party
will succeed on the merits of the claim. The determination on this
possibility shall not affect the discretion of the arbitral tribunal in
making any subsequent determination.
(2) With regard to a request for an interim measure under section
18(2)(d) of this act, the requirements in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of
this section shall apply only to the extent the tribunal considers
appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 APPLICATION FOR PRELIMINARY ORDERS AND
CONDITIONS FOR GRANTING PRELIMINARY ORDERS. (1) Unless otherwise
agreed by the parties, a party may, without notice to any other party,
make a request for an interim measure together with an application for
a preliminary order directing a party not to frustrate the purpose of
the interim measure requested.
(2) The arbitral tribunal may grant a preliminary order provided it
considers that prior disclosure of the request for the interim measure
to the party against whom it is directed risks frustrating the purpose
of the measure.
(3) The conditions defined under section 19 of this act apply to
any preliminary order, provided that the harm to be assessed under
section 19(1)(a) of this act is the harm likely to result from the
order being granted or not.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 SPECIFIC REGIME FOR PRELIMINARY ORDERS.
(1) Immediately after the arbitral tribunal has made a determination in
respect of an application for a preliminary order, the arbitral
tribunal shall give notice to all parties of the request for the
interim measure, the application for the preliminary order, the
preliminary order, if any, and all other communications, including by
indicating the content of any oral communication, between any party and
the arbitral tribunal in relation thereto.
(2) At the same time, the arbitral tribunal shall give an
opportunity to any party against whom a preliminary order is directed
to present its case at the earliest practicable time.
(3) The arbitral tribunal shall decide promptly on any objection to
the preliminary order.
(4) A preliminary order shall expire after twenty days from the
date on which it was issued by the arbitral tribunal. However, the
arbitral tribunal may issue an interim measure adopting or modifying
the preliminary order after the party against whom the preliminary
order is directed has been given notice and an opportunity to present
its case.
(5) A preliminary order shall be binding on the parties but shall
not be subject to enforcement by a court. Such a preliminary order
does not constitute an award.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 MODIFICATION, SUSPENSION, TERMINATION. The
arbitral tribunal may modify, suspend, or terminate an interim measure
or a preliminary order it has granted upon application of any party or,
in exceptional circumstances and upon prior notice to the parties, on
the arbitral tribunal's own initiative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 PROVISION OF SECURITY. (1) The arbitral
tribunal may require the party requesting an interim measure to provide
appropriate security in connection with the measure.
(2) The arbitral tribunal shall require the party applying for a
preliminary order to provide security in connection with the order
unless the arbitral tribunal considers it inappropriate to do so.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 DISCLOSURE. (1) The arbitral tribunal may
require any party promptly to disclose any material change in the
circumstances on the basis of which the measure was requested or
granted.
(2) The party applying for a preliminary order shall disclose to
the arbitral tribunal all circumstances that are likely to be relevant
to the arbitral tribunal's determination whether to grant or maintain
the order, and such obligation shall continue until the party against
whom the order has been requested has had an opportunity to present its
case. Thereafter, subsection (1) of this section shall apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 COSTS AND DAMAGES. The party requesting an
interim measure or applying for a preliminary order shall be liable for
any costs and damages caused by the measure or the order to any party
if the arbitral tribunal later determines that, in the circumstances,
the measure or the order should not have been granted. The arbitral
tribunal may award such costs and damages at any point during the
proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 RECOGNITION AND ENFORCEMENT. (1) An
interim measure issued by an arbitral tribunal shall be recognized as
binding and, unless otherwise provided by the arbitral tribunal,
enforced upon application to the superior court, irrespective of the
country in which it was issued, subject to the provisions of section 27
of this act.
(2) The party who is seeking or has obtained recognition or
enforcement of an interim measure shall promptly inform the court of
any termination, suspension, or modification of that interim measure.
(3) The court of the state where recognition or enforcement is
sought may, if it considers it proper, order the requesting party to
provide appropriate security if the arbitral tribunal has not already
made a determination with respect to security or where such a decision
is necessary to protect the rights of third parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 GROUNDS FOR REFUSING RECOGNITION AND
ENFORCEMENT. (1) Recognition or enforcement of an interim award may be
refused only:
(a) At the request of the party against whom it is invoked if the
court is satisfied that:
(i) Such refusal is warranted on the grounds set forth in section
47(1)(a) (i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this act;
(ii) The arbitral tribunal's decision with respect to the provision
of security in connection with the interim measure issued by the
arbitral tribunal has not been complied with; or
(iii) The interim measure has been terminated or suspended by the
arbitral tribunal or, where so empowered, by the court of the state in
which the arbitration takes place or under the law of which that
interim measure was granted; or
(b) If the court finds that:
(i) The interim measure is incompatible with the powers conferred
upon the court unless the court decides to reformulate the interim
measure to the extent necessary to adapt it to its own powers and
procedures for the purposes of enforcing that interim measure and
without modifying its substance; or
(ii) Any of the grounds set forth in section 47(1)(b) (i) or (ii)
of this act apply to the recognition and enforcement of the interim
measure.
(2) Any determination made by the court on any ground in subsection
(1) of this section shall be effective only for the purposes of the
application to recognize and enforce the interim measure. The court
where recognition or enforcement is sought shall not, in making that
determination, undertake a review of the substance of the interim
measure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 COURT ORDERED INTERIM MEASURES. A court
shall have the same power of issuing an interim measure in relation to
arbitration proceedings, irrespective of whether their place is in the
territory of this state, as it has in relation to proceedings in
courts. The court shall exercise such power in accordance with its own
procedures in consideration of the specific features of international
arbitration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 EQUAL TREATMENT OF PARTIES. The parties
shall be treated with equality, and each party shall be given a full
opportunity of presenting its case.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 DETERMINATION OF RULES AND PROCEDURE. (1)
Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the parties are free to
agree on the procedure to be followed by the arbitral tribunal in
conducting the proceedings.
(2) Failing such agreement, the arbitral tribunal may, subject to
the provisions of this chapter, conduct the arbitration in such manner
as it considers appropriate. The power conferred upon the arbitral
tribunal includes the power to determine the admissibility, relevance,
materiality, and weight of any evidence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 PLACE OF ARBITRATION. (1) The parties are
free to agree on the place of arbitration. Failing such agreement, the
place of arbitration shall be determined by the arbitral tribunal
having regard to the circumstances of the case, including the
convenience of the parties.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section, the arbitral tribunal may, unless otherwise agreed by the
parties, meet at any place it considers appropriate for consultation
among its members, for hearing witnesses, experts, or the parties, or
for inspection of goods, other property, or documents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 COMMENCEMENT OF ARBITRAL PROCEEDINGS.
Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, the arbitral proceedings in
respect of a particular dispute commence on the date on which a request
for that dispute to be referred to arbitration is received by the
respondent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 LANGUAGE. (1) The parties are free to
agree on the language or languages to be used in the arbitral
proceedings. Failing such agreement, the arbitral tribunal shall
determine the language or languages to be used in the proceedings.
This agreement or determination, unless otherwise specified therein,
shall apply to any written statement by a party, any hearing, and any
award, decision, or other communication by the arbitral tribunal.
(2) The arbitral tribunal may order that any documentary evidence
shall be accompanied by a translation into the language or languages
agreed upon by the parties or determined by the arbitral tribunal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 STATEMENT OF CLAIM AND DEFENSE. (1) Within
the period of time agreed by the parties or determined by the arbitral
tribunal, the claimant shall state the facts supporting its claim, the
point at issue, and the relief or remedy sought, and the respondent
shall state its defense in respect of these particulars, unless the
parties have otherwise agreed as to the required elements of such
statements. The parties may submit with their statements all documents
they consider to be relevant or may add a reference to the documents or
other evidence they will submit.
(2) Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, either party may amend
or supplement its claims or defenses during the course of the arbitral
proceedings, unless the arbitral tribunal considers it inappropriate to
allow such amendment having regard to the delay in making it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 HEARINGS AND WRITTEN PROCEEDINGS. (1)
Subject to any contrary agreement by the parties, the arbitral tribunal
shall decide whether to hold oral hearings for the presentation of
evidence or for oral argument, or whether the proceedings shall be
conducted on the basis of documents and other materials. However,
unless the parties have agreed that no hearings shall be held, the
arbitral tribunal shall hold such hearings at an appropriate stage of
the proceedings, if so requested by a party.
(2) The parties shall be given sufficient advance notice of any
hearing and of any meeting of the arbitral tribunal for the purposes of
inspection of goods, other property, or documents.
(3) All statements, documents, or other information supplied to the
arbitral tribunal by one party shall be communicated to the other
party. Any expert report or evidentiary document on which the arbitral
tribunal may rely in making its decision shall be communicated to the
parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 DEFAULT OF A PARTY. Unless otherwise
agreed by the parties, if, without showing sufficient cause:
(1) The claimant fails to communicate its statement of claim in
accordance with section 34(1) of this act, the arbitral tribunal shall
terminate the proceedings;
(2) The respondent fails to communicate its statements of defense
in accordance with section 34(1) of this act, the arbitral tribunal
shall continue the proceedings without treating such failure in itself
as an admission of the claimant's allegations; and
(3) Any party fails to appear at a hearing or to produce
documentary evidence, the arbitral tribunal may continue the
proceedings and make the award on the evidence before it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 EXPERT APPOINTED BY ARBITRAL TRIBUNAL. (1)
Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, the arbitral tribunal:
(a) May appoint one or more experts to report to it on specific
issues to be determined by the arbitral tribunal; and
(b) May require a party to give the expert any relevant information
or to produce, or to provide access to, any relevant documents, goods,
or other property for the expert's inspection.
(2) Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, if a party so requests
or if the arbitral tribunal considers it necessary, the expert shall,
after delivery of the expert's written or oral report, participate in
a hearing where the parties have the opportunity to put questions to
the expert and to present expert witnesses in order to testify on the
points at issue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 COURT ASSISTANCE IN TAKING EVIDENCE;
CONSOLIDATION. (1) The arbitral tribunal or a party with the approval
of the arbitral tribunal may request from the superior court assistance
in taking evidence. The court may execute the request within its
competence and according to its rules on taking evidence.
(2) When the parties to two or more arbitration agreements have
agreed in their respective arbitration agreements or otherwise, the
superior court may, on application by one party with the consent of all
other parties to those arbitration agreements, do one or more of the
following:
(a) Order the arbitration proceedings arising out of those
arbitration agreements to be consolidated on terms the court considers
just and necessary;
(b) Where all parties cannot agree on an arbitral tribunal for the
consolidated arbitration, appoint an arbitral tribunal in accordance
with section 12(4) of this act; and
(c) Where the parties cannot agree on any other matter necessary to
conduct the consolidated arbitration, make any other order it considers
necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 RULES APPLICABLE TO SUBSTANCE OF DISPUTE.
(1) The arbitral tribunal shall decide the dispute in accordance with
such rules of law as are chosen by the parties as applicable to the
substance of the dispute. Any designation of the law or legal system
of a given state shall be construed, unless otherwise expressed, as
directly referring to the substantive law of that state and not to its
conflict of laws rules.
(2) Failing any designation by the parties, the arbitral tribunal
shall apply the law determined by the conflict of laws rules which it
considers applicable.
(3) The arbitral tribunal shall decide ex aequo et bono or as
amiable compositeur only if the parties have expressly authorized it to
do so.
(4) In all cases, the arbitral tribunal shall decide in accordance
with the terms of the contract and shall take into account the usages
of the trade applicable to the transaction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 DECISION MAKING BY PANEL OF ARBITRATORS.
In arbitral proceedings with more than one arbitrator, any decision of
the arbitral tribunal shall be made, unless otherwise agreed by the
parties, by a majority of all its members. However, questions of
procedure may be decided by a presiding arbitrator, if so authorized by
the parties or all members of the arbitral tribunal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 SETTLEMENT. (1) If, during arbitral
proceedings, the parties settle the dispute, the arbitral tribunal
shall terminate the proceedings and, if requested by the parties and
not objected to by the arbitral tribunal, record the settlement in the
form of an arbitral award on agreed terms.
(2) An award on agreed terms shall be made in accordance with the
provisions of section 42 of this act and shall state that it is an
award. Such an award has the same status and effect as any other award
on the merits of the case.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 FORM AND CONTENTS OF AWARD. (1) The award
shall be made in writing and shall be signed by the arbitrator or
arbitrators. In arbitral proceedings with more than one arbitrator,
the signatures of the majority of all members of the arbitral tribunal
shall suffice, provided that the reason for any omitted signature is
stated.
(2) The award shall state the reasons upon which it is based,
unless the parties have agreed that no reasons are to be given or the
award is an award on agreed terms under section 41 of this act.
(3) The award shall state its date and the place of arbitration as
determined in accordance with section 31(1) of this act. The award
shall be deemed to have been made at that place.
(4) After the award is made, a copy signed by the arbitrators in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section shall be delivered to
each party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 43 TERMINATION OF PROCEEDINGS. (1) The
arbitral proceedings are terminated by the final award or by an order
of the arbitral tribunal in accordance with subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) The arbitral tribunal shall issue an order for the termination
of the arbitral proceedings when:
(a) The claimant withdraws its claim, unless the respondent objects
thereto and the arbitral tribunal recognizes a legitimate interest on
the respondent's part in obtaining a final settlement of the dispute;
(b) The parties agree on the termination of the proceedings; or
(c) The arbitral tribunal finds that the continuation of the
proceedings has for any other reason become unnecessary or impossible.
(3) The mandate of the arbitral tribunal terminates with the
termination of the arbitral proceedings, subject to the provisions of
sections 44 and 45(4) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 44 CORRECTION AND INTERPRETATION OF AWARD;
ADDITIONAL AWARD. (1) Within thirty days of receipt of the award,
unless another period of time has been agreed upon by the parties:
(a) A party, with notice to the other party, may request the
arbitral tribunal to correct in the award any errors in computation,
any clerical or typographical errors, or any errors of similar nature;
(b) If so agreed by the parties, a party, with notice to the other
party, may request the arbitral tribunal to give an interpretation of
a specific point or part of the award; and
(c) If the arbitral tribunal considers the request to be justified,
it shall make the correction or give the interpretation within thirty
days of receipt of the request. The interpretation shall form part of
the award.
(2) The arbitral tribunal may correct any error of the type
referred to in subsection (1)(a) of this section on its own initiative
within thirty days of the date of the award.
(3) Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, a party, with notice to
the other party, may request, within thirty days of receipt of the
award, the arbitral tribunal to make an additional award as to claims
presented in the arbitral proceedings but omitted from the award. If
the arbitral tribunal considers the request to be justified, it shall
make the additional award within sixty days.
(4) The arbitral tribunal may extend, if necessary, the period of
time within which it shall make a correction, interpretation, or an
additional award under subsection (1) or (3) of this section.
(5) The provisions of section 42 of this act shall apply to a
correction or interpretation of the award or to an additional award.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 45 APPLICATION FOR SETTING ASIDE AS EXCLUSIVE
RECOURSE AGAINST ARBITRAL AWARD. (1) Recourse to the superior court
against an arbitral award may be made only by an application for
setting aside in accordance with subsections (2) and (3) of this
section.
(2) An arbitral award may be set aside by the superior court only
if:
(a) the party making the application furnishes proof that:
(i) A party to the arbitration agreement referred to in section 8
of this act was under some incapacity, or the said agreement is not
valid under the law to which the parties have subjected it or, failing
any indication thereon, under the law of this state;
(ii) The party making the application was not given proper notice
of the appointment of an arbitrator or of the arbitral proceedings or
was otherwise unable to present its case;
(iii) The award deals with a dispute not contemplated by or not
falling within the terms of the submission to arbitration, or contains
decisions on matters beyond the scope of the submission to arbitration,
provided that, if the decisions on matters submitted to arbitration can
be separated from those not so submitted, only that part of the award
which contains decisions on matters not submitted to arbitration may be
set aside; or
(iv) The composition of the arbitral tribunal or the arbitral
procedure was not in accordance with the agreement of the parties,
unless such agreement was in conflict with a provision of this chapter
from which the parties cannot derogate, or, failing such agreement, was
not in accordance with this chapter; or
(b) The court finds that:
(i) The subject matter of the dispute is not capable of settlement
by arbitration under the law of this state; or
(ii) The award is in conflict with the public policy of this state.
(3) An application for setting aside may not be made after three
months have elapsed from the date on which the party making that
application had received the award or, if a request had been made under
section 44 of this act, from the date on which that request had been
disposed of by the arbitral tribunal.
(4) The court, when asked to set aside an award, may, where
appropriate and so requested by a party, suspend the setting aside
proceedings for a period of time determined by it in order to give the
arbitral tribunal an opportunity to resume the arbitral proceedings or
to take such other action as in the arbitral tribunal's opinion will
eliminate the grounds for setting aside.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 46 RECOGNITION AND ENFORCEMENT. (1) An
arbitral award, irrespective of the country in which it was made, shall
be recognized as binding and, upon application in writing to the
superior court, shall be enforced subject to the provisions of this
section and of section 47 of this act.
(2) The party relying on an award or applying for its enforcement
shall supply the original award or a copy thereof. If the award is not
made in English, the court may request the party to supply a
translation thereof into English.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 47 GROUNDS FOR REFUSING RECOGNITION OR
ENFORCEMENT. (1) Recognition or enforcement of an arbitral award,
irrespective of the country in which it was made, may be refused only:
(a) At the request of the party against whom it is invoked, if that
party furnishes to the competent court where recognition or enforcement
is sought proof that:
(i) A party to the arbitration agreement referred to in section 8
of this act was under some incapacity, or the said agreement is not
valid under the law to which the parties have subjected it or, failing
any indication thereon, under the law of the country where the award
was made;
(ii) The party against whom the award is invoked was not given
proper notice of the appointment of an arbitrator or of the arbitral
proceedings or was otherwise unable to present its case;
(iii) The award deals with a dispute not contemplated by or not
falling within the terms of the submission to arbitration, or contains
decisions on matters beyond the scope of the submission to arbitration,
provided that, if the decisions on matters submitted to arbitration can
be separated from those not so submitted, that part of the award which
contains decisions on matters submitted to arbitration may be
recognized and enforced;
(iv) The composition of the arbitral tribunal or the arbitral
procedure was not in accordance with the agreement of the parties, or,
failing such agreement, was not in accordance with the law of the
country where the arbitration took place; or
(v) The award has not yet become binding on the parties or has been
set aside or suspended by a court of the country in which, or under the
law of which, that award was made; or
(b) The court finds that:
(i) The subject matter of the dispute is not capable of settlement
by arbitration under the law of this state; or
(ii) The recognition or enforcement of the award would be contrary
to the public policy of this state.
(2) If an application for setting aside or suspension of an award
has been made to a court referred to in subsection (1)(a)(v) of this
section, the court where recognition or enforcement is sought may, if
it considers it proper, adjourn its decision and may also, on the
application of the party claiming recognition or enforcement of the
award, order the other party to provide appropriate security.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 48 Sections 1 through 47 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

--- END ---