BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 57.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board of commissioners of a district that had an annual
operating budget of five million dollars or more in each of the
preceding three years may by resolution adopt a policy to issue its own
warrants for payment of claims or other obligations of the district.
The board of commissioners, after auditing all payrolls and bills, may
authorize the issuing of one general certificate to the county
treasurer, to be signed by the president of the board of commissioners,
authorizing the county treasurer to pay all the warrants specified by
date, number, name, and amount, and the accounting funds on which the
warrants are drawn. The district may then issue the warrants specified
in the general certificate.
(2) The board of commissioners of a district that had an annual
operating budget of greater than two hundred fifty thousand dollars and
under five million dollars in each of the preceding three years may
upon agreement between the county treasurer and the district
commission, with approval of the district commission by resolution,
adopt a policy to issue its own warrants for payment of claims or other
obligations of the district. The board of commissioners, after
auditing all payrolls and bills, may authorize the issuing of one
general certificate to the county treasurer, to be signed by the
president of the board of commissioners, authorizing the county
treasurer to pay all the warrants specified by date, number, name, and
amount, and the accounting funds on which the warrants are drawn. The
district may then issue the warrants specified in the general
certificate.

--- END ---