BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.42.010 and 2012 c 24 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Attorney general" means the attorney general of the state of
Washington or any person designated by the attorney general to carry
out a responsibility of the attorney general under this chapter.
(2) "Business loan" means a loan or extension of credit granted to
a business entity that: (a) Is owned and operated by a service member,
in which the service member is either (i) a sole proprietor, or (ii)
the owner of at least fifty percent of the entity; and (b) experiences
a material reduction in revenue due to the service member's military
service.
(((2))) (3) "Dependent" means:
(a) The service member's spouse;
(b) The service member's minor child; or
(c) An individual for whom the service member provided more than
one-half of the individual's support for one hundred eighty days
immediately preceding an application for relief under this chapter.
(((3))) (4) "Financial institution" means an institution as defined
in RCW 30.22.041.
(((4))) (5) "Judgment" does not include temporary orders as issued
by a judicial court or administrative tribunal in domestic relations
cases under Title 26 RCW, including but not limited to establishment of
a temporary child support obligation, creation of a temporary parenting
plan, or entry of a temporary protective or restraining order.
(((5))) (6) "Military service" means a service member:
(a) Under a call to active service authorized by the president of
the United States or the secretary of defense for a period of more than
thirty consecutive days; or
(b) Under a call to service authorized by the governor under RCW
38.08.040 for a period of more than thirty consecutive days.
(((6))) (7) "National guard" has the meaning in RCW 38.04.010.
(((7))) (8) "Service member" means any resident of Washington state
who is a member of the national guard or member of a military reserve
component.

Sec. 2 RCW 38.42.020 and 2005 c 254 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any service member who is ordered to report for military
service and his or her dependents are entitled to the rights and
protections of this chapter during the period beginning on the date on
which the service member receives the order and ending one hundred
eighty days after termination of or release from military service.
(2) This chapter applies to any judicial or administrative
proceeding commenced in any court or agency in Washington state in
which a service member or his or her dependent is a ((defendant))
party. This chapter does not apply to criminal proceedings.
(3) This chapter shall be construed liberally so as to provide
fairness and do substantial justice to service members and their
dependents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 38.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The federal Servicemembers Civil Relief Act of 2003, P.L.
108-189, as amended, is specifically declared to apply in proper cases
in all the courts of this state.
(2) A violation of the federal Servicemembers Civil Relief Act of
2003 is a violation of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 38.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter may in a
civil action:
(a) Obtain any appropriate equitable or declaratory relief with
respect to the violation; and
(b) Recover all other appropriate relief, including monetary
damages.
(2) The court may award to a person aggrieved by a violation of
this chapter who prevails in an action brought under subsection (1)(a)
of this section the costs of the action, including reasonable
attorneys' fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 38.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Civil proceedings to enforce this chapter may be brought by the
attorney general against any person that:
(a) Engages in a pattern or practice of violating this chapter; or
(b) Engages in a violation of this chapter that raises an issue of
significant public importance.
(2) In a civil action commenced under subsection (1)(a) of this
section, the court may:
(a) Grant any appropriate equitable or declaratory relief with
respect to the violation of this chapter;
(b) Award all other appropriate relief, including monetary damages,
to any person aggrieved by the violation; and
(c) May, to vindicate the public interest, assess a civil penalty:
(i) In an amount not exceeding fifty-five thousand dollars for a
first violation; and
(ii) In an amount not exceeding one hundred ten thousand dollars
for any subsequent violation.
(3) Upon timely application, a person aggrieved by a violation of
this chapter with respect to which the civil action is commenced may
intervene in such an action and may obtain appropriate relief as the
person could obtain in a civil action under section 3 of this act with
respect to that violation, along with costs and reasonable attorneys'
fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 38.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the attorney general believes that any person may:
(a) Be in possession, custody, or control of any original or copy of
any book, record, report, memorandum, paper, communication, tabulation,
map, chart, photograph, mechanical transcription, or other tangible
document or recording, wherever situated, which he or she believes to
be relevant to the subject matter of an investigation of a possible
violation of this chapter, or federal statutes dealing with the same or
similar matters that the attorney general is authorized to enforce; or
(b) have knowledge of any information that the attorney general
believes relevant to the subject matter of such an investigation, he or
she may, prior to the institution of a civil proceeding thereon,
execute in writing and cause to be served upon such a person, a civil
investigative demand requiring such a person to produce the documentary
material and permit inspection and copying, to answer in writing
written interrogatories, to give oral testimony, or any combination of
these demands pertaining to the documentary material or information.
Documents and information obtained under this section are not
admissible in criminal prosecutions.
(2) Each demand must:
(a) State the statute and section or sections thereof, the alleged
violation of which is under investigation, and the general subject
matter of the investigation;
(b) If the demand is for the production of documentary material,
describe the class or classes of documentary material to be produced
thereunder with reasonable specificity so as fairly to indicate the
material demanded;
(c) Prescribe a return date within which the documentary material
is to be produced, the answers to written interrogatories are to be
made, or a date, time, and place at which oral testimony is to be
taken; and
(d) Identify the members of the attorney general's staff to whom
the documentary material is to be made available for inspection and
copying, to whom answers to written interrogatories are to be made, or
who are to conduct the examination for oral testimony.
(3) No demand may:
(a) Contain any requirement that would be unreasonable or improper
if contained in a subpoena duces tecum, a request for answers to
written interrogatories, or a request for deposition upon oral
examination issued by a court of this state; or
(b) Require the disclosure of any documentary material that would
be privileged or which for any other reason would not be required by a
subpoena duces tecum issued by a court of this state.
(4) Service of such a demand may be made by:
(a) Delivering a duly executed copy thereof to the person to be
served, or, if such a person is not a natural person, to any officer or
managing agent of the person to be served;
(b) Delivering a duly executed copy thereof to the principal place
of business in this state of the person to be served; or
(c) Mailing by registered or certified mail a duly executed copy
thereof addressed to the person to be served at the principal place of
business in this state, or, if the person has no place of business in
this state, to his or her principal office or place of business.
(5)(a) Documentary material demanded pursuant to the provisions of
this section must be produced for inspection and copying during normal
business hours at the principal office or place of business of the
person served, or at such other times and places as may be agreed upon
by the person served and the attorney general;
(b) Written interrogatories in a demand served under this section
must be answered in the same manner as provided in the civil rules for
superior court;
(c) The oral testimony of any person obtained pursuant to a demand
served under this section must be taken in the same manner as provided
in the civil rules for superior court for the taking of depositions.
In the course of the deposition, the assistant attorney general
conducting the examination may exclude from the place where the
examination is held all persons other than the person being examined,
the person's counsel, and the officer before whom the testimony is to
be taken;
(d) Any person compelled to appear pursuant to a demand for oral
testimony under this section may be accompanied by counsel;
(e) The oral testimony of any person obtained pursuant to a demand
served under this section must be taken in the county within which the
person resides, is found, or transacts business, or in another place as
may be agreed upon between the person served and the attorney general.
(6) If, after prior court approval, a civil investigative demand
specifically prohibits disclosure of the existence or content of the
demand, unless otherwise ordered by a superior court for good cause
shown, it is a misdemeanor for any person if not a bank, trust company,
mutual savings bank, credit union, or savings and loan association
organized under the laws of the United States or of any one of the
states to disclose to any other person the existence or content of the
demand, except for disclosure to counsel for the recipient of the
demand or unless otherwise required by law.
(7) No documentary material, answers to written interrogatories, or
transcripts of oral testimony produced pursuant to a demand, or copies
thereof, shall, unless otherwise ordered by a superior court for good
cause shown, be produced for inspection or copying by, nor may the
contents thereof be disclosed to, other than an authorized employee of
the attorney general, without the consent of the person who produced
the material, answered written interrogatories, or gave oral testimony,
except as otherwise provided in this section: PROVIDED, That:
(a) Under the reasonable terms and conditions as the attorney
general prescribes, the copies of the documentary material, answers to
written interrogatories, or transcripts of oral testimony must be
available for inspection and copying by the person who produced the
material, answered written interrogatories, or gave oral testimony, or
any duly authorized representative of such a person;
(b) The attorney general or any assistant attorney general may use
the copies of documentary material, answers to written interrogatories,
or transcripts of oral testimony as he or she determines necessary in
the enforcement of this chapter, including presentation before any
court: PROVIDED, That any material, answers to written
interrogatories, or transcripts of oral testimony that contain trade
secrets may not be presented except with the approval of the court in
which action is pending after adequate notice to the person furnishing
the material, answers to written interrogatories, or oral testimony.
(8) At any time before the return date specified in the demand, or
within twenty days after the demand has been served, whichever period
is shorter, a petition to extend the return date for, or to modify or
set aside a demand issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section,
stating good cause, may be filed in the superior court for Thurston
county, or in another county where the parties reside. A petition, by
the person on whom the demand is served, stating good cause, to require
the attorney general or any person to perform any duty imposed by the
provisions of this section, and all other petitions in connection with
a demand, may be filed in the superior court for Thurston county, or in
the county where the parties reside. The court has jurisdiction to
impose such sanctions as are provided for in the civil rules for
superior court with respect to discovery motions.
(9) Whenever any person fails to comply with any civil
investigative demand for documentary material, answers to written
interrogatories, or oral testimony duly served upon him or her under
this section, or whenever satisfactory copying or reproduction of any
such material cannot be done and the person refuses to surrender the
material, the attorney general may file, in the trial court of general
jurisdiction of the county in which the person resides, is found, or
transacts business, and serve upon the person a petition for an order
of the court for the enforcement of this section, except that if the
person transacts business in more than one county the petition must be
filed in the county in which the person maintains his or her principal
place of business, or in another county as may be agreed upon by the
parties to the petition. Whenever any petition is filed in the trial
court of general jurisdiction of any county under this section, the
court has jurisdiction to hear and determine the matter so presented
and to enter such an order or orders as may be required to carry into
effect the provisions of this section, and may impose such sanctions as
are provided for in the civil rules for superior court with respect to
discovery motions.

Sec. 7 RCW 73.16.070 and 2001 c 133 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The federal ((soldiers' and sailors' civil relief act of 1940,
Public Act No. 861)) Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment
Rights Act, P.L. 103-353, as amended, is hereby specifically declared
to apply in proper cases in all the courts of this state.

--- END ---