BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning on the effective date of this section, the license
issuance fee under RCW 66.24.630(4) does not apply to any spirits
retail licensee with respect to sales of spirits in original containers
to retailers licensed to sell spirits for consumption on the premises.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---