BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that the
liberty interest of a parent to make decisions concerning the
upbringing, education, management, and care of his or her child is a
fundamental right.
(2) Neither the state nor any political subdivision of the state,
nor any agency, officer, or employee thereof, may infringe this
fundamental right without demonstrating that its governmental interest
as applied to the parent is a compelling interest of the highest order
and may not otherwise be served.
(3) The legislature further recognizes that this fundamental right
does not: (a) Authorize a parent to abuse or neglect his or her child
or engage in any other unlawful conduct against his or her child; or
(b) prohibit courts, law enforcement agencies, or agencies which
provide child protective services, or the employees of such agencies,
from acting within their official capacity pursuant to law.
(4) Except as otherwise provided by express statutory language, the
provisions of this section apply to any state statute or rule, or any
local ordinance, rule, or regulation, and the implementation of any
such statute, ordinance, rule, or regulation, regardless of whether
such statute, ordinance, rule, or regulation was adopted or effective
before, on, or after the effective date of this section. Any statutory
law adopted after the effective date of this section is subject to this
chapter unless such law explicitly excludes such application by express
reference to this chapter.
(5) As used in this section, "child protective services" has the
same meaning as defined in RCW 26.44.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The provisions of this chapter must be
broadly construed to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 26 RCW.

--- END ---