BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.36.375 and 1997 c 219 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a ((personal)) wireless service provider applies to site
several ((microcells and/or minor)) wireless service facilities in a
single geographical area:
(a) If one or more of the ((microcells and/or minor)) wireless
service facilities are not exempt from the requirements of RCW
43.21C.030(2)(c), local governmental entities are encouraged: (i) To
allow the applicant, at the applicant's discretion, to file a single
set of documents required by chapter 43.21C RCW that will apply to all
the ((microcells and/or minor)) wireless service facilities to be
sited; and (ii) to render decisions under chapter 43.21C RCW regarding
all the ((microcells and/or minor)) wireless service facilities in a
single administrative proceeding; and
(b) Local governmental entities are encouraged: (i) To allow the
applicant, at the applicant's discretion, to file a single set of
documents for land use permits that will apply to all the ((microcells
and/or minor)) wireless service facilities to be sited; and (ii) to
render decisions regarding land use permits for all the ((microcells
and/or minor)) wireless service facilities in a single administrative
proceeding.
(c) For small cell networks involving multiple individual small
cell facilities, local governmental entities shall allow the applicant,
if the applicant so chooses, to file a consolidated application and
receive a single permit for the small cell network instead of filing
separate applications for each individual small cell facility.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "((Personal)) Wireless services" means data and
telecommunications services, including commercial mobile services,
commercial mobile data services, unlicensed wireless services, and
common carrier wireless exchange access services, as defined by federal
laws and regulations.
(b) (("Microcell" means a wireless communication facility
consisting of an antenna that is either: (i) Four feet in height and
with an area of not more than five hundred eighty square inches; or
(ii) if a tubular antenna, no more than four inches in diameter and no
more than six feet in length.
(c) "Minor facility" means a wireless communication facility
consisting of up to three antennas, each of which is either: (i) Four
feet in height and with an area of not more than five hundred eighty
square inches; or (ii) if a tubular antenna, no more than four inches
in diameter and no more than six feet in length; and the associated
equipment cabinet that is six feet or less in height and no more than
forty-eight square feet in floor area.)) "Wireless service facility"
means a facility for the provision of wireless services.
(c) "Small cell facility" means either:
(i) A wireless service facility as defined by the federal
telecommunications act of 1996, as amended as of the effective date of
this section; or
(ii) A wireless service facility that meets both of the following
qualifications:
(A) Each antenna is located inside an antenna enclosure of no more
than three cubic feet in volume or, in the case of an antenna that has
exposed elements, the antenna and all of its exposed elements could fit
within an imaginary enclosure of no more than three cubic feet; and
(B) Primary equipment enclosures are no larger than seventeen cubic
feet in volume. The following associated equipment may be located
outside the primary equipment enclosure and if so located, are not
included in the calculation of equipment volume: Electric meter,
concealment, telecom demarcation box, ground-based enclosures, battery
back-up power systems, grounding equipment, power transfer switch, and
cut-off switch.
(d) "Small cell network" means a collection of interrelated small
cell facilities designed to deliver wireless service to a defined
geographic area.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.21.860 and 2007 c 6 s 1020 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No city or town may impose a franchise fee or any other fee or
charge of whatever nature or description upon the light and power, or
gas distribution businesses, as defined in RCW 82.16.010, or telephone
business, as defined in RCW 82.16.010, or service provider for use of
the right-of-way, except:
(a) A tax authorized by RCW 35.21.865 may be imposed;
(b) A fee may be charged to such businesses or service providers
that recovers actual administrative expenses incurred by a city or town
that are directly related to receiving and approving a permit, license,
and franchise, to inspecting plans and construction, or to the
preparation of a detailed statement pursuant to chapter 43.21C RCW;
(c) Taxes permitted by state law on service providers;
(d) Franchise requirements and fees for cable television services
as allowed by federal law; and
(e) A site-specific charge pursuant to an agreement between the
city or town and a service provider of personal wireless services
acceptable to the parties for:
(i) The placement of new structures in the right-of-way regardless
of height, unless the new structure is the result of a mandated
relocation in which case no charge will be imposed if the previous
location was not charged;
(ii) The placement of replacement structures when the replacement
is necessary for the installation or attachment of wireless facilities,
the replacement structure is higher than the replaced structure, and
the overall height of the replacement structure and the wireless
facility is more than sixty feet; or
(iii) The placement of personal wireless facilities on structures
owned by the city or town located in the right-of-way. However, a
site-specific charge shall not apply to the placement of personal
wireless facilities on existing structures, unless the structure is
owned by the city or town.
A city or town is not required to approve the use permit for the
placement of a facility for personal wireless services that meets one
of the criteria in this subsection absent such an agreement. If the
parties are unable to agree on the amount of the charge, the service
provider may submit the amount of the charge to binding arbitration by
serving notice on the city or town. Within thirty days of receipt of
the initial notice, each party shall furnish a list of acceptable
arbitrators. The parties shall select an arbitrator; failing to agree
on an arbitrator, each party shall select one arbitrator and the two
arbitrators shall select a third arbitrator for an arbitration panel.
The arbitrator or arbitrators shall determine the charge based on
comparable siting agreements involving public land and rights-of-way.
The arbitrator or arbitrators shall not decide any other disputed
issues, including but not limited to size, location, and zoning
requirements. Costs of the arbitration, including compensation for the
arbitrator's services, must be borne equally by the parties
participating in the arbitration and each party shall bear its own
costs and expenses, including legal fees and witness expenses, in
connection with the arbitration proceeding.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit franchise fees
imposed on an electrical energy, natural gas, or telephone business, by
contract existing on April 20, 1982, with a city or town, for the
duration of the contract, but the franchise fees shall be considered
taxes for the purposes of the limitations established in RCW 35.21.865
and 35.21.870 to the extent the fees exceed the costs allowable under
subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---