BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide mechanisms for low-cost financing of energy systems on the
distribution side of the electricity grid, to provide for consumer
protection of customers of these systems, and to recognize electric
utility efforts in being early adopters of programs that encourage
energy independence by customers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Biomass energy" includes: (i) Organic by-products of
pulping and the wood manufacturing process; (ii) animal manure; (iii)
solid organic fuels from wood; (iv) forest or field residues; (v)
untreated wooden demolition or construction debris; (vi) food waste and
food processing residuals; (vii) liquors derived from algae; (viii)
dedicated energy crops; and (ix) yard waste.
(b) "Biomass energy" does not include: (i) Wood pieces that have
been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) wood from old growth
forests; or (iii) municipal solid waste.
(2) "Electric utility" means a consumer-owned utility or investor-owned utility as those terms are defined in RCW 19.280.020.
(3) "High efficiency cogeneration" means the sequential production
of electricity and useful thermal energy from a common fuel source,
where, under normal operating conditions, the facility has a useful
thermal energy output of no less than seventy-two percent of the total
energy output.
(4) "Leased energy system" means a renewable energy system that is:
(a) Located in Washington;
(b) Installed on an individual's, business's, or local government's
real property that is not leased and is provided electricity generated
by an electric utility; and
(c) Owned by:
(i) An electric utility and leased to a customer; or
(ii) A third-party vendor that has contracted with a customer of an
electric utility to lease a renewable energy system.
(5) "Renewable energy system" includes: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c)
solar energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) wave, ocean,
or tidal power; (g) gas from sewage treatment facilities; (h) biodiesel
fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135 that is not derived from crops raised
on land cleared from old growth or first-growth forests where the
clearing occurred after December 7, 2006; (i) biomass energy; or (j)
high efficiency cogeneration.
(6) "Third-party vendor" means an entity that seeks to lease and
install renewable energy systems to electric utility customers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) An electric utility may offer a leased
energy program. The leased energy program must offer to customers
across all rate classes the opportunity to lease from the electric
utility a renewable energy system that will be installed on the
customer's property.
(2) If an electric utility offers a leased energy program, no other
entity may offer leases to the utility's customers.
(3) If an electric utility does not offer a leased energy program
that provides customers across all rate classes access to renewable
energy systems on their property, third-party vendors may offer these
systems through leases to the electric utility's customers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) An electric utility that offers a
utility program as provided in section 3 of this act shall maintain a
registry of contractors operating in the electric utility's service
area that are licensed to install renewable energy systems. The
electric utility shall provide the names and contact information for
the contractors listed in the registry to customers who have indicated
an interest in the utility program, in order to assist customers in
identifying available renewable energy system installment services.
(2) In the case of a consumer-owned utility, the consumer-owned
utility must follow applicable laws governing procurement and public
works, as provided in chapters 54.04 and 39.04 RCW.
(3) In the case of an investor-owned utility, the investor-owned
utility is encouraged to include in the registry all licensed
contractors known to work in the utility's service area and any
licensed contractor who requests to be included in the registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Electric utilities or third-party vendors
are encouraged to offer to customers the option to purchase the
renewable energy system at the end of the lease term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Any customer leasing a renewable energy
system from an electric utility or a third-party vendor must be able to
transfer the obligation with any change of ownership of the underlying
property.
(2) Anticipating widespread adoption of leased energy systems and
associated energy storage systems, the legislature finds it prudent to
help facilitate the change of ownership of the underlying property by
making sure owners disclose to customers and customers are fully
informed of any environmental liabilities and disposal costs, if there
be any, associated with the renewable energy system and any associated
energy storage system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The department of ecology shall conduct
an assessment of the environmental consequences, throughout the product
lifecycle, associated with leased energy systems and energy storage
systems installed in Washington containing hazardous materials, rare
earth minerals, and other commercially valuable materials. The
assessment must include a review of available and potential disposal
and recycling options to properly manage hazardous wastes, and recover
rare earth minerals and other commercially valuable materials.
(2) The department of ecology shall identify and convene
appropriate parties to develop recommendations on the responsible
management of hazardous wastes and the recovery of rare earth minerals
and other commercially valuable materials contained in renewable energy
systems at the end of a system's life. The department of ecology shall
present its report and recommendations to the legislature, consistent
with RCW 43.01.036, by December 1, 2014.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The utilities and transportation
commission shall publish, without disclosing proprietary information,
a list of financing models being offered by investor-owned utilities or
third-party vendors registered as competitive electrical companies.
(2) The governing boards of customer-owned utilities shall publish,
without disclosing proprietary information, a list of financing models
being offered by the utility or third-party vendors registered as
competitive electrical companies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 80.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Only leased energy systems that can store up to twenty percent
of the maximum total system hourly output for four hours are eligible
for net metering.
(2) Electric utilities or third-party vendors offering leased
energy systems may offer centralized energy storage systems on the
distribution system to meet the storage requirements in subsection (1)
of this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "leased energy system" has
the same meaning as defined in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Third-party vendors of distributed renewable energy systems are
electrical companies as defined in this title and are subject to the
jurisdiction of the commission.
(b) A competitive marketplace with effective competition exists for
the provision of leasing and installation of distributed renewable
energy systems in the state of Washington.
(c) Traditional rate of return, rate base regulation of electrical
companies providing leasing and installation of distributed renewable
energy systems may not provide the most efficient and effective means
of achieving the public policy goals of this state as declared in RCW
80.28.024, 80.28.074, and this section. The commission is authorized
to employ an alternative form of regulation if that alternative is
better suited to achieving those policy goals.
(d) The commission should retain its authority to protect consumers
of distributed renewable energy systems from unreasonable deceptive
practices. Nothing in this act precludes the office of the attorney
general from exercising its statutory authority concerning consumer
protection.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "renewable energy system" has
the same meaning as defined in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A third-party vendor must register with the commission as a
competitive electrical company before beginning operations in this
state to lease and install distributed renewable energy systems. The
registration must be on a form prescribed by the commission and contain
that information as the commission may by rule require, but must
include at a minimum: The name and address of the company; the name
and address of the company's registered agent, if any; the name,
address, and title of each officer or director; the company's most
current balance sheet; the company's latest annual report, if any; and
a description of the services the company offers or intends to offer.
(2) The commission may require as a precondition to registration
the procurement of a performance bond sufficient to cover any advances
or deposits the electrical company may collect from its customers or
order that the advances or deposits be held in escrow or trust.
(3) The commission may deny registration to any company that:
(a) Does not provide the information required by this section;
(b) Fails to provide a performance bond, if required;
(c) Does not possess adequate financial resources to provide the
proposed service; or
(d) Does not possess adequate technical competency to provide the
proposed service.
(4) The commission shall take action to approve or issue a notice
of hearing concerning any application for registration within thirty
days after receiving the application. The commission may approve an
application with or without a hearing. The commission may deny an
application after a hearing.
(5) The commission may adopt rules that describe the manner by
which it will regulate competitive electrical companies, as well as the
process for considering applications for registration under this title.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "renewable energy system" has
the same meaning as defined in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Competitive electrical companies must be subject to minimal
regulation. The commission may waive any regulatory requirement under
this title for competitive electrical companies when it determines that
competition will serve the same purposes as public interest regulation.
The commission may waive different regulatory requirements for
different companies if the different treatment is in the public
interest. A competitive electrical company must at a minimum:
(a) Keep its accounts according to regulations as determined by the
commission;
(b) File financial reports with the commission as required by the
commission and in a form and at times prescribed by the commission;
(c) Post its prices on a public web site available to all potential
customers; and
(d) Cooperate with commission investigations of customer
complaints.
(2) The commission may revoke any waivers it grants and may
reclassify any competitive electrical company if the revocation or
reclassification would protect the public interest.
(3) The commission may waive the requirements of RCW 80.28.090 in
whole or in part for a competitive electrical company if it finds that
competition will serve the same purpose and protect the public
interest.
(4) Competitive electrical companies must pay regulatory fees to
the commission under chapter 80.24 RCW.
(5) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon request of the commission, investor-owned utilities and third-party vendors offering leased energy systems must provide information
on the financial terms of leased energy systems currently under
contract. The commission must use this information to determine how
each party to a lease energy system contract benefits financially. In
compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the commission shall report its findings
to the appropriate energy committees of the house of representatives
and senate by December 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 6 and 8 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---