BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to make
efforts so that all parts of Washington can access economic
opportunity. Natural gas is an abundant and domestically produced
energy. The plentiful supply of natural gas has decreased the price of
this energy resource. Natural gas is the cleanest of the carbon
emitting fuels as reflected in chapter 80.80 RCW relating to
Washington's greenhouse gas emissions performance standard for new
electrical generation. Washington is well-situated to take advantage
of natural gas to achieve its policy objectives including economic
development and improving environmental conditions.
Many rural and urban areas of Washington do not have the
infrastructure necessary to access this low-cost energy resource. It
is the intent of the legislature to provide mechanisms to ensure that
as many parts of the state as possible have the economic opportunity to
utilize natural gas as an energy resource to power businesses and heat
homes. In particular, this economic opportunity should be focused on
displacing other fuel types that cause harm to state resident's health
in the form of pollution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall conduct a process that allows customers
and utilities to bring forth innovative proposals for the financing and
building of natural gas infrastructure. The goals of these innovative
proposals are to:
(a) Develop and implement alternatives to general rate case
proceedings that will cause the extension or expansion of natural gas
infrastructure to occur in order to serve some citizens of Washington.
In particular, the commission must pursue alternatives that facilitate
the extension or expansion of natural gas infrastructure to rural areas
or urban areas referred to as donut holes that have insufficient or no
access to natural gas as an energy resource;
(b) Extend natural gas services to areas where woodstoves provide
the primary source of residential heating;
(c) Encourage the development of industrial land that lacks natural
gas distribution infrastructure; and
(d) Allow gas companies to recover the capital costs of the
infrastructure over the life-cycle of that infrastructure while
mitigating the risk of stranded assets.
(2) For the purpose of this section, a "donut hole" means an area
within a utility's service territory that was underdeveloped when the
natural gas system was built out. The previously underdeveloped area
now includes homes, businesses, and institutional and industrial
facilities that could use natural gas, but does not have access to
natural gas services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2015, the commission shall adopt rules that promote
incremental investments in natural gas infrastructure expansions that
by December 1, 2025:
(a) Result in the residential conversion from wood or oil-fired
boilers for space heating to natural gas, and the conversion from hog
fuel and bunker fuel used in industrial processes to natural gas;
(b) Produce two hundred fifty million dollars in pipeline expansion
over a ten-year period, starting in 2015; and
(c) Result in fifty thousand residential natural gas conversions
that currently use wood or oil-fired boilers for space heating over a
ten-year period, starting in 2015.
(2) The progress towards meeting the milestones in subsection (1)
of this section must be measured by the commission and reported
electronically to the committees of the senate and house of
representatives with jurisdiction over energy policy by the commission
every four years by December 1st until 2025 using econometric modeling
software produced by regional economic models incorporated. If
reasonable progress is not being made towards these goals every four
years, the legislature shall make adjustments to reach the policy
milestones or adjust the milestone goals themselves.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each natural gas main extension tariff of a gas company must
include the following provisions:
(a) A maximum footage and equipment allowance provided by the gas
company at no charge to the applicant. The maximum footage and
equipment allowance may be differentiated by customer class;
(b) An economic feasibility analysis for those extensions that
exceed the maximum footage and equipment allowance prepared by the gas
company and provided to an applicant. The economic feasibility
analysis must consider the incremental revenues and costs associated
with the main extension. In those instances where the requested main
extension does not meet the economic feasibility criteria established
by the gas company, the gas company may require the customer to provide
funds to the gas company, which will make the main extension
economically feasible. The methodology employed by the gas company in
determining economic feasibility must be applied uniformly and
consistently to each applicant requiring a main extension;
(c) The timing and methodology by which the gas company will refund
any advances for construction as additional customers are served off
the main extension. The customer may request an annual survey to
determine if additional customers have been connected to and are using
service from the extension. In no case may the amount of the refund
exceed the amount originally advanced;
(d) That all advances for construction be noninterest bearing; and
(e) That a customer is eligible to receive refunds on an advance
for construction throughout the service life of the main extension.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Advance for construction" means the money provided to the
natural gas company by the applicant under the terms of a main
extension agreement the value of which may be refundable.
(b) "Main extension" means the lines and equipment necessary to
extend the existing gas distribution system to provide service to
additional customers.

--- END ---