BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that technological
developments in unmanned aircraft have expanded the vehicles' capacity
to be widely deployed in our state and in our communities. The
legislature further finds that while the federal aviation
administration modernization and reform act of 2012 establishes a
regulatory framework for the use of unmanned aircraft by public
agencies and commercial entities, the recreational use of certain small
unmanned aircraft outside of federally controlled airspace is exempt
from federal regulation. The potential for these small unmanned
aircraft to be operated in close proximity to human dwellings and
activities presents opportunities for widespread recreational use and
enjoyment. At the same time, the recreational use of unmanned aircraft
in Washington state airspace increases the likelihood of physical
trespass onto private property and invasions of personal privacy. The
legislature intends to protect personal privacy by prohibiting the use
of unmanned aircraft equipped with sensing devices that collect
personal information, including images of individuals on private
property that could not have been captured without the assistance of
the unmanned aircraft.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Active sensing device" means a sensing device that is
acquiring personal information from its surroundings. A sensing device
is not an "active sensing device" when it is capable of acquiring
personal information from its surroundings, but this functionality is
dormant or has not been activated.
(2) "Person" means a natural person.
(3) "Personal information" means:
(a) Any information that describes, locates, or indexes anything
about a person including, but not limited to, his or her social
security number, driver's license number, agency-issued identification
number, student identification number, real or personal property
holdings derived from tax returns, and his or her education, financial
transactions, medical history, ancestry, religion, political ideology,
or criminal or employment record; or
(b) Any image of a person taken from any location in the Washington
state airspace, when the person whose image has been captured is on
private property, the landowner and tenants with a right to occupy the
private property have not consented to the capture of images of their
person on the property, and the taking of such an image is in violation
of the reasonable expectation of privacy of the person. The
legislature finds and declares that except as otherwise required by the
first amendment of the United States Constitution, the reasonable
expectation of privacy of a person whose image has been captured under
the circumstances described in this subsection (3)(b) has been violated
when the image could not have been captured from outside the boundaries
of the property on which the person is located, from an ordinary
vantage point, and without the assistance of the unmanned aircraft.
This finding is intended to be in addition to, and not in derogation
of, any expectation of privacy established as reasonable by law, or
recognized by the courts, including expectations of privacy deemed
reasonable under the Constitution of the state of Washington and of the
United States.
(4)(a) "Sensing device" means a device capable of acquiring
personal information from its surroundings through any means including,
but not limited to, cameras, thermal detectors, microphones, chemical
detectors, radiation gauges, and wireless receivers in any frequency.
(b) "Sensing device" does not include equipment, the sole function
of which is to provide information directly necessary for safe air
navigation or piloting of an unmanned aircraft.
(5) "Unmanned aircraft" means an aircraft that is operated without
physical human presence on board the aircraft.
(6) "Washington state airspace" means all airspace within the
territorial limits of this state that is within class G airspace and
not otherwise classified as controlled by the federal aviation
administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) No person may operate in Washington
state airspace an unmanned aircraft that is equipped with an active
sensing device unless:
(a) The federal government has provided specific authorization for
the operation; or
(b) The operation complies with each of the conditions established
in section 4 of this act.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, "specific
authorization" by the federal government includes operation under a
certificate of authorization or other authorization issued pursuant to
the federal aviation administration modernization and reform act of
2012 (49 U.S.C. 40101 Sec. 336), but does not include operation of an
unmanned aircraft pursuant to the exemption from regulation for
recreational uses established in the special rule for model aircraft of
the federal aviation administration modernization and reform act of
2012 (49 U.S.C. 40101 Sec. 336).
(3) Nothing in this chapter may be construed as authorizing the use
of, prohibiting the use of, or regulating in any manner the use of an
unmanned aircraft by a public agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Except where specifically authorized by the
federal government, an unmanned aircraft that is equipped with an
active sensing device may not be operated in Washington state airspace
unless the following conditions are met:
(1) The unmanned aircraft is clearly and conspicuously labeled with
the name and contact information of the aircraft's owner and operator;
and
(2) The unmanned aircraft does not have an active sensing device
onboard that collects personal information about any individual without
the individual's consent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Any person who violates the requirements of
section 4 of this act with the intent to capture any type of personal
information of another person for an illicit purpose, including a
commercial purpose where the commercial use of the unmanned aircraft is
not compliant with the requirements of the federal aviation
administration modernization and reform act of 2012 or other applicable
law, is guilty of a misdemeanor, in addition to any other penalty
provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 In addition to any other remedies authorized
by law, an individual whose reasonable expectation of privacy is
violated by the use of an unmanned aircraft equipped with an active
sensing device in violation of the requirements of this chapter may
bring an action for damages from the person who committed the
violation. The person may recover actual damages or liquidated damages
of five thousand dollars, whichever is greater, and an award of costs
and reasonable attorneys' fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The remedy provided by this chapter does not
restrict any remedy that is otherwise available. The provisions of
this chapter are not exclusive and are in addition to any other
requirements, rights, remedies, and penalties provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 14 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---