BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the recent
proliferation of social networking web sites and other online services,
including mobile applications, has created an unprecedented opportunity
for individuals to create a digital persona. The legislature finds
that an individual has a privacy interest in his or her digital persona
and a right to exercise some degree of control over how the individual
projects himself or herself in the digital world. It is the intent of
the legislature to ensure that individuals who visit internet web sites
and use online or mobile services, such as social networking services,
have the opportunity to remove content or information that they have
posted, retaining control over information that contributes to their
digital personas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.190 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section
and section 3 of this act unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Operator" means any person or entity that owns a service. It
does not include any third party that operates, hosts, or manages, but
does not own, a service on the owner's behalf or processes information
on the owner's behalf.
(2) "Posted" means content or information that can be accessed by
a user in addition to the user who posted the content or information,
whether the user who posted the content is a registered user or not, of
the service where the content or information is posted.
(3) "Registered user" means a natural person who resides in the
state and who has created an account for the purpose of accessing a
service.
(4) "Service" means an internet web site, online service, online
application, or mobile application, or a portion thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.190 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An operator must:
(a) Permit a registered user of the operator's service to remove
or, if the operator prefers, to request and obtain removal of content
or information posted on the operator's service;
(b) Provide notice to a registered user of the operator's service
to remove or, if the operator prefers, request and obtain removal of
content or information posted on the operator's service;
(c) Provide clear and conspicuous instructions to a registered user
of the operator's service on how the user may remove or, if the
operator prefers, request and obtain the removal of content or
information posted on the operator's service; and
(d) Provide notice to a registered user of the operator's service
that the removal described under (a) of this subsection does not ensure
complete or comprehensive removal of the content or information posted
on the operator's service by the registered user.
(2) An operator or a third party is not required to erase or
otherwise eliminate, or to enable erasure or elimination of, content or
information if:
(a) Any other provision of federal or state law requires the
operator or third party to maintain the content or information;
(b) The content or information was stored on or posted to the
operator's service by a third party other than the registered user,
including any content or information posted by the registered user that
was stored, republished, or reposted by the third party;
(c) The operator anonymizes the content or information posted by
the registered user, so that the registered user cannot be individually
identified;
(d) The registered user does not follow clear and conspicuous
instructions provided by the operator pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of
this section in requesting or seeking to obtain the removal of content
or information posted on the operator's service; or
(e) The registered user has received compensation or other
consideration for providing the content. However, the mere provision
of the service by the operator is not deemed compensation or
consideration under this subsection.
(3) This section shall not be construed to limit the authority of
a law enforcement agency to obtain any content or information from an
operator as authorized by law or pursuant to an order of a court of
competent jurisdiction.
(4) An operator shall be deemed compliant with this section if:
(a) It renders the content or information posted by the user no
longer visible to other users of the service and the public even if the
content or information remains on the operator's servers in some form;
or
(b) Despite making the original posting by the user invisible, it
remains visible because a third party has copied the posting or
reposted the content or information posted by the user.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act may be known and cited as the
digital world privacy rights act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---