BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
COUNTY FERRY DISTRICT FUNCTIONS AND TAXING AUTHORITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 Any county with a population of one
million or more in which a county ferry district has been established
pursuant to RCW 36.54.110 through 36.54.190 with boundaries coterminous
with the boundaries of the county may by ordinance or resolution, as
the case may be, of the county legislative authority assume the rights,
powers, functions, and obligations of such county ferry district in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The assumption of the rights, powers,
functions, and obligations of a county ferry district may be initiated
by the adoption of an ordinance or a resolution, as the case may be, by
the county legislative authority indicating its intention to conduct a
hearing concerning assumption of such rights, powers, functions, and
obligations. In the event the county legislative authority adopts such
an ordinance or a resolution of intention, such ordinance or resolution
must set a time and place at which it will consider the proposed
assumption of the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of the
county ferry district, and must state that all persons interested may
appear and be heard. Such ordinance or resolution of intention must
be published for at least two times during the two weeks next preceding
the scheduled hearing in newspapers of daily general circulation
printed or published in the county in which the county ferry district
is to be located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 At the time scheduled for the hearing in
the ordinance or resolution of intention, the county legislative
authority must consider the assumption of the rights, powers,
functions, and obligations of the county ferry district, and hear those
appearing and all protests and objections to it. The county
legislative authority may continue the hearing from time to time, not
exceeding sixty days in all.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 (1) If, after receiving testimony, the
county legislative authority determines that the public interest or
welfare would be satisfied by the county assuming the rights, powers,
immunities, functions, and obligations of the county ferry district,
the county legislative authority may declare that to be its intent and
assume such rights, powers, immunities, functions, and obligations by
ordinance or resolution, as the case may be, providing thereby that the
county is vested with every right, power, immunity, function, and
obligation currently granted to or possessed by the county ferry
district pursuant to RCW 36.54.110 through 36.54.190 (including RCW
36.54.130 relating to county ferry district authority to levy and use
an annual ad valorem property tax) and other provisions of state law
applicable to county ferry districts established under RCW 36.54.110
through 36.54.190. However, in exercising such rights, powers,
immunities, functions, and obligations, all actions must be taken in
the name of the county and title to all property or property rights
vest in the county.
(2) Upon assumption of the rights, powers, immunities, functions,
and obligations of the county ferry district by the county, the
governing body established pursuant to the provisions of RCW
36.54.110(5) must be abolished; such provision must be inapplicable to
the county; and the county legislative authority is thereafter vested
with all rights, powers, immunities, functions, and obligations
otherwise vested by law in the governing board of the county ferry
district. However, in any county with a home rule charter such rights,
powers, functions, and obligations vest in accordance with the
executive and legislative responsibilities defined in such charter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 Employees and personnel of the county
ferry district do not automatically become employees of the county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 No transfer of any function made pursuant
to this chapter may be construed to impair or alter any existing rights
acquired under the provisions of RCW 36.54.110 through 36.54.190 or any
other provision of law relating to county ferry districts, nor as
impairing or altering any actions, activities, or proceedings validated
thereunder, nor as impairing or altering any civil or criminal
proceedings instituted thereunder, nor any rule, regulation, or order
promulgated thereunder, nor any administrative action taken thereunder;
and neither the assumption of control of any county ferry district
function by a county, nor any transfer of rights, powers, functions,
and obligations as provided in this chapter, may impair or alter the
validity of any act performed by such county ferry district or division
thereof or any officer thereof prior to the assumption of such rights,
powers, functions, and obligations by any county as authorized by this
chapter. Furthermore, an ad valorem property tax levy upon real and
personal property authorized by RCW 36.54.130 and levied by a county as
authorized by this chapter must be treated as a levy by a county ferry
district for all purposes including, but not limited to, limitations on
levies contained in RCW 84.52.043.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 (1) All rules and regulations, and all
pending business before the board of any county ferry district
transferred pursuant to the provisions of this chapter must be
continued and acted upon by the county.
(2) All existing contracts and obligations of the transferred
county ferry district remain in full force and effect, and must be
performed by the county. No transfer authorized in this chapter
affects the validity of any official act performed by any official or
employee prior to the transfer authorized pursuant to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 (1) When the rights, powers, functions,
and obligations of a county ferry district are transferred pursuant to
this chapter, all real and personal property owned by the county ferry
district becomes that of the county.
(2) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers,
or other writings relating to the administration of the powers, duties,
and functions transferred pursuant to this chapter and available to the
county ferry district must be made available to the county.
(3) All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and
other tangible property employed in carrying out the rights, powers,
functions, and obligations transferred by this chapter and available to
the county ferry district must be made available to the county.
(4) All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with
powers, duties, and functions transferred under this section must be
assigned to the county.
(5) Any appropriations or federal grant made to the county ferry
district for the purpose of carrying out the rights, powers,
functions, and obligations authorized to be assumed by a county
pursuant to this chapter, on the effective date of such transfer, must
be credited to the county for the purpose of carrying out such
transferred rights, powers, functions, and obligations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 (1) The county must assume and agree to
provide for the payment of all of the indebtedness of the county ferry
district including the payment and retirement of outstanding general
obligation and revenue bonds issued by the county ferry district.
Until the indebtedness of a county ferry district assumed by a county
under this chapter has been discharged, all property within the
boundaries of the county ferry district and the owners and occupants of
that property continue to be liable for taxes, special assessments, and
other charges legally pledged to pay the indebtedness of the county
ferry district. The county must assume the obligation of causing the
payment of such indebtedness, collecting such taxes, assessments, and
charges, and observing and performing the other contractual obligations
of the county ferry district. The legislative authority of the county
must act in the same manner as the governing body of the county ferry
district for the purpose of certifying the amount of any property tax
to be levied and collected therein, and may cause service and other
charges and assessments to be collected from such property or owners or
occupants thereof, enforce such collection, and perform all acts
necessary to ensure performance of the contractual obligations of the
county ferry district in the same manner and by the same means as if
the property of the county ferry district had not been acquired by the
county.
(2) When a county assumes the obligation of paying indebtedness of
a county ferry district and if property taxes or assessments have been
levied and service and other charges have accrued for such purpose but
have not been collected by the county ferry district prior to such
assumption, the same when collected must belong and be paid to the
county and be used by such county so far as necessary for payment of
the indebtedness of the county ferry district existing and unpaid on
the date such county assumed that indebtedness. Any funds received by
the county which have been collected for the purpose of paying any
bonded or other indebtedness of the county ferry district must be used
for the purpose for which they were collected and for no other purpose
until such indebtedness has been paid and retired or adequate provision
has been made for such payment and retirement. Any funds remaining
after the payment and retirement of such indebtedness must be used
solely for carrying out the rights, powers, functions, and obligations
of the county ferry district assumed by the county. No transfer of
property as provided in this chapter derogates from the claims or
rights of the creditors of the county ferry district or impair the
ability of the county ferry district to respond to its debts and
obligations.

PART II
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 Sections 101 through 109 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---