BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
establish and support an inclusive legislative-driven process to build
on the current goals of chapter 19.285 RCW, the energy independence
act. The legislature recognizes that under the best of circumstances,
it can take five years to plan and procure energy resources for the
electric grid and under the worst circumstances much longer. In a
recent report on electric utility integrated resource planning, as
required in chapter 19.280 RCW, the department of commerce noted that
there is a lack of specifically identified electric generating
resources after 2020. While the goals of the renewable portfolio
standard created in the energy independence act are many, the prime
outcomes of the energy independence act are nurturing the build out of
renewable energy resources, being as efficient with current energy
resources as possible, and creating economic opportunity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By December 31, 2014, the joint
committee on energy supply and energy conservation created in RCW
44.39.010 shall make recommendations to the energy committees of the
legislature on ways to improve the effectiveness and implementation of
the existing law and policies that would further the renewable energy
and energy efficiency goals for utilities after 2020. The joint
committee must consider how its recommendations will achieve the
following objectives:
(a) Ensure that Washington continues to capture all cost-effective
energy conservation and address any barriers to achieving this goal;
(b) Encourage renewable energy resources;
(c) Promote the greatest efficiency in using existing resources,
especially compared with states that Washington competes with
economically;
(d) Enable technologies that make existing practices and processes
more efficient;
(e) Reduce the overall amount of pollution generated in the
production and consumption of energy;
(f) Reduce the amount of wealth Washington exports to neighboring
jurisdictions for energy procurement;
(g) Keep rates as low as practical in a policy environment where
there are often competing goals;
(h) Create regulatory certainty in advance of typical energy
planning and procurement cycles; and
(i) Maximize the creation of jobs in Washington.
(2) The joint committee on energy supply and energy conservation
may also identify and recommend policies that eliminate barriers to
achieving goals identified in their recommendations, including, but not
limited to, permitting timelines, financing, and technology
availability.
(3) The joint committee on energy supply and energy conservation
shall conduct an assessment of the cost of maintenance at baseload
energy generation facilities necessary to meet the ramping and cycling
of eligible renewable resources. The joint committee must consult with
energy generation facility operators and use commercially available
information on the increased fatigue on energy generation facilities.
(4) The joint committee on energy supply and energy conservation
shall review existing reports on the capacity of the electricity grid
infrastructure to handle the load from intermittent renewable energy
resources. The joint committee shall examine potential issues that may
arise if the state's renewable energy targets are increased.
(5) The joint committee on energy supply and energy conservation
shall conduct an assessment of energy storage material supplies, costs,
and enabling technologies. The assessment must include an evaluation
of the domestic availability of the components in the supply chain and
how potential limitations in material supplies and enabling
technologies may affect the integration of renewable energy
technologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) In order to facilitate the development
of the recommendations in section 2 of this act, the joint committee on
energy supply and energy conservation shall hold a minimum of four
meetings:
(a) The first meeting must provide an opportunity for the public to
present to the joint committee on what goals the joint committee should
consider when making its recommendation to the legislature to meet the
goals in section 1 of this act;
(b) A second meeting to summarize and report on areas of consensus
and division among stakeholders. The joint committee shall direct
staff on the next steps needed in order to work through areas of
division towards consensus draft recommendations;
(c) A third meeting to take public testimony on a draft set of
recommendations. The joint committee shall deliberate and direct staff
to prepare final recommendations; and
(d) The fourth meeting to vote on final recommendations to the 2015
legislature for new or revised energy performance standards after 2020.
(2) Additional meetings may be scheduled by the joint committee on
energy supply and energy conservation as deemed necessary by the chair
before, between, or after the four meetings listed in subsection (1)(a)
through (d) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 It is widely acknowledged that as a state
and country, nearly two-thirds of the energy consumed through various
processes is lost as waste heat. To assist the joint committee on
energy supply and energy conservation deliberations in developing new
energy performance standards after 2020, the legislature directs the
Washington State University energy program to conduct a resource
assessment on the amount of new energy resources that could be made
available with a high efficiency cogeneration policy or a thermal
heating efficiency policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act expire
January 1, 2015.

--- END ---