BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 85.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Territory that is located outside of a diking district and is
contiguous to the district and that receives services from the district
may be annexed into the district using the following method:
(a) The governing body must adopt a resolution of its intent to
annex the territory. The resolution must: (i) Include a map and
description of the subject territory; (ii) indicate which service or
services the territory is receiving from the district; (iii) specify
the proposed system of assessment; and (iv) set a date and time for a
public hearing on the annexation proposal;
(b) The district must publish notice of the hearing in a newspaper
of general circulation in the district and must notify, by mail, all
property owners as determined by the records of the county assessor.
The notice required under this subsection (1)(b) must be published and
mailed at least twenty-one days, but not more than twenty-eight days,
before the public hearing. This subsection (1)(b) does not restrict or
prevent a district from publishing or mailing notices that are in
addition to the required notice;
(c) After the public hearing, which may be continued from time to
time, the governing body must decide whether to recommend the
annexation to the legislative authority of the county in which the
territory proposed for annexation is located. If the governing body
recommends the annexation, it must adopt a resolution of the
recommendation within forty-five days of its decision and forward a
copy of the resolution, together with a draft annexation ordinance, to
the applicable legislative authority;
(d) The county legislative authority, by resolution, must set a
date and time for a public hearing on the annexation proposal. The
date of the hearing must be within ninety days after the county
receives the recommendation resolution and draft annexation ordinance
from the diking district. The county legislative authority must
provide notice of the hearing, by mail, to all property owners within
the proposed annexation area as determined by the records of the county
assessor. The notice must be mailed at least twenty-one days, but not
more than twenty-eight days, before the public hearing;
(e) After the public hearing, which may be continued from time to
time, the county legislative authority must decide whether to approve,
modify, or reject the annexation proposal. The legislative authority
may remove territory from the proposal, but it may not add territory
without holding an additional public meeting and providing meeting
notice to the property owners affected by the addition that conforms
with the notice requirements of (b) of this subsection; and
(f) If the county legislative authority approves the annexation
proposal in its original or a modified form, it must do so by
ordinance. Approved annexations are effective on the first day of the
following January.
(2) For the purposes of this section, territory bounded by a river,
lake, or other body of water is contiguous to a district that is also
bounded by the same river, lake, or other body of water.

--- END ---