BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of female genital mutilation when any of the
following occur:
(a) The person knowingly circumcises, excises, or infibulates the
whole or any part of the labia majora, labia minora, or clitoris;
(b) The parent, guardian, or other person legally responsible or
charged with the care or custody of a female minor allows the
circumcision, excision, or infibulation, in whole or in part, of the
labia majora, labia minora, or clitoris; or
(c) The person knowingly removes or causes or permits the removal
of a female minor from this state for the purpose of circumcising,
excising, or infibulating, in whole or in part, the labia majora, labia
minora, or clitoris of such female.
(2) It shall not be a defense to prosecution for a violation of
this section that the conduct described in subsection (1) of this
section is required as a matter of custom, ritual, or religious
practice, or that the minor on whom it is performed consented to the
procedure, or the minor's parent or legal guardian consented to the
procedure.
(3) If the action described in subsection (1) of this section is
performed by a licensed physician during a surgical procedure, it shall
not be a violation of this section if either of the following is true:
(a) The procedure is necessary to the physical health of the minor
on whom it is performed; or
(b) The procedure is performed on a minor who is in labor or who
has just given birth and is performed for medical purposes connected
with that labor or birth.
(4) Female genital mutilation is a mandatory reportable offense for
any personnel required to report child abuse under chapter 26.44 RCW.
(5) Female genital mutilation is a class B felony.
(6) If the prosecuting attorney has a reasonable belief that any
person arrested or charged pursuant to this section is not a citizen or
national of the United States, he or she shall report the information
to the United States immigration and naturalization service in an
expeditious manner.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.44.020 and 2012 c 259 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Abuse or neglect" means sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, or
injury of a child by any person under circumstances which cause harm to
the child's health, welfare, or safety, excluding conduct permitted
under RCW 9A.16.100; or the negligent treatment or maltreatment of a
child by a person responsible for or providing care to the child. An
abused child is a child who has been subjected to child abuse or
neglect as defined in this section. Female genital mutilation under
chapter 9A.36 RCW constitutes abuse. The belief that female genital
mutilation is required as a matter of custom, ritual, or standard
practice or consent to the conduct by the child on whom it is performed
or by the child's parent or legal guardian is not an affirmative
defense to a charge of child abuse under this subsection.
(2) "Child" or "children" means any person under the age of
eighteen years of age.
(3) "Child protective services" means those services provided by
the department designed to protect children from child abuse and
neglect and safeguard such children from future abuse and neglect, and
conduct investigations of child abuse and neglect reports.
Investigations may be conducted regardless of the location of the
alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective services includes referral
to services to ameliorate conditions that endanger the welfare of
children, the coordination of necessary programs and services relevant
to the prevention, intervention, and treatment of child abuse and
neglect, and services to children to ensure that each child has a
permanent home. In determining whether protective services should be
provided, the department shall not decline to provide such services
solely because of the child's unwillingness or developmental inability
to describe the nature and severity of the abuse or neglect.
(4) "Child protective services section" means the child protective
services section of the department.
(5) "Children's advocacy center" means a child-focused facility in
good standing with the state chapter for children's advocacy centers
and that coordinates a multidisciplinary process for the investigation,
prosecution, and treatment of sexual and other types of child abuse.
Children's advocacy centers provide a location for forensic interviews
and coordinate access to services such as, but not limited to, medical
evaluations, advocacy, therapy, and case review by multidisciplinary
teams within the context of county protocols as defined in RCW
26.44.180 and 26.44.185.
(6) "Clergy" means any regularly licensed or ordained minister,
priest, or rabbi of any church or religious denomination, whether
acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any
public or private organization or institution.
(7) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington,
juvenile department.
(8) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(9) "Family assessment" means a comprehensive assessment of child
safety, risk of subsequent child abuse or neglect, and family strengths
and needs that is applied to a child abuse or neglect report. Family
assessment does not include a determination as to whether child abuse
or neglect occurred, but does determine the need for services to
address the safety of the child and the risk of subsequent
maltreatment.
(10) "Family assessment response" means a way of responding to
certain reports of child abuse or neglect made under this chapter using
a differential response approach to child protective services. The
family assessment response shall focus on the safety of the child, the
integrity and preservation of the family, and shall assess the status
of the child and the family in terms of risk of abuse and neglect
including the parent's or guardian's or other caretaker's capacity and
willingness to protect the child and, if necessary, plan and arrange
the provision of services to reduce the risk and otherwise support the
family. No one is named as a perpetrator, and no investigative finding
is entered in the record as a result of a family assessment.
(11) "Founded" means the determination following an investigation
by the department that, based on available information, it is more
likely than not that child abuse or neglect did occur.
(12) "Inconclusive" means the determination following an
investigation by the department, prior to October 1, 2008, that based
on available information a decision cannot be made that more likely
than not, child abuse or neglect did or did not occur.
(13) "Institution" means a private or public hospital or any other
facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment, or care.
(14) "Law enforcement agency" means the police department, the
prosecuting attorney, the state patrol, the director of public safety,
or the office of the sheriff.
(15) "Malice" or "maliciously" means an intent, wish, or design to
intimidate, annoy, or injure another person. Such malice may be
inferred from an act done in willful disregard of the rights of
another, or an act wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or an
act or omission of duty betraying a willful disregard of social duty.
(16) "Negligent treatment or maltreatment" means an act or a
failure to act, or the cumulative effects of a pattern of conduct,
behavior, or inaction, that evidences a serious disregard of
consequences of such magnitude as to constitute a clear and present
danger to a child's health, welfare, or safety, including but not
limited to conduct prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100. When considering
whether a clear and present danger exists, evidence of a parent's
substance abuse as a contributing factor to negligent treatment or
maltreatment shall be given great weight. The fact that siblings share
a bedroom is not, in and of itself, negligent treatment or
maltreatment. Poverty, homelessness, or exposure to domestic violence
as defined in RCW 26.50.010 that is perpetrated against someone other
than the child does not constitute negligent treatment or maltreatment
in and of itself.
(17) "Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter
18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee
or agent of any public or private organization or institution.
(18) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a
person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine and
surgery, optometry, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic
medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery or to provide other
health services. The term "practitioner" includes a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner. A person who is being furnished
Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited Christian Science
practitioner will not be considered, for that reason alone, a neglected
person for the purposes of this chapter.
(19) "Professional school personnel" include, but are not limited
to, teachers, counselors, administrators, child care facility
personnel, and school nurses.
(20) "Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice
psychology under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual
capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private
organization or institution.
(21) "Screened-out report" means a report of alleged child abuse or
neglect that the department has determined does not rise to the level
of a credible report of abuse or neglect and is not referred for
investigation.
(22) "Sexual exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing, permitting, or
encouraging a child to engage in prostitution by any person; or (b)
allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in the obscene or
pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of a child by any
person.
(23) "Sexually aggressive youth" means a child who is defined in
RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as being a sexually aggressive youth.
(24) "Social service counselor" means anyone engaged in a
professional capacity during the regular course of employment in
encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support, or education of
children, or providing social services to adults or families, including
mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and domestic violence
programs, whether in an individual capacity, or as an employee or agent
of any public or private organization or institution.
(25) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the state
under RCW 74.15.090 or an Indian tribe under RCW 74.15.190 that has
entered into a performance-based contract with the department to
provide child welfare services.
(26) "Unfounded" means the determination following an investigation
by the department that available information indicates that, more
likely than not, child abuse or neglect did not occur, or that there is
insufficient evidence for the department to determine whether the
alleged child abuse did or did not occur.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Each county prosecuting attorney shall:
(1) Keep annual statistics of the following information:
(a)(i) The number of offenders that are charged with female genital
mutilation under section 1 of this act, and (ii) the number of
offenders that are charged and convicted under section 1(1) of this
act; and
(b) The number of reports that the prosecuting attorney's office
receives that are required under section 1(4) of this act, the number
of offenders that are charged pursuant to the report, and the number of
offenders that are convicted pursuant to the report.
(2) Submit its annual report to the administrative office of the
courts. The administrative office of the courts shall submit a
consolidated report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1st of each year.

--- END ---