BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Before requiring any alterations to a child care facility due
to inconsistencies with requirements in chapter 19.27 RCW, the
department shall:
(a) Consult with the city or county enforcement official; and
(b) Receive written verification from the city or county
enforcement official that the alteration is required.
(2) The department's consultation with the city or county
enforcement official is limited to licensed child care space.
(3) Unless there is imminent danger to children or staff, the
department may not modify, suspend, or revoke a child care license or
business activities while the department is waiting to:
(a) Consult with the city or county enforcement official under
subsection (1)(a) of this section; or
(b) Receive written verification from the city or county
enforcement official that the alteration is required under subsection
(1)(b) of this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "child care facility" means
a family day care home, school-age care, and child day care center.

--- END ---