BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 On December 30, 2013, the Washington state
auditor's office issued a performance audit report, finding that state
agencies could shorten the time it takes to submit, review, and make
decisions on business permit applications through simple improvements.
In response to the performance audit findings, the legislature intends
to improve the predictability and efficiency of permit decisions by
making information about permitting assistance and timelines more
readily available to the public. The legislature finds that providing
citizens and businesses with better information about permit decisions
will assist their planning and decision making, promoting economic
development. Making permit performance data readily accessible to
citizens helps them hold government accountable to a high level of
customer service and timeliness. Finally, requiring agencies to track
the time it takes to issue permits equips agency leaders with key
information that can assist them in improving overall project
schedules, better allocating resources, and identifying additional
opportunities to better serve the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means the following executive branch agencies and
offices of statewide elected officials:
(a) Department of agriculture;
(b) Department of archaeology and historic preservation;
(c) Department of ecology;
(d) Department of fish and wildlife;
(e) Gambling commission;
(f) Department of health;
(g) Department of labor and industries;
(h) Department of licensing;
(i) Liquor control board;
(j) Department of natural resources;
(k) Parks and recreation commission;
(l) Department of revenue;
(m) Department of transportation; and
(n) Utilities and transportation commission.
(2) "Office" means the office of regulatory assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) By June 30, 2014, each agency shall
prepare and submit to the office an inventory of all the business
permits indicated in the December 30, 2013, performance audit report by
the state auditor.
(2)(a) Each agency shall track and record the time it takes to make
permitting decisions.
(b) Agencies are encouraged to track all relevant information that
can assist Washington businesses in determining how long a permit
process will take so that the businesses may successfully plan their
activities and make sound investment choices, reduce permitting costs
to the taxpayers in the form of unnecessary or duplicate staff work,
and avoid permitting decision delays that can result in higher costs
and lost revenue.
(c) At a minimum, each agency shall track and record the following
information for each permit application it receives or decision it
issues:
(i) The application completion time, which is the time elapsed from
the initial submission of an application by an entity seeking a permit
to the time at which the agency has determined that the application is
complete; and
(ii) The permit decision time, which is the time elapsed from
receipt of a complete application to the agency's issuance of a
decision approving or denying the permit.
(3) Each agency shall calculate, for each permit it has identified
in its inventory, the following performance data:
(a) The average application completion and permit decision times
for each permit, as measured by the times tracked for ninety percent of
applications or permit decisions, excluding the five percent that took
the shortest and the five percent that took the longest;
(b) The maximum application completion time, excluding applications
that were withdrawn or never completed; and
(c) The maximum permit decision time.
(4) Each agency shall report to the office, as provided in this
subsection (4).
(a) By March 1, 2016, each agency shall report the times calculated
under subsection (3) of this section for the period from January 1,
2015, to January 1, 2016.
(b) By March 1, 2018, and March 1, 2020, each agency shall report
based on the times tracked and calculated since the previous reporting
period.
(c) In each of the reports required under this section, each agency
shall submit an updated inventory of permits. Each agency shall
identify any permits listed in its inventory for which the agency has
not yet posted permit processing times and other information as
required under section 4 of this act and an estimated date for such
posting prior to June 30, 2015.
(5) The office shall make available to the legislature, upon
request, the individual agency reports submitted under subsection (4)
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) To provide meaningful customer service
that informs project planning and decision making by the citizens and
businesses served, each agency must make available to permit applicants
the following information through a link from the agency's web site to
the office's web site, as provided in subsection (4) of this section:
(a) A list of the types of permit assistance available and how such
assistance may be accessed;
(b) An estimate of the time required by the agency to process a
permit application and issue a decision;
(c) Other tools to help applicants successfully complete a thorough
application, such as:
(i) Examples of model completed applications;
(ii) Examples of approved applications, appropriately redacted to
remove sensitive information; and
(iii) Checklists for ensuring a complete application.
(2) Each agency shall update at reasonable intervals the
information it posts pursuant to this section.
(3)(a) Agencies must post the information required under subsection
(1) of this section for all permits as soon as practicable, and no
later than the deadlines established in this section.
(b) The agency shall post the permit inventory for that agency and
the information required under subsection (1)(a) and (c) of this
section no later than June 30, 2014.
(c) The agency shall post the estimates of application completion
and permit decision times required under subsection (1)(b) of this
section based on actual data for calendar year 2015 by March 1, 2016,
and update this information for the previous calendar year, by March
1st of each year thereafter.
(d) Agencies must consider the customer experience in ensuring all
permit assistance information is simple to use, easy to access, and
designed in a customer-friendly manner.
(4) To ensure agencies can post the required information online
with minimal expenditure of agency resources, the office of the chief
information officer shall, in consultation with the office of
regulatory assistance, establish a central repository of this
information, hosted on the office of regulatory assistance's web site.
Each agency shall include at least one link to the central repository
from the agency's web site. Agencies shall place the link or links in
such locations as the agency deems will be most customer-friendly and
maximize accessibility of the information to users of the web site.
(5) The office shall ensure the searchability of the information
posted on the central repository, applying industry best practices such
as search engine optimization, to ensure that the permit performance
and assistance information is readily findable and accessible by
members of the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) By September 30th of 2016 and each even-numbered year thereafter up to and including 2020, the office shall
publish a comprehensive progress report to the economic development
committees of the house of representatives and the senate and to the
governor on the performance of agencies in tracking permit timelines
and other efforts to improve clarity and predictability of regulatory
permitting. The report must include at a minimum for each agency a
summary of the data reported by the agency to the office under section
3(4) of this act.
(2) The office shall post the comprehensive progress report on its
web site. The report must be easily accessible and designed in a
customer-friendly format.
(3) Beginning with the 2016 report, the office must identify
permits with processing and decision times that are most improved and
processing and decision times that are most in need of improvement, as
indicated by the performance data collected under section 3 of this
act. Each agency may include a statement describing any process
improvements the agency has identified for implementation in order to
improve processing and decision times.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.17.385 and 2005 c 384 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each state agency shall, within available funds, develop and
implement a quality management, accountability, and performance system
to improve the public services it provides.
(2) Each agency shall ensure that managers and staff at all levels,
including those who directly deliver services, are engaged in the
system and shall provide managers and staff with the training necessary
for successful implementation.
(3) Each agency shall, within available funds, ensure that its
quality management, accountability, and performance system:
(a) Uses strategic business planning to establish goals,
objectives, and activities consistent with the priorities of
government, as provided in statute;
(b) Engages stakeholders and customers in establishing service
requirements and improving service delivery systems;
(c) Includes clear, relevant, and easy-to-understand measures for
each activity;
(d) Gathers, monitors, and analyzes activity data;
(e) Uses the data to evaluate the effectiveness of programs to
manage process performance, improve efficiency, and reduce costs;
(f) Establishes performance goals and expectations for employees
that reflect the organization's objectives; and provides for regular
assessments of employee performance;
(g) Uses activity measures to report progress toward agency
objectives to the agency director at least quarterly;
(h) Where performance is not meeting intended objectives, holds
regular problem-solving sessions to develop and implement a plan for
addressing gaps; and
(i) Allocates resources based on strategies to improve performance.
(4) Each agency shall conduct a yearly assessment of its quality
management, accountability, and performance system.
(5) State agencies whose chief executives are appointed by the
governor shall report to the governor on agency performance at least
quarterly. The reports shall be included on the agencies', the
governor's, and the office of financial management's web sites.
(6) The governor shall report annually to citizens on the
performance of state agency programs. The governor's report shall
include:
(a) Progress made toward the priorities of government as a result
of agency activities; and
(b) Improvements in agency quality management systems, fiscal
efficiency, process efficiency, asset management, personnel management,
statutory and regulatory compliance, and management of technology
systems.
(7) Each state agency shall integrate efforts made under this
section with other management, accountability, and performance systems,
including procedures implemented under chapter 43.--- RCW (the new
chapter created in section 7 of this act), undertaken under executive
order or other authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2014, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---