BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 2.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Before granting an order under any of the following titles of
the laws of the state of Washington, the court may consult the judicial
information system or any related databases, if available, to determine
criminal history or the pendency of other proceedings involving the
parties:
(a) Granting any temporary or final order establishing a parenting
plan or residential schedule or directing residential placement of a
child or restraining or limiting a party's contact with a child under
Title 26 RCW;
(b) Granting any order regarding a vulnerable child or adult or
alleged incapacitated person irrespective of the title or where
contained in the laws of the state of Washington;
(c) Granting letters of guardianship or administration or letters
testamentary under Title 11 RCW;
(d) Granting any relief under Title 71 RCW;
(e) Granting any relief in a juvenile proceeding under Title 13
RCW.
(2) In the event that the court consults such a database, the court
shall disclose that fact to the parties and shall disclose any
particular matters relied upon by the court in rendering the decision.
A copy of the document relied upon must be filed, as a confidential
document, within the court file, with any confidential contact
information such as addresses, phone numbers, or other information that
might disclose the location or whereabouts of any person redacted from
the document or documents.

--- END ---