BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.09.260 and 2009 c 502 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (4), (5), (6), (8),
and (10) of this section, the court shall not modify a prior custody
decree or a parenting plan unless it finds, upon the basis of facts
that have arisen since the prior decree or plan or that were unknown to
the court at the time of the prior decree or plan, that a substantial
change has occurred in the circumstances of the child or the nonmoving
party and that the modification is in the best interest of the child
and is necessary to serve the best interests of the child. The effect
of a parent's military duties potentially impacting parenting functions
shall not, by itself, be a substantial change of circumstances
justifying a permanent modification of a prior decree or plan.
(2) In applying these standards, the court shall retain the
residential schedule established by the decree or parenting plan
unless:
(a) The parents agree to the modification;
(b) The child has been integrated into the family of the petitioner
with the consent of the other parent in substantial deviation from the
parenting plan;
(c) The child's present environment is detrimental to the child's
physical, mental, or emotional health and the harm likely to be caused
by a change of environment is outweighed by the advantage of a change
to the child; or
(d) The court has found the nonmoving parent in contempt of court
at least twice within three years because the parent failed to comply
with the residential time provisions in the court-ordered parenting
plan, or the parent has been convicted of custodial interference in the
first or second degree under RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070.
(3) A conviction of custodial interference in the first or second
degree under RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070 shall constitute a substantial
change of circumstances for the purposes of this section.
(4) The court may reduce or restrict contact between the child and
the parent with whom the child does not reside a majority of the time
if it finds that the reduction or restriction would serve and protect
the best interests of the child using the criteria in RCW 26.09.191.
(5) The court may order adjustments to the residential aspects of
a parenting plan upon a showing of a substantial change in
circumstances of either parent or of the child, and without
consideration of the factors set forth in subsection (2) of this
section, if the proposed modification is only a minor modification in
the residential schedule that does not change the residence the child
is scheduled to reside in the majority of the time and:
(a) Does not exceed twenty-four full days in a calendar year; or
(b) Is based on a change of residence of the parent with whom the
child does not reside the majority of the time or an involuntary change
in work schedule by a parent which makes the residential schedule in
the parenting plan impractical to follow; or
(c) Does not result in a schedule that exceeds ninety overnights
per year in total, if the court finds that, at the time the petition
for modification is filed, the decree of dissolution or parenting plan
does not provide reasonable time with the parent with whom the child
does not reside a majority of the time, and further, the court finds
that it is in the best interests of the child to increase residential
time with the parent in excess of the residential time period in (a) of
this subsection. However, any motion under this subsection (5)(c) is
subject to the factors established in subsection (2) of this section if
the party bringing the petition has previously been granted a
modification under this same subsection within twenty-four months of
the current motion. Relief granted under this section shall not be the
sole basis for adjusting or modifying child support.
(6) The court may order adjustments to the residential aspects of
a parenting plan pursuant to a proceeding to permit or restrain a
relocation of the child. The person objecting to the relocation of the
child or the relocating person's proposed revised residential schedule
may file a petition to modify the parenting plan, including a change of
the residence in which the child resides the majority of the time((,
without a showing of adequate cause other than the proposed relocation
itself)). A modification based on an objection to relocation of the
child may not go forward without a finding of adequate cause based on
the factors enumerated in RCW 26.09.520. A hearing to determine
adequate cause for modification shall not be required ((so)) if a
finding of adequate cause, based on the factors enumerated in RCW
26.09.520, has previously been made with relation to an objection to
relocation, as long as the request for relocation of the child is being
pursued. In making a determination of a modification pursuant to
relocation of the child, the court shall first determine whether to
permit or restrain the relocation of the child using the procedures and
standards provided in RCW 26.09.405 through 26.09.560. Following that
determination, the court shall determine what modification pursuant to
relocation should be made, if any, to the parenting plan or custody
order or visitation order.
(7) A parent with whom the child does not reside a majority of the
time and whose residential time with the child is subject to
limitations pursuant to RCW 26.09.191 (2) or (3) may not seek expansion
of residential time under subsection (5)(c) of this section unless that
parent demonstrates a substantial change in circumstances specifically
related to the basis for the limitation.
(8)(a) If a parent with whom the child does not reside a majority
of the time voluntarily fails to exercise residential time for an
extended period, that is, one year or longer, the court upon proper
motion may make adjustments to the parenting plan in keeping with the
best interests of the minor child.
(b) For the purposes of determining whether the parent has failed
to exercise residential time for one year or longer, the court may not
count any time periods during which the parent did not exercise
residential time due to the effect of the parent's military duties
potentially impacting parenting functions.
(9) A parent with whom the child does not reside a majority of the
time who is required by the existing parenting plan to complete
evaluations, treatment, parenting, or other classes may not seek
expansion of residential time under subsection (5)(c) of this section
unless that parent has fully complied with such requirements.
(10) The court may order adjustments to any of the nonresidential
aspects of a parenting plan upon a showing of a substantial change of
circumstances of either parent or of a child, and the adjustment is in
the best interest of the child. Adjustments ordered under this section
may be made without consideration of the factors set forth in
subsection (2) of this section.
(11) If the parent with whom the child resides a majority of the
time receives temporary duty, deployment, activation, or mobilization
orders from the military that involve moving a substantial distance
away from the parent's residence or otherwise would have a material
effect on the parent's ability to exercise parenting functions and
primary placement responsibilities, then:
(a) Any temporary custody order for the child during the parent's
absence shall end no later than ten days after the returning parent
provides notice to the temporary custodian, but shall not impair the
discretion of the court to conduct an expedited or emergency hearing
for resolution of the child's residential placement upon return of the
parent and within ten days of the filing of a motion alleging an
immediate danger of irreparable harm to the child. If a motion
alleging immediate danger has not been filed, the motion for an order
restoring the previous residential schedule shall be granted; and
(b) The temporary duty, activation, mobilization, or deployment and
the temporary disruption to the child's schedule shall not be a factor
in a determination of change of circumstances if a motion is filed to
transfer residential placement from the parent who is a military
service member.
(12) If a parent receives military temporary duty, deployment,
activation, or mobilization orders that involve moving a substantial
distance away from the military parent's residence or otherwise have a
material effect on the military parent's ability to exercise
residential time or visitation rights, at the request of the military
parent, the court may delegate the military parent's residential time
or visitation rights, or a portion thereof, to a child's family member,
including a stepparent, or another person other than a parent, with a
close and substantial relationship to the minor child for the duration
of the military parent's absence, if delegating residential time or
visitation rights is in the child's best interest. The court may not
permit the delegation of residential time or visitation rights to a
person who would be subject to limitations on residential time under
RCW 26.09.191. The parties shall attempt to resolve disputes regarding
delegation of residential time or visitation rights through the dispute
resolution process specified in their parenting plan, unless excused by
the court for good cause shown. Such a court-ordered temporary
delegation of a military parent's residential time or visitation rights
does not create separate rights to residential time or visitation for
a person other than a parent.
(13) If the court finds that a motion to modify a prior decree or
parenting plan has been brought in bad faith, the court shall assess
the attorney's fees and court costs of the nonmoving parent against the
moving party.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.09.270 and 2011 c 336 s 691 are each amended to
read as follows:
A party seeking a temporary custody order or a temporary parenting
plan ((or)), modification of a custody decree or parenting plan, or
objecting to a notice of relocation shall submit together with his or
her motion, an affidavit setting forth facts supporting the requested
order ((or)), modification, or objection and shall give notice,
together with a copy of his or her affidavit, to other parties to the
proceedings, who may file opposing affidavits. The court shall deny
the motion or objection unless it finds that adequate cause for hearing
the motion or objection is established by the affidavits, in which case
it shall set a date for hearing on an order to show cause why the
requested order ((or)), modification, or objection should not be
granted.

--- END ---