BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.80.040 and 2012 c 261 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The vehicle access pass is created solely for access to the
department of fish and wildlife recreation sites or lands.
((The))(2)(a) A vehicle access pass is only available to a person
who purchases a current valid: Big game hunting license issued under
RCW 77.32.450; small game hunting license issued under RCW 77.32.460;
western Washington pheasant permit issued under RCW 77.32.575; trapping
license issued under RCW 77.65.450; watchable wildlife decal issued
under RCW 77.32.560; or combination, saltwater, or freshwater personal
use fishing license issued under RCW 77.32.470.
(((2)))(b) One vehicle access pass must be issued per purchase
pursuant to this subsection (((1) of this section)) unless a purchaser
qualifies for a discover pass under (c) of this subsection.
(c) One discover pass must be issued at no additional cost to a
purchaser who spends more than two hundred dollars during any one
transaction for recreational licenses, permits, tags, or other
documents issued pursuant to chapter 77.32 RCW. The two hundred dollar
threshold includes all department of fish and wildlife recreational
documents purchased in the transaction, inclusive of any application
and transaction fees.
(3) The vehicle access pass is valid for the license year of the
license it is purchased with.
(4) The vehicle access pass must contain space for two motor
vehicle license plate numbers. A vehicle access pass is only valid for
those vehicle license plate numbers written on the pass.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.80.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 15 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a discover pass
is required for any motor vehicle to:
(a) Park at any recreation site or lands; or
(b) Operate on any recreation site or lands.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 79A.80.110, the cost of a discover
pass is thirty dollars. Every four years the office of financial
management must review the cost of the discover pass and, if necessary,
recommend to the legislature an adjustment to the cost of the discover
pass to account for inflation.
(3) A discover pass is valid for one year beginning from the date
that the discover pass is marked for activation. The activation date
may differ from the purchase date pursuant to any policies developed by
the agencies.
(4) Sales of discover passes must be consistent with RCW
79A.80.100.
(5) The discover pass must contain space for two motor vehicle
license plate numbers. A discover pass is valid only for those vehicle
license plate numbers written on the pass. However, the agencies may
offer for sale a family discover pass that is fully transferable among
vehicles and does not require the placement of a license plate number
on the pass to be valid. The agencies must collectively set a price
for the sale of a family discover pass that is no more than fifty
dollars. A discover pass is valid only for use with one motor vehicle
at any one time.
(6) One complimentary discover pass must be provided:
(a) As directed in RCW 79A.80.040; and
(b) To a volunteer who performed twenty-four hours of service on
agency-sanctioned volunteer projects in a year. The agency must
provide vouchers to volunteers identifying the number of volunteer
hours they have provided for each project. The vouchers may be brought
to an agency to be redeemed for a discover pass.

--- END ---