BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the rural
county sales tax program, a combination of tax incentives for
manufacturing and research and development facilities, machinery and
equipment, which was initially adopted in 1985 and extended to 2009,
with periodic adjustments, was an effective tax incentive and should be
reestablished. This finding is based in part on a December 2009 report
by the department of revenue titled, "Analysis of Rural County Sales
Tax Program," which found several positive indicators including, but
not limited to, the following: (a) Thirty-one counties had qualified
projects; (b) program participants had an increase in employment of 4.1
percent, while nonparticipants in rural counties showed a decline in
employment positions of 5.3 percent; (c) program participants
outperformed Washington as a whole in increasing their share of United
States manufacturing employment; and (d) program participants
experienced significantly larger increases in gross revenue when
compared to nonparticipants.
(2)(a) This subsection is the tax preference performance statement
for the sales and use tax deferral/exemption program provided in this
act. The performance statement is only intended to be used for
subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to
create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine
eligibility for preferential tax treatment.
(b) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended
to accomplish the general purpose indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(c).
(c) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to
incentivize private sector investment, diversify state employment
opportunities, and create jobs in rural counties, by reinstating the
rural sales tax program for a period of ten years.
(d) To measure the effectiveness of the tax incentive program in
this act in achieving the specific public policy objective described in
(c) of this subsection, the joint legislative audit and review
committee must evaluate the following:
(i) Changes in employment and unemployment rates for participating
counties in comparison with statewide amounts, and including the
estimated change in employment for participating counties as a
percentage of total statewide employment;
(ii) Total investment amounts in projects qualifying for the sales
tax exemption/deferral under this act; and
(iii) The estimated increase in state and local property tax
revenues from new construction associated with projects qualifying for
the sales tax exemption/deferral under this act.
(e)(i) The following data sources are intended to provide the
informational basis for the evaluation under (d) of this subsection:
Employment data reported to the state employment security department;
investment amounts reported on the annual survey required under RCW
82.32.585; property tax data compiled by the department of revenue;
data reported on the application filed under RCW 82.60.030; and any
other data the committee deems appropriate.
(ii) In addition to the data sources provided under (e)(i) of this
subsection, the joint legislative audit and review committee may use
any other data it deems necessary in performing the evaluation under
(d) of this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.60.020 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 16 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible area" means((:
(a) Through June 30, 2010,)) a rural county as defined in RCW
82.14.370((; and
(b) Beginning July 1, 2010, a qualifying county)) beginning July 1,
2014.
(4)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project
that is located, as of the date the application required by RCW
82.60.030 is received by the department, in an eligible area as defined
in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) "Eligible investment project" does not include any portion of
an investment project undertaken by a light and power business as
defined in RCW 82.16.010(4), other than that portion of a cogeneration
project that is used to generate power for consumption within the
manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an integral
part, or investment projects that have already received deferrals under
this chapter.
(5) "Initiation of construction" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.63.010.
(6) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the
project.
(7) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes:
(a) ((Before July 1, 2010: (i))) Computer programming, the
production of computer software, and other computer-related services,
but only when the computer programming, production of computer
software, or other computer-related services are performed by a
manufacturer as defined in RCW 82.04.110 and contribute to the
production of a new, different, or useful substance or article of
tangible personal property for sale;
(((ii))) (b) The activities performed by research and development
laboratories and commercial testing laboratories; and
(((iii))) (c) The conditioning of vegetable seeds((; and
(b) Beginning July 1, 2010: (i) The activities performed by
research and development laboratories and commercial testing
laboratories; and (ii) the conditioning of vegetable seeds)).
(8) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(9) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures, and
expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of
increasing floor space or production capacity used for manufacturing or
research and development activities, including plant offices and
warehouses or other facilities for the storage of raw material or
finished goods if such facilities are an essential or an integral part
of a factory, mill, plant, or laboratory used for manufacturing or
research and development. If a building is used partly for
manufacturing or research and development and partly for other
purposes, the applicable tax deferral must be determined by
apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the
department.
(10) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee employed in the eligible investment project during the entire
tax year. The term "entire tax year" means a full-time position that
is filled for a period of twelve consecutive months. The term "full-time" means at least thirty-five hours a week, four hundred fifty-five
hours a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred twenty hours a year.
(11) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial
and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an
integral and necessary part of a manufacturing or research and
development operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes:
Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment;
manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving
parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all equipment
used to control or operate the machinery.
(12) (("Qualifying county" means a county that has an unemployment
rate, as determined by the employment security department, which is at
least twenty percent above the state average for the three calendar
years immediately preceding the year in which the list of qualifying
counties is established or updated, as the case may be, as provided in
RCW 82.60.120.
(13))) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(((14))) (13) "Research and development" means the development,
refinement, testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product,
service, or process before commercial sales have begun, but only when
such activities are intended to ultimately result in the production of
a new, different, or useful substance or article of tangible personal
property for sale. As used in this subsection, "commercial sales"
excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total
gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or process do
not exceed one million dollars.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.60.030 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 16 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Application for deferral of taxes under this chapter must be
made before initiation of the construction of the investment project or
acquisition of equipment or machinery. The application must be made to
the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
application must contain information regarding the location of the
investment project, the applicant's average employment in the state for
the prior year, estimated or actual new employment related to the
project, estimated or actual wages of employees related to the project,
estimated or actual costs, time schedules for completion and operation,
and other information required by the department. The department must
rule on the application within sixty days.
(2) This section expires July 1, ((2020)) 2024.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.60.040 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 16 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department must issue a sales and use tax deferral
certificate for state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on each eligible investment project.
(2) The department must keep a running total of all deferrals
granted under this chapter during each fiscal biennium.
(3) This section expires July 1, ((2020)) 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 82.60.010 (Legislative findings and declaration) and 2010
1st sp.s. c 16 s 1 & 1985 c 232 s 1; and
(2) RCW 82.60.120 (Qualifying county list -- 2010 1st sp.s. c 16) and
2010 1st sp.s. c 16 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Chapter 82.60 RCW expires on the date
that legislation enacting comprehensive business and occupation tax
reform takes effect.
(2) The department of revenue must provide notice of the expiration
date of this act to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of
representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code
reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the department.

--- END ---