BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94B.080 and 2008 c 231 s 53 are each amended to read
as follows:
The court may order an offender whose sentence includes community
placement or community supervision to undergo a mental status
evaluation and to participate in available outpatient mental health
treatment, if the court finds that reasonable grounds exist to believe
that the offender is a mentally ill person as defined in RCW 71.24.025,
and that this condition is likely to have influenced the offense. An
order requiring outpatient mental status evaluation or treatment
((must)) may be based on a presentence report and, if applicable,
mental status evaluations that have been filed with the court to
determine the offender's competency or eligibility for a defense of
insanity. The court may order additional evaluations at a later date
if deemed appropriate.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.500 and 2008 c 231 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before imposing a sentence upon a defendant, the court shall
conduct a sentencing hearing. The sentencing hearing shall be held
within forty court days following conviction. Upon the motion of
either party for good cause shown, or on its own motion, the court may
extend the time period for conducting the sentencing hearing.
Except in cases where the defendant shall be sentenced to a term of
total confinement for life without the possibility of release or, when
authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for the crime of aggravated murder in the
first degree, sentenced to death, the court may order the department to
complete a risk assessment report. If available before sentencing, the
report shall be provided to the court.
Unless specifically waived by the court, the court shall order the
department to complete a chemical dependency screening report before
imposing a sentence upon a defendant who has been convicted of a
violation of the uniform controlled substances act under chapter 69.50
RCW, a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation under chapter
9A.28 RCW, or any felony where the court finds that the offender has a
chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense. In
addition, the court shall, at the time of plea or conviction, order the
department to complete a presentence report before imposing a sentence
upon a defendant who has been convicted of a felony sexual offense.
The department of corrections shall give priority to presentence
investigations for sexual offenders. If the court determines that the
defendant may be a mentally ill person as defined in RCW 71.24.025,
although the defendant has not established that at the time of the
crime he or she lacked the capacity to commit the crime, was
incompetent to commit the crime, or was insane at the time of the
crime, the court ((shall)) may order the department to complete a
presentence report before imposing a sentence.
The court shall consider the risk assessment report and presentence
reports, if any, including any victim impact statement and criminal
history, and allow arguments from the prosecutor, the defense counsel,
the offender, the victim, the survivor of the victim, or a
representative of the victim or survivor, and an investigative law
enforcement officer as to the sentence to be imposed.
A criminal history summary relating to the defendant from the
prosecuting authority or from a state, federal, or foreign governmental
agency shall be prima facie evidence of the existence and validity of
the convictions listed therein. If the court is satisfied by a
preponderance of the evidence that the defendant has a criminal
history, the court shall specify the convictions it has found to exist.
All of this information shall be part of the record. Copies of all
risk assessment reports and presentence reports presented to the
sentencing court and all written findings of facts and conclusions of
law as to sentencing entered by the court shall be sent to the
department by the clerk of the court at the conclusion of the
sentencing and shall accompany the offender if the offender is
committed to the custody of the department. Court clerks shall
provide, without charge, certified copies of documents relating to
criminal convictions requested by prosecuting attorneys.
(2) To prevent wrongful disclosure of information related to mental
health services, as defined in RCW 71.05.445 and 71.34.345, a court may
take only those steps necessary during a sentencing hearing or any
hearing in which the department presents information related to mental
health services to the court. The steps may be taken on motion of the
defendant, the prosecuting attorney, or on the court's own motion. The
court may seal the portion of the record relating to information
relating to mental health services, exclude the public from the hearing
during presentation or discussion of information relating to mental
health services, or grant other relief to achieve the result intended
by this subsection, but nothing in this subsection shall be construed
to prevent the subsequent release of information related to mental
health services as authorized by RCW 71.05.445, 71.34.345, or
72.09.585. Any person who otherwise is permitted to attend any hearing
pursuant to chapter 7.69 or 7.69A RCW shall not be excluded from the
hearing solely because the department intends to disclose or discloses
information related to mental health services.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.500 and 2013 c 200 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before imposing a sentence upon a defendant, the court shall
conduct a sentencing hearing. The sentencing hearing shall be held
within forty court days following conviction. Upon the motion of
either party for good cause shown, or on its own motion, the court may
extend the time period for conducting the sentencing hearing.
Except in cases where the defendant shall be sentenced to a term of
total confinement for life without the possibility of release or, when
authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for the crime of aggravated murder in the
first degree, sentenced to death, the court may order the department to
complete a risk assessment report. If available before sentencing, the
report shall be provided to the court.
Unless specifically waived by the court, the court shall order the
department to complete a chemical dependency screening report before
imposing a sentence upon a defendant who has been convicted of a
violation of the uniform controlled substances act under chapter 69.50
RCW, a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation under chapter
9A.28 RCW, or any felony where the court finds that the offender has a
chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense. In
addition, the court shall, at the time of plea or conviction, order the
department to complete a presentence report before imposing a sentence
upon a defendant who has been convicted of a felony sexual offense.
The department of corrections shall give priority to presentence
investigations for sexual offenders. If the court determines that the
defendant may be a mentally ill person as defined in RCW 71.24.025,
although the defendant has not established that at the time of the
crime he or she lacked the capacity to commit the crime, was
incompetent to commit the crime, or was insane at the time of the
crime, the court ((shall)) may order the department to complete a
presentence report before imposing a sentence.
The court shall consider the risk assessment report and presentence
reports, if any, including any victim impact statement and criminal
history, and allow arguments from the prosecutor, the defense counsel,
the offender, the victim, the survivor of the victim, or a
representative of the victim or survivor, and an investigative law
enforcement officer as to the sentence to be imposed.
A criminal history summary relating to the defendant from the
prosecuting authority or from a state, federal, or foreign governmental
agency shall be prima facie evidence of the existence and validity of
the convictions listed therein. If the court is satisfied by a
preponderance of the evidence that the defendant has a criminal
history, the court shall specify the convictions it has found to exist.
All of this information shall be part of the record. Copies of all
risk assessment reports and presentence reports presented to the
sentencing court and all written findings of facts and conclusions of
law as to sentencing entered by the court shall be sent to the
department by the clerk of the court at the conclusion of the
sentencing and shall accompany the offender if the offender is
committed to the custody of the department. Court clerks shall
provide, without charge, certified copies of documents relating to
criminal convictions requested by prosecuting attorneys.
(2) To prevent wrongful disclosure of information and records
related to mental health services, as described in RCW 71.05.445 and
70.02.250, a court may take only those steps necessary during a
sentencing hearing or any hearing in which the department presents
information related to mental health services to the court. The steps
may be taken on motion of the defendant, the prosecuting attorney, or
on the court's own motion. The court may seal the portion of the
record relating to information relating to mental health services,
exclude the public from the hearing during presentation or discussion
of information and records relating to mental health services, or grant
other relief to achieve the result intended by this subsection, but
nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent the subsequent
release of information and records related to mental health services as
authorized by RCW 71.05.445, 70.02.250, or 72.09.585. Any person who
otherwise is permitted to attend any hearing pursuant to chapter 7.69
or 7.69A RCW shall not be excluded from the hearing solely because the
department intends to disclose or discloses information related to
mental health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1,
2014.

--- END ---