BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.505 and 2010 c 224 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose
punishment as provided in this chapter.
(2)(a) The court shall impose a sentence as provided in the
following sections and as applicable in the case:
(i) Unless another term of confinement applies, a sentence within
the standard sentence range established in RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517;
(ii) RCW 9.94A.701 and 9.94A.702, relating to community custody;
(iii) RCW 9.94A.570, relating to persistent offenders;
(iv) RCW 9.94A.540, relating to mandatory minimum terms;
(v) RCW 9.94A.650, relating to the first-time offender waiver;
(vi) RCW 9.94A.660, relating to the drug offender sentencing
alternative;
(vii) RCW 9.94A.670, relating to the special sex offender
sentencing alternative;
(viii) RCW 9.94A.655, relating to the parenting sentencing
alternative;
(ix) RCW 9.94A.507, relating to certain sex offenses;
(x) RCW 9.94A.535, relating to exceptional sentences;
(xi) RCW 9.94A.589, relating to consecutive and concurrent
sentences;
(xii) RCW 9.94A.603, relating to felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug and felony physical
control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug.
(b) If a standard sentence range has not been established for the
offender's crime, the court shall impose a determinate sentence which
may include not more than one year of confinement; community
restitution work; a term of community custody under RCW 9.94A.702 not
to exceed one year; and/or other legal financial obligations. The
court may impose a sentence which provides more than one year of
confinement and a community custody term under RCW 9.94A.701 if the
court finds reasons justifying an exceptional sentence as provided in
RCW 9.94A.535.
(3) If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty
days or less, the court may, in its discretion, specify that the
sentence be served on consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence
requiring more than thirty days of confinement shall be served on
consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule court-ordered
intermittent sentences as space permits.
(4) If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial
obligation, it shall be imposed as provided in RCW 9.94A.750,
9.94A.753, 9.94A.760, and 43.43.7541.
(5) Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.750(4) and 9.94A.753(4), a
court may not impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or
community custody that exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as
provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(6) The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all
confinement time served before the sentencing if that confinement was
solely in regard to the offense for which the offender is being
sentenced.
(7) The court shall order restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.750
and 9.94A.753.
(8) As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce
crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions as provided in
this chapter. "Crime-related prohibitions" may include a prohibition
on the use or possession of alcohol, cannabis products, or controlled
substances if the court finds that any chemical dependency or substance
abuse contributed to the offense.
(9) In any sentence of partial confinement, the court may require
the offender to serve the partial confinement in work release, in a
program of home detention, on work crew, or in a combined program of
work crew and home detention.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.607 and 1999 c 197 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Where the court finds that the offender has ((a)) any chemical
dependency that has contributed to his or her offense, the court may,
as a condition of the sentence and subject to available resources,
order the offender to participate in rehabilitative programs or
otherwise to perform affirmative conduct reasonably related to the
circumstances of the crime for which the offender has been convicted
and reasonably necessary or beneficial to the offender and the
community in rehabilitating the offender. A rehabilitative program may
include a directive that the offender obtain an evaluation as to the
need for chemical dependency treatment related to the use of alcohol,
cannabis products, or controlled substances, regardless of the
particular substance that contributed to the commission of the offense.
The court may also impose a prohibition on the use or possession of
alcohol, cannabis products, or controlled substances regardless of
whether a chemical dependency evaluation is ordered.
(2) This section applies to sentences which include any term other
than, or in addition to, a term of total confinement, including
suspended sentences.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.703 and 2009 c 214 s 3 and 2009 c 28 s 11 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
When a court sentences a person to a term of community custody, the
court shall impose conditions of community custody as provided in this
section.
(1) Mandatory conditions. As part of any term of community
custody, the court shall:
(a) Require the offender to inform the department of court-ordered
treatment upon request by the department;
(b) Require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by
the department under RCW 9.94A.704;
(c) If the offender was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507 for an
offense listed in RCW 9.94A.507(1)(a), and the victim of the offense
was under eighteen years of age at the time of the offense, prohibit
the offender from residing in a community protection zone;
(d) If the offender was sentenced under RCW 9A.36.120, prohibit the
offender from serving in any paid or volunteer capacity where he or she
has control or supervision of minors under the age of thirteen.
(2) Waivable conditions. Unless waived by the court, as part of
any term of community custody, the court shall order an offender to:
(a) Report to and be available for contact with the assigned
community corrections officer as directed;
(b) Work at department-approved education, employment, or community
restitution, or any combination thereof;
(c) Refrain from possessing or consuming controlled substances
except pursuant to lawfully issued prescriptions;
(d) Pay supervision fees as determined by the department; and
(e) Obtain prior approval of the department for the offender's
residence location and living arrangements.
(3) Discretionary conditions. As part of any term of community
custody, the court may order an offender to:
(a) Remain within, or outside of, a specified geographical
boundary;
(b) Refrain from direct or indirect contact with the victim of the
crime or a specified class of individuals;
(c) Participate in crime-related treatment or counseling services;
(d) Participate in rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform
affirmative conduct reasonably related to the circumstances of the
offense, the offender's risk of reoffending, or the safety of the
community;
(e) Refrain from possessing or consuming alcohol or cannabis
products; or
(f) Comply with any crime-related prohibitions.
(4) Special conditions.
(a) In sentencing an offender convicted of a crime of domestic
violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, if the offender has a minor
child, or if the victim of the offense for which the offender was
convicted has a minor child, the court may order the offender to
participate in a domestic violence perpetrator program approved under
RCW 26.50.150.
(b)(i) In sentencing an offender convicted of an alcohol or drug-related traffic offense, the court shall require the offender to
complete a diagnostic evaluation by an alcohol or drug dependency
agency approved by the department of social and health services or a
qualified probation department, defined under RCW 46.61.516, that has
been approved by the department of social and health services. If the
offense was pursuant to chapter 46.61 RCW, the report shall be
forwarded to the department of licensing. If the offender is found to
have an alcohol or drug problem that requires treatment, the offender
shall complete treatment in a program approved by the department of
social and health services under chapter 70.96A RCW. If the offender
is found not to have an alcohol or drug problem that requires
treatment, the offender shall complete a course in an information
school approved by the department of social and health services under
chapter 70.96A RCW. The offender shall pay all costs for any
evaluation, education, or treatment required by this section, unless
the offender is eligible for an existing program offered or approved by
the department of social and health services.
(ii) For purposes of this section, "alcohol or drug-related traffic
offense" means the following: Driving while under the influence as
defined by RCW 46.61.502, actual physical control while under the
influence as defined by RCW 46.61.504, vehicular homicide as defined by
RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), vehicular assault as defined by RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), homicide by watercraft as defined by RCW 79A.60.050,
or assault by watercraft as defined by RCW 79A.60.060.
(iii) This subsection (4)(b) does not require the department of
social and health services to add new treatment or assessment
facilities nor affect its use of existing programs and facilities
authorized by law.

--- END ---