BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.12.010 and 1989 c 12 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The "prevailing rate of wage", for the intents and purposes of
this chapter, shall be the rate of hourly wage, usual benefits, and
overtime paid in the locality((, as hereinafter defined,)) to the
majority of workers, laborers, or mechanics, in the same trade or
occupation on nonpublic works. In the event that there is not a
majority in the same trade or occupation paid at the same rate, then
the average rate of hourly wage and overtime paid to such laborers,
workers, or mechanics in the same trade or occupation shall be the
prevailing rate. If the wage paid by any contractor or subcontractor
to laborers, workers, or mechanics on any public work is based on some
period of time other than an hour, the hourly wage for the purposes of
this chapter shall be mathematically determined by the number of hours
worked in such period of time.
(2) The "locality" for the purposes of this chapter shall be the
largest city in the county wherein the physical work is being
performed.
(3) The "usual benefits" for the purposes of this chapter shall
include the amount of:
(a) The rate of contribution irrevocably made by a contractor or
subcontractor to a trustee or to a third person pursuant to a fund,
plan, or program; and
(b) The rate of costs to the contractor or subcontractor which may
be reasonably anticipated in providing benefits to workers, laborers,
and mechanics pursuant to an enforceable commitment to carry out a
financially responsible plan or program which was communicated in
writing to the workers, laborers, and mechanics affected, for medical
or hospital care, pensions on retirement or death, compensation for
injuries or illness resulting from occupational activity, or insurance
to provide any of the foregoing, for unemployment benefits, life
insurance, disability and sickness insurance, or accident insurance,
for vacation and holiday pay, for defraying costs of apprenticeship or
other similar programs, or for other bona fide fringe benefits, but
only where the contractor or subcontractor is not required by other
federal, state, or local law to provide any of such benefits.
(4) An "interested party" for the purposes of this chapter shall
include a contractor, subcontractor, an employee of a contractor or
subcontractor, an organization whose members' wages, benefits, and
conditions of employment are affected by this chapter, and the director
of labor and industries or the director's designee.
(5) "Nonpublic work" means all work, construction, alteration,
repair, or improvement other than ordinary maintenance, that is not
"public work" as defined in RCW 39.04.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.12.026 and 2003 c 363 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) In establishing the prevailing rate of wage under RCW
39.12.010, 39.12.015, and 39.12.020((,)):
(1) The department may use only data from nonpublic works; and
(2) All data collected by the department may be used only in the
county for which the work was performed.
(((2) This section applies only to prevailing wage surveys
initiated on or after August 1, 2003.))

Sec. 3 RCW 42.56.270 and 2013 c 305 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.325, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and
43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(b) Internal control documents, independent auditors' reports and
financial statements, and supporting documents: (i) Of house-banked
social card game licensees required by the gambling commission pursuant
to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW; or (ii) submitted by tribes
with an approved tribal/state compact for class III gaming;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
commerce:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce pursuant to RCW
43.330.050(8); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce or the office of the
governor in connection with the siting, recruitment, expansion,
retention, or relocation of that person's business and until a siting
decision is made, identifying information of any person supplying
information under this subsection and the locations being considered
for siting, relocation, or expansion of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of commerce based on
information as described in (a)(i) of this subsection, any work product
is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of commerce from a person connected with siting,
recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's
business, information described in (a)(ii) of this subsection will be
available to the public under this chapter;
(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained
by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter
70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information;
(15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to
the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or
19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does
not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel
licensees;
(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;
(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless
permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or
operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit;
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to
RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;
(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and
services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under
RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
providers of this information;
(19) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328
that can be identified to a particular business;
(20) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained
by the University of Washington, other than information the university
is required to disclose under RCW 28B.20.150, when the information
relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such
information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in
loss to the University of Washington consolidated endowment fund or to
result in private loss to the providers of this information;
(21) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by innovate Washington in
applications for, or delivery of, grants and loans under chapter 43.333
RCW, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably
be expected to result in private loss to the providers of this
information; ((and))
(22) Market share data submitted by a manufacturer under RCW
70.95N.190(4); and
(23) Responses to wage and hour surveys used by the department of
labor and industries to establish the prevailing rate of wage under
chapter 39.12 RCW.

--- END ---