BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.12.026 and 2003 c 363 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) In establishing the prevailing rate of wage under RCW
39.12.010, 39.12.015, and 39.12.020((,)):
(1) The department shall use a stratified random sampling
methodology; and
(2) All data collected by the department may be used only in the
county for which the work was performed.
(((2) This section applies only to prevailing wage surveys
initiated on or after August 1, 2003.))

Sec. 2 RCW 39.12.070 and 2008 c 285 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of labor and industries may charge fees to awarding
agencies on public works for the approval of statements of intent to
pay prevailing wages and the certification of affidavits of wages paid.
The department may also charge fees to persons or organizations
requesting the arbitration of disputes under RCW 39.12.060. The amount
of the fees shall be established by rules adopted by the department
under the procedures in the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW. The fees shall apply to all approvals, certifications, and
arbitration requests made after the effective date of the rules. All
fees shall be deposited in the public works administration account.
The department may refuse to arbitrate for contractors, subcontractors,
persons, or organizations which have not paid the proper fees. The
department may, if necessary, request the attorney general to take
legal action to collect delinquent fees.
The department shall set the fees permitted by this section at a
level that generates revenue that is as near as practicable to the
amount of the appropriation to administer this chapter, including, but
not limited to, ((the performance of adequate wage surveys)) collecting
data to establish the prevailing rate of wage, and to investigate and
enforce all alleged violations of this chapter, including, but not
limited to, incorrect statements of intent to pay prevailing wage,
incorrect certificates of affidavits of wages paid, and wage claims, as
provided for in this chapter and chapters 49.48 and 49.52 RCW.
However, the fees charged for the approval of statements of intent to
pay prevailing wages and the certification of affidavits of wages paid
shall be forty dollars.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.12.080 and 2006 c 230 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The public works administration account is created in the state
treasury. The department of labor and industries shall deposit in the
account all moneys received from fees or civil penalties collected
under RCW 39.12.050, 39.12.065, and 39.12.070. Appropriations from the
account may be made only for the purposes of administration of this
chapter, including, but not limited to, ((the performance of adequate
wage surveys)) collecting data to establish the prevailing rate of
wage, and for the investigation and enforcement of all alleged
violations of this chapter as provided for in this chapter and chapters
49.48 and 49.52 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.56.270 and 2013 c 305 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.325, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and
43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(b) Internal control documents, independent auditors' reports and
financial statements, and supporting documents: (i) Of house-banked
social card game licensees required by the gambling commission pursuant
to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW; or (ii) submitted by tribes
with an approved tribal/state compact for class III gaming;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
commerce:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce pursuant to RCW
43.330.050(8); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce or the office of the
governor in connection with the siting, recruitment, expansion,
retention, or relocation of that person's business and until a siting
decision is made, identifying information of any person supplying
information under this subsection and the locations being considered
for siting, relocation, or expansion of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of commerce based on
information as described in (a)(i) of this subsection, any work product
is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of commerce from a person connected with siting,
recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's
business, information described in (a)(ii) of this subsection will be
available to the public under this chapter;
(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained
by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter
70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information;
(15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to
the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or
19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does
not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel
licensees;
(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;
(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless
permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or
operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit;
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to
RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;
(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and
services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under
RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
providers of this information;
(19) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328
that can be identified to a particular business;
(20) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained
by the University of Washington, other than information the university
is required to disclose under RCW 28B.20.150, when the information
relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such
information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in
loss to the University of Washington consolidated endowment fund or to
result in private loss to the providers of this information;
(21) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by innovate Washington in
applications for, or delivery of, grants and loans under chapter 43.333
RCW, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably
be expected to result in private loss to the providers of this
information; ((and))
(22) Market share data submitted by a manufacturer under RCW
70.95N.190(4); and
(23) Data collected by the department of labor and industries in
establishing the prevailing rate of wage under chapter 39.12 RCW.

--- END ---