BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 INTENT. (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The cultural organizations of the state provide numerous public
benefits. Providing support for the state's cultural organizations is
in the public interest and will serve multiple public purposes
including, among others, enhancing and extending the educational reach
and offerings of cultural organizations; ensuring continued and
expanded access to the facilities and programs of cultural
organizations by economically and geographically underserved
populations; and providing financial stability to the organizations to
enable them to focus on core missions as well as to continue and extend
the numerous public benefits they provide.
(b) Economic impact studies consistently confirm that cultural
institutions represent a multibillion dollar segment of the state's
overall economy and are directly responsible for tens of thousands of
jobs.
(2) The purpose of this chapter is to authorize the cultural access
program, under which counties authorize funding for public school
cultural access programs and support cultural organizations.

PART II
DEFINITIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrative costs" means all operating, administrative, and
maintenance expenses for a program, a designated public agency, or a
designated entity.
(2) "Attendance" means the total number of visits by persons in
physical attendance during a year at cultural organization facilities
located or cultural organization programs provided within the county
creating a program, including attendance for which admission was paid,
discounted, or free, consistent with and verifiable under guidelines
adopted by the appropriate program.
(3) "Cultural organization" means a nonprofit corporation
incorporated under the laws of the state of Washington and recognized
by the internal revenue service as described in section 501(c)(3) of
the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, with its principal
location or locations and conducting a majority of its activities
within the state, not including: Any agency of the state or any of its
political subdivisions; any municipal corporation; any organization
that raises funds for redistribution to multiple cultural
organizations; or any radio or television broadcasting network or
station, cable communications system, internet-based communications
venture or service, newspaper, or magazine. The primary purpose of the
organization must be the advancement and preservation of science or
technology, the visual or performing arts, zoology, botany,
anthropology, heritage, or natural history and any organization shall
directly provide programming or experiences available to the general
public. Any organization with the primary purpose of advancing and
preserving zoology such as zoos and aquariums must be or support a
facility that is accredited by the association of zoos and aquariums or
its functional successor. A state-related cultural organization may be
a cultural organization.
(4) "Designated entity" means the entity designated by the
legislative authority of a county creating the program, as required
under section 601(1)(d) of this act. The entity may be a public
agency, including the state arts commission established under chapter
43.46 RCW, or a Washington nonprofit corporation that is not a cultural
organization eligible for funding under this chapter.
(5) "Designated public agency" means the public agency designated
by the legislative authority of a county creating the program, as
required under section 601(2)(h) of this act.
(6) "Program" means a cultural access program established by a
county by ordinance.
(7) "Revenues" means revenues from all sources generated by a
cultural organization, consistent with generally accepted accounting
practices and any program guidelines, excluding: (a) Revenues
associated with capital projects other than major maintenance projects
including, but not limited to, capital campaign expenses; (b) funds
provided under this chapter; (c) revenue that would be considered
unrelated business taxable income under the internal revenue code of
1986, as amended; and (d) with respect to a state-related cultural
organization, state funding received by it or for the institution it
supports. Revenues include transfers from an organization's endowment
or reserves and may include the value of in-kind goods and services to
the extent permitted under any program guidelines.
(8) "State-related cultural organization" means an organization
incorporated as a nonprofit corporation under the laws of the state of
Washington and recognized by the internal revenue service as described
in section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended,
with a primary purpose and directly providing programming or
experiences available to the general public consistent with the
requirements for recognition as a cultural organization under this
chapter operating in a facility owned and supported by the state, a
state agency, or state educational institution.

PART III
CULTURAL ACCESS PROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 CREATION. (1) Any county legislative
authority may create a cultural access program by ordinance.
(2) Any contiguous group of counties may create a program by
entering into an interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW, approved
by resolution of the county legislative authorities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 START-UP FUNDING AND CONDITIONAL
FORMATION. (1) The county creating a program may advance to the
program funding for its administrative costs, including the cost of
informing the public about the formation of the program, how it is
proposed to be funded, and the public benefits to be realized if it is
successful. However, this subsection does not authorize the
preparation and distribution of information to the general public for
the purpose of influencing the outcome of any election called for voter
authorization of a proposed tax to support a program.
(2) The county creating a program may provide for repayment of any
start-up funding advanced to a program from the proceeds of taxes
authorized under sections 401 through 403 of this act and approved by
voters after the taxes are first collected. The funds may be repaid to
such county with interest at the internal rate of return on the
invested funds of such county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 NONSUPPLANTATION. In creating a program
under this chapter, any county creating the program shall affirm that
any funding such county usually and customarily provides to cultural
organizations similar to funding that would be available to those
organizations under this chapter may not be replaced or materially
diminished as a result of funding becoming available under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 ADVISORY COUNCILS. Each county creating
a program under this chapter may establish an advisory council, the
membership of which must include citizen representatives of
constituencies and organizations with interests relevant to the work of
the program including, but not limited to, leaders in the business,
educational, and cultural communities. Advisory council members should
be residents of the county creating the program. Policies concerning
the size and operation of any advisory council must be established by
the county that creates the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 ALTERNATIVE ADMINISTRATIVE ARRANGEMENTS.
A county with a population of less than one million five hundred
thousand may contract with the state arts commission formed under
chapter 43.46 RCW for the provision of consulting, management, or other
administrative services to be provided to its program created under
this chapter. Any county creating a program may elect to consolidate
administration of such a program with that of the entity or public
agency designated by the county creating such a program to perform the
functions required under section 601 of this act.

PART IV
FUNDING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 PROGRAM TO IMPOSE TAX. (1) A county
creating a program under this chapter may impose sales and use taxes
under section 402 of this act or additional regular property tax levies
under section 403 of this act for the purposes authorized under this
chapter.
(2) If a county imposes sales and use taxes under section 402 of
this act, the county may not impose an additional regular property tax
levy under section 403 of this act so long as such sales and use taxes
are in effect.
(3) If a county imposes an additional regular property tax levy
under section 403 of this act, the county may not impose sales and use
taxes under section 402 of this act so long as such property tax levy
is in effect.
(4) All revenue from taxes imposed under this chapter must be
credited to a special fund in the treasury of the county imposing such
tax and used solely for the purpose of paying all or any part of the
cost of cultural access programs as provided in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
SALES AND USE TAXES. (1) The legislative authority of a county may
impose a sales and use tax of up to one-tenth of one percent of the
selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used,
in the case of a use tax, for the purposes authorized under chapter
36.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 702 of this act). The
legislative authority of the county may impose the sales and use tax by
ordinance and, in its sole discretion, may condition its imposition on
the specific authorization of a majority of the voters voting on a
proposition submitted at a special election held after June 30, 2015.
The ordinance and ballot proposition, if any, may provide for the tax
to apply for a period of up to seven consecutive years.
(2) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other
taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event.
(3) The legislative authority of a county may reimpose a tax
imposed under this section for one or more additional periods of up to
seven consecutive years. The legislative authority of the county may
reimpose the sales and use tax by ordinance and, in its sole
discretion, may condition its reimposition on the prior specific
authorization of a majority of the voters voting on a proposition
submitted at any special election.
(4) Moneys collected under this section may only be used for the
purposes set forth in section 601 of this act.
(5) The department must perform the collection of taxes under this
section on behalf of a county at no cost to the county, and the state
treasurer must distribute those taxes as available on a monthly basis
to the county or, upon the direction of the county, to its treasurer or
a fiscal agent, paying agent, or trustee for obligations issued or
incurred by the program.
(6) The definitions in section 201 of this act apply to this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 A new section is added to chapter 84.52
RCW to read as follows:
PROPERTY TAX. (1) The legislative authority of a county may impose
an additional regular property tax levy for the purposes authorized
under chapter 36.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 702 of
this act). The legislative authority of the county may impose the
additional levy by ordinance and, in its sole discretion, may condition
its imposition of the levy upon prior specific authorization of a
majority of the voters voting on a proposition submitted at a special
election held after June 30, 2015. The ordinance and the ballot
proposition, if any, must set forth the total dollar amount to be
collected in the first year of the levy and may provide for a levy for
a period of up to seven consecutive years. The total dollar amount to
be set forth in the ordinance and the ballot proposition, if any, may
not exceed an amount equal to: (a) The total taxable retail sales and
taxable uses for the most recent calendar year as reported by the
department; multiplied by (b) one-tenth of one percent.
(2) The legislative authority of a county may reimpose an
additional regular property tax levy imposed under subsection (1) of
this section for one or more additional periods of up to seven
consecutive years. The legislative authority of the county may
reimpose the levy by ordinance and, in its sole discretion, may
condition the reimposition of the levy upon the specific authorization
of a majority of the voters voting on a proposition submitted at any
special election. The ordinance and the ballot proposition, if any,
must set forth the total dollar amount to be collected in the first
year of the reimposed levy, which dollar amount may not exceed an
amount equal to: (a) The total number of taxable retail sales and
taxable uses for the most recent calendar year as reported by the
department; multiplied by (b) one-tenth of one percent.
(3) In the event a county is levying property taxes for its program
that, in combination with property taxes levied by other taxing
districts exceed the limitation in RCW 84.52.050, the county's property
tax levy for such a program must be reduced or eliminated consistent
with RCW 84.52.010.
(4) The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 does not apply to the first
levy imposed under subsection (1) of this section or to the first levy
reimposed under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 do not apply to the tax levy
authorized in this section.
(6) Moneys collected under this section may only be used for the
purposes set forth in section 601 of this act.
(7) The definitions in section 201 of this act apply to this
section.

Sec. 404 RCW 84.52.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 28 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes must be
levied or voted in specific amounts.
(2) The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes,
and purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, must be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county must be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
(3) When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax
levy on any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in
RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either
of these sections, the assessor must recompute and establish a
consolidated levy in the following manner:
(a) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county
road district, and city or town purposes must be extended on the tax
rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law;
however any state levy takes precedence over all other levies and may
not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW
84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 36.54.130,
84.34.230, 84.52.069, 84.52.105, section 403 of this act, the portion
of the levy by a metropolitan park district that was protected under
RCW 84.52.120, 84.52.125, 84.52.135, 84.52.140, and the protected
portion of the levy under RCW 86.15.160 by flood control zone districts
in a county with a population of seven hundred seventy-five thousand or
more that are coextensive with a county, the combined rate of regular
property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then
these levies must be reduced as follows:
(i) The portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that
has a population of less than one hundred fifty thousand and is located
in a county with a population of one million five hundred thousand or
more that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 must be reduced until the
combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value
of any property or must be eliminated;
(ii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the protected portion of the levy
imposed under RCW 86.15.160 by a flood control zone district in a
county with a population of seven hundred seventy-five thousand or more
that is coextensive with a county must be reduced until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or must be eliminated;
(iii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under
RCW 84.52.140 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be
eliminated;
(iv) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a fire
protection district that is protected under RCW 84.52.125 must be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;
(v) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under
RCW 84.52.135 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be
eliminated;
(vi) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a ferry
district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or must be eliminated;
(vii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district with a population of one hundred fifty
thousand or more that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 must be reduced
until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or must be eliminated;
(viii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW
84.34.230, 84.52.105, section 403 of this act, and any portion of the
levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value, must be reduced on a pro rata basis
until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or must be eliminated; and
(ix) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 must
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated.
(b) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by
all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property must be
reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of
taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:
(i) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100,
and 67.38.130 must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(ii) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control
zone districts other than the portion of a levy protected under RCW
84.52.815 must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(iii) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire
protection service authorities, library districts, the first fifty cent
per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park
districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for public hospital districts, must be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;
(iv) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after
January 1, 2002, must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(v) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 and regional
fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b) and (c)
must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and
(vi) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, regional fire protection
service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a), library districts,
metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and
public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levy, must be reduced on a pro rata basis
or eliminated.

Sec. 405 RCW 84.52.010 and 2009 c 551 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be
levied or voted in specific amounts.
The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and
purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on
any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW
84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either of
these sections, the assessor shall recompute and establish a
consolidated levy in the following manner:
(1) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county
road district, and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax
rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law;
however any state levy shall take precedence over all other levies and
shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW
84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 36.54.130,
84.34.230, 84.52.069, 84.52.105, section 403 of this act, the portion
of the levy by a metropolitan park district that was protected under
RCW 84.52.120, 84.52.125, 84.52.135, and 84.52.140, the combined rate
of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent
limitation exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property, then these levies shall be reduced as follows:
(a) The levy imposed by a county under RCW 84.52.140 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(b) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a fire
protection district that is protected under RCW 84.52.125 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(c) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under
RCW 84.52.135 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be
eliminated;
(d) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a ferry
district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or must be eliminated;
(e) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(f) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW
84.34.230, 84.52.105, section 403 of this act, and any portion of the
levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true
and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; and
(g) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or eliminated.
(2) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by
all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be
reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of
taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:
(a) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100,
and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(b) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control
zone districts shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(c) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire
protection service authorities, library districts, the first fifty cent
per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park
districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for public hospital districts, shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;
(d) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after
January 1, 2002, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(e) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 and regional
fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b) and (c)
shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and
(f) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, regional fire protection
service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a), library districts,
metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and
public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated.

Sec. 406 RCW 84.52.043 and 2011 c 275 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as
amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal
property by the taxing districts hereafter named are as follows:
(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts are as follows: (a) The
levy by the state may not exceed three dollars and sixty cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value adjusted to the state equalized
value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state
department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support of the
common schools; (b) the levy by any county may not exceed one dollar
and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (c) the levy
by any road district may not exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value; and (d) the levy by any city or
town may not exceed three dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value. However any county is hereby
authorized to increase its levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a
rate not to exceed two dollars and forty-seven and one-half cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value for general county purposes if the
total levies for both the county and any road district within the
county do not exceed four dollars and five cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as
a result of the increased county levy.
(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior
taxing districts, other than the state, may not exceed five dollars and
ninety cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term
"junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other than the
state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and
public utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection
do not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law by
or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax
levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution;
(c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW
84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical
services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable
housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; (f)
the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are
protected under RCW 84.52.120; (g) levies imposed by ferry districts
under RCW 36.54.130; (h) levies for criminal justice purposes under RCW
84.52.135; (i) the portions of levies by fire protection districts that
are protected under RCW 84.52.125; (j) levies by counties for transit-related purposes under RCW 84.52.140; ((and)) (k) the protected portion
of the levies imposed under RCW 86.15.160 by flood control zone
districts in a county with a population of seven hundred seventy-five
thousand or more that are coextensive with a county; and (l) levies for
cultural access program purposes under section 403 of this act.

Sec. 407 RCW 84.52.043 and 2009 c 551 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as
amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal
property by the taxing districts hereafter named shall be as follows:
(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a)
The levy by the state shall not exceed three dollars and sixty cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value adjusted to the state equalized
value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state
department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support of the
common schools; (b) the levy by any county shall not exceed one dollar
and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (c) the levy
by any road district shall not exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value; and (d) the levy by any city or
town shall not exceed three dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value. However any county is hereby
authorized to increase its levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a
rate not to exceed two dollars and forty-seven and one-half cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value for general county purposes if the
total levies for both the county and any road district within the
county do not exceed four dollars and five cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as
a result of the increased county levy.
(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior
taxing districts, other than the state, shall not exceed five dollars
and ninety cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term
"junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other than the
state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and
public utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection
shall not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law
by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax
levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution;
(c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW
84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical
services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable
housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; (f)
the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are
protected under RCW 84.52.120; (g) levies imposed by ferry districts
under RCW 36.54.130; (h) levies for criminal justice purposes under RCW
84.52.135; (i) the portions of levies by fire protection districts that
are protected under RCW 84.52.125; ((and)) (j) levies by counties for
transit-related purposes under RCW 84.52.140; and (k) levies for
cultural access program purposes under section 403 of this act.

PART V
PUBLIC BENEFITS AND PUBLIC SCHOOL CULTURAL ACCESS PROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 PUBLIC BENEFITS. (1) A program created
under this chapter shall provide or continue to provide funding
authorized under this chapter only to cultural organizations that
provide discernible public benefits. Each program created under this
chapter shall identify a range of public benefits that cultural
organizations may provide or continue to provide in satisfaction of
this requirement for eligibility to receive funding authorized under
this chapter. The public benefits include, without limitation:
Reasonable opportunities for access to facilities, programs, and
services on a reduced or no admission fee basis, particularly for
diverse and underserved populations and communities; providing, through
technological and other means, services or programs in locations other
than an organization's own facilities; providing educational programs
and experiences both at an organization's own facilities and in schools
and other venues; broadening cultural programs, performances, and
exhibitions for the enlightenment and entertainment of the public;
supporting collaborative relationships with other cultural
organizations in order to extend the reach and impact of the
collaborating organizations for the benefit of the public; and, in the
case of community-based cultural organizations, organizational
capacity-building projects or activities that an organization can
demonstrate, to the reasonable satisfaction of the designated entity,
will enhance the ability of the organization to provide or continue to
provide meaningful public benefits not otherwise achievable.
(2) Each program created under this chapter shall adopt guidelines
establishing a baseline standard of continuous performance with respect
to the provision of public benefits required under this chapter and for
evaluating the eligibility of any cultural organization to receive
funds under this chapter based on the continuous performance of the
organization in the provision of the public benefits. The guidelines
must include: (a) Procedures for notifying any organization at risk of
losing its eligibility to receive funds under this chapter for failure
to achieve the program's baseline standard of performance with respect
to the continuous provision of public benefits; and (b) measures or
procedures available to the organization for either retaining or
recovering eligibility, as appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 PUBLIC SCHOOL CULTURAL ACCESS PROGRAM.
(1) A program created under this chapter shall develop and provide a
public school cultural access program, as provided in section 601 of
this act.
(2) To the extent practicable consistent with available resources,
the public school cultural access element of a program of a county
described in section 601(2) of this act must include the following
attributes:
(a) Provide benefits designed to increase public school student
access to the programming offered and facilities operated by regional
and community-based cultural organizations receiving funding under this
chapter;
(b) Offer benefits to every public school in the county while
scaling the range of benefits available to and the frequency of
opportunities to participate by any particular school to coincide with
the relative percentage of students attending the school who
participate in the national free or reduced-price school meals program;
(c) Benefits provided under the public school cultural access
program must include, without limitation:
(i) Establishing and operating, within funding provided to support
the public school cultural access program under this subsection, of a
centralized service available to regional and community-based cultural
organizations receiving funding under this chapter and public schools
in the county to coordinate opportunities for public school student
access to the programs and activities offered by the organizations both
at the facilities and venues operated by the organizations and through
programs and experiences provided by the organizations at schools and
elsewhere;
(ii) Providing directly or otherwise funding and arranging for
transportation for public school students to attend and participate in
the programs and activities offered by such organizations;
(iii) In consultation with cultural organizations located within
the county, preparing and maintaining a readily accessible and current
guide cataloging access opportunities and facilitating scheduling;
(iv) Coordinating closely with cultural organizations to maximize
student utilization of available opportunities in a cost-efficient
manner including possible scheduling on a single day opportunities for
different grade levels at any one school and participation in multiple
programs or activities in the same general area for which program-funded transportation is provided;
(v) Supporting the development of tools, materials, and media by
cultural organizations to ensure that school access programs and
activities correlate with school curricula and extend the reach of
access programs and activities for classroom use with or without direct
on-site participation, to the extent practicable;
(vi) Building meaningful partnerships with public schools and
cultural organizations in order to maximize participation in school
access programs and activities and ensure their relevance and
effectiveness;
(d) When a program determines that its program element required
under (c)(i) through (vi) of this subsection has achieved sufficient
scale and participation among public schools located within its
boundaries and that it has resources remaining to devote to additional
public school cultural access programs without diminishing such
participation, the county may develop and financially support other
public school cultural access activities in conjunction with cultural
organizations receiving funds under this chapter; public school
districts; and other public or nonprofit organizations that support
cultural access. Any funding for development and support of such
activities provided to cultural organizations receiving funds under
this subsection must only be used to supplement the public benefits
provided by such organizations as required under this chapter and may
not be used by such organizations to replace or diminish funding for
such required public benefits;
(e) Preparation of an annual public school cultural access plan for
authority board review and adoption prior to implementation; and
(f) Compilation of an annual report documenting the reach and
evaluating the effectiveness of program-funded public school cultural
access efforts, including recommendations to the county for
improvements.

PART VI
USE OF FUNDS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 ALLOCATION. (1) A program in a county
with a population of less than one million five hundred thousand must
allocate the proceeds of taxes authorized under sections 402 and 403 of
this act as follows:
(a) If any start-up funding has been provided to the program under
section 302 of this act with the expectation that the funding will be
repaid, the program must annually reserve from total funds available
funding sufficient to provide for repayment of such start-up funding
until any such start-up funding has been fully repaid;
(b) The funding determined by the county forming such a program to
be reserved for program costs, including direct administrative costs,
and repaying any start-up funding provided under section 303 of this
act. Information disclosing the amount of funding to be reserved for
program administrative costs must be included in any proposition
submitted to voters under section 402 or 403 of this act;
(c) The county must determine the percentage of total funds
available annually to be reserved for a public school cultural access
program established and managed by the county to increase access to
cultural activities and programming for public school students resident
in the county. The activities and programming need not be located or
provided within the county. In developing its program, the county may
consider the attributes prescribed for a public school cultural access
program required to be undertaken under section 502(2) of this act;
(d) Remaining funds available annually, including all funds not
initially reserved under (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection as well
as funds not distributed by the county from the reserved funds must be
distributed by the county to the entity designated by the legislative
authority of the county creating the program. The county shall
determine:
(i) Guidelines, consistent with the requirements of this chapter,
it deems necessary or appropriate for determining the eligibility of
cultural organizations to receive funding under this chapter;
(ii) Criteria for the award of funds to eligible cultural
organizations, including the public benefits to be derived from
projects submitted for funding;
(iii) The amount of funding to be allocated to support designated
entity administrative costs;
(iv) Criteria for the identification by the county or, if so
directed by the county, by the designated entity of any cultural
organization or organizations that would receive annual distributions
of funds in such amounts determined by the county or, if so directed by
the county, the designated entity; and
(v) Procedures to be used by the designated entity in awarding
funding to other cultural organizations that may, but are not required
to include a periodic competitive process for awarding funds for
particular purposes or projects proposed by eligible cultural
organizations;
(e) In evaluating requests for funding authorized under this
chapter, the designated entity responsible for the distribution of the
funds shall consider the public benefits that any cultural
organizations represented will be derived from proposed projects. At
the conclusion of a project approved for funding, such organization is
required to report to the designated entity on the public benefits
realized;
(f) Funds distributed to cultural organizations may be used to
support cultural and educational activities, programs, and initiatives;
public benefits and communications; and basic operations. Funds may
also be used for: (i) Capital expenditures or acquisitions including,
but not limited to, the acquisition of or construction of improvements
to real property; and (ii) technology, equipment, and supplies
reasonably related to or necessary for a project otherwise eligible for
funding under this chapter. Program guidelines may also determine the
circumstances under which funds may be used to fund start-up expenses
of new community-based cultural organizations;
(g) If the county or designated entity determine the eligibility of
a cultural organization to receive funding or the relative magnitude of
the funding it receives on the basis of its budget, revenues, or
expenses, any determination with respect to a qualifying state-related
cultural organization must exclude any state funding received by the
organization or for the institution it supports.
(2) A county with a population of more than one million five
hundred thousand must allocate the proceeds of the taxes authorized
under sections 402 and 403 of this act as follows:
(a) If any start-up funding has been provided to the program under
section 302 of this act with the expectation that the funding will be
repaid, the program must annually reserve from total funds available
annually funding sufficient to provide for repayment of such start-up
funding until any such start-up funding has been fully repaid;
(b) After allocating any funds as required in (a) of this
subsection, up to one and one-fourth percent of total funds available
annually may be used for program administrative costs;
(c) After allocating funds as required in (a) and (b) of this
subsection, ten percent of remaining funds available annually must be
used to fund a public school cultural access program to be administered
by the program;
(d) Seventy-five percent of total remaining funds available
annually excluding funds initially reserved under (a), (b), and (c) of
this subsection must be reserved for distribution by the program to
regional cultural organizations that are cultural organizations that
own, operate, or support cultural facilities or provide performances,
exhibits, educational programs, experiences, or entertainment that
widely benefit and are broadly attended by the public, subject to
further definition under guidelines adopted by the program. A regional
cultural organization may also generally be characterized under program
guidelines as a financially stable, substantial organization with full-time support and program staff, maintaining a broad-based membership,
having year-round or enduring seasonal operations, being a substantial
financial contributor to the development, operation, and maintenance of
the organization's principal venue or venues, and providing substantial
public benefits. The funding must be provided only to those regional
cultural organizations that the program determines, on an annual basis,
to have met the following guidelines:
(i) For at least the preceding three years, the organization has
been continuously in good standing as a nonprofit corporation under the
laws of the state of Washington;
(ii) The organization has its principal location or locations and
conducts the majority of its activities within the county area
primarily for the benefit of county residents;
(iii) The organization has not declared bankruptcy or suspended or
substantially curtailed operations for a period longer than six months
during the preceding two years;
(iv) The organization provided to the program audited annual
financial statements for at least its two most recent fiscal years;
(v) Over the three preceding years, the organization has minimum
average annual revenues of at least one million two hundred fifty
thousand dollars. The program shall annually and cumulatively adjust
the minimum revenues by the annual percentage change in the consumer
price index for the prior year for the Seattle-Tacoma-Bellevue,
Washington metropolitan statistical area for all urban consumer, all
goods, as published by the United States department of labor, bureau of
labor statistics. The minimum revenues requirement, adjusted for
inflation as provided in this section, remains effective through the
date on which the initial tax authorized by the voters under section
402 or 403 of this act expires. Thereafter, the program must, at the
beginning of each subsequent period of funding as approved by the
voters, establish initial minimum average annual revenues of not less
than the amount of the minimum revenues required during the final year
of the immediately preceding period of funding;
(vi) For purposes of determining the eligibility of a regional
organization to receive funding or the relative magnitude of the
funding it receives on the basis of its revenues, any determination
with respect to a qualifying state-related cultural organization must
exclude any state funding received by the organization or for the
institution it supports; and
(vii) Any additional guidelines, consistent with section 201 of
this act and this section, as the program deems necessary or
appropriate for determining the eligibility of prospective regional
cultural organizations to receive funding under this section and for
establishing the amount of funding any organization may receive;
(e) Funds available under (d) of this subsection must be
distributed among eligible regional cultural organizations based on an
annual ranking of eligible organizations by the combined size of their
average annual revenues and their average annual attendance, both over
the three preceding years. However, an organization's attendance must
have twice the weight of the organization's revenues in determining its
relative ranking. Available funds must be distributed proportionally
among eligible organizations, consistent with the ranking, such that
the organization with the largest combined revenues and weighted
attendance would receive the most funding and the organization with the
smallest combined revenues and weighted attendance would receive the
least funding. However, no organization may receive funds in excess of
fifteen percent of its average annual revenues over the three preceding
years. Any funds available under (d) of this subsection not
distributed to regional cultural organizations as a result of
application of the formula provided under this subsection (2)(e) must
be allocated by the program for distribution under (g) of this
subsection;
(f) Funds distributed to regional cultural organizations under (d)
of this subsection must be used to support cultural and educational
activities, programs and initiatives, public benefits and
communications, and basic operations. No funds distributed to regional
cultural organizations under (d) of this subsection may be used for
capital expenditures or acquisitions including, but not limited to, the
acquisition of or the construction of improvements to real property.
(g) In addition to providing or continuing to provide public
benefits identified by the program under this section, regional
cultural organizations receiving funding under this subsection (2)
shall participate in good faith in the program's public school cultural
access program required under section 502 of this act. The regional
cultural organizations shall provide or continue to provide public
benefits under this section in addition to participating in the public
school cultural access program. Each regional cultural organization
receiving funds authorized under this chapter pursuant to a program
allocation formula shall annually, prior to year end, preview for the
program public benefits the organization's plans to provide or continue
to provide in the following year and report on public benefits it
provided or continued to provide during the current year;
(h) Remaining funds available annually, including funds not
initially reserved under (a) through (d) of this subsection as well as
funds not distributed by the program from the reserved funds must be
distributed by the program to the public agency designated by the
legislative authority of the county creating such a program;
(i) Funds distributed by the designated public agencies under (h)
of this subsection must be applied as follows:
(i) Not more than eight percent of such funds must be used for
administrative costs of the public agency designated by a county
creating the program; and
(ii) The balance must be used to fund community-based cultural
organizations that are cultural organizations or a community
preservation and development authority formed under chapter 43.167 RCW
prior to January 1, 2011, that primarily function, focus their
activities, and are supported or patronized within a local community
and are not a regional cultural organization, subject to further
definition under guidelines adopted by the designated public agency.
Designated public agencies shall adopt:
(A) Guidelines, consistent with the requirements of this chapter,
it deems necessary or appropriate for determining the eligibility of
community-based cultural organizations to receive funding under this
chapter and for establishing the amount of funding any organization may
receive;
(B) Criteria for the award of funds to eligible community-based
cultural organizations, including the public benefits to be derived
from projects submitted for funding; and
(C) Procedures for conducting, at least annually, a competitive
process for the award of available funding;
(j) Funds distributed to community-based cultural organizations may
be used to support cultural and educational activities, programs, and
initiatives; public benefits and communications; and basic operations.
Funds may also be used for: (i) Capital expenditures or acquisitions
including, but not limited to, the acquisition of or construction of
improvements to real property; and (ii) technology, equipment, and
supplies reasonably related to or necessary for a project otherwise
eligible for funding under this chapter. Program guidelines may also
determine the circumstances under which funds may be used to fund
start-up expenses of new community-based cultural organizations.

PART VII
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 No direct or collateral attack on any
program purported to be authorized or created in conformance with this
chapter may be commenced more than thirty days after creation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 Sections 101 through 305, 401, 501, 502,
and 601 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 The provisions of this act must be
liberally construed to effectuate the policies and purposes of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 Sections 404 and 406 of this act expire
January 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 Sections 405 and 407 of this act take
effect January 1, 2018.

--- END ---