BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Statewide training for code officials is
an essential element in the health and vitality of the state's
construction industry. The recent downturn in the economy has resulted
in staff reductions in many local code enforcement offices. With the
expected retirement of other senior code officials, there will be a
substantial need for training of new code officials as well as
continuing training for existing officials. As the economy of the
state of Washington improves, it is imperative to have well-trained
building inspectors throughout our communities in order to assure
timely and consistent inspections so that our construction economy can
recover at the most expeditious rate.
(2) Because of these issues, the state of Washington approved the
creation of the code officials apprenticeship program. Local
jurisdictions are less able to consistently pay for and send staff to
training in central locations without compromising service levels. The
legislature finds that support for technical training and the code
officials apprenticeship and training program will provide:
(a) Consistent training for code officials for all jurisdictions;
(b) Greater uniformity of enforcement of building codes;
(c) Education on the implementation of the new energy and green
construction codes;
(d) Equal access for all jurisdictions to training essential to the
efficient and effective discharge of the regulatory function;
(e) A reduction of the employment cost burden of local
jurisdictions; and
(f) Leverage, when possible, of training dollars by taking
advantage of the economy of scale presented by a central, organized
training curriculum using economies of scale and potential grant funds
to supplement code official training.
(3) It is the intent of this act to assure that our construction
industry and local communities have assurance that code officials have
access to current training on the most recent code updates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 There is imposed a fee of two dollars on
each building permit issued by a county or a city. The building permit
must be the same type of permit on which a fee may be imposed under RCW
19.27.085(3). Quarterly, each county and city must remit moneys
collected under this section to the state treasury; however, no
remittance is required until a minimum of fifty dollars has accumulated
pursuant to this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Revenue collected in accordance with section
2 of this act and deposited in the code officials apprenticeship and
training account in the state treasury must be appropriated to the
department of enterprise services for distribution to the sponsor of an
apprenticeship program for building officials for the following
purposes:
(1) Expenses related to the establishment and operation of a code
official apprenticeship program;
(2) Administrative expenses of the joint apprenticeship training
committee for the code official apprenticeship program; and
(3) Expenses related to training programs for code officials
provided by public or private entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The code officials apprenticeship and
training account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from
section 2 of this act must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used only as provided in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department of labor and industries
must review the code officials apprenticeship and training program and
the use of funds collected in accordance with the fee imposed under
section 2 of this act. In satisfying the requirements of this section,
the department of labor and industries must analyze:
(a) Whether and to what extent the purposes enumerated in section
1(2) of this act, for which funding support is provided to the code
officials apprenticeship and training program, are being furthered or
achieved by the program; and
(b) The impact the code officials apprenticeship and training
program, and the funding support provided under sections 2 and 3 of
this act, has had on each of the following:
(i) Each county;
(ii) Persons of different age groups, races, genders, and income
levels; and
(iii) Persons who enter the program and, specifically, their
ability to obtain employment in their occupational field.
(2) In conducting the review, the department of labor and
industries must request information from and consult with appropriate
stakeholders, including but not limited to the Washington association
of building officials, the association of Washington cities, the
Washington state association of counties, the state board for community
and technical colleges, the state workforce training and education
coordinating board, the Washington association of realtors, and the
department of commerce.
(3) The department of labor and industries must submit a report of
its findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature. A
preliminary report must be submitted by June 1, 2016, and a final
report must be submitted by December 31, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 49.04 RCW.

--- END ---