BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that cooperative partnerships between
school districts, early learning providers, health and social service
providers, and other community-based nonprofit organizations can result
in both effective and efficient use of school facilities for the
betterment of the community at large. Such partnerships build on
community strengths, foster family and community engagement, and
provide enhanced opportunities for academic and nonacademic programming
in readily available locations.
(2) School districts are encouraged to use family and community
engagement coordinators, including but not limited to those allocated
through the prototypical school funding formula under RCW 28A.150.260,
to coordinate cooperative partnerships between schools, the school
district, and an array of community-based organizations in order to
expand academic and nonacademic program offerings using school
facilities outside of the regular school day or year.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of
state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school
districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic
education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as
follows:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a
basic education instructional allocation for each common school
district.
(2) The distribution formula under this section shall be for
allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under chapter
28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and
regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use
basic education instructional funds to implement a particular
instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires
school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student
ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay
for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this
section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning
period.
(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been
adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a
school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic
education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing
and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support
instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high,
middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section.
The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not
constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or
structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical
schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of
a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students
using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours
of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the
intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted
from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average
full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the
district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school
to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further
adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small
schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are
defined as follows:
(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;
(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight;
and
(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
six.
(4)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers
needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one
teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following
general education average class size of full-time equivalent students
per teacher:

General education
average
class size
Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23
Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium and beginning with schools with
the highest percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price
meals in the prior school year, the general education average class
size for grades K-3 shall be reduced until the average class size
funded under this subsection (4) is no more than 17.0 full-time
equivalent students per teacher beginning in the 2017-18 school year.
(c) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high
school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom teachers
based on the following number of full-time equivalent students per
teacher in career and technical education:

Career and technical
education average
class size
Approved career and technical education offered at
the middle school and high school level . . . . . . . . . . . . 26.57
Skill center programs meeting the standards established
by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction . . . . . . . . . . . . 22.76

(d) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum
specify:
(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than
fifty percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price
meals; and
(ii) A specialty average class size for laboratory science,
advanced placement, and international baccalaureate courses.
(5) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition
to classroom teachers:

Elementary
School Middle
School High
School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level
administrators . . . . . . . . . . . .
1.253
1.353
1.880

Teacher librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology,
and media to support school library media programs . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.663
0.519
0.523

Health and social services:

School nurses . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.076 0.060 0.096

Social workers . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.042 0.006 0.015

Psychologists . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.017 0.002 0.007

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach and graduation
advising . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.493
1.116
1.909

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional
services provided by classified employees . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.936
0.700
0.652

Office support and other noninstructional aides . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.012 2.325 3.269

Custodians . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.657 1.942 2.965

Classified staff providing student and staff safety . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.079 0.092 0.141

((Parent involvement)) Family and community engagement coordinators . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.00 0.00 0.00

(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to
provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as
follows:

Staff per 1,000
K-12 students
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.628
Facilities, maintenance, and grounds . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.813
Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.332

(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district
to support certificated and classified staffing of central
administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under
subsections (4)(a) and (b) and (5) of this section and (a) of this
subsection.
(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to
school districts for career and technical education and skill center
administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified
in the omnibus appropriations act.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the minimum
allocation for each school district shall include allocations per
annual average full-time equivalent student for the following
materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted for inflation
from the 2008-09 school year:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $54.43
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $147.90
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $58.44
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $124.07
Instructional professional development for certified and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $9.04
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $73.27
Security and central office . . . . . . . . . . . . $50.76

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium, the minimum allocation for
maintenance, supplies, and operating costs shall be increased as
specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The following
allocations, adjusted for inflation from the 2007-08 school year, are
provided in the 2015-16 school year, after which the allocations shall
be adjusted annually for inflation as specified in the omnibus
appropriations act:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $113.80
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $309.21
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $122.17
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $259.39
Instructional professional development for certificated and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $18.89
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $153.18
Security and central office administration . . . . . . . . . . . . $106.12

(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this
section, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based
on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:
(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students
in grades seven through twelve;
(b) Laboratory science courses for students in grades nine through
twelve;
(c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades nine through twelve offered in a high school; and
(d) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades eleven and twelve offered through a skill center.
(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this
section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs
and services:
(a) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
underachieving students through the learning assistance program under
RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the
district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for
free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum
allocation for the program shall provide for each level of prototypical
school resources to provide, on a statewide average, 1.5156 hours per
week in extra instruction with a class size of fifteen learning
assistance program students per teacher.
(b) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students
whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be
based on the head count number of students in each school who are
eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction
program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum
allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide
resources to provide, on a statewide average, 4.7780 hours per week in
extra instruction with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction
program students per teacher. Notwithstanding other provisions of this
subsection (10), the actual per-student allocation may be scaled to
provide a larger allocation for students needing more intensive
intervention and a commensurate reduced allocation for students needing
less intensive intervention, as detailed in the omnibus appropriations
act.
(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for
highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030,
allocations shall be based on two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school district's full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs
shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590
hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen highly capable program
students per teacher.
(11) The allocations under subsections (4)(a) and (b), (5), (6),
and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW
28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental
instructional resources for students with disabilities.
(12)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high
schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this
section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are
eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such
students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the
omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and
reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.
(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4),
(7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter
28A.700 RCW.
(13)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds
shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.
(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect.
(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each
month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall
be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional
hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the
present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review
of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the
common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.165.035 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 203 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in the 2015-16 school year, expenditure of funds from
the learning assistance program must be consistent with the provisions
of RCW 28A.655.235.
(2) Use of best practices that have been demonstrated through
research to be associated with increased student achievement magnifies
the opportunities for student success. To the extent they are included
as a best practice or strategy in one of the state menus or an approved
alternative under this section or RCW 28A.655.235, the following are
services and activities that may be supported by the learning
assistance program:
(a) Extended learning time opportunities occurring:
(i) Before or after the regular school day;
(ii) On Saturday; and
(iii) Beyond the regular school year;
(b) Services under RCW 28A.320.190;
(c) Professional development for certificated and classified staff
that focuses on:
(i) The needs of a diverse student population;
(ii) Specific literacy and mathematics content and instructional
strategies; and
(iii) The use of student work to guide effective instruction and
appropriate assistance;
(d) Consultant teachers to assist in implementing effective
instructional practices by teachers serving participating students;
(e) Tutoring support for participating students;
(f) Outreach activities and support for parents of participating
students, including employing ((parent and)) family and community
engagement coordinators; and
(g) Up to five percent of a district's learning assistance program
allocation may be used for development of partnerships with community-based organizations, educational service districts, and other local
agencies to deliver academic and nonacademic supports to participating
students who are significantly at risk of not being successful in
school to reduce barriers to learning, increase student engagement, and
enhance students' readiness to learn. The office of the superintendent
of public instruction must approve any community-based organization or
local agency before learning assistance funds may be expended.
(3) In addition to the state menu developed under RCW 28A.655.235,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene a
panel of experts, including the Washington state institute for public
policy, to develop additional state menus of best practices and
strategies for use in the learning assistance program to assist
struggling students at all grade levels in English language arts and
mathematics and reduce disruptive behaviors in the classroom. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall publish the
state menus by July 1, 2015, and update the state menus by each July
1st thereafter.
(4)(a) Beginning in the 2016-17 school year, except as provided in
(b) of this subsection, school districts must use a practice or
strategy that is on a state menu developed under subsection (3) of this
section or RCW 28A.655.235.
(b) Beginning in the 2016-17 school year, school districts may use
a practice or strategy that is not on a state menu developed under
subsection (3) of this section for two school years initially. If the
district is able to demonstrate improved outcomes for participating
students over the previous two school years at a level commensurate
with the best practices and strategies on the state menu, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall approve use of the
alternative practice or strategy by the district for one additional
school year. Subsequent annual approval by the superintendent of
public instruction to use the alternative practice or strategy is
dependent on the district continuing to demonstrate increased improved
outcomes for participating students.
(c) Beginning in the 2016-17 school year, school districts may
enter cooperative agreements with state agencies, local governments, or
school districts for administrative or operational costs needed to
provide services in accordance with the state menus developed under
this section and RCW 28A.655.235.
(5) School districts are encouraged to implement best practices and
strategies from the state menus developed under this section and RCW
28A.655.235 before the use is required.

--- END ---