BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A supplemental capital budget is hereby
adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the
several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as
shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2015, out of the several funds specified in this act.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Archives Facilities Maintenance Environmental Control (30000028)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Library and Archives Building (30000029)

The appropriations in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a
predesign to determine: (a) Necessary program space for the state
library currently located in Tumwater, and additional archive space;
(b) capital budget requirements including the use of fees collected by
the secretary of state that will support a certificate of participation
for the financing of the construction of the facility, and future
operating costs.
(2) The study will consider the use of the general administration
building site as a possible location. Any benefits or consequences may
be identified at this site or other sites considered.
(3) The office of financial management shall determine the maximum
use of the site and consider the consolidation of other state agencies,
including separately elected officials.
(4) The building shall be a high performance building and the
construction shall be procured using a performance based method
including design-build or design-build-operate-maintain.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Building for the Arts Grants (30000006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
provisions of section 1011, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.
(2) The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the
Federal Way performing arts center.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $218,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,481,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,699,000

Sec. 1004 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1073 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000189)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($4,400,000 for fiscal year 2014 and)) $4,400,000 from the
drinking water assistance account--state for fiscal year 2015 is
provided solely as state match for federal safe drinking water funds.
(2) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of
a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility
for which an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the
public works board must require as a contract condition that the
project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The
project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its
drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,800,000))
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($208,800,000))
$204,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $680,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($888,800,000))
$884,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
High Energy Efficient Housing Demonstration (30000708)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a
demonstration program making loans or grants to low-income housing
developers for ultra-high energy efficient housing projects including
single and multifamily units. The program's purpose is to apply ultra-high energy efficiency design and build strategies and technologies to
the construction of affordable housing, in order to increase housing
affordability for low-income households and reduce consumption of
limited natural resources.
(2) In consultation with professional building, energy efficiency,
and housing finance organizations, the office of financial management,
and the appropriate legislative staff, the department shall develop and
implement a competitive program by December 1, 2014, that is designed
to fund and evaluate ultra-high energy efficient housing projects.
(3) To receive funding, a project must:
(a) Demonstrate energy-saving and renewable energy systems designed
to reduce building energy use by fifty percent or more after the
housing is fully occupied, compared to the current edition of the
Washington state energy code;
(b) Propose to use a performance-based design and build process;
and,
(c) Provide a life-cycle cost analysis report to the department.
(4) At least one of the projects selected for funding must
demonstrate energy-saving and renewable energy systems designed to
achieve net zero energy use after the housing is fully occupied.
(5) The department must consider, at a minimum and in any order,
the following factors in assigning a numerical ranking to a project:
(a) Whether the proposed design demonstrates that the project will
achieve a fifty percent or greater reduction in building energy use
when fully occupied, compared to the current edition of the Washington
state energy code. Points for this factor must be awarded so that the
greater the reduction in energy use, the higher the number of points.
(b) The life-cycle cost of the project;
(c) That the project demonstrates a design, use of materials, and
construction process that can be replicated by the Washington building
industry;
(d) The extent to which the project leverages nonstate funds;
(e) The extent to which the project is ready to proceed to
construction;
(f) Whether the project promotes sustainable use of resources and
environmental quality;
(g) Whether the project is being well-managed to fund maintenance
and capital depreciation;
(h) Reduction of housing and utilities carbon footprint; and,
(i) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to
achieve the purpose of this program.
(6) By October 1, 2015, the department shall submit a report to the
governor and legislative fiscal committees on the results of the
demonstration project, including a benefit-cost analysis of designing
projects to reach net-zero energy use.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Capital Funding for Weatherization (30000707)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for low-income weatherization through the energy
matchmakers program.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Sec. 1007 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1074 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (91000582)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) All expenditures from the state taxable building construction
account--state appropriation in this section must be used for projects
that provide a benefit to the public through development,
demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save
energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions or
otherwise increase energy independence for the state. All expenditures
must be used for projects that develop and acquire assets that have a
useful life of at least thirteen years. These requirements must be
specified in funding agreements issued by the department.
(2) For any project funded from the state taxable building
construction account--state appropriation in this section, state funds
must not exceed fifty percent of the estimated cost of a project, and
funding preference must be provided to projects that offer a higher
percentage of nonstate match funds.
(3)(a) $15,000,000 of the state taxable building construction
account--state appropriation in this section is provided solely to
create a revolving loan fund to support the widespread use of proven
building energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies now
inhibited by lack of access to capital.
(b) To create the loan fund, the department shall provide grant
funds to a competitively selected nonprofit lender that will provide
matching private capital and will administer the loan fund. The
department must select the loan fund administrator through a
competitive process, with scoring conducted by a group of qualified
experts, applying criteria specified by the department.
(c) The department must establish guidelines for the lender related
to applicant eligibility, the screening process, and evaluation and
selection criteria. The criteria must include requiring evidence of
support for the proposed project from the impacted community and
consistency with economic growth strategies and plans of the affected
local governments. Applications for loans from the revolving fund must
disclose all sources of public funding to be provided for a project.
The nonprofit lender must use the revolving loan fund to make
affordable loans for projects including, but not limited to:
Residential and commercial energy retrofits, residential and community-scale solar installations, anaerobic digesters to treat dairy and
organic waste, and combined heat and power projects using woody biomass
as a fuel source.
(d) The department must conduct due diligence activities associated
with the use of public funds, including oversight of the project
selection process and project monitoring.
(e) Projects seeking financing of solar installations under this
section must agree in contract to not participate in the cost-recovery
program under RCW 82.16.120.
(4) $15,000,000 of the state taxable building construction
account--state appropriation in this section is provided solely for
grants to advance renewable energy technologies by public and private
electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. The
department shall work with utilities to offer matching grants for
projects that demonstrate new smart grid technologies. The department
shall develop a grant application process to competitively select
projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of
qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the
department. Applications for grants must disclose all sources of
public funding to be provided for a project. The grant funds must be
used to fund projects that demonstrate how to: Integrate intermittent
renewables through energy storage and information technology, dispatch
energy storage resources from utility control rooms, use the thermal
properties and electric load of commercial buildings and district
energy systems to store energy, or otherwise improve the reliability
and reduce the costs of intermittent or distributed renewable energy.
(5) $6,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account--state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to
match federal funds used to develop and demonstrate clean energy
technologies. The department shall work with the University of
Washington, Washington State University, and the Pacific Northwest
National Laboratory to offer matching funds for projects including, but
not limited to: Advancing energy storage and solar technologies, and
federal manufacturing innovation centers related to use of light-weight
carbon fiber components to advance energy efficiency in the
aeronautical, automotive, and marine sectors.
(6) The department must report on number and results of projects
funded through the clean energy fund, including the number of job hours
created and the number of jobs maintained and created, to the governor
and the legislature, by November 1, 2014.
(7) The energy recovery act account--federal appropriation in this
section is provided solely for loans, loan guarantees, and grants that
encourage the establishment of innovative and sustainable industries
for renewable energy and energy efficiency technology, consistent with
provisions of RCW 43.325.040 (energy freedom account).

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000,000
Energy Recovery Act Account--((Federal)) State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

Sec. 1008 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1077 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Projects for Jobs and Economic Development (92000151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share
of the appropriations are released for design costs only.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriations are provided solely for the following list
of projects:

Projects for Jobs & Economic Development Authorized Amount

City of Bremerton Puget Sound Naval Safety Project $1,300,000

Fairchild Airforce Base $2,700,000

City of Lynnwood Main Street Improvements $250,000

Port of Everett: Roll-On/Roll-Off Cargo Berth $1,500,000

Kittitas County Infrastructure and Facilities $5,000,000

City of Kennewick Industrial Land $1,000,000

Perry Tech Institute Building (($1,000,000))
$2,000,000

City of Buckley Drinking Water Improvements $350,000

((Coronado)) Carbonado Reservoir Replacement $525,000

Hopelink Cleveland Street Project $1,000,000

Redmond Connector $1,300,000

Washougal ((Storm Water Decant Facility)) Wastewater Treatment Plant $1,000,000

Roslyn Renaissance Northwest Improvement Company Building $500,000

Everett/Tulalip Water Pipeline Construction $1,000,000

((Renton Aerospace Training Center Construction $5,000,000))

Renton Riverview Bridge Replacement $1,100,000

Omak City Sewer, Collection System, and Treatment Plant $2,000,000

Harper Pier Replacement $800,000

University Place Main Street Redevelopment $975,000

Sultan Alder Avenue Water/Sewer Line Replacement $185,000

Quincy Industrial Water Reclamation & Reuse $700,000

NW Medical School $136,000

Ione - 8th St Lift Station Replacement $165,000

Stevens PUD Projects $532,000

Port Orchard Bay St. Pedestrian Path - Phase 2 $336,000

Dekalb Pier - Phase 2 (($255,000))
$755,000

Kenmore Village $300,000

South Kirkland TOD/Cross Kirkland Corridor (($1,300,000))
$1,500,000

Washington Agriculture Discovery Center $100,000

Mountlake Terrace Mainstreet Grant $2,000,000

Issaquah - North Roadway Network Improvement $5,000,000

TRIDEC Development of Small Modular Reactor Proposal $500,000

City of Shelton Wastewater $1,500,000

Port of Moses Lake Firefighting System $300,000

Seattle Chinatown/ID Development $500,000

TOTAL (($42,109,000))
$38,809,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,009,000))
$31,709,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,100,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,109,000))
$38,809,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,109,000))
$38,809,000

Sec. 1009 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1078 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Projects That Strengthen Communities and Quality of Life (92000230)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this
section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been
either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient
to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is
useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature.
This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the
appropriation is released for design costs only.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) $1,500,000 of the appropriation in this section from the state
building construction account--state is provided solely for design
development to align ongoing planning for the replacement of the
Seattle multimodal terminal at Colman dock with the creation of a
public park. The scope of work must provide a design plan that
includes an elevated park and corresponding amenities above the
terminal. Design development shall be delivered through the city of
Seattle. The scope of this project does not preclude any current plans
for Colman dock to replace or seismically upgrade the facility, nor
does it reduce the amount of general and commercial traffic, high
occupancy vehicles, transit, bicyclist and pedestrian movement.
(8) $500,000 of the appropriation from the environmental legacy
stewardship account--state is provided solely for an investigation of
possible contaminated soils around the Colman dock.
(9) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Projects that Strengthen Communities & Quality of Life Authorized Amount

Ft. Vancouver - Mother Joseph Academy & Infantry Barracks $1,000,000

LaConner Boardwalk $1,600,000

Kent Interurban Trail Connector (($750,000))
$1,350,000

Town of Concrete Public Safety Building $785,000

Complete Development of Ashford Park Facilities $1,000,000

Jackson Park Renovation $1,000,000

South Whatcom Library Construction $90,000

Guemes Channel Trail Project $700,000

Seabrook Trail $437,000

Vashon Island Allied Arts $2,000,000

Federal Way Performing Arts $2,000,000

Japanese Gulch Land Acquisition $1,000,000

Milton - Triangle Park ADA Upgrades $225,000

Langston Hughes Performing Arts Center - Storage $150,000

Wood Pellet Heat in Schools Pilot $500,000

Snohomish County Sheriff's Office South Precinct $1,000,000

Ravensdale Park $650,000

Worthington Park $210,000

Eastside Tacoma Community Center $400,000

((228th Street Trail $500,000))

Institute for Community Leadership $275,000

FISH of Vancouver/Nonprofit Community Service Center $1,000,000

Yelm Community Center $1,000,000

Ellensburg Depot $500,000

Roslyn City Hall $400,000

Northwest Carriage Museum $375,000

People's Community Center and Pool $500,000

((Town of Concrete Fire and Life Safety Facility $500,000))

Chehalis Pool $250,000

Mount Rainier Park Ranger Memorial $60,000

McAllister Air Museum $500,000

Repairs to Stevenson Grange $50,000

Meydenbauer Park Improvements $3,000,000

Sixty Acres Park Enhancements $750,000

Covington Community Park Phase 2 $2,100,000

Johnson Farm Museum - Anderson Island $250,000

Nikolai Project $40,000

Ft. Steilacoom Building Preservation $250,000

Plaza Roberto Maestas - Building the Beloved Community $1,000,000

Seattle Multimodal Terminal at Colman Dock/Public Park $2,000,000

Confluence Project $747,000

Castle Rock Citywide Residential Street Project $504,000

UWAVE $30,000

Transit-Community Center $800,000

Mt. Spokane Lodge $250,000

TOTAL (($33,128,000))
$32,728,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,628,000))
$32,228,000
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,128,000))
$32,728,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,128,000))
$32,728,000

Sec. 1010 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1064 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for Homeless Veterans (91000455)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
Homeless Veterans" in LEAP capital document No. 2013-1A, developed
April 10, 2013. The department shall evaluate projects on the LEAP
list and allocate the funding based on the requirements of RCW
43.185.050 and 43.185.070. Upon review of a completed application, if
the department determines that a project is not eligible or is not
ready to proceed, the department may reallocate the funding to a
project in another category in the LEAP list, or to the highest
((ranking)) ranked, ready-to-proceed project on the alternate list in
LEAP capital document No. 2013-1A, developed April 10, 2013. The
department shall, at its discretion, determine the actual amount of
funding to be allocated to each project, provided that the total
allocation does not exceed the appropriation provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,367,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,367,000

Sec. 1011 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1065 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for Farmworkers (91000457)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
Farmworkers" in LEAP capital document No. 2013-1A, developed April 10,
2013. The department shall evaluate projects on the LEAP list and
allocate the funding based on the requirements of RCW 43.185.050 and
43.185.070. Upon review of a completed application, if the department
determines that a project is not eligible or is not ready to proceed,
the department may reallocate the funding to a project in another
category on the LEAP list, or to the highest ((ranking)) ranked, ready-to-proceed project on the alternate list in LEAP capital document No.
2013-1A, developed April 10, 2013. The department shall, at its
discretion, determine the actual amount of funding to be allocated to
each project, provided that the total allocation does not exceed the
appropriation provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,050,000

Sec. 1012 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1066 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for People with Developmental Disabilities (91000458)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
People with Developmental Disabilities" in LEAP capital document No.
2013-1A, developed April 10, 2013. The department shall evaluate
projects on the LEAP list and allocate the funding based on the
requirements of RCW 43.185.050 and 43.185.070. Upon review of a
completed application, if the department determines that a project is
not eligible or is not ready to proceed, the department may reallocate
the funding to a project in another category on the LEAP list, or to
the highest ((ranking)) ranked, ready-to-proceed project on the
alternate list in LEAP capital document No. 2013-1A, developed April
10, 2013. The department shall, at its discretion, determine the
actual amount of funding to be allocated to each project, provided that
the total allocation does not exceed the appropriation provided in this
section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,019,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,019,000

Sec. 1013 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1067 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for People with Chronic Mental Illness (91000459)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
People with Chronic Mental Illness" in LEAP capital document No. 2013-1A, developed April 10, 2013. The department shall evaluate projects
on the LEAP list and allocate the funding based on the requirements of
RCW 43.185.050 and 43.185.070. Upon review of a completed application,
if the department determines that a project is not eligible or is not
ready to proceed, the department may reallocate the funding to a
project in another category in the LEAP list, or to the highest
((ranking)) ranked, ready-to-proceed project on the alternate list in
LEAP capital document No. 2013-1A, developed April 10, 2013. The
department shall, at its discretion, determine the actual amount of
funding to be allocated to each project, provided that the total
allocation does not exceed the appropriation provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,064,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,064,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Involuntary Evaluation and Treatment Beds (91000592)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the
department, in collaboration with the department of social and health
services, to issue grants to community hospital or free-standing
evaluation and treatment facilities providing new or increased capacity
for short term psychiatric detention and commitment services in the
King county regional support network, Spokane regional support network
outside of Spokane county, and Thurston/Mason regional support
networks. If the department cannot provide funds for a project within
each of these three regional support networks, they may, in
collaboration with the department of social and health services,
consider other locations.
(2) These funds must not be used in settings that meet the criteria
to be classified under federal law as institutions for mental diseases.
Funds may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with
establishment of the new or increased capacity in these settings.
These funds must not be used for operating costs associated with the
treatment of patients using these services.
(3) In order to receive funding, each of the projects must be
identified by the department of social and health services and the
regional support network and provide:
(a) Evidence that the project has been developed in collaboration
with one or more regional support networks, as defined in RCW
71.24.025;
(b) Evidence that the project will serve persons who are publicly
funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act under
chapter 71.05 RCW;
(c) Evidence of capacity to serve individuals with medical and
psychiatric comorbidities;
(d) A commitment to maintain the beds or facility for at least a
ten year period;
(e) The date upon which structural modifications or construction
would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;
(f) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the
beds; and
(g) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and
prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by
the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary
commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.
(4) To accommodate the emergent need for inpatient psychiatric
services, the department and the department of health, in collaboration
with the department of social and health services, must establish a
concurrent and expedited process for the purpose of grant applicants
meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate the
new or increased capacity in these settings.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Facilities and Housing for Individuals with Mental Illness
(91000636)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the department, in consultation with the department
of social and health services, to issue grants on a statewide
competitive basis for facilities and housing that serve individuals
with mental illness. Funds may be used for construction and equipment
costs associated with establishment of: Community hospital inpatient
psychiatric beds; free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities;
triage, crisis stabilization, and enhanced services facilities;
residential care facilities; and housing for individuals with chronic
mental illness. The department and the department of social and health
services must establish criteria for the issuance of grants. Funds
shall not be used for operating costs associated with these facilities
and housing.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
2014 Local and Community Projects (91000593)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation from the state taxable building construction
account in this section is provided solely for a historic building
rehabilitation demonstration program. The purposes of the program are
to: Support the public interest in preserving the state's historical
heritage; protect public safety and health in and around historic
buildings; and contribute to the economic stability of Washington
communities by keeping historic buildings functional and economically
viable.
(a) For purposes of this subsection, "historic building" means a
building that is at least fifty years old and retains authentic,
distinctive physical characteristics from its historic period of
construction.
(b) Funds appropriated in this subsection must be used to provide
gap financing for historic building rehabilitation projects that
otherwise could not be completed due to the financial circumstances of
their owners.
(i) Funds may be used for rehabilitation work that makes a building
safe and secure, such as fire sprinkler systems and reinforcing walls.
Funds may also be used for rehabilitation work that is required to make
space habitable and in compliance with code requirements.
(ii) Financing shall be in the form of low-interest rate loans.
Forgivable interest loans or grants may be allowed under certain
circumstances, as determined by the department. Loan repayments must
be deposited into the historic building rehabilitation revolving loan
fund established in section 7009 of this act, to be lent to future
projects.
(c) The department must issue a competitive request for
qualifications and quotations and select a certified nonprofit
community development financial institution to implement the
demonstration program. The department and selected organization must
enter into a contract and jointly develop a project solicitation,
evaluation and selection process.
(d) The expectation is that at least five percent of the project
cost will be contributed by the building owner in cash. The contractor
must work with other public and private lenders to underwrite financing
packages that leverage additional funding resources and applicable tax
credits.
(e) Projects will be evaluated on criteria including but not
limited to the following:
(i) Whether the project meets at least one of the public purposes
stated in this subsection;
(ii) The extent to which the project has leveraged funding from
public and private lenders and applicable tax credits; and
(iii) The extent to which the building owner has committed cash and
in-kind resources to the project.
(f) The department must conduct due diligence activities associated
with the use of public funds, including oversight of the project
selection process and project monitoring.
(g) By October 1, 2015, the department must provide a report to the
governor and appropriate legislative committees on the results of the
demonstration program and a recommendation as to whether it should
continue as a statutorily authorized program.
(8) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the
following list of projects:

Project Authorized Amount

Bellevue Downtown Park Inspiration Playground and Sensory Garden $750,000

Blackhills Community Soccer Complex $500,000

Bonlow Drive Extension $428,000

Broadway Low Income Senior Housing $500,000

Brookville Gardens Community Park $1,000,000

Caribou Trail Apartments $100,000

Casa Latina Worker Center Phase 3 $230,000

CDM Services: Clark County Aging Care Resource Center $1,000,000

Clallam County Respite Center and Healthcare $500,000

Coastal Harvest Ice Machine $75,000

Cross Park, Pierce County $450,000

Dawson Place Child Advocacy Center Phase 2 $176,000

Discover Children's Museum $250,000

Edmonds Center for the Arts $200,000

Floyd Norgaard Cultural Center $40,000

Frances Anderson Cultural Center Roofing Project $200,000

Gordon Family YMCA $1,000,000

Gratzer Park Ball Fields $200,000

Historic Building Rehabilitation Demonstration Program $750,000

Lakewood Towne Green $250,000

Lewis County Event Center and Sports Complex Phase 2 Construction $400,000

Life Support $500,000

Mason County Sheriff Evidence Storage Facility $500,000

Meadowlark Development $500,000

Milton City Facilities Upgrades $359,000

North Kitsap Fishline Food Bank $500,000

Port of Centralia - Centralia Station Phase 2 $500,000

Prairie Line Children's Art Park $302,000

Renovate Mason County Senior Center $230,000

Rockford Wastewater Treatment Facility Improvements $1,094,000

SE 240th St Watermain System Improvements $500,000

Sentinel Boulevard Restoration $230,000

St Vincent Food Bank & Community Services Construction Project $500,000

Twisp Town Hall $222,000

Vancouver Sea Mar Community Health Center $1,250,000

Vantage Point Apartments $500,000

Washington Green Schools $50,000

Washougal Senior/Community Center $212,000

Western Washington Live Grain Handling and Storage Facility $450,000

Yakima Warriors Association Community Complex $1,000,000

TOTAL $18,398,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,648,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,398,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,398,000

Sec. 1017 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1084 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Catastrophic Flood Relief (20084850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $9,200,000 of the appropriation is for design
alternatives for large capital flood damage reduction projects,
including basin-level water retention and Interstate 5 protection
projects.
(2) Up to $15,092,000 of the appropriation is for construction of
priority local flood protection projects, including multipurpose
projects that reduce flood damage and benefit fish habitat.
(3) Up to $1,750,000 of the appropriation is for projects to reduce
damage to residential and other structures in the floodplain, through
flood proofing and buyouts.
(4) Up to $2,160,000 of the appropriation is for state agency
technical assistance, stakeholder project management, project support,
and coordination.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $752,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,202,000))
$33,202,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,733,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,687,000))
$42,687,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
K-12 Skill Center Scoring Process (91000429)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) By November 1st of each even-numbered year, the office of
financial management shall complete an objective analysis and scoring
of all major capital projects proposed by skill centers and submit the
results of the scoring process to the legislative fiscal committees and
the superintendent of public instruction.
(2) The office of financial management, in consultation with the
legislative fiscal committees and the superintendent of public
instruction, shall establish a skill center scoring system and process
that is based on the framework used in the community and technical
college system of prioritization. Staff from the state board for
community and technical colleges shall provide technical assistance on
the development of a scoring system and process.
(3) The office of financial management shall consult with the
legislative fiscal committees in the scoring of skill center project
proposals, and may also solicit participation by independent experts.
(a) For each skill center project, the scoring system must, at a
minimum, include:
(i) An evaluation of enrollment trends;
(ii) Programs needed to prepare students for employment,
postsecondary education, long-term occupational skills training, and
apprenticeship;
(iii) Reasonableness of cost, including building and system life
cycle cost analysis and building performance goals;
(iv) Local project contribution;
(v) The ability of the project to enhance specific statewide and
regional goals, including employer demand for skilled workers;
(vi) Age and condition of the facility if applicable;
(vii) Space utilization; and
(viii) Consideration of a skill center program participant's
ongoing connection to and integration with their resident high school
and its student population.
(b) The office of financial management must assign high priority to
the reasonableness of cost and local project contribution criteria in
the scoring process.
(c) Major projects scored may include projects at the predesign,
design, or construction funding phase. Predesigns shall be on a
separate prioritized list.
(4) In evaluating and scoring skill center projects, the office of
financial management shall take into consideration project schedules
that result in realistic, balanced, and predictable expenditure
patterns over the ensuing three biennia.
(5) The office of financial management shall distribute common
definitions, the scoring system, and other information required for the
project proposal and scoring process as part of its biennial budget
instructions. The office of financial management, in consultation with
the legislative fiscal committees, shall develop common definitions
that skill centers must use in developing their project proposals and
lists under this section.
(6) In developing any scoring system for major capital projects
proposed by skill centers, the office of financial management:
(a) Shall be provided with all required information by the
superintendent of public instruction, skill centers, and the state
board for community and technical colleges as deemed necessary by the
office of financial management;
(b) May utilize independent services to verify, sample, or evaluate
information provided to the office of financial management by the
superintendent of public instruction, the skill centers, and the state
board for community and technical colleges; and
(c) Shall have full access to all data maintained by the
superintendent of public instruction and skill centers concerning the
inventory and condition of public school facilities.
(7) By December 1, 2014, the office of financial management, in
consultation with the superintendent of public instruction, must
develop options for integrating skill centers into the school
construction assistance program, including options for multidistrict
school financing to meet local match requirement beyond the ten percent
minimum threshold provided in RCW 28A.245.030.

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Sec. 1019 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1109 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
1063 Block Replacement (91000016)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for predesign and bridging documents, design,
competition honoraria, project management, demolition, and other
planning activities including permits. The predesign must specify the
tenants of the building as directed by the office of financial
management. The predesign must indicate the estimated annual cost
increase for state agency tenants compared to the cost of their
existing leases. The estimated cost increase may take into account
estimated cost savings in staff costs and other costs that may result
in more efficient building design and layout of office space. The
director of the office of financial management must review these cost
estimates and submit a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature indicating the budget increase that would be required sixty
days prior to executing any construction contracts for the building.
The lease for any prospective tenant may not be extended beyond the
anticipated occupancy date of the building. The building will be
alternatively financed as authorized in section 7014 of this act. The
building will be delivered using design build, as defined by chapter
39.10 RCW, with a guarantee for energy, operations, and maintenance
performance. The term for performance validation must not be less than
five years. The state may use state employees for services not related
to building performance. Criteria for selecting a contractor must
include life cycle costs, energy costs, or energy use index. The scope
of the building shall be between two hundred thousand and two hundred
twenty-five thousand square feet of office space based on the office of
financial management's direction for square feet and tenants identified
in the programming phase including the Washington state patrol.
Initial tenant lease costs for the building may not exceed six dollars
per gross square foot not including debt services. This is phase one
of a two-phase process that includes future demolition of the current
general administration building and construction of a similar facility
which may include the state library as a tenant.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Capitol Campus Master Plan (91000017)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for updating the master plan for the capitol campus.
The master plan will include existing sites that are available for
development to consolidate or relocate state agencies. Each
opportunity site shall include an estimate of building size the site
can hold and a project estimate for the building. The master plan
shall include a schedule for the site development. The office of
financial management shall provide the agencies to be consolidated or
relocated within the 2015-2021 six-year facilities plan.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Capitol Campus Dashboards (91000018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for installing energy dashboards in the John L. O'Brien
building, the John A. Cherberg building, and the legislative building.
The dashboards will also be made available on a department web site.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Generator Fuel Tank - Emergency Management Division (30000701)

Appropriation:
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Sec. 1023 2013 2nd sp.s c 19 s 1115 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,979,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,800,000))
$3,673,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,652,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,249,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,049,000))
$51,901,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Historic Block Public Safety/Code Compliance Feasibility Study
(91000004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for conducting a feasibility study for making state
grants or loans for the purposes of: Seismic upgrades; fire
suppression; public safety; and other building code compliance needs in
historic buildings, blocks, and districts throughout the state. The
study shall include an examination of: The statewide need for the
funding; eligible property types; engineering solutions and cost
ranges; potential funding sources and mechanisms; and, the feasibility
of dispersing state funds to multiple property owners in order to
reduce engineering costs. The department must submit the feasibility
study to legislative fiscal committees by November 1, 2014.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES
Relocation of Industrial Hygiene Lab and Safety Training (30000015)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for a
predesign to determine: (a) Necessary program space for the industrial
hygiene lab and safety training space; and (b) capital budget
requirements including the use of fees collected by the department that
will support a certificate of participation for the financing of the
construction of the facility and future operating costs.
(2) The study will consider the use of 1500 Jefferson Street data
center as a possible location. Any benefits or consequences may be
identified at this site or other sites considered.
(3) The building shall be a high performance building and the
construction shall be procured using a performance based method
including design-build or design-build-operate-maintain.

Appropriation:
Medical Aid Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
Accident Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building
(20081319)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $828,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,928,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Fircrest Campus Electrical Infrastructure (91000023)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for design and engineering of electrical infrastructure
upgrades including electrical infrastructure feeding the department of
health lab.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $470,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,970,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
McNeil Island Still Harbor Dock Repairs (30002573)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
State Mental Health Facility Improvements (91000025)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,259,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,259,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Veterans Cemetery Expansion (30000145)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $268,000

General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,680,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,948,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,948,000

Sec. 2007 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 2037 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Department of Corrections Centralized Pharmacy Westside (92000034)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($700,000))
$862,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($700,000))
$862,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Complex Contaminated Soil Remediation
(30000994)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Female Capacity (91000014)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for
developing a predesign and other planning needs to provide capacity for
female offenders. The predesign shall assess the use of the Washington
state corrections center for women including any necessary
infrastructure.
(2) The predesign shall also assess the use of mental health beds
to add capacity. Facilities including Western State Hospital, the
Yakima jail, and Pine Lodge, shall be considered to provide mental
health services to female offenders. Different levels of treatment
shall be analyzed with a cost benefit for each level.
(3) The department may contract with the Washington state institute
for public policy or other entities. The department of social and
health services shall provide information as needed.
(4) The department shall coordinate any efficiencies with section
2010 of this act.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Male Capacity (91000015)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for
developing a predesign and other planning needs to provide capacity for
male offenders. The predesign shall assess the use of the Maple Lane
facility including any necessary infrastructure.
(2) The predesign shall also assess the use of mental health beds
to add capacity. Facilities including Western State Hospital, the
Yakima jail, Pine Lodge, and the use of the Maple Lane facility shall
be considered to provide mental health services to male offenders.
Different levels of treatment shall be analyzed with a cost benefit for
each level.
(3) The department may contract with the Washington state institute
for public policy or other entities. The department of social and
health services shall provide information as needed.
(4) The department shall coordinate any efficiencies with section
2009 of this act.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center for Women Diesel Tank Removal
(91000016)

Appropriation:
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
Elevator Repairs (30000003)

Appropriation:
Administrative Contingency Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $469,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $469,000

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 3001 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3002 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (19972012)

Reappropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,885,000
Appropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,354,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,548,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,433,000))
$18,787,000

Sec. 3002 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3067 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000327)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(((1) $7,750,000 for fiscal year 2014 and $7,750,000 for fiscal
year 2015 of the state building construction account--state is provided
solely as state match for federal clean water funds.
(2))) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of
a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which
an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the department of
ecology must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor
undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor
may finance the costs of the audit as part of its water pollution
control program loan.

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,500,000))
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($184,500,000))
$270,500,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($250,000,000))
$320,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $510,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($760,000,000))
$830,500,000

Sec. 3003 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3075 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Cleanup Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000337)

Appropriation:
Environmental Legacy Stewardship
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,500,000))
$46,881,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,517,000))
$20,136,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,017,000

Sec. 3004 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3076 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000351)

Appropriation:
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,300,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,047,000))
$6,047,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,347,000

Sec. 3005 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3079 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grants (30000374)

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,537,000
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,296,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,833,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($260,000,000))
$251,063,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($322,537,000))
$334,896,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Flood Hazard Reduction Grants (91000239)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $22,915,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for a statewide competitive grant program for flood hazard
reduction projects that also protect or restore floodplain ecosystem
functions.
(a) Grants may be distributed on a competitive basis to the
following eligible entities: Counties, cities, federally recognized
Indian tribes; port districts; flood control districts; conservation
districts; and diking and drainage districts.
(b) Applicants must provide a twenty percent match from nonstate
sources. The nonstate match may include cash on hand, the value of
real property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, the
proceeds of a letter of credit or other binding loan commitment, a
pledge commitment, and in-kind contributions. Applicants may receive
credit for properly documented nonstate matching funds that were
contributed no earlier than ten years prior to the grant solicitation
round and that are related to the needs identified in the project
application. The department may develop additional requirements
related to documenting the value of the nonstate match.
(c) Priority must first be given to projects that:
(i) Are located in a county or counties covered by ten or more
state emergency flood proclamations from 1996 to 2012; and
(ii) Are part of a basin-wide strategy created by a governor's work
group in close collaboration with an Indian tribe and a multicounty
flood authority.
(d) Priority must next be given to projects in counties that have
historically been and are projected to continue to be at greatest risk
and most vulnerable to flooding.
(e) The department, in consultation with the office of financial
management, must evaluate, score, and rank applications based on the
following criteria:
(i) Projects that achieve multiple benefits including, but not
limited to, cost-effective flood hazard reduction to people, property,
critical facilities, and transportation corridors, flood risk
reduction, salmon recovery, water quality improvements, habitat
restoration, agricultural viability, public access, and channel
migration zone protection. Projects must address both reduction and
prevention of flood risks, and protection or restoration of floodplain
ecosystem functions. For the Chehalis river basin, projects may also
include, but not be limited to, an upstream water retention facility;
(ii) Projects that are consistent with and recommended by a
collaborative planning and approval process that includes public
comment, such as a comprehensive flood hazard management plan, a hazard
mitigation plan, a comprehensive plan, a watershed plan, or other
applicable plans;
(iii) Projects that minimize or eliminate future costs for
maintenance, operation, or emergency response; and
(iv) Projects that are ready to proceed with the scope of work, and
whose sponsors have the capacity to complete the project successfully.
(2) $2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for a grant to the Moses Lake irrigation and rehabilitation
district for phase 1 of the Moses Lake north dam replacement project
and associated design, permitting and management costs.
(3) $85,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely
for a grant to the city of Stanwood for the state route number 532
flood protection berm and shared use path project.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Headquarters Energy Conservation and HVAC Replacement (30000396)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,773,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,023,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Coastal Restoration Grants (91000243)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for grants to projects that restore forests, water
quality, fish and wildlife habitat on the Washington Pacific Coast and
are on the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2014-1A
developed February 21, 2014.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Water Act Mitigation (91000242)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $24,600,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for a statewide competitive grant program for local governments
for storm water projects that provide a water quality or ecological
benefit, address pollution from existing development, and support
partnerships to reduce toxic water pollution. Prior to awarding a
grant in a water body that is in Indian tribe reservation lands or in
a usual and accustomed fishing area, the department must seek comment
and agreement from the tribe.
(2) $400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for the Meeker Creek stream and riparian restoration project.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

Sec. 3010 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3104 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Lake Sammamish State Park: Sunset Beach Bathhouse Replacement
(30000653)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The state parks and recreation commission
shall enter into an interagency agreement with the office of financial
management to provide funding for a budget evaluation study. The
office of financial management shall use a budget evaluation study team
approach using value engineering techniques and life cycle cost
analysis in conducting the study. The office of financial management
shall select the budget evaluation team members, contract for the
study, and report the results to the legislature and agencies in a
timely manner following the study. Funds must not be allotted until
the scope of work is approved by the office of financial management as
recommended by the study.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,984,000))
$2,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,984,000))
$2,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Boating Facilities Program (30000219)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Marblemount Hatchery Replace Barrier Culverts (30000657)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,098,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,098,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Lake Rufus Woods Agreement Fishing Area Facilities (91000149)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Replace Barrier Culverts on Department of Natural Resources Land
(30000232)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Olympic Region Shop Fire Recovery (30000226)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,471,000
Park Land Trust Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $639,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,110,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,110,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Marine Station (30000229)

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $535,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,535,000

Sec. 3017 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3220 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Derelict Vessel Removal and Disposal (91000049)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
the expedited removal and disposal of derelict vessels under RCW
79.100.100 and for vessels eligible for the voluntary vessel turn-in
program established in chapter 291, Laws of 2013 (Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1245).
(1) The department must streamline the process for removing and
disposing of derelict vessels in order to expedite the elimination of
the backlog of identified derelict vessels. Department staff resources
must prioritize their time on the legal process of identifying legal
ownership and responsibility and contracting for the removal and
disposal of identified derelict vessels. The department must develop
and execute contracts for removal and disposal of derelict vessels
that:
(a) Ensure proper management of any hazardous wastes;
(b) Expedite the removal of identified derelict vessels; and
(c) Balance costs of removal and disposal after accounting for
salvage value with the need to develop contractor capacity to achieve
the expedited elimination of the backlog of identified derelict
vessels.
(2) The department may expend up to three percent of the
appropriations for administration of the project.
(3) The department must submit a progress report each December 1st
and May 1st of each year of the biennium. The report must include a
list of the vessels removed and disposed of, the costs incurred for
administration, removal, and disposal, and the number of vessels
remaining to be removed and disposed of at the end of the reporting
period.
(4) Up to $350,000 of the appropriation in this section is for
predesign of a publicly owned derelict vessel deconstruction facility.
The department may consult with the office of financial management and
the department of enterprise services for development of a request for
proposal for the predesign analysis.
(a) The predesign analysis must include, but is not limited to,
project scope, proposed alternatives, siting considerations including
upland storage, cost estimates, and the potential for public and
private partnerships.
(b) The department must provide a report on proposed
recommendations to the legislature by January 1, 2015.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $589,000
Appropriation:
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,500,000))
$4,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,411,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,500,000))
$7,850,000

(End of part)

PART 4
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Fire Training Academy Oil Water Separator (91000004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

PART 5
EDUCATION
Sec. 5001 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5020 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
2013-2015 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance
(30000145)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,340,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants and for
completing inventory and building condition assessments for all public
school districts once every six years.
(2) $933,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for mapping the design of new
facilities and remapping the design of facilities to be remodeled, for
school construction projects funded through the school construction
assistance program.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
improve web-based access by taxpayers to school capacity and actual
enrollment in order to understand possible opportunities to increase
efficiency through consolidation. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction must post this capacity and enrollment information
on its web site.
(4) Funds from this appropriation may be used to match federal
dollars provided by the office of economic adjustment for school
replacement facilities located on military bases.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
expedite allocation and distribution of any eligible funds under the
school construction assistance grant program to the Evergreen (Clark
County) School District to address the school construction emergency
resulting from the fire that destroyed the Crestline School.
(6) The space allocations for state funding assistance purposes for
districts with senior or four-year high schools with fewer than four
hundred students, as outlined in WAC 392-343-035, must be computed in
accordance with the following formula:

Number of Headcount
Student-Grades 9-12 Maximum Space
Allocation Per Facility

0-200 42,000 square feet

201-300 48,000 square feet

301-or more 52,000 square feet

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($285,355,000))
$230,681,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($208,232,000))
$172,684,000
Common School Construction Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($495,087,000))
$404,865,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,099,310,000))
$3,099,270,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,594,397,000))
$3,504,135,000

Sec. 5002 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5019 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Capital Program Administration (30000128)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall publish to its
web site and report to the office of financial management, the
appropriate committees of the legislature, and the legislative
evaluation and accountability program a list of local school district
projects submitted for approval for school construction assistance
within seven business days of the school district deadline to submit
items for approval. The report must include, but not be limited to:
(a) School district;
(b) Project name;
(c) Estimated square footage by proposed project type;
(d) Estimated total of all project costs and estimated total
construction contract cost;
(e) Funding sources and election dates, if applicable; and
(f) Intent to front-fund the project.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction must provide to the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee in
electronic database form the following:
(a) Study and survey information beginning with grants awarded July
1, 2014; and
(b) All available inventory and condition of schools data.

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,854,000))
$3,604,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,246,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,100,000))
$19,850,000

Sec. 5003 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5024 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Spokane Valley Tech (91000026)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,500,000))
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,500,000))
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Water Bottle Filling Stations in K-12 Public Schools (91000028)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Kiona-Benton City High School Parking Lot (91000029)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Nutrition Equipment Assistance Grants (91000030)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
competitive equipment assistance grants consistent with chapter . . .,
Laws of 2014 (Substitute House Bill No. 2410).

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING
LOSS
Lloyd Auditorium Emergency Repairs (30000012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $260,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,610,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Net Pen Aquaculture Research (91000015)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the University of Washington sea grant program to:
Create an index of net pen scientific literature and policy research
applicable to Washington state; establish a technical steering group to
assess net pen research needs and to estimate costs of implementing net
pen research proposals; and, initiate a net pen outreach program to
engage relevant stakeholders. The University of Washington sea grant
program shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
by January 20, 2015.

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $94,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $94,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Buried Oil Storage Tank Remediation (30000681)

Appropriation:
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Sec. 5010 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5078 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Carver Academic Renovation (20081060)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,374,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($73,531,000))
$68,531,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,905,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
History Museum Membrane System Replacement (30000220)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,748,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,748,000

Sec. 5012 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5117 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Centralia Community College: Student Services (30000123)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,517,000
Community/Technical College Capital
Projects Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,162,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,679,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,075,000))
$31,793,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,592,000))
$37,472,000

(End of part)

PART 6
SUPPLEMENTAL CAPITAL BUDGET
Sec. 6001 2013 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Renton Aerospace Training Center Construction (((92000151)))
(30000724)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for construction of the Renton aerospace training
center. ((This funding is in addition to funding provided in section
1077, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. (uncodified).))

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$10,000,000

(End of part)

PART 7
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
Sec. 7001 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7043 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS
State Toxic Control Account: For transfer to
the Local Toxic Control Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account: For transfer to
the Local Toxic Control Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
Enterprise Services Account: For transfer to the Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $922,900
State Taxable Building Construction Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance account, $4,400,000
for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account: For transfer
to the water pollution control revolving account,
$7,750,000 for fiscal year 2014 and $7,750,000 for
fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,500,000

Sec. 7002 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7014 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL
CONTRACTS. The following agencies may enter into financial contracts,
paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for
the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section,
agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option
available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements,
lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial
contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an
agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the
authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation
therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial
contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent
provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance
committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
enterprise services and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions
authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not
eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional
space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic
transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible
for state funded maintenance and operations.
(1) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Peninsula College
for up to $2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate or replace the Forks
satellite building.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Puget Sound
Community College for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the
downtown Lacey campus.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase up to forty
acres of land.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River
Community College for up to $15,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a
replacement facility for the student life center.
(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom Community
College for up to $11,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a student
recreation center.
(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane Community
College for up to $3,100,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an addition to the
student services building.
(g) Enter into a long-term lease on behalf of Spokane Community
College at Felts Field suitable for the aerospace training center
program, subject to the approval of the office of financial management
as required by chapter 43.82 RCW.
(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia
College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the main building.
(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia
College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase interest in a mixed
use building for student housing.
(2) Department of enterprise services:
(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $1,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the modifications to the Yakima office building in preparation for
the department of social and health services use of the building.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $69,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct a new office building at 1063 Capitol Way South, Olympia.
((The building will be delivered using design build, as defined by
chapter 39.10 RCW, with a guarantee for energy, operations and
maintenance performance. The term for performance validation must not
be less than five years. The state may use state employees for
services not related to building performance. Criteria for selecting
a contractor must include life cycle costs, energy costs or energy use
index. The scope of the building shall be between two hundred thousand
and two hundred twenty-five thousand square feet of office space based
on the office of financial management's direction for square feet and
tenants identified in the programming phase including the Washington
State Patrol. Tenant lease costs for the building may not exceed $26
per gross square foot including debt services and operating expenses.
Proposals must be received by January 31, 2014. This is phase one of
a two-phase process that includes future demolition of the current
general administration building and construction of a similar facility
which may include the state library as a tenant.))
(3) Eastern Washington University: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $19,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to improve and expand recreational and
athletic facilities on the Cheney campus.
(4) The Evergreen State College: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $12,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the currently leased
facilities for the Tacoma program.

Sec. 7003 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7033 and 2013
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 992 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2)(a) Moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 must be deposited as
follows: Fifty-six percent to the state toxics control account under
subsection (3) of this section and forty-four percent to the local
toxics control account under subsection (4) of this section. When the
cumulative amount of deposits made to the state and local toxics
control accounts under this section reaches the limit during a fiscal
year as established in (b) of this subsection, the remainder of the
moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 during that fiscal year must be
deposited into the environmental legacy stewardship account created in
RCW 70.105D.170.
(b) The limit on distributions of moneys collected under RCW
82.21.030 to the state and local toxics control accounts for the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2013, is one hundred forty million dollars.
(c) In addition to the funds required under (a) of this subsection,
the following moneys must be deposited into the state toxics control
account: (i) The costs of remedial actions recovered under this
chapter or chapter 70.105A RCW; (ii) penalties collected or recovered
under this chapter; and (iii) any other money appropriated or
transferred to the account by the legislature.
(3) Moneys in the state toxics control account must be used only to
carry out the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to
the following activities:
(a) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(b) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(c) The hazardous waste clean-up program required under this
chapter;
(d) State matching funds required under federal cleanup law;
(e) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(f) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling, or
disposal of paint and hazardous wastes from households, small
businesses, and agriculture;
(g) Oil and hazardous materials spill prevention, preparedness,
training, and response activities;
(h) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(i) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(j) A public participation program;
(k) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards
under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both: (i) A substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur; and (ii) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship;
(l) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management
priorities of RCW 70.105.150;
(m) State agriculture and health programs for the safe use,
reduction, recycling, or disposal of pesticides;
(n) Storm water pollution control projects and activities that
protect or preserve existing remedial actions or prevent hazardous
clean-up sites;
(o) Funding requirements to maintain receipt of federal funds under
the federal solid waste disposal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.);
(p) Air quality programs and actions for reducing public exposure
to toxic air pollution;
(q) Public funding to assist prospective purchasers to pay for the
costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) if:
(i) The facility is located within a redevelopment opportunity zone
designated under RCW 70.105D.150;
(ii) The amount and terms of the funding are established under a
settlement agreement under RCW 70.105D.040(5); and
(iii) The director has found the funding meets any additional
criteria established in rule by the department, will achieve a
substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise
occur, and will provide a public benefit in addition to cleanup
commensurate with the scope of the public funding;
(r) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris
cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters;
(s) Appropriations to the local toxics control account or the
environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170, if
the legislature determines that priorities for spending exceed
available funds in those accounts;
(t) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the department of
ecology's water quality, shorelands, environmental assessment,
administration, and air quality programs;
(u) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, actions at the state
conservation commission to improve water quality for shellfish; ((and))
(v) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, actions at the University
of Washington for reducing ocean acidification;
(w) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics
control account may be spent on projects in section ((3159)) 3160,
chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. and for transfer to the local
toxics control account; and
(x) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics
control account may be transferred to the radioactive mixed waste
account.
(4)(a) The department shall use moneys deposited in the local
toxics control account for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority:
(i) Extended grant agreements entered into under (((c)[(e)]))
(e)(i) of this subsection;
(ii) Remedial actions, including planning for adaptive reuse of
properties as provided for under (((c)[(e)])) (e)(iv) of this
subsection. The department must prioritize funding of remedial actions
at:
(A) Facilities on the department's hazardous sites list with a high
hazard ranking for which there is an approved remedial action work plan
or an equivalent document under federal cleanup law;
(B) Brownfield properties within a redevelopment opportunity zone
if the local government is a prospective purchaser of the property and
there is a department-approved remedial action work plan or equivalent
document under the federal cleanup law;
(iii) Storm water pollution source projects that: (A) Work in
conjunction with a remedial action; (B) protect completed remedial
actions against recontamination; or (C) prevent hazardous clean-up
sites;
(iv) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(v) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris
cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters; and
(vii) Appropriations to the state toxics control account or the
environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170, if
the legislature determines that priorities for spending exceed
available funds in those accounts.
(b) Funds for plans and programs must be allocated consistent with
the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters
70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW.
(c) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control
account may also be used for local government storm water planning and
implementation activities.
(d) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the local toxics control account to the state general
fund, such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.
(e) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department may
use the following strategies when providing grants to local governments
under this subsection:
(i) Enter into an extended grant agreement with a local government
conducting remedial actions at a facility where those actions extend
over multiple biennia and the total eligible cost of those actions
exceeds twenty million dollars. The agreement is subject to the
following limitations:
(A) The initial duration of such an agreement may not exceed ten
years. The department may extend the duration of such an agreement
upon finding substantial progress has been made on remedial actions at
the facility;
(B) Extended grant agreements may not exceed fifty percent of the
total eligible remedial action costs at the facility; and
(C) The department may not allocate future funding to an extended
grant agreement unless the local government has demonstrated to the
department that funds awarded under the agreement during the previous
biennium have been substantially expended or contracts have been
entered into to substantially expend the funds;
(ii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government
conducting a remedial action that provides for periodic reimbursement
of remedial action costs as they are incurred as established in the
agreement;
(iii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government prior to
it acquiring a property or obtaining necessary access to conduct
remedial actions, provided the agreement is conditioned upon the local
government acquiring the property or obtaining the access in accordance
with a schedule specified in the agreement;
(iv) Provide integrated planning grants to local governments to
fund studies necessary to facilitate remedial actions at brownfield
properties and adaptive reuse of properties following remediation.
Eligible activities include, but are not limited to: Environmental
site assessments; remedial investigations; health assessments;
feasibility studies; site planning; community involvement; land use and
regulatory analyses; building and infrastructure assessments; economic
and fiscal analyses; and any environmental analyses under chapter
43.21C RCW;
(v) Provide grants to local governments for remedial actions
related to areawide groundwater contamination. To receive the funding,
the local government does not need to be a potentially liable person or
be required to seek reimbursement of grant funds from a potentially
liable person;
(vi) The director may alter grant matching requirements to create
incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the
following conditions exists:
(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship
imposed by the clean-up liability;
(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development,
public recreational opportunities, or habitat restoration opportunities
that would not otherwise occur; or
(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and
redevelopment of brownfield property under RCW 70.105D.040(5) that
would not otherwise occur;
(vii) When pending grant applications under (((c)[(e)])) (e)(iv)
and (v) of this subsection (4) exceed the amount of funds available,
designated redevelopment opportunity zones must receive priority for
distribution of available funds.
(((d) [(f)])) (f) To expedite multiparty clean-up efforts, the
department may purchase remedial action cost-cap insurance. For the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the local toxics control account
may be spent on projects in sections 3024, 3035, 3036, and 3059,
chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.
(5) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for: Natural disasters where there is no
hazardous substance contamination; high performance buildings; solid
waste incinerator facility feasibility studies, construction,
maintenance, or operation; or after January 1, 2010, for projects
designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound, funded in a
competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310. However,
this subsection does not prevent an appropriation from the state toxics
control account to the department of revenue to enforce compliance with
the hazardous substance tax imposed in chapter 82.21 RCW.
(7) Except during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, one percent of the
moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 shall be allocated only for public
participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-
profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these
grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations
in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases
of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and
hazardous waste management priorities. No grant may exceed sixty
thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys appropriated
for public participation that are not expended at the close of any
biennium revert to the state toxics control account.
(8) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance. To accelerate both remedial action and economic recovery,
the department may expedite the adoption of rules necessary to
implement chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. using the expedited
procedures in RCW 34.05.353. The department shall initiate the award
of financial assistance by August 1, 2013. To ensure the adoption of
rules will not delay financial assistance, the department may
administer the award of financial assistance through interpretive
guidance pending the adoption of rules through July 1, 2014.
(9) Except as provided under subsection (3)(k) and (q) of this
section, nothing in chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. effects
[affects] the ability of a potentially liable person to receive public
funding.
(10) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium the local toxics control
account may also be used for the centennial clean water program and for
storm water grants.

Sec. 7004 RCW 43.160.080 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6011 are each
amended to read as follows:
There shall be a fund in the state treasury known as the public
facilities construction loan revolving account, which shall consist of
all moneys collected under this chapter and any moneys appropriated to
it by law. Disbursements from the revolving account shall be on
authorization of the board. In order to maintain an effective
expenditure and revenue control, the public facilities construction
loan revolving account shall be subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW. During the 2009-2011 biennium, sums in the public
facilities construction loan revolving account may be used for
community economic revitalization board export assistance grants and
loans in section 1018, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. and for
matching funds for the federal energy regional innovation cluster in
section 1017, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. During the 2013-2015 biennium, sums in the public facilities construction loan
revolving account may be used for the animal disease traceability
project in section 3247, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.,
administered by the department of agriculture.

Sec. 7005 RCW 70.148.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 993 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The pollution liability insurance program trust account is
established in the custody of the state treasurer. All funds
appropriated for this chapter and all premiums collected for
reinsurance shall be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the
account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter
including payment of costs of administering the pollution liability
insurance and underground storage tank community assistance programs.
Expenditures for payment of administrative and operating costs of the
agency are subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW
and may be made only after appropriation by statute. No appropriation
is required for other expenditures from the account.
(2) Each calendar quarter, the director shall report to the
insurance commissioner the loss and surplus reserves required for the
calendar quarter. The director shall notify the department of revenue
of this amount by the fifteenth day of each calendar quarter.
(3) Each calendar quarter the director shall determine the amount
of reserves necessary to fund commitments made to provide financial
assistance under RCW 70.148.130 to the extent that the financial
assistance reserves do not jeopardize the operations and liabilities of
the pollution liability insurance program. The director shall notify
the department of revenue of this amount by the fifteenth day of each
calendar quarter. The director may immediately establish an initial
financial assistance reserve of five million dollars from available
revenues. The director may not expend more than fifteen million
dollars for the financial assistance program.
(4) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the pollution liability insurance program trust account
to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance of the account.
(5) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the pollution liability
insurance program trust account may be used for other underground
storage tank cleanup projects as provided in sections 1022, 2011, and
5009, chapter . . ., Laws of 2014 (this act).
(6) This section expires July 1, 2020.

Sec. 7006 RCW 27.34.330 and 2006 c 371 s 232 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington state historical society shall establish a
competitive process to solicit proposals for and prioritize heritage
capital projects for potential funding in the state capital budget.
The society shall adopt rules governing project eligibility and
evaluation criteria. Application for funding of specific heritage
projects may be made to the society by local governments, public
development authorities, nonprofit corporations, tribal governments,
and other entities, as determined by the society. The society, with
the advice of ((leaders in the heritage field)) an advisory panel,
including but not limited to leaders in the fields of heritage,
architecture, and finance, representatives from the office of the
secretary of state, the department of enterprise services, the eastern
Washington state historical society, and the department of archaeology
and historic preservation, shall establish and submit a prioritized
list of heritage capital projects to the governor and the legislature
in the society's biennial capital budget request. The list shall
include a description of each project, the amount of recommended state
funding, and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the
project. The total amount of recommended state funding for projects on
a biennial project list shall not exceed ten million dollars. The
prioritized list shall be developed through open and public meetings
and the amount of state funding shall not exceed thirty-three and one-third percent of the total cost of the project. The nonstate portion
of the total project cost may include cash, the value of real property
when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind
contributions. The department shall not sign contracts or otherwise
financially obligate funds under this section until the legislature has
approved a specific list of projects. In contracts for grants
authorized under this section, the society shall include provisions
requiring that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a
specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and
that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the
grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the
contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant. Program
administration costs retained by the society must be consistent with
capital budget guidelines established by the office of financial
management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7007 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
To the extent that any appropriation authorizes expenditures of
state funds from the state building construction account, or from any
other capital project account in the state treasury, for a capital
project or program that is specified to be funded with proceeds from
the sale of bonds, the legislature declares that any such expenditures
for that project or program made prior to the issue date of the
applicable bonds are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of those
bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of such appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7008 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
The legislative evaluation and accountability program committee
shall develop a new K-12 capital budget model in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction, the office of financial
management, the caseload forecast council, and legislative fiscal staff
for use in forecasting biennial appropriations to support the school
construction assistance program. The model must include improved
forecasting of the school construction assistance program through
analysis of existing data including, but not limited to:
(1) Local school district bond and levy elections and bond sales;
(2) Actual pace of state assistance reimbursement including front-funded projects and other conditions that contribute to variations in
reimbursements;
(3) Local school district study and survey results specific to
estimated capital costs, cost/benefit analyses on the need to modernize
and/or replace existing school facilities, timelines for completing
school facilities projects, and ability to provide capital funds by
local efforts;
(4) Analysis of actual inventory and condition of schools; and
(5) State population forecasts of school aged children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7009 A new section is added to chapter 43.330
RCW to read as follows:
The historic building rehabilitation revolving loan fund is created
in the state treasury. All receipts from the repayment of historic
building rehabilitation loans must be deposited into the fund. Moneys
in the fund may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from
the fund may be used only for loans to historic building rehabilitation
projects as provided for in section 1016 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7010 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
The department of enterprise services shall develop a city/state
impact summary in partnership with the city of Olympia. The analysis
must describe physical spaces and related operations that jointly
impact state facilities and the host capital city. At a minimum, the
transition of Sylvester park in downtown Olympia from a state facility
to a local facility must be considered in the analysis. The analysis
must also include a menu of city-wide revenue sources to be considered
by the 2015 legislature that will increase city revenues and ultimately
city expenditures by the host capital city to mitigate impacts that the
city has on state government facilities and the operations of those
facilities. A final report is due to the office of financial
management, the house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and
means committee by December 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7011 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7004 (uncodified); and
(2) 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7013 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7012 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 52
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 55
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 52
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 52
--- END ---