BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.335 and 1991 c 107 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that the parks and recreation lands owned and
managed by the ((state parks and recreation)) commission are a
significant collection of valuable scenic, natural, cultural, and
historical((, and cultural)) resources for the citizens of Washington
state. The legislature further finds that if citizens understand and
appreciate the ((state park ecological resources, they will come to
appreciate and understand the ecosystems and natural resources
throughout the state)) scenic, natural, cultural, and historical
resources present in Washington's state parks, they will be inspired to
conserve this important legacy for future generations. Therefore, the
((state parks and recreation)) commission may ((increase the)) use
((of)) its facilities and resources to provide ((environmental))
scenic, natural, cultural, or historical resource interpretation
throughout the state parks system.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.05.340 and 1991 c 107 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((state parks and recreation)) commission may provide
((environmental interpretative)) scenic, natural, cultural, or
historical resource interpretive activities for visitors to state parks
that:
(1) Explain the functions, history, significance, and cultural
aspects of ecosystems;
(2) Explain the relationship between human needs, human behaviors
and attitudes, and the environment; ((and))
(3) Explain the diverse human heritage and cultural changes over
time in Washington state;
(4) Offer experiences and information to increase citizen
understanding, appreciation, and stewardship of ((the environment and
its multiple uses)) their natural, cultural, ethnic, and artistic
heritage; and
(5) Explain the need for natural, cultural, and historical resource
protection and preservation as well as the methods by which these goals
can be achieved.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.05.345 and 1991 c 107 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((state parks and recreation)) commission may consult and enter
into agreements with and solicit assistance from ((private sector
organizations and other governmental agencies that are interested in
conserving and interpreting Washington's environment. The commission
shall not permit commercial advertising in state park lands or
interpretive centers as a condition of such agreements. Logos or
credit lines for sponsoring organizations may be permitted. The
commission shall maintain an accounting of all monetary gifts provided,
and expenditures of monetary gifts shall not be used to increase
personnel)) other public agencies, the state parks foundation, private
entities, employee business units, and tribes that are interested in
stewarding and interpreting state parks scenic, natural, cultural, and
recreational resources. The commission may not permit commercial
advertising in state park lands or interpretive centers as a condition
of the agreements. Logos or credit lines for sponsoring organizations
is permitted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When entering into any agreement under RCW 79A.05.345 or
otherwise involving the management of state park land or a facility by
a public or private partner, the commission shall consider, when
appropriate:
(a) If the entity has an adequate source of available funding to
assume the financial responsibilities of the agreement;
(b) If the entity has sufficient expertise to assume the scope of
responsibilities of the agreement;
(c) If the agreement results in net financial benefits to the
state; and
(d) If the agreement results in advancement of the commission's
public purpose.
(2) Any agreement subject to this section must include specific
performance measures. The performance measures must cover, but are not
limited to, the entity's ability to manage financial operating costs,
to adequately perform management responsibilities, and to address and
respond to public concerns. The agreement must provide that failure to
meet any performance measure may lead to the termination of the
contract or requirements for remedial action to be taken before the
agreement may be extended.

Sec. 5 RCW 79A.70.010 and 2000 c 25 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purpose of the Washington state parks ((gift)) foundation is to
solicit support for the state parks system, cooperate with other
organizations, and to encourage gifts to support and improve the state
parks.

Sec. 6 RCW 79A.70.020 and 2000 c 25 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter((,))
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Foundation" means the Washington state parks ((gift))
foundation((,)) created in RCW 79A.70.030.
(2) "State parks" means that system of parks administered by the
commission under this title.
(3) "Eligible grant recipients" includes any and all of the
activities of the commission in carrying out the provisions of this
title and friends groups or other organizations that propose projects
or programs solely for the benefit of state parks.
(4) "Eligible projects" means any project, action, program, or part
of any project ((or)), action, or program that serves to preserve,
restore, improve, or enhance the state parks.

Sec. 7 RCW 79A.70.030 and 2000 c 25 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2000, the commission shall file articles of
incorporation in accordance with the Washington nonprofit corporation
act, chapter 24.03 RCW, to establish the Washington state parks
((gift)) foundation. The foundation shall not be an agency,
instrumentality, or political subdivision of the state and shall not
disburse public funds.
(2) The foundation shall have a board of directors consisting of up
to fifteen members, whose terms, method of appointment, and authority
must be in accordance with the Washington nonprofit corporation act,
chapter 24.03 RCW. ((Initial members of the board shall be appointed
by the governor and collectively have experience in business,
charitable giving, outdoor recreation, and parks administration.
Initial appointments shall be made by September 30, 2000. Subsequent
board members shall be elected by the general membership of the
foundation.
(3) Members of the board shall serve three-year terms, except for
the initial terms, which shall be staggered by the governor to achieve
a balanced mix of terms on the board. Members of the board may serve
up to a maximum of three terms. At the end of a term, a member may
continue to serve until a successor has been elected.))

Sec. 8 RCW 79A.70.040 and 2000 c 25 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((As soon as practicable, the board of directors shall organize
themselves and the foundation suitably to carry out the duties of the
foundation, including achieving federal tax-exempt status.
(2))) The foundation shall actively solicit contributions from
individuals and groups for the benefit of the state parks.
(((3))) (2) The foundation shall develop criteria for guiding
themselves in either the creation of an endowment, or the making of
grants to eligible grant recipients and eligible projects in the state
parks, or both.
(((4))) (3) A competitive grant process shall be conducted at least
annually by the foundation to award funds ((to the)) for the benefit of
state parks. Competitive grant applications shall only be submitted to
the foundation by the commission, friends groups, or other
organizations with projects or programs solely for the benefit of state
parks. ((The process shall be started as soon as practicable.))
Grants shall be awarded to eligible projects consistent with the
criteria developed by the foundation ((and shall be available only for
state parks use on eligible projects)).

--- END ---