BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that after the
termination of funding for the state tourism office, the Washington
tourism alliance, a statewide industry organization with members from
all sectors of the tourism industry, has maintained a basic state
tourism marketing program. In spite of that, competition from other
states and provinces has caused Washington state's percentage growth of
tourism to be below the national average. Tourism is the fourth
largest export industry in Washington state, employs more than one
hundred fifty-three thousand individuals, and contributes significantly
to state and local tax revenues. It is composed of large and small
businesses from all corners of Washington state. Because of the number
and diversity of businesses in the tourism industry and the desire to
prevent further decline in the state's tourism industry, the
legislature finds that it is in the state's best interest to identify
a long-term, significant source of funding that can only be used for
implementing a state tourism marketing program. The program should be
supported by contributions from the primary business sectors of the
state's tourism industry. The legislature also finds that a state
tourism marketing program is best governed by the businesses and
entities that contribute funding, including in-kind contributions.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to enact the structure of
a mechanism that will provide funding for a state tourism marketing
program, including the sources of funding and governance organization
which will determine the specific use and allocation of the funds.
Further, it is the intent of the legislature that appropriate state
agencies will work with the Washington tourism alliance to devise a
plan to collect funds necessary for a state tourism marketing program
and ensure that the funds are used only for that purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington tourism alliance has
determined that a reasonable amount to initially implement a state
tourism marketing program is seven million five hundred thousand
dollars. It is intended for this amount to be raised from five major
sectors of the tourism industry. These sectors are lodging, food
service, attractions and entertainment, retail, and transportation.
Based on the North American classification system codes that make up
each sector, it is intended for these sectors to contribute the
following amounts in a manner to be described in the report required
under subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Lodging - two million four hundred thousand dollars;
(b) Food service - two million one hundred thousand dollars;
(c) Attractions and entertainment - nine hundred seventy-five
thousand dollars;
(d) Retail - one million four hundred twenty-five thousand dollars;
and
(e) Transportation - six hundred thousand dollars.
(2) By December 1, 2014, a report must be submitted to the
appropriate legislative committees from the Washington tourism alliance
proposing the manner in which the amounts allocated to each sector will
be collected and the mechanism that can be used to ensure that the
funds are used only by the Washington tourism alliance for a state
tourism marketing program including its administration. The
legislature must direct the appropriate agencies of state government to
work with the Washington tourism alliance to assist in developing the
collection method. These agencies include but are not limited to the
department of revenue, department of commerce, the state treasurer's
office, and the secretary of state.
(3) In addition to the five sectors in subsection (1) of this
section, the Washington tourism alliance must identify and include in
the report other tourism sectors, businesses, and government entities
which are part of the tourism industry and could provide additional
funding for a state marketing program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) As part of the report to the legislature
required under section 2(2) of this act, the Washington tourism
alliance must include a proposal for a governance structure which will
determine the use of the funds, including a method to report on the
effectiveness of the state tourism marketing plan. The report must
also include a method for stopping the collection of funds from the
sectors noted in section 2(1) of this act if the board determines that
the funds are not being used in an appropriate manner.
(2) The governance structure must include a board with a majority
of representatives from the five sectors noted in section 2(1) of this
act. Representatives from destination marketing organizations must
also be included on the board. The board members must be chosen to
ensure broad geographic representation and diversity in the size of
businesses. Other representatives may be chosen from businesses and
entities that voluntarily make a significant contribution to state
tourism marketing funding. All board members must represent the
interests of the entire state.
(3) Initial board appointments must be made by the current
Washington tourism alliance board. Statewide trade associations that
represent any of the sectors noted in section 2(1) of this act must
submit nominations from their sector for the board. The nominations
must reflect the size and geographic diversity of the sector
represented by the trade association and must be at least twice the
number of positions to be filled by the nominations. Initial and
subsequent board appointments must be made from these nominations.
(4) The governance structure must include a proposal for a
marketing committee and an executive committee. The marketing
committee may include representatives from the tourism industry who are
not members of the board.

--- END ---