BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.302 and 2010 c 211 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board may determine that part or all of a comprehensive
plan or development regulations are invalid if the board:
(a) Makes a finding of noncompliance and issues an order of remand
under RCW 36.70A.300;
(b) Includes in the final order a determination, supported by
findings of fact and conclusions of law, that the continued validity of
part or parts of the plan or regulation would substantially interfere
with the fulfillment of the goals of this chapter; and
(c) Specifies in the final order the particular part or parts of
the plan or regulation that are determined to be invalid, and the
reasons for their invalidity.
(2) ((A determination of invalidity is prospective in effect and
does not extinguish rights that vested under state or local law before
receipt of the board's order by the city or county. The determination
of invalidity does not apply to a completed development permit
application for a project that vested under state or local law before
receipt of the board's order by the county or city or to related
construction permits for that project.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this
section and (b) of this subsection, a development permit application
not vested under state or local law before receipt of the board's order
by the county or city vests to the local ordinance or resolution that
is determined by the board not to substantially interfere with the
fulfillment of the goals of this chapter.
(b) Even though the application is not vested under state or local
law before receipt by the county or city of the board's order,)) (a)
Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, no rights vest
in the part or parts of a plan or regulation determined to be invalid
by the board under subsection (1) of this section. A permit
application or permit submitted or issued under the invalidated part or
parts of a plan or regulation prior to the board's determination of
invalidity is void and confers no vested rights.
(b) A determination of invalidity does not apply to a development
permit application for:
(i) A permit for construction by any owner, lessee, or contract
purchaser of a single-family residence for his or her own use or for
the use of his or her family on a lot existing before receipt by the
county or city of the board's order, except as otherwise specifically
provided in the board's order to protect the public health and safety;
(ii) A building permit and related construction permits for
remodeling, tenant improvements, or expansion of an existing structure
on a lot existing before receipt of the board's order by the county or
city; and
(iii) A boundary line adjustment or a division of land that does
not increase the number of buildable lots existing before receipt of
the board's order by the county or city.
(((4))) (3) If the ordinance that adopts a plan or development
regulation under this chapter includes a savings clause intended to
revive prior policies or regulations in the event the new plan or
regulations are determined to be invalid, the board shall determine
under subsection (1) of this section whether the prior policies or
regulations are valid during the period of remand.
(((5))) (4) A county or city subject to a determination of
invalidity may adopt interim controls and other measures to be in
effect until it adopts a comprehensive plan and development regulations
that comply with the requirements of this chapter. A development
permit application may vest under an interim control or measure upon
determination by the board that the interim controls and other measures
do not substantially interfere with the fulfillment of the goals of
this chapter.
(((6))) (5) A county or city subject to a determination of
invalidity may file a motion requesting that the board clarify, modify,
or rescind the order. The board shall expeditiously schedule a hearing
on the motion. At the hearing on the motion, the parties may present
information to the board to clarify the part or parts of the
comprehensive plan or development regulations to which the final order
applies. The board shall issue any supplemental order based on the
information provided at the hearing not later than thirty days after
the date of the hearing.
(((7))) (6)(a) If a determination of invalidity has been made and
the county or city has enacted an ordinance or resolution amending the
invalidated part or parts of the plan or regulation or establishing
interim controls on development affected by the order of invalidity,
after a compliance hearing, the board shall modify or rescind the
determination of invalidity if it determines under the standard in
subsection (1) of this section that the plan or regulation, as amended
or made subject to such interim controls, will no longer substantially
interfere with the fulfillment of the goals of this chapter.
(b) If the board determines that part or parts of the plan or
regulation are no longer invalid as provided in this subsection, but
does not find that the plan or regulation is in compliance with all of
the requirements of this chapter, the board, in its order, may require
periodic reports to the board on the progress the jurisdiction is
making towards compliance.

--- END ---