BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.431 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Nursing facility medicaid payment rate allocations shall be
facility-specific and shall have six components: Direct care, therapy
care, support services, operations, property, and financing allowance.
The department shall establish and adjust each of these components, as
provided in this section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each
medicaid nursing facility in this state.
(2) Component rate allocations in therapy care and support services
for all facilities shall be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of
eighty-five percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are
set up or in use. Component rate allocations in operations, property,
and financing allowance for essential community providers shall be
based upon a minimum facility occupancy of ((eighty-seven)) eighty-five
percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in
use. Component rate allocations in operations, property, and financing
allowance for small nonessential community providers shall be based
upon a minimum facility occupancy of ((ninety-two)) ninety percent of
licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use.
Component rate allocations in operations, property, and financing
allowance for large nonessential community providers shall be based
upon a minimum facility occupancy of ((ninety-five)) ninety-two percent
of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use.
For all facilities, the component rate allocation in direct care shall
be based upon actual facility occupancy. The median cost limits used
to set component rate allocations shall be based on the applicable
minimum occupancy percentage. In determining each facility's therapy
care component rate allocation under RCW 74.46.511, the department
shall apply the applicable minimum facility occupancy adjustment before
creating the array of facilities' adjusted therapy costs per adjusted
resident day. In determining each facility's support services
component rate allocation under RCW 74.46.515(3), the department shall
apply the applicable minimum facility occupancy adjustment before
creating the array of facilities' adjusted support services costs per
adjusted resident day. In determining each facility's operations
component rate allocation under RCW 74.46.521(3), the department shall
apply the minimum facility occupancy adjustment before creating the
array of facilities' adjusted general operations costs per adjusted
resident day.
(3) Information and data sources used in determining medicaid
payment rate allocations, including formulas, procedures, cost report
periods, resident assessment instrument formats, resident assessment
methodologies, and resident classification and case mix weighting
methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to time as
determined by the department.
(4)(a) Direct care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months.
Effective July 1, 2009, the direct care component rate allocation shall
be rebased, so that adjusted cost report data for calendar year 2007 is
used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2015. Beginning July 1, 2015,
the direct care component rate allocation shall be rebased biennially
during every odd-numbered year thereafter using adjusted cost report
data from two years prior to the rebase period, so adjusted cost report
data for calendar year 2013 is used for July 1, 2015, through June 30,
2017, and so forth.
(b) Direct care component rate allocations established in
accordance with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the direct care component rate allocation established in accordance
with this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor or
factors for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial appropriations
act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any
earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or
compounded to the direct care component rate allocation established in
accordance with this chapter.
(5)(a) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months.
Effective July 1, 2009, the therapy care component rate allocation
shall be cost rebased, so that adjusted cost report data for calendar
year 2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2015. Beginning
July 1, 2015, the therapy care component rate allocation shall be
rebased biennially during every odd-numbered year thereafter using
adjusted cost report data from two years prior to the rebase period, so
adjusted cost report data for calendar year 2013 is used for July 1,
2015, through June 30, 2017, and so forth.
(b) Therapy care component rate allocations established in
accordance with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the therapy care component rate allocation established in accordance
with this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor or
factors for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial appropriations
act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any
earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or
compounded to the therapy care component rate allocation established in
accordance with this chapter.
(6)(a) Support services component rate allocations shall be
established using adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months. Effective July 1, 2009, the support services component rate
allocation shall be cost rebased, so that adjusted cost report data for
calendar year 2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2015.
Beginning July 1, 2015, the support services component rate allocation
shall be rebased biennially during every odd-numbered year thereafter
using adjusted cost report data from two years prior to the rebase
period, so adjusted cost report data for calendar year 2013 is used for
July 1, 2015, through June 30, 2017, and so forth.
(b) Support services component rate allocations established in
accordance with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the support services component rate allocation established in
accordance with this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions
factor or factors for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial
appropriations act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied
solely or compounded to the support services component rate allocation
established in accordance with this chapter.
(7)(a) Operations component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months.
Effective July 1, 2009, the operations component rate allocation shall
be cost rebased, so that adjusted cost report data for calendar year
2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2015. Beginning July
1, 2015, the operations care component rate allocation shall be rebased
biennially during every odd-numbered year thereafter using adjusted
cost report data from two years prior to the rebase period, so adjusted
cost report data for calendar year 2013 is used for July 1, 2015,
through June 30, 2017, and so forth.
(b) Operations component rate allocations established in accordance
with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the operations component rate allocation established in accordance with
this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor or factors
for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial appropriations act, no
economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any earlier
biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or compounded to
the operations component rate allocation established in accordance with
this chapter.
(8) Total payment rates under the nursing facility medicaid payment
system shall not exceed facility rates charged to the general public
for comparable services.
(9) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions for determining component rate allocations for
facilities in circumstances not directly addressed by this chapter,
including but not limited to: Inflation adjustments for partial-period
cost report data, newly constructed facilities, existing facilities
entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a period of
absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded new bed
capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of ownership
of the nursing facility business, facilities temporarily reducing the
number of set-up beds during a remodel, facilities having less than six
months of either resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under
the current contractor prior to rate setting, and other circumstances.
(10) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions, including necessary threshold costs, for adjusting
rates to reflect capital improvements or new requirements imposed by
the department or the federal government. Any such rate adjustments
are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.
(11) Effective July 1, 2010, there shall be no rate adjustment for
facilities with banked beds. For purposes of calculating minimum
occupancy, licensed beds include any beds banked under chapter 70.38
RCW.
(12) Facilities obtaining a certificate of need or a certificate of
need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW after June 30, 2001, must have
a certificate of capital authorization in order for (a) the
depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be included in
calculation of the facility's property component rate allocation; and
(b) the net invested funds associated with the capitalized addition to
be included in calculation of the facility's financing allowance rate
allocation.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.46.435 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 7 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The property component rate allocation for each facility shall
be determined by dividing the sum of the reported allowable prior
period actual depreciation, subject to department rule, adjusted for
any capitalized additions or replacements approved by the department,
and the retained savings from such cost center, by the greater of a
facility's total resident days in the prior period or resident days as
calculated on ((eighty-seven)) eighty-five percent facility occupancy
for essential community providers, ((ninety-two)) ninety percent
occupancy for small nonessential community providers, or ((ninety-five)) ninety-two percent facility occupancy for large nonessential
community providers. If a capitalized addition or retirement of an
asset will result in a different licensed bed capacity during the
ensuing period, the prior period total resident days used in computing
the property component rate shall be adjusted to anticipated resident
day level.
(2) A nursing facility's property component rate allocation shall
be rebased annually, effective July 1st, in accordance with this
section and this chapter.
(3) When a certificate of need for a new facility is requested, the
department, in reaching its decision, shall take into consideration
per-bed land and building construction costs for the facility which
shall not exceed a maximum to be established by the secretary.
(4) The property component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.46.437 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 7 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish for each medicaid nursing
facility a financing allowance component rate allocation. The
financing allowance component rate shall be rebased annually, effective
July 1st, in accordance with the provisions of this section and this
chapter.
(2) The financing allowance is determined by multiplying the net
invested funds of each facility by ((.04)) .085, and dividing by the
greater of a nursing facility's total resident days from the most
recent cost report period or resident days calculated on ((eighty-seven)) eighty-five percent facility occupancy for essential community
providers, ((ninety-two)) ninety percent facility occupancy for small
nonessential community providers, or ((ninety-five)) ninety-two percent
occupancy for large nonessential community providers. If a capitalized
addition, renovation, replacement, or retirement of an asset will
result in a different licensed bed capacity during the ensuing period,
the prior period total resident days used in computing the financing
allowance shall be adjusted to the greater of the anticipated resident
day level or ((eighty-seven)) eighty-five percent of the new licensed
bed capacity for essential community providers, ((ninety-two)) ninety
percent facility occupancy for small nonessential community providers,
or ((ninety-five)) ninety-two percent occupancy for large nonessential
community providers.
(3) In computing the portion of net invested funds representing the
net book value of tangible fixed assets, the same assets, depreciation
bases, lives, and methods referred to in department rule, including
owned and leased assets, shall be utilized, except that the capitalized
cost of land upon which the facility is located and such other
contiguous land which is reasonable and necessary for use in the
regular course of providing resident care must also be included.
Subject to provisions and limitations contained in this chapter, for
land purchased by owners or lessors before July 18, 1984, capitalized
cost of land is the buyer's capitalized cost. For all partial or whole
rate periods after July 17, 1984, if the land is purchased after July
17, 1984, capitalized cost is that of the owner of record on July 17,
1984, or buyer's capitalized cost, whichever is lower. In the case of
leased facilities where the net invested funds are unknown or the
contractor is unable to provide necessary information to determine net
invested funds, the secretary has the authority to determine an amount
for net invested funds based on an appraisal conducted according to
department rule.
(4) The financing allowance rate allocation calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.46.506 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 7 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The direct care component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of nursing care for one resident of a nursing facility for
one day, including direct care supplies. Therapy services and
supplies, which correspond to the therapy care component rate, shall be
excluded. The direct care component rate includes elements of case mix
determined consistent with the principles of this section and other
applicable provisions of this chapter.
(2) The department shall determine and update semiannually for each
nursing facility serving medicaid residents a facility-specific per-resident day direct care component rate allocation, to be effective on
the first day of each six-month period. In determining direct care
component rates the department shall utilize, as specified in this
section, minimum data set resident assessment data for each resident of
the facility, as transmitted to, and if necessary corrected by, the
department in the resident assessment instrument format approved by
federal authorities for use in this state.
(3) The department may question the accuracy of assessment data for
any resident and utilize corrected or substitute information, however
derived, in determining direct care component rates. The department is
authorized to impose civil fines and to take adverse rate actions
against a contractor, as specified by the department in rule, in order
to obtain compliance with resident assessment and data transmission
requirements and to ensure accuracy.
(4) Cost report data used in setting direct care component rate
allocations shall be for rate periods as specified in RCW
74.46.431(4)(a).
(5) The department shall rebase each nursing facility's direct care
component rate allocation as described in RCW 74.46.431, adjust its
direct care component rate allocation for economic trends and
conditions as described in RCW 74.46.431, and update its medicaid
average case mix index as described in RCW 74.46.496 and 74.46.501,
consistent with the following:
(a) Adjust total direct care costs reported by each nursing
facility for the applicable cost report period specified in RCW
74.46.431(4)(a) to reflect any department adjustments, and to eliminate
reported resident therapy costs and adjustments, in order to derive the
facility's total allowable direct care cost;
(b) Divide each facility's total allowable direct care cost by its
adjusted resident days for the same report period, to derive the
facility's allowable direct care cost per resident day;
(c) Divide each facility's adjusted allowable direct care cost per
resident day by the facility average case mix index for the applicable
quarters specified by RCW 74.46.501(6)(b) to derive the facility's
allowable direct care cost per case mix unit;
(d) Divide nursing facilities into at least two and, if applicable,
three peer groups: Those located in nonurban counties; those located
in high labor-cost counties, if any; and those located in other urban
counties;
(e) Array separately the allowable direct care cost per case mix
unit for all facilities in nonurban counties; for all facilities in
high labor-cost counties, if applicable; and for all facilities in
other urban counties, and determine the median allowable direct care
cost per case mix unit for each peer group;
(f) Determine each facility's semiannual direct care component rate
as follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred ((ten)) twelve percent of the peer group median
established under (e) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per
case mix unit equal to one hundred ((ten)) twelve percent of the peer
group median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation
equal to the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by
that facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable
six-month period specified in RCW 74.46.501(6)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than or equal to one hundred ((ten)) twelve percent of the peer group
median established under (e) of this subsection shall have a direct
care component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost
per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case
mix index from the applicable six-month period specified in RCW
74.46.501(6)(c).
(6) The direct care component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7) Costs related to payments resulting from increases in direct
care component rates, granted under authority of RCW 74.46.508 for a
facility's exceptional care residents, shall be offset against the
facility's examined, allowable direct care costs, for each report year
or partial period such increases are paid. Such reductions in
allowable direct care costs shall be for rate setting, settlement, and
other purposes deemed appropriate by the department.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.46.515 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 7 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The support services component rate allocation corresponds to
the provision of food, food preparation, dietary, housekeeping, and
laundry services for one resident for one day.
(2) The department shall determine each medicaid nursing facility's
support services component rate allocation using cost report data
specified by RCW 74.46.431(6).
(3) To determine each facility's support services component rate
allocation, the department shall:
(a) Array facilities' adjusted support services costs per adjusted
resident day, as determined by dividing each facility's total allowable
support services costs by its adjusted resident days for the same
report period, increased if necessary to a minimum occupancy provided
by RCW 74.46.431(2), for each facility from facilities' cost reports
from the applicable report year, for facilities located within urban
counties, and for those located within nonurban counties and determine
the median adjusted cost for each peer group;
(b) Set each facility's support services component rate at the
lower of the facility's per resident day adjusted support services
costs from the applicable cost report period or the adjusted median per
resident day support services cost for that facility's peer group,
either urban counties or nonurban counties, plus ((eight)) ten percent;
and
(c) Adjust each facility's support services component rate for
economic trends and conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(6).
(4) The support services component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.46.521 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 7 s 9 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The operations component rate allocation corresponds to the
general operation of a nursing facility for one resident for one day,
including but not limited to management, administration, utilities,
office supplies, accounting and bookkeeping, minor building
maintenance, minor equipment repairs and replacements, and other
supplies and services, exclusive of direct care, therapy care, support
services, property, financing allowance, and variable return.
(2) The department shall determine each medicaid nursing facility's
operations component rate allocation using cost report data specified
by RCW 74.46.431(7)(a). Operations component rates for essential
community providers shall be based upon a minimum occupancy of
((eighty-seven)) eighty-five percent of licensed beds. Operations
component rates for small nonessential community providers shall be
based upon a minimum occupancy of ((ninety-two)) ninety percent of
licensed beds. Operations component rates for large nonessential
community providers shall be based upon a minimum occupancy of
((ninety-five)) ninety-two percent of licensed beds.
(3) For all calculations and adjustments in this subsection, the
department shall use the greater of the facility's actual occupancy or
an occupancy equal to ((eighty-seven)) eighty-five percent for
essential community providers, ((ninety-two)) ninety percent for small
nonessential community providers, or ((ninety-five)) ninety-two percent
for large nonessential community providers. To determine each
facility's operations component rate the department shall:
(a) Array facilities' adjusted general operations costs per
adjusted resident day, as determined by dividing each facility's total
allowable operations cost by its adjusted resident days for the same
report period for facilities located within urban counties and for
those located within nonurban counties and determine the median
adjusted cost for each peer group;
(b) Set each facility's operations component rate at the lower of:
(i) The facility's per resident day adjusted operations costs from
the applicable cost report period adjusted if necessary for minimum
occupancy; or
(ii) The adjusted median per resident day general operations cost
for that facility's peer group, urban counties or nonurban counties;
and
(c) Adjust each facility's operations component rate for economic
trends and conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(7)(b).
(4) The operations component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 2014, the department shall establish a
disproportionate medicaid share rate add-on using an array of
facilities.
(a) To calculate the array of facilities, the department, without
using peer groups, shall first rank all facilities in numerical order
from highest to lowest according to each facility's examined and
documented medicaid occupancy as a percentage of total occupancy based
upon medicaid days compared to total resident days from the applicable
cost report period specified in RCW 74.46.431(7)(a). The array shall
then be divided into four quartiles, each containing, as nearly as
possible, an equal number of facilities, and one percent shall be
assigned to the lowest quartile, three percent to facilities in the
next lowest quartile, four and one-half percent to facilities in the
next highest quartile, and five and one-half percent to facilities in
the highest quartile.
(b) The department shall compute the disproportionate medicaid
share add-on by multiplying a facility's assigned percentage by the sum
of the facility's direct care, therapy care, support services, and
operations component rates determined in accordance with this chapter
and rules adopted by the department.
(c) The disproportionate medicaid share array, with subsequent
reassignment of quartiles, if any, shall be calculated on an annual
basis, effective July 1, using the most recently filed cost report
information.
(2) The disproportionate medicaid share add-on calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(3) The disproportionate medicaid share add-on shall not be subject
to the settlement provisions of RCW 74.46.022(6).
(4) The disproportionate medicaid share add-on shall not be
included in or subject to the comparative analysis calculation
described in section 11, chapter 7, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. and
section 3, chapter 3, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess., or subsequent and
similar comparative analysis.

--- END ---