BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.16.090 and 2003 c 400 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Examinations for licensure under this chapter shall be conducted at
such times and places as the director determines appropriate.
Examinations shall consist of tests designed to reasonably measure the
applicant's knowledge of safe and sanitary practices and may also
include the applicant's knowledge of this chapter and rules adopted
pursuant to this chapter. The director may establish by rule a
performance examination in addition to any other examination. The
director shall establish by rule the minimum passing score for all
examinations and the requirements for reexamination of applicants who
fail the examination or examinations. The director may allow an
independent person to conduct the examinations at the expense of the
applicants.
The director shall ((take steps to ensure that after completion of
the required course or apprenticeship program, applicants may promptly
take the examination and receive the results of the examination))
provide written and practical practice examinations for students of
schools regulated under this chapter prior to completion of the
required training hours. The director shall provide practice
examination results to schools.

--- END ---