BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the quality
education council has made seven recommendations in its 2014 report
under its statutory assignment to recommend and inform the ongoing
implementation of an evolving program of basic education, recommend the
financing necessary to support such a program, develop strategic
recommendations intended to inform future educational policy and
funding decisions, and identify measurable goals and priorities for the
educational system.
(2) The legislature intends under this act to implement those
recommendations from the quality education council's 2014 report that
require statutory change.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.550 and 2013 c 282 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The following statewide indicators of educational system health
are established:
(a) Kindergarten readiness: The percentage of students
demonstrating the characteristics of entering kindergartners in all six
areas identified by the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing
skills administered in accordance with RCW 28A.655.080;
(b) Third grade literacy:
(i) The percentage of students meeting the standard on the
((fourth)) third grade statewide reading or English language arts
assessment administered in accordance with RCW 28A.655.070; and
(ii) The percentage of students in grades kindergarten through
three meeting the proficiency standard on the state English language
proficiency assessment;
(c) Readiness for high school:
(i) The percentage of students meeting the standard on the eighth
grade statewide ((mathematics)) assessments in reading or language
arts, mathematics, and science administered in accordance with RCW
28A.655.070;
(ii) The percentage of students in grades kindergarten through
eight meeting the proficiency standard on the state English language
proficiency assessment; and
(iii) The difference in student growth on the statewide assessments
in reading or English language arts and mathematics between all
students and targeted subgroups of students, as measured by the
Washington achievement index adopted under RCW 28A.657.110;
(d) High school graduation:
(i) The four-year cohort high school graduation rate; and
(ii) The five-year extended high school graduation rate;
(e) Quality of a high school diploma:
(i) The percentage of students within four years of high school
graduation enrolled in precollege or remedial courses in public
postsecondary education institutions; and
(ii) The percentage of students meeting the career and college
ready standard on high school assessments in English language arts and
mathematics developed by a multistate consortium and administered in
accordance with RCW 28A.655.070;
(f) Postsecondary attainment:
(i) The percentage of high school graduates who during the second
quarter after graduation are either enrolled in postsecondary education
or training or are employed, and the percentage during the fourth
quarter after graduation who are either enrolled in postsecondary
education or training or are employed; and
(((f) The percentage of students enrolled in precollege or remedial
courses in college)) (ii) The percent of high school graduates
attaining degrees, certificates, career credentials, and completing
apprenticeships before age twenty-six; and
(g) Access to quality schools: Starting with the 2014-15 school
year as a base year, the percentage of schools at or above the "Good"
tier of the Washington achievement index adopted under RCW 28A.657.110.
(2) The statewide indicators established in subsection (1) of this
section shall be disaggregated as provided under RCW 28A.300.042.
(3) The state board of education, with assistance from the office
of the superintendent of public instruction, the office of the
governor, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the
educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, the
education data center in the office of financial management, the
professional educator standards board, the department of early
learning, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the
student achievement council, shall establish a process for identifying
realistic but challenging system-wide performance goals and
measurements, if necessary, for each of the indicators established in
subsection (1) of this section, including for subcategories of students
as provided under subsection (2) of this section. The performance goal
for each indicator must be set on a biennial basis((, and may only be
adjusted upward)).
(4) The ((state board of education, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, and the student achievement
council)) agencies listed under subsection (3) of this section shall
each align their strategic planning and education reform efforts with
the statewide indicators and performance goals established under this
section. If any agency uses an indicator in subsection (1) of this
section for purposes of strategic planning or performance benchmarking,
the performance goal and measure used must be the same as established
by the process under subsection (3) of this section.
(5)(a) The state board of education, with assistance from the
((office of the superintendent of public instruction, the workforce
training and education coordinating board, the educational opportunity
gap oversight and accountability committee, and the student achievement
council)) agencies listed under subsection (3) of this section, shall
submit a report on the status of each indicator in subsection (1) of
this section and recommend revised performance goals and measurements,
if necessary, by ((December)) February 1st of each ((even))
odd-numbered year, except that the initial report establishing baseline
values and initial goals shall be delivered to the education committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2013.
(b) If the educational system is not on target to meet the
performance goals on any individual indicator, the report must
recommend evidence-based reforms intended to improve student
achievement in that area.
(c) To the extent data is available, the performance goals for each
indicator must be compared with national data in order to identify
whether Washington student achievement results are within the top ten
percent nationally or are comparable to results in peer states with
similar characteristics as Washington. If comparison data show that
Washington students are falling behind national peers on any indicator,
the report must recommend evidence-based reforms targeted at addressing
the indicator in question.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.290.010 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The quality education council is created to recommend and
inform the ongoing implementation by the legislature of an evolving
program of basic education and the financing necessary to support such
program. The council shall develop strategic recommendations on the
program of basic education for the common schools. The council shall
take into consideration the capacity report produced under RCW
28A.300.172 and the availability of data and progress of implementing
the data systems required under RCW 28A.655.210. Any recommendations
for modifications to the program of basic education shall be based on
evidence that the programs effectively support student learning. The
council shall update the statewide strategic recommendations every four
years. The recommendations of the council are intended to:
(a) Inform future educational policy and funding decisions of the
legislature and governor;
(b) Identify measurable goals and priorities for the educational
system in Washington state for a ten-year time period, including the
goals of basic education, ongoing strategies for coordinating statewide
efforts to eliminate the achievement gap and reduce student dropout
rates, and strategies to increase learning opportunities in science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics that are aligned with the STEM
framework for action and accountability developed under RCW
28A.188.030; and
(c) Enable the state of Washington to continue to implement an
evolving program of basic education.
(2) The council may assign its responsibility for identifying
measurable goals for the educational system to the state board of
education and the process established under RCW 28A.150.550. The
council may request updates and progress reports from the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, the
professional educator standards board, and the department of early
learning on the work of the agencies as well as educational working
groups established by the legislature.
(3) The chair of the council shall be selected from the
councilmembers. The council shall be composed of the following
members:
(a) Four members of the house of representatives, with two members
representing each of the major caucuses and appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives;
(b) Four members of the senate, with two members representing each
of the major caucuses and appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) One representative each from the office of the governor, office
of the superintendent of public instruction, state board of education,
professional educator standards board, and department of early
learning; and
(d) One nonlegislative representative from the educational
opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee established
under RCW 28A.300.136, to be selected by the members of the committee.
(4) The council ((shall meet no more than four days a year)) may
convene subcommittees including both members of the council and other
individuals with expertise in particular areas if necessary to complete
its work.
(5)(a) The council shall submit an initial report to the governor
and the legislature by January 1, 2010, detailing its recommendations,
including recommendations for resolving issues or decisions requiring
legislative action during the 2010 legislative session, and
recommendations for any funding necessary to continue development and
implementation of chapter 548, Laws of 2009.
(b) The initial report shall, at a minimum, include:
(i) Consideration of how to establish a statewide beginning teacher
mentoring and support system;
(ii) Recommendations for a program of early learning for at-risk
children;
(iii) A recommended schedule for the concurrent phase-in of the
changes to the instructional program of basic education and the
implementation of the funding formulas and allocations to support the
new instructional program of basic education as established under
chapter 548, Laws of 2009. The phase-in schedule shall have full
implementation completed by September 1, 2018; and
(iv) A recommended schedule for phased-in implementation of the new
distribution formula for allocating state funds to school districts for
the transportation of students to and from school, with phase-in
beginning no later than September 1, 2013.
(6) The council shall submit a report to the legislature by January
1, 2012, detailing its recommendations for a comprehensive plan for a
voluntary program of early learning. Before submitting the report, the
council shall seek input from the early learning advisory council
created in RCW 43.215.090.
(7) The council shall submit a report to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2010, that includes:
(a) Recommendations for specific strategies, programs, and funding,
including funding allocations through the funding distribution formula
in RCW 28A.150.260, that are designed to close the achievement gap and
increase the high school graduation rate in Washington public schools.
The council shall consult with the educational opportunity gap
oversight and accountability committee and the building bridges work
group in developing its recommendations; and
(b) Recommendations for assuring adequate levels of state-funded
classified staff to support essential school and district services.
(8) The council shall be staffed by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the office of financial
management. Additional staff support shall be provided by the state
entities with representatives on the council. Senate committee
services and the house of representatives office of program research
may provide additional staff support.
(9) Legislative members of the council shall serve without
additional compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council
or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative
members of the council may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.165.005 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 201 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter is designed to: (a) Promote the use of data when
developing programs to assist underachieving students and reduce
disruptive behaviors in the classroom; and (b) guide school districts
in providing the most effective and efficient practices when
implementing supplemental instruction and services to assist
underachieving students and reduce disruptive behaviors in the
classroom.
(2) Except for services and activities under RCW 28A.165.035(2) (g)
and (h), school districts implementing a learning assistance program
shall focus first on addressing the needs of students in grades
kindergarten through four who are deficient in reading or reading
readiness skills to improve reading literacy.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.165.035 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 203 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in the 2015-16 school year, expenditure of funds from
the learning assistance program must be consistent with the provisions
of RCW 28A.655.235.
(2) Use of best practices that have been demonstrated through
research to be associated with increased student achievement magnifies
the opportunities for student success. To the extent they are included
as a best practice or strategy in one of the state menus or an approved
alternative under this section or RCW 28A.655.235, the following are
services and activities that may be supported by the learning
assistance program:
(a) Extended learning time opportunities occurring:
(i) Before or after the regular school day;
(ii) On Saturday; and
(iii) Beyond the regular school year;
(b) Services under RCW 28A.320.190;
(c) Professional development for certificated and classified staff
that focuses on:
(i) The needs of a diverse student population;
(ii) Specific literacy and mathematics content and instructional
strategies; and
(iii) The use of student work to guide effective instruction and
appropriate assistance;
(d) Consultant teachers to assist in implementing effective
instructional practices by teachers serving participating students;
(e) Tutoring support for participating students;
(f) Outreach activities and support for parents of participating
students, including employing parent and family engagement
coordinators; ((and))
(g) Up to five percent of a district's learning assistance program
allocation may be used for development of partnerships with community-based organizations, educational service districts, and other local
agencies to deliver academic and nonacademic supports to participating
students who are significantly at risk of not being successful in
school to reduce barriers to learning, increase student engagement, and
enhance students' readiness to learn. The office of the superintendent
of public instruction must approve any community-based organization or
local agency before learning assistance funds may be expended; and
(h) Up to five percent of a district's learning assistance program
allocation may be used to develop and deliver supplemental
instructional programs specifically designed to help close the
educational opportunity gap by preventing summer learning loss, if
approved by the office of the superintendent of public instruction
under subsection (6) of this section.
(3) In addition to the state menu developed under RCW 28A.655.235,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene a
panel of experts, including the Washington state institute for public
policy, to develop additional state menus of best practices and
strategies for use in the learning assistance program to assist
struggling students at all grade levels in English language arts and
mathematics and reduce disruptive behaviors in the classroom. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall publish the
state menus by July 1, 2015, and update the state menus by each July
1st thereafter.
(4)(a) Beginning in the 2016-17 school year, except as provided in
(b) of this subsection, school districts must use a practice or
strategy that is on a state menu developed under subsection (3) of this
section or RCW 28A.655.235.
(b) Beginning in the 2016-17 school year, school districts may use
a practice or strategy that is not on a state menu developed under
subsection (3) of this section for two school years initially. If the
district is able to demonstrate improved outcomes for participating
students over the previous two school years at a level commensurate
with the best practices and strategies on the state menu, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall approve use of the
alternative practice or strategy by the district for one additional
school year. Subsequent annual approval by the superintendent of
public instruction to use the alternative practice or strategy is
dependent on the district continuing to demonstrate increased improved
outcomes for participating students.
(c) Beginning in the 2016-17 school year, school districts may
enter cooperative agreements with state agencies, local governments, or
school districts for administrative or operational costs needed to
provide services in accordance with the state menus developed under
this section and RCW 28A.655.235.
(5) School districts are encouraged to implement best practices and
strategies from the state menus developed under this section and RCW
28A.655.235 before the use is required.
(6)(a) School districts may annually apply to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to use up to five percent of their
learning assistance program allocation in schools whose enrollment of
students eligible for free and reduced-price meals or English language
learner students is higher than the statewide average in order to
develop and deliver instructional programs specifically designed to
prevent summer learning loss by participating students.
(b) The school district must describe the specific program or
strategy to be used to prevent summer learning loss; specify the school
and target population of participating students; specify the amount of
the learning assistance program allocation to be expended for this
purpose; identify expected outcomes from the intervention; and report
student outcomes as required under RCW 28A.165.100 for the summer
learning loss programs separately from other interventions under the
learning assistance program.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.150.220 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In order for students to have the opportunity to develop the
basic education knowledge and skills under RCW 28A.150.210, school
districts must provide instruction of sufficient quantity and quality
and give students the opportunity to complete graduation requirements
that are intended to prepare them for postsecondary education, gainful
employment, and citizenship. The program established under this
section shall be the minimum instructional program of basic education
offered by school districts.
(2) Each school district shall make available to students the
following minimum instructional offering each school year:
(a) For students enrolled in grades one through twelve, at least a
district-wide annual average of one thousand hours, which shall be
increased to at least one thousand eighty instructional hours for
students enrolled in each of grades seven through twelve and at least
one thousand instructional hours for students in each of grades one
through six ((according to an implementation schedule adopted by the
legislature, but not before)) beginning in the 2014-15 school year; and
(b) For students enrolled in kindergarten, at least four hundred
fifty instructional hours, which shall be increased to at least one
thousand instructional hours according to the implementation schedule
under RCW 28A.150.315.
(3) The instructional program of basic education provided by each
school district shall include:
(a) Instruction in the essential academic learning requirements
under RCW 28A.655.070;
(b) Instruction that provides students the opportunity to complete
twenty-four credits for high school graduation, ((subject to a phased-in implementation of the twenty-four credits as established by the
legislature)) beginning with the graduating class of 2019. Course
distribution requirements may be established by the state board of
education under RCW 28A.230.090;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages;
(d) Supplemental instruction and services for underachieving
students through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005
through 28A.165.065;
(e) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled
students and exited students whose primary language is other than
English through the transitional bilingual instruction program under
RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080;
(f) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense
as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with
disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020; and
(g) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010
through 28A.185.030.
(4) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require
individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours
per day or to take any particular courses.
(5) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic
educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five
years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one
years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred eighty
school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school
district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or
equivalent, in kindergarten, to be increased to a minimum of one
hundred eighty school days per school year according to the
implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315. However, schools
administering the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing
skills may use up to three school days at the beginning of the school
year to meet with parents and families as required in the parent
involvement component of the inventory. In addition, effective May 1,
1979, a school district may schedule the last five school days of the
one hundred and eighty day school year for noninstructional purposes in
the case of students who are graduating from high school, including,
but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early release from
school upon the request of a student, and all such students may be
claimed as a full-time equivalent student to the extent they could
otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and
28A.150.260.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes a school district from
enriching the instructional program of basic education, such as
offering additional instruction or providing additional services,
programs, or activities that the school district determines to be
appropriate for the education of the school district's students.
(7) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental
program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2011 c 203 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except as
provided in RCW 28A.230.122 and except those equivalencies established
by local high schools or school districts under RCW 28A.230.097. The
purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that a student is ready
for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and
citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high
school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board
of education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements
for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and
technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to
a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized.
The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in
these programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of
academic achievement, complete the program and earn the program's
certificate or credential, and complete other state and local
graduation requirements.
(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high
school graduation requirements to the education committees of the
legislature for review and to the quality education council established
under RCW 28A.290.010. The legislature shall have the opportunity to
act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted
through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a
fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis
prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the
legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted
legislation.
(d) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement the
career and college ready graduation requirement proposal adopted under
board resolution on November 10, 2010, and revised on January 9, 2014,
to take effect beginning with the graduating class of 2019. The
funding allocated under chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. to
support the instructional program of basic education constitutes the
funding by the legislature required under (c) of this subsection.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

--- END ---