BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.45.060 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
There is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property at
the rate of one and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the selling
price. Beginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30, ((2019)) 2015, an
amount equal to two percent of the proceeds of this tax must be
deposited in the public works assistance account created in RCW
43.155.050, and an amount equal to four and one-tenth percent must be
deposited in the education legacy trust account created in RCW
83.100.230. Thereafter, an amount equal to six and one-tenth percent
of the proceeds of this tax to the state treasurer must be deposited in
the public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050. Except
as otherwise provided in this section, an amount equal to one and six-
tenths percent of the proceeds of this tax to the state treasurer must
be deposited in the city-county assistance account created in RCW
43.08.290.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.16.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected from every person
a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one
or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax shall be equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after
the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses shall be deposited in the education legacy trust
account created in RCW 83.100.230 from July 1, 2013, through June 30,
((2019)) 2015, and thereafter in the public works assistance account
created in RCW 43.155.050.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.18.040 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Taxes collected under this chapter must be held in trust until
paid to the state. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection
(1), taxes received by the state must be deposited in the public works
assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050. For the period beginning
July 1, 2011, and ending June 30, 2015, taxes received by the state
under this chapter must be deposited in the general fund for general
purpose expenditures. ((For fiscal years 2016, 2017, and 2018, one-half of the taxes received by the state under this chapter must be
deposited in the general fund for general purpose expenditures and the
remainder deposited in the education legacy trust account created in
RCW 83.100.230. For fiscal year 2019, taxes received by the state
under this chapter must be deposited in the education legacy trust
account created in RCW 83.100.230.)) Any person collecting the tax who
appropriates or converts the tax collected is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor if the money required to be collected is not available for
payment on the date payment is due. If a taxpayer fails to pay the tax
imposed by this chapter to the person charged with collection of the
tax and the person charged with collection fails to pay the tax to the
department, the department may, in its discretion, proceed directly
against the taxpayer for collection of the tax.
(2) The tax is due from the taxpayer within twenty-five days from
the date the taxpayer is billed by the person collecting the tax.
(3) The tax is due from the person collecting the tax at the end of
the tax period in which the tax is received from the taxpayer. If the
taxpayer remits only a portion of the total amount billed for taxes,
consideration, and related charges, the amount remitted must be applied
first to payment of the solid waste collection tax and this tax has
priority over all other claims to the amount remitted.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.135.045 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(1) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction of facility improvements or
additions that are consistent with the construction objectives of
chapter 3, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 728), or for higher
education construction.
(2) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection must result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and does not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(3) After July 1, 2015, the state treasurer must transfer one
hundred two million dollars from the general fund to the education
construction fund by June 30th of each year.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.88.055 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 8 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature must adopt a four-year balanced budget as
follows:
(a) Beginning in the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature
shall enact a balanced omnibus operating appropriations bill that
leaves, in total, a positive ending fund balance in the general fund
and related funds.
(b) Beginning in the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the projected
maintenance level of the omnibus appropriations bill enacted by the
legislature shall not exceed the available fiscal resources for the
next ensuing fiscal biennium.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Available fiscal resources" means the beginning general fund
and related fund balances and any fiscal resources estimated for the
general fund and related funds, adjusted for enacted legislation, and
with forecasted revenues adjusted to the greater of (i) the official
general fund and related funds revenue forecast for the ensuing
biennium, or (ii) the official general fund and related funds forecast
for the second fiscal year of the current fiscal biennium, increased by
4.5 percent for each fiscal year of the ensuing biennium. For purposes
of appropriations enacted for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, "available
fiscal resources" for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium includes moneys
deposited in the public works assistance account and the education
construction fund under the amendatory changes in sections 1 through 4
of this act;
(b) "Projected maintenance level" means estimated appropriations
necessary to maintain the continuing costs of program and service
levels either funded in that appropriations bill or mandated by other
state or federal law, and the amount of any general fund moneys
projected to be transferred to the budget stabilization account
pursuant to Article VII, section 12 of the state Constitution, but does
not include in the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia the costs
related to the enhanced funding under the new definition of basic
education as established in chapter 548, Laws of 2009, and affirmed by
the decision in Mathew McCleary et al., v. The State of Washington, 173
Wn.2d 477, 269 P.3d 227, (2012), from which the short-term exclusion of
these obligations is solely for the purposes of calculating this
estimate and does not in any way indicate an intent to avoid full
funding of these obligations;
(c) "Related funds," as used in this section, means the Washington
opportunity pathways account and the education legacy trust account.
(3) Subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section does not apply to an
appropriations bill that makes net reductions in general fund and
related funds appropriations and is enacted between July 1st and
February 15th of any fiscal year.
(4) Subsection (1)(b) of this section does not apply in a fiscal
biennium in which money is appropriated from the budget stabilization
account.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.33.060 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 8 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) To facilitate compliance with, and subject to the terms of, RCW
43.88.055, the state budget outlook work group shall prepare, subject
to the approval of the economic and revenue forecast council under RCW
82.33.010, an official state budget outlook for state revenues and
expenditures for the general fund and related funds. In odd-numbered
years, the period covered by the November state budget outlook shall be
the current fiscal biennium and the next ensuing fiscal biennium. In
even-numbered years, the period covered by the November state budget
outlook shall be the next two ensuing fiscal biennia. The revenue and
caseload projections used in the outlook must reflect the most recent
official forecasts adopted by the economic and revenue forecast council
and the caseload forecast council for the years for which those
forecasts are available.
(2) The outlook must:
(a) Estimate revenues to and expenditures from the state general
fund and related funds. The estimate of ensuing biennium expenditures
must include maintenance items including, but not limited to,
continuation of current programs, forecasted growth of current
entitlement programs, and actions required by law, including
legislation with a future implementation date. Estimates of ensuing
biennium expenditures must exclude policy items including, but not
limited to, legislation not yet enacted by the legislature, collective
bargaining agreements not yet approved by the legislature, and changes
to levels of funding for employee salaries and benefits unless those
changes are required by statute. Estimated maintenance level
expenditures must also exclude costs of court rulings issued during or
within fewer than ninety days before the beginning of the current
legislative session. For purposes of outlooks prepared for
appropriations enacted for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, estimated
revenues to the general fund and related funds for the 2015-2017 fiscal
biennium include moneys deposited in the public works assistance
account and the education construction fund under the amendatory
changes in sections 1 through 4 of this act;
(b) Address major budget and revenue drivers, including trends and
variability in these drivers;
(c) Clearly state the assumptions used in the estimates of baseline
and projected expenditures and any adjustments made to those estimates;
(d) Clearly state the assumptions used in the baseline revenue
estimates and any adjustments to those estimates; and
(e) Include the impact of previously enacted legislation with a
future implementation date.
(3) The outlook must also separately include projections based on
the revenues and expenditures proposed in the governor's budget
documents submitted to the legislature under RCW 43.88.030.
(4) The economic and revenue forecast council shall submit state
budget outlooks prepared under this section to the governor and the
members of the committees on ways and means of the senate and house of
representatives, including one copy to the staff of each of the
committees, as required by this section.
(5) Each January, the state budget outlook work group shall also
prepare, subject to the approval of the economic and revenue forecast
council, a state budget outlook for state revenues and expenditures
that reflects the governor's proposed budget document submitted to the
legislature under chapter 43.88 RCW. Within thirty days following
enactment of an operating budget by the legislature, the work group
shall prepare, subject to the approval of the economic and revenue
forecast council, a state budget outlook for state revenues and
expenditures that reflects the enacted budget.
(6) All agencies of state government shall provide to the
supervisor immediate access to all information relating to state budget
outlooks.
(7) The state budget outlook work group must publish its proposed
methodology on the economic and revenue forecast council web site. The
state budget outlook work group, in consultation with the economic and
revenue forecast work group and outside experts if necessary, must
analyze the extent to which the proposed methodology for projecting
expenditures for the ensuing fiscal biennia may be reliably used to
determine the future impact of appropriations and make recommendations
to change the outlook process to increase reliability and accuracy.
The recommendations are due by December 1, 2013, and every five years
thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 5 and 6 of this act are necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---