BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a petition for review, which meets the criteria set out in
subsection (2) of this section, is submitted to the growth management
hearings board in accordance with RCW 36.70A.280 and 36.70A.290, the
petitioner may file in superior court a petition to stay or suspend
vesting under the comprehensive plan, development regulation, or
amendment to a comprehensive plan or development regulation challenged
in the petition for review during pendency of the matter before the
board. A petition to stay or suspend vesting must set forth a
statement of grounds for the stay and the factual basis for the
request.
(2) To be eligible to receive a stay or suspension of vesting from
the court under this section, the petition for review submitted to the
growth management hearings board must allege the following:
(a) A county has adopted a comprehensive plan, development
regulation, or amendment to a comprehensive plan or development
regulation that modifies the boundaries of an urban growth area;
(b) The modified urban growth area includes territory previously
designated outside of the urban growth area; and
(c) The adopted comprehensive plan, development regulation, or
amendment to a comprehensive plan or development regulation is not in
compliance with the goals and requirements of this chapter, or
applicable requirements of chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW.
(3) A court may grant a petition to stay or suspend vesting only if
the court finds that:
(a) The party requesting the stay is likely to prevail on the
merits;
(b) Without the stay the party requesting it will suffer
irreparable harm;
(c) The grant of a stay will not substantially harm other parties
to the proceedings; and
(d) The request for the stay is timely in light of the
circumstances of the case.
(4) The court may grant the petition to stay or suspend vesting
upon such terms and conditions as are necessary to prevent harm to
other parties by the stay.
(5) If a petition to stay or suspend vesting is granted under this
section, the stay or suspension may not exceed the latest of the
following dates:
(a) Upon issuance of the board's final order finding that the
challenged comprehensive plan, development regulation, or amendment to
a comprehensive plan or development regulation is in compliance with
statutory requirements, as provided in RCW 36.70A.300(3)(a); or
(b) If the board finds that the comprehensive plan, development
regulation, or amendment to a comprehensive plan or development
regulation is not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter,
upon the board's subsequent review and determination that the
jurisdiction is in compliance.

--- END ---