BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that additional
flexibility is needed for mercury-containing light manufacturers to
comply with the requirements of chapter 70.275 RCW in order to provide
a sustainable funding mechanism and provide effective state protections
to producer-operated product stewardship programs under chapter 70.275
RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.275.020 and 2010 c 130 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Brand" means a name, symbol, word, or mark that identifies a
product, rather than its components, and attributes the product to the
owner of the brand as the producer.
(2) "Collection" or "collect" means, except for persons involved in
mail-back programs:
(a) The activity of accumulating any amount of mercury-containing
lights at a location other than the location where the lights are used
by covered entities, and includes curbside collection activities,
household hazardous waste facilities, and other registered drop-off
locations; and
(b) The activity of transporting mercury-containing lights in the
state, where the transporter is not a generator of unwanted mercury-containing lights, to a location for purposes of accumulation.
(3) "Covered entities" means:
(a) A ((single-family or a multifamily household generator and
persons that deliver no more than fifteen)) household generator or
other person who purchases mercury-containing lights at retail and
delivers no more than ten mercury-containing lights to registered
collectors for a product stewardship program ((during a ninety-day
period)) on any given day; and
(b) A ((single-family or a multifamily household generator and
persons that utilize)) household generator or other person who
purchases mercury-containing lights at retail and utilizes a registered
residential curbside collection program or a mail-back program for
collection of mercury-containing lights and ((that)) discards no more
than fifteen mercury-containing lights into those programs ((during a
ninety-day period)) on any given day.
(4) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(5) "Final disposition" means the point beyond which no further
processing takes place and materials from mercury-containing lights
have been transformed for direct use as a feedstock in producing new
products, or disposed of or managed in permitted facilities.
(6) "Hazardous substances" or "hazardous materials" means those
substances or materials identified by rules adopted under chapter
70.105 RCW.
(7) "Mail-back program" means the use of a prepaid postage
container with mercury vapor barrier packaging that is used for the
collection and recycling of mercury-containing lights from covered
entities as part of a product stewardship program and is transported by
the United States postal service or a common carrier.
(8) "Mercury-containing lights" means lamps, bulbs, tubes, or other
devices that contain mercury and provide functional illumination in
homes, businesses, and outdoor stationary fixtures.
(9) "Mercury vapor barrier packaging" means sealable containers
that are specifically designed for the storage, handling, and transport
of mercury-containing lights in order to prevent the escape of mercury
into the environment by volatilization or any other means, and that
meet the requirements for transporting by the United States postal
service or a common carrier.
(10) "Orphan product" means a mercury-containing light that lacks
a producer's brand, or for which the producer is no longer in business
and has no successor in interest, or that bears a brand for which the
department cannot identify an owner.
(11) "Person" means a sole proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, nonprofit corporation or organization, limited liability
company, firm, association, cooperative, or other legal entity located
within or outside Washington state.
(12) "Processing" means recovering materials from unwanted products
for use as feedstock in new products. Processing must occur at
permitted facilities.
(13) "Producer" means a person that:
(a) Has or had legal ownership of the brand, brand name, or cobrand
of a mercury-containing light sold in or into Washington state,
((except for persons whose primary business is retail sales)) unless
the brand owner is a retailer whose mercury-containing light was
supplied by another producer participating in a stewardship program
under this chapter;
(b) Imports or has imported mercury-containing lights branded by a
producer that meets the requirements of (a) of this subsection and
where that producer has no physical presence in the United States;
(c) If (a) and (b) of this subsection do not apply, makes or made
((an unbranded)) a mercury-containing light that is sold or has been
sold in or into Washington state; or
(d)(i) Sells or sold at wholesale or retail a mercury-containing
light; (ii) does not have legal ownership of the brand; and (iii)
elects to fulfill the responsibilities of the producer for that
product.
(14) "Product stewardship" means a requirement for a producer of
mercury-containing lights to manage and reduce adverse safety, health,
and environmental impacts of the product throughout its life cycle,
including financing and providing for the collection, transporting,
reusing, recycling, processing, and final disposition of their
products.
(15) "Product stewardship plan" or "plan" means a detailed plan
describing the manner in which a product stewardship program will be
implemented.
(16) "Product stewardship program" or "program" means the methods,
systems, and services financed in the manner provided for under RCW
70.275.050 and provided by producers of mercury-containing lights
generated by covered entities that addresses product stewardship and
includes ((collecting, transporting, reusing)) arranging for the
collection, transportation, recycling, processing, and final
disposition of unwanted mercury-containing lights, including ((a fair
share of)) orphan products.
(17) "Recovery" means the collection and transportation of unwanted
mercury-containing lights under this chapter.
(18)(a) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing unwanted
products into usable or marketable materials for use other than
landfill disposal or incineration.
(b) "Recycling" does not include energy recovery or energy
generation by means of combusting unwanted products with or without
other waste.
(19) "Reporting period" means the period commencing January 1st and
ending December 31st in the same calendar year.
(20) "Residuals" means nonrecyclable materials left over from
processing an unwanted product.
(21) "Retailer" means a person who offers mercury-containing lights
for sale at retail through any means including, but not limited to,
remote offerings such as sales outlets, catalogs, or the internet, but
does not include a sale that is a wholesale transaction with a
distributor or a retailer.
(22)(a) "Reuse" means a change in ownership of a mercury-containing
light or its components, parts, packaging, or shipping materials for
use in the same manner and purpose for which it was originally
purchased, or for use again, as in shipping materials, by the generator
of the shipping materials.
(b) "Reuse" does not include dismantling of products for the
purpose of recycling.
(23) "Stakeholder" means a person who may have an interest in or be
affected by a product stewardship program.
(24) "Stewardship organization" means an organization designated by
a producer or group of producers to act as an agent on behalf of each
producer to operate a product stewardship program.
(25) "Unwanted product" means a mercury-containing light no longer
wanted by its owner or that has been abandoned, discarded, or is
intended to be discarded by its owner.
(26) "Environmental handling charge" or "charge" means the charge
approved by the department to be applied to each mercury-containing
light to be sold at retail in or into Washington state. The
environmental handling charge must cover all administrative and
operational costs associated with the product stewardship program,
including the fee for the department's administration and enforcement.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.275.030 and 2010 c 130 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every producer of mercury-containing lights sold in or into
Washington state for ((residential use must fully finance and
participate in a product stewardship program for that product,
including the department's costs for administering and enforcing this
chapter.
(2) Every producer must:
(a) Participate in a product stewardship program approved by the
department and operated by a product stewardship organization
contracted by the department. All producers must finance and
participate in the plan operated by the product stewardship
organization, unless the producer obtains department approval for an
independent plan as described in (b) of this subsection; or
(b) Finance and operate, either individually or jointly with other
producers, a product stewardship program approved by the department.
(3) A producer, group of producers, or product stewardship
organization funded by producers must pay all administrative and
operational costs associated with their program or programs, except for
the collection costs associated with curbside and mail-back collection
programs. For curbside and mail-back programs, a producer, group of
producers, or product stewardship organization shall finance)) retail
sale in Washington state must participate in a product stewardship
program for those products, operated by a stewardship organization and
financed in the manner provided by RCW 70.275.050. Every such producer
must inform the department of the producer's participation in a product
stewardship program by including the producer's name in a plan
submitted to the department by a stewardship organization as required
by RCW 70.275.040. Producers must satisfy these participation
obligations individually or may do so jointly with other producers.
(2) A stewardship organization operating a product stewardship
program must pay all administrative and operational costs associated
with its program with revenues received from the environmental handling
charge described in RCW 70.275.050. The stewardship organization's
administrative and operational costs are not required to include a
collection location's cost of receiving, accumulating and storing, and
packaging mercury-containing lights. However, a stewardship
organization may offer incentives or payments to collectors. The
stewardship organization's administrative and operational costs do not
include the collection costs associated with curbside and mail-back
collection programs. The stewardship organization must arrange for
collection service at locations described in subsection (4) of this
section, which may include household hazardous waste facilities,
charities, retailers, government recycling sites, or other suitable
private locations. No such entity is required to provide collection
services at their location. For curbside and mail-back programs, a
stewardship organization must pay the costs of transporting mercury-containing lights from accumulation points and for processing mercury-containing lights collected by curbside and mail-back programs. For
collection locations, including household hazardous waste facilities,
charities, retailers, government recycling sites, or other suitable
private locations, a ((producer, group of producers, or product))
stewardship organization ((shall finance)) must pay the costs of
((collection,)) packaging and shipping materials as required under RCW
70.275.070 or must compensate collectors for the costs of those
materials, and must pay the costs of transportation((,)) and processing
of mercury-containing lights collected ((at)) from the collection
locations.
(((4))) (3) Product stewardship programs shall collect unwanted
mercury-containing lights delivered from covered entities for
((reuse,)) recycling, processing, or final disposition, and not charge
a fee when lights are dropped off or delivered into the program.
(((5))) (4) Product stewardship programs shall provide, at a
minimum, no cost services in all cities in the state with populations
greater than ten thousand and all counties of the state on an ongoing,
year-round basis.
(((6))) (5) Product stewardship programs shall promote the safe
handling and recycling of mercury-containing lights to the public,
including producing and offering point-of-sale educational materials to
retailers of mercury-containing lights and point-of-return educational
materials to collection locations.
(6) All product stewardship programs operated under approved plans
must recover their fair share of unwanted covered products as
determined by the department.
(7) The department or its designee may inspect, audit, or review
audits of processing and disposal facilities used to fulfill the
requirements of a product stewardship program.
(8) No product stewardship program required under this chapter may
use federal or state prison labor for processing unwanted products.
(9) Product stewardship programs for mercury-containing lights must
be fully implemented by January 1, ((2013)) 2015.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.275.040 and 2010 c 130 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((A producer, group of producers, or product stewardship
program submitting a proposed product stewardship plan under RCW
70.275.030(2)(b) must submit that plan by January 1st of the year prior
to the planned implementation.)) On June 1st of the year prior to
implementation, each producer must ensure that a stewardship
organization submits a proposed product stewardship plan on the
producer's behalf to the department for approval. Plans approved by
the department must be implemented by January 1st of the following
calendar year.
(2) The department shall establish rules for plan content. Plans
must include but are not limited to:
(a) All necessary information to inform the department about the
plan operator and participating producers and their brands;
(b) The management and organization of the product stewardship
program that will oversee the collection, transportation, and
processing services;
(c) The identity of collection, transportation, and processing
service providers, including a description of the consideration given
to existing residential curbside collection infrastructure and mail-back systems as an appropriate collection mechanism;
(d) How the product stewardship program will seek to use businesses
within the state, including transportation services, retailers,
collection sites and services, existing curbside collection services,
existing mail-back services, and processing facilities;
(e) A description of how the public will be informed about the
((recycling program)) product stewardship program, including how
consumers will be provided with information describing collection
opportunities for unwanted mercury-containing lights from covered
entities and safe handling of mercury-containing lights, waste
prevention, and recycling. The description must also include
information to make consumers aware that an environmental handling
charge has been added to the purchase price of mercury-containing
lights sold at retail to fund the mercury-containing light stewardship
programs in the state. The environmental handling charge may not be
described as a department recycling fee or charge at the point of
retail sale;
(f) A description of the financing system required under RCW
70.275.050;
(g) How mercury and other hazardous substances will be handled for
collection through final disposition;
(h) A public review and comment process; and
(i) Any other information deemed necessary by the department to
ensure an effective mercury light product stewardship program that is
in compliance with all applicable laws and rules.
(3) All plans submitted to the department must be made available
for public review on the department's web site and at the department's
headquarters.
(4) At least two years from the start of the product stewardship
program and once every four years thereafter, ((a producer, group of
producers, or product)) each stewardship organization operating a
product stewardship program must update its product stewardship plan
and submit the updated plan to the department for review and approval
according to rules adopted by the department.
(5) ((Each product stewardship program shall submit an annual
report to the department describing the results of implementing their
plan for the prior year. The department may adopt rules for reporting
requirements. All reports submitted to the department must be made
available for public review)) By June 1, 2016, and each June 1st
thereafter, each stewardship organization must submit an annual report
to the department describing the results of implementing the
stewardship organization's plan for the prior calendar year, including
an independent financial audit. The department may adopt rules for
reporting requirements. Financial information included in the annual
report must include but is not limited to:
(a) The amount of the environmental handling charge assessed on
mercury-containing lights and the revenue generated;
(b) Identification of confidential information pursuant to RCW
43.21A.160 submitted in the annual report; and
(c) The cost of the mercury-containing lights product stewardship
program, including line item costs for:
(i) Program operations;
(ii) Communications, including media, printing and fulfillment,
public relations, and other education and outreach projects;
(iii) Administration, including administrative personnel costs,
travel, compliance and auditing, legal services, banking services,
insurance, and other administrative services and supplies, and
stewardship organization corporate expenses; and
(iv) Amount of unallocated reserve funds.
(6) Beginning in 2023 every stewardship organization must include
in its annual report an analysis of the percent of total sales of
lights sold at retail to covered entities in Washington that mercury-containing lights constitute, the estimated number of mercury-
containing lights in use by covered entities in the state, and the
projected number of unwanted mercury-containing lights to be recycled
in future years.
(7) All plans and reports submitted to the department must be made
available for public review, excluding sections determined to be
confidential pursuant to RCW 43.21A.160, on the department's web site
and at the department's headquarters.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.275.050 and 2010 c 130 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((All producers that sell mercury-containing lights in or into
the state of Washington are responsible for financing the mercury-containing light recycling program required by RCW 70.275.030.
(2) Each producer shall pay fifteen thousand dollars to the
department to contract for a product stewardship program to be operated
by a product stewardship organization. The department shall retain
five thousand dollars of the fifteen thousand dollars for
administration and enforcement costs.
(3) A producer or producers participating in an independent plan,
as permitted under RCW 70.275.030(2)(b), must pay the full cost of
operation. Each producer participating in an approved independent plan
shall pay an annual fee of five thousand dollars to the department for
administration and enforcement costs.)) Each stewardship organization
must recommend to the department an environmental handling charge to be
added to the price of each mercury-containing light sold in or into the
state of Washington for sale at retail. The environmental handling
charge must be designed to provide revenue necessary and sufficient to
cover all administrative and operational costs associated with the
stewardship program described in the department-approved product
stewardship plan for that organization, including the department's
annual fee required by subsection (5) of this section, and a prudent
reserve. The stewardship organization must consult with collectors,
retailers, recyclers, and each of its participating producers in
developing its recommended environmental handling charge. The
environmental handling charge may, but is not required to, vary by the
type of mercury-containing light. In developing its recommended
environmental handling charge, the stewardship organization must take
into consideration and report to the department:
(a) The anticipated number of mercury-containing lights that will
be sold to covered entities in the state at retail during the relevant
period;
(b) The number of unwanted mercury-containing lights delivered from
covered entities expected to be recycled during the relevant period;
(c) The operational costs of the stewardship organization as
described in RCW 70.275.030(2);
(d) The administrative costs of the stewardship organization
including the department's annual fee, described in subsection (5) of
this section; and
(e) The cost of other stewardship program elements including public
outreach.
(2) The department must review, adjust if necessary, and approve
the stewardship organization's recommended environmental handling
charge within sixty days of submittal. In making its determination,
the department shall review the product stewardship plan and may
consult with the producers, the stewardship organization, retailers,
collectors, recyclers, and other entities.
(3) No sooner than January 1, 2015:
(a) The mercury-containing light environmental handling charge must
be added to the purchase price of all mercury-containing lights sold to
Washington retailers for sale at retail, and each Washington retailer
shall add the charge to the purchase price of all mercury-containing
lights sold at retail in this state, and the producer shall remit the
environmental handling charge to the stewardship organization in the
manner provided for in the stewardship plan; or
(b) Each Washington retailer must add the mercury-containing light
environmental handling charge to the purchase price of all mercury-containing lights sold at retail in this state, where the retailer, by
voluntary binding agreement with the producer, arranges to remit the
environmental handling charge to the stewardship organization on behalf
of the producer in the manner provided for in the stewardship plan.
Producers may not require retailers to opt for this provision via
contract, marketing practice, or any other means. The stewardship
organization must allow retailers to retain a portion of the
environmental handling charge as reimbursement for any costs associated
with the collection and remittance of the charge.
(4) At any time, a stewardship organization may submit to the
department a recommendation for an adjusted environmental handling
charge for the department's review, adjustment, if necessary, and
approval under subsection (2) of this section to ensure that there is
sufficient revenue to fund the cost of the program, current deficits,
or projected needed reserves for the next year. The department must
review the stewardship organization's recommended environmental
handling charge and must adjust or approve the recommended charge
within thirty days of submittal if the department determines that the
charge is reasonably designed to meet the criteria described in
subsection (1) of this section.
(5) Beginning March 1, 2015, and each year thereafter, each
stewardship organization shall pay to the department an annual fee
equivalent to five thousand dollars for each participating producer to
cover the department's administrative and enforcement costs. The
amount paid under this section must be deposited into the product
stewardship programs account created in RCW 70.275.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 70.275 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature that a producer, group of
producers, stewardship organization preparing, submitting, and
implementing a mercury-containing light product stewardship program
pursuant to this chapter, as well as participating entities in the
distribution chain, including retailers and distributors, are granted
immunity, individually and jointly, from federal and state antitrust
liability that might otherwise apply to the activities reasonably
necessary for implementation and compliance with this chapter. It is
further the intent of the legislature that the activities of the
producer, group of producers, stewardship organization, and entities in
the distribution chain, including retailers and distributors, in
implementing and complying with the provisions of this chapter may not
be considered to be in restraint of trade, a conspiracy, or combination
thereof, or any other unlawful activity in violation of any provisions
of federal or state antitrust laws.
(2) The department shall actively supervise the conduct of the
stewardship organization, the producers of mercury-containing lights,
and entities in the distribution chain in determination and
implementation of the environmental handling charge authorized by this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The mercury-containing lights product stewardship program as
established under chapter 70.275 RCW is terminated July 1, 2025, as
provided in section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, 2026:
(1) RCW 70.275.010 (Findings -- Purpose) and 2010 c 130 s 1;
(2) RCW 70.275.020 (Definitions) and 2014 c . . . s 2 (section 2 of
this act) & 2010 c 130 s 2;
(3) RCW 70.275.030 (Product stewardship program) and 2014 c . . .
s 3 (section 3 of this act) & 2010 c 130 s 3;
(4) RCW 70.275.040 (Submission of proposed product stewardship
plans -- Department to establish rules -- Public review -- Plan update -- Annual report) and 2014 c . . . s 4 (section 4 of this act) & 2010 c
130 s 4;
(5) RCW 70.275.050 (Financing the mercury-containing light
recycling program) and 2014 c . . . s 5 (section 5 of this act) & 2010
c 130 s 5;
(6) RCW 70.275.060 (Collection and management of mercury) and 2010
c 130 s 6;
(7) RCW 70.275.070 (Collectors of unwanted mercury-containing
lights -- Duties) and 2010 c 130 s 7;
(8) RCW 70.275.090 (Producers must participate in an approved
product stewardship program) and 2010 c 130 s 9;
(9) RCW 70.275.100 (Written warning -- Penalty -- Appeal) and 2010 c
130 s 10;
(10) RCW 70.275.110 (Department's web site to list producers
participating in product stewardship plan -- Required participation in a
product stewardship plan -- Written warning -- Penalty -- Rules -- Exemptions)
and 2010 c 130 s 11;
(11) RCW 70.275.130 (Product stewardship programs account) and 2010
c 130 s 13;
(12) RCW 70.275.140 (Adoption of rules -- Report to the legislature -- Invitation to entities to comment on issues -- Estimate of statewide
recycling rate for mercury-containing lights -- Mercury vapor barrier
packaging) and 2010 c 130 s 14;
(13) RCW 70.275.150 (Application of chapter to the Washington
utilities and transportation commission) and 2010 c 130 s 15;
(14) RCW 70.275.160 (Application of chapter to entities regulated
under chapter 70.105 RCW) and 2010 c 130 s 16;
(15) RCW 70.275.900 (Chapter liberally construed) and 2010 c 130 s
17;
(16) RCW 70.275.901 (Severability -- 2010 c 130) and 2010 c 130 s 21;
and
(17) RCW 70.275.--- and 2014 c . . . s 6 (section 6 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RCW 70.275.120 (Producers must pay annual
fees) and 2010 c 130 s 12 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) RCW 70.275.080 is recodified as a
section in chapter 70.95M RCW.
(2) This section takes effect July 1, 2026, only if chapter 70.275
RCW is repealed as provided for in section 8 of this act.

--- END ---