BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the dedication
and extraordinary work ethic of state employees. The legislature also
recognizes that many state employees lose annual leave because there
are many situations in which it is difficult to use accrued annual
leave. Therefore, the legislature intends to increase the number of
hours allowed to accrue as annual leave from two hundred forty hours to
three hundred sixty hours. The legislature also intends that the
number of hours for purposes of retirement benefits and cash-out of
annual leave upon leaving state employment shall remain at two hundred
forty hours.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.01.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 449 are each
amended to read as follows:
Each subordinate officer and employee of the several offices,
departments, and institutions of the state government shall be entitled
under their contract of employment with the state government to not
less than one working day of vacation leave with full pay for each
month of employment if said employment is continuous for six months.
Each such subordinate officer and employee shall be entitled under
such contract of employment to not less than one additional working day
of vacation with full pay each year for satisfactorily completing the
first two, three and five continuous years of employment respectively.
Such part time officers or employees of the state government who
are employed on a regular schedule of duration of not less than one
year shall be entitled under their contract of employment to that
fractional part of the vacation leave that the total number of hours of
such employment bears to the total number of hours of full time
employment.
Each subordinate officer and employee of the several offices,
departments and institutions of the state government shall be entitled
under his or her contract of employment with the state government to
accrue unused vacation leave not to exceed ((thirty)) forty-five
working days. Officers and employees transferring within the several
offices, departments and institutions of the state government shall be
entitled to transfer such accrued vacation leave to each succeeding
state office, department or institution. All vacation leave shall be
taken at the time convenient to the employing office, department or
institution((: PROVIDED, That)). If a subordinate officer's or
employee's request for vacation leave is deferred by reason of the
convenience of the employing office, department or institution, and a
statement of the necessity(( therefor)) is retained by the agency, then
the ((aforesaid)) maximum ((thirty)) forty-five working days of accrued
unused vacation leave shall be extended for each month ((said)) the
leave is ((so)) deferred.
No annual leave in excess of thirty days may be included for
purposes of calculating retirement benefits under any public retirement
system in the state.

--- END ---