BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state
building code council adopted by rule changes to the climate zones used
in the building codes due to modifications in the 2012 international
energy conservation code (IECC). The legislature intends to update the
statutes to be more reflective of the national standards.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27.031 and 2003 c 291 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, there shall be in
effect in all counties and cities the state building code which shall
consist of the following codes which are hereby adopted by reference:
(1)(a) The International Building Code, published by the
International Code Council(([,])), Inc.;
(b) The International Residential Code, published by the
International Code Council, Inc.;
(2) The International Mechanical Code, published by the
International Code Council(([,])), Inc., except that the standards for
liquified petroleum gas installations shall be NFPA 58 (Storage and
Handling of Liquified Petroleum Gases) and ANSI Z223.1/NFPA 54
(National Fuel Gas Code);
(3) The International Fire Code, published by the International
Code Council(([,])), Inc., including those standards of the National
Fire Protection Association specifically referenced in the
International Fire Code: PROVIDED, That, notwithstanding any wording
in this code, participants in religious ceremonies shall not be
precluded from carrying hand-held candles;
(4) Except as provided in RCW 19.27.170, the Uniform Plumbing Code
and Uniform Plumbing Code Standards, published by the International
Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials: PROVIDED, That any
provisions of such code affecting sewers or fuel gas piping are not
adopted; ((and))
(5) The rules adopted by the council establishing standards for
making buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by ((the
physically disabled)) individuals with disabilities or elderly persons
as provided in RCW 70.92.100 through 70.92.160; and
(6) The state's climate zones for building purposes are designated
in RCW 19.27A.020(3) and may not be changed through adoption of a model
code or rule.
In case of conflict among the codes enumerated in subsections (1),
(2), (3), and (4) of this section, the first named code shall govern
over those following.
The codes enumerated in this section shall be adopted by the
council as provided in RCW 19.27.074. The council shall solicit input
from first responders to ensure that firefighter safety issues are
addressed during the code adoption process.
The council may issue opinions relating to the codes at the request
of a local official charged with the duty to enforce the enumerated
codes.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.27A.020 and 2010 c 271 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state building code council shall adopt rules to be known
as the Washington state energy code as part of the state building code.
(2) The council shall follow the legislature's standards set forth
in this section to adopt rules to be known as the Washington state
energy code. The Washington state energy code shall be designed to:
(a) Construct increasingly energy efficient homes and buildings
that help achieve the broader goal of building zero fossil-fuel
greenhouse gas emission homes and buildings by the year 2031;
(b) Require new buildings to meet a certain level of energy
efficiency, but allow flexibility in building design, construction, and
heating equipment efficiencies within that framework; and
(c) Allow space heating equipment efficiency to offset or
substitute for building envelope thermal performance.
(3) The Washington state energy code shall take into account
regional climatic conditions. ((Climate zone 1 shall include all
counties not included in climate zone 2. Climate zone 2)) One climate
zone includes: Adams, Asotin, Benton, Chelan, Columbia, Douglas,
Ferry, Franklin, Garfield, Grant, Kittitas, Klickitat, Lincoln,
Okanogan, Pend Oreille, Skamania, Spokane, Stevens, ((and)) Walla
Walla, Whitman, and Yakima counties. The other climate zone includes
all other counties not listed in this subsection (3). The assignment
of a county to a climate zone may not be changed by adoption of a model
code or rule.
(4) The Washington state energy code for residential buildings
shall be the 2006 edition of the Washington state energy code, or as
amended by rule by the council.
(5) The minimum state energy code for new nonresidential buildings
shall be the Washington state energy code, 2006 edition, or as amended
by the council by rule.
(6)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the Washington
state energy code for residential structures shall preempt the
residential energy code of each city, town, and county in the state of
Washington.
(b) The state energy code for residential structures does not
preempt a city, town, or county's energy code for residential
structures which exceeds the requirements of the state energy code and
which was adopted by the city, town, or county prior to March 1, 1990.
Such cities, towns, or counties may not subsequently amend their energy
code for residential structures to exceed the requirements adopted
prior to March 1, 1990.
(7) The state building code council shall consult with the
department of ((general administration)) enterprise services as
provided in RCW 34.05.310 prior to publication of proposed rules. The
director of the department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services shall recommend to the state building code council any changes
necessary to conform the proposed rules to the requirements of this
section.
(8) The state building code council shall evaluate and consider
adoption of the international energy conservation code in Washington
state in place of the existing state energy code.
(9) The definitions in RCW 19.27A.140 apply throughout this
section.

--- END ---