BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.37 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Ambulance seat belt notification must include a lighted message
alarm and may include chime alarms that meet federal regulations
regarding chime alarm intervals to notify the driver that a passenger
has not fastened his or her seat belt in the cab of the ambulance.
Seat belt alarms are prohibited from activating until the ambulance
unit is put in drive gear. Any ambulance manufactured after the
effective date of this section must comply with this subsection, and
current warning systems may be modified to the specifications within
this subsection on any ambulance manufactured before the effective date
of this section.
(2) Any ambulance manufactured after the effective date of this
section must have air bags that meet federal regulations in the cab of
the ambulance and must not be modified, blocked, or turned off.
(3) The Washington state patrol, in partnership with the Washington
fire chiefs, must study the need and feasibility of regional accident
prevention programs for ambulance and medic unit operators, including
the use of driver simulators. The study must take into consideration,
among other issues, the availability of driver simulators, as well as
any administrative and funding requirements needed to implement such a
program. The results of the study must be reported to the legislature
by December 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---