BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.12.100 and 2009 c 63 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, ((an)) if the services provided
by an individual employed on a public works project require
registration under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensing under chapter 19.28
RCW, the individual ((employed on a public works project)) is not
considered to be a laborer, worker, or mechanic when:
(1) ((The individual has been and is free from control or direction
over the performance of the service, both under the contract of service
and in fact;
(2) The service is either outside the usual course of business for
the contractor or contractors for whom the individual performs
services, or the service is performed outside all of the places of
business of the enterprise for which the individual performs services,
or the individual is responsible, both under the contract and in fact,
for the costs of the principal place of business from which the service
is performed;
(3) The individual is customarily engaged in an independently
established trade, occupation, profession, or business, of the same
nature as that involved in the contract of service, or the individual
has a principal place of business for the business the individual is
conducting that is eligible for a business deduction for federal income
tax purposes other than that furnished by the employer for which the
business has contracted to furnish services;
(4) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is responsible for filing at the next applicable filing
period, both under the contract of service and in fact, a schedule of
expenses with the internal revenue service for the type of business the
individual is conducting;
(5))) On the effective date of the contract of service, or within
a reasonable period after the effective date of the contract of
service, the individual has an active and valid certificate of
registration with the department of revenue, and an active and valid
account with any other state agencies as required by the particular
case, for the business the individual is conducting for the payment of
all state taxes normally paid by employers and businesses and has
registered for and received a unified business identifier number from
the state of Washington; and
(((6) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is maintaining a separate set of books or records that
reflect all items of income and expenses of the business which the
individual is conducting; and
(7))) (2) On the effective date of the contract of service, ((if
the nature of the work performed requires registration under chapter
18.27 RCW or licensure under chapter 19.28 RCW,)) the individual has a
valid contractor registration pursuant to chapter 18.27 RCW or an
electrical contractor license pursuant to chapter 19.28 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.17.020 and 2010 c 8 s 12005 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) The term "agriculture" means farming and includes, but is not
limited to:
(a) The cultivation and tillage of the soil;
(b) Dairying;
(c) The production, cultivation, growing, and harvesting of any
agricultural or horticultural commodity;
(d) The raising of livestock, bees, fur-bearing animals, or
poultry; and
(e) Any practices performed by a farmer or on a farm, incident to
or in connection with such farming operations, including but not
limited to preparation for market and delivery to:
(i) Storage;
(ii) Market; or
(iii) Carriers for transportation to market.
The term "agriculture" does not mean a farmer's processing for sale
or handling for sale a commodity or product grown or produced by a
person other than the farmer or the farmer's employees.
(2) The term "director" means the director of the department of
labor and industries, or his or her designated representative.
(3) The term "department" means the department of labor and
industries.
(4) The term "employer" means any person, firm, corporation,
partnership, business trust, legal representative, or other business
entity which engages in any business, industry, profession, or activity
in this state and employs one or more employees or who contracts with
one or more persons, the essence of which is the personal labor of such
person or persons and includes the state, counties, cities, and all
municipal corporations, public corporations, political subdivisions of
the state, and charitable organizations: PROVIDED, That any person,
partnership, or business entity not having employees, and who is
covered by the industrial insurance act shall be considered both an
employer and an employee.
(5) The term "employee" means an employee of an employer who is
employed in the business of his or her employer whether by way of
manual labor or otherwise and every person in this state who is engaged
in the employment of or who is working under an independent contract
the essence of which is his or her personal labor for an employer under
this chapter whether by way of manual labor or otherwise. An
individual performing services that require registration under chapter
18.27 RCW or licensing under chapter 19.28 RCW is not an "employee"
when:
(a) On the effective date of the contract of service, or within a
reasonable period after the effective date of the contract, the
individual has an active and valid certificate of registration with the
department of revenue, and an active and valid account with any other
state agencies as required by the particular case, for the business the
individual is conducting for the payment of all state taxes normally
paid by employers and businesses and has registered for and received a
unified business identifier number from the state of Washington; and
(b) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual has a valid contractor registration pursuant to chapter
18.27 RCW or an electrical contractor license pursuant to chapter 19.28
RCW.
(6) The term "person" means one or more individuals, partnerships,
associations, corporations, business trusts, legal representatives, or
any organized group of persons.
(7) The term "safety and health standard" means a standard which
requires the adoption or use of one or more practices, means, methods,
operations, or processes reasonably necessary or appropriate to provide
safe or healthful employment and places of employment.
(8) The term "workplace" means any plant, yard, premises, room, or
other place where an employee or employees are employed for the
performance of labor or service over which the employer has the right
of access or control, and includes, but is not limited to, all
workplaces covered by industrial insurance under Title 51 RCW, as now
or hereafter amended.
(9) The term "working day" means a calendar day, except Saturdays,
Sundays, and all legal holidays as set forth in RCW 1.16.050, as now or
hereafter amended, and for the purposes of the computation of time
within which an act is to be done under the provisions of this chapter,
shall be computed by excluding the first working day and including the
last working day.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.46.010 and 2013 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Director" means the director of labor and industries;
(2) "Employ" includes to permit to work;
(3) "Employee" includes any individual employed by an employer but
shall not include:
(a) Any individual (i) employed as a hand harvest laborer and paid
on a piece rate basis in an operation which has been, and is generally
and customarily recognized as having been, paid on a piece rate basis
in the region of employment; (ii) who commutes daily from his or her
permanent residence to the farm on which he or she is employed; and
(iii) who has been employed in agriculture less than thirteen weeks
during the preceding calendar year;
(b) Any individual employed in casual labor in or about a private
home, unless performed in the course of the employer's trade, business,
or profession;
(c) Any individual employed in a bona fide executive,
administrative, or professional capacity or in the capacity of outside
salesperson as those terms are defined and delimited by rules of the
director. However, those terms shall be defined and delimited by the
human resources director pursuant to chapter 41.06 RCW for employees
employed under the director of personnel's jurisdiction;
(d) Any individual engaged in the activities of an educational,
charitable, religious, state or local governmental body or agency, or
nonprofit organization where the employer-employee relationship does
not in fact exist or where the services are rendered to such
organizations gratuitously. If the individual receives reimbursement
in lieu of compensation for normally incurred out-of-pocket expenses or
receives a nominal amount of compensation per unit of voluntary service
rendered, an employer-employee relationship is deemed not to exist for
the purpose of this section or for purposes of membership or
qualification in any state, local government, or publicly supported
retirement system other than that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;
(e) Any individual employed full time by any state or local
governmental body or agency who provides voluntary services but only
with regard to the provision of the voluntary services. The voluntary
services and any compensation therefor shall not affect or add to
qualification, entitlement, or benefit rights under any state, local
government, or publicly supported retirement system other than that
provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;
(f) Any newspaper vendor, carrier, or delivery person selling or
distributing newspapers on the street, to offices, to businesses, or
from house to house and any freelance news correspondent or "stringer"
who, using his or her own equipment, chooses to submit material for
publication for free or a fee when such material is published;
(g) Any carrier subject to regulation by Part 1 of the Interstate
Commerce Act;
(h) Any individual engaged in forest protection and fire prevention
activities;
(i) Any individual employed by any charitable institution charged
with child care responsibilities engaged primarily in the development
of character or citizenship or promoting health or physical fitness or
providing or sponsoring recreational opportunities or facilities for
young people or members of the armed forces of the United States;
(j) Any individual whose duties require that he or she reside or
sleep at the place of his or her employment or who otherwise spends a
substantial portion of his or her work time subject to call, and not
engaged in the performance of active duties;
(k) Any resident, inmate, or patient of a state, county, or
municipal correctional, detention, treatment or rehabilitative
institution;
(l) Any individual who holds a public elective or appointive office
of the state, any county, city, town, municipal corporation or quasi
municipal corporation, political subdivision, or any instrumentality
thereof, or any employee of the state legislature;
(m) All vessel operating crews of the Washington state ferries
operated by the department of transportation;
(n) Any individual employed as a seaman on a vessel other than an
American vessel;
(o) An individual performing services that require registration
under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensing under chapter 19.28 RCW when:
(i) On the effective date of the contract of service, or within a
reasonable period after the effective date of the contract, the
individual has an active and valid certificate of registration with the
department of revenue, and an active and valid account with any other
state agencies as required by the particular case, for the business the
individual is conducting for the payment of all state taxes normally
paid by employers and businesses and has registered for and received a
unified business identifier number from the state of Washington; and
(ii) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual has a valid contractor registration pursuant to chapter
18.27 RCW or an electrical contractor license pursuant to chapter 19.28
RCW;
(4) "Employer" includes any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, business trust, or any person or group of persons acting
directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an
employee;
(5) "Occupation" means any occupation, service, trade, business,
industry, or branch or group of industries or employment or class of
employment in which employees are gainfully employed;
(6) "Retail or service establishment" means an establishment
seventy-five percent of whose annual dollar volume of sales of goods or
services, or both, is not for resale and is recognized as retail sales
or services in the particular industry;
(7) "Wage" means compensation due to an employee by reason of
employment, payable in legal tender of the United States or checks on
banks convertible into cash on demand at full face value, subject to
such deductions, charges, or allowances as may be permitted by rules of
the director.

Sec. 4 RCW 50.04.145 and 2008 c 102 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The term "employment" shall not include services which require
registration under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensing under chapter 19.28
RCW rendered by an individual when:
(1) ((The individual has been and will continue to be free from
control or direction over the performance of the service, both under
the contract of service and in fact;
(2) The service is either outside the usual course of business for
which the service is performed, or the service is performed outside of
all the places of business of the enterprise for which the service is
performed, or the individual is responsible, both under the contract
and in fact, for the costs of the principal place of business from
which the service is performed;
(3) The individual is customarily engaged in an independently
established trade, occupation, profession, or business, of the same
nature as that involved in the contract of service, or the individual
has a principal place of business for the business the individual is
conducting that is eligible for a business deduction for federal income
tax purposes, other than that furnished by the employer for which the
business has contracted to furnish services;
(4) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is responsible for filing at the next applicable filing
period, both under the contract of service and in fact, a schedule of
expenses with the internal revenue service for the type of business the
individual is conducting;
(5))) On the effective date of the contract of service, or within
a reasonable period after the effective date of the contract, the
individual has an active and valid certificate of registration with the
department of revenue, and an active and valid account with any other
state agencies as required by the particular case, for the business the
individual is conducting for the payment of all state taxes normally
paid by employers and businesses and has registered for and received a
unified business identifier number from the state of Washington; and
(((6) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is maintaining a separate set of books or records that
reflect all items of income and expenses of the business that the
individual is conducting; and
(7))) (2) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual has a valid contractor registration pursuant to chapter
18.27 RCW or an electrical contractor license pursuant to chapter 19.28
RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 51.08.181 and 2008 c 102 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this title, any individual performing services
that require registration under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensing under
chapter 19.28 RCW for remuneration under an independent contract is not
a worker when:
(1) ((The individual has been, and will continue to be, free from
control or direction over the performance of the service, both under
the contract of service and in fact;
(2) The service is either outside the usual course of business for
which the service is performed, or the service is performed outside all
of the places of business of the enterprise for which the service is
performed, or the individual is responsible, both under the contract
and in fact, for the costs of the principal place of business from
which the service is performed;
(3) The individual is customarily engaged in an independently
established trade, occupation, profession, or business, of the same
nature as that involved in the contract of service, or the individual
has a principal place of business for the business the individual is
conducting that is eligible for a business deduction for federal income
tax purposes other than that furnished by the employer for which the
business has contracted to furnish services;
(4) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is responsible for filing at the next applicable filing
period, both under the contract of service and in fact, a schedule of
expenses with the internal revenue service for the type of business the
individual is conducting;
(5))) On the effective date of the contract of service, or within
a reasonable period after the effective date of the contract, the
individual has an active and valid certificate of registration with the
department of revenue, and an active and valid account with any other
state agencies as required by the particular case, for the business the
individual is conducting for the payment of all state taxes normally
paid by employers and businesses and has registered for and received a
unified business identifier number from the state of Washington; and
(((6) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is maintaining a separate set of books or records that
reflect all items of income and expenses of the business which the
individual is conducting; and
(7))) (2) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual has a valid contractor registration pursuant to chapter
18.27 RCW or an electrical contractor license pursuant to chapter 19.28
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect January 1, 2015.

--- END ---