BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is the intent of this act to extend
the retail sales and use tax exemption for nutrient management
equipment to nutrient handling businesses that contract with farmers as
part of the farm plan relating to nutrient management. The legislature
finds that the equipment required for nutrient management is costly and
therefore has provided farmers with a sales and use tax exemption for
this equipment, including labor and materials required for proper
installation, repairing, and cleaning of this equipment. The
legislature further finds that farmers that do not own this equipment
need to contract with nutrient handling businesses for this specific
service as part of their nutrient management plan. These nutrient
handling businesses are currently not afforded the same tax treatment
as farmers for the nutrient management equipment used for the proper
handling of livestock manure required under every farm plan.
Therefore, the legislature intends to incentivize nutrient handling
businesses to adopt the latest technology for effective and
environmentally healthy application of livestock manure and to make
compliance with the nutrient management portion of a farm plan more
affordable for farmers by reducing the overall cost of the equipment
needed for proper compliance.
(2) It is the intent of this act to extend the sales and use tax
exemption for nutrient management equipment to nutrient handling
businesses for the purpose described under RCW 82.32.808(2)(e). The
legislature further intends to review the tax exemption and its actual
fiscal impact on state revenues to determine if the fiscal impact to
state revenues reasonably conforms to the fiscal estimate in the fiscal
note for this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.890 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 601 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
eligible persons of:
(a) Qualifying livestock nutrient management equipment;
(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving qualifying livestock
nutrient management equipment; and
(c)(i) Labor and services rendered in respect to repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving of qualifying livestock nutrient
management facilities, or to tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of qualifying livestock nutrient management
facilities in the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
of such facilities.
(ii) The exemption provided in this subsection (1)(c) does not
apply to the sale of or charge made for: (A) Labor and services
rendered in respect to the constructing of new, or replacing previously
existing, qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities; or (B)
tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of
qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities during the course
of constructing new, or replacing previously existing, qualifying
livestock nutrient management facilities.
(2) The exemption provided in subsection (1) of this section
applies to sales made after the livestock nutrient management plan is:
(a) Certified under chapter 90.64 RCW; (b) approved as part of the
permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (c) approved as required
under subsection (4)(c)(((iii))) (i)(C) of this section.
(3)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The
department of agriculture must provide a list of eligible persons, as
defined in subsection (4)(c)(i)(A) and (((ii))) (B) of this section, to
the department of revenue. Conservation districts must maintain lists
of eligible persons as defined in subsection (4)(c)(((iii))) (i)(C) of
this section to allow the department of revenue to verify eligibility.
The application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the
department and must contain information regarding the location of the
dairy or animal feeding operation and other information the department
may require.
(b) A person claiming an exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
RCW 82.12.890 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Animal feeding operation" means a lot or facility, other than
an aquatic animal production facility, where the following conditions
are met:
(i) Animals, other than aquatic animals, have been, are, or will be
stabled or confined and fed or maintained for a total of forty-five
days or more in any twelve-month period; and
(ii) Crops, vegetation, forage growth, or postharvest residues are
not sustained in the normal growing season over any portion of the lot
or facility.
(b) "Conservation district" means a subdivision of state government
organized under chapter 89.08 RCW.
(c) "Eligible person" means a person:
(i)(A) Licensed to produce milk under chapter 15.36 RCW who has a
certified dairy nutrient management plan, as required by chapter 90.64
RCW;
(((ii))) (B) Who owns an animal feeding operation and has a permit
issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or
(((iii))) (C) Who owns an animal feeding operation and has a
nutrient management plan approved by a conservation district as meeting
natural resource conservation service field office technical guide
standards and who possesses an exemption certificate under RCW
82.08.855.
(ii)(A) That has a contract with an "eligible person" described
under (c)(i) of this subsection (4) to assume temporary control or
possession of livestock manure and arranges for transport to, and
utilization at, an importing operation or other location; or
(B) That transports or land applies livestock manure as a contract
agent for an "eligible person" described under (c)(i) or (c)(ii)(A) of
this subsection (4) under the direction of such eligible person.
(d) "Handling and treatment of livestock manure" means the
activities of collecting, storing, moving, or transporting livestock
manure, separating livestock manure solids from liquids, or applying
livestock manure to the agricultural lands of an eligible person other
than through the use of pivot or linear type traveling irrigation
systems.
(e) "Permit" means either a state waste discharge permit or a
national pollutant discharge elimination system permit, or both.
(f) "Qualifying livestock nutrient management equipment" means the
following tangible personal property for exclusive use in the handling
and treatment of livestock manure, including repair and replacement
parts for such equipment: (i) Aerators; (ii) agitators; (iii) augers;
(iv) conveyers; (v) gutter cleaners; (vi) hard-hose reel traveler
irrigation systems; (vii) lagoon and pond liners and floating covers;
(viii) loaders; (ix) manure composting devices; (x) manure spreaders;
(xi) manure tank wagons; (xii) manure vacuum tanks; (xiii) poultry
house cleaners; (xiv) poultry house flame sterilizers; (xv) poultry
house washers; (xvi) poultry litter saver machines; (xvii) pipes;
(xviii) pumps; (xix) scrapers; (xx) separators; (xxi) slurry injectors
and hoses; and (xxii) wheelbarrows, shovels, and pitchforks.
(g) "Qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities" means the
following structures and facilities for exclusive use in the handling
and treatment of livestock manure: (i) Flush systems; (ii) lagoons;
(iii) liquid livestock manure storage structures, such as concrete
tanks or glass-lined steel tanks; and (iv) structures used solely for
the dry storage of manure, including roofed stacking facilities.
(5) The exemption under this section does not apply to sales made
from July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires July 1, 2024.

--- END ---