BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.160.010 and 1990 c 177 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following words or terms shall have the meanings indicated
unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(1) "Certificate of competency holder" means an individual who has
satisfactorily met the qualifications and has received a certificate of
competency from the state director of fire protection under the
provisions of this chapter.
(2) "Dwelling unit fire protection sprinkler system contractor"
means a contractor registered under chapter 18.27 RCW who offers to
undertake the execution of contracts for the design, installation,
maintenance, or servicing of a residential dwelling unit fire
protection sprinkler system in accordance with performance standards
and requirements for one and two-family dwellings in the state building
code adopted under chapter 19.27 RCW or any part of such a system.
(3) "Dwelling unit fire protection sprinkler system contractor
license" means the license issued by the state director of fire
protection upon an application being approved, the fee being paid, and
the satisfactory completion of the requirements of this chapter. The
license shall be issued in the name of the dwelling unit sprinkler
system contractor with the name or names of the certificate of
competency holder noted thereon.
(4) "Fire protection sprinkler system contractor" means a person or
organization that offers to undertake the execution of contracts for
the installation, inspection, maintenance, or servicing of a fire
protection sprinkler system or any part of such a system.
(((3))) (5) "Fire protection sprinkler system" means an assembly of
underground and/or overhead piping or conduit beginning at the
connection to the primary water supply, whether public or private, that
conveys water with or without other agents to dispersal openings or
devices to extinguish, control, or contain fire and to provide
protection from exposure to fire or other products of combustion.
(((4))) (6) "Fire protection sprinkler system contractor's license"
means the license issued by the state director of fire protection to a
fire protection sprinkler system contractor upon an application being
approved, the fee being paid, and the satisfactory completion of the
requirements of this chapter. The license shall be issued in the name
of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor with the name or
names of the certificate of competency holder noted thereon.
(((5))) (7) "NFPA 13-D" means whatever standard that is used by the
national fire protection association for the installation of fire
protection sprinkler systems in one or two-family residential dwellings
or mobile homes.
(((6))) (8) "NFPA 13-R" means whatever standard that is used by the
national fire protection association for the installation of fire
protection sprinkler systems in residential dwellings up to four
stories in height.
(((7))) (9) "Inspection" means a visual examination of a fire
protection sprinkler system or portion of the system to verify that the
system appears to be in operating condition and is free from physical
damage and complies with the applicable statutes and regulations
adopted by the state director of fire protection.
(((8))) (10) "Installation" means the initial placement of fire
protection sprinkler system equipment or the extension, modification,
or alteration of equipment after the initial placement. Installation
shall include the work from a street or main water access throughout
the entire building.
(((9))) (11) "Maintenance" means to maintain in the condition of
repair that provides performance as originally planned.
(((10))) (12) "Organization" means a corporation, partnership,
firm, or other business association, governmental entity, or any other
legal or commercial entity.
(((11))) (13) "Person" means a natural person, including an owner,
manager, partner, officer, employee, or occupant.
(((12))) (14) "Service" means to repair or test.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.160.030 and 2003 c 74 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter shall be administered by the state director of
fire protection.
(2) The state director of fire protection shall have the authority,
and it shall be his or her duty to:
(a) Issue such administrative regulations as necessary for the
administration of this chapter;
(b)(i) Set reasonable fees for licenses, certificates, testing, and
other aspects of the administration of this chapter. However, the
license fee for fire protection sprinkler system contractors engaged
solely in the installation, inspection, maintenance, or servicing of
NFPA 13-D or dwelling unit fire protection sprinkler systems shall not
exceed one hundred dollars, and the license fee for fire protection
sprinkler system contractors engaged solely in the installation,
inspection, maintenance, or servicing of NFPA 13-R fire protection
sprinkler systems shall not exceed three hundred dollars;
(ii) Adopt rules establishing a special category restricted to
contractors registered under chapter 18.27 RCW who install underground
systems that service fire protection sprinkler systems. The rules
shall be adopted within ninety days of March 31, 1992;
(iii) Subject to RCW 18.160.120, adopt rules defining infractions
under this chapter and fines to be assessed for those infractions;
(iv) Adopt rules establishing a special category restricted to
dwelling unit fire protection sprinkler system contractors. The rules
shall be adopted within one hundred eighty days of March 31, 2014;
(v) Adopt rules establishing certificate of competency requirements
for persons who design, install, maintain, or service dwelling unit
fire protection sprinkler systems in accordance with performance
standards and requirements for one and two-family dwellings in the
state building code adopted under chapter 19.27 RCW. The rules shall
be adopted within one hundred eighty days of March 31, 2014; and
(vi) Adopt rules authorizing plumbing contractors as defined in
chapter 18.106 RCW who are registered under chapter 18.27 RCW to
install dwelling unit fire sprinkler systems in one and two-family
dwellings where the design is provided by a licensed fire protection
sprinkler system contractor or dwelling unit fire protection sprinkler
system contractor. The rules shall be adopted within one hundred
eighty days of March 31, 2014;
(c) Enforce the provisions of this chapter;
(d) Conduct investigations of complaints to determine if any
infractions of this chapter or the regulations developed under this
chapter have occurred;
(e) Assign a certificate number to each certificate of competency
holder; and
(f) Adopt rules necessary to implement and administer a program
which requires the affixation of a seal any time a fire protection
sprinkler system is installed, which seal shall include the certificate
number of any certificate of competency holder who installs, in whole
or in part, the fire protection sprinkler system.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.160.040 and 2000 c 171 s 36 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To become a certificate of competency holder under this
chapter, an applicant must have satisfactorily passed an examination
administered by the state director of fire protection. A certificate
of competency holder can satisfy this examination requirement by
presenting a copy of a current certificate of competency from the
national institute for certification in engineering technologies
showing that the applicant has achieved the classification of
engineering technician level 3 or senior engineering technician level
4 in the field of fire protection, automatic sprinkler system layout,
or an alternate certificate demonstrating competency of relevant
technical scope applicable to dwelling unit fire protection sprinkler
systems, as determined by the state director of fire protection. The
state director of fire protection may accept equivalent proof of
qualification in lieu of examination. This examination requirement is
mandatory except as otherwise provided in this chapter.
(2) Every applicant for a certificate of competency shall fulfill
the requirements established by the state director of fire protection
under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) Every applicant for a certificate of competency shall make
application to the state director of fire protection and pay the fees
required.
(4) Provided the application for the certificate of competency is
made prior to ninety days after May 1, 1991, the state director of fire
protection, in lieu of the examination requirements of the applicant
for a certificate of competency, may accept as satisfactory evidence of
competency and qualification, affidavits attesting that the applicant
has had a minimum of three years' experience.
(5) The state director of fire protection may issue a temporary
certificate of competency to an applicant who, in his or her judgment,
will satisfactorily perform as a certificate of competency holder under
the provisions of this chapter. The temporary certificate of
competency shall remain in effect for a period of up to three years.
The temporary certificate of competency holder shall, within the three-year period, complete the examination requirements specified in
subsection (1) of this section. There shall be no examination
exemption for an individual issued a temporary certificate of
competency. Prior to the expiration of the three-year period, the
temporary certificate of competency holder shall make application for
a regular certificate of competency. The procedures and qualifications
for issuance of a regular certificate of competency shall be applicable
to the temporary certificate of competency holder. When a temporary
certificate of competency expires, the holder shall cease all
activities associated with the holding of a temporary certificate of
competency, subject to the penalties contained in this chapter.
(6) To become a licensed fire protection sprinkler system
contractor or a dwelling unit fire protection sprinkler system
contractor under this chapter, a person or firm must comply with the
following:
(a) Must be or have in his or her full-time employ a holder of a
valid certificate of competency;
(b) Comply with the minimum insurance requirements of this chapter;
and
(c) Make application to the state director of fire protection for
a license and pay the fees required.
(7) Each license and certificate of competency issued under this
chapter must be posted in a conspicuous place in the fire protection
sprinkler system contractor's or the dwelling unit fire protection
sprinkler system contractor's place of business.
(8) All bids, advertisements, proposals, offers, and installation
drawings for fire protection sprinkler systems must prominently display
the fire protection sprinkler system contractor's or the dwelling unit
fire protection sprinkler system contractor's license number.
(9) A certificate of competency or license issued under this
chapter is not transferable.
(10) In no case shall a certificate of competency holder be
employed full time by more than one fire protection sprinkler system
contractor or dwelling unit fire protection sprinkler system contractor
at the same time. If the certificate of competency holder should leave
the employment of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor or
dwelling unit fire protection sprinkler system contractor, he or she
must notify the state director of fire protection within thirty days.
If the certificate of competency holder should leave the employment of
the fire protection sprinkler system contractor or dwelling unit fire
protection sprinkler system contractor, the contractor shall have six
months or until the expiration of the current license, whichever occurs
last, to submit a new application identifying another certificate of
competency holder who is at the time of application an owner of the
fire protection sprinkler system business or a full-time employee of
the fire protection sprinkler system contractor or dwelling unit fire
protection sprinkler system contractor, in order to be issued a new
license. If such application is not received and a new license issued
within the allotted time, the state director of fire protection shall
revoke the license of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor
or dwelling unit fire protection sprinkler system contractor.

--- END ---