BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 34.05.271 and 2013 c 68 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Before taking a significant agency action, the department of
fish and wildlife must identify the sources of information reviewed and
relied upon by the agency in the course of preparing to take
significant agency action. Peer-reviewed literature, if applicable,
must be identified, as well as any scientific literature or other
sources of information used. The department of fish and wildlife shall
make available on the agency's web site the index of records required
under RCW 42.56.070(((6))) that are relied upon, or invoked, in support
of a proposal for significant agency action.
(b) On the agency's web site, the department of fish and wildlife
must identify and categorize each source of information that is relied
upon in the form of a bibliography, citation list, or similar list of
sources. The categories in (c) of this subsection do not imply or
infer any hierarchy or level of quality.
(c) The bibliography, citation list, or similar list of sources
must categorize the sources of information as belonging to one or more
of the following categories:
(i) Independent peer review: Review is overseen by an independent
third party;
(ii) Internal peer review: Review by staff internal to the
department of fish and wildlife;
(iii) External peer review: Review by persons that are external to
and selected by the department of fish and wildlife;
(iv) Open review: Documented open public review process that is
not limited to invited organizations or individuals;
(v) Legal and policy document: Documents related to the legal
framework for the significant agency action including but not limited
to:
(A) Federal and state statutes;
(B) Court and hearings board decisions;
(C) Federal and state administrative rules and regulations; and
(D) Policy and regulatory documents adopted by local governments;
(vi) Data from primary research, monitoring activities, or other
sources, but that has not been incorporated as part of documents
reviewed under the processes described in (c)(i), (ii), (iii), and (iv)
of this subsection;
(vii) Records of the best professional judgment of department of
fish and wildlife employees or other individuals; or
(viii) Other: Sources of information that do not fit into one of
the categories identified in this subsection (1)(c).
(2)(a) For the purposes of this section, "significant agency
action" means an act of the department of fish and wildlife that:
(i) Results in the development of a significant legislative rule as
defined in RCW 34.05.328;
(ii) Results in the development of technical guidance, technical
assessments, or technical documents that are used to directly support
implementation of a state rule or state statute; or
(iii) Results in the development of fish and wildlife recovery
plans.
(b) "Significant agency action" does not include rule making by the
department of fish and wildlife associated with fishing and hunting
rules.
(3) This section is not intended to affect agency action regarding
individual permitting, compliance and enforcement decisions, or
guidance provided by an agency to a local government on a case-by-case
basis.

--- END ---