BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 34.05.272 and 2013 c 69 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies only to the water quality and shorelands
and environmental assistance programs within the department of ecology.
(2)(a) Before taking a significant agency action, the department of
ecology must identify the sources of information reviewed and relied
upon by the agency in the course of preparing to take significant
agency action. Peer-reviewed literature, if applicable, must be
identified, as well as any scientific literature or other sources of
information used. The department of ecology shall make available on
the agency's web site the index of records required under RCW
42.56.070(((6))) that are relied upon, or invoked, in support of a
proposal for significant agency action.
(b) On the agency's web site, the department of ecology must
identify and categorize each source of information that is relied upon
in the form of a bibliography, citation list, or similar list of
sources. The categories in (c) of this subsection do not imply or
infer any hierarchy or level of quality.
(c) The bibliography, citation list, or similar list of sources
must categorize the sources of information as belonging to one or more
of the following categories:
(i) Independent peer review: Review is overseen by an independent
third party;
(ii) Internal peer review: Review by staff internal to the
department of ecology;
(iii) External peer review: Review by persons that are external to
and selected by the department of ecology;
(iv) Open review: Documented open public review process that is
not limited to invited organizations or individuals;
(v) Legal and policy document: Documents related to the legal
framework for the significant agency action including but not limited
to:
(A) Federal and state statutes;
(B) Court and hearings board decisions;
(C) Federal and state administrative rules and regulations; and
(D) Policy and regulatory documents adopted by local governments;
(vi) Data from primary research, monitoring activities, or other
sources, but that has not been incorporated as part of documents
reviewed under the processes described in (c)(i), (ii), (iii), and (iv)
of this subsection;
(vii) Records of the best professional judgement of department of
ecology employees or other individuals; or
(viii) Other: Sources of information that do not fit into one of
the categories identified in this subsection (1)(c).
(3) For the purposes of this section, "significant agency action"
means an act of the department of ecology that:
(a) Results in the development of a significant legislative rule as
defined in RCW 34.05.328; or
(b) Results in the development of technical guidance, technical
assessments, or technical documents that are used to directly support
implementation of a state rule or state statute.
(4) This section is not intended to affect agency action regarding
individual permitting, compliance and enforcement decisions, or
guidance provided by an agency to a local government on a case-by-case
basis.

--- END ---