BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax under this chapter, a person may deduct the
greater of:
(a) Thirty percent of gross income;
(b) Cost of goods sold; or
(c) Compensation, but not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars
for each month in the tax reporting period.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Benefits compensation" means the cost of all benefits, to the
extent deductible for federal income tax purposes, the person provides
to its officers, directors, owners, partners, and employees, including
workers' compensation benefits, health care, employer contributions
made to employees' health savings accounts, and retirement.
(b) "Compensation" means wages and cash compensation and benefits
compensation, paid to officers, directors, owners, partners, and
employees of the person.
(c)(i) "Cost of goods sold" means all direct costs of acquiring or
producing the goods subject to tax under this chapter, including: (A)
Labor costs; (B) cost of materials that are an integral part of
specific property produced; (C) cost of materials that are consumed in
the ordinary course of performing production activities; (D) handling
costs, including costs attributable to processing, assembling,
repackaging, and inbound transportation costs; (E) storage costs,
including the costs of carrying, storing, or warehousing property; (F)
depreciation, depletion, and amortization, reported on the federal
income tax return on which the report under this chapter is based, to
the extent associated with and necessary for the production of goods,
including recovery described by 26 U.S.C. Sec. 197 of the federal
internal revenue code; (G) the cost of renting or leasing equipment,
facilities, or real property directly used for the production of the
goods, including pollution control equipment and intangible drilling
and dry hole costs; (H) the cost of repairing and maintaining
equipment, facilities, or real property directly used for the
production of the goods, including pollution control devices; (I) costs
attributable to research, experimental, engineering, and design
activities directly related to the production of the goods, including
all research or experimental expenditures described by 26 U.S.C. Sec.
174 of the federal internal revenue code; (J) geological and
geophysical costs incurred to identify and locate property that has the
potential to produce minerals; (K) taxes paid in relation to acquiring
or producing any material, or taxes paid in relation to services that
are a direct cost of production; (L) the cost of producing or acquiring
electricity sold; and (M) a contribution to a partnership in which the
taxable entity owns an interest that is used to fund activities, the
costs of which would otherwise be treated as cost of goods sold of the
partnership, but only to the extent that those costs are related to
goods distributed to the taxable entity as goods-in-kind in the
ordinary course of production activities rather than being sold.
(ii) "Cost of goods sold" also includes the following costs in
relation to the person's sale of goods: (A) Deterioration of the
goods; (B) obsolescence of the goods; (C) spoilage and abandonment,
including the costs of rework labor, reclamation, and scrap; (D) if the
property is held for future production, preproduction direct costs
allocable to the property, including costs of purchasing the goods and
of storage and handling the goods; (E) postproduction direct costs
allocable to the property; (F) the cost of insurance on a plant or a
facility, machinery, equipment, or materials directly used in the
production of the goods; (G) the cost of insurance on the produced
goods; (H) the cost of utilities, including electricity, gas, and
water, directly used in the production of the goods; (I) the costs of
quality control, including replacement of defective components pursuant
to standard warranty policies, inspection directly allocable to the
production of the goods, and repairs and maintenance of goods; and (J)
licensing or franchise costs, including fees incurred in securing the
contractual right to use a trademark, corporate plan, manufacturing
procedure, special recipe, or other similar right directly associated
with the goods produced.
(d) "Wages and cash compensation" means the amount entered in the
medicare wages and tips box of internal revenue service form W-2 or any
subsequent form with a different number or designation that
substantially provides the same information. The term also includes,
to the extent not otherwise included in this subsection (2)(d): (i)
Net distributive income from a taxable entity treated as a partnership
for federal income tax purposes, but only if the person receiving the
distribution is a natural person; (ii) net distributive income from
limited liability companies and corporations treated as S corporations
for federal income tax purposes, but only if the person receiving the
distribution is a natural person; (iii) stock awards and stock options
deducted for federal income tax purposes; and (iv) net distributive
income from a limited liability company treated as a sole
proprietorship for federal income tax purposes, but only if the person
receiving the distribution is a natural person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---