BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.74.010 and 2012 c 62 s 3 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Compensatory mitigation" means the restoration, creation,
enhancement, or preservation of uplands, wetlands, or other ((aquatic))
resources for the purposes of compensating for unavoidable adverse
impacts that remain after all appropriate and practicable avoidance and
minimization has been achieved. "Compensatory mitigation" includes
mitigation that:
(a) Occurs at the same time as, or in advance of, a project's
planned environmental impacts;
(b) Is located in a site either on, near, or distant from the
project's impacts; and
(c) Provides either the same or different biological functions and
values as the functions and values impacted by the project.
(2) "Family forest fish passage program" means the program
administered by the recreation and conservation office created pursuant
to RCW 76.09.410 that provides public cost assistance to small forest
landowners associated with the road maintenance and abandonment
processes.
(3) "Forestry riparian easement program" means the program
established in RCW 76.13.120.
(4) "Infrastructure development" means an action that is critical
for the maintenance or expansion of an existing infrastructure feature
such as a highway, rail line, airport, marine terminal, utility
corridor, harbor area, or hydroelectric facility and is consistent with
an approved land use planning process. This planning process may
include the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW, or the shoreline
management act, chapter 90.58 RCW, in areas covered by those chapters.
(5) "Mitigation" means sequentially avoiding impacts, minimizing
impacts, or compensating for remaining unavoidable impacts.
(6) "Mitigation plan" means a document or set of documents
developed through joint discussions between a project proponent and
environmental regulatory agencies that describe the unavoidable
((wetland or aquatic)) resource impacts of a proposed infrastructure
development or noninfrastructure development and the proposed
compensatory mitigation for those impacts.
(7) "Noninfrastructure development" means a development project
that requires the completion of compensatory mitigation that does not
meet the definition of "infrastructure development" and is consistent
with an approved land use planning process. This planning process may
include the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW, or the shoreline
management act, chapter 90.58 RCW, in areas covered by those chapters.
(8) "Project proponent" means a public or private entity
responsible for preparing a mitigation plan.
(9) "Riparian open space program" means the program created
pursuant to RCW 76.09.040.
(10) "Watershed" means an area identified as a state of Washington
water resource inventory area under WAC 173-500-040 as it exists on
June 7, 2012.
(11) "Environmentally designated land" means land purchases or
other acquisitions and investments that were paid for directly or
indirectly by public funds and result in the creation, conservation, or
enhancement of land, or any portion of land, that is open space, a
park, forest land, fish or wildlife habitat, a conservation area or
easement, a wetland, a critical area, or property that is unlikely to
be paved or have permanent structures erected upon it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.74 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) State agencies and local governments may not, as part of any
permitting process, require a state agency or a local government to
purchase or otherwise acquire an interest in land as an environmental
or compensatory mitigation requirement for a public infrastructure
project unless subsection (2) of this section does not apply.
(2)(a) Prior to agreeing with a permitting agency to purchase or
otherwise acquire land as environmental or compensatory mitigation, a
state agency or local project applicant must first determine if an
existing environmentally designated land satisfies the mitigation
requirements. If the state agency or local project applicant
determines that an identified existing environmentally designated land
provides substantially similar environmental benefit to the proposed
mitigation requirement, then the permitting agency must accept the
existing environmentally designated land investment as satisfaction for
the mitigation requirement.
(b) The applicant state agency may only use environmentally
designated land for mitigation under this section if the land
investment was paid in full or part by direct or indirect state
funding. Local governments may only use environmentally designated
land for mitigation under this section if the land investment was paid
in full or part by direct or indirect local funding unless the
infrastructure project in question is being funded with state money, in
which case the local government can also utilize state-funded
environmentally designated land.
(3) Only the minimum portion of the identified existing
environmentally designated land parcel necessary to satisfy the
environmental or compensatory mitigation is required to be documented
and used for the project so that the acreage of the environmentally
designated land parcel is fully used for as many projects as possible
without using any portion of that property more than once. A parcel of
environmentally designated land may be used for multiple mitigation
uses if the parcel is restored or enhanced after its initial use under
this section.
(4) When coordinating with federal permitting agencies, state
agencies and local governments shall, whenever possible and consistent
with this section, utilize existing environmentally designated lands
for project mitigation.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.21C.060 and 1983 c 117 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The policies and goals set forth in this chapter are supplementary
to those set forth in existing authorizations of all branches of
government of this state, including state agencies, municipal and
public corporations, and counties. Any governmental action may be
conditioned or denied pursuant to this chapter: PROVIDED, That such
conditions or denials shall be based upon policies identified by the
appropriate governmental authority and incorporated into regulations,
plans, or codes which are formally designated by the agency (or
appropriate legislative body, in the case of local government) as
possible bases for the exercise of authority pursuant to this chapter.
Such designation shall occur at the time specified by RCW 43.21C.120.
Such action may be conditioned only to mitigate specific adverse
environmental impacts which are identified in the environmental
documents prepared under this chapter. These conditions shall be
stated in writing by the decision maker. Mitigation measures shall be
reasonable and capable of being accomplished and must be consistent
with section 2 of this act. In order to deny a proposal under this
chapter, an agency must find that: (1) The proposal would result in
significant adverse impacts identified in a final or supplemental
environmental impact statement prepared under this chapter; and (2)
reasonable mitigation measures are insufficient to mitigate the
identified impact. Except for permits and variances issued pursuant to
chapter 90.58 RCW, when such a governmental action, not requiring a
legislative decision, is conditioned or denied by a nonelected official
of a local governmental agency, the decision shall be appealable to the
legislative authority of the acting local governmental agency unless
that legislative authority formally eliminates such appeals. Such
appeals shall be in accordance with procedures established for such
appeals by the legislative authority of the acting local governmental
agency.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.01.305 and 2009 c 471 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For highway construction projects where the department
considers agricultural lands of long-term commercial significance, as
defined in RCW 36.70A.030, in reviewing and selecting sites to meet
environmental mitigation requirements under the national environmental
policy act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4321 et seq.) and chapter 43.21C RCW, the
department shall, to the greatest extent possible, consider using
public land and the tools provided by section 2 of this act first.
(2) If public lands are not available that meet the required
environmental mitigation needs, the department may use other sites
while making every effort to avoid any net loss of agricultural lands
that have a designation of long-term commercial significance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter may not be implemented in any way that frustrates the
purpose of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter may not be implemented in any way that frustrates the
purpose of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter may not be implemented in any way that frustrates the
purpose of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter may not be implemented in any way that frustrates the
purpose of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 78.44 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter may not be implemented in any way that frustrates the
purpose of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 86.16 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter may not be implemented in any way that frustrates the
purpose of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A
RCW to read as follows:
This chapter may not be implemented in any way that frustrates the
purpose of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter may not be implemented in any way that frustrates the
purpose of section 2 of this act.

--- END ---