BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the legal
services provided by assistant attorneys general in the office of the
attorney general are crucial to the ability of the state officials,
agencies, colleges, boards, and commissions to function and fulfill
their obligations to the citizens of the state. Assistant attorneys
general are exempt from civil service under RCW 41.06.070 and, unlike
other agencies in state government, the office of the attorney general
does not have a salary schedule with regular step increases for
assistant attorneys general. The assistant attorneys general currently
have no mechanism through which to collectively bargain for salary
increases. The legislature finds the office of the attorney general
has experienced increased difficulty recruiting and retaining attorneys
due to the disparity in wages paid to assistant attorneys general as
compared to attorneys in other public sector positions. This type of
turnover is costly to the office of the attorney general, negatively
impacts morale, interferes with the ability of the office to succession
plan, and ultimately harms the citizens of this state. Therefore, it
is the legislature's intent to empower assistant attorneys general to
collectively bargain for fair wages that will foster job satisfaction
and the highest standards of professional competence among assistant
attorneys general.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this chapter
applies to assistant attorneys general as provided under sections 3 and
4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Assistant attorneys general who are not otherwise excluded
from bargaining under (b) of this subsection are granted the right to
collectively bargain over wages with the attorney general or his or her
designee. Collective bargaining between assistant attorneys general
and the attorney general or his or her designee is governed by chapter
41.56 RCW, except as expressly limited by this chapter and other law.
(b) Senior assistant attorneys general, deputy attorneys general,
the solicitor general, special assistant attorneys general,
confidential employees as defined by RCW 41.80.005(4), and any
assistant or deputy attorney general who reports directly to the
attorney general may not collectively bargain.
(2)(a) The only unit appropriate for the purpose of collective
bargaining under RCW 41.56.060 is a statewide unit of assistant
attorneys general not otherwise excluded from bargaining under this
section.
(b) The showing of interest required to request an election under
RCW 41.56.060 is ten percent of the unit and any intervener seeking to
appear on the ballot must make the same showing of interest.
(3) The attorney general or his or her designee and the exclusive
bargaining representative may not bargain over rights of management
that, in addition to all powers, duties, and rights established by
constitutional provision or statute, include but are not limited to the
following:
(a) The functions and programs of the office of the attorney
general, the use of technology, and the structure of the organization;
(b) The office of the attorney general's budget and the size of its
workforce, including determining the financial basis for layoffs;
(c) The right to direct and supervise employees;
(d) The right to take whatever actions are necessary to carry out
the mission of the state and the attorney general's office during
emergencies;
(e) Retirement plans and retirement benefits;
(f) Health care benefits or other employee insurance benefits; and
(g) The right of the attorney general to, at his or her pleasure,
appoint or terminate assistants as provided in RCW 43.10.060 and
43.10.065.
(4) The attorney general may designate the governor, or the
governor's designee, to bargain on his or her behalf. If such a
designation occurs, costs of the negotiations and arbitration, if any,
shall be reimbursed as provided in RCW 41.80.140.
(5) Assistant attorneys general do not have the right to strike.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon meeting the requirements of subsection (2) of this
section, the governor must submit, as part of the proposed biennial or
supplemental operating budget submitted to the legislature under RCW
43.88.030, and the attorney general must submit, as part of his or her
proposed budget to the legislature, a request for funds necessary to
implement the compensation provisions of a collective bargaining
agreement entered into under section 3 of this act or for legislation
necessary to implement such agreement.
(2) A request for funds necessary to implement the compensation
provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into under
section 3 of this act shall not be submitted by the governor or the
attorney general to the legislature unless such request:
(a) Has been submitted to the director of financial management by
October 1st prior to the legislative session at which the request is to
be considered; and
(b) Has been certified by the director of financial management as
being feasible financially for the state.
(3) The legislature must approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds as a whole. If the legislature rejects or fails to
act on the submission, both parties shall immediately enter into
collective bargaining for a mutually agreed upon modification of the
agreement.
(4) The attorney general or his or her designee shall periodically
consult with the joint committee on employment relations established by
RCW 41.80.010 regarding appropriations necessary to implement the
compensation provisions of any collective bargaining agreement and,
upon completion of negotiations, advise the committee on the elements
of the agreement and on any legislation necessary to implement such
agreement.
(5) If, after the compensation provisions of an agreement are
approved by the legislature, a significant revenue shortfall occurs
resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by proclamation of the
governor or by resolution of the legislature, both parties shall
immediately enter into collective bargaining for a mutually agreed upon
modification of the agreement.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.10.070 and 1965 c 8 s 43.10.070 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to any collective bargaining agreement, the attorney
general shall fix the compensation of all assistants, attorneys, and
employees, and in the event they are assigned to any department, board,
or commission, such department, board, or commission shall pay the
compensation as fixed by the attorney general, not however in excess of
the amount made available to the department by law for legal services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---