BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.28 RCW
to read as follows:
The use of unsafe practices and work in violation of this chapter
can cause serious and preventable injury to employees and the public in
addition to property damage. It is the policy of the legislature that
employees should be protected from adverse workplace actions for being
a whistleblower. The legislature intends to protect employees by
creating a remedy for whistleblowers who experience adverse action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employer may not take adverse action against an employee who
is a whistleblower. An employee aggrieved by a violation of this
section may file an action in a court of competent jurisdiction in the
county where the violation is alleged to have occurred. The court may
award compensatory damages, injunctive relief, attorneys' fees, and
costs to an employee who prevails in the action.
(2) The identity of a whistleblower who reports, in good faith, to
the department or a political subdivision that regulates electrical
installations, practices that may violate this chapter or rules adopted
under this chapter is confidential. The provisions of RCW 4.24.500
through 4.24.520, providing certain protections to persons who
communicate to government agencies, apply to such reports.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Adverse action" means discharging or in any manner
discriminating against an employee because the employee:
(i) Reported a violation of this chapter;
(ii) Filed a complaint, instituted a proceeding, or caused to be
instituted a proceeding under or related to this chapter;
(iii) Testified or is planning to testify in a proceeding under or
related to this chapter; or
(iv) Exercised, on his or her own behalf or on the behalf of
others, any right or responsibility afforded by this chapter.
(b) "Whistleblower" means an employee who:
(i) In good faith, reports or opposes a practice that may violate
this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter or the safety,
installation, repair, or maintenance policies of his or her employer;
(ii) Is believed to have reported the practices described in (b)(i)
of this subsection; or
(iii) Assisted in reporting, provided information in connection
with reporting, or testified regarding the practices described in
(b)(i) of this subsection.

--- END ---