BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.190.010 and 1996 c 84 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A program of education shall be provided for by the department of
social and health services and the several school districts of the
state for common school age persons who have been admitted to
facilities staffed and maintained or contracted pursuant to RCW
13.40.320 by the department of social and health services for the
education and treatment of juveniles who have been diverted or who have
been found to have committed a juvenile offense. The division of
duties, authority, and liabilities of the department of social and
health services and the several school districts of the state
respecting the educational programs shall be the same in all respects
as set forth in RCW 28A.190.030 through 28A.190.060 respecting programs
of education for state residential school residents. For the purposes
of this section, the term "residential school" or "schools" as used in
RCW 28A.190.030 through 28A.190.060 shall be construed to mean a
facility staffed and maintained by the department of social and health
services or a program established under RCW 13.40.320, for the
education and treatment of juvenile offenders on probation or parole.
Nothing in this section shall prohibit a school district from utilizing
the services of an educational service district subject to RCW
28A.310.180. For the purposes of this chapter, the term "school
district" includes any educational service district that has entered
into an agreement to provide a program of education for residential
school residents on behalf of the school district as a cooperative
service program pursuant to RCW 28A.310.180.

--- END ---