BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.12.135 and 2003 c 209 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) A ((rural)) fire protection district organized under this
title may enter into a contract pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW with a
contiguous city for the furnishing by the city to the fire protection
district or districts of emergency medical services in the form of
ambulance services, provided that the contract may not provide for the
establishment of any ambulance service that would compete with any
existing, private ambulance service. The fire protection district or
districts may impose a monthly utility service charge on each developed
residential property located in the portion of the fire protection
district or districts served pursuant to the contract in an amount
equal to the amount imposed by the city on similar city developed
residential property. Developed residential property includes single-family residences, apartments, manufactured homes, mobile homes, and
trailers available for occupancy for a continuous period greater than
thirty days. A fire protection district or districts may contract with
the contiguous city or with any other governmental entity pursuant to
chapter 39.34 RCW for the billing and collection services related to
the monthly utility service charge for ambulance service. A city
providing ambulance services to a fire protection district or districts
under a contract entered into pursuant to this subsection may charge
individuals actually using the ambulance services reasonable rates and
charges for the ambulance services.
(((2) For purposes of this section, "rural" means a population
density within the fire protection district or districts as a whole of
ten or fewer persons per square mile.)) Prior to entering into a
contract for the furnishing of emergency medical services as authorized
by this section, the commissioners of the fire protection district or
districts and the legislative authority of the city must, separately or
jointly, hold a public hearing on the proposed contract prior to its
execution. Each fire protection district and city holding a public
hearing in accordance with this section must, separately or jointly,
publish notice of the meeting or meetings, and a summary of the
proposed contract, including costs to be borne by residents or property
owners in the district if the contract is executed, at least once a
week for two weeks before the date of the hearing or hearings in one or
more newspapers of general circulation within the area to be served by
the proposed contract.

--- END ---