BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state lottery may provide as a promotional activity, free
or for a charge, scratch tickets to persons otherwise eligible to
purchase lottery tickets, and to licensed retailers for distribution to
persons otherwise eligible to purchase lottery tickets. Only scratch
tickets with a retail price of one or two dollars may be used under
this section. The state lottery shall limit promotional scratch
tickets to no more than one percent of the annual sales of one or two
dollar scratch tickets. Promotional scratch tickets provided under
this section must be conducted in accordance with rules established for
promotional activities. Rules adopted under this section must include
audit and reporting provisions.
(2) The lottery commission must review the use of promotional
scratch tickets annually and report its findings to the appropriate
committees of the legislature. Subject to its annual review, the
lottery commission must set quantity guidelines and may suspend the use
of promotional scratch tickets on a fiscal year basis.

--- END ---