BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.020 and 2013 c 323 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of early learning is created as an executive
branch agency. The department is vested with all powers and duties
transferred to it under this chapter and such other powers and duties
as may be authorized by law.
(2) The primary duties of the department are to implement state
early learning policy and to coordinate, consolidate, and integrate
child care and early learning programs in order to administer programs
and funding as efficiently as possible. The department's duties
include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) To support both public and private sectors toward a
comprehensive and collaborative system of early learning that serves
parents, children, and providers and to encourage best practices in
child care and early learning programs;
(b) To make early learning resources available to parents and
caregivers;
(c) To carry out activities, including providing clear and easily
accessible information about quality and improving the quality of early
learning opportunities for young children, in cooperation with the
nongovernmental private-public partnership;
(d) To administer child care and early learning programs;
(e) To apply data already collected comparing the following factors
and make biennial recommendations to the legislature regarding working
connections subsidy and state-funded preschool rates and compensation
models that would attract and retain high quality early learning
professionals:
(i) State-funded early learning subsidy rates and market rates of
licensed early learning homes and centers;
(ii) Compensation of early learning educators in licensed centers
and homes and early learning teachers at state higher education
institutions;
(iii) State-funded preschool program compensation rates and
Washington state head start program compensation rates; and
(iv) State-funded preschool program compensation to compensation in
similar comprehensive programs in other states.
(f) To serve as the state lead agency for Part C of the federal
individuals with disabilities education act (IDEA);
(g) To standardize internal financial audits, oversight visits,
performance benchmarks, and licensing criteria, so that programs can
function in an integrated fashion;
(h) To support the implementation of the nongovernmental private-public partnership and cooperate with that partnership in pursuing its
goals including providing data and support necessary for the successful
work of the partnership;
(i) To work cooperatively and in coordination with the early
learning advisory council established in RCW 43.215.090 to develop and
implement a statewide early learning plan that guides the department in
promoting alignment of private and public sector actions, objectives,
and resources, and ensuring school readiness;
(j) To collaborate with the K-12 school system at the state and
local levels to ensure appropriate connections and smooth transitions
between early learning and K-12 programs;
(k) To develop and adopt rules for administration of the program of
early learning established in RCW ((43.215.141)) 43.215.455;
(l) To develop a comprehensive birth-to-three plan to provide
education and support through a continuum of options including, but not
limited to, services such as: Home visiting; quality incentives for
infant and toddler child care subsidies; quality improvements for
family home and center-based child care programs serving infants and
toddlers; professional development; early literacy programs; and
informal supports for family, friend, and neighbor caregivers; and
(m) Upon the development of an early learning information system,
to make available to parents timely inspection and licensing action
information and provider comments through the internet and other means.
(3) When additional funds are appropriated for the specific purpose
of home visiting and parent and caregiver support, the department must
reserve at least eighty percent for home visiting services to be
deposited into the home visiting services account and up to twenty
percent of the new funds for other parent or caregiver support.
(4) Home visiting services must include programs that serve
families involved in the child welfare system.
(5) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the legislature shall fund the expansion in the
Washington state preschool program pursuant to RCW ((43.215.142))
43.215.456 in fiscal year 2014.
(6) The department's programs shall be designed in a way that
respects and preserves the ability of parents and legal guardians to
direct the education, development, and upbringing of their children,
and that recognizes and honors cultural and linguistic diversity. The
department shall include parents and legal guardians in the development
of policies and program decisions affecting their children.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.090 and 2012 c 229 s 589 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The early learning advisory council is established to advise
the department on statewide early learning issues that would build a
comprehensive system of quality early learning programs and services
for Washington's children and families by assessing needs and the
availability of services, aligning resources, developing plans for data
collection and professional development of early childhood educators,
and establishing key performance measures.
(2) ((The council shall work in conjunction with the department to
develop a statewide early learning plan that guides the department in
promoting alignment of private and public sector actions, objectives,
and resources, and ensuring school readiness.
(3))) The council shall include diverse, statewide representation
from public, nonprofit, and for-profit entities. Its membership shall
reflect regional, racial, and cultural diversity to adequately
represent the needs of all children and families in the state.
(((4))) (3) Councilmembers shall serve two-year terms. However, to
stagger the terms of the council, the initial appointments for twelve
of the members shall be for one year. Once the initial one-year to
two-year terms expire, all subsequent terms shall be for two years,
with the terms expiring on June 30th of the applicable year. The terms
shall be staggered in such a way that, where possible, the terms of
members representing a specific group do not expire simultaneously.
(((5))) (4) The council shall consist of not more than ((twenty-three)) thirty-four members, as follows:
(a) The governor shall appoint at least one representative from
each of the following: The department, the office of financial
management, the department of social and health services, the
department of health, the student achievement council, and the state
board for community and technical colleges;
(b) One representative from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, to be appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction;
(c) The governor shall appoint ((seven)) six leaders in early
childhood education, with at least one representative with experience
or expertise in one or more of the areas such as the following: The K-12 system, family day care providers, and child care centers with four
of the ((seven)) six governor's appointees made as follows:
(i) The head start state collaboration office director or the
director's designee;
(ii) A representative of a head start, early head start,
migrant/seasonal head start, or tribal head start program;
(iii) A representative of a local education agency; and
(iv) A representative of the state agency responsible for programs
under section 619 or part C of the federal individuals with
disabilities education act;
(d) Two members of the house of representatives, one from each
caucus, and two members of the senate, one from each caucus, to be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and the
president of the senate, respectively;
(e) Two parents, one of whom serves on ((the)) a department(('s
parent advisory)) parent-represented group, to be appointed by the
governor;
(f) One representative of the private-public partnership created in
RCW 43.215.070, to be appointed by the partnership board;
(g) One representative designated by sovereign tribal governments;
((and))
(h) One representative from the Washington federation of
independent schools;
(i) One representative of school-age child care providers,
appointed by the governor;
(j) One representative of a statewide alliance of early learning
advocates; and
(k) One representative from each of the ten early learning regional
coalitions funded by the department and the private-public partnership
created in RCW 43.215.070, appointed by the coalition that he or she
will be representing, five of whom shall be initially appointed for one
year at the discretion of the department in order to stagger their
terms.
(((6))) (5) The council shall be cochaired by one representative of
a state agency and one nongovernmental member, to be elected by the
council for two-year terms.
(((7) The council shall appoint two members and stakeholders with
expertise in early learning to sit on the technical working group
created in section 2, chapter 234, Laws of 2010.
(8))) (6) Each member of the board shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and reimbursed for travel expenses
incurred in carrying out the duties of the board in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(((9))) (7) The department shall provide staff support to the
council.

--- END ---