BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.235 and 1994 c 218 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of a prosecution under RCW 9.46.215 or a seizure,
confiscation, or destruction order under RCW 9.46.231, it shall be a
defense that the gambling device involved is an antique slot machine
and that the antique slot machine was not operated for gambling
purposes while in the owner's or defendant's possession. Operation of
an antique slot machine shall be only by free play or with coins
provided at no cost by the owner. No slot machine, having been seized
under this chapter, may be altered, destroyed, or disposed of without
affording the owner thereof an opportunity to present a defense under
this section. If the defense is applicable, the antique slot machine
shall be returned to the owner or defendant, as the court may direct.
(2) RCW 9.46.231 shall have no application to any antique slot
machine that has not been operated for gambling purposes while in the
owner's possession.
(3) For the purposes of this section, a slot machine shall be
conclusively presumed to be an antique slot machine if it is at least
twenty-five years old.
(4) RCW 9.46.231 and 9.46.215 do not apply to gambling devices on
board a passenger cruise ship which has been registered and bonded with
the federal maritime commission, if the gambling devices are not
operated for gambling purposes within the state.
(5) RCW 9.46.231 and 9.46.215 do not apply to gambling devices
being transported to, or in the possession of, a licensed or certified
manufacturer of class III tribal lottery systems, as defined in class
III gaming compacts, provided the following conditions are met:
(a) Such devices were manufactured by a licensed or certified
manufacturer; and
(b) The possession of such devices is limited to the following
purposes:
(i) Research and software game development; or
(ii) Warehousing and distribution of class III tribal lottery
system components to class III gaming locations; and
(c) The devices and components are:
(i) Not available to the general public;
(ii) Accessible only to employees of the class III tribal lottery
system manufacturer, subsidiary employees of the manufacturer, or
third-party vendor employees under contract with the manufacturer;
(iii) Possessed only in locations approved by the commission; and
(iv) Not used for gambling purposes; and
(d) The manufacturer is in compliance with all reporting
requirements established under this chapter and has paid all inspection
fees as required by the commission.
(6) The commission is granted the authority to impose such fees as
it deems necessary to implement subsection (5) of this section.

--- END ---