BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.415.360 and 2009 c 548 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, targeted
professional development programs, to be known as learning improvement
days, are authorized to further the development of outstanding
mathematics, science, and reading teaching and learning opportunities
in the state of Washington and to provide educators with the training
and support necessary to ensure the successful implementation of
statewide education reforms. The intent of this section is to provide
guidance for the learning improvement days in the omnibus
appropriations act: PROVIDED, That for the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017
fiscal biennia, districts receiving funding for learning improvement
days must use those funds as specified in the omnibus appropriations
act. The learning improvement days authorized in this section shall
not be considered part of the definition of basic education.
(2) A school district is eligible to receive funding for learning
improvement days that are limited to specific activities related to
student learning that contribute to the following outcomes:
(a) Provision of meaningful, targeted professional development for
all teachers in mathematics, science, or reading;
(b) Increased knowledge and instructional skill for mathematics,
science, or reading teachers;
(c) Increased use of curriculum materials with supporting
diagnostic and supplemental materials that align with state standards;
(d) Skillful guidance for students participating in alternative
assessment activities;
(e) Increased rigor of course offerings especially in mathematics,
science, and reading;
(f) Increased student opportunities for focused, applied
mathematics and science classes;
(g) Increased student success on state achievement measures; and
(h) Increased student appreciation of the value and uses of
mathematics, science, and reading knowledge and exploration of related
careers.
(3) School districts receiving resources under this section shall
submit reports to the superintendent of public instruction documenting
how the use of the funds contributes to measurable improvement in the
outcomes described under subsection (2) of this section; and how other
professional development resources and programs authorized in statute
or in the omnibus appropriations act contribute to the expected
outcomes. The superintendent of public instruction and the office of
financial management shall collaborate on required report content and
format.

--- END ---