BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that as the cost of
higher education is shifted away from state support and more toward the
contribution of students and their families, dual credit courses allow
students an opportunity to cut the cost of their higher education by
earning college credits while in high school. However, because each
institution of higher education has its own unique policies related to
awarding such credit, the dual credit work that students do while in
high school is not always recognized by institutions of higher
education.
This act is intended to better understand the array of policies
that institutions of higher education use to award college credit for
dual credit courses. With that understanding, work related to awarding
college credit for dual credit courses can continue to create a more
uniform policy among institutions of higher education. In doing so,
students will have a greater reassurance that their dual credit
coursework will be recognized for college credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.77 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The council shall review policies related to providing students
college credit for completion of dual credit courses. The dual credit
courses that should be considered in this analysis include AP,
International Baccalaureate, and Cambridge. This review must identify
the major differences between institutions of higher education in
awarding college credit for completion of dual credit coursework and
best practices among the institutions in awarding college credit for
completion of dual credit courses. The review must further identify
whether the institutional crediting policies apply equally to each dual
credit program, or whether certain dual credit programs are not awarded
as much college credit. By December 1, 2014, the council shall make
recommendations to the higher education committees of the legislature
regarding the steps that should be taken to improve the practices of
institutions of higher education in awarding college credit for dual
credit coursework.
(2) This section expires August 1, 2015.

--- END ---