BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 PUBLIC POLICY. It is the public policy of
the state of Washington to promote ready access to legal assistance and
counsel for all citizens of the state and to encourage programs and
plans that promote arrangements between members of the public as
consumers of legal services and lawyers and other trained professionals
who provide legal assistance and counsel to the general public for any
type of legal needs. To that end, and to effectuate this public
policy, the legislature finds that it is desirable and necessary to
create a regulatory environment that is not more burdensome than is
necessary both to ensure that the citizens of this state have ready and
uncomplicated access to legal services and at the same time to
safeguard the public from the risk that a legal expense organization
providing access to legal services may be unable to fulfill its
contractual obligations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of the state of
Washington.
(2) "Legal service organization" or "organization" means any
person, entity, or group of persons, including associations or
administrators, who provide or offer to provide a legal service plan.
(3) "Legal service plan" or "plan" means an arrangement between an
organization and an individual or person or group of individuals or
persons, identified in the plan as members, whereby specified legal
services are to be provided to the members in consideration of a
specified payment for a specified period of time.
(4) "Member" means an individual, person, or group of individuals
or persons eligible to receive legal services under a legal service
plan.
(5) "Membership agreement" means the written contract or agreement
entered into between a member or group of members and the legal service
organization under which the member or group of members will have
access to legal services under a legal service plan. Membership
agreements are not to be considered retainer agreements as further
described in section 3 of this act.
(6) "Providing attorney" means an attorney duly licensed and in
good standing in this state who provides legal services under a
providing attorney agreement in accordance with the terms of the
membership agreement.
(7) "Providing attorney agreement" means a written contract or
agreement between a legal service organization and a providing attorney
under which the providing attorney renders and provides legal services
to a member of a legal service plan.
(8) "Sales representative" means a person who promotes, markets,
and solicits members on behalf of a plan, and who, in conjunction
therewith, thereafter sells a legal service plan to a person or
individual who becomes a member.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 ARRANGEMENTS EXCLUDED UNDER THIS CHAPTER.
This chapter does not apply to any of the following arrangements:
(1) Retainer agreements made by an attorney or firm of attorneys
with specified individual, group, or corporate clients with fees based
on reasonable estimates of the nature and amount of legal services to
be provided to the particular client;
(2) Retainer agreements, contingent fee arrangements, or similar
agreements made by an attorney or firm of attorneys with a client or
group of clients involved in the same or closely related legal matters
including, but not limited to, class actions;
(3) Any two-party agreement providing for the delivery of specified
legal services in return for a specified payment, including
administrative fees, under an arrangement made between an attorney or
firm of attorneys and a group of individuals who are all members of the
same bona fide nonprofit organization, or a group of individuals who
are all employed by the same employer, if the primary purpose of the
membership organization or employer is other than providing legal
services. Groups of individuals under this subsection may include,
without limitation, churches, labor unions, trade groups or trade
associations, credit unions, and condominium or special purpose
associations;
(4) Referral of individual clients to an attorney by a nonprofit
lawyer referral service or public corporation or entity such as a state
or local bar association provided there is no fee or charge for such
referral;
(5) Employee welfare benefit plans to the extent that state law or
regulation is preempted by federal law or regulation;
(6) Legal assistance plans financed primarily by public funds,
interest on lawyers' trust account funds in accordance with
requirements and regulations of the state bar association, or other
public service funds;
(7) Policies of insurance, or coverage incidental to such insurance
which may include legal defense, issued by an insurer holding a valid
certificate of authority in this state and issued under applicable laws
in this title pertaining to such insurance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 CERTIFICATE OF REGISTRATION REQUIRED. (1)
A person or entity may not transact business in this state as a legal
service organization, or otherwise offer, market, solicit, provide, or
do business on behalf of a legal service plan, unless such person or
entity holds a valid certificate of registration as a legal service
organization issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section, any person or entity conducting business as a legal service
organization in this state as of the effective date of this section,
must be permitted to continue conducting business as a legal service
organization in this state. However, such person or entity must apply
for and obtain registration as a legal service organization in
accordance with section 6 of this act within one year after the
commissioner has prescribed the forms and established the fee for such
registration required in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 REQUIREMENTS AND QUALIFICATIONS FOR
CERTIFICATE OF REGISTRATION. (1) A person or entity applying for
registration as a legal service organization must comply with the
following requirements as set forth in this section:
(a) Apply for registration on such forms prescribed by the
commissioner and pay all applicable fees associated therewith under
this chapter;
(b) Appoint the commissioner as its attorney-in-fact for service of
process, upon whom must be served all legal process issued against such
person or entity in regard to all causes of action arising within this
state. Service of process against a person or entity doing business as
a legal service organization must be available only by service upon the
commissioner, and valid service of legal process against the
commissioner as attorney-in-fact constitutes service upon the
organization; and
(c) Designate by name and address the individual or person who must
serve as the organization's registered agent to whom the commissioner
must forward legal process issued against the organization and received
by the commissioner.
(2) A person or entity applying for registration as a legal service
organization must meet the following qualifications:
(a) The applicant must be financially responsible and be able to
meet its direct obligations and responsibilities to its members under
the terms of its membership agreements with its members; and
(b) The applicant must provide such information as the commissioner
may establish by regulation that the directors, officers, and managers
of the organization are competent, trustworthy, and have sufficient
management and business experience to conduct the business and affairs
of the organization in a reasonable and prudent manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 REGISTRATION APPLICATION--FORM--FEE. (1) An
applicant for a certificate of registration must apply to the
commissioner on a form prescribed by the commissioner.
(2) The applicant must deposit with the office of insurance
commissioner the filing fees established by the commissioner to be paid
for filing the application for the certificate of registration and any
necessary accompanying documents to be filed with the application.
(3) The application must include the following information:
(a) The name, address, telephone number, and any other reasonable
and necessary contact information of the organization making
application for the certificate of registration;
(b) The name, address, and reasonable and necessary contact
information of the directors, executive officers, or senior managers of
the organization making application for the certificate of
registration;
(c) Whether any of the directors, officers, or senior managers of
the organization making application for the certificate of registration
has ever been convicted of or is currently under indictment for fraud
or other crime involving moral turpitude, or has ever had a judgment
entered against him or her, or has ever had any professional license
refused, revoked, or suspended in any state where the applicant
conducts business as a legal service organization;
(d) A statement of financial condition of the organization making
application for a certificate of registration, in a form satisfactory
to the commissioner and as may be specifically provided for in this
chapter or in such regulation as the commissioner may adopt hereunder;
and
(e) Any other information as the commissioner may, by regulation,
require as reasonable and necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 ISSUANCE OF CERTIFICATE OF REGISTRATION.
(1) Upon a determination that the organization making application for
a certificate of registration has satisfied the requirements and met
the qualifications of this chapter to conduct business as a legal
service organization, the commissioner must issue the certificate of
registration to the applicant.
(2) If the commissioner denies or refuses to issue the certificate
of registration to any applicant, the commissioner must notify the
applicant of the denial of or refusal to issue the certificate of
registration in writing within fifteen days of such denial or refusal.
The commissioner must provide the applicant with the specific reasons
for the denial of or refusal to issue the certificate of registration
and advise the applicant of the right to appeal the actions of the
commissioner in accordance with the provisions of this title and
chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 DURATION OF CERTIFICATE OF REGISTRATION--RENEWAL--FEE. (1) The initial certificate of registration to conduct
business as a legal service organization must be effective as of the
date of issue and valid through the balance of the year in which the
initial certificate of registration is issued. Thereafter, a
certificate of registration is effective for one calendar year, from
January 1st through December 31st.
(2) A legal service organization may renew its certificate of
registration by timely paying the applicable renewal fee during such
renewal period and in such amount as is established by the
commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 GROUNDS FOR SUSPENSION, REVOCATION, OR
REFUSAL TO ISSUE OR RENEW CERTIFICATE OF REGISTRATION. (1) The
commissioner may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew a
certificate of registration only upon a finding of the following
reasons:
(a) Fraud or deceit by the organization applying for or obtaining
the certificate of registration;
(b) Dishonesty, fraud, or gross negligence by the organization
applying for or holding a certificate of registration in the conduct of
its business as a legal service organization;
(c) Conduct resulting in the conviction of a felony under the laws
of any state or the United States;
(d) Conviction of any crime under the laws of any state or the
United States punishable by imprisonment of not less than one year, the
essential element of which crime is dishonesty or fraud;
(e) Failure to pay a civil penalty imposed by final order of the
commissioner after hearing.
(2) An organization holding a certificate of registration that has
not been renewed or has been revoked must surrender the certificate of
registration to the commissioner at the commissioner's request.
(3) The commissioner may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or
renew a certificate of registration only after giving written notice of
the reasons for such action and after giving the organization an
opportunity for appeal and hearing pursuant to the provisions of
chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 PROVIDING ATTORNEY AGREEMENT. An
organization may not offer, market, or operate a legal service plan in
this state unless the organization first enters into a written
providing attorney agreement with at least one providing attorney.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 MEMBERSHIP AGREEMENT. A legal service
organization must provide a membership agreement to each individual,
person, or group of individuals or persons who is a party to a legal
service plan. Each membership agreement must contain the following
basic provisions:
(1) A listing and clear description of the legal services to be
provided under the plan and a clear explanation of the limits of such
legal services;
(2) The name and address of the principal place of business of the
legal service organization offering the plan;
(3) If the plan offers a limited choice of providing attorneys, a
process for providing the services of an alternate attorney in the
event the designated providing attorney is unable to perform the legal
services provided under the plan because of a conflict of interests,
ethical considerations, or the particular circumstances would make it
impractical for the providing attorney to render legal services
requested by the member; and
(4) A provision for review and settlement of disagreements about
the grounds for requesting an alternate attorney.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 UNFAIR, DISCRIMINATORY, OR MISLEADING
PROVISIONS IN AGREEMENTS PROHIBITED. (1) No providing attorney
agreement or membership agreement may contain any provisions that are
unfair, discriminatory, or misleading, or that encourage
misrepresentation or misunderstanding of the terms of the agreement, or
that endanger the solvency of the organization or the plan, or that are
intentionally contrary to law.
(2) For the term of each providing attorney agreement and each
member agreement, a legal service organization must maintain at its
principal place of business adequate books and records of all
transactions between the organization and the providing attorney and
between the organization and the members of a plan. Upon reasonable
notice to the organization, the commissioner must have reasonable
access to such books and records provided such access does not violate
or conflict with the attorney-client relationship or with any privilege
or other privacy right recognized in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 FILING AGREEMENTS WITH COMMISSIONER. Each
legal service organization must file with the commissioner a copy of
all current membership agreement forms used by the organization in this
state. The organization must also file any material changes or
revisions in the membership agreement forms with the commissioner prior
to using any such revised forms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 ANNUAL REPORT OF LEGAL SERVICE
ORGANIZATION. (1) Each legal service organization doing business in
this state must annually file with the commissioner, on such form and
in such detail as the commissioner may prescribe by regulation, a
verified financial statement providing sufficient information
concerning the legal service organization's assets, liabilities, loss
and expense records, if applicable, fee refund reserves or unearned
payment reserves, if applicable, and such other information as may
reasonably be required so long as the disclosure of such information
does not violate or conflict with the attorney-client relationship or
with any privilege or any other privacy right recognized in this state.
(2) Each legal service organization must submit to the commissioner
annually a statement containing the names and addresses of all
individuals or persons in this state whom the organization has
contracted, appointed, or retained as sales or marketing
representatives to act on behalf of the organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 BOND OR SECURITY DEPOSIT--WHEN REQUIRED--AMOUNT. A legal service organization may not issue, sell, or offer for
sale in this state a legal service plan providing for access to legal
services under the plan unless the organization offering the plan posts
a bond or provides evidence of a security deposit pursuant to this
section. The bond or security deposit must be held in trust to the
commissioner for the protection of members in the plan and other
affected persons, if any, under the plan. The security bond or other
deposit posted by the organization under this section must be in the
amount of one hundred thousand dollars, and must be held in a bank
authorized to transact business in this state and insured by the
federal deposit insurance corporation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 SCOPE AND APPLICABILITY OF THIS CHAPTER.
(1) The provisions of this chapter may not in any way affect the
practice of law in this state.
(2) The provisions of this chapter must provide for the oversight
of legal service plans and legal service organizations in this state.
Legal service organizations are not insurers under RCW 48.01.050, and,
legal service plans are not insurance under RCW 48.01.040. Except as
specifically described and provided for in this chapter, legal service
plans, and legal service organizations and their representatives are
not subject to the provisions of this title.
(3) The provisions of this chapter may not affect the validity of
any legal service plan, membership agreement, or providing attorney
agreement in force as of the effective date of this section and which
would otherwise be subject to the provisions of this chapter. Any
revision to a legal service plan, membership agreement, providing
attorney agreement, or similar plan or agreement after the effective
date of this section is subject to the full provisions of this chapter
and must comply in all respects therewith from and after any such
renewal or revision thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 REGULATIONS. The commissioner has
authority to promulgate such regulations and rules as may be reasonable
and necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter within the
scope and application of this chapter as specifically set forth in this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 17 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

--- END ---