BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of this act to clarify the
application of Article II, section 16 of the Washington state
Constitution with respect to traffic violations committed by state
legislators.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.64.010 and 2004 c 43 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every traffic enforcement agency in this state shall provide in
appropriate form traffic citations containing notices to appear which
shall be issued in books with citations in quadruplicate and meeting
the requirements of this section, or issued by an electronic device
capable of producing a printed copy and electronic copies of the
citations. The chief administrative officer of every such traffic
enforcement agency shall be responsible for the issuance of such books
or electronic devices and shall maintain a record of every such book
and each citation contained therein and every such electronic device
issued to individual members of the traffic enforcement agency and
shall require and retain a receipt for every book and electronic device
so issued.
(2) Every traffic enforcement officer upon issuing a traffic
citation to an alleged violator of any provision of the motor vehicle
laws of this state or of any traffic ordinance of any city or town
shall deposit the original or a printed or electronic copy of such
traffic citation with a court having competent jurisdiction over the
alleged offense or with its traffic violations bureau. Upon the
deposit of the original or a copy of such traffic citation with a court
having competent jurisdiction over the alleged offense or with its
traffic violations bureau as aforesaid, the original or copy of such
traffic citation may be disposed of only by trial in the court or other
official action by a judge of the court, including forfeiture of the
bail or by the deposit of sufficient bail with or payment of a fine to
the traffic violations bureau by the person to whom such traffic
citation has been issued by the traffic enforcement officer. The
issuance of a traffic citation to a legislator is not civil process
under Article II, section 16 of the Washington state Constitution;
however, court appearances, or any other hearings related to the
disposition of a traffic citation, may not be scheduled during a
legislative session. For the purposes of this subsection, "legislative
session" means the regular session and any special sessions.
(3) It shall be unlawful and official misconduct for any traffic
enforcement officer or other officer or public employee to dispose of
a traffic citation or copies thereof or of the record of the issuance
of the same in a manner other than as required in this section.
(4) The chief administrative officer of every traffic enforcement
agency shall require the return to him or her of a printed or
electronic copy of every traffic citation issued by an officer under
his or her supervision to an alleged violator of any traffic law or
ordinance and of all copies of every traffic citation which has been
spoiled or upon which any entry has been made and not issued to an
alleged violator. Such chief administrative officer shall also
maintain or cause to be maintained in connection with every traffic
citation issued by an officer under his or her supervision a record of
the disposition of the charge by the court or its traffic violations
bureau in which the original or copy of the traffic citation was
deposited.
(5) Any person who cancels or solicits the cancellation of any
traffic citation, in any manner other than as provided in this section,
is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(6) Every record of traffic citations required in this section
shall be audited monthly by the appropriate fiscal officer of the
government agency to which the traffic enforcement agency is
responsible.

--- END ---