BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.16.020 and 2002 c 261 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The period prescribed for the commencement of actions shall be as
follows:
(1) Within ten years:
(((1))) (a) Except when subsection (2) of this section applies, for
actions for the recovery of real property, or for the recovery of the
possession thereof; and no action shall be maintained for such recovery
unless it appears that the plaintiff, his or her ancestor, predecessor
or grantor was seized or possessed of the premises in question within
ten years before the commencement of the action.
(((2))) (b) For an action upon a judgment or decree of any court of
the United States, or of any state or territory within the United
States, or of any territory or possession of the United States outside
the boundaries thereof, or of any extraterritorial court of the United
States, unless the period is extended under RCW 6.17.020 or a similar
provision in another jurisdiction.
(((3))) (c) Of the eighteenth birthday of the youngest child named
in the order for whom support is ordered for an action to collect past
due child support that has accrued under an order entered after July
23, 1989, by any of the above-named courts or that has accrued under an
administrative order as defined in RCW 74.20A.020(6), which is issued
after July 23, 1989.
(2) Actions for the recovery of land against a person who is or may
be in adverse possession must be brought within twenty years after the
commencement of the possession where entry onto the land begins on or
after the effective date of this section. A person may not gain title
to or rights in another's land by adverse possession until the
possession is proven to have continued for twenty years.

Sec. 2 RCW 7.28.010 and 2011 c 336 s 170 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except when subsection (2) of this section applies, any person
having a valid subsisting interest in real property, and a right to the
possession thereof, may recover the same by action in the superior
court of the proper county, to be brought against the tenant in
possession; if there is no such tenant, then against the person
claiming the title or some interest therein, and may have judgment in
such action quieting or removing a cloud from plaintiff's title; an
action to quiet title may be brought by the known heirs of any deceased
person, or of any person presumed in law to be deceased, or by the
successors in interest of such known heirs against the unknown heirs of
such deceased person or against such person presumed to be deceased and
his or her unknown heirs, and if it shall be made to appear in such
action that the plaintiffs are heirs of the deceased person, or the
person presumed in law to be deceased, or the successors in interest of
such heirs, and have been in possession of the real property involved
in such action for ten years preceding the time of the commencement of
such action, and that during said time no person other than the
plaintiff in the action or his or her grantors has claimed or asserted
any right or title or interest in said property, the court may adjudge
and decree the plaintiff or plaintiffs in such action to be the owners
of such real property, free from all claims of any unknown heirs of
such deceased person, or person presumed in law to be deceased; and an
action to quiet title may be maintained by any person in the actual
possession of real property against the unknown heirs of a person known
to be dead, or against any person where it is not known whether such
person is dead or not, and against the unknown heirs of such person,
and if it shall thereafter transpire that such person was at the time
of commencing such action dead the judgment or decree in such action
shall be as binding and conclusive on the heirs of such person as
though they had been known and named; and in all actions, under this
section, to quiet or remove a cloud from the title to real property, if
the defendant be absent or a nonresident of this state, or cannot,
after due diligence, be found within the state, or conceals himself or
herself to avoid the service of summons, service may be made upon such
defendant by publication of summons as provided by law; and the court
may appoint a trustee for such absent or nonresident defendant, to make
or cancel any deed or conveyance of whatsoever nature, or do any other
act to carry into effect the judgment or the decree of the court.
(2) Actions to quiet title that are based upon an allegation of
adverse possession must be brought within twenty years after the
commencement of the possession where entry onto the land begins on or
after the effective date of this section. A person may not gain title
to or rights in another's land by adverse possession until the
possession is proven to have continued for twenty years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 7.28 RCW
to read as follows:
A landowner is entitled to the following protection:
It is an affirmative defense to any claim of adverse possession
that the landowner gave permission to use the land at any time during
the applicable time period specified in RCW 4.16.020 or 7.28.010 to the
person claiming title by adverse possession. A certified letter,
return receipt requested, delivered at any time during the applicable
time period specified in RCW 4.16.020 or 7.28.010 by the landowner to
the person claiming title by adverse possession granting permission to
use the land is conclusive evidence that subsequent use is permissive.

Sec. 4 RCW 7.28.083 and 2011 c 255 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A party who prevails against the holder of record title at the
time an action asserting title to real property by adverse possession
was filed, or against a subsequent purchaser from such holder, may be
required to:
(a) Reimburse such holder or purchaser for part or all of any taxes
or assessments levied on the real property during the period the
prevailing party was in possession of the real property in question and
which are proven by competent evidence to have been paid by such holder
or purchaser; and
(b) Pay to the treasurer of the county in which the real property
is located part or all of any taxes or assessments levied on the real
property after the filing of the adverse possession claim and which are
due and remain unpaid at the time judgment on the claim is entered.
(2) If the court orders reimbursement for taxes or assessments paid
or payment of taxes or assessments due under subsection (1) of this
section, the court shall determine how to allocate taxes or assessments
between the property acquired by adverse possession and the property
retained by the title holder. In making its determination, the court
shall consider all the facts and shall order such reimbursement or
payment as appears equitable and just.
(3) The prevailing party in an action asserting title to real
property by adverse possession may request the court to award costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees((.)), and the court ((may)) must award ((all
or a portion of)) costs and reasonable attorneys' fees to the
prevailing party ((if, after considering all the facts, the court
determines such an award is equitable and just)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act apply only
to actions commenced after the effective date of this section.

--- END ---