BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 34.05.630 and 1998 c 21 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All rules required to be filed pursuant to RCW 34.05.380, and
emergency rules adopted pursuant to RCW 34.05.350, are subject to
selective review by the committee. The committee must review a rule:
(a) Upon receipt of a petition for review signed by at least
fifteen members of the legislature;
(b) If the rule has an economic impact of ten million dollars or
more; or
(c) Upon receipt of a petition for review signed by five or more
local governments representing collectively fifty thousand or more
Washington residents.
(2) All agency policy and interpretive statements, guidelines, and
documents that are of general applicability, or their equivalents, are
subject to selective review by the committee to determine whether or
not a statement, guideline, or document that is of general
applicability, or its equivalent, is being used as a rule that has not
been adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions of law.
(3) If the rules review committee finds by a majority vote of its
members: (a) That an existing rule is not within the intent of the
legislature as expressed by the statute which the rule implements, (b)
that the rule has not been adopted in accordance with all applicable
provisions of law, or (c) that an agency is using a policy or
interpretive statement in place of a rule, the agency affected shall be
notified of such finding and the reasons therefor. Within thirty days
of the receipt of the rules review committee's notice, the agency shall
file notice of a hearing on the rules review committee's finding with
the code reviser and mail notice to all persons who have made timely
request of the agency for advance notice of its rule-making proceedings
as provided in RCW 34.05.320. The agency's notice shall include the
rules review committee's findings and reasons therefor, and shall be
published in the Washington state register in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 34.08 RCW.
(4) The agency shall consider fully all written and oral
submissions regarding (a) whether the rule in question is within the
intent of the legislature as expressed by the statute which the rule
implements, (b) whether the rule was adopted in accordance with all
applicable provisions of law, and (c) whether the agency is using a
policy or interpretive statement, guideline, or document that is of
general applicability, or its equivalent, in place of a rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The following agency actions are subject to selective review by
the committee to ensure consistency with the agency's adopted
guidelines, administrative regulations for issuing a permit, or both:
(a) A water quality general permit or individual wastewater
discharge permit issued by the department of ecology under chapter
90.48 RCW or pursuant to the federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec.
1251 et seq.;
(b) A permit issued by the department of ecology to major sources
under RCW 70.94.152;
(c) The use by the department of ecology of advisory materials or
guidelines issued pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW in the review of a
local shoreline master program; and
(d) The use by the department of commerce of advisory materials or
guidelines issued pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW regarding the local
designation of a critical area.
(2) The committee must review an agency action:
(a) Upon receipt of a petition for review signed by at least
fifteen members of the legislature;
(b) If the action has an economic impact of ten million dollars or
more; or
(c) Upon receipt of a petition for review signed by five or more
local governments representing collectively fifty thousand or more
Washington residents.
(3) If the committee finds by a majority vote of its members that
the issuance of a permit or the use of guidelines or advisory materials
under subsection (1) of this section is not consistent with the
agency's adopted guidelines, administrative regulations for issuing a
permit, or both, the agency affected must be notified of the findings,
the reasons for the findings, and all written and oral comments
received during the review.
(4) Within thirty days of the receipt of the committee's findings,
the agency must fully consider all written and oral comments received
as a result of the committee review.

--- END ---