BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.93.060 and 2003 c 337 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a violation of this section to abandon a junk vehicle
upon any property.
(2) In addition, no person shall throw, drop, deposit, discard, or
otherwise dispose of litter upon any public property in the state or
upon private property in this state not owned by him or her or in the
waters of this state whether from a vehicle or otherwise including but
not limited to any public highway, public park, beach, campground,
forest land, recreational area, trailer park, highway, road, street, or
alley except:
(a) When the property is designated by the state or its agencies or
political subdivisions for the disposal of garbage and refuse, and the
person is authorized to use such property for that purpose;
(b) Into a litter receptacle in a manner that will prevent litter
from being carried away or deposited by the elements upon any part of
the private or public property or waters.
(((2))) (3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (((4))) (5) of this
section, it is a class ((3)) 2 civil infraction as provided in RCW
7.80.120 for a person to litter in an amount less than or equal to one
cubic foot. This penalty is in addition to any penalty imposed for a
violation of RCW 46.61.645(1).
(b) It is a misdemeanor for a person to litter in an amount greater
than one cubic foot but less than one cubic yard. The person shall
also pay a litter cleanup restitution payment equal to twice the actual
cost of cleanup, or fifty dollars per cubic foot of litter, whichever
is greater. The court shall distribute one-half of the restitution
payment to the landowner and one-half of the restitution payment to the
law enforcement agency investigating the incident. The court may, in
addition to or in lieu of part or all of the cleanup restitution
payment, order the person to pick up and remove litter from the
property, with prior permission of the legal owner or, in the case of
public property, of the agency managing the property. The court may
suspend or modify the litter cleanup restitution payment for a first-time offender under this section, if the person cleans up and properly
disposes of the litter.
(c) It is a gross misdemeanor for a person to litter in an amount
of one cubic yard or more. The person shall also pay a litter cleanup
restitution payment equal to twice the actual cost of cleanup, or one
hundred dollars per cubic foot of litter, whichever is greater. The
court shall distribute one-half of the restitution payment to the
landowner and one-half of the restitution payment to the law
enforcement agency investigating the incident. The court may, in
addition to or in lieu of part or all of the cleanup restitution
payment, order the person to pick up and remove litter from the
property, with prior permission of the legal owner or, in the case of
public property, of the agency managing the property. The court may
suspend or modify the litter cleanup restitution payment for a first-time offender under this section, if the person cleans up and properly
disposes of the litter.
(d) If a junk vehicle is abandoned in violation of this section,
RCW 46.55.230 governs the vehicle's removal, disposal, and sale, and
the penalties that may be imposed against the person who abandoned the
vehicle.
(((3))) (4) If the violation occurs in a state park, the court
shall, in addition to any other penalties assessed, order the person to
perform twenty-four hours of community restitution in the state park
where the violation occurred if the state park has stated an intent to
participate as provided in RCW 79A.05.050.
(((4))) (5) It is a class 1 civil infraction as provided in RCW
7.80.120 for a person to discard, in violation of this section,
potentially dangerous litter in any amount.

--- END ---