BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county, municipality, or political subdivision of the state
may, by majority vote of the local governing body, opt out of the
requirements of this chapter for public works and public building
service maintenance contracts estimated to cost less than five million
dollars, exclusive of engineering fees, land acquisition costs, taxes,
and the cost of any change orders.
(2) An awarding agency may subdivide or otherwise disaggregate a
public works project to qualify for this section.
(3) For purposes of this section, "local governing body" means a
council, board, commission, or other legislative authority charged with
governing the county, municipality, or political subdivision of the
state.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.04.260 and 1993 c 110 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any work,
construction, alteration, repair, or improvement, other than ordinary
maintenance, that the state or a municipality causes to be performed by
a private party through a contract to rent, lease, or purchase at least
fifty percent of the project by one or more state agencies or
municipalities shall comply with chapter 39.12 RCW.
(2) This section does not apply to work, construction, alteration,
repair, or improvement, other than ordinary maintenance, that is exempt
from the requirements of chapter 39.12 RCW under section 1 of this act.

--- END ---