BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the existing
statutory limitations on hotel liability regarding the loss of
valuables and luggage do not provide adequate protections for the
guests, lodgers, and boarders of the hotels. The legislature finds
that the substance of the existing statutes was last revised over eight
decades ago and the caps on liability that are still in place do not
reflect modern society. While the protections established for hotels
may have made sense at that time, the legislature finds that the
standards of gross negligence should be replaced by a standard of
negligence. The legislature further finds that a guest, lodger, and
boarder, or any other person who the hotel has a duty to, should be
able to fully recover for any personal property that is lost due to the
negligence of a hotel. Similar to a common carrier, a hotel should not
be able to contractually limit liability with a guest, lodger, and
boarder regarding lost valuables.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a guest leaves baggage or property in any hotel after the
end of the guest's contracted stay in the hotel or sends any baggage or
property in advance of a stay in a hotel, the hotel may hold the
baggage or property. After six months from the receipt of such baggage
or property, a hotel may sell the baggage or property at public auction
as provided by law for the sale of property to satisfy a hotel keeper's
lien. The hotel may use the proceeds of the sale to reimburse any
reasonable expenses related to the advertisement and sale of the
property, any reasonable storage costs that may have accrued, and any
other amounts owed by the owner of the baggage or property to the
hotel.
(2) When any such baggage or property is received, kept, or stored
by a hotel, the hotel may deliver the baggage or property at any time
to a storage or warehouse company for storage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 19.48.030 (Liability for loss of valuables when safe or
vault furnished -- Limitation) and 1933 c 114 s 1, 1929 c 216 s 2, 1915
c 190 s 3, & 1890 p 95 s 1; and
(2) RCW 19.48.070 (Liability for loss of baggage and other
property -- Limitation -- Storage -- Disposal) and 2011 c 336 s 541, 1929 c
216 s 3, 1917 c 57 s 1, & 1915 c 190 s 4.

--- END ---