BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.40.200 and 1997 c 204 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
All appropriations shall lapse at the end of the fiscal year:
PROVIDED, That the appropriation accounts may remain open for a period
of thirty days, and may, at the auditor's discretion, remain open for
a period not to exceed sixty days thereafter for the payment of claims
incurred against such appropriations prior to the close of the fiscal
year. During the period the accounts remain open, the county
legislative authority may make transfers, revisions, supplemental
appropriations as provided in RCW 36.40.100 and 36.40.195, and
appropriations to meet public emergencies occurring prior to the close
of the fiscal year as provided in RCW 36.40.140.
After such period has expired all appropriations shall become null
and void and any claim presented thereafter against any such
appropriation shall be provided for in the next ensuing budget:
PROVIDED, That this shall not prevent payments upon uncompleted
improvements in progress at the close of the fiscal year.

--- END ---