BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Every person under the age of twenty-one
years of age who purchases or attempts to purchase marijuana is guilty
of a violation of this title. This section does not apply to persons
between the age of eighteen and twenty-one years of age who are
participating in a controlled purchase program conducted by the liquor
control board or other law enforcement agencies.
(2) Every person between the ages of eighteen and twenty,
inclusive, who is convicted of a violation of this section is guilty of
a misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a
minimum fine of two hundred fifty dollars is imposed and any sentence
requiring restitution must require not fewer than twenty-five hours of
community restitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Any person who invites a minor into a public
place where marijuana is sold and treats, gives, or purchases marijuana
for such minor, or permits a minor to treat, give, or purchase
marijuana for an adult, or holds out the minor to be twenty-one years
of age or older to the owner or employee of the marijuana
establishment, a law enforcement officer, or a liquor enforcement
officer, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) It is a misdemeanor for any person under
the age of twenty-one years to:
(a) Enter or remain in any marijuana licensed premises; and
(b) Represent his or her age as being twenty-one or more years for
the purpose of purchasing marijuana, or entering or remaining in a
marijuana licensed premises.
(2) The liquor control board has the power and the duty to classify
marijuana licensed premises as off-limits to persons under the age of
twenty-one.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Any person who transfers in any manner an
identification of age to a minor the purpose of permitting such minor
to obtain marijuana, usable marijuana, or marijuana infused products is
guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except
that a minimum fine of two hundred fifty dollars is imposed and any
sentence requiring community restitution must require not fewer than
twenty-five hours of community restitution: PROVIDED, That
corroborative testimony of a witness other than the minor is a
condition precedent to conviction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) No person may forge, alter, counterfeit,
otherwise prepare or acquire and supply to a person under the age of
twenty-one years a facsimile of any of the officially issued forms of
identification that are acceptable for proof of age.
(2) The following are acceptable forms of identification to verify
a person's age for the purpose of selling or allowing a person access
to a marijuana licensed premises:
(a) Driver's license, instruction permit, or identification card of
any state, province of Canada, from a U.S. territory or the District of
Columbia, or identicard issued by the Washington state department of
licensing under RCW 46.20.117;
(b) United States armed forces identification card issued to active
duty, reserve, and retired personnel and the personnel's dependents
that may include an embedded, digital signature in lieu of a visible
signature;
(c) Passport;
(d) Merchant marine identification card issued by the United States
coast guard; and
(e) Enrollment card issued by the governing authority of a
federally recognized Indian tribe located in Washington, if the
enrollment card incorporates security features comparable to those
implemented by the department of licensing for Washington driver's
licenses.
(3) If the form of identification has an expiration date, a person
may not use the document after the expiration date to verify his or her
age.
(4) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor punishable
as provided by RCW 9A.20.021 except that a minimum fine of two hundred
fifty dollars is imposed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 69.50 RCW.

--- END ---