BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.50.101 and 2013 c 276 s 2 and 2013 c 116 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, definitions of terms
shall be as indicated where used in this chapter:
(a) "Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by
injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the
body of a patient or research subject by:
(1) a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the
practitioner's authorized agent); or
(2) the patient or research subject at the direction and in the
presence of the practitioner.
(b) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at
the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does
not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or
employee of the carrier or warehouseperson.
(c) (("Board")) "Commission" means the ((state board of)) pharmacy
quality assurance commission.
(d) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate
precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or
state laws, or federal or ((board)) commission rules.
(e)(1) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical
structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure
of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:
(i) that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on
the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant,
depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of
a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or
(ii) with respect to a particular individual, that the individual
represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or
hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially
similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule
I or II.
(2) The term does not include:
(i) a controlled substance;
(ii) a substance for which there is an approved new drug
application;
(iii) a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect
for investigational use by a particular person under Section 505 of the
federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, to the extent
conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption; or
(iv) any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption
before an exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.
(f) "Deliver" or "delivery," means the actual or constructive
transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not
there is an agency relationship.
(g) "Department" means the department of health.
(h) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order
for a controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order,
the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging
necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.
(i) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.
(j) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or
dispensing a controlled substance.
(k) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.
(l) "Drug" means (1) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in
the official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the
official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any
supplement to them; (2) controlled substances intended for use in the
diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in
individuals or animals; (3) controlled substances (other than food)
intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of
individuals or animals; and (4) controlled substances intended for use
as a component of any article specified in (1), (2), or (3) of this
subsection. The term does not include devices or their components,
parts, or accessories.
(m) "Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement
administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its
successor agency.
(n) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means
the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug
of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a
prescription or refill authorization verbally transmitted by telephone
nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.
(o) "Immediate precursor" means a substance:
(1) that the ((state board of pharmacy)) commission has found to be
and by rule designates as being the principal compound commonly used,
or produced primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled
substance;
(2) that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be
used in the manufacture of a controlled substance; and
(3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit
the manufacture of the controlled substance.
(p) "Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in subsection (((y)))
(z)(5) of this section, RCW 69.50.204(a) (12) and (34), and
69.50.206(b)(4), the term includes any geometrical isomer; in RCW
69.50.204(a) (8) and (42), and 69.50.210(c) the term includes any
positional isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(a)(35), 69.50.204(c), and
69.50.208(a) the term includes any positional or geometric isomer.
(q) "Lot" means a definite quantity of marijuana, useable
marijuana, or marijuana-infused product identified by a lot number,
every portion or package of which is uniform within recognized
tolerances for the factors that appear in the labeling.
(r) "Lot number" shall identify the licensee by business or trade
name and Washington state unified business identifier number, and the
date of harvest or processing for each lot of marijuana, useable
marijuana, or marijuana-infused product.
(s) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation,
compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance,
either directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of
natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by
a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any
packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of
its container. The term does not include the preparation, compounding,
packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a controlled
substance:
(1) by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's
administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of
the practitioner's professional practice; or
(2) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent
under the practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an
incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(t) "Marijuana" or "marihuana" means all parts of the plant
Cannabis, whether growing or not, with a THC concentration greater than
0.3 percent on a dry weight basis; the seeds thereof; the resin
extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture,
salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or
resin. The term does not include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber
produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant,
any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or
preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted
therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant
which is incapable of germination.
(u) "Marijuana concentrates" means products consisting wholly or in
part of the resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis and
having a THC concentration greater than sixty percent.
(v) "Marijuana processor" means a person licensed by the state
liquor control board to process marijuana into useable marijuana and
marijuana-infused products, package and label useable marijuana and
marijuana-infused products for sale in retail outlets, and sell useable
marijuana and marijuana-infused products at wholesale to marijuana
retailers.
(((v))) (w) "Marijuana producer" means a person licensed by the
state liquor control board to produce and sell marijuana at wholesale
to marijuana processors and other marijuana producers.
(((w))) (x) "Marijuana-infused products" means products that
contain marijuana or marijuana extracts ((and)), are intended for human
use, and have a THC concentration greater than 0.3 percent and no
greater than sixty percent. The term "marijuana-infused products" does
not include either useable marijuana or marijuana concentrates.
(((x))) (y) "Marijuana retailer" means a person licensed by the
state liquor control board to sell useable marijuana and marijuana-infused products in a retail outlet.
(((y))) (z) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether
produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of
vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or
by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:
(1) Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium
derivative, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers,
whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
possible within the specific chemical designation. The term does not
include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.
(2) Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate,
including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers,
esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers, esters,
ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.
(3) Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.
(4) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves
from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their
salts have been removed.
(5) Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.
(6) Cocaine base.
(7) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer
thereof.
(8) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity
of any substance referred to in subparagraphs (1) through (7).
(((z))) (aa) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being
capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or
addiction-sustaining liability. The term includes opium, substances
derived from opium (opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The
term does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled
under RCW 69.50.201, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). The term includes
the racemic and levorotatory forms of dextromethorphan.
(((aa))) (bb) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver
somniferum L., except its seeds.
(((bb))) (cc) "Person" means individual, corporation, business
trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture,
government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or
commercial entity.
(((cc))) (dd) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of
the opium poppy, after mowing.
(((dd))) (ee) "Practitioner" means:
(1) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW; a physician assistant
under chapter 18.71A RCW; an osteopathic physician and surgeon under
chapter 18.57 RCW; an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter
18.57A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.57A.020 subject to any
limitations in RCW 18.57A.040; an optometrist licensed under chapter
18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010
subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010; a dentist under chapter
18.32 RCW; a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW;
a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW; a registered nurse, advanced
registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under
chapter 18.79 RCW; a naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW
who is licensed under RCW 18.36A.030 subject to any limitations in RCW
18.36A.040; a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific
investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise
permitted insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to
distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a
controlled substance in the course of their professional practice or
research in this state.
(2) A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered,
or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with
respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of
professional practice or research in this state.
(3) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a
physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a
dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and
surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed
physician assistant or a licensed osteopathic physician assistant
specifically approved to prescribe controlled substances by his or her
state's medical quality assurance commission or equivalent and his or
her supervising physician, an advanced registered nurse practitioner
licensed to prescribe controlled substances, or a veterinarian licensed
to practice veterinary medicine in any state of the United States.
(((ee))) (ff) "Prescription" means an order for controlled
substances issued by a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in
the state of Washington to prescribe controlled substances within the
scope of his or her professional practice for a legitimate medical
purpose.
(((ff))) (gg) "Production" includes the manufacturing, planting,
cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.
(((gg))) (hh) "Retail outlet" means a location licensed by the
state liquor control board for the retail sale of useable marijuana and
marijuana-infused products.
(((hh))) (ii) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee.
(((ii))) (jj) "State," unless the context otherwise requires, means
a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the
Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession
subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.
(((jj))) (kk) "THC concentration" means percent of delta-9
tetrahydrocannabinol content per dry weight of any part of the plant
Cannabis, or per volume or weight of marijuana product, or the combined
percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid
in any part of the plant Cannabis regardless of moisture content.
(((kk))) (ll) "Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully
possesses a controlled substance for the individual's own use or for
the use of a member of the individual's household or for administering
to an animal owned by the individual or by a member of the individual's
household.
(((ll))) (mm) "Useable marijuana" means dried marijuana flowers.
The term "useable marijuana" does not include either marijuana-infused
products or marijuana concentrates.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.50.325 and 2013 c 3 s 4 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a marijuana producer's license to produce
marijuana for sale at wholesale to marijuana processors and other
marijuana producers, regulated by the state liquor control board and
subject to annual renewal. The production, possession, delivery,
distribution, and sale of marijuana in accordance with the provisions
of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 and the rules adopted to implement and
enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana producer, shall not be a
criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana
producer's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall
specify the location at which the marijuana producer intends to
operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder
thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The
application fee for a marijuana producer's license shall be two hundred
fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana
producer's license shall be one thousand dollars. A separate license
shall be required for each location at which a marijuana producer
intends to produce marijuana.
(2) There shall be a marijuana processor's license to process,
package, and label marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and
marijuana-infused products for sale at wholesale to marijuana
processors and marijuana retailers, regulated by the state liquor
control board and subject to annual renewal. The processing,
packaging, possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana,
useable marijuana, ((and)) marijuana-infused products, and marijuana
concentrates in accordance with the provisions of chapter 3, Laws of
2013 and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly
licensed marijuana processor, shall not be a criminal or civil offense
under Washington state law. Every marijuana processor's license shall
be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location at
which the licensee intends to operate, which must be within the state
of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person
to use the license. The application fee for a marijuana processor's
license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for
issuance and renewal of a marijuana processor's license shall be one
thousand dollars. A separate license shall be required for each
location at which a marijuana processor intends to process marijuana.
(3) There shall be a marijuana retailer's license to sell marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products at
retail in retail outlets, regulated by the state liquor control board
and subject to annual renewal. The possession, delivery, distribution,
and sale of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in accordance with the provisions of chapter 3, Laws
of 2013 and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly
licensed marijuana retailer, shall not be a criminal or civil offense
under Washington state law. Every marijuana retailer's license shall
be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location of
the retail outlet the licensee intends to operate, which must be within
the state of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any
other person to use the license. The application fee for a marijuana
retailer's license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee
for issuance and renewal of a marijuana retailer's license shall be one
thousand dollars. A separate license shall be required for each
location at which a marijuana retailer intends to sell marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products.

Sec. 3 RCW 69.50.354 and 2013 c 3 s 13 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
There may be licensed, in no greater number in each of the counties
of the state than as the state liquor control board shall deem
advisable, retail outlets established for the purpose of making
marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused
products available for sale to adults aged twenty-one and over. Retail
sale of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in accordance with the provisions of chapter 3, Laws
of 2013 and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly
licensed marijuana retailer or retail outlet employee, shall not be a
criminal or civil offense under Washington state law.

Sec. 4 RCW 69.50.357 and 2013 c 3 s 14 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Retail outlets shall sell no products or services other than
marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products,
or paraphernalia intended for the storage or use of marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.
(2) Licensed marijuana retailers shall not employ persons under
twenty-one years of age or allow persons under twenty-one years of age
to enter or remain on the premises of a retail outlet.
(3) Licensed marijuana retailers shall not display any signage in
a window, on a door, or on the outside of the premises of a retail
outlet that is visible to the general public from a public right-of-way, other than a single sign no larger than one thousand six hundred
square inches identifying the retail outlet by the licensee's business
or trade name.
(4) Licensed marijuana retailers shall not display useable
marijuana or marijuana-infused products in a manner that is visible to
the general public from a public right-of-way.
(5) No licensed marijuana retailer or employee of a retail outlet
shall open or consume, or allow to be opened or consumed, any marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product on the
outlet premises.
(6) The state liquor control board shall fine a licensee one
thousand dollars for each violation of any subsection of this section.
Fines collected under this section must be deposited into the dedicated
marijuana fund created under RCW 69.50.530.

Sec. 5 RCW 69.50.360 and 2013 c 3 s 15 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
The following acts, when performed by a validly licensed marijuana
retailer or employee of a validly licensed retail outlet in compliance
with rules adopted by the state liquor control board to implement and
enforce chapter 3, Laws of 2013, shall not constitute criminal or civil
offenses under Washington state law:
(1) Purchase and receipt of marijuana concentrates, useable
marijuana, or marijuana-infused products that have been properly
packaged and labeled from a marijuana processor validly licensed under
chapter 3, Laws of 2013;
(2) Possession of quantities of marijuana concentrates, useable
marijuana, or marijuana-infused products that do not exceed the maximum
amounts established by the state liquor control board under RCW
69.50.345(5); and
(3) Delivery, distribution, and sale, on the premises of the retail
outlet, of any combination of the following amounts of marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product to any
person twenty-one years of age or older:
(a) One ounce of useable marijuana;
(b) Sixteen ounces of marijuana-infused product in solid form;
((or))
(c) Seventy-two ounces of marijuana-infused product in liquid form;
or
(d) Seven grams of marijuana concentrate.

Sec. 6 RCW 42.56.270 and 2013 c 305 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.325, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and
43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), marijuana
producer, processor, or retailer license, liquor license, gambling
license, or lottery retail license;
(b) Internal control documents, independent auditors' reports and
financial statements, and supporting documents: (i) Of house-banked
social card game licensees required by the gambling commission pursuant
to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW; or (ii) submitted by tribes
with an approved tribal/state compact for class III gaming;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
commerce:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce pursuant to RCW
43.330.050(8); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce or the office of the
governor in connection with the siting, recruitment, expansion,
retention, or relocation of that person's business and until a siting
decision is made, identifying information of any person supplying
information under this subsection and the locations being considered
for siting, relocation, or expansion of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of commerce based on
information as described in (a)(i) of this subsection, any work product
is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of commerce from a person connected with siting,
recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's
business, information described in (a)(ii) of this subsection will be
available to the public under this chapter;
(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained
by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter
70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information;
(15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to
the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or
19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does
not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel
licensees;
(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;
(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless
permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or
operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit;
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to
RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;
(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and
services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under
RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
providers of this information;
(19) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328
that can be identified to a particular business;
(20) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained
by the University of Washington, other than information the university
is required to disclose under RCW 28B.20.150, when the information
relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such
information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in
loss to the University of Washington consolidated endowment fund or to
result in private loss to the providers of this information;
(21) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by innovate Washington in
applications for, or delivery of, grants and loans under chapter 43.333
RCW, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably
be expected to result in private loss to the providers of this
information; and
(22) Market share data submitted by a manufacturer under RCW
70.95N.190(4).

Sec. 7 RCW 69.50.535 and 2013 c 3 s 27 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected a marijuana excise tax equal to
twenty-five percent of the selling price on each wholesale sale in this
state of marijuana by a licensed marijuana producer to a licensed
marijuana processor or another licensed marijuana producer. This tax
is the obligation of the licensed marijuana producer.
(2) There is levied and collected a marijuana excise tax equal to
twenty-five percent of the selling price on each wholesale sale in this
state of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana ((or)), and
marijuana-infused products by a licensed marijuana processor to a
licensed marijuana retailer. This tax is the obligation of the
licensed marijuana processor.
(3) There is levied and collected a marijuana excise tax equal to
twenty-five percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this
state of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products. This tax is the obligation of the licensed marijuana
retailer, is separate and in addition to general state and local sales
and use taxes that apply to retail sales of tangible personal property,
and is part of the total retail price to which general state and local
sales and use taxes apply.
(4) All revenues collected from the marijuana excise taxes imposed
under subsections (1) through (3) of this section shall be deposited
each day in a depository approved by the state treasurer and
transferred to the state treasurer to be credited to the dedicated
marijuana fund.
(5) The state liquor control board shall regularly review the tax
levels established under this section and make recommendations to the
legislature as appropriate regarding adjustments that would further the
goal of discouraging use while undercutting illegal market prices.

--- END ---