BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes the
increasing diversity of Washington state agriculture, the growing
number of smaller farms, and the important contributions that all farms
make to the state's economy and the state's ability to produce food,
fiber, and forest crops locally.
(2) The legislature intends, through the study and report required
in section 2 of this act, to evaluate:
(a) The ongoing viability of small farms and the impact the open
space program has on small farms;
(b) The potential modification to the existing gross income
thresholds for small farms;
(c) The fiscal impact and other consequences of potentially
extending current use valuation to home sites for smaller farms; and
(d) Allowing noncontiguous parcels to qualify under the current use
farm and agricultural program that are part of a single farming
operation.
(3) It is the legislature's further intent to adopt legislation
during the 2015 session substantially conforming to the recommendations
embodied in the report required under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of revenue, in
consultation with the stakeholder group described in subsection (3) of
this section, must conduct a study and prepare a report to the
legislature, by December 31, 2014, as provided in this section. The
primary objectives of the study are to evaluate and make
recommendations on improving the current use program for farm and
agricultural lands, with an emphasis on the viability of small farms.
The department's report must specifically include recommendations to
update program eligibility requirements, recommendations to modify the
program based on current farming practices, and recommendations to
allow small farm home sites to qualify for current use valuation. The
department must develop its recommendations consistent with the
following goals:
(a) To promote current use assessment practices in accord with the
legislature's intent in RCW 84.34.010, which is to maintain, preserve,
conserve, and otherwise continue in existence adequate open space lands
for the production of food, fiber, and forest crops;
(b) To ensure the current use farm and agricultural program for
small farm operations benefits these bona fide small farm operations
without subsidizing unintended parties;
(c) To ensure the current use farm and agricultural program is
consistent with current farming practices;
(d) To ensure that the current income thresholds for the current
use farm and agricultural program are consistent with the current farm
sector income and finances.
(2) The report must include proposed draft legislation to
accomplish the department's recommendation. The report may also
include an evaluation of the economic impact of farming and
agricultural production on the state's overall economy, with particular
focus on small scale agricultural production using a food and
agriculture hub approach.
(3) In preparing the report, the department must consult with an
agricultural current use stakeholder group, which may include the state
conservation commission, the office of farmland preservation,
representatives of statewide farm associations, the Washington State
University cooperative extension program, small and large farm
advocates, county officials including county assessors and county
commissioners, other academic institutions, and the agriculture and
fiscal committees of the legislature.
(4) Nonpartisan legislative staff on the appropriate fiscal
committees must provide assistance in researching and compiling data
used in the preparation of the report.

--- END ---