BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70C RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that land use decisions concerning
preliminary short plats of short subdivisions or boundary line
adjustments can adversely affect adjacent landowners' and residents'
property interests, neighborhood designs, and environmental values. To
protect these interests and values, the legislature recognizes that
neighbors and community organizations may need to file timely
challenges to land use decisions, and to do so, they must receive
timely and appropriate notice of the land use decisions.
The legislature finds also that due process requires notice to be
given to adjacent landowners and residents of land use decisions
related to the preliminary short plat approval of a short subdivision
or the approval of a boundary line adjustment. Notice is necessary to
ensure that adjacent landowners and residents have the opportunity to
file challenges or assert their property interests. The legislature
intends that the statute of limitations set forth in this chapter for
challenging land use decisions does not begin to run until notice of a
land use decision is provided to adjacent landowners and residents in
accordance with sections 4 and 5 of this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70C.040 and 1995 c 347 s 705 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Proceedings for review under this chapter shall be commenced by
filing a land use petition in superior court.
(2) A land use petition is barred, and the court may not grant
review, unless the petition is timely filed with the court and timely
served on the following persons who shall be parties to the review of
the land use petition:
(a) The local jurisdiction, which for purposes of the petition
shall be the jurisdiction's corporate entity and not an individual
decision maker or department;
(b) Each of the following persons if the person is not the
petitioner:
(i) Each person identified by name and address in the local
jurisdiction's written decision as an applicant for the permit or
approval at issue; and
(ii) Each person identified by name and address in the local
jurisdiction's written decision as an owner of the property at issue;
(c) If no person is identified in a written decision as provided in
(b) of this subsection, each person identified by name and address as
a taxpayer for the property at issue in the records of the county
assessor, based upon the description of the property in the
application; and
(d) Each person named in the written decision who filed an appeal
to a local jurisdiction quasi-judicial decision maker regarding the
land use decision at issue, unless the person has abandoned the appeal
or the person's claims were dismissed before the quasi-judicial
decision was rendered. Persons who later intervened or joined in the
appeal are not required to be made parties under this subsection.
(3) The petition is timely if it is filed and served on all parties
listed in subsection (2) of this section within twenty-one days of the
issuance of the land use decision.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the date on which a land use
decision is issued is:
(a) Three days after a written decision is mailed by the local
jurisdiction or, if not mailed, the date on which the local
jurisdiction provides notice that a written decision is publicly
available;
(b) If the land use decision is made by ordinance or resolution by
a legislative body sitting in a quasi-judicial capacity, the date the
body passes the ordinance or resolution; ((or))
(c) If the land use decision relates to the preliminary short plat
approval of a short subdivision or the approval of a boundary line
adjustment in a city with a population of five hundred thousand or
more, the date that notice of the decision is effective pursuant to
section 4 or 5 of this act; or
(d) If ((neither (a) nor (b) of this subsection applies)) (a), (b),
and (c) of this subsection do not apply, the date the decision is
entered into the public record.
(5) Service on the local jurisdiction must be by delivery of a copy
of the petition to the persons identified by or pursuant to RCW
4.28.080 to receive service of process. Service on other parties must
be in accordance with the superior court civil rules or by first-class
mail to:
(a) The address stated in the written decision of the local
jurisdiction for each person made a party under subsection (2)(b) of
this section;
(b) The address stated in the records of the county assessor for
each person made a party under subsection (2)(c) of this section; and
(c) The address stated in the appeal to the quasi-judicial decision
maker for each person made a party under subsection (2)(d) of this
section.
(6) Service by mail is effective on the date of mailing and proof
of service shall be by affidavit or declaration under penalty of
perjury.

Sec. 3 RCW 58.17.040 and 2004 c 239 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:
(1) Cemeteries and other burial plots while used for that purpose;
(2) Divisions of land into lots or tracts each of which is one-one
hundred twenty-eighth of a section of land or larger, or five acres or
larger if the land is not capable of description as a fraction of a
section of land, unless the governing authority of the city, town, or
county in which the land is situated shall have adopted a subdivision
ordinance requiring plat approval of such divisions: PROVIDED, That
for purposes of computing the size of any lot under this item which
borders on a street or road, the lot size shall be expanded to include
that area which would be bounded by the center line of the road or
street and the side lot lines of the lot running perpendicular to such
center line;
(3) Divisions made by testamentary provisions, or the laws of
descent;
(4) Divisions of land into lots or tracts classified for industrial
or commercial use when the city, town, or county has approved a binding
site plan for the use of the land in accordance with local regulations;
(5) A division for the purpose of lease when no residential
structure other than mobile homes or travel trailers are permitted to
be placed upon the land when the city, town, or county has approved a
binding site plan for the use of the land in accordance with local
regulations;
(6) ((A division made for the purpose of alteration by adjusting
boundary lines, between platted or unplatted lots or both, which does
not create any additional lot, tract, parcel, site, or division nor
create any lot, tract, parcel, site, or division which contains
insufficient area and dimension to meet minimum requirements for width
and area for a building site;
(7))) Divisions of land into lots or tracts if: (a) Such division
is the result of subjecting a portion of a parcel or tract of land to
either chapter 64.32 or 64.34 RCW subsequent to the recording of a
binding site plan for all such land; (b) the improvements constructed
or to be constructed thereon are required by the provisions of the
binding site plan to be included in one or more condominiums or owned
by an association or other legal entity in which the owners of units
therein or their owners' associations have a membership or other legal
or beneficial interest; (c) a city, town, or county has approved the
binding site plan for all such land; (d) such approved binding site
plan is recorded in the county or counties in which such land is
located; and (e) the binding site plan contains thereon the following
statement: "All development and use of the land described herein shall
be in accordance with this binding site plan, as it may be amended with
the approval of the city, town, or county having jurisdiction over the
development of such land, and in accordance with such other
governmental permits, approvals, regulations, requirements, and
restrictions that may be imposed upon such land and the development and
use thereof. Upon completion, the improvements on the land shall be
included in one or more condominiums or owned by an association or
other legal entity in which the owners of units therein or their
owners' associations have a membership or other legal or beneficial
interest. This binding site plan shall be binding upon all now or
hereafter having any interest in the land described herein." The
binding site plan may, but need not, depict or describe the boundaries
of the lots or tracts resulting from subjecting a portion of the land
to either chapter 64.32 or 64.34 RCW. A site plan shall be deemed to
have been approved if the site plan was approved by a city, town, or
county: (i) In connection with the final approval of a subdivision
plat or planned unit development with respect to all of such land; or
(ii) in connection with the issuance of building permits or final
certificates of occupancy with respect to all of such land; or (iii) if
not approved pursuant to (i) and (ii) of this subsection (((7)))
(6)(e), then pursuant to such other procedures as such city, town, or
county may have established for the approval of a binding site plan;
(((8))) (7) A division for the purpose of leasing land for
facilities providing personal wireless services while used for that
purpose. "Personal wireless services" means any federally licensed
personal wireless service. "Facilities" means unstaffed facilities
that are used for the transmission or reception, or both, of wireless
communication services including, but not necessarily limited to,
antenna arrays, transmission cables, equipment shelters, and support
structures; and
(((9))) (8) A division of land into lots or tracts of less than
three acres that is recorded in accordance with chapter 58.09 RCW and
is used or to be used for the purpose of establishing a site for
construction and operation of consumer-owned or investor-owned electric
utility facilities. For purposes of this subsection, "electric utility
facilities" means unstaffed facilities, except for the presence of
security personnel, that are used for or in connection with or to
facilitate the transmission, distribution, sale, or furnishing of
electricity including, but not limited to, electric power substations.
This subsection does not exempt a division of land from the zoning and
permitting laws and regulations of cities, towns, counties, and
municipal corporations. Furthermore, this subsection only applies to
electric utility facilities that will be placed into service to meet
the electrical needs of a utility's existing and new customers. New
customers are defined as electric service locations not already in
existence as of the date that electric utility facilities subject to
the provisions of this subsection are planned and constructed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 58.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided otherwise by this section, this chapter does
not apply to a division made for the purpose of alteration by adjusting
boundary lines, between platted or unplatted lots or both, that does
not create any additional lot, tract, parcel, site, or division nor
create any lot, tract, parcel, site, or division that contains
insufficient area and dimension to meet minimum requirements for width
and area for a building site.
(2) Upon receipt of a complete application for approval of a
boundary line adjustment in a city with a population of five hundred
thousand or more, the officer charged with administration of
regulations pertaining to boundary line adjustments must provide notice
of the application to all adjacent landowners and residents and an
opportunity to submit comments.
(3) If a boundary line adjustment in a city with a population of
five hundred thousand or more is approved, the officer charged with
administration of regulations pertaining to boundary line adjustments
must provide notice of the decision to all adjacent landowners and
residents.
(4) The legislative body of a city with a population of five
hundred thousand or more must adopt regulations and procedures for
providing notice in accordance with this section.
(a) At a minimum, the required notice must be:
(i) Mailed to each adjacent landowner and resident at the mailing
address on record with the city or county, or if no mailing address is
on record, the physical address of the adjacent property; and
(ii) Posted on the property subject to the proposed boundary line
adjustment in a manner reasonably calculated to provide notice to all
adjacent landowners and residents.
(b) Notice is effective three days after being mailed to all
adjacent landowners and residents, or on the date notice is posted on
the property subject to the proposed boundary line adjustment,
whichever is later.
(5) For purposes of this section, "adjacent landowners and
residents" means owners, as shown by the records of the county
assessor, residents, and persons who are both owners and residents of
real property located within three hundred feet of any portion of the
boundary of the property subject to the proposed boundary line
adjustment. If the owner of the real property proposed to be adjusted
owns another parcel or parcels of real property, that lie adjacent to
the real property proposed to be adjusted, notice under this section
must be given to the owners and residents of real property located
within three hundred feet of any portion of the boundaries of such
adjacently located parcels owned by the owner of the real property
subject to the proposed boundary line adjustment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 58.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of a complete application for preliminary short
plat approval of a short subdivision in a city with a population of
five hundred thousand or more, the officer charged with administration
of regulations pertaining to short plats and short subdivisions must
provide notice of the application to all adjacent landowners and
residents and an opportunity to submit comments.
(2) If a preliminary short plat of a short subdivision in a city
with a population of five hundred thousand or more is approved, the
officer charged with administration of regulations pertaining to short
plats and short subdivisions must provide notice of the decision to all
adjacent landowners and residents.
(3) The legislative body of a city with a population of five
hundred thousand or more must adopt regulations and procedures for
providing notice in accordance with this section.
(a) At a minimum, the required notice must be:
(i) Mailed to each adjacent landowner and resident at the mailing
address on record with the city or county, or if no mailing address is
on record, the physical address of the adjacent property; and
(ii) Posted on the property proposed to be subdivided in a manner
reasonably calculated to provide notice to all adjacent landowners and
residents.
(b) Notice is effective three days after being mailed to all
adjacent landowners and residents, or on the date notice is posted on
the property proposed to be subdivided, whichever is later.
(4) For purposes of this section, "adjacent landowners and
residents" means owners, as shown by the records of the county
assessor, residents, and persons who are both owners and residents of
real property located within three hundred feet of any portion of the
boundary of the proposed short subdivision. If the owner of the real
property proposed to be subdivided owns another parcel or parcels of
real property, that lie adjacent to the real property proposed to be
subdivided, notice under this section must be given to the owners and
residents of real property located within three hundred feet of any
portion of the boundaries of such adjacently located parcels owned by
the owner of the real property proposed to be subdivided.

--- END ---