BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that every
individual in the state has a fundamental right to a healthful
environment, and a right to the pursuit of commonplace activities such
as breathing, drinking, eating, working, and recreating without risking
their health as a result of environmental degradation. There are
vulnerable communities throughout the state that bear a
disproportionate burden of pollution problems. Residents of these
communities face higher rates of cancer and other life-threatening
public health problems. All residents of the state, regardless of
race, color, culture, national origin, or income level, have a right to
participate meaningfully and receive fair treatment during the
implementation and enforcement of environmental laws, rules, and
policies. The improvement of environmental law and policy decision-making processes helps state agencies meet their responsibility to
comply with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 2000(d). These important objectives and
responsibilities are satisfied by the passage of this act.
(2) Pursuant to the policy declared in this section, and consistent
with federal executive order 12898, state agencies shall, to the extent
practical, make achieving environmental justice part of their mission
by identifying and addressing, as appropriate, the disproportionately
high and adverse human health or environmental effects of their
programs, policies, and activities on minority populations and low-income populations in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70.94.030.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Highly impacted community" means a community that the
department of health has determined is likely to bear a
disproportionate burden of public health risks from environmental
pollution.
(4) "Person" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 90.48.020.
(5) "Supplemental environmental project" means an environmentally
beneficial project that a person agrees to undertake in settlement of
an enforcement action, but which the person is not otherwise obligated
to perform.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Within available funds and consistent
with section 13 of this act, the department of health must identify and
maintain a list of highly impacted communities in this state.
(2) In identifying highly impacted communities, the department of
health shall consider, at minimum, including areas that have any of the
following characteristics:
(a) Unemployment rates more than twenty percent above the state
average;
(b) Median household income that is less than seventy-five percent
of the state median household income;
(c) Disproportionate public health challenges, as demonstrated by
environmental, scientific, or public health data; or
(d) A significant percentage of community residents who are
minorities, foreign born, or who lack proficiency in the English
language.
(3) In identifying whether a community is a highly impacted
community under this section, the department of health may rely on
existing environmental, economic, scientific, or public health data.
(4)(a) All data, documents, and other records used in the
identification of highly impacted communities are subject to release
pursuant to the procedures established under RCW 42.56.070.
(b) The department of health must identify the sources of
information that it reviewed and relied upon in identifying highly
impacted communities as required by RCW 34.05.272.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) This section and section 5 of this act
apply to the settlement of an enforcement action based upon a violation
of a permit issued under chapter 70.94, 70.105, or 90.48 RCW or a
violation of an order under RCW 70.105D.050. In conjunction with the
settlement of an enforcement action, the department, authority, or
attorney general may offer and enter into an agreement with a person
whose activity negatively affects public health in a highly impacted
community to contribute in-kind services or otherwise fund a
supplemental environmental project under the following circumstances:
(a) A supplemental environmental project may include projects to
protect human health, prevent pollution, reduce pollution, protect or
restore natural or man-made environments, assessments or audits of
environmental quality or pollution prevention, efforts to promote
environmental compliance, or emergency preparedness efforts.
(b) A supplemental environmental project authorized by the
department must:
(i)(A) Take place within the same highly impacted community in
which the violation occurred; or
(B) Primarily benefit the highly impacted community in which the
violation occurred;
(ii)(A) Be designed to reduce the likelihood that similar
violations will occur in the future;
(B) Reduce the adverse impact to public health or the environment
to which the violation at issue contributes within the highly impacted
community; or
(C) Reduce the overall risk to public health or the environment
potentially affected by the violation at issue;
(iii) Be of a scope and type defined in the signed settlement
agreement between the department and the person in violation of a
permit issued under chapter 70.94, 70.105, or 90.48 RCW or an order
under RCW 70.105D.050; and
(iv) Include deadlines and quantifiable performance metrics for the
achievement of intermediate deliverables or objectives towards the
completion of the supplemental environmental project.
(2) If the department, attorney general, or authority enters an
agreement for a person to perform or fund a supplemental environmental
project in conjunction with the settlement of an enforcement action
related to the violation of a permit issued under chapter 70.94,
70.105, or 90.48 RCW, the department, attorney general, or authority
shall also recover a monetary penalty in accordance with RCW 70.94.430,
70.94.431, 70.105.080, 70.105.085, or 70.105.090 or chapter 90.48 RCW.
(3) In determining the monetary amount to be recovered in the
settlement, in addition to the current factors considered in
determining the amounts of a penalty under RCW 70.94.430, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.105.085, or 70.105.090 or chapter 90.48 RCW, the
department, attorney general, or authority shall consider:
(a) The cost to the person of the supplemental environmental
project; and
(b) The environmental or public health benefits anticipated to
accrue from the supplemental environmental project.
(4) Nothing in this section affects the authority of the
department, attorney general, or authority to enter into a supplemental
environmental project agreement in the settlement of enforcement
actions under existing statutory authorities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 To the maximum extent practicable, the
department, attorney general, or authority shall seek the input of the
highly impacted community in the development of a proposed supplemental
environmental project pursuant to section 4 of this act. After the
department, attorney general, or authority has decided to consider the
inclusion of a supplemental environmental project in conjunction with
the settlement of an enforcement action, the department, attorney
general, or authority shall, to the maximum extent practicable, seek to
provide information to the highly impacted community regarding:
(1) The proposed supplemental environmental project; and
(2) The process the department, attorney general, or authority
plans to follow in making a final determination regarding the details
of the supplemental environmental project.

Sec. 6 RCW 34.05.272 and 2013 c 69 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies only to the water quality and shorelands
and environmental assistance programs within the department of ecology,
except as provided in subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(2) Before taking a significant agency action, the department of
ecology or the department of health as provided in subsection (3)(b) of
this section must identify the sources of information reviewed and
relied upon by the agency in the course of preparing to take
significant agency action. Peer-reviewed literature, if applicable,
must be identified, as well as any scientific literature or other
sources of information used. The department of ecology shall make
available on the agency's web site the index of records required under
RCW 42.56.070(6) that are relied upon, or invoked, in support of a
proposal for significant agency action.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "significant agency action"
means an act of the department of ecology that:
(a) Results in the development of a significant legislative rule as
defined in RCW 34.05.328; ((or))
(b) Results in the identification of a highly impacted community by
the department of health pursuant to section 3 of this act; or
(c) Results in the development of technical guidance, technical
assessments, or technical documents that are used to directly support
implementation of a state rule or state statute.
(4) This section is not intended to affect agency action regarding
individual permitting, compliance and enforcement decisions, or
guidance provided by an agency to a local government on a case-by-case
basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1)(a) Nothing in this chapter provides a
cause of action for a party to challenge a decision by the department
to enter into an agreement that results in the performance of a
supplemental environmental project.
(b) Nothing in this chapter provides a cause of action for a party
to challenge a decision by the department not to enter into an
agreement that results in the performance of a supplemental
environmental project.
(c) Nothing in this chapter provides a cause of action for a party
to challenge the contents of a supplemental environmental project
agreement.
(2) Under no circumstances may the department compel a party to
fund a supplemental environmental project, unless the party has
voluntarily agreed to do so in the settlement of an enforcement action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Nothing in sections 1 through 5 of this act
creates a new cause of action, or eliminates or restricts any cause of
action, with respect to the liability of a party to a claimant,
including but not limited to the liability of a party associated with
hazardous wastes or substances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The department may adopt rules as necessary
to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The department of ecology must report to
appropriate committees of the legislature on the processes that it and
the department of health currently use to engage potentially affected
communities under existing environmental and public health laws
including, but not limited to, chapters 36.70A, 43.21C, 70.94, 70.95,
70.105, 70.105D, 90.48, and 90.58 RCW. This report must include an
analysis of existing requirements to solicit public input or otherwise
engage communities during permitting and other decision-making
processes. This report must also include an analysis of the extent to
which environmental laws already require mitigation projects that
benefit affected communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 5, 9, and 13 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 5, 9, and 13 of this act
take effect January 1, 2016, unless the department of ecology does not
submit a report to the legislature pursuant to section 10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The responsibility of the department and
the department of health to fulfill the requirements of this chapter is
contingent upon specific funding for the purposes of this act,
referencing this act by bill or chapter number. If such funding is not
provided by July 1, 2020, in the omnibus appropriations act, the
department must bring request legislation to repeal this act.

--- END ---