BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that
implementation of the common core state standards, increased emphasis
on closing the educational opportunity gap, expectations for
improvement on multiple measures of student learning and achievement,
and implementation of new teacher and principal evaluation systems are
only a few of the significant changes made in recent years to the
public school system. The legislature further acknowledges that in
order to address these changes, school staff need to spend time working
together to gain knowledge and skills, develop strategies, and evaluate
results. This professional development time is critical, but should
not come at the expense of providing instruction to students.
Therefore, the legislature intends to provide funding to support
professional development outside the regular school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature must appropriate sufficient funds to provide,
beginning in the 2014-15 school year, at least two professional
development days per year for all state-funded certificated
instructional staff, state-funded certificated building-level
administrators, and state-funded classified teaching or instructional
assistants.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "state-funded" means funds
and staffing units allocated under RCW 28A.150.260, including funds
allocated for the learning assistance program, the transitional
bilingual instruction program, special education, and the highly
capable program. The method of calculation for providing the funds
under this section shall be specified in the omnibus appropriations
act.
(3) School districts must provide the two professional development
days under this section outside the minimum one hundred eighty-day
school calendar. School districts may organize the time as portions of
days rather than two single full days as long as the total time equates
to two days.
(4) The legislature may direct a required focus or content for the
professional development funded under this section in the omnibus
appropriations act. If the legislature does not so direct, the focus
and content of the professional development shall be as directed by the
school district board of directors.
(5) The funding provided under this section shall not be considered
part of the program of basic education under RCW 28A.150.200.

--- END ---