BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that new scientific
evidence and economic realities cast doubt on the wisdom of imposing
mandatory decades long sentences on offenders, leaving no hope for
release or incentive to reform. Studies show that long incarcerations,
with no opportunity for review, prevent offenders from maintaining the
ties to society which they need to successfully reenter society and
build lives free from criminal behavior. Additionally, many offenders
are incarcerated long past the time they pose a risk to public safety.
Senior citizens are extraordinarily expensive inmates and many pose
little risk of recidivism. Given the capacity and budget crises in the
department of corrections, providing an opportunity for such offenders
to be released makes economic sense. Inflexible sentences cost
Washingtonians huge sums of money, without providing a commensurate
increase in public safety. The legislature finds that providing an
opportunity for review and release of offenders who no longer pose a
risk of criminality benefits society, the reformed offenders, public
safety and the public treasury.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.728 and 2010 c 224 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and
committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of
the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the
sentence except as follows:
(1) An offender may earn early release time as authorized by RCW
9.94A.729;
(2) An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an
authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may
leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections
officer or officers;
(3)(a) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical
placement for an offender when all of the following conditions exist:
(i) The offender has a medical condition that is serious and is
expected to require costly care or treatment;
(ii) The offender poses a low risk to the community because he or
she is currently physically incapacitated due to age or the medical
condition or is expected to be so at the time of release; and
(iii) It is expected that granting the extraordinary medical
placement will result in a cost savings to the state.
(b) An offender sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without
the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an
extraordinary medical placement.
(c) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all
offenders in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic
monitoring equipment interferes with the function of the offender's
medical equipment or results in the loss of funding for the offender's
medical care, in which case, an alternative type of monitoring shall be
utilized. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the monitoring
services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be performed.
(d) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement
under this subsection at any time.
(e) Persistent offenders are not eligible for extraordinary medical
placement;
(4) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons
board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health
problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or
other extraordinary circumstances;
(5) No more than the final six months of the offender's term of
confinement may be served in partial confinement designed to aid the
offender in finding work and reestablishing himself or herself in the
community or no more than the final twelve months of the offender's
term of confinement may be served in partial confinement as part of the
parenting program in RCW 9.94A.6551. This is in addition to that
period of earned early release time that may be exchanged for partial
confinement pursuant to RCW 9.94A.729(5)(d);
(6) The governor may pardon any offender;
(7) The department may release an offender from confinement any
time within ten days before a release date calculated under this
section;
(8) An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to
completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as
provided in RCW 9.94A.870; ((and))
(9) An offender may leave a correctional facility subject to the
authorization of the indeterminate sentence review board, as described
in section 3 of this act; and
(10) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an
offender sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as
subject to a mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not
be released from total confinement before the completion of the listed
mandatory minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless
allowed under RCW 9.94A.540.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any person
who was sentenced under this chapter may petition the indeterminate
sentence review board for early release after serving fifteen years,
provided the current sentence was not imposed under RCW 9.94A.507.
(2) Before the hearing described in subsection (3) of this section,
the department shall conduct, and the offender shall participate in, an
examination of the offender, incorporating methodologies that are
recognized by experts in the prediction of criminal dangerousness, and
including a prediction of the probability that the offender will engage
in violent offenses if released.
(3) The board shall conduct a hearing to determine whether it is
more likely than not that the person will commit a new violent offense,
as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, if released on conditions set by the
board. The board shall order the person released, under such
affirmative and other conditions as the board determines appropriate,
unless the board determines that, despite such conditions, it is more
likely than not that the person will commit a new violent offense if
released. Public safety considerations shall be given the highest
priority in determinations made under this section. The board may also
consider the person's efforts towards rehabilitation, the person's
completion of a basic education program and skills for employment, and
the availability of community or family support for the person upon
release.
(4) If the board does not order the offender released, the board
shall establish a new minimum term not to exceed an additional five
years. The board shall review the person again not less than ninety
days prior to the expiration of the new minimum term.
(5) At such hearing the convicted person shall be present and
entitled to be heard and may present evidence and witnesses in his or
her behalf. If the board determines that an offender is not able to
adequately represent himself or herself, the board shall cause the
appointment of an attorney to represent the offender to be paid for at
state expense.
(6) In a hearing conducted under subsection (3) of this section,
the board shall provide opportunities for the victims of any crimes for
which the offender has been convicted to present statements, as set
forth in RCW 7.69.032. The procedures for victim input shall be
developed by rule. To facilitate victim involvement, county
prosecutor's offices shall ensure that any victim impact statements and
known contact information for victims of record are forwarded as part
of the judgment and sentence.
(7) A person released by the board under this section is subject to
community custody for a term determined by the board, not to exceed
five years from the date of release.
(8) A decision of the board under this section shall be final and
not subject to appeal or review, except that this section shall not
limit or circumscribe the powers of the governor to commute the
sentence of, or grant a pardon to, any convicted person.
(9) The board shall adopt rules governing the procedures described
in this section, including criteria for release, timelines for issuance
of decisions, and prioritization of petitions.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.533 and 2013 c 270 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section apply to the standard sentence
ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517.
(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the
standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid
sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the
seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by
seventy-five percent.
(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes
listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements
based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm
enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is
subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is
being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to
commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to
the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class
C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both,
and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements
under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has
previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July
23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection
(4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm
enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the
enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except section 3 of
this act, all firearm enhancements under this section are mandatory,
shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to
all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly
weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter.
However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an
offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be granted an
extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(3);
(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all
felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed
felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to
the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which
underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of
the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon
enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section
based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c)
of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender
has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after
July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or
subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly
weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of
the enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except section 3 of
this act, all deadly weapon enhancements under this section are
mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run
consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other
firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under
this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has
expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be
granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW
9.94A.728(3);
(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to
all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense
while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender
is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If
the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in
this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility,
and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under
chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this
subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(a) or (b) or 69.50.410;
(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(c), (d), or (e);
(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.4013.
For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a
state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part
of that facility or county jail.
(6) An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter
69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or
9.94A.827. All enhancements under this subsection shall run
consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, for all offenses
sentenced under this chapter.
(7) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence
range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each
prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055. All enhancements under
this subsection shall be mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions.
(8)(a) The following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range for felony crimes committed on or after July 1,
2006, if the offense was committed with sexual motivation, as that term
is defined in RCW 9.94A.030. If the offender is being sentenced for
more than one offense, the sexual motivation enhancement must be added
to the total period of total confinement for all offenses, regardless
of which underlying offense is subject to a sexual motivation
enhancement. If the offender committed the offense with sexual
motivation and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory
offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the following additional times shall
be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2)
of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified
under RCW 9A.28.020:
(i) Two years for any felony defined under the law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both;
(ii) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a
class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or
both;
(iii) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both;
(iv) If the offender is being sentenced for any sexual motivation
enhancements under (a)(i), (ii), and/or (iii) of this subsection and
the offender has previously been sentenced for any sexual motivation
enhancements on or after July 1, 2006, under (a)(i), (ii), and/or (iii)
of this subsection, all sexual motivation enhancements under this
subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except section 3 of
this act, all sexual motivation enhancements under this subsection are
mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run
consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other
sexual motivation enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this
chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired,
an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be granted an
extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(3);
(c) The sexual motivation enhancements in this subsection apply to
all felony crimes;
(d) If the standard sentence range under this subsection exceeds
the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a sexual motivation
enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the
statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence
representing the enhancement may not be reduced;
(e) The portion of the total confinement sentence which the
offender must serve under this subsection shall be calculated before
any earned early release time is credited to the offender;
(f) Nothing in this subsection prevents a sentencing court from
imposing a sentence outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW
9.94A.535.
(9) An additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the
standard sentence range for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073,
9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089 committed on
or after July 22, 2007, if the offender engaged, agreed, or offered to
engage the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the one-year
enhancement must be added to the total period of total confinement for
all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to the
enhancement. If the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory
offense for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079,
9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089, and the offender attempted,
solicited another, or conspired to engage, agree, or offer to engage
the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee, an additional
one-year enhancement shall be added to the standard sentence range
determined under subsection (2) of this section. For purposes of this
subsection, "sexual conduct" means sexual intercourse or sexual
contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.
(10)(a) For a person age eighteen or older convicted of any
criminal street gang-related felony offense for which the person
compensated, threatened, or solicited a minor in order to involve the
minor in the commission of the felony offense, the standard sentence
range is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range
defined by the appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of
the completed crime, and multiplying the range by one hundred twenty-five percent. If the standard sentence range under this subsection
exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory
maximum sentence is the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender.
(b) This subsection does not apply to any criminal street gang-related felony offense for which involving a minor in the commission of
the felony offense is an element of the offense.
(c) The increased penalty specified in (a) of this subsection is
unavailable in the event that the prosecution gives notice that it will
seek an exceptional sentence based on an aggravating factor under RCW
9.94A.535.
(11) An additional twelve months and one day shall be added to the
standard sentence range for a conviction of attempting to elude a
police vehicle as defined by RCW 46.61.024, if the conviction included
a finding by special allegation of endangering one or more persons
under RCW 9.94A.834.
(12) An additional twelve months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of RCW
9.94A.831.
(13) An additional twelve months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for vehicular homicide committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.520 or for vehicular assault committed while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.522, or for
any felony driving under the influence (RCW 46.61.502(6)) or felony
physical control under the influence (RCW 46.61.504(6)) for each child
passenger under the age of sixteen who is an occupant in the
defendant's vehicle. These enhancements shall be mandatory, shall be
served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other
sentencing provisions. If the addition of a minor child enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(14) An additional twelve months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of RCW
9.94A.832.
(15) An offender who receives a sentence enhancement under this
section is eligible for early release as described in section 3 of this
act after serving fifteen years, regardless of the length or number of
sentence enhancements.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.570 and 2000 c 28 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding the statutory maximum sentence or any other
provision of this chapter, except section 3 of this act, a persistent
offender shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement for life
((without the possibility of release)) or, when authorized by RCW
10.95.030 for the crime of aggravated murder in the first degree,
sentenced to death. In addition, no offender subject to this section
may be eligible for community custody, earned release time, furlough,
home detention, partial confinement, work crew, work release, ((or any
other form of release as defined under RCW 9.94A.728 (1), (2), (3),
(4), (6), (8), or (9))) extraordinary medical placement, or any other
form of authorized leave from a correctional facility while not in the
direct custody of a corrections officer or officers, except: (1) In
the case of an offender in need of emergency medical treatment; (2) as
authorized by section 3 of this act; or (((2))) (3) for the purpose of
commitment to an inpatient treatment facility in the case of an
offender convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 9.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the board or a community corrections officer of this
state has reason to believe an offender released under section 3 of
this act has violated a condition of community custody or the laws of
this state, any community corrections officer may arrest or cause the
arrest and detention of the offender pending a determination by the
board whether sanctions should be imposed. The community corrections
officer shall report all facts and circumstances surrounding the
alleged violation to the board, with recommendations.
(2) If the board or the department causes the arrest or detention
of an offender for a violation that does not amount to a new crime and
the offender is arrested or detained by local law enforcement or in a
local jail, the board or department, whichever caused the arrest or
detention, shall be financially responsible for local costs. Jail bed
costs shall be allocated at the rate established under RCW 9.94A.740.
(3) If an offender released by the board under RCW 9.95.420 is
accused of violating any condition or requirement of community custody,
he or she is entitled to a hearing before the board or a designee of
the board prior to the imposition of sanctions. The hearing shall be
considered as offender disciplinary proceedings and shall not be
subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall develop hearing
procedures and a structure of graduated sanctions consistent with the
hearing procedures and graduated sanctions developed pursuant to RCW
9.94A.737. The board may suspend the offender's release to community
custody and confine the offender in a correctional institution owned,
operated by, or operated under contract with the state prior to the
hearing unless the offender has been arrested and confined for a new
criminal offense.
(4) Following the hearing specified in subsection (3) of this
section, the board may impose sanctions such as work release, home
detention with electronic monitoring, work crew, community restitution,
inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling
sessions, supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any
other sanctions available in the community, or may suspend the release
and sanction up to sixty days confinement in a local correctional
facility for each violation whenever an offender released by the board
under section 3 of this act violates any condition or requirement of
community custody.
(5) The hearing procedures required under subsection (3) of this
section shall be developed by rule and include the provisions of RCW
9.95.435 (4) through (6).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The indeterminate sentence review board and
department of corrections may adopt rules to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 2 and 3 of this act apply
retroactively to all eligible offenders incarcerated on the effective
date of this section, regardless of the date of the offender's
underlying offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act does not create any expectation
that an offender will be released before the end of his or her
sentence, and offenders have no reason to conclude that early release
as described in section 3 of this act is an entitlement or creates any
liberty interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---