BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.320.025 and 1999 c 101 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of directors may change the name of the school
district if:
(a) Either ten percent of the registered voters of the district
file a petition requesting that the name of the school district be
changed and submit the proposed new name with the request to the board
or the board passes a motion to hold a hearing to change the school
district name;
(b) After receiving the petition or adopting the motion, the board
holds a hearing within one month after the petition was submitted to
the board. The board shall publish notice of the hearing and the
proposed new name once a week for three consecutive weeks in a
newspaper of general circulation within the school district or for
three consecutive weeks on a public web site maintained by the school
district. At the hearing, other names may be proposed and considered
by the board without additional notice requirements; and
(c) A majority of the board votes to adopt the new name.
(2) If the board adopts the new name, the new name shall be
recorded in the school district office and with the educational service
district superintendent, the superintendent of public instruction, the
state board of education, and the secretary of state.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.335.020 and 1983 c 109 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before any school closure, a school district board of directors
shall adopt a policy regarding school closures which provides for
citizen involvement before the school district board of directors
considers the closure of any school for instructional purposes. The
policy adopted shall include provisions for the development of a
written summary containing an analysis as to the effects of the
proposed school closure. The policy shall also include a requirement
that during the ninety days before a school district's final decision
upon any school closure, the school board of directors shall conduct
hearings to receive testimony from the public on any issues related to
the closure of any school for instructional purposes. The policy shall
require separate hearings for each school which is proposed to be
closed.
The policy adopted shall provide for reasonable notice to the
residents affected by the proposed school closure. At a minimum, the
notice of any hearing pertaining to a proposed school closure shall
contain the date, time, place, and purpose of the hearing. Notice of
each hearing shall be published once each week for two consecutive
weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the area where the
school, subject to closure, is located or for two consecutive weeks on
a public web site maintained by the school district. The last notice
of hearing shall be published not later than seven days immediately
before the final hearing.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.335.040 and 1991 c 116 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every school district board of directors is authorized to
permit the rental, lease, or occasional use of all or any portion of
any surplus real property owned or lawfully held by the district to any
person, corporation, or government entity for profit or nonprofit,
commercial or noncommercial purposes: PROVIDED, That the leasing or
renting or use of such property is for a lawful purpose and does not
interfere with conduct of the district's educational program and
related activities: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the lease or rental
agreement entered into shall include provisions which permit the
recapture of the leased or rented surplus property of the district
should such property be needed for school purposes in the future except
in such cases where, due to proximity to an international airport, land
use has been so permanently altered as to preclude the possible use of
the property for a school housing students and the school property has
been heavily impacted by surrounding land uses so that a school housing
students would no longer be appropriate in that area.
(2) Authorization to rent, lease or permit the occasional use of
surplus school property under this section, RCW 28A.335.050 and
28A.335.090 is conditioned on the establishment by each school district
board of directors of a policy governing the use of surplus school
property.
(3) The board of directors of any school district desiring to rent
or lease any surplus real property owned by the school district shall
publish a written notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the
school district or on a public web site maintained by the school
district for rentals or leases totaling ten thousand dollars or more in
value. School districts shall not rent or lease the property for at
least forty-five days following the publication of the ((newspaper))
notice.
(4) Private schools shall have the same rights as any other person
or entity to submit bids for the rental or lease of surplus real
property and to have such bids considered along with all other bids:
PROVIDED, That the school board may establish reasonable conditions for
the use of such real property to assure the safe and proper operation
of the property in a manner consistent with board policies.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.335.120 and 2006 c 263 s 913 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of any school district of this state
may:
(a) Sell for cash, at public or private sale, and convey by deed
all interest of the district in or to any of the real property of the
district which is no longer required for school purposes; and
(b) Purchase real property for the purpose of locating thereon and
affixing thereto any house or houses and appurtenant buildings removed
from school sites owned by the district and sell for cash, at public or
private sale, and convey by deed all interest of the district in or to
such acquired and improved real property.
(2) When the board of directors of any school district proposes a
sale of school district real property pursuant to this section and the
value of the property exceeds seventy thousand dollars, the board shall
publish a notice of its intention to sell the property. The notice
shall be published at least once each week during two consecutive weeks
in a legal newspaper with a general circulation in the area in which
the school district is located or for two consecutive weeks on a public
web site maintained by the school district. The notice shall describe
the property to be sold and designate the place where and the day and
hour when a hearing will be held. The board shall hold a public
hearing upon the proposal to dispose of the school district property at
the place and the day and hour fixed in the notice and admit evidence
offered for and against the propriety and advisability of the proposed
sale.
(3) The board of directors of any school district desiring to sell
surplus real property shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general
circulation in the school district or on a public web site maintained
by the school district. School districts shall not sell the property
for at least forty-five days following the publication of the
((newspaper)) notice.
(4) Private schools shall have the same rights as any other person
or entity to submit bids for the purchase of surplus real property and
to have such bids considered along with all other bids.
(5) Any sale of school district real property authorized pursuant
to this section shall be preceded by a market value appraisal by a
professionally designated real estate appraiser as defined in RCW
74.46.020 or a general real estate appraiser certified under chapter
18.140 RCW selected by the board of directors and no sale shall take
place if the sale price would be less than ninety percent of the
appraisal made by the real estate appraiser: PROVIDED, That if the
property has been on the market for one year or more the property may
be reappraised and sold for not less than seventy-five percent of the
reappraised value with the unanimous consent of the board.
(6) If in the judgment of the board of directors of any district
the sale of real property of the district not needed for school
purposes would be facilitated and greater value realized through use of
the services of licensed real estate brokers, a contract for such
services may be negotiated and concluded: PROVIDED, That the use of a
licensed real estate broker will not eliminate the obligation of the
board of directors to provide the notice described in this section:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the fee or commissions charged for any broker
services shall not exceed seven percent of the resulting sale value for
a single parcel: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any professionally designated
real estate appraiser as defined in RCW 74.46.020 or a general real
estate appraiser certified under chapter 18.140 RCW selected by the
board to appraise the market value of a parcel of property to be sold
may not be a party to any contract with the school district to sell
such parcel of property for a period of three years after the
appraisal.
(7) If in the judgment of the board of directors of any district
the sale of real property of the district not needed for school
purposes would be facilitated and greater value realized through sale
on contract terms, a real estate sales contract may be executed between
the district and buyer.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.335.180 and 1997 c 264 s 1 and 1997 c 104 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, school districts,
educational service districts, or any other state or local governmental
agency concerned with education, when declaring texts and other books,
equipment, materials or relocatable facilities as surplus, shall, prior
to other disposal thereof, serve notice in writing in a newspaper of
general circulation in the school district or on a public web site
maintained by the school district and to any public school district or
private school in Washington state annually requesting such a notice,
that the same is available for sale, rent, or lease to public school
districts or approved private schools, at depreciated cost or fair
market value, whichever is greater: PROVIDED, That students wishing to
purchase texts pursuant to RCW 28A.320.230(2) shall have priority as to
such texts. The notice requirement in this section does not apply to
the sale or transfer of assistive devices under RCW 28A.335.205 or
chapter 72.40 RCW. Such districts or agencies shall not otherwise
sell, rent or lease such surplus property to any person, firm,
organization, or nongovernmental agency for at least thirty days
following publication of notice ((in a newspaper of general circulation
in the school district)).
(2) In lieu of complying with subsection (1) of this section,
school districts and educational service districts may elect to grant
surplus personal property to a federal, state, or local governmental
entity, or to indigent persons, at no cost on the condition the
property be used for preschool through twelfth grade educational
purposes, or elect to loan surplus personal property to a nonreligious,
nonsectarian private entity on the condition the property be used for
the preschool through twelfth grade education of members of the public
on a nondiscriminatory basis.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.505.050 and 1995 c 121 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon completion of their budgets as provided in RCW 28A.505.040,
every school district shall publish a notice stating that the board of
directors will meet for the purpose of fixing and adopting the budget
of the district for the ensuing fiscal year. Such notice shall
designate the date, time, and place of said meeting which shall occur
no later than the thirty-first day of August for first-class school
districts, and the first day of August for second-class school
districts. The notice shall also state that any person may appear
((thereat)) and be heard for or against any part of such budget.
((Said)) Notice shall be published at least: (a) Once each week for
two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the
district, or, if there ((be none)) is no newspaper of general
circulation in the district, in a newspaper of general circulation in
the county or counties in which such district is a part; or (b) for two
consecutive weeks on a public web site maintained by the school
district. The last notice shall be published no later than seven days
immediately prior to the hearing.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.530.080 and 2010 c 241 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the authority granted under RCW 28A.530.010, a
school district may contract indebtedness for any purpose specified in
RCW 28A.530.010 (2), (4), and (5) or for the purpose of purchasing any
real or personal property, or property rights, in connection with the
exercise of any powers or duties which it is now or hereafter
authorized to exercise, and issue bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness therefor without a vote of the qualified electors of the
district, subject to the limitations on indebtedness set forth in RCW
39.36.020(3).
(2) Before issuing nonvoted bonds in excess of two hundred fifty
thousand dollars, a school district shall publish notice of intent to
issue such bonds and shall hold a public hearing on the proposal at any
regular or special meeting of the school board. The notice shall
designate: The date, time, and place of the hearing; the purpose and
amount of the bonds; the type, terms, and conditions of bonds; and the
means identified for repayment. The notice shall also state that any
person may appear and be heard on the issue of issuing such bonds. The
notice shall be published at least: (a) Once each week for two
consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the
district, or if there is ((none)) no newspaper of general circulation
in the district, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or
counties in which such district is a part; or (b) for two consecutive
weeks on a public web site maintained by the school district. The last
notice shall be published no later than seven days immediately before
the hearing. At the conclusion of public comment, the board of
directors may proceed to determine, by resolution, whether to issue
such bonds.
(3) The public notice and hearing requirements in subsection (2) of
this section shall not apply to any refinancing or refunding of
outstanding nonvoted or voted bonds.
(4) Such bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness shall be
issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW, and the proceeds
thereof shall be deposited in the capital projects fund, the
transportation vehicle fund, or the general fund, as applicable.

--- END ---