BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.128.060 and 2013 c 300 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An application for license shall be made to the department upon
forms provided by it and shall contain such information as the
department reasonably requires.
(2) Subject to the provisions of this section, the department shall
issue a license to an adult family home if the department finds that
the applicant and the home are in compliance with this chapter and the
rules adopted under this chapter. The department may not issue a
license if (a) the applicant or a person affiliated with the applicant
has prior violations of this chapter relating to the adult family home
subject to the application or any other adult family home, or of any
other law regulating residential care facilities within the past ten
years that resulted in revocation, suspension, or nonrenewal of a
license or contract with the department; or (b) the applicant or a
person affiliated with the applicant has a history of significant
noncompliance with federal, state, or local laws, rules, or regulations
relating to the provision of care or services to vulnerable adults or
to children. A person is considered affiliated with an applicant if
the person is listed on the license application as a partner, officer,
director, resident manager, or majority owner of the applying entity,
or is the spouse of the applicant.
(3) The license fee shall be submitted with the application.
(4) Proof of financial solvency must be submitted when requested by
the department.
(5) The department shall serve upon the applicant a copy of the
decision granting or denying an application for a license. An
applicant shall have the right to contest denial of his or her
application for a license as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW by
requesting a hearing in writing within twenty-eight days after receipt
of the notice of denial.
(6) The department shall not issue a license to a provider if the
department finds that the provider or spouse of the provider or any
partner, officer, director, managerial employee, or majority owner has
a history of significant noncompliance with federal or state
regulations, rules, or laws in providing care or services to vulnerable
adults or to children.
(7) The department shall license an adult family home for the
maximum level of care that the adult family home may provide. The
department shall define, in rule, license levels based upon the
education, training, and caregiving experience of the licensed provider
or staff.
(8) For adult family homes that serve residents with special needs
such as dementia, developmental disabilities, or mental illness,
specialty training is required of providers and resident managers
consistent with RCW 70.128.230, and also is required for caregivers,
with standardized competency testing for caregivers hired after July
28, 2013, as set forth by the department in rule. The department shall
examine, with input from experts, providers, consumers, and advocates,
whether the existing specialty training courses are adequate for
providers, resident managers, and caregivers to meet these residents'
special needs, are sufficiently standardized in curricula and
instructional techniques, and are accompanied by effective tools to
fairly evaluate successful student completion. The department may
enhance the existing specialty training requirements by rule, and may
update curricula, instructional techniques, and competency testing
based upon its review and stakeholder input. In addition, the
department shall examine, with input from experts, providers,
consumers, and advocates, whether additional specialty training
categories should be created for adult family homes serving residents
with other special needs, such as traumatic brain injury, skilled
nursing, or bariatric care. The department may establish, by rule,
additional specialty training categories and requirements for
providers, resident managers, and caregivers, if needed to better serve
residents with such special needs.
(9) The department shall establish, by rule, standards used to
license nonresident providers and multiple facility operators.
(10) The department shall establish, by rule, for multiple facility
operators educational standards substantially equivalent to recognized
national certification standards for residential care administrators.
(11)(a) At the time of an application for an adult family home
license and upon the annual fee renewal date set by the department, the
licensee shall pay a license fee. Beginning July 1, 2011, the per bed
license fee and any processing fees, including the initial license fee,
must be established in the omnibus appropriations act and any amendment
or additions made to that act. The license fees established in the
omnibus appropriations act and any amendment or additions made to that
act may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight
activity costs and must include the department's cost of paying
providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid
clients.
(b) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any
portion of the licensing and processing fees required under this
subsection (11) in any case in which the department determines that an
adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional
circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to
require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would
present a hardship to the applicant.
(12) A provider who receives notification of the department's
initiation of a denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of an
adult family home license may, in lieu of appealing the department's
action, surrender or relinquish the license. The department shall not
issue a new license to or contract with the provider, for the purposes
of providing care to vulnerable adults or children, for a period of
twenty years following the surrendering or relinquishment of the former
license. The licensing record shall indicate that the provider
relinquished or surrendered the license, without admitting the
violations, after receiving notice of the department's initiation of a
denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of a license.
(13) The department shall establish, by rule, the circumstances
requiring a change in the licensed provider, which include, but are not
limited to, a change in ownership or control of the adult family home
or provider, a change in the provider's form of legal organization,
such as from sole proprietorship to partnership or corporation, and a
dissolution or merger of the licensed entity with another legal
organization. The new provider is subject to the provisions of this
chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter, and other applicable
law. In order to ensure that the safety of residents is not
compromised by a change in provider, the new provider is responsible
for correction of all violations that may exist at the time of the new
license.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.128.120 and 2013 c 39 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each adult family home provider, applicant, and each resident
manager shall have the following minimum qualifications, except that
only applicants are required to meet the provisions of subsections (10)
and (11) of this section:
(1) Twenty-one years of age or older;
(2) For those applying after September 1, 2001, to be licensed as
providers, and for resident managers whose employment begins after
September 1, 2001, a United States high school diploma or high school
equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536 or any English or
translated government documentation of the following:
(a) Successful completion of government-approved public or private
school education in a foreign country that includes an annual average
of one thousand hours of instruction over twelve years or no less than
twelve thousand hours of instruction;
(b) A foreign college, foreign university, or United States
community college two-year diploma;
(c) Admission to, or completion of coursework at, a foreign
university or college for which credit was granted;
(d) Admission to, or completion of coursework at, a United States
college or university for which credits were awarded;
(e) Admission to, or completion of postgraduate coursework at, a
United States college or university for which credits were awarded; or
(f) Successful passage of the United States board examination for
registered nursing, or any professional medical occupation for which
college or university education preparation was required;
(3) Good moral and responsible character and reputation;
(4) Literacy and the ability to communicate in the English
language;
(5) Management and administrative ability to carry out the
requirements of this chapter;
(6) Satisfactory completion of department-approved basic training
and continuing education training as required by RCW 74.39A.074, and in
rules adopted by the department;
(7) Satisfactory completion of department-approved, or equivalent,
special care training before a provider may provide special care
services to a resident;
(8) Not been convicted of any crime that is disqualifying under RCW
43.43.830 or 43.43.842, or department rules adopted under this chapter,
or been found to have abused, neglected, exploited, or abandoned a
minor or vulnerable adult as specified in RCW 74.39A.056(2);
(9) For those applying to be licensed as providers, and for
resident managers whose employment begins after August 24, 2011, at
least one thousand hours in the previous sixty months of successful,
direct caregiving experience obtained after age eighteen to vulnerable
adults in a licensed or contracted setting prior to operating or
managing an adult family home. The applicant or resident manager must
have credible evidence of the successful, direct caregiving experience
or, currently hold one of the following professional licenses:
Physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW; osteopathic physician
licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; osteopathic physician assistant
licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW; physician assistant licensed under
chapter 18.71A RCW; registered nurse, advanced registered nurse
practitioner, or licensed practical nurse licensed under chapter 18.79
RCW;
(10) For applicants, proof of financial solvency, as defined in
rule; and
(11) Applicants must successfully complete an adult family home
administration and business planning class, prior to being granted a
license. The class must be a minimum of forty-eight hours of classroom
time and approved by the department. The department shall promote and
prioritize bilingual capabilities within available resources and when
materials are available for this purpose. Under exceptional
circumstances, such as the sudden and unexpected death of a provider,
the department may consider granting a license to an applicant who has
not completed the class but who meets all other requirements. If the
department decides to grant the license due to exceptional
circumstances, the applicant must complete the class within four months
of licensure.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.39A.320 and 2012 c 10 s 67 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) To the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, the
department shall establish a capital add-on rate, not less than the
July 1, 2005, capital add-on rate established by the department, for
those assisted living facilities contracting with the department that
have a medicaid occupancy percentage of sixty percent or greater.
(((2))) (b) Effective for July 1, 2006, and for each July 1st
rate-setting period thereafter, the department shall determine the
facility's medicaid occupancy percentage using the last six months'
medicaid resident days from the preceding calendar year divided by the
product of all its licensed assisted living facility beds irrespective
of use, times calendar days for the six-month period. For the purposes
of this section, medicaid resident days include those clients who are
enrolled in a medicaid managed long-term care program, including but
not limited to the program for all inclusive care and the medicaid
integration project.
(((3))) (c) The medicaid occupancy percentage established beginning
on July 1, 2006, and for each July 1st thereafter, shall be used to
determine whether an assisted living facility qualifies for the capital
add-on rate under this section. Those facilities that qualify for the
capital add-on rate shall receive the capital add-on rate throughout
the applicable fiscal year.
(2) The department may negotiate with adult family homes to
establish a capital add-on rate for those adult family homes
contracting with the department that have a medicaid occupancy
percentage of sixty percent or greater.

--- END ---