BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Cities, counties, and towns must cooperate with the liquor
control board with respect to the establishment within their
jurisdictional boundaries of businesses involved in the production,
processing, or sale of recreational marijuana where such businesses are
licensed under RCW 69.50.325. Subject to the regulatory requirements
of this chapter, licensed marijuana businesses attempting to locate
within the jurisdictional boundaries of a municipality must be treated
the same as other businesses within that jurisdiction with respect to
ordinances or regulations that include, but are not limited to, those
pertaining to local business licensing, zoning, and land use.
(2) Cities, counties, and towns are prohibited from enacting any
ordinance or other regulation pertaining to business licensing, zoning,
or land use that has the effect of preventing or impeding the
establishment of a recreational marijuana business licensed under RCW
69.50.325. In the event the liquor control board determines that a
municipality has engaged in regulatory practices that impede the
establishment of such businesses in violation of this section, the
liquor control board may:
(a) Penalize the offending municipality by making it ineligible to
receive any funds from the liquor revolving fund established in RCW
66.08.170 and the liquor excise tax fund established under RCW
82.08.170. Upon the determination that a municipality is ineligible to
receive moneys from such funds under this section, the liquor control
board may direct the state treasurer to withhold the revenues to which
a county, city, or town would otherwise be entitled from the liquor
revolving fund and the liquor excise tax fund. In the event the liquor
control board later determines that the offending municipality has
become compliant with the requirements of this section, it shall direct
the state treasurer to resume distributing revenues from these funds to
the municipality; and
(b) Bring legal action in superior court against the offending
municipality for injunctive relief for violations of this section. The
municipality shall pay all court costs and other litigation-related
expenses for legal actions brought under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.08.170 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 959 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a fund, known as the "liquor revolving fund",
which shall consist of all license fees, permit fees, penalties,
forfeitures, and all other moneys, income, or revenue received by the
board. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. All moneys
received by the board or any employee thereof, except for change funds
and an amount of petty cash as fixed by the board within the authority
of law shall be deposited each day in a depository approved by the
state treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be credited
to the liquor revolving fund. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer funds from the liquor revolving ((account
[fund])) fund to the state general fund and may direct an additional
amount of liquor profits to be distributed to local governments.
Neither the transfer of funds nor the additional distribution of liquor
profits to local governments during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium may
reduce the excess fund distributions that otherwise would occur under
RCW 66.08.190. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the state
treasurer shall transfer from the liquor revolving fund to the state
general fund forty-two million five hundred thousand dollars for fiscal
year 2012 and forty-two million five hundred thousand dollars for
fiscal year 2013. The transfer during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium
may not reduce the excess fund distributions that otherwise would occur
under RCW 66.08.190. Sales to licensees are exempt from any liquor
price increases that may result from the transfer of funds from the
liquor revolving fund to the state general fund during the 2011-2013
fiscal biennium. Disbursements from the revolving fund shall be on
authorization of the board or a duly authorized representative thereof.
In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control the
liquor revolving fund shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88
RCW but no appropriation shall be required to permit expenditures and
payment of obligations from such fund.
(2) Transfers of funds to local governments from the liquor
revolving fund are subject to the provisions of section 1 of this act.
Local governments are ineligible to receive such funding if the liquor
control board determines that the local government is noncompliant with
the requirements of section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.170 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, during
the months of January, April, July, and October of each year, the state
treasurer must make the transfers required under subsections (2) and
(3) of this section from the liquor excise tax fund and then the
apportionment and distribution of all remaining moneys in the liquor
excise tax fund to the counties, cities, and towns in the following
proportions: (a) Twenty percent of the moneys in the liquor excise tax
fund must be divided among and distributed to the counties of the state
in accordance with the provisions of RCW 66.08.200; and (b) eighty
percent of the moneys in the liquor excise tax fund must be divided
among and distributed to the cities and towns of the state in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 66.08.210.
(2) Each fiscal quarter and prior to making the twenty percent
distribution to counties under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the
treasurer shall transfer to the liquor revolving fund created in RCW
66.08.170 sufficient moneys to fund the allotments from any legislative
appropriations for county research and services as provided under
chapter 43.110 RCW.
(3) During the months of January, April, July, and October of each
year, the state treasurer must transfer two million five hundred
thousand dollars from the liquor excise tax fund to the state general
fund.
(4) During calendar year 2012, the October distribution under
subsection (1) of this section and the July and October transfers under
subsections (2) and (3) of this section must not be made. During
calendar year 2013, the January, April, and July distributions under
subsection (1) of this section and transfers under subsections (2) and
(3) of this section must not be made.
(5) All transfers of funds to local governments from the liquor
excise tax fund are subject to the provisions of section 1 of this act.
Local governments are ineligible to receive such funding if the liquor
control board determines that the local government is noncompliant with
the requirements of section 1 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.08.050 and 2012 c 2 s 107 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board, subject to the provisions of this title and the rules,
must:
(1) Determine the nature, form and capacity of all packages to be
used for containing liquor kept for sale under this title;
(2) Execute or cause to be executed, all contracts, papers, and
documents in the name of the board, under such regulations as the board
may fix;
(3) Pay all customs, duties, excises, charges and obligations
whatsoever relating to the business of the board;
(4) Require bonds from all employees in the discretion of the
board, and to determine the amount of fidelity bond of each such
employee;
(5) Perform services for the state lottery commission to such
extent, and for such compensation, as may be mutually agreed upon
between the board and the commission;
(6) Accept and deposit into the general fund-local account and
disburse, subject to appropriation, federal grants or other funds or
donations from any source for the purpose of improving public awareness
of the health risks associated with alcohol consumption by youth and
the abuse of alcohol by adults in Washington state. The board's
alcohol awareness program must cooperate with federal and state
agencies, interested organizations, and individuals to effect an active
public beverage alcohol awareness program;
(7) Perform all other matters and things, whether similar to the
foregoing or not, to carry out the provisions of this title and chapter
69.50 RCW regarding the production, processing, and sale of
recreational marijuana, and has full power to do each and every act
necessary to the conduct of its regulatory functions, including all
supplies procurement, preparation and approval of forms, and every
other undertaking necessary to perform its regulatory functions
whatsoever, subject only to audit by the state auditor. However, the
board has no authority to regulate the content of spoken language on
licensed premises where wine and other liquors are served and where
there is not a clear and present danger of disorderly conduct being
provoked by such language or to restrict advertising of lawful prices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---