BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.28.271 and 2011 c 301 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation,
or other entity to employ an individual for purposes of RCW 19.28.161
through 19.28.271 who has not been issued a certificate of competency,
a temporary permit, or a training certificate. It is unlawful for any
individual to engage in the electrical construction trade or to
maintain or install any electrical equipment or conductors without
having in his or her possession a certificate of competency, a
temporary permit, or a training certificate under RCW 19.28.161 through
19.28.271, and photo identification. The department may establish by
rule a requirement that the individual ((also wear and visibly display
his or her certificate or permit)) produce proof of proper licensing
and identification upon request, but the department may not require an
individual to wear or visibly display his or her license or personal
identification on his or her clothing or person or as part of his or
her uniform.
(2) Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
found in violation of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be assessed
a penalty of not less than fifty dollars or more than five hundred
dollars. The department shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for
violating RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271. An appeal may be made to
the board as is provided in RCW 19.28.131. The appeal shall be filed
within twenty days after the notice of the penalty is given to the
assessed party using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or
the delivery can be confirmed, sent to the last known address of the
assessed party and shall be made by filing a written notice of appeal
with the department. Any equipment maintained or installed by any
person who does not possess a certificate of competency under RCW
19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not receive an electrical work permit
and electrical service shall not be connected or maintained to operate
the equipment. Each day that a person, firm, partnership, corporation,
or other entity violates RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 is a separate
violation.
(3) A civil penalty shall be collected in a civil action brought by
the attorney general in the county wherein the alleged violation arose
at the request of the department if any of RCW 19.28.161 through
19.28.271 or any rules adopted under RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271
are violated.

--- END ---