BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the impact of
mopeds, scooters, and motorcycles on roads and the environment is much
less than that of a passenger car, sport utility vehicle, or truck. To
achieve the greenhouse gas reduction goals of the state, there needs to
be a reduction in emissions from vehicles on our roads. It is the
intent of the legislature to incentivize the use of mopeds, scooters,
and motorcycles as a means to reduce emissions and the wear and tear on
the state's roadways by providing an incentive to use a friendly mode
of transportation that will have less impact on the roadways and the
environment.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.17.365 and 2010 c 161 s 533 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person applying for a motor vehicle registration and paying
the vehicle license fee required in RCW 46.17.350(1) (a), (d), (e),
(((h),)) (j), (n), and (o) shall pay a motor vehicle weight fee in
addition to all other fees and taxes required by law. The motor
vehicle weight fee:
(a) Must be based on the motor vehicle scale weight;
(b) Is the difference determined by subtracting the vehicle license
fee required in RCW 46.17.350 from the license fee in Schedule B of RCW
46.17.355, plus two dollars; and
(c) Must be distributed under RCW 46.68.415.
(2) A person applying for a motor home vehicle registration shall,
in lieu of the motor vehicle weight fee required in subsection (1) of
this section, pay a motor home vehicle weight fee of seventy-five
dollars in addition to all other fees and taxes required by law. The
motor home vehicle weight fee must be distributed under RCW 46.68.415.
(3) The department shall:
(a) Rely on motor vehicle empty scale weights provided by vehicle
manufacturers, or other sources defined by the department, to determine
the weight of each motor vehicle; and
(b) Adopt rules for determining weight for vehicles without
manufacturer empty scale weights.

--- END ---