BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.41.080 and 2011 c 314 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall select an administrator ((through a competitive
bidding process)) to administer the pool.
(1) The board shall evaluate ((bids)) administrators based upon
criteria established by the board, which shall include:
(a) The administrator's proven ability to handle health coverage;
(b) The efficiency of the administrator's claim-paying procedures;
(c) An estimate of the total charges for administering the plan;
and
(d) The administrator's ability to administer the pool in a cost-effective manner.
(2) ((The administrator shall serve for a period of three years
subject to removal for cause. At least six months prior to the
expiration of each three-year period of service by the administrator,
the board shall invite all interested parties, including the current
administrator, to submit bids to serve as the administrator for the
succeeding three-year period. Selection of the administrator for this
succeeding period shall be made at least three months prior to the end
of the current three-year period, unless at the time required for
submission of bids pursuant to this subsection to the pool will be
discontinued before the end of the succeeding thirty-six month period))
The administrator shall serve pursuant to a contract. Upon expiration
of the term of the contract, the board may, in its discretion, renew
the contract or select an administrator by soliciting bids from
qualified contractors.
(3) The administrator shall perform such duties as may be assigned
by the board including:
(a) Administering eligibility and administrative claim payment
functions relating to the pool;
(b) Establishing a premium billing procedure for collection of
premiums from covered persons. Billings shall be made on a periodic
basis as determined by the board, which shall not be more frequent than
a monthly billing;
(c) Performing all necessary functions to assure timely payment of
benefits to covered persons under the pool including:
(i) Making available information relating to the proper manner of
submitting a claim for benefits to the pool, and distributing forms
upon which submission shall be made;
(ii) Taking steps necessary to offer and administer managed care
benefit plans; and
(iii) Evaluating the eligibility of each claim for payment by the
pool;
(d) Submission of regular reports to the board regarding the
operation of the pool. The frequency, content, and form of the report
shall be as determined by the board;
(e) Following the close of each accounting year, determination of
net paid and earned premiums, the expense of administration, and the
paid and incurred losses for the year and reporting this information to
the board and the commissioner on a form as prescribed by the
commissioner.
(4) The administrator shall be paid as provided in the contract
between the board and the administrator for its expenses incurred in
the performance of its services.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.41.090 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Following the close of each accounting year, the pool
administrator shall determine the total net cost of pool operation
which shall include:
(a) Net premium (premiums less administrative expense allowances),
the pool expenses of administration, and incurred losses for the year,
taking into account investment income and other appropriate gains and
losses; and
(b) The amount of pool contributions specified in the state omnibus
appropriations act for deposit into the health benefit exchange account
under RCW 43.71.060, to assist with the transition of enrollees from
the pool into the health benefit exchange created by chapter 43.71 RCW.
(2)(a) Each member's proportion of participation in the pool shall
be determined annually by the board based on annual statements and
other reports deemed necessary by the board and filed by the member
with the commissioner; and shall be determined by multiplying the total
cost of pool operation by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction
equals that member's total number of resident insured persons,
including spouse and dependents, covered under all health plans in the
state by that member during the preceding calendar year. The
denominator of the fraction equals the total number of resident insured
persons, including spouses and dependents, covered under all health
plans in the state by all pool members during the preceding calendar
year.
(b) For purposes of calculating the numerator and the denominator
under (a) of this subsection:
(i) All health plans in the state by the state health care
authority include only the uniform medical plan;
(ii) Each ten resident insured persons, including spouse and
dependents, under a stop loss plan or the uniform medical plan shall
count as one resident insured person;
(iii) Health plans serving medical care services program clients
under RCW 74.09.035 are exempted from the calculation; and
(iv) Health plans established to serve elderly clients or medicaid
clients with disabilities under chapter 74.09 RCW when the plan has
been implemented on a demonstration or pilot project basis are exempted
from the calculation until July 1, 2009.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 48.41.037, any deficit incurred by
the pool, including pool contributions for deposit into the health
benefit exchange account, shall be recouped by assessments among
members apportioned under this subsection pursuant to the formula set
forth by the board among members. The ((monthly per member assessment
may not exceed the 2013 assessment level)) total of 2014 member
assessments may not exceed the total of 2013 member assessments except
to the extent necessary to pay a deficit incurred by the pool from pool
losses and administrative expenses. If the maximum ((assessment is))
2014 assessments are insufficient to cover a pool deficit, including
contribution for deposits into the health benefit exchange account, the
assessments shall be used first to pay all incurred losses and pool
administrative expenses, with the remainder being available for deposit
in the health benefit exchange account.
(3) The board may abate or defer, in whole or in part, the
assessment of a member if, in the opinion of the board, payment of the
assessment would endanger the ability of the member to fulfill its
contractual obligations. If an assessment against a member is abated
or deferred in whole or in part, the amount by which such assessment is
abated or deferred may be assessed against the other members in a
manner consistent with the basis for assessments set forth in
subsection (2) of this section. The member receiving such abatement or
deferment shall remain liable to the pool for the deficiency.
(4) Subject to the limitation imposed in subsection (2)(c) of this
section, the pool administrator shall transfer the assessments for pool
contributions for the operation of the health benefit exchange to the
treasurer for deposit into the health benefit exchange account ((with
the quarterly assessments for)) in 2014 as specified in the state
omnibus appropriations act. If assessments exceed actual losses and
administrative expenses of the pool and pool contributions for deposit
into the health benefit exchange account, the excess shall be held at
interest and used by the board to offset future losses or to reduce
pool premiums. As used in this subsection, "future losses" includes
reserves for incurred but not reported claims.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.41.110 and 2012 c 211 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The pool shall offer one or more care management plans of
coverage. Such plans may, but are not required to, include point of
service features that permit participants to receive in-network
benefits or out-of-network benefits subject to differential cost
shares. The pool may incorporate managed care features into existing
plans.
(2) The administrator shall prepare a brochure outlining the
benefits and exclusions of pool policies in plain language. After
approval by the board, such brochure shall be made reasonably available
to participants or potential participants.
(3) The health insurance policies issued by the pool shall pay only
reasonable amounts for medically necessary eligible health care
services rendered or furnished for the diagnosis or treatment of
covered illnesses, injuries, and conditions. Eligible expenses are the
reasonable amounts for the health care services and items for which
benefits are extended under a pool policy.
(4) The pool shall offer at least two policies, one of which will
be a comprehensive policy that must comply with RCW 48.41.120 and must
at a minimum include the following services or related items, except as
provided in subsection (11) of this section:
(a) Hospital services, including charges for the most common
semiprivate room, for the most common private room if semiprivate rooms
do not exist in the health care facility, or for the private room if
medically necessary, including no less than a total of one hundred
eighty inpatient days in a calendar year, and no less than thirty days
inpatient care for alcohol, drug, or chemical dependency or abuse per
calendar year;
(b) Professional services including surgery for the treatment of
injuries, illnesses, or conditions, other than dental, which are
rendered by a health care provider, or at the direction of a health
care provider, by a staff of registered or licensed practical nurses,
or other health care providers;
(c) No less than twenty outpatient professional visits for the
diagnosis or treatment of alcohol, drug, or chemical dependency or
abuse rendered during a calendar year by a state-certified chemical
dependency program approved under chapter 70.96A RCW, or by one or more
physicians, psychologists, or community mental health professionals,
or, at the direction of a physician, by other qualified licensed health
care practitioners;
(d) Drugs and contraceptive devices requiring a prescription;
(e) Services of a skilled nursing facility, excluding custodial and
convalescent care, for not less than one hundred days in a calendar
year as prescribed by a physician;
(f) Services of a home health agency;
(g) Chemotherapy, radioisotope, radiation, and nuclear medicine
therapy;
(h) Oxygen;
(i) Anesthesia services;
(j) Prostheses, other than dental;
(k) Durable medical equipment which has no personal use in the
absence of the condition for which prescribed;
(l) Diagnostic x-rays and laboratory tests;
(m) Oral surgery including at least the following: Fractures of
facial bones; excisions of mandibular joints, lesions of the mouth,
lip, or tongue, tumors, or cysts excluding treatment for
temporomandibular joints; incision of accessory sinuses, mouth salivary
glands or ducts; dislocations of the jaw; plastic reconstruction or
repair of traumatic injuries occurring while covered under the pool;
and excision of impacted wisdom teeth;
(n) Maternity care services;
(o) Services of a physical therapist and services of a speech
therapist;
(p) Hospice services;
(q) Professional ambulance service to the nearest health care
facility qualified to treat the illness or injury;
(r) Mental health services pursuant to RCW 48.41.220; and
(s) Other medical equipment, services, or supplies required by
physician's orders and medically necessary and consistent with the
diagnosis, treatment, and condition.
(5) The board shall design and employ cost containment measures and
requirements such as, but not limited to, care coordination, provider
network limitations, preadmission certification, and concurrent
inpatient review which may make the pool more cost-effective.
(6) The pool benefit policy may contain benefit limitations,
exceptions, and cost shares such as copayments, coinsurance, and
deductibles that are consistent with managed care products, except that
differential cost shares may be adopted by the board for nonnetwork
providers under point of service plans. No limitation, exception, or
reduction may be used that would exclude coverage for any disease,
illness, or injury.
(7)(a) The pool may not reject an individual for health plan
coverage based upon preexisting conditions of the individual or deny,
exclude, or otherwise limit coverage for an individual's preexisting
health conditions; except that it shall impose a six-month benefit
waiting period for preexisting conditions for which medical advice was
given, for which a health care provider recommended or provided
treatment, or for which a prudent layperson would have sought advice or
treatment, within six months before the effective date of coverage.
The preexisting condition waiting period shall not apply to prenatal
care services or benefits for outpatient prescription drugs. The pool
may not avoid the requirements of this section through the creation of
a new rate classification or the modification of an existing rate
classification. Credit against the waiting period shall be as provided
in subsection (8) of this section.
(b) The pool shall not impose any preexisting condition waiting
period for any person under the age of nineteen.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the pool shall
credit any preexisting condition waiting period in its plans for a
person who was enrolled at any time during the sixty-three day period
immediately preceding the date of application for the new pool plan.
For the person previously enrolled in a group health benefit plan, the
pool must credit the aggregate of all periods of preceding coverage not
separated by more than sixty-three days toward the waiting period of
the new health plan. For the person previously enrolled in an
individual health benefit plan other than a catastrophic health plan,
the pool must credit the period of coverage the person was continuously
covered under the immediately preceding health plan toward the waiting
period of the new health plan. For the purposes of this subsection, a
preceding health plan includes an employer-provided self-funded health
plan.
(b) The pool shall waive any preexisting condition waiting period
for a person who is an eligible individual as defined in section
2741(b) of the federal health insurance portability and accountability
act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. 300gg-41(b)).
(9) If an application is made for the pool policy as a result of
rejection by a carrier, then the date of application to the carrier,
rather than to the pool, should govern for purposes of determining
preexisting condition credit.
(10) The pool shall contract with organizations that provide care
management that has been demonstrated to be effective and shall
encourage enrollees who are eligible for care management services to
participate. The pool may encourage the use of shared decision making
and certified decision aids for preference-sensitive care areas.
(11) The board may modify the covered services and cost-sharing for
pool policies to comply with the requirements of the affordable care
act to maintain minimum essential coverage and otherwise as necessary
for covered persons not to be subject to the shared responsibility
payment under the affordable care act. For purposes of this
subsection, "affordable care act" means the federal patient protection
and affordable care act, P.L. 111-148, as amended by the federal health
care and education reconciliation act of 2010, P.L. 111-152, and
federal regulations and guidance issued under the affordable care act.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.41.120 and 2007 c 259 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitation provided in subsection (3) of this
section, the comprehensive pool policy offered under RCW 48.41.110(4)
shall impose a deductible as provided in this subsection. Deductibles
of five hundred dollars and one thousand dollars on a per person per
calendar year basis shall initially be offered. The board may
authorize deductibles in other amounts. The deductible shall be
applied to the first five hundred dollars, one thousand dollars, or
other authorized amount of eligible expenses incurred by the covered
person.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section and
subject to the limitations provided in subsection (3) of this section,
a mandatory coinsurance requirement shall be imposed at a rate not to
exceed twenty percent of eligible expenses in excess of the mandatory
deductible and which supports the efficient delivery of high quality
health care services for the medical conditions of pool enrollees.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the
maximum aggregate out of pocket payments for eligible expenses by the
insured in the form of deductibles and coinsurance under the
comprehensive pool policy offered under RCW 48.41.110(4) shall not
exceed in a calendar year:
(a) One thousand five hundred dollars per individual, or three
thousand dollars per family, per calendar year for the five hundred
dollar deductible policy;
(b) Two thousand five hundred dollars per individual, or five
thousand dollars per family per calendar year for the one thousand
dollar deductible policy; or
(c) An amount authorized by the board for any other deductible
policy.
(4) Except for those enrolled in a high deductible health plan
qualified under federal law for use with a health savings account,
eligible expenses incurred by a covered person in the last three months
of a calendar year, and applied toward a deductible, shall also be
applied toward the deductible amount in the next calendar year.
(5) The board may modify:
(a) Cost-sharing as an incentive for enrollees to participate in
care management services and other cost-effective programs and
policies; and
(b) Covered services and cost-sharing pursuant to RCW 48.41.110.

--- END ---