BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Breastfeeding-friendly Washington is a voluntary program to
encourage and recognize hospitals, health care providers, workplaces,
and child day care centers that offer an optimal level of care for
infant feeding.
(2) The department of health shall create the breastfeeding-friendly Washington designations and may adopt rules to recognize the
level of achievement by participating hospitals, health care providers,
workplaces, and child day care centers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2014, a hospital may use the breastfeeding-friendly Washington designation provided in subsection (2) of this
section on promotional materials if the hospital achieves criteria
defined by the department of health based on the following ten steps to
successful breastfeeding:
(a) Have a written breastfeeding policy that is routinely
communicated to all health care staff;
(b) Train all health care staff in skills necessary to implement
this policy;
(c) Inform all pregnant women about the benefits and management of
breastfeeding;
(d) Help mothers initiate breastfeeding within one hour of birth;
(e) Show mothers how to breastfeed and how to maintain lactation,
even if they are separated from their infants;
(f) Give newborn infants no food or drink other than breast milk,
unless medically indicated;
(g) Practice rooming in by allowing mothers and infants to remain
together twenty-four hours a day;
(h) Encourage breastfeeding on demand;
(i) Give no pacifiers or artificial nipples to breastfeeding
infants; or
(j) Foster the establishment of breastfeeding support groups and
refer mothers to them on discharge from the hospital or clinic.
(2) A hospital seeking to use the breastfeeding-friendly Washington
designation must submit its breastfeeding policy and supporting
documentation with its application to the department of health for
approval. The department shall review and approve those policies and
supporting documentation that meet the requirements of this section and
issue a designation based on the number of steps met by the hospital.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "hospital" means the
maternity or newborn service of a facility licensed under chapter 70.41
RCW and includes "birthing center" or "childbirth center" as defined in
RCW 18.46.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2014, a health care provider may use the
breastfeeding-friendly Washington designation provided in subsection
(2) of this section on promotional materials if the health care
provider achieves criteria defined by the department of health based on
the following ten steps:
(a) Develops a written policy supporting breastfeeding mothers and
breastfeeding as the optimal infant feeding method and communicates the
policy clearly and routinely to all clinic staff;
(b) Does not offer coupons for formula, free formula samples, or
gift bags containing formula (for nonemergency situations) and does not
display formula manufacturer's marketing materials;
(c) Provides a breastfeeding-friendly environment, such as
welcoming mothers to nurse their babies at the facility, displaying
posters that support breastfeeding, and making available infant feeding
best practice information;
(d) Completes training on breastfeeding, assures office staff
receive training on breastfeeding, and stays up-to-date with current
practices of care;
(e) Assures office staff provide updated breastfeeding resources to
pregnant and breastfeeding women;
(f) Helps pregnant women and their families learn about
breastfeeding management and the importance of breastfeeding for their
babies and themselves;
(g) Encourages pregnant women to include breastfeeding in their
birth plan and to attend breastfeeding classes;
(h) Includes evidence-based breastfeeding support as a standard of
care, such as ensuring mother and baby see a health care provider to
discuss infant feeding within three days of hospital discharge;
(i) Establishes partnerships for coordinated care after delivery;
or
(j) Implements a quality improvement plan to support breastfeeding
and to address the quality of care provided to breastfeeding mothers
and their babies.
(2) A health care provider seeking to use the breastfeeding-friendly Washington designation must submit its breastfeeding policy
and supporting documentation with his or her application to the
department of health for approval. The department of health shall
review and approve those policies and supporting documentation that
meet the requirements of this section and issue a designation based on
the number of steps met by the health care provider.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "health care provider" means
any person licensed under Title 18 RCW to provide maternity and infant
care services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2016, an employer may use the breastfeeding-friendly Washington designation provided in subsection (2) of this
section on promotional materials if the employer achieves criteria
defined by the department of health based on the following ten steps:
(a) Develops a written policy that supports breastfeeding or allows
flexible schedules for employees to pump their milk;
(b) Provides a secure place with an electrical outlet for pumping
milk other than a toilet stall or bathroom;
(c) Provides a safe place for employees to store their pumped milk;
(d) Educates managers on the importance of breastfeeding and
policies that support breastfeeding employees;
(e) Provides updated breastfeeding resources to pregnant and
breastfeeding employees to help them balance the requirements for
breastfeeding with their job responsibilities;
(f) Provides a minimum of twelve weeks of unpaid leave that can be
used for maternity leave under the family and medical leave act;
(g) Offers lactation support programs as part of the basic employee
benefits package;
(h) Offers breastfeeding employees options for returning to work
such as part-time employment, job sharing, telecommuting, or flextime
to accommodate continued breastfeeding;
(i) Includes policies and benefits that support breastfeeding
employees in new employee orientation; or
(j) Provides on-site child care or policies that allow mothers to
directly breastfeed their babies after they return to work.
(2) An employer seeking to use the breastfeeding-friendly
Washington designation must submit its breastfeeding policy and
supporting documentation with its application to the department of
health for approval. The department of health shall review and approve
those policies and supporting documentation that meet the requirements
of this section and issue a designation based on the number of steps
met by the employer.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "employer" includes those
employers defined in RCW 49.12.005 and also includes the state, state
institutions, state agencies, political subdivisions of the state, and
municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2016, a child day care center may use the
breastfeeding-friendly Washington designation provided in subsection
(2) of this section on promotional materials if the child day care
center achieves criteria defined by the department of health based on
the following ten steps:
(a) Makes a commitment to the importance of breastfeeding,
especially exclusive breastfeeding, and shares this commitment with
staff;
(b) Trains all staff to promote optimal infant and young child
feeding;
(c) Informs women and families about the importance of
breastfeeding;
(d) Develops a breastfeeding-friendly feeding plan with each
family;
(e) Trains all staff to handle, store, and feed mother's milk
properly;
(f) Ensures that all breastfeeding families are able to properly
store and label milk for child day care center use;
(g) Provides a breastfeeding-friendly environment, such as
welcoming mothers to nurse their babies at the facility, displaying
posters that support breastfeeding, and having information that shows
best practices;
(h) Supports breastfeeding employees;
(i) Keeps updated resource lists of local breastfeeding services
and share these lists with breastfeeding employees; or
(j) Offers staff ongoing training opportunities and updates about
breastfeeding support.
(2) A child day care center seeking to use the breastfeeding-friendly Washington designation must submit its breastfeeding policy
and supporting documentation with its application to the department of
health for approval. The department of health shall review and approve
those policies and supporting documentation that meet the requirements
of this section and issue a designation based on the number of steps
met by the child day care center.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "child day care center" has
the meaning provided in RCW 43.215.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts, as now
existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective July 1,
2016: RCW 43.70.640 (Workplace breastfeeding policies -- Infant-friendly
designation) and 2001 c 88 s 3.

--- END ---