BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state
benefits substantially from additional tax revenues generated from
certain short-term major public events. Local governments incur
significant costs in attracting, staging, and maintaining the venues
for such events. The legislature further finds that the current
distribution of additional temporary increased sales tax revenue from
such events fails to recognize the significant local government costs
necessary to maintain and improve the venues to attract and host such
events. The legislature therefore finds it appropriate to share a
portion of the temporary new revenue derived from the event with the
local government responsible for providing and maintaining the event
venues in order to continue to attract such events.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A county special events tax program is
created. An eligible county may apply to receive a temporary
additional portion of the state sales tax imposed under chapter 82.08
RCW, as provided in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Eligible county" means a county that is host to a paid
admission public event:
(a) For which venue selection is made independently of the county;
(b) For which preparation requirements extend beyond the normal use
of the existing venue support facilities and include event support
costs borne by the county; and
(c) That is eligible under the provisions of section 4(4) of this
act.
(2) "Event period" means the fiscal quarter in which the event
occurs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Not later than ninety days prior to the
first day of the event, the executive authority of a county expecting
to be eligible under this chapter must provide the department with a
statement indicating the county's expectation that it will be eligible
for selective temporary shared revenue from this event under the
provisions of this chapter. Accompanying this notification, the county
must provide supporting documentation and applicable metrics
demonstrating the extent of the anticipated additional tax income
generated from the event.
(2) Tax collection and remission proceeds normally during the event
period, except that the department will ensure that it has the means to
track collections in the eligible county for validation after the
event.
(3) Within ninety days following the end of the fiscal year in
which the event occurred, the department must compute the sales tax
revenue derived from the eligible county during the event period. The
department must then compare that amount to an average for the same
period in the same county for the three previous years.
(4) If the department finds that revenue during the event period
exceeds the average for the three previous years by an amount greater
than two million dollars it must declare the county eligible to receive
a temporary share of the additional revenues subject to the provisions
of this chapter. The department must notify the eligible county of its
findings within ninety days.
(5)(a) The state must make disbursements under this chapter to the
economic development endowment account of the eligible county as
follows: Forty percent of state sales tax revenue collected in the
eligible county from the event period in excess of the average for the
same period in the preceding three years. Such disbursements must be
treated as a one-time occurrence establishing no entitlement to any
future disbursement unless specifically authorized by law.
(b) In addition to any disbursements from state sales tax revenue
under (a) of this subsection, an eligible county may also accept funds
from other public or private sources into its economic development
endowment account, if those funds are used exclusively for the purposes
specified in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) An eligible county that has applied to
receive tax revenue under this section must agree to create and
maintain an economic development endowment account. Any funds
deposited in the account may only be used for the support of venues
suitable for hosting eligible events under this section.
(2) An eligible county may receive additional funds from other
public or private sources for deposit into the economic development
endowment account; however, such funds may only be spent for the
purposes specified in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act expires December 31, 2016.

--- END ---