BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.12.040 and 2013 c 113 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, before
payment is made by or on behalf of the state, or any county,
municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws, of any sum
or sums due on account of a public works contract, it is the duty of
the officer or person charged with the custody and disbursement of
public funds to require the contractor and each and every subcontractor
from the contractor or a subcontractor to submit to such officer a
"Statement of Intent to Pay Prevailing Wages". For a contract in
excess of ten thousand dollars, the statement of intent to pay
prevailing wages must include:
(i) The contractor's registration certificate number; and
(ii) The prevailing rate of wage for each classification of workers
entitled to prevailing wages under RCW 39.12.020 and the estimated
number of workers in each classification.
(b) Each statement of intent to pay prevailing wages must be
approved by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries before it is submitted to the disbursing officer. Unless
otherwise authorized by the department of labor and industries, each
voucher claim submitted by a contractor for payment on a project
estimate must state that the prevailing wages have been paid in
accordance with the prefiled statement or statements of intent to pay
prevailing wages on file with the public agency. Following the final
acceptance of a public works project, it is the duty of the officer
charged with the disbursement of public funds, to require the
contractor and each and every subcontractor from the contractor or a
subcontractor to submit to such officer an affidavit of wages paid
before the funds retained according to the provisions of RCW 60.28.011
are released to the contractor. On a public works project where no
retainage is withheld pursuant to RCW 60.28.011(1)(b), the affidavit of
wages paid must be submitted to the state, county, municipality, or
other public body charged with the duty of disbursing or authorizing
disbursement of public funds prior to final acceptance of the public
works project. If a subcontractor performing work on a public works
project fails to submit an affidavit of wages paid form, the contractor
or subcontractor with whom the subcontractor had a contractual
relationship for the project may file the forms on behalf of the
nonresponsive subcontractor. Affidavit forms may only be filed on
behalf of a nonresponsive subcontractor who has ceased operations or
failed to file as required by this section. The contractor filing the
affidavit must accept responsibility for payment of prevailing wages
unpaid by the subcontractor on the project pursuant to RCW 39.12.020
and 39.12.065. Intentionally filing a false affidavit on behalf of a
subcontractor subjects the filer to the same penalties as are provided
in RCW 39.12.050. Each affidavit of wages paid must be certified by
the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries
before it is submitted to the disbursing officer.
(2) As an alternate to the procedures provided for in subsection
(1) of this section, for public works projects of two thousand five
hundred dollars or less and for projects where the limited public works
process under RCW 39.04.155(3) is followed:
(a) An awarding agency may authorize the contractor or
subcontractor to submit the statement of intent to pay prevailing wages
directly to the officer or person charged with the custody or
disbursement of public funds in the awarding agency without approval by
the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries.
The awarding agency must retain such statement of intent to pay
prevailing wages for a period of not less than three years.
(b) Upon final acceptance of the public works project, the awarding
agency must require the contractor or subcontractor to submit an
affidavit of wages paid. Upon receipt of the affidavit of wages paid,
the awarding agency may pay the contractor or subcontractor in full,
including funds that would otherwise be retained according to the
provisions of RCW 60.28.011. Within thirty days of receipt of the
affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency must submit the affidavit
of wages paid to the industrial statistician of the department of labor
and industries for approval.
(c) A statement of intent to pay prevailing wages and an affidavit
of wages paid must be on forms approved by the department of labor and
industries.
(d) In the event of a wage claim and a finding for the claimant by
the department of labor and industries where the awarding agency has
used the alternative process provided for in this subsection (2), the
awarding agency must pay the wages due directly to the claimant. If
the contractor or subcontractor did not pay the wages stated in the
affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency may take action at law to
seek reimbursement from the contractor or subcontractor of wages paid
to the claimant, and may prohibit the contractor or subcontractor from
bidding on any public works contract of the awarding agency for up to
one year.
(e) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to allow an awarding
agency to subdivide any public works project of more than two thousand
five hundred dollars for the purpose of circumventing the procedures
required by subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Before payment is made by or on behalf of the state, or any
county, municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws, it
is the duty of the officer or person charged with the custody and
disbursement of public funds to require the contractor and each and
every subcontractor to submit to the officer or person charged with the
custody and disbursement of public funds current, complete, and
accurate certified payroll records. Following the final acceptance of
a public works project, it is the duty of the officer charged with the
disbursement of public funds to require the contractor and each and
every subcontractor to submit current, complete, and accurate certified
payroll records before final payment is made and funds retained
according to the provisions of RCW 60.28.011 are released to the
contractor. The awarding agency shall be held harmless and is not
liable for the currency, completeness, or accuracy of certified payroll
records submitted under this section.
(4) Certified payroll records provided to the officer or person
charged with the custody and disbursement of public funds under this
section must be submitted in a format acceptable to the officer or
person charged with the custody and disbursement of public funds.

--- END ---