BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.52.070 and 2010 c 8 s 12056 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any employer and any officer, vice principal or agent of any
employer who shall violate any of the provisions of RCW 49.52.050 (1)
and (2) shall be liable in a civil action by the aggrieved employee or
his or her assignee to judgment for ((twice)) the amount of the wages
unlawfully rebated or withheld plus twice that amount by way of
exemplary damages, together with costs of suit and a reasonable sum for
attorney's fees((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the benefits of this
section shall not be available to any employee who has knowingly
submitted to such violations)).

--- END ---