BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many workers are
unable to exercise their wage and hour rights because of fear of
adverse action or actual adverse action by unscrupulous employers.
Employers should not gain a competitive advantage against law abiding
business by retaliating or discriminating against their employees. No
employee should have to fear adverse action simply for engaging in
rights the state of Washington has deemed so important that they are
protected by law. It is in the public interest of the state of
Washington that employees be able to report concerns to their employers
without fear of retaliation or discrimination. The legislature finds
that strong, clear, and effective protections for employees will help
address the problems of employer retaliation.

MINIMUM WAGE ACT
Sec. 2 RCW 49.46.010 and 2013 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Director" means the director of labor and industries or the
director's authorized representative;
(2) "Employ" includes to permit to work;
(3) "Employee" includes any individual employed by an employer but
shall not include:
(a) Any individual (i) employed as a hand harvest laborer and paid
on a piece rate basis in an operation which has been, and is generally
and customarily recognized as having been, paid on a piece rate basis
in the region of employment; (ii) who commutes daily from his or her
permanent residence to the farm on which he or she is employed; and
(iii) who has been employed in agriculture less than thirteen weeks
during the preceding calendar year;
(b) Any individual employed in casual labor in or about a private
home, unless performed in the course of the employer's trade, business,
or profession;
(c) Any individual employed in a bona fide executive,
administrative, or professional capacity or in the capacity of outside
salesperson as those terms are defined and delimited by rules of the
director. However, those terms shall be defined and delimited by the
human resources director pursuant to chapter 41.06 RCW for employees
employed under the director of personnel's jurisdiction;
(d) Any individual engaged in the activities of an educational,
charitable, religious, state or local governmental body or agency, or
nonprofit organization where the employer-employee relationship does
not in fact exist or where the services are rendered to such
organizations gratuitously. If the individual receives reimbursement
in lieu of compensation for normally incurred out-of-pocket expenses or
receives a nominal amount of compensation per unit of voluntary service
rendered, an employer-employee relationship is deemed not to exist for
the purpose of this section or for purposes of membership or
qualification in any state, local government, or publicly supported
retirement system other than that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;
(e) Any individual employed full time by any state or local
governmental body or agency who provides voluntary services but only
with regard to the provision of the voluntary services. The voluntary
services and any compensation therefor shall not affect or add to
qualification, entitlement, or benefit rights under any state, local
government, or publicly supported retirement system other than that
provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;
(f) Any newspaper vendor, carrier, or delivery person selling or
distributing newspapers on the street, to offices, to businesses, or
from house to house and any freelance news correspondent or "stringer"
who, using his or her own equipment, chooses to submit material for
publication for free or a fee when such material is published;
(g) Any carrier subject to regulation by Part 1 of the Interstate
Commerce Act;
(h) Any individual engaged in forest protection and fire prevention
activities;
(i) Any individual employed by any charitable institution charged
with child care responsibilities engaged primarily in the development
of character or citizenship or promoting health or physical fitness or
providing or sponsoring recreational opportunities or facilities for
young people or members of the armed forces of the United States;
(j) Any individual whose duties require that he or she reside or
sleep at the place of his or her employment or who otherwise spends a
substantial portion of his or her work time subject to call, and not
engaged in the performance of active duties;
(k) Any resident, inmate, or patient of a state, county, or
municipal correctional, detention, treatment or rehabilitative
institution;
(l) Any individual who holds a public elective or appointive office
of the state, any county, city, town, municipal corporation or quasi
municipal corporation, political subdivision, or any instrumentality
thereof, or any employee of the state legislature;
(m) All vessel operating crews of the Washington state ferries
operated by the department of transportation;
(n) Any individual employed as a seaman on a vessel other than an
American vessel;
(4) "Employer" includes any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, business trust, or any person or group of persons acting
directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an
employee;
(5) "Occupation" means any occupation, service, trade, business,
industry, or branch or group of industries or employment or class of
employment in which employees are gainfully employed;
(6) "Retail or service establishment" means an establishment
seventy-five percent of whose annual dollar volume of sales of goods or
services, or both, is not for resale and is recognized as retail sales
or services in the particular industry;
(7) "Wage" means compensation due to an employee by reason of
employment, payable in legal tender of the United States or checks on
banks convertible into cash on demand at full face value, subject to
such deductions, charges, or allowances as may be permitted by rules of
the director;
(8) "Adverse action" means discharging, denying a promotion,
demoting, failing to rehire after a seasonal interruption of work,
threatening, penalizing, retaliating, engaging in unfair immigration-related practices, filing a false report with a government agency,
changing an employee's status to a nonemployee, or otherwise
discriminating against an employee. "Adverse action" may involve any
aspect of employment, including pay, work hours, responsibilities, or
other material change in the terms and condition of employment;
(9) "Department" means the department of labor and industries;
(10) "Front pay" means the compensation the employee would earn if
reinstated to his or her former position;
(11) "Interested party" includes: A contractor or subcontractor or
an employee of a contractor or subcontractor; the director or the
director's designee; an organization whose members' wages, benefits,
and conditions of employment are affected by this chapter, including a
labor union; or any other organization of workers that exists for the
purpose, in whole or in part, of interacting with employers;
(12)(a) "Pattern or practice" means that, in addition to the
current violation, within the previous ten years the employer was:
(i) Convicted of a criminal violation of a state or local law
concerning retaliation;
(ii) Subject to a court order entering final judgment for a
violation of section 3, 9, 14, or 19 of this act, and the judgment was
not satisfied or current within thirty days of the later of:
(A) The expiration of the time for appealing the order; or
(B) If a timely appeal was made, the date of the final resolution
of the appeal; or
(iii) Subject to a final and binding citation and notice of
assessment from the department for a violation of section 3, 9, 14, or
19 of this act, and the citation and penalty were not satisfied or
current within thirty days of the date the citation became final and
binding.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (12), an employer includes
a successor employer, as defined in RCW 49.48.082;
(13)(a) "Unfair immigration-related practice" includes any of the
following practices:
(i) Requesting more or different documents than are required under
8 U.S.C. Sec. 1324a(b), or a refusal to honor documents tendered
pursuant to that section that on their face reasonably appear to be
genuine;
(ii) Using the federal E-Verify system to check the employment
authorization status of a person at a time or in a manner not required
under 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1324a(b), or not authorized under any memorandum of
understanding governing the use of the federal E-Verify system;
(iii) Threatening to file or the filing of a false police report;
(iv) Threatening to contact or contacting immigration authorities;
(v) Withholding or threatening to destroy documents related to a
person's immigration status.
(b) "Unfair immigration-related practice" does not include conduct
undertaken at the express and specific direction or request of the
federal government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employer, any of its agents, or any person acting on behalf
of the employer may not take adverse action against any individual or
individuals because:
(a) An employee or former employee has informed any other person or
made a complaint, or the employer believes an employee has informed any
other person or made a complaint, including to the employer, the
department, the attorney general, or any other person that the employer
engaged in conduct that an employee reasonably believes violates this
chapter;
(b) An employee or former employee demands from the employee's
employer a lawful claim under this chapter;
(c) An employee or former employee has caused to be instituted, or
is about to cause to be instituted, a proceeding under or related to
this chapter;
(d) An employee or former employee has testified or is about to
testify in a proceeding under or related to this chapter;
(e) An employee has refused to participate in an activity that
would result in a violation of state or federal law;
(f) An employee or former employee has sought information about his
or her rights under this chapter or informed others about their rights
under this chapter;
(g) An employee or former employee has, or the employer believes an
employee has, otherwise exercised rights protected by this chapter; or
(h) An employee or former employee filed a complaint with the
department or brought suit in court where the employer was determined
to have violated this chapter.
(2) If an employer takes adverse action against an employee or
former employee within ninety days of an activity described in
subsection (1) of this section, the employer is presumed to have acted
in retaliation in violation of subsection (1) of this section.
However, in the case of seasonal work that ended before the close of
the ninety day period, the presumption also applies if the employer
fails to rehire a former employee at the next opportunity for work in
the same position. The employer may rebut the presumption with clear
and convincing evidence that the adverse action was taken for a
permissible purpose.
(3) A complaint or other communication by an employee triggers the
protections of this section regardless of whether the complaint or
communication is in writing or makes explicit reference to this
chapter.
(4) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An individual aggrieved or an interested party filing on behalf
of an individual aggrieved by section 3 of this act may file a
complaint with the director.
(2) If an individual aggrieved or an interested party filing on
behalf of an individual aggrieved files a complaint with the
department, the director may investigate the complaint. If, following
an investigation, the director determines that an employer violated
section 3 of this act, the director may order the employer to comply
with any one or more of the following:
(a) Pay a civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars and
not more than ten thousand dollars per individual aggrieved. The
department must deposit civil penalties under this section in the
supplemental pension fund established under RCW 51.44.033.
(b)(i) Subject to (b)(ii) of this subsection, pay any aggrieved
individual not less than one thousand dollars and not more than ten
thousand dollars.
(ii) If an employee or former employee is the aggrieved individual,
pay the individual the greater of:
(A) The amount of any civil penalty imposed under (a) of this
subsection; or
(B) Three times the amount of any wages, salary, and employment
benefits unlawfully denied or withheld, except benefits under Title 50
or 51 RCW.
(c) If the aggrieved individual is a former employee of the
violating employer, reinstate the aggrieved individual as an employee
at not less than the most recent rate of pay received by the employee.
The director may award front pay in lieu of reinstatement.
(3) An appeal from the director's determination may be taken in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, with the prevailing party entitled
to recover reasonable costs and attorneys' fees.
(4) The director may not investigate any alleged violation under
this section that occurred more than three years before the date that
the employee filed the complaint. This period is tolled during any
period of time that an employer, any of its agents, or any person
acting on behalf of the employer deters an individual from filing a
complaint.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An individual aggrieved by a violation of section 3 of this act
may bring suit on behalf of himself or herself or on behalf of any
other individuals similarly situated.
(2) If a court determines that an employer violated section 3 of
this act, the court, unless prohibited by federal law:
(a)(i) Shall award statutory damages for each individual aggrieved
by the violation. Subject to (a)(ii) of this subsection, statutory
damages must not be less than one thousand dollars and not more ten
thousand dollars per individual, unless the employer engaged in a
pattern or practice of violations, in which case the statutory damages
must be not less than ten thousand dollars and not more than twenty-five thousand dollars per individual;
(ii) If an employee or former employee is the individual subject to
adverse action, the court shall award the greater of:
(A) The amounts specified in (a)(i) of this subsection; or
(B) Three times the amount of any wages, salary, and employment
benefits unlawfully denied or withheld, except benefits under Title 50
or 51 RCW;
(b) May award actual damages sustained by the individual;
(c) May order injunctive or other equitable relief if the aggrieved
individual is an employee or former employee of the violating employer.
The relief may include:
(i) Reinstatement of the former employee as an employee to his or
her former position at not less than the most recent rate of
compensation received by the employee, including the value of any
benefits; or
(ii) Front pay in lieu of reinstatement;
(d)(i) For a first violation, may order the appropriate government
agencies to suspend all licenses that are held by the violating party
for a period of up to fourteen days. The licenses that are subject to
suspension are all licenses, certifications, or registrations held by
the violating party specific to the business location or locations
where the adverse action occurred;
(ii) For a second violation, the court may order the appropriate
government agencies to suspend all licenses that are held by the
violating party for a period of up to thirty days. The licenses that
are subject to suspension are all licenses held by the violating party
specific to the business location or locations where the adverse action
occurred;
(iii) For a third violation, the court may order the appropriate
government agencies to suspend all licenses that are held by the
violating party for a period of up to ninety days. The licenses that
are subject to suspension are all licenses held by the violating party
specific to the business location or locations where the adverse action
occurred.
(e) Shall award attorneys' fees and costs.
(3) A civil action under this section must be brought no later than
three years after the violation occurred. This period is tolled during
any period of time that an employer, any of its agents, or any person
acting on behalf of the employer deters an individual from bringing an
action under this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 49.46.100 and 2010 c 8 s 12044 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) Any employer who hinders or delays the director or his or
her authorized representatives in the performance of his or her duties
in the enforcement of this chapter, or refuses to admit the director or
his or her authorized representatives to any place of employment, or
fails to make, keep, and preserve any records as required under the
provisions of this chapter, or falsifies any such record, or refuses to
make any record accessible to the director or his or her authorized
representatives upon demand, or refuses to furnish a sworn statement of
such record or any other information required for the proper
enforcement of this chapter to the director or his or her authorized
representatives upon demand, or pays or agrees to pay wages at a rate
less than the rate applicable under this chapter, or otherwise violates
any provision of this chapter or of any regulation issued under this
chapter shall be deemed in violation of this chapter and shall, upon
conviction therefor, be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(((2) Any employer who discharges or in any other manner
discriminates against any employee because such employee has made any
complaint to his or her employer, to the director, or his or her
authorized representatives that he or she has not been paid wages in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or that the employer
has violated any provision of this chapter, or because such employee
has caused to be instituted or is about to cause to be instituted any
proceeding under or related to this chapter, or because such employee
has testified or is about to testify in any such proceeding shall be
deemed in violation of this chapter and shall, upon conviction
therefor, be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.))

INDUSTRIAL WELFARE ACT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employer, any of its agents, or any person acting on behalf
of the employer may not take adverse action against any individual or
individuals because an employee has updated or attempted to update his
or her personal information, unless the change is directly related to
the skill set or knowledge required for the job.
(2) If an employer takes adverse action against an employee or
former employee within ninety days of an activity described in
subsection (1) of this section, the employer is presumed to have acted
in retaliation in violation of subsection (1) of this section.
However, in the case of seasonal work that ended before the close of
the ninety day period, the presumption also applies if the employer
fails to rehire a former employee at the next opportunity for work in
the same position. The employer may rebut the presumption with clear
and convincing evidence that the adverse action was taken for a
permissible purpose.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "adverse action" has the same
meaning as in RCW 49.46.010.
(4) An interested party or individual aggrieved by this section may
file a complaint under section 4 of this act.
(5) An individual aggrieved by a violation of this section may also
bring suit on behalf of himself or herself or on behalf of any other
individuals similarly situated under section 5 of this act.
(6) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

WAGE PAYMENT ACT
Sec. 8 RCW 49.48.082 and 2010 c 42 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
RCW 49.48.083 through 49.48.086:
(1) "Citation" means a written determination by the department that
a wage payment requirement has been violated.
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Determination of compliance" means a written determination by
the department that wage payment requirements have not been violated.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries, or the director's authorized representative.
(5) "Employee" has the meaning provided in: (a) RCW 49.46.010 for
purposes of a wage payment requirement set forth in RCW 49.46.020 or
49.46.130; and (b) RCW 49.12.005 for purposes of a wage payment
requirement set forth in RCW 49.48.010, 49.52.050, or 49.52.060.
(6) "Employer" has the meaning provided in RCW 49.46.010 for
purposes of a wage payment requirement set forth in RCW 49.46.020,
49.46.130, 49.48.010, 49.52.050, or 49.52.060.
(7) "Notice of assessment" means a written notice by the department
that, based on a citation, the employer shall pay the amounts assessed
under RCW 49.48.083.
(8) "Repeat willful violator" means any employer that has been the
subject of a final and binding citation and notice of assessment for a
willful violation of a wage payment requirement within three years of
the date of issue of the most recent citation and notice of assessment
for a willful violation of a wage payment requirement.
(9) "Successor" means any person to whom an employer quitting,
selling out, exchanging, or disposing of a business sells or otherwise
conveys in bulk and not in the ordinary course of the employer's
business, more than fifty percent of the property, whether real or
personal, tangible or intangible, of the employer's business.
(10) "Wage" has the meaning provided in RCW 49.46.010.
(11) "Wage complaint" means a complaint from an employee to the
department that asserts that an employer has violated one or more wage
payment requirements and that is reduced to writing.
(12) "Wage payment requirement" means a wage payment requirement
set forth in RCW 49.46.020, 49.46.130, 49.48.010, 49.52.050, or
49.52.060, and any related rules adopted by the department.
(13) "Willful" means a knowing and intentional action that is
neither accidental nor the result of a bona fide dispute, as evaluated
under the standards applicable to wage payment violations under RCW
49.52.050(2).
(14) "Adverse action" means discharging, denying a promotion,
demoting, failing to rehire after a seasonal interruption of work,
threatening, penalizing, retaliating, engaging in unfair immigration-related practices, filing a false report with a government agency,
changing an employee's status to a nonemployee, or otherwise
discriminating against an employee. "Adverse action" may involve any
aspect of employment, including pay, work hours, responsibilities, or
other material change in the terms and condition of employment.
(15) "Front pay" means the compensation the employee would earn if
reinstated to his or her former position.
(16) "Interested party" includes: A contractor or subcontractor or
an employee of a contractor or subcontractor; the director or the
director's designee; an organization whose members' wages, benefits,
and conditions of employment are affected by this chapter, including a
labor union; or any other organization of workers that exists for the
purpose, in whole or in part, of interacting with employers.
(17)(a) "Pattern or practice" means that, in addition to the
current violation, within the previous ten years the employer was:
(i) Convicted of a criminal violation of a state or local law
concerning retaliation;
(ii) Subject to a court order entering final judgment for a
violation of section 3, 9, 14, or 19 of this act, and the judgment was
not satisfied or current within thirty days of the later of:
(A) The expiration of the time for appealing the order; or
(B) If a timely appeal was made, the date of the final resolution
of the appeal; or
(iii) Subject to a final and binding citation and notice of
assessment from the department for a violation of section 3, 14, or 19
of this act, and the citation and penalty were not satisfied or current
within thirty days of the date the citation became final and binding.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (17), an employer includes
a successor employer, as defined in RCW 49.48.082.
(18)(a) "Unfair immigration-related practice" includes any of the
following practices:
(i) Requesting more or different documents than are required under
8 U.S.C. Sec. 1324a(b), or a refusal to honor documents tendered
pursuant to that section that on their face reasonably appear to be
genuine;
(ii) Using the federal E-Verify system to check the employment
authorization status of a person at a time or in a manner not required
under 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1324a(b), or not authorized under any memorandum of
understanding governing the use of the federal E-Verify system;
(iii) Threatening to file or the filing of a false police report;
(iv) Threatening to contact or contacting immigration authorities;
(v) Withholding or threatening to destroy documents related to a
person's immigration status.
(b) "Unfair immigration-related practice" does not include conduct
undertaken at the express and specific direction or request of the
federal government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) An employer, any of its agents, or any
person acting on behalf of the employer may not take adverse action
against any individual or individuals because:
(a) An employee or former employee has informed any other person or
made a complaint, or the employer believes an employee has informed any
other person or made a complaint, including to the employer, the
department, the attorney general, or any other person that the employer
engaged in conduct that an employee reasonably believes violates this
chapter;
(b) An employee or former employee demands from the employee's
employer a lawful claim under this chapter;
(c) An employee or former employee has caused to be instituted, or
is about to cause to be instituted, a proceeding under or related to
this chapter;
(d) An employee or former employee has testified or is about to
testify in a proceeding under or related to this chapter;
(e) An employee has refused to participate in an activity that
would result in a violation of state or federal law;
(f) An employee or former employee has sought information about his
or her rights under this chapter or informed others about their rights
under this chapter;
(g) An employee or former employee has, or the employer believes an
employee has, otherwise exercised rights protected by this chapter; or
(h) An employee or former employee filed a complaint with the
department or brought suit in court where the employer was determined
to have violated this chapter.
(2) If an employer takes adverse action against an employee or
former employee within ninety days of an activity described in
subsection (1) of this section, the employer is presumed to have acted
in retaliation in violation of subsection (1) of this section.
However, in the case of seasonal work that ended before the close of
the ninety day period, the presumption also applies if the employer
fails to rehire a former employee at the next opportunity for work in
the same position. The employer may rebut the presumption with clear
and convincing evidence that the adverse action was taken for a
permissible purpose.
(3) A complaint or other communication by an employee triggers the
protections of this section regardless of whether the complaint or
communication is in writing or makes explicit reference to this
chapter.
(4) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) An individual aggrieved or an
interested party filing on behalf of an individual aggrieved by section
9 of this act may file a complaint with the director on behalf of
himself or herself. If an individual aggrieved or an interested party
filing on behalf of an individual aggrieved files a complaint with the
department, the director may investigate the complaint.
(2) If, following an investigation, the director determines that an
employer violated section 9 of this act, it may order the employer to
comply with any one or more of the following:
(a) Pay a civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars and
not more than ten thousand dollars per individual aggrieved. The
department must deposit civil penalties under this section in the
supplemental pension fund established under RCW 51.44.033.
(b)(i) Subject to (b)(ii) of this subsection, pay any aggrieved
individual not less than one thousand dollars and not more than ten
thousand dollars.
(ii) If an employee or former employee is the aggrieved individual,
pay the individual the greater of:
(A) The amount of any civil penalty imposed under (a) of this
subsection; or
(B) Three times the amount of any wages, salary, and employment
benefits unlawfully denied or withheld, except benefits under Title 50
or 51 RCW.
(c) If the aggrieved individual is a former employee of the
violating employer, reinstate the aggrieved individual as an employee
at not less than the most recent rate of pay received by the employee.
The director may award front pay in lieu of reinstatement.
(3) An appeal from the director's determination may be taken in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, with the prevailing party entitled
to recover reasonable costs and attorneys' fees.
(4) The director may not investigate any alleged violation under
this section that occurred more than three years before the date that
the employee filed the complaint. This period is tolled during any
period of time that an employer, any of its agents, or any person
acting on behalf of the employer deters an individual from filing a
complaint.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) An individual aggrieved by a violation
of section 9 of this act may bring suit on behalf of himself or herself
or on behalf of any other individuals similarly situated.
(2) If a court determines that an employer violated section 9 of
this act, the court, unless prohibited by federal law:
(a)(i) Shall award statutory damages for each individual aggrieved
by the violation. Subject to (a)(ii) of this subsection, statutory
damages must not be less than one thousand dollars and not more ten
thousand dollars per individual, unless the employer engaged in a
pattern or practice of violations, in which case the statutory damages
must be not less than ten thousand dollars and not more than twenty-five thousand dollars per individual;
(ii) If an employee or former employee is the individual subject to
adverse action, the court shall award the greater of:
(A) The amounts specified in (a)(i) of this subsection; or
(B) Three times the amount of any wages, salary, and employment
benefits unlawfully denied or withheld, except benefits under Title 50
or 51 RCW;
(b) May award actual damages sustained by the individual;
(c) May order injunctive or other equitable relief if the aggrieved
individual is an employee or former employee of the violating employer.
The relief may include:
(i) Reinstatement of the former employee as an employee to his or
her former position at not less than the most recent rate of
compensation received by the employee, including the value of any
benefits; or
(ii) Front pay in lieu of reinstatement;
(d)(i) For a first violation, may order the appropriate government
agencies to suspend all licenses that are held by the violating party
for a period of up to fourteen days. The licenses that are subject to
suspension are all licenses, certifications, or registrations held by
the violating party specific to the business location or locations
where the adverse action occurred;
(ii) For a second violation, the court may order the appropriate
government agencies to suspend all licenses that are held by the
violating party for a period of up to thirty days. The licenses that
are subject to suspension are all licenses held by the violating party
specific to the business location or locations where the adverse action
occurred;
(iii) For a third violation, the court may order the appropriate
government agencies to suspend all licenses that are held by the
violating party for a period of up to ninety days. The licenses that
are subject to suspension are all licenses held by the violating party
specific to the business location or locations where the adverse action
occurred.
(e) Shall award attorneys' fees and costs.
(3) A civil action under this section must be brought no later than
three years after the violation occurred. This period is tolled during
any period of time that an employer, any of its agents, or any person
acting on behalf of the employer deters an individual from bringing an
action under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 9 through 11 of this act are each
added to chapter 49.48 RCW.

PREVAILING WAGE
Sec. 13 RCW 39.12.010 and 1989 c 12 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) The "prevailing rate of wage,"((, for the intents and purposes
of this chapter, shall be)) means the rate of hourly wage, usual
benefits, and overtime paid in the locality, as ((hereinafter)) defined
in this section, to the majority of workers, laborers, or mechanics, in
the same trade or occupation. In the event that there is not a
majority in the same trade or occupation paid at the same rate, then
the average rate of hourly wage and overtime paid to such laborers,
workers, or mechanics in the same trade or occupation shall be the
prevailing rate. If the wage paid by any contractor or subcontractor
to laborers, workers, or mechanics on any public work is based on some
period of time other than an hour, the hourly wage for the purposes of
this chapter shall be mathematically determined by the number of hours
worked in such period of time.
(2) The "locality" ((for the purposes of this chapter shall be))
means the largest city in the county wherein the physical work is being
performed.
(3) The "usual benefits" ((for the purposes of this chapter shall))
includes the amount of:
(a) The rate of contribution irrevocably made by a contractor or
subcontractor to a trustee or to a third person pursuant to a fund,
plan, or program; and
(b) The rate of costs to the contractor or subcontractor which may
be reasonably anticipated in providing benefits to workers, laborers,
and mechanics pursuant to an enforceable commitment to carry out a
financially responsible plan or program which was communicated in
writing to the workers, laborers, and mechanics affected, for medical
or hospital care, pensions on retirement or death, compensation for
injuries or illness resulting from occupational activity, or insurance
to provide any of the foregoing, for unemployment benefits, life
insurance, disability and sickness insurance, or accident insurance,
for vacation and holiday pay, for defraying costs of apprenticeship or
other similar programs, or for other bona fide fringe benefits, but
only where the contractor or subcontractor is not required by other
federal, state, or local law to provide any of such benefits.
(4) An "interested party" ((for the purposes of this chapter
shall)) includes a contractor, subcontractor, an employee of a
contractor or subcontractor, an organization whose members' wages,
benefits, and conditions of employment are affected by this chapter,
and the director of labor and industries or the director's designee.
(5) "Adverse action" means discharging, denying a promotion,
demoting, failing to rehire after a seasonal interruption of work,
threatening, penalizing, retaliating, engaging in unfair immigration-related practices, filing a false report with a government agency,
changing an employee's status to a nonemployee, or otherwise
discriminating against an employee. "Adverse action" may involve any
aspect of employment, including pay, work hours, responsibilities, or
other material change in the terms and condition of employment.
(6) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(7) "Front pay" means the compensation the employee would earn if
reinstated to his or her former position.
(8) "Interested party" includes: A contractor or subcontractor or
an employee of a contractor or subcontractor; the director or the
director's designee; an organization whose members' wages, benefits,
and conditions of employment are affected by this chapter, including a
labor union; or any other organization of workers that exists for the
purpose, in whole or in part, of interacting with employers.
(9)(a) "Pattern or practice" means that, in addition to the current
violation, within the previous ten years the employer was:
(i) Convicted of a criminal violation of a state or local law
concerning retaliation;
(ii) Subject to a court order entering final judgment for a
violation of section 3, 9, 14, or 19 of this act, and the judgment was
not satisfied or current within thirty days of the later of:
(A) The expiration of the time for appealing the order; or
(B) If a timely appeal was made, the date of the final resolution
of the appeal; or
(iii) Subject to a final and binding citation and notice of
assessment from the department for a violation of section 3, 9, or 19
of this act, and the citation and penalty were not satisfied or current
within thirty days of the date the citation became final and binding.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (9), an employer includes
a successor employer, as defined in RCW 49.48.082.
(10)(a) "Unfair immigration-related practice" includes any of the
following practices:
(i) Requesting more or different documents than are required under
8 U.S.C. Sec. 1324a(b), or a refusal to honor documents tendered
pursuant to that section that on their face reasonably appear to be
genuine;
(ii) Using the federal E-Verify system to check the employment
authorization status of a person at a time or in a manner not required
under 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1324a(b), or not authorized under any memorandum of
understanding governing the use of the federal E-Verify system;
(iii) Threatening to file or the filing of a false police report;
(iv) Threatening to contact or contacting immigration authorities;
(v) Withholding or threatening to destroy documents related to a
person's immigration status.
(b) "Unfair immigration-related practice" does not include conduct
undertaken at the express and specific direction or request of the
federal government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) An employer, any of its agents, or any
person acting on behalf of the employer may not take adverse action
against any individual or individuals because:
(a) An employee or former employee has informed any other person or
made a complaint, or the employer believes an employee has informed any
other person or made a complaint, including to the employer, the
department, the attorney general, or any other person that the employer
engaged in conduct that an employee reasonably believes violates this
chapter;
(b) An employee or former employee demands from the employee's
employer a lawful claim under this chapter;
(c) An employee or former employee has caused to be instituted, or
is about to cause to be instituted, a proceeding under or related to
this chapter;
(d) An employee or former employee has testified or is about to
testify in a proceeding under or related to this chapter;
(e) An employee has refused to participate in an activity that
would result in a violation of state or federal law;
(f) An employee or former employee has sought information about his
or her rights under this chapter or informed others about their rights
under this chapter;
(g) An employee or former employee has, or the employer believes an
employee has, otherwise exercised rights protected by this chapter; or
(h) An employee or former employee filed a complaint with the
department or brought suit in court where the employer was determined
to have violated this chapter.
(2) If an employer takes adverse action against an employee or
former employee within ninety days of an activity described in
subsection (1) of this section, the employer is presumed to have acted
in retaliation in violation of subsection (1) of this section.
However, in the case of seasonal work that ended before the close of
the ninety day period, the presumption also applies if the employer
fails to rehire a former employee at the next opportunity for work in
the same position. The employer may rebut the presumption with clear
and convincing evidence that the adverse action was taken for a
permissible purpose.
(3) A complaint or other communication by an employee triggers the
protections of this section regardless of whether the complaint or
communication is in writing or makes explicit reference to this
chapter.
(4) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) An individual aggrieved or an
interested party filing on behalf of an individual aggrieved by section
14 of this act may file a complaint with the director on behalf of
himself or herself. If an individual aggrieved or an interested party
filing on behalf of an individual aggrieved files a complaint with the
department, the director may investigate the complaint.
(2) If, following an investigation, the director determines that an
employer violated section 14 of this act, the director may order the
employer to comply with any one or more of the following:
(a) Pay a civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars and
not more than ten thousand dollars per individual aggrieved. The
department must deposit civil penalties under this section in the
supplemental pension fund established under RCW 51.44.033.
(b)(i) Subject to (b)(ii) of this subsection, pay any aggrieved
individual not less than one thousand dollars and not more than ten
thousand dollars.
(ii) If an employee or former employee is the aggrieved individual,
pay the individual the greater of:
(A) The amount of any civil penalty imposed under (a) of this
subsection; or
(B) Three times the amount of any wages, salary, and employment
benefits unlawfully denied or withheld, except benefits under Title 50
or 51 RCW.
(c) If the aggrieved individual is a former employee of the
violating employer, reinstate the aggrieved individual as an employee
at not less than the most recent rate of pay received by the employee.
The director may award front pay in lieu of reinstatement.
(3) An appeal from the director's determination may be taken in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, with the prevailing party entitled
to recover reasonable costs and attorneys' fees.
(4) The director may not investigate any alleged violation under
this section that occurred more than three years before the date that
the employee filed the complaint. This period is tolled during any
period of time that an employer, any of its agents, or any person
acting on behalf of the employer deters an individual from filing a
complaint.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) An individual aggrieved by a violation
of section 14 of this act may bring suit on behalf of himself or
herself or on behalf of any other individuals similarly situated.
(2) If a court determines that an employer violated section 14 of
this act, the court, unless prohibited by federal law:
(a)(i) Shall award statutory damages for each individual aggrieved
by the violation. Subject to (a)(ii) of this subsection, statutory
damages must not be less than one thousand dollars and not more ten
thousand dollars per individual, unless the employer engaged in a
pattern or practice of violations, in which case the statutory damages
must be not less than ten thousand dollars and not more than twenty-five thousand dollars per individual;
(ii) If an employee or former employee is the individual subject to
adverse action, the court shall award the greater of:
(A) The amounts specified in (a)(i) of this subsection; or
(B) Three times the amount of any wages, salary, and employment
benefits unlawfully denied or withheld, except benefits under Title 50
or 51 RCW;
(b) May award actual damages sustained by the individual;
(c) May order injunctive or other equitable relief if the aggrieved
individual is an employee or former employee of the violating employer.
The relief may include:
(i) Reinstatement of the former employee as an employee to his or
her former position at not less than the most recent rate of
compensation received by the employee, including the value of any
benefits; or
(ii) Front pay in lieu of reinstatement;
(d)(i) For a first violation, may order the appropriate government
agencies to suspend all licenses that are held by the violating party
for a period of up to fourteen days. The licenses that are subject to
suspension are all licenses, certifications, or registrations held by
the violating party specific to the business location or locations
where the adverse action occurred;
(ii) For a second violation, the court may order the appropriate
government agencies to suspend all licenses that are held by the
violating party for a period of up to thirty days. The licenses that
are subject to suspension are all licenses held by the violating party
specific to the business location or locations where the adverse action
occurred;
(iii) For a third violation, the court may order the appropriate
government agencies to suspend all licenses that are held by the
violating party for a period of up to ninety days. The licenses that
are subject to suspension are all licenses held by the violating party
specific to the business location or locations where the adverse action
occurred.
(e) Shall award attorneys' fees and costs.
(3) A civil action under this section must be brought no later than
three years after the violation occurred. This period is tolled during
any period of time that an employer, any of its agents, or any person
acting on behalf of the employer deters an individual from bringing an
action under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 14 through 16 of this act are each
added as new sections to chapter 39.12 RCW.

WAGE DEDUCTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adverse action" means discharging, denying a promotion,
demoting, failing to rehire after a seasonal interruption of work,
threatening, penalizing, retaliating, engaging in unfair immigration-related practices, filing a false report with a government agency,
changing an employee's status to a nonemployee, or otherwise
discriminating against an employee. "Adverse action" may involve any
aspect of employment, including pay, work hours, responsibilities, or
other material change in the terms and condition of employment.
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries.
(4) "Front pay" means the compensation the employee would earn if
reinstated to his or her former position.
(5) "Interested party" includes: A contractor or subcontractor or
an employee of a contractor or subcontractor; the director or the
director's designee; an organization whose members' wages, benefits,
and conditions of employment are affected by this chapter, including a
labor union; or any other organization of workers that exists for the
purpose, in whole or in part, of interacting with employers.
(6)(a) "Pattern or practice" means that, in addition to the current
violation, within the previous ten years the employer was:
(i) Convicted of a criminal violation of a state or local law
concerning retaliation;
(ii) Subject to a court order entering final judgment for a
violation of section 3, 9, 14, or 19 of this act, and the judgment was
not satisfied or current within thirty days of the later of:
(A) The expiration of the time for appealing the order; or
(B) If a timely appeal was made, the date of the final resolution
of the appeal; or
(iii) Subject to a final and binding citation and notice of
assessment from the department for a violation of section 3, 9, or 15
of this act, and the citation and penalty were not satisfied or current
within thirty days of the date the citation became final and binding.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (6), an employer includes
a successor employer, as defined in RCW 49.48.082.
(7)(a) "Unfair immigration-related practice" means any of the
following practices:
(i) Requesting more or different documents than are required under
8 U.S.C. Sec. 1324a(b), or a refusal to honor documents tendered
pursuant to that section that on their face reasonably appear to be
genuine;
(ii) Using the federal E-Verify system to check the employment
authorization status of a person at a time or in a manner not required
under 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1324a(b), or not authorized under any memorandum of
understanding governing the use of the federal E-Verify system;
(iii) Threatening to file or the filing of a false police report;
(iv) Threatening to contact or contacting immigration authorities;
(v) Withholding or threatening to destroy documents related to a
person's immigration status.
(b) "Unfair immigration-related practice" does not include conduct
undertaken at the express and specific direction or request of the
federal government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) An employer, any of its agents, or any
person acting on behalf of the employer may not take adverse action
against any individual or individuals because:
(a) An employee or former employee has informed any other person or
made a complaint, or the employer believes an employee has informed any
other person or made a complaint, including to the employer, the
department, the attorney general, or any other person that the employer
engaged in conduct that an employee reasonably believes violates this
chapter;
(b) An employee or former employee demands from the employee's
employer a lawful claim under this chapter;
(c) An employee or former employee has caused to be instituted, or
is about to cause to be instituted, a proceeding under or related to
this chapter;
(d) An employee or former employee has testified or is about to
testify in a proceeding under or related to this chapter;
(e) An employee has refused to participate in an activity that
would result in a violation of state or federal law;
(f) An employee or former employee has sought information about his
or her rights under this chapter or informed others about their rights
under this chapter;
(g) An employee or former employee has, or the employer believes an
employee has, otherwise exercised rights protected by this chapter; or
(h) An employee or former employee filed a complaint with the
department or brought suit in court where the employer was determined
to have violated this chapter.
(2) If an employer takes adverse action against an employee or
former employee within ninety days of an activity described in
subsection (1) of this section, the employer is presumed to have acted
in retaliation in violation of subsection (1) of this section.
However, in the case of seasonal work that ended before the close of
the ninety day period, the presumption also applies if the employer
fails to rehire a former employee at the next opportunity for work in
the same position. The employer may rebut the presumption with clear
and convincing evidence that the adverse action was taken for a
permissible purpose.
(3) A complaint or other communication by an employee triggers the
protections of this section regardless of whether the complaint or
communication is in writing or makes explicit reference to this
chapter.
(4) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1) An individual aggrieved or an
interested party filing on behalf of an individual aggrieved by section
19 of this act may file a complaint with the director on behalf of
himself or herself. If an individual aggrieved or an interested party
filing on behalf of an individual aggrieved files a complaint with the
department, the director may investigate the complaint.
(2) If, following an investigation, the director determines that an
employer violated section 19 of this act, the director may order the
employer to comply with any one or more of the following:
(a) Pay a civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars and
not more than ten thousand dollars per individual aggrieved. The
department must deposit civil penalties under this section in the
supplemental pension fund established under RCW 51.44.033.
(b)(i) Subject to (b)(ii) of this subsection, pay any aggrieved
individual not less than one thousand dollars and not more than ten
thousand dollars.
(ii) If an employee or former employee is the aggrieved individual,
pay the individual the greater of:
(A) The amount of any civil penalty imposed under (a) of this
subsection; or
(B) Three times the amount of any wages, salary, and employment
benefits unlawfully denied or withheld, except benefits under Title 50
or 51 RCW.
(c) If the aggrieved individual is a former employee of the
violating employer, reinstate the aggrieved individual as an employee
at not less than the most recent rate of pay received by the employee.
The director may award front pay in lieu of reinstatement.
(3) An appeal from the director's determination may be taken in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, with the prevailing party entitled
to recover reasonable costs and attorneys' fees.
(4) The director may not investigate any alleged violation under
this section that occurred more than three years before the date that
the employee filed the complaint. This period is tolled during any
period of time that an employer, any of its agents, or any person
acting on behalf of the employer deters an individual from filing a
complaint.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 (1) An individual aggrieved by a violation
of section 19 of this act may bring suit on behalf of himself or
herself or on behalf of any other individuals similarly situated.
(2) If a court determines that an employer violated section 19 of
this act, the court, unless prohibited by federal law:
(a)(i) Shall award statutory damages for each individual aggrieved
by the violation. Subject to (a)(ii) of this subsection, statutory
damages must not be less than one thousand dollars and not more ten
thousand dollars per individual, unless the employer engaged in a
pattern or practice of violations, in which case the statutory damages
must be not less than ten thousand dollars and not more than twenty-five thousand dollars per individual;
(ii) If an employee or former employee is the individual subject to
adverse action, the court shall award the greater of:
(A) The amounts specified in (a)(i) of this subsection; or
(B) Three times the amount of any wages, salary, and employment
benefits unlawfully denied or withheld, except benefits under Title 50
or 51 RCW;
(b) May award actual damages sustained by the individual;
(c) May order injunctive or other equitable relief if the aggrieved
individual is an employee or former employee of the violating employer.
The relief may include:
(i) Reinstatement of the former employee as an employee to his or
her former position at not less than the most recent rate of
compensation received by the employee, including the value of any
benefits; or
(ii) Front pay in lieu of reinstatement;
(d)(i) For a first violation, may order the appropriate government
agencies to suspend all licenses that are held by the violating party
for a period of up to fourteen days. The licenses that are subject to
suspension are all licenses, certifications, or registrations held by
the violating party specific to the business location or locations
where the adverse action occurred;
(ii) For a second violation, the court may order the appropriate
government agencies to suspend all licenses that are held by the
violating party for a period of up to thirty days. The licenses that
are subject to suspension are all licenses held by the violating party
specific to the business location or locations where the adverse action
occurred;
(iii) For a third violation, the court may order the appropriate
government agencies to suspend all licenses that are held by the
violating party for a period of up to ninety days. The licenses that
are subject to suspension are all licenses held by the violating party
specific to the business location or locations where the adverse action
occurred.
(e) Shall award attorneys' fees and costs.
(3) A civil action under this section must be brought no later than
three years after the violation occurred. This period is tolled during
any period of time that an employer, any of its agents, or any person
acting on behalf of the employer deters an individual from bringing an
action under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Sections 18 through 21 of this act are each
added as new sections to chapter 49.52 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---