BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that transparency in
higher education budgeting is essential to the maintenance of public
trust in the higher education system. Such transparency is not only an
appropriate check on future higher education cost increases, it should
also counteract any perception that public institutions are not
adequately accountable for student and taxpayer dollars. Therefore, to
ensure general accessibility to meaningful budget information and to
improve public confidence in the system, the legislature intends to
require that departmental budgets of institutions of higher education
be posted on the education data center's data dashboard.
The legislature finds that placing the responsibility for posting
departmental budgets of institutions of higher education on the
education data center takes advantage of the independence, expertise,
and technology base within the education data center. The legislature
intends that the education data center use information that is already
public, so as to minimize the costs to the education data center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
The education data center established in RCW 43.41.400 shall post
on the education data center's data dashboard established under RCW
28B.77.090 the department-level budgets, including budget planning and
expenditures of institutions of higher education. For institutions of
higher education without a department structure, the education data
center shall post comparable budget information. The education data
center shall post department-level budget plans and budget expenditures
to the data dashboard within sixty days of an institution of higher
education's adoption of its annual fiscal budget plan and completion of
its fiscal year budget. The education data center is responsible for
obtaining the budget and spending data from each institution of higher
education, and for developing the format used to display the budget
information.

--- END ---