BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington health benefit exchange is hereby created as a
state agency. The exchange is the successor to the public-private
partnership created in section 3, chapter 317, Laws of 2011. All
powers, duties, and functions vested in the public-private partnership
created in section 3, chapter 317, Laws of 2011 are transferred to the
exchange.
(2) The exchange shall have a director appointed by the governor,
with the consent of the senate. The director shall serve at the
pleasure of the governor. The director may employ a deputy director
and such assistant directors and special assistants as may be needed to
administer the exchange, who shall be exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW,
and any additional staff members as are necessary to administer this
chapter. The director may delegate any power or duty vested in him or
her by law, including authority to make final decisions and enter final
orders in hearings conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) The exchange may, consistent with the purposes of this chapter:
(a) Sue and be sued in its own name; (b) make and execute agreements,
contracts, and other instruments, with any public or private person or
entity; (c) accept grants, donations, loans of funds, and contributions
in money, services, materials, or otherwise, from the United States or
any of its agencies or from any other source, and use or expend those
moneys, services, materials, or other contributions; (d) aggregate or
delegate the aggregation of funds that comprise the premium for a
health plan; and (e) complete other duties necessary to begin open
enrollment in qualified health plans through the exchange.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.71.010 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise. Terms and phrases used
in this chapter that are not defined in this section must be defined as
consistent with implementation of a state health benefit exchange
pursuant to the affordable care act.
(1) "Affordable care act" means the federal patient protection and
affordable care act, P.L. 111-148, as amended by the federal health
care and education reconciliation act of 2010, P.L. 111-152, or federal
regulations or guidance issued under the affordable care act.
(2) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority,
established under chapter 41.05 RCW.
(3) "Board" means the governing board established in RCW 43.71.020.
(4) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner, established in
Title 48 RCW.
(5) "Director" means the director of the exchange.
(6) "Exchange" means the Washington health benefit exchange
((established in RCW 43.71.020)) created in section 1 of this act.
(((6))) (7) "Self-sustaining" means capable of operating with
revenue attributable to the operations of the exchange. Self-sustaining sources include, but are not limited to, federal grants,
federal premium tax subsidies and credits, charges to health carriers,
premiums paid by enrollees, and premium taxes under RCW
48.14.0201(5)(b) and 48.14.020(2).

Sec. 3 RCW 43.71.020 and 2012 c 87 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The Washington health benefit exchange is established and
constitutes a self-sustaining public-private partnership separate and
distinct from the state, exercising functions delineated in chapter
317, Laws of 2011.)) By January 1, 2014, the exchange shall operate
consistent with the affordable care act subject to statutory
authorization. The exchange shall have a governing board consisting of
persons with expertise in the Washington health care system and private
and public health care coverage. The initial membership of the board
shall be appointed as follows:
(a) By October 1, 2011, each of the two largest caucuses in both
the house of representatives and the senate shall submit to the
governor a list of five nominees who are not legislators or employees
of the state or its political subdivisions, with no caucus submitting
the same nominee.
(i) The nominations from the largest caucus in the house of
representatives must include at least one employee benefit specialist;
(ii) The nominations from the second largest caucus in the house of
representatives must include at least one health economist or actuary;
(iii) The nominations from the largest caucus in the senate must
include at least one representative of health consumer advocates;
(iv) The nominations from the second largest caucus in the senate
must include at least one representative of small business;
(v) The remaining nominees must have demonstrated and acknowledged
expertise in at least one of the following areas: Individual health
care coverage, small employer health care coverage, health benefits
plan administration, health care finance and economics, actuarial
science, or administering a public or private health care delivery
system.
(b) By December 15, 2011, the governor shall appoint two members
from each list submitted by the caucuses under (a) of this subsection.
The appointments made under this subsection (1)(b) must include at
least one employee benefits specialist, one health economist or
actuary, one representative of small business, and one representative
of health consumer advocates. The remaining four members must have a
demonstrated and acknowledged expertise in at least one of the
following areas: Individual health care coverage, small employer
health care coverage, health benefits plan administration, health care
finance and economics, actuarial science, or administering a public or
private health care delivery system.
(c) By December 15, 2011, the governor shall appoint a ninth member
to serve as chair. The chair may not be an employee of the state or
its political subdivisions. The chair shall serve as a nonvoting
member except in the case of a tie.
(d) The following members shall serve as nonvoting, ex officio
members of the board:
(i) The insurance commissioner or his or her designee; and
(ii) The administrator of the health care authority, or his or her
designee.
(2) Initial members of the board shall serve staggered terms not to
exceed four years. Members appointed thereafter shall serve two-year
terms.
(3) A member of the board whose term has expired or who otherwise
leaves the board shall be replaced by gubernatorial appointment. When
the person leaving was nominated by one of the caucuses of the house of
representatives or the senate, his or her replacement shall be
appointed from a list of five nominees submitted by that caucus within
thirty days after the person leaves. If the member to be replaced is
the chair, the governor shall appoint a new chair within thirty days
after the vacancy occurs. A person appointed to replace a member who
leaves the board prior to the expiration of his or her term shall serve
only the duration of the unexpired term. Members of the board may be
reappointed to multiple terms.
(4) No board member may be appointed if his or her participation in
the decisions of the board could benefit his or her own financial
interests or the financial interests of an entity he or she represents.
A board member who develops such a conflict of interest shall resign or
be removed from the board.
(5) Members of the board must be reimbursed for their travel
expenses while on official business in accordance with RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060. The board shall prescribe rules for the conduct of its
business. Meetings of the board are at the call of the chair.
(6) ((The exchange and the board are subject only to the provisions
of chapter 42.30 RCW, the open public meetings act, and chapter 42.56
RCW, the public records act, and not to any other law or regulation
generally applicable to state agencies. Consistent with the open
public meetings act, the board may hold executive sessions to consider
proprietary or confidential nonpublished information.
(7)))(a) The board shall establish an advisory committee to allow
for the views of the health care industry and other stakeholders to be
heard in the operation of the health benefit exchange.
(b) The board may establish technical advisory committees or seek
the advice of technical experts when necessary to execute the powers
and duties included in chapter 317, Laws of 2011.
(((8))) (7) Members of the board are not civilly or criminally
liable and may not have any penalty or cause of action of any nature
arise against them for any action taken or not taken, including any
discretionary decision or failure to make a discretionary decision,
when the action or inaction is done in good faith and in the
performance of the powers and duties under chapter 317, Laws of 2011.
Nothing in this section prohibits legal actions against the board to
enforce the board's statutory or contractual duties or obligations.
(((9))) (8) In recognition of the government-to-government
relationship between the state of Washington and the federally
recognized tribes in the state of Washington, the board shall consult
with the American Indian health commission.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.71.030 and 2012 c 87 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The exchange may, consistent with the purposes of this
chapter: (a) Sue and be sued in its own name; (b) make and execute
agreements, contracts, and other instruments, with any public or
private person or entity; (c) employ, contract with, or engage
personnel; (d) pay administrative costs; (e) accept grants, donations,
loans of funds, and contributions in money, services, materials or
otherwise, from the United States or any of its agencies, from the
state of Washington and its agencies or from any other source, and use
or expend those moneys, services, materials, or other contributions;
(f) aggregate or delegate the aggregation of funds that comprise the
premium for a health plan; and (g) complete other duties necessary to
begin open enrollment in qualified health plans through the exchange
beginning October 1, 2013.
(2))) The board shall develop a methodology to ensure the exchange
is self-sustaining after December 31, 2014. The board shall seek input
from health carriers to develop funding mechanisms that fairly and
equitably apportion among carriers the reasonable administrative costs
and expenses incurred to implement the provisions of this chapter. The
board shall submit its recommendations to the legislature by December
1, 2012. If the legislature does not enact legislation during the 2013
regular session to modify or reject the board's recommendations, the
board may proceed with implementation of the recommendations.
(((3))) (2) The board shall establish policies that permit city and
county governments, Indian tribes, tribal organizations, urban Indian
organizations, private foundations, and other entities to pay premiums
on behalf of qualified individuals.
(((4) The employees of the exchange may participate in the public
employees' retirement system under chapter 41.40 RCW and the public
employees' benefits board under chapter 41.05 RCW.
(5))) (3) Qualified employers may access coverage for their
employees through the exchange for small groups under section 1311 of
P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended. The exchange shall enable any
qualified employer to specify a level of coverage so that any of its
employees may enroll in any qualified health plan offered through the
small group exchange at the specified level of coverage.
(((6))) (4) The exchange shall report its activities and status to
the governor and the legislature as requested, and no less often than
annually.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.71 RCW
to read as follows:
The director of the exchange is authorized to adopt such rules as
are necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this
chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.05.011 and 2013 c 2 s 306 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(2) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established
under RCW 41.05.055.
(3) "Dependent care assistance program" means a benefit plan
whereby state and public employees may pay for certain employment
related dependent care with pretax dollars as provided in the salary
reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 129 or
other sections of the internal revenue code.
(4) "Director" means the director of the authority.
(5) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means
law enforcement officers and firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
members of the Washington state patrol retirement fund as defined in
RCW 43.43.120, and reserve officers and firefighters as defined in RCW
41.24.010 who die as a result of injuries sustained in the course of
employment as determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department
of labor and industries.
(6) "Employee" includes all employees of the state, whether or not
covered by civil service; elected and appointed officials of the
executive branch of government, including full-time members of boards,
commissions, or committees; justices of the supreme court and judges of
the court of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state
legislature. Pursuant to contractual agreement with the authority,
"employee" may also include: (a) Employees of a county, municipality,
or other political subdivision of the state and members of the
legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to
office after February 20, 1970, if the legislative authority of the
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state seeks
and receives the approval of the authority to provide any of its
insurance programs by contract with the authority, as provided in RCW
41.04.205 and 41.05.021(1)(g); (b) employees of employee organizations
representing state civil service employees, at the option of each such
employee organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees of
employee organizations currently pooled with employees of school
districts for the purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at the
option of each such employee organization; (c) employees of a school
district if the authority agrees to provide any of the school
districts' insurance programs by contract with the authority as
provided in RCW 28A.400.350; (d) employees of a tribal government, if
the governing body of the tribal government seeks and receives the
approval of the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by
contract with the authority, as provided in RCW 41.05.021(1) (f) and
(g); and (e) ((employees of the Washington health benefit exchange if
the governing board of the exchange established in RCW 43.71.020 seeks
and receives approval of the authority to provide any of its insurance
programs by contract with the authority, as provided in RCW
41.05.021(1) (g) and (n); and (f))) employees of a charter school
established under chapter 28A.710 RCW. "Employee" does not include:
Adult family homeowners; unpaid volunteers; patients of state
hospitals; inmates; employees of the Washington state convention and
trade center as provided in RCW 41.05.110; students of institutions of
higher education as determined by their institution; and any others not
expressly defined as employees under this chapter or by the authority
under this chapter.
(7) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(8) "Employing agency" means a division, department, or separate
agency of state government, including an institution of higher
education; a county, municipality, school district, educational service
district, or other political subdivision; charter school; and a tribal
government covered by this chapter.
(9) "Faculty" means an academic employee of an institution of
higher education whose workload is not defined by work hours but whose
appointment, workload, and duties directly serve the institution's
academic mission, as determined under the authority of its enabling
statutes, its governing body, and any applicable collective bargaining
agreement.
(10) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows
employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the
amount of employee contributions from among a range of choices offered
by the authority.
(11) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01
RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW,
or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.
(12) "Medical flexible spending arrangement" means a benefit plan
whereby state and public employees may reduce their salary before taxes
to pay for medical expenses not reimbursed by insurance as provided in
the salary reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec.
125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.
(13) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility
and enrollment requirements under the salary reduction plan.
(14) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.
(15) "Premium payment plan" means a benefit plan whereby state and
public employees may pay their share of group health plan premiums with
pretax dollars as provided in the salary reduction plan under this
chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the
internal revenue code.
(16) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:
(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or
educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;
(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district,
educational service district, or charter school on or after October 1,
1993, and immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;
(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district,
educational service district, or charter school due to a total and
permanent disability, and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement
allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.
(17) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.
(18) "Salary reduction plan" means a benefit plan whereby state and
public employees may agree to a reduction of salary on a pretax basis
to participate in the dependent care assistance program, medical
flexible spending arrangement, or premium payment plan offered pursuant
to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.
(19) "Seasonal employee" means an employee hired to work during a
recurring, annual season with a duration of three months or more, and
anticipated to return each season to perform similar work.
(20) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in:
(a) RCW 41.32.010(17) on or after July 1, 1996; or
(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or
(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;
and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.32.010(33), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan
3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.
(21) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical
and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state
health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the
department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and
local school districts.
(22) "Tribal government" means an Indian tribal government as
defined in section 3(32) of the employee retirement income security act
of 1974, as amended, or an agency or instrumentality of the tribal
government, that has government offices principally located in this
state.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.05.021 and 2012 c 87 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state health care authority is created within
the executive branch. The authority shall have a director appointed by
the governor, with the consent of the senate. The director shall serve
at the pleasure of the governor. The director may employ a deputy
director, and such assistant directors and special assistants as may be
needed to administer the authority, who shall be exempt from chapter
41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are necessary to
administer this chapter. The director may delegate any power or duty
vested in him or her by law, including authority to make final
decisions and enter final orders in hearings conducted under chapter
34.05 RCW. The primary duties of the authority shall be to:
Administer state employees' insurance benefits and retired or disabled
school employees' insurance benefits; administer the basic health plan
pursuant to chapter 70.47 RCW; administer the children's health program
pursuant to chapter 74.09 RCW; study state-purchased health care
programs in order to maximize cost containment in these programs while
ensuring access to quality health care; implement state initiatives,
joint purchasing strategies, and techniques for efficient
administration that have potential application to all state-purchased
health services; and administer grants that further the mission and
goals of the authority. The authority's duties include, but are not
limited to, the following:
(a) To administer health care benefit programs for employees and
retired or disabled school employees as specifically authorized in RCW
41.05.065 and in accordance with the methods described in RCW
41.05.075, 41.05.140, and other provisions of this chapter;
(b) To analyze state-purchased health care programs and to explore
options for cost containment and delivery alternatives for those
programs that are consistent with the purposes of those programs,
including, but not limited to:
(i) Creation of economic incentives for the persons for whom the
state purchases health care to appropriately utilize and purchase
health care services, including the development of flexible benefit
plans to offset increases in individual financial responsibility;
(ii) Utilization of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems,
utilization review, and prospective payment methods, and that ensure
access to quality care, including assuring reasonable access to local
providers, especially for employees residing in rural areas;
(iii) Coordination of state agency efforts to purchase drugs
effectively as provided in RCW 70.14.050;
(iv) Development of recommendations and methods for purchasing
medical equipment and supporting services on a volume discount basis;
(v) Development of data systems to obtain utilization data from
state-purchased health care programs in order to identify cost centers,
utilization patterns, provider and hospital practice patterns, and
procedure costs, utilizing the information obtained pursuant to RCW
41.05.031; and
(vi) In collaboration with other state agencies that administer
state purchased health care programs, private health care purchasers,
health care facilities, providers, and carriers:
(A) Use evidence-based medicine principles to develop common
performance measures and implement financial incentives in contracts
with insuring entities, health care facilities, and providers that:
(I) Reward improvements in health outcomes for individuals with
chronic diseases, increased utilization of appropriate preventive
health services, and reductions in medical errors; and
(II) Increase, through appropriate incentives to insuring entities,
health care facilities, and providers, the adoption and use of
information technology that contributes to improved health outcomes,
better coordination of care, and decreased medical errors;
(B) Through state health purchasing, reimbursement, or pilot
strategies, promote and increase the adoption of health information
technology systems, including electronic medical records, by hospitals
as defined in RCW 70.41.020(4), integrated delivery systems, and
providers that:
(I) Facilitate diagnosis or treatment;
(II) Reduce unnecessary duplication of medical tests;
(III) Promote efficient electronic physician order entry;
(IV) Increase access to health information for consumers and their
providers; and
(V) Improve health outcomes;
(C) Coordinate a strategy for the adoption of health information
technology systems using the final health information technology report
and recommendations developed under chapter 261, Laws of 2005;
(c) To analyze areas of public and private health care interaction;
(d) To provide information and technical and administrative
assistance to the board;
(e) To review and approve or deny applications from counties,
municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state to
provide state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to their
employees in accordance with the provisions of RCW 41.04.205 and (g) of
this subsection, setting the premium contribution for approved groups
as outlined in RCW 41.05.050;
(f) To review and approve or deny the application when the
governing body of a tribal government applies to transfer their
employees to an insurance or self-insurance program administered under
this chapter. In the event of an employee transfer pursuant to this
subsection (1)(f), members of the governing body are eligible to be
included in such a transfer if the members are authorized by the tribal
government to participate in the insurance program being transferred
from and subject to payment by the members of all costs of insurance
for the members. The authority shall: (i) Establish the conditions
for participation; (ii) have the sole right to reject the application;
and (iii) set the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined
in RCW 41.05.050. Approval of the application by the authority
transfers the employees and dependents involved to the insurance,
self-insurance, or health care program approved by the authority;
(g) To ensure the continued status of the employee insurance or
self-insurance programs administered under this chapter as a
governmental plan under section 3(32) of the employee retirement income
security act of 1974, as amended, the authority shall limit the
participation of employees of a county, municipal, school district,
educational service district, or other political subdivision((, the
Washington health benefit exchange,)) or a tribal government, including
providing for the participation of those employees whose services are
substantially all in the performance of essential governmental
functions, but not in the performance of commercial activities;
(h) To establish billing procedures and collect funds from school
districts in a way that minimizes the administrative burden on
districts;
(i) To publish and distribute to nonparticipating school districts
and educational service districts by October 1st of each year a
description of health care benefit plans available through the
authority and the estimated cost if school districts and educational
service district employees were enrolled;
(j) To apply for, receive, and accept grants, gifts, and other
payments, including property and service, from any governmental or
other public or private entity or person, and make arrangements as to
the use of these receipts to implement initiatives and strategies
developed under this section;
(k) To issue, distribute, and administer grants that further the
mission and goals of the authority;
(l) To adopt rules consistent with this chapter as described in RCW
41.05.160 including, but not limited to:
(i) Setting forth the criteria established by the board under RCW
41.05.065 for determining whether an employee is eligible for benefits;
(ii) Establishing an appeal process in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW by which an employee may appeal an eligibility determination;
(iii) Establishing a process to assure that the eligibility
determinations of an employing agency comply with the criteria under
this chapter, including the imposition of penalties as may be
authorized by the board;
(m)(i) To administer the medical services programs established
under chapter 74.09 RCW as the designated single state agency for
purposes of Title XIX of the federal social security act;
(ii) To administer the state children's health insurance program
under chapter 74.09 RCW for purposes of Title XXI of the federal social
security act;
(iii) To enter into agreements with the department of social and
health services for administration of medical care services programs
under Titles XIX and XXI of the social security act. The agreements
shall establish the division of responsibilities between the authority
and the department with respect to mental health, chemical dependency,
and long-term care services, including services for persons with
developmental disabilities. The agreements shall be revised as
necessary, to comply with the final implementation plan adopted under
section 116, chapter 15, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.;
(iv) To adopt rules to carry out the purposes of chapter 74.09 RCW;
(v) To appoint such advisory committees or councils as may be
required by any federal statute or regulation as a condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the authority. The director may appoint
statewide committees or councils in the following subject areas: (A)
Health facilities; (B) children and youth services; (C) blind services;
(D) medical and health care; (E) drug abuse and alcoholism; (F)
rehabilitative services; and (G) such other subject matters as are or
come within the authority's responsibilities. The statewide councils
shall have representation from both major political parties and shall
have substantial consumer representation. Such committees or councils
shall be constituted as required by federal law or as the director in
his or her discretion may determine. The members of the committees or
councils shall hold office for three years except in the case of a
vacancy, in which event appointment shall be only for the remainder of
the unexpired term for which the vacancy occurs. No member shall serve
more than two consecutive terms. Members of such state advisory
committees or councils may be paid their travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter
amended((;
(n) To review and approve or deny the application from the
governing board of the Washington health benefit exchange to provide
state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to employees of
the exchange. The authority shall (i) establish the conditions for
participation; (ii) have the sole right to reject an application; and
(iii) set the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined in
RCW 41.05.050)).
(2) On and after January 1, 1996, the public employees' benefits
board may implement strategies to promote managed competition among
employee health benefit plans. Strategies may include but are not
limited to:
(a) Standardizing the benefit package;
(b) Soliciting competitive bids for the benefit package;
(c) Limiting the state's contribution to a percent of the lowest
priced qualified plan within a geographical area;
(d) Monitoring the impact of the approach under this subsection
with regards to: Efficiencies in health service delivery, cost shifts
to subscribers, access to and choice of managed care plans statewide,
and quality of health services. The health care authority shall also
advise on the value of administering a benchmark employer-managed plan
to promote competition among managed care plans.

Sec. 8 RCW 42.17A.705 and 2012 c 229 s 582 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17A.700, "executive state officer"
includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the director of the department of services for the blind,
the chief information officer of the office of chief information
officer, the director of the state system of community and technical
colleges, the director of commerce, the director of the consolidated
technology services agency, the secretary of corrections, the director
of early learning, the director of ecology, the commissioner of
employment security, the chair of the energy facility site evaluation
council, the director of enterprise services, the secretary of the
state finance committee, the director of financial management, the
director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest
practices appeals board, the director of the gambling commission, the
secretary of health, the administrator of the Washington state health
care authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the
human resources director, the executive secretary of the human rights
commission, the executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence
review board, the executive director of the state investment board, the
director of labor and industries, the director of licensing, the
director of the lottery commission, the director of the office of
minority and women's business enterprises, the director of parks and
recreation, the executive director of the public disclosure commission,
the executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, the director of
the recreation and conservation office, the director of retirement
systems, the director of revenue, the secretary of social and health
services, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive
secretary of the board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation,
the secretary of the utilities and transportation commission, the
director of veterans affairs, the director of the Washington health
benefit exchange, the president of each of the regional and state
universities and the president of The Evergreen State College, and each
district and each campus president of each state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, Eastern Washington
University board of trustees, Washington economic development finance
authority, Washington energy northwest executive board, The Evergreen
State College board of trustees, executive ethics board, fish and
wildlife commission, forest practices appeals board, forest practices
board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities
authority, student achievement council, higher education facilities
authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance commission,
human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review board, board of
industrial insurance appeals, state investment board, commission on
judicial conduct, legislative ethics board, life sciences discovery
fund authority board of trustees, liquor control board, lottery
commission, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council, parks and recreation commission, Washington personnel
resources board, board of pilotage commissioners, pollution control
hearings board, public disclosure commission, public employees'
benefits board, recreation and conservation funding board, salmon
recovery funding board, shorelines hearings board, board of tax
appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington board of
regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington State
University board of regents, and Western Washington University board of
trustees.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.17.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 107 are each
amended to read as follows:
There shall be departments of the state government which shall be
known as (1) the department of social and health services, (2) the
department of ecology, (3) the department of labor and industries, (4)
the department of agriculture, (5) the department of fish and wildlife,
(6) the department of transportation, (7) the department of licensing,
(8) the department of enterprise services, (9) the department of
commerce, (10) the department of veterans affairs, (11) the department
of revenue, (12) the department of retirement systems, (13) the
department of corrections, (14) the department of health, (15) the
department of financial institutions, (16) the department of
archaeology and historic preservation, (17) the department of early
learning, ((and)) (18) the Puget Sound partnership, and (19) the
Washington health benefit exchange, which shall be charged with the
execution, enforcement, and administration of such laws, and invested
with such powers and required to perform such duties, as the
legislature may provide.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.17.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 108 are each
amended to read as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the
director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the
director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the
secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the
director of enterprise services, (9) the director of commerce, (10) the
director of veterans affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12) the
director of retirement systems, (13) the secretary of corrections, (14)
the secretary of health, (15) the director of financial institutions,
(16) the director of the department of archaeology and historic
preservation, (17) the director of early learning, ((and)) (18) the
executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, and (19) the
director of the Washington health benefit exchange.
Such officers, except the director of fish and wildlife, shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and hold
office at the pleasure of the governor. The director of fish and
wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as
prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The Washington health benefit exchange
created in section 1 of this act assumes all existing obligations of
the public-private partnership created in section 3, chapter 317, Laws
of 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 41.04.003 (Title application -- Health benefit exchange) and
2012 c 87 s 19;
(2) RCW 43.01.031 (Chapter application -- Health benefit exchange)
and 2012 c 87 s 20;
(3) RCW 43.03.003 (Chapter application -- Health benefit exchange)
and 2012 c 87 s 21; and
(4) RCW 82.04.323 (Exemption -- Washington health benefit exchange)
and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 8.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The repeal in section 12(4) of this act
does not modify the applicability of the exemption for tax reporting
periods ending on or before the effective date of this section.

--- END ---