BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.12.650 and 2010 c 161 s 309 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Releasing interest. An owner releasing interest in a vehicle
shall:
(a) Sign the release of interest section provided on the
certificate of title or on a release of interest document or form
approved by the department;
(b) Give the certificate of title or most recent evidence of
ownership to the person gaining the interest in the vehicle;
(c) Give the person gaining interest in the vehicle an odometer
disclosure statement if one is required; and
(d) Report the vehicle sold as provided in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) Report of sale. An owner shall notify the department, county
auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director in
writing within five business days after a vehicle is or has been:
(a) Sold;
(b) Given as a gift to another person;
(c) Traded, either privately or to a dealership;
(d) Donated to charity;
(e) Turned over to an insurance company or wrecking yard; or
(f) Disposed of.
(3) Report of sale properly filed. A report of sale is properly
filed if it is received by the department, county auditor or other
agent, or subagent appointed by the director within five business days
after the date of sale or transfer and it includes:
(a) The date of sale or transfer;
(b) The owner's name and address;
(c) The name and address of the person acquiring the vehicle;
(d) The vehicle identification number and license plate number;
(e) A date or stamp by the department showing it was received on or
before the fifth business day after the date of sale or transfer; and
(f) Payment of the fees required under RCW 46.17.050 if the report
of sale is processed by a county auditor or other agent or subagent
appointed by the director.
(4) Report of sale - administration. The department shall:
(a) Provide or approve reports of sale forms;
(b) Provide a system enabling an owner to submit reports of sale
electronically;
(c) Immediately update the department's vehicle record when a
report of sale has been filed;
(d) Provide instructions on release of interest forms that allow
the seller of a vehicle to release their interest in a vehicle at the
same time a financial institution, as defined in RCW 30.22.040,
releases its lien on the vehicle; ((and))
(e) Send a report to the department of revenue that lists vehicles
for which a report of sale has been received but no transfer of
ownership has taken place. The department shall send the report once
each quarter; and
(f) Pursuant to section 2 of this act, determine whether the owner
of the vehicle is subject to ignition interlock requirements under RCW
46.20.720, 46.61.5055, or 10.05.140.
(5)(a) Transferring ownership. A person who has recently acquired
a vehicle by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, inheritance, or legal
action shall apply to the department, county auditor or other agent, or
subagent appointed by the director for a new certificate of title
within fifteen days of delivery of the vehicle. A secured party who
has possession of the certificate of title shall either:
(i) Apply for a new certificate of title on behalf of the owner and
pay the fee required under RCW 46.17.100; or
(ii) Provide all required documents to the owner, as long as the
transfer was not a breach of its security agreement, to allow the owner
to apply for a new certificate of title.
(b) Compliance with this subsection does not affect the rights of
the secured party.
(6) Certificate of title delivered to secured party. The
certificate of title must be kept by or delivered to the person who
becomes the secured party when a security interest is reserved or
created at the time of the transfer of ownership. The parties must
comply with RCW 46.12.675.
(7) Penalty for late transfer. A person who has recently acquired
a motor vehicle by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, inheritance, or
legal action who does not apply for a new certificate of title within
fifteen calendar days of delivery of the vehicle is charged a penalty,
as described in RCW 46.17.140, when applying for a new certificate of
title. It is a misdemeanor to fail or neglect to apply for a transfer
of ownership within forty-five days after delivery of the vehicle. The
misdemeanor is a single continuing offense for each day that passes
regardless of the number of days that have elapsed following the forty-five day time period.
(8) Penalty for late transfer - exceptions. The penalty is not
charged if the delay in application is due to at least one of the
following:
(a) The department requests additional supporting documents;
(b) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
fails to perform or is neglectful;
(c) The owner is prevented from applying due to an illness or
extended hospitalization;
(d) The legal owner fails or neglects to release interest;
(e) The owner did not know of the filing of a report of sale by the
previous owner and signs an affidavit to the fact; or
(f) The department finds other conditions exist that adequately
explain the delay.
(9) Review and issue. The department shall review applications for
certificates of title and issue certificates of title when it has
determined that all applicable provisions of law have been complied
with.
(10) Rules. The department may adopt rules as necessary to
implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Within forty-eight hours or two business days, upon receiving a
request for a new certificate of title transferring ownership under RCW
46.12.650 or upon receiving a report of sale notice that a vehicle has
been transferred or sold under RCW 46.12.650, the department shall
determine whether the person who becomes the owner or secured party of
the vehicle is subject to ignition interlock requirements under RCW
46.20.720, 46.61.5055, or 10.05.140. If a person's driving record, as
maintained by the department, requires the person to drive only a motor
vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device, the
department shall notify the person of the ignition interlock
requirement in writing by certified mail at his or her address of
record as maintained by the department. A notice for an ignition
interlock requirement shall remind by informing the recipient thereof
that he or she may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a
functioning ignition interlock device and failing to comply with the
requirements is punishable pursuant to RCW 46.20.740.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.750 and 2005 c 200 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who is restricted to the use of a vehicle equipped
with an ignition interlock device and who tampers with the device or
directs, authorizes, or requests another to tamper with the device, in
order to circumvent the device by modifying, detaching, disconnecting,
or otherwise disabling it, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) A person who knowingly assists another person who is restricted
to the use of a vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device to
circumvent the device or to start and operate that vehicle in violation
of a court order is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. The provisions of
this subsection do not apply if the starting of a motor vehicle, or the
request to start a motor vehicle, equipped with an ignition interlock
device is done for the purpose of safety or mechanical repair of the
device or the vehicle and the person subject to the court order does
not operate the vehicle.
(3) A person who is restricted to the use of a vehicle equipped
with an ignition interlock device and who attempts to circumvent the
installation and use of a device by purchasing or acquiring another or
multiple vehicles is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---