BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When determining the prioritization of fish passage barrier
removals for each fiscal biennium, the department must regularly
consult with the department of fish and wildlife, the department of
natural resources, state parks, appropriate local governments, regional
fishery enhancement groups, forest landowners, and appropriate tribes
to identify existing fish passage barriers on state highways where the
removal of such barriers by the department may occur in conjunction
with projects sponsored by these entities. When such an opportunity is
identified, to the greatest extent practicable, the department must
coordinate with the sponsoring entity in order to remove the implicated
fish passage barrier in a manner that achieves the greatest cumulative
cost savings to the department and the sponsoring entity.
(2) The department must provide a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature by January 15th of each year regarding
the fish passage barrier projects in which the department coordinated
with a sponsoring entity, the savings associated with the coordination,
and any recommendations for improvements to the coordination process.

--- END ---