BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.303 and 2009 c 381 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) School districts, educational service districts, the Washington
state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss, the state school
for the blind, and their contractors hiring employees who will have
regularly scheduled unsupervised access to children shall require a
record check through the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system under RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.834, 10.97.030,
and 10.97.050 and through the federal bureau of investigation before
hiring an employee. The record check shall include a fingerprint check
using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint
card. The requesting entity shall provide a copy of the record report
to the applicant. When necessary, applicants may be employed on a
conditional basis pending completion of the investigation. If the
applicant has had a record check within the previous two years, the
district, the Washington state center for childhood deafness and
hearing loss, the state school for the blind, or contractor may waive
the requirement. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the district, pursuant to chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW, the Washington
state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss, the state school
for the blind, or contractor hiring the employee shall determine who
shall pay costs associated with the record check.
(2) Federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded schools may use the
process in subsection (1) of this section to perform record checks for
their employees and applicants for employment.
(3) Individuals who hold a valid portable background check
clearance card issued by the department of early learning consistent
with RCW 43.215.215 can meet the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section by providing a true and accurate copy of their Washington state
patrol and federal bureau of investigation background report results to
the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.410.010 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) The Washington professional educator standards board shall
establish, publish, and enforce rules determining eligibility for and
certification of personnel employed in the common schools of this
state, including certification for emergency or temporary, substitute
or provisional duty and under such certificates or permits as the board
shall deem proper or as otherwise prescribed by law. The rules shall
require that the initial application for certification shall require a
record check of the applicant through the Washington state patrol
criminal identification system and through the federal bureau of
investigation at the applicant's expense. The record check shall
include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal
identification fingerprint card. An individual who holds a valid
portable background check clearance card issued by the department of
early learning consistent with RCW 43.215.215 is exempt from the office
of the superintendent of public instruction fingerprint background
check if the individual provides a true and accurate copy of his or her
Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation background
report results to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. The superintendent of public instruction may waive the
record check for any applicant who has had a record check within the
two years before application. The rules shall permit a holder of a
lapsed certificate but not a revoked or suspended certificate to be
employed on a conditional basis by a school district with the
requirement that the holder must complete any certificate renewal
requirements established by the state board of education within two
years of initial reemployment.
(b) In establishing rules pertaining to the qualifications of
instructors of American sign language the board shall consult with the
national association of the deaf, "sign instructors guidance network"
(s.i.g.n.), and the Washington state association of the deaf for
evaluation and certification of sign language instructors.
(c) The board shall develop rules consistent with RCW 18.340.020
for the certification of spouses of military personnel.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall act as the
administrator of any such rules and have the power to issue any
certificates or permits and revoke the same in accordance with board
rules.

--- END ---