BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An online alternative credit degree program that awards degrees
based on an alternative credit model is established. This program is
intended to position the state to meet baccalaureate degree production
goals and to serve nontraditional students who may already hold some
postsecondary academic credits or life experience that can count
towards a degree.
(2) Students targeted for enrollment in this program include:
(a) Students who are early learning providers, to help expand
professional degree holders in the field;
(b) Veterans returning to civilian life with education, knowledge,
and skills acquired during military service;
(c) Students transferring from another college or university;
(d) High school students who are college bound;
(e) Students who come to a university or college with academic
credits earned through dual credit programs such as running start,
international baccalaureate, AP, college in the high school, and other
programs;
(f) Individuals who have completed education and training programs
provided by an employer;
(g) Individuals who have acquired knowledge and work experience on
the job or through an internship; and
(h) Individuals who have acquired some postsecondary academic
credit, but whose commitments to work or family prohibit degree
completion in a traditional baccalaureate setting.
(3) Central Washington University shall host the online alternative
credit degree program. In order to develop the program the university
shall:
(a) Communicate with community and business leaders to identify and
deliver needed programs;
(b) Develop and launch curricula and programs in response to the
needs of business and students;
(c) Evaluate and offer credit for student learning already acquired
outside of academic settings;
(d) Develop a delivery model that provides flexibility for working
students in place of a traditional instructional model and pace;
(e) Coordinate with other K-20 education providers; and
(f) Identify strategies to enhance baccalaureate aspirations in
underserved communities.
(4) Central Washington University shall consult with the department
of early learning for the purposes of targeting students who are early
learning providers in subsection (2)(a) of this section and developing
programs in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Central Washington University shall report annually by December
1st to the higher education committees of the legislature on progress
in implementing the program and recommendations for improvement or
expansion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2014, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---