BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A business owner has a cause of action for trespass against any
person who intentionally enters or remains unlawfully upon the business
owner's premises in violation of a written notice, provided by the
business owner to the person, notifying the person that: (a) He or she
is prohibited from reentering the premises; and (b) any reentry of the
person onto the premises in violation of the notice constitutes
trespass and is subject to the penalty established in this section.
(2) In any action under subsection (1) of this section, a business
owner may recover actual damages, or elect to recover statutory damages
in the amount of two hundred fifty dollars.
(3) As used in this section, the word "person" does not include an
employee or government contractor performing duties pursuant to law on
behalf of: (a) Any department, agency, or office of the state; or (b)
any political subdivision of the state.

--- END ---