BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 SHORT TITLE. This act may be known and
cited as the flood hazard reduction act of 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 FLOOD HAZARD REDUCTION BONDS AUTHORIZED.
For the purpose of providing funds to finance flood control,
prevention, protection, and mitigation projects in areas of Washington
state that are at greatest risk and most vulnerable to flooding, and
all costs incidental thereto, the state finance committee is authorized
to issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum
of one billion ten million dollars, or as much thereof as may be
required, to finance all or a part of the cost of these projects and
all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this section may be
sold at such price as the state finance committee shall determine. No
bonds authorized in this section may be offered for sale without prior
legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 BOND ISSUANCE--INTENT. (1) It is the intent
of the legislature that the proceeds of new bonds authorized in this
chapter will be appropriated in phases over five biennia, beginning
with the 2015-2017 biennium, to the office of financial management to
provide funding for flood control, prevention, protection, and
mitigation projects in areas of Washington state that are at greatest
risk and most vulnerable to flooding.
(2) This chapter is not intended to limit the legislature's ability
to appropriate bond proceeds if the full amount authorized in this
chapter has not been appropriated after five biennia. The
authorization to issue bonds contained in this chapter does not expire
until the full authorization has been appropriated and issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 PROCEEDS. (1) The proceeds from the sale of
the bonds authorized in section 2 of this act shall be deposited in the
flood hazard reduction account created in section 10 of this act.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) If the state finance committee deems it necessary to issue
bonds authorized in section 2 of this act as taxable bonds in order to
comply with federal internal revenue service rules and regulations
pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds or in order to reduce
the total financing costs for bonds issued, the proceeds of such
taxable bonds shall be transferred to the state taxable building
construction account in lieu of any deposit otherwise provided by this
section. The state treasurer shall submit written notice to the
director of the office of financial management if it is determined that
any such transfer to the state taxable building construction account is
necessary. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation.
(3) These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes
specified in section 2 of this act and for the payment of expenses
incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds, and shall be
administered by the office of financial management, subject to
legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 PAYMENT PROCEDURES, TERMS, AND COVENANTS.
(1) The debt-limit general fund bond retirement account shall be used
for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds
authorized in this chapter.
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements on the bonds authorized in this chapter.
(3) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest
payment is due on bonds issued under this chapter, the state treasurer
shall withdraw from any general state revenues received in the state
treasury and deposit in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement
account an amount equal to the amount certified by the state finance
committee to be due on the payment date.
(4) Bonds issued under this chapter shall state that they are a
general obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge the full
faith and credit of the state to the payment of the principal thereof
and the interest thereon, and shall contain an unconditional promise to
pay the principal and interest as the same shall become due.
(5) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.
(6) The state finance committee is authorized to prescribe the
form, terms, conditions, and covenants of the bonds provided for in
this chapter, the time or times of sale of all or any portion of them,
and the conditions and manner of their sale and issuance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 ADDITIONAL METHODS OF PAYING DEBT SERVICE
AUTHORIZED. The legislature may provide additional means for raising
moneys for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds
authorized under this chapter, and this section shall not be deemed to
provide an exclusive method for payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 BONDS--LEGAL INVESTMENT FOR PUBLIC FUNDS.
The bonds authorized by this chapter shall constitute a legal
investment for all state funds or for funds under state control and all
funds of municipal corporations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 INTENDED USE OF BOND PROCEEDS--PILOT
PROJECTS AUTHORIZED. The legislature intends to use three hundred
million dollars of the proceeds from the sale of bonds issued under
this chapter for flood control, prevention, protection, and mitigation
pilot projects in the Chehalis river basin including, but not limited
to, an upstream water retention facility. Pilot projects funded must
be reviewed and approved by both the Chehalis river basin flood
authority and the Chehalis tribe prior to the allotment of funds by the
office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 INTENDED USE OF BOND PROCEEDS--COMPETITIVE
GRANT PROGRAM. (1) The legislature intends to use seven hundred
million dollars of the proceeds from the sale of bonds issued under
this chapter for flood control, prevention, protection, and mitigation
grants to be distributed on a competitive basis to the following
eligible entities: Counties; cities; federally recognized Indian
tribes; port districts; flood control zone districts; flood control
districts; and diking and drainage districts.
(2) Applicants must provide a twenty percent match from nonstate
sources. The nonstate match may include cash on hand; the value of
real property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project; the
proceeds of a letter of credit or other binding loan commitment; a
pledge commitment; and in-kind contributions. Applicants may receive
credit for properly documented nonstate matching funds that were
contributed no earlier than ten years prior to the grant solicitation
round and that are related to the needs identified in the project
application. The office of financial management may develop additional
requirements related to documenting the value of the nonstate match.
(3) The office of financial management, in consultation with the
department of ecology, must evaluate, score, and rank applications
based on the following criteria, in descending order of priority:
(a) Projects that provide cost-effective hazard reduction to
people, property, critical facilities, and transportation corridors in
counties that have historically been and are projected to continue to
be at greatest risk and most vulnerable to flooding, including:
(i) Clark county;
(ii) Cowlitz county;
(iii) Grays Harbor county;
(iv) King county;
(v) Lewis county;
(vi) Pierce county;
(vii) Skagit county;
(viii) Snohomish county;
(ix) Thurston county;
(x) Whatcom county; and
(xi) Other counties as determined by the office of financial
management;
(b) Projects that have been examined through a collaborative
planning and approval process that includes public comment, such as a
comprehensive flood hazard management plan, a hazard mitigation plan,
a comprehensive plan, a watershed plan, or other applicable plans;
(c) Projects that minimize or eliminate future costs for
maintenance, operation, or emergency response;
(d) Projects that are ready to proceed with the scope of work, and
whose sponsors have the capacity to complete the project successfully;
(e) Projects that achieve multiple benefits, including, but not
limited to, salmon recovery, water quality improvements, habitat
restoration, and channel migration zone protection.
(4) Proceeds from the sale of bonds issued under this chapter may
not be used for the development of comprehensive flood hazard
management plans, hazard mitigation plans, comprehensive plans,
watershed plans, or other plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 CREATION OF THE FLOOD HAZARD REDUCTION
ACCOUNT. The flood hazard reduction account is created in the state
treasury. Proceeds from the bonds issued under section 4 of this act
shall be deposited in the account. The account shall be used for
purposes of section 2 of this act. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 86 RCW.

--- END ---