BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
FLOOD HAZARD REDUCTION BONDS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FLOOD HAZARD REDUCTION BONDS AUTHORIZED.
For the purpose of providing funds to finance projects for flood hazard
reduction that also protect or restore floodplain ecosystem functions,
and all costs incidental thereto, the state finance committee is
authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington
in the sum of seven hundred fifty-seven million five hundred thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to finance all or a
part of the cost of these projects and all costs incidental thereto.
Bonds authorized in this section may be sold at such price as the state
finance committee shall determine. No bonds authorized in this section
may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the
net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 BOND ISSUANCE--INTENT. (1) It is the
intent of the legislature that the proceeds of new bonds authorized in
section 101 of this act will be appropriated in phases over five
biennia, beginning with the 2015-2017 biennium, to the office of
financial management to provide funding for flood hazard reduction
projects that also protect or restore floodplain ecosystem functions.
(2) No more than three percent of the total biennial appropriation
may be retained by the office of financial management for
administrative expenses.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section is not intended to limit the
legislature's ability to appropriate bond proceeds if the full amount
authorized in section 101 of this act has not been appropriated after
five biennia. The authorization to issue bonds contained in this
chapter does not expire until the full authorization has been
appropriated and issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 PROCEEDS. (1) The proceeds from the sale
of the bonds authorized in section 101 of this act shall be deposited
in the flood hazard reduction account created in section 108 of this
act. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) If the state finance committee deems it necessary to issue
bonds authorized in section 101 of this act as taxable bonds in order
to comply with federal internal revenue service rules and regulations
pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds or in order to reduce
the total financing costs for bonds issued, the proceeds of such
taxable bonds shall be transferred to the state taxable building
construction account in lieu of any deposit otherwise provided by this
section. The state treasurer shall submit written notice to the
director of the office of financial management if it is determined that
any such transfer to the state taxable building construction account is
necessary. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation.
(3) These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes
specified in section 101 of this act and for the payment of expenses
incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds, and shall be
administered by the office of financial management, subject to
legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 PAYMENT PROCEDURES, TERMS, AND COVENANTS.
(1) The debt-limit general fund bond retirement account shall be used
for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds
authorized in section 101 of this act.
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements on the bonds authorized in section 101 of this act.
(3) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest
payment is due on bonds issued under section 101 of this act, the state
treasurer shall withdraw from any general state revenues received in
the state treasury and deposit in the debt-limit general fund bond
retirement account an amount equal to the amount certified by the state
finance committee to be due on the payment date.
(4) Bonds issued under section 101 of this act shall state that
they are a general obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge
the full faith and credit of the state to the payment of the principal
thereof and the interest thereon, and shall contain an unconditional
promise to pay the principal and interest as the same shall become due.
(5) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.
(6) The state finance committee is authorized to prescribe the
form, terms, conditions, and covenants of the bonds provided for in
section 101 of this act, the time or times of sale of all or any
portion of them, and the conditions and manner of their sale and
issuance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 ADDITIONAL METHODS OF PAYING DEBT SERVICE
AUTHORIZED. The legislature may provide additional means for raising
moneys for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds
authorized in section 101 of this act, and this section shall not be
deemed to provide an exclusive method for payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 BONDS--LEGAL INVESTMENT FOR PUBLIC FUNDS.
The bonds authorized by section 101 of this act shall constitute a
legal investment for all state funds or for funds under state control
and all funds of municipal corporations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 INTENDED USE OF BOND PROCEEDS--COMPETITIVE
GRANT PROGRAM. (1) The legislature intends to use the proceeds from
the sale of bonds issued under section 101 of this act for flood hazard
reduction projects that also protect or restore floodplain ecosystem
functions. Grants may be distributed on a competitive basis to the
following eligible entities: Counties; cities; federally recognized
Indian tribes; port districts; flood control zone districts; flood
control districts; and diking and drainage districts.
(2) Applicants must provide a twenty percent match from nonstate
sources. The nonstate match may include cash on hand; the value of
real property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project; the
proceeds of a letter of credit or other binding loan commitment; a
pledge commitment; and in-kind contributions. Applicants may receive
credit for properly documented nonstate matching funds that were
contributed no earlier than ten years prior to the grant solicitation
round and that are related to the needs identified in the project
application. The office of financial management may develop additional
requirements related to documenting the value of the nonstate match.
(3) The office of financial management, in consultation with the
department of ecology, must evaluate, score, and rank applications
based on the following criteria, in descending order of priority:
(a) Projects that achieve multiple benefits, including, but not
limited to, cost-effective flood hazard reduction to people, property,
critical facilities, and transportation corridors, flood risk
reduction, salmon recovery, water quality improvements, habitat
restoration, agricultural viability, public access, and channel
migration zone protection. Projects must address both reduction and
prevention of flood risks, and protection or restoration of floodplain
ecosystem functions. For the Chehalis river basin, projects may also
include, but not be limited to, an upstream water retention facility.
(i) Priority must first be given to projects that:
(A) Are located in a county or counties covered by ten or more
state emergency flood proclamations from 1996 to 2012;
and
(B) Are part of a basin-wide strategy created by a governor's work
group in close collaboration with an Indian tribe and a multicounty
flood authority.
(ii) Priority must next be given to projects in counties that have
historically been and are projected to continue to be at greatest risk
and most vulnerable to flooding;
(b) Projects that are consistent with and recommended by a
collaborative planning and approval process that includes public
comment, such as a comprehensive flood hazard management plan, a hazard
mitigation plan, a comprehensive plan, a watershed plan, or other
applicable plans;
(c) Projects that minimize or eliminate future costs for
maintenance, operation, or emergency response; and
(d) Projects that are ready to proceed with the scope of work, and
whose sponsors have the capacity to complete the project successfully.
(4) Proceeds from the sale of bonds issued under this chapter may
not be used for the development of comprehensive flood hazard
management plans, hazard mitigation plans, comprehensive plans,
watershed plans, or other plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 CREATION OF THE FLOOD HAZARD REDUCTION
ACCOUNT. The flood hazard reduction account is created in the state
treasury. Proceeds from the bonds issued under section 103 of this act
shall be deposited in the account. The account shall be used for
purposes of section 101 of this act. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation.

PART II
STORM WATER BONDS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 STORM WATER BONDS AUTHORIZED. For the
purpose of providing funds to finance an ongoing, statewide competitive
program of grants to cities and counties for storm water projects that
protect and improve water quality and improve watershed functionality,
and all costs incidental thereto, the state finance committee is
authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington
in the sum of seven hundred fifty-seven million five hundred thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to finance all or a
part of the cost of these projects and all costs incidental thereto.
Bonds authorized in this section may be sold at such price as the state
finance committee shall determine. No bonds authorized in this section
may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the
net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 BOND ISSUANCE--INTENT. (1) It is the
intent of the legislature that the proceeds of new bonds authorized in
section 201 of this act will be appropriated in phases over five
biennia, beginning with the 2015-2017 biennium, to the department of
ecology to provide funding to cities and counties for competitive storm
water grants.
(2) No more than three percent of the total biennial appropriation
may be retained by the department of ecology for administrative
expenses.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section is not intended to limit the
legislature's ability to appropriate bond proceeds if the full amount
authorized in this chapter has not been appropriated after five
biennia. The authorization to issue bonds contained in this chapter
does not expire until the full authorization has been appropriated and
issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 PROCEEDS. (1) The proceeds from the sale
of the bonds authorized in section 201 of this act shall be deposited
in the storm water financial assistance account created in section 208
of this act. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation.
(2) If the state finance committee deems it necessary to issue
bonds authorized in section 201 of this act as taxable bonds in order
to comply with federal internal revenue service rules and regulations
pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds or in order to reduce
the total financing costs for bonds issued, the proceeds of such
taxable bonds shall be transferred to the state taxable building
construction account in lieu of any deposit otherwise provided by this
section. The state treasurer shall submit written notice to the
director of the office of financial management if it is determined that
any such transfer to the state taxable building construction account is
necessary. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation.
(3) These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes
specified in section 201 of this act and for the payment of expenses
incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds, and shall be
administered by the department of ecology, subject to legislative
appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 PAYMENT PROCEDURES, TERMS, AND COVENANTS.
(1) The debt-limit general fund bond retirement account shall be used
for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds
authorized in section 201 of this act.
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements on the bonds authorized in section 201 of this act.
(3) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest
payment is due on bonds issued under section 201 of this act, the state
treasurer shall withdraw from any general state revenues received in
the state treasury and deposit in the debt-limit general fund bond
retirement account an amount equal to the amount certified by the state
finance committee to be due on the payment date.
(4) Bonds issued under section 201 of this act shall state that
they are a general obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge
the full faith and credit of the state to the payment of the principal
thereof and the interest thereon, and shall contain an unconditional
promise to pay the principal and interest as the same shall become due.
(5) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.
(6) The state finance committee is authorized to prescribe the
form, terms, conditions, and covenants of the bonds provided for in
section 201 of this act, the time or times of sale of all or any
portion of them, and the conditions and manner of their sale and
issuance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 ADDITIONAL METHODS OF PAYING DEBT SERVICE
AUTHORIZED. The legislature may provide additional means for raising
moneys for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds
authorized in section 201 of this act, and this section shall not be
deemed to provide an exclusive method for payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 BONDS--LEGAL INVESTMENT FOR PUBLIC FUNDS.
The bonds authorized by section 201 of this act shall constitute a
legal investment for all state funds or for funds under state control
and all funds of municipal corporations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 INTENDED USE OF BOND PROCEEDS--STORM WATER
COMPETITIVE GRANT PROGRAM. (1) The legislature intends to use the
proceeds from the sale of bonds issued under section 201 of this act
for a competitive program of grants to cities and counties for storm
water projects that protect and improve water quality and improve
watershed functionality.
(2) The department of ecology shall administer the competitive
storm water grant program.
(3) The grants must be provided solely for capital projects that:
(a) Implement pollutant reduction strategies which advance the
state's compliance with water quality standards under the federal clean
water act; and
(b) Are the result of collaboration and agreement between a city or
a county, and any Indian tribe or tribes whose reservation lands or
usual and accustomed fishing areas include the affected portion of the
receiving water body.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 CREATION OF THE STORM WATER FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT. The storm water financial assistance account is
created in the state treasury. Proceeds from the bonds issued under
section 203 of this act shall be deposited in the account. The account
shall be used for purposes of section 201 of this act. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation.

PART III
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid,
the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 Sections 101 through 108 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 Sections 201 through 208 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---