BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that effective
professional learning enables educators to develop the knowledge,
skills, practices, and dispositions needed to help students learn and
achieve at higher levels.
(2) The legislature further finds that a clear definition of
professional learning provides a foundational vision that sets the
course for how state, regional, and local education leaders support
educator professional development. A shared, statewide definition is
a piece of critical infrastructure to guide policy and investments in
the content, structure, and provision of the types of professional
development that are associated with increased student performance. A
definition of professional learning is also an accountability measure
to assure that professional development will have the highest possible
return on investment in terms of increased student performance.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to adopt a statewide
definition of effective professional learning and encourages each
public school and school district to establish sustained, job-embedded,
relevant professional learning opportunities that meet the definition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The term "professional learning" means a comprehensive,
sustained, and intensive approach to improving teachers' and
principals' effectiveness in raising student achievement. Professional
learning fosters collective responsibility for improved student
performance and must comprise learning that is aligned with student
learning and educator development needs, and school, school district,
or state improvement goals. Professional learning shall have as its
primary focus the improvement of teachers' and school leaders'
effectiveness in assisting all students to meet the state learning
goals.
(2) Professional learning shall include the work of established
collaborative teams of teachers, school leaders, and other
administrative, instructional, and educational services staff members,
or third-party providers under contract with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, who commit to working together to
accomplish common goals and who are engaged in a continuous cycle of
professional improvement that is focused on:
(a) Evaluating student and teacher learning needs through ongoing
reviews of data on student and teacher performance;
(b) Defining a clear set of educator learning goals based on the
rigorous analysis of these data; and
(c) Regularly assessing the effectiveness of the professional
learning in achieving identified learning goals, improving teaching,
and assisting all students in meeting state academic learning
standards.
(3) Professional learning shall incorporate coherent, sustained,
and evidence-based strategies that improve educator effectiveness and
student achievement, including job-embedded coaching or other forms of
assistance to support educators' transfer of new knowledge and skills
to their work.
(4) Professional learning may be supported by external expert
assistance or additional activities that:
(a) Address defined student and educator learning goals;
(b) Advance ongoing school-based professional development; and
(c) Include, but are not limited to, courses, workshops,
institutes, networks, and conferences provided by for-profit and
nonprofit entities outside the school such as universities, educational
service districts, technical assistance providers, networks of content
specialists, and other education organizations and associations.

--- END ---