BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16A.060 and 2011 c 114 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director may not issue or renew a motor vehicle
registration or change the registered owner of a registered vehicle for
any motor vehicle required to be inspected under chapter 70.120 RCW,
unless the application for issuance or renewal is: (a) Accompanied by
a valid certificate of compliance or a valid certificate of acceptance
issued as required under chapter 70.120 RCW; or (b) exempt, as
described in subsection (2) of this section. The certificates must
have a date of validation that is within twelve months of the assigned
registration renewal date. Certificates for fleet or owner tested
diesel vehicles may have a date of validation that is within twelve
months of the assigned registration renewal date.
(2) The following motor vehicles are exempt from emission test
requirements:
(a) Motor vehicles that are less than five years old or more than
twenty-five years old;
(b) Motor vehicles that are a 2009 model year or newer;
(c) Motor vehicles powered exclusively by electricity, propane,
compressed natural gas, or liquid petroleum gas;
(d) Motorcycles as defined in RCW 46.04.330 and motor-driven cycles
as defined in RCW 46.04.332;
(e) Farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.181;
(f) Street rod vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.572 and custom
vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.161;
(g) Used vehicles that are offered for sale by a motor vehicle
dealer licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW;
(h) Classes of motor vehicles exempted by the director of the
department of ecology; ((and))
(i) Hybrid motor vehicles that obtain a rating by the environmental
protection agency of at least fifty miles per gallon of gas during city
driving. For purposes of this section, a hybrid motor vehicle is one
that uses propulsion units powered by both electricity and gas; and
(j) Collectible vehicles as defined in section 2 of this act.
(3) The department of ecology shall provide information to motor
vehicle owners:
(a) Regarding the boundaries of emission contributing areas and
restrictions established under this section that apply to vehicles
registered in such areas; and
(b) On the relationship between motor vehicles and air pollution
and steps motor vehicle owners should take to reduce motor vehicle
related air pollution.
(4) The department of licensing shall:
(a) Notify all registered motor vehicle owners affected by the
emission testing program that they must have an emission test to renew
their registration;
(b) Adopt rules implementing and enforcing this section, except for
subsection (2)(e) of this section, as specified in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(5) A motor vehicle may not be registered, leased, rented, or sold
for use in the state, starting with the model year as provided in RCW
70.120A.010, unless the vehicle:
(a) Has seven thousand five hundred miles or more; or
(b)(i) Is consistent with the vehicle emission standards and carbon
dioxide equivalent emission standards adopted by the department of
ecology; and
(ii) Has a California certification label for all emission
standards, and carbon dioxide equivalent emission standards necessary
to meet fleet average requirements.
(6) The department of licensing, in consultation with the
department of ecology, may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section and may provide for reasonable exemptions to these
requirements. The department of ecology may exempt public safety
vehicles from meeting the standards where the department finds that
vehicles necessary to meet the needs of public safety agencies are not
otherwise reasonably available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Collectible vehicle" means a vehicle that complies with the
following:
(1) Is of unique or rare design, of limited production, and an
object of curiosity;
(2) Is maintained primarily for use in car club activities,
exhibitions, parades, or other functions of public interest or for a
private collection, and is used only infrequently for other purposes;
and
(3) Has collectible vehicle or classic automobile insurance
coverage that restricts the collectible vehicle mileage or use, or
both, and requires the owner to have another vehicle for personal use.

--- END ---