BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.52.112 and 1986 c 9 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All taxes, penalties, and interest shall be paid in full before
any action may be instituted in any court to contest all or any part of
such taxes, penalties, or interest unless the court determines that
there would be an undue hardship to the employer. In the event an
employer prevails in a court action, the employer shall be allowed
interest on all taxes, penalties, and interest paid by the employer but
determined by a final order of the court to not be due, from the date
such taxes, penalties, and interest were paid. Interest shall be at
the rate allowed by law as prejudgment interest.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply when the employer
is appealing a decision and order affirming an order assessing taxes,
penalties under RCW 51.48.030, and any interest assessed under RCW
51.48.210, in which the board reversed the proposed decision and order
of the industrial appeals judge.

--- END ---