BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.145 and 2013 c 98 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any craft distillery may sell spirits of its own production for
consumption off the premises((, up to three liters per person per
day)). A craft distillery selling spirits under this subsection must
comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to retailers.
(2) Any craft distillery may contract distilled spirits for, and
sell contract distilled spirits to, holders of distillers' or
manufacturers' licenses, including licenses issued under RCW 66.24.520,
or for export.
(3) Any craft distillery licensed under this section may provide,
free ((of)) or for a charge, one-half ounce or less samples of spirits
of its own production to persons on the premises of the distillery.
The maximum total per person per day is two ounces. Every person who
participates in any manner in the service of samples must obtain a
class 12 alcohol server permit.
(4) The board must adopt rules to implement the alcohol server
permit requirement and may adopt additional rules to implement this
section.
(5) Distilling is an agricultural practice.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.28.040 and 2012 c 2 s 116 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as permitted by the board under RCW 66.20.010, no domestic
brewery, microbrewery, distributor, distiller, domestic winery,
importer, rectifier, certificate of approval holder, or other
manufacturer of liquor may, within the state of Washington, give to any
person any liquor; but nothing in this section nor in RCW 66.28.305
prevents a domestic brewery, microbrewery, distributor, domestic
winery, distiller, certificate of approval holder, or importer from
furnishing samples of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to authorized
licensees for the purpose of negotiating a sale, in accordance with
regulations adopted by the liquor control board, provided that the
samples are subject to taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
nothing in this section prevents a domestic brewery, microbrewery,
domestic winery, distillery, certificate of approval holder, or
distributor from furnishing beer, wine, or spirituous liquor for
instructional purposes under RCW 66.28.150; nothing in this section
prevents a domestic winery, certificate of approval holder, or
distributor from furnishing wine without charge, subject to the taxes
imposed by RCW 66.24.210, to a not-for-profit group organized and
operated solely for the purpose of enology or the study of viticulture
which has been in existence for at least six months and that uses wine
so furnished solely for such educational purposes or a domestic winery,
or an out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from furnishing wine
without charge or a domestic brewery, or an out-of-state certificate of
approval holder, from furnishing beer without charge, subject to the
taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, or a domestic distiller
licensed under RCW 66.24.140 or an accredited representative of a
distiller, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor
licensed under RCW 66.24.310, from furnishing spirits without charge,
to a nonprofit charitable corporation or association exempt from
taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or (6) of the internal revenue
code of 1986 for use consistent with the purpose or purposes entitling
it to such exemption; nothing in this section prevents a domestic
brewery or microbrewery from serving beer without charge, on the
brewery premises; nothing in this section prevents donations of wine
for the purposes of RCW 66.12.180; nothing in this section prevents a
domestic winery from serving wine without charge, on the winery
premises; and nothing in this section prevents a craft distillery from
serving spirits ((without charge)), on the distillery premises subject
to RCW 66.24.145.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.126.020 and 2012 c 2 s 213 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agreement of distributorship" means any contract, agreement,
commercial relationship, license, association, or any other
arrangement, for a definite or indefinite period, between a supplier
and distributor.
(2) "Authorized representative" has the same meaning as "authorized
representative" as defined in RCW 66.04.010.
(3) "Brand" means any word, name, group of letters, symbol, or
combination thereof, including the name of the distiller or brewer if
the distiller's or brewer's name is also a significant part of the
product name, adopted and used by a supplier to identify specific
spirits or a specific malt beverage product and to distinguish that
product from other spirits or malt beverages produced by that supplier
or other suppliers.
(4) "Distributor" means any person, including but not limited to a
component of a supplier's distribution system constituted as an
independent business, importing or causing to be imported into this
state, or purchasing or causing to be purchased within this state, any
spirits or malt beverages for sale or resale to retailers licensed
under the laws of this state, regardless of whether the business of
such person is conducted under the terms of any agreement with a
distiller or malt beverage manufacturer.
(5) "Importer" means any distributor importing spirits or beer into
this state for sale to retailer accounts or for sale to other
distributors designated as "subjobbers" for resale.
(6) "Malt beverage manufacturer" means every brewer, fermenter,
processor, bottler, or packager of malt beverages located within or
outside this state, or any other person, whether located within or
outside this state, who enters into an agreement of distributorship for
the resale of malt beverages in this state with any wholesale
distributor doing business in the state of Washington.
(7) "Person" means any natural person, corporation, partnership,
trust, agency, or other entity, as well as any individual officers,
directors, or other persons in active control of the activities of such
entity.
(8) "Spirits manufacturer" means every distiller, processor,
bottler, or packager of spirits located within or outside this state,
or any other person, whether located within or outside this state, who
enters into an agreement of distributorship for the resale of spirits
in this state with any wholesale distributor doing business in the
state of Washington.
(9) "Successor distributor" means any distributor who enters into
an agreement, whether oral or written, to distribute a brand of spirits
or malt beverages after the supplier with whom such agreement is made
or the person from whom that supplier acquired the right to manufacture
or distribute the brand has terminated, canceled, or failed to renew an
agreement of distributorship, whether oral or written, with another
distributor to distribute that same brand of spirits or malt beverages.
(10) "Supplier" means any spirits or malt beverage manufacturer or
importer who enters into or is a party to any agreement of
distributorship with a wholesale distributor. "Supplier" does not
include: (a) Any distiller licensed under RCW 66.24.140 or 66.24.145
and producing less than ((sixty)) one hundred fifty thousand proof
gallons of spirits annually or any brewery or microbrewery licensed
under RCW 66.24.240 and producing less than two hundred thousand
barrels of malt liquor annually; (b) any brewer or manufacturer of malt
liquor producing less than two hundred thousand barrels of malt liquor
annually and holding a certificate of approval issued under RCW
66.24.270; or (c) any authorized representative of distillers or malt
liquor manufacturers who holds an appointment from one or more
distillers or malt liquor manufacturers which, in the aggregate,
produce less than two hundred thousand barrels of malt liquor or
((sixty)) one hundred fifty thousand proof gallons of spirits.
(11) "Terminated distribution rights" means distribution rights
with respect to a brand of malt beverages which are lost by a
terminated distributor as a result of termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal of an agreement of distributorship for that brand.
(12) "Terminated distributor" means a distributor whose agreement
of distributorship with respect to a brand of spirits or malt
beverages, whether oral or written, has been terminated, canceled, or
not renewed.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.24.140 and 2010 c 290 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license to distillers, including blending,
rectifying and bottling; fee two thousand dollars per annum, unless
provided otherwise as follows:
(((1))) (a) For distillers producing ((sixty)) one hundred fifty
thousand gallons or less of spirits with at least half of the raw
materials used in the production grown in Washington, the license fee
((shall)) must be reduced to one hundred dollars per annum;
(((2))) (b) The board ((shall)) must license stills used and to be
used solely and only by a commercial chemist for laboratory purposes,
and not for the manufacture of liquor for sale, at a fee of twenty
dollars per annum;
(((3))) (c) The board ((shall)) must license stills used and to be
used solely and only for laboratory purposes in any school, college or
educational institution in the state, without fee; and
(((4))) (d) The board ((shall)) must license stills ((which shall))
that have been duly licensed as fruit and/or wine distilleries by the
federal government, used and to be used solely as fruit and/or wine
distilleries in the production of fruit brandy and wine spirits, at a
fee of two hundred dollars per annum.
(2) Any distillery licensed under this section may:
(a) Sell spirits of its own production for consumption off the
premises. A distillery selling spirits under this subsection must
comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to retailers;
(b) Contract distilled spirits for, and sell contract distilled
spirits to, holders of distillers' or manufacturers' licenses,
including licenses issued under RCW 66.24.520, or for export; and
(c) Provide free or for a charge one-half ounce or less samples of
spirits of its own production to persons on the premises of the
distillery. The maximum total per person per day is two ounces. Every
person who participates in any manner in the service of samples must
obtain a class 12 alcohol server permit.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.28.310 and 2013 c 107 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits an industry member from
providing retailers branded promotional items which are of nominal
value, singly or in the aggregate. Such items include but are not
limited to: Trays, lighters, blotters, postcards, pencils, coasters,
menu cards, meal checks, napkins, clocks, mugs, glasses, bottles or can
openers, corkscrews, matches, printed recipes, shirts, hats, visors,
and other similar items. Branded promotional items:
(i) Must be used exclusively by the retailer or its employees in a
manner consistent with its license;
(ii) Must bear imprinted advertising matter of the industry member
only, except imprinted advertising matter of the industry member can
include the logo of a professional sports team which the industry
member is licensed to use;
(iii) May be provided by industry members only to retailers and
their employees and may not be provided by or through retailers or
their employees to retail customers; and
(iv) May not be targeted to or appeal principally to youth.
(b) An industry member is not obligated to provide any such branded
promotional items, and a retailer may not require an industry member to
provide such branded promotional items as a condition for selling any
alcohol to the retailer.
(c) Any industry member or retailer or any other person asserting
that the provision of branded promotional items as allowed in (a) of
this subsection has resulted or is more likely than not to result in
undue influence or an adverse impact on public health and safety, or is
otherwise inconsistent with the criteria in (a) of this subsection may
file a complaint with the board. Upon receipt of a complaint the board
may conduct such investigation as it deems appropriate in the
circumstances. If the investigation reveals the provision of branded
promotional items has resulted in or is more likely than not to result
in undue influence or has resulted or is more likely than not to result
in an adverse impact on public health and safety or is otherwise
inconsistent with (a) of this subsection the board may issue an
administrative violation notice to the industry member, to the
retailer, or both. The recipient of the administrative violation
notice may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits:
(a) An industry member from providing to a special occasion
licensee and a special occasion licensee from receiving services for:
(i) Installation of draft beer dispensing equipment or advertising;
(ii) Advertising, pouring, or dispensing of beer or wine at a beer
or wine tasting exhibition or judging event; or
(iii) Pouring or dispensing of spirits by a licensed domestic
distiller or the accredited representative of a distiller,
manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor licensed
under RCW 66.24.310; or
(b) Special occasion licensees from paying for beer ((or)), wine,
or spirits immediately following the end of the special occasion event;
or
(c) Wineries ((or)), breweries, or distilleries that are
participating in a special occasion event from paying reasonable booth
fees to the special occasion licensee.
(3) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits industry members from
performing, and retailers from accepting the service of building,
rotating, and restocking displays and stockroom inventories; rotating
and rearranging can and bottle displays of their own products;
providing point of sale material and brand signs; pricing case goods of
their own brands; and performing such similar business services
consistent with board rules, or personal services as described in
subsection (5) of this section.
(4) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits:
(a) Industry members from listing on their internet web sites
information related to retailers who sell or promote their products,
including direct links to the retailers' internet web sites; and
(b) Retailers from listing on their internet web sites information
related to industry members whose products those retailers sell or
promote, including direct links to the industry members' web sites; or
(c) Industry members and retailers from producing, jointly or
together with regional, state, or local industry associations,
brochures and materials promoting tourism in Washington state which
contain information regarding retail licensees, industry members, and
their products.
(5) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits the performance of personal
services offered from time to time by a domestic winery or certificate
of approval holder to retailers when the personal services are (a)
conducted at a licensed premises, and (b) intended to inform, educate,
or enhance customers' knowledge or experience of the manufacturer's
products. The performance of personal services may include
participation and pouring, bottle signing events, and other similar
informational or educational activities at the premises of a retailer
holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, a wine and/or
beer restaurant license, a specialty wine shop license, a special
occasion license, a grocery store license with a tasting endorsement,
or a private club license. A domestic winery or certificate of
approval holder is not obligated to perform any such personal services,
and a retail licensee may not require a domestic winery or certificate
of approval holder to conduct any personal service as a condition for
selling any alcohol to the retail licensee, or as a condition for
including any product of the domestic winery or certificate of approval
holder in any tasting conducted by the licensee. Except as provided in
RCW 66.28.150, the cost of sampling may not be borne, directly or
indirectly, by any domestic winery or certificate of approval holder or
any distributor. Nothing in this section prohibits wineries,
breweries, microbreweries, certificate of approval holders, and retail
licensees from identifying the producers on private labels authorized
under RCW 66.24.400, 66.24.425, 66.24.450, 66.24.360, and 66.24.371.
(6) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits an industry member from
entering into an arrangement with any holder of a sports entertainment
facility license or an affiliated business for brand advertising at the
licensed facility or promoting events held at the sports entertainment
facility as authorized under RCW 66.24.570.
(7) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits the performance of personal
services offered from time to time by a domestic brewery, microbrewery,
or beer certificate of approval holder to grocery store licensees with
a tasting endorsement when the personal services are (a) conducted at
a licensed premises in conjunction with a tasting event, and (b)
intended to inform, educate, or enhance customers' knowledge or
experience of the manufacturer's products. The performance of personal
services may include participation and pouring, bottle signing events,
and other similar informational or educational activities. A domestic
brewery, microbrewery, or beer certificate of approval holder is not
obligated to perform any such personal services, and a grocery store
licensee may not require the performance of any personal service as a
condition for including any product in any tasting conducted by the
licensee.
(8) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits an arrangement between a
domestic winery and a restaurant licensed under RCW 66.24.320 or
66.24.400 to waive a corkage fee.
(9) Nothing in this section prohibits professional sports teams who
hold a retail liquor license or their agents from accepting bona fide
liquor advertising from manufacturers, importers, distributors, or
their agents for use in the sporting arena. Professional sports teams
who hold a retail liquor license or their agents may license the
manufacturer, importer, distributor, or their agents to use the name
and trademarks of the professional sports team in their advertising and
promotions, under the following conditions:
(a) Such advertising must be paid for by said manufacturer,
importer, distributor, or their agent at the published advertising rate
or at a reasonable fair market value.
(b) Such advertising may carry with it no express or implied offer
on the part of the manufacturer, importer, distributor, or their agent,
or promise on the part of the retail licensee whose operation is
directly or indirectly part of the sporting arena, to stock or list any
particular brand of liquor to the total or partial exclusion of any
other brand.

--- END ---