BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All bills introduced, and any proposed substitute, striking
amendment, or conference committee report thereon, must be made
publicly available to the members of the legislature and the public at
least seventy-two hours before the bill is eligible for a public
hearing, legislative action, or to be voted on by the senate or the
house of representatives.
(2) At least seventy-two hours notice must be given of all public
hearings held by any legislative committee. Such notice shall contain
the date, time, and place of the hearing together with the title and
number of each bill, or identification of the subject matter, to be
considered at the hearing.
(3) No bill is eligible for legislative action of any kind unless
it has first been subject to a public hearing in the same session of
consideration.
(4) No bill is eligible for legislative action on the floor of
either the senate or house of representatives until forty-eight hours
after it has been placed on the floor calendar.
(5) No bill is eligible for final passage in either house of the
legislature unless copies of the bill, in the final form to be passed,
have been made available to the members of that house of the
legislature and the public for at least twenty-four hours.
(6) This section may be suspended by a two-thirds vote of the
members elected to the house of the legislature in which it is pending,
and every individual consideration of a bill or action suspending this
section must be recorded in the journal of the respective house of the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
No bill is eligible for public hearing or legislative consideration
of any kind unless the bill lays forth in full the changes to any act
or sections of law. Title-only bills are prohibited.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All committees of the legislature are open to the public and
shall follow the requirements of chapter 42.30 RCW.
(2) A policy committee may not temporarily adjourn solely for the
purpose of allowing caucus meetings with the public excluded so that
committee members may discuss a pending vote on a bill or amendment
prior to committee action on a bill.

--- END ---