BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16A.030 and 2011 c 171 s 43 and 2011 c 96 s 31 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Vehicles must be registered as required by this chapter and
must display license plates or decals assigned by the department.
(2) It is unlawful for a person to operate any vehicle on a public
highway of this state without having in full force and effect a current
and proper vehicle registration and displaying license plates on the
vehicle.
(3) Vehicle license plates or registration certificates, whether
original issues or duplicates, may not be issued or furnished by the
department until the applicant makes satisfactory application for a
certificate of title or presents satisfactory evidence that a
certificate of title covering the vehicle has been previously issued.
(4) Failure to make initial registration before operating a vehicle
on the public highways of this state is a traffic infraction. A person
committing this infraction must pay a fine of five hundred twenty-nine
dollars, which may ((not)) be suspended, deferred, or reduced. This
fine is in addition to any delinquent taxes and fees that must be
deposited and distributed in the same manner as if the taxes and fees
were properly paid in a timely fashion. The ((five hundred twenty-nine
dollar)) fine must be deposited into the vehicle licensing fraud
account created in the state treasury in RCW 46.68.250.
(5) Failure to renew an expired registration before operating a
vehicle on the public highways of this state is a traffic infraction.
(6) It is a gross misdemeanor for a resident, as identified in RCW
46.16A.140, to register a vehicle in another state, evading the payment
of any tax or vehicle license fee imposed in connection with
registration. It is punishable, in lieu of the fine in subsection (4)
of this section, as follows:
(a) For a first offense:
(i) Up to three hundred sixty-four days in the county jail;
(ii) Payment of a fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars plus any
applicable assessments, which may ((not)) be suspended, deferred, or
reduced. The fine ((of five hundred twenty-nine dollars)) must be
deposited into the vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state
treasury in RCW 46.68.250;
(iii) A fine of one thousand dollars to be deposited into the
vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state treasury in RCW
46.68.250, which may ((not)) be suspended, deferred, or reduced; and
(iv) The delinquent taxes and fees, which must be deposited and
distributed in the same manner as if the taxes and fees were properly
paid in a timely fashion, and which may ((not)) be suspended, deferred,
or reduced;
(b) For a second or subsequent offense:
(i) Up to three hundred sixty-four days in the county jail;
(ii) Payment of a fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars plus any
applicable assessments, which may ((not)) be suspended, deferred, or
reduced. The fine ((of five hundred twenty-nine dollars)) must be
deposited into the vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state
treasury in RCW 46.68.250;
(iii) A fine of five thousand dollars to be deposited into the
vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state treasury in RCW
46.68.250, which may ((not)) be suspended, deferred, or reduced; and
(iv) The amount of delinquent taxes and fees, which must be
deposited and distributed in the same manner as if the taxes and fees
were properly paid in a timely fashion, and which may ((not)) be
suspended, deferred, or reduced.
(7) A vehicle with an expired registration of more than forty-five
days parked on a public street may be impounded by a police officer
under RCW 46.55.113(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By June 30, 2016, the administrative office
of the courts must report to the legislature on the results of the fine
changes in section 1, chapter . . ., Laws of 2014 (section 1 of this
act). The report must include whether enforcement or prosecution, or
both, along with distributions to the vehicle licensing fraud account,
increased or decreased due to the changes.

--- END ---