BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 60.04.011 and 1992 c 126 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Construction agent" means any registered or licensed
contractor, registered or licensed subcontractor, architect, engineer,
or other person having charge of any improvement to real property, who
shall be deemed the agent of the owner for the limited purpose of
establishing the lien created by this chapter.
(2) "Contract price" means the amount agreed upon by the
contracting parties, or if no amount is agreed upon, then the customary
and reasonable charge therefor.
(3) "Draws" means periodic disbursements of interim or construction
financing by a lender.
(4) "Furnishing labor, professional services, materials, or
equipment" means the performance of any labor or professional services,
the contribution owed to any employee benefit plan on account of any
labor, the provision of any supplies or materials, and the renting,
leasing, or otherwise supplying of equipment for the improvement of
real property.
(5) "Improvement" means: (a) Constructing, altering, repairing,
remodeling, demolishing, clearing, grading, or filling in, of, to, or
upon any real property or street or road in front of or adjoining the
same; (b) planting of trees, vines, shrubs, plants, hedges, or lawns,
or providing other landscaping materials on any real property; and (c)
providing professional services upon real property or in preparation
for or in conjunction with the intended activities in (a) or (b) of
this subsection.
(6) "Interim or construction financing" means that portion of money
secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other encumbrance to finance
improvement of, or to real property, but does not include:
(a) Funds to acquire real property;
(b) Funds to pay interest, insurance premiums, lease deposits,
taxes, assessments, or prior encumbrances;
(c) Funds to pay loan, commitment, title, legal, closing,
recording, or appraisal fees;
(d) Funds to pay other customary fees, which pursuant to agreement
with the owner or borrower are to be paid by the lender from time to
time;
(e) Funds to acquire personal property for which the potential lien
claimant may not claim a lien pursuant to this chapter.
(7) "Labor" means exertion of the powers of body or mind performed
at the site for compensation. "Labor" includes amounts due and owed to
any employee benefit plan on account of such labor performed.
(8) "Mortgagee" means a person who has a valid mortgage of record
or deed of trust of record securing a loan.
(9) "Owner-occupied" means a single-family residence occupied by
the owner as his or her principal residence.
(10) "Payment bond" means a surety bond issued by a surety licensed
to issue surety bonds in the state of Washington that confers upon
potential claimants the rights of third party beneficiaries.
(11) "Potential lien claimant" means any person or entity entitled
to assert lien rights under this chapter who has otherwise complied
with the provisions of this chapter and is registered or licensed if
required to be licensed or registered by the provisions of the laws of
the state of Washington.
(12) "Prime contractor" includes all contractors, general
contractors, and specialty contractors, as defined by chapter 18.27 or
19.28 RCW, or who are otherwise required to be registered or licensed
by law, who contract directly with a property owner or their common law
agent to assume primary responsibility for the creation of an
improvement to real property, and includes property owners or their
common law agents who are contractors, general contractors, or
specialty contractors as defined in chapter 18.27 or 19.28 RCW, or who
are otherwise required to be registered or licensed by law, who offer
to sell their property without occupying or using the structures,
projects, developments, or improvements for more than one year.
(13) "Professional services" means surveying, establishing or
marking the boundaries of, preparing maps, plans, appraisals, reports,
or specifications for, or inspecting, appraising, testing, or otherwise
performing any other architectural, appraisal, inspection, or
engineering services for the improvement of real property.
(14) "Real property lender" means a bank, savings bank, savings and
loan association, credit union, mortgage company, appraisal management
company, or other corporation, association, partnership, trust, or
individual that makes loans secured by real property located in the
state of Washington.
(15) "Site" means the real property which is or is to be improved.
(16) "Subcontractor" means a general contractor or specialty
contractor as defined by chapter 18.27 or 19.28 RCW, or who is
otherwise required to be registered or licensed by law, who contracts
for the improvement of real property with someone other than the owner
of the property or their common law agent.

Sec. 2 RCW 60.04.031 and 1992 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, every person
furnishing professional services, materials, or equipment for the
improvement of real property shall give the owner or reputed owner
notice in writing of the right to claim a lien. If the prime
contractor is in compliance with the requirements of RCW 19.27.095,
60.04.230, and 60.04.261, this notice shall also be given to the prime
contractor as described in this subsection unless the potential lien
claimant has contracted directly with the prime contractor. The notice
may be given at any time but only protects the right to claim a lien
for professional services, materials, or equipment supplied after the
date which is sixty days before:
(a) Mailing the notice by certified or registered mail to the owner
or reputed owner; or
(b) Delivering or serving the notice personally upon the owner or
reputed owner and obtaining evidence of delivery in the form of a
receipt or other acknowledgment signed by the owner or reputed owner or
an affidavit of service.
In the case of new construction of a single-family residence, the
notice of a right to claim a lien may be given at any time but only
protects the right to claim a lien for professional services,
materials, or equipment supplied after a date which is ten days before
the notice is given as described in this subsection.
(2) Notices of a right to claim a lien shall not be required of:
(a) Persons who contract directly with the owner or the owner's
common law agent;
(b) Laborers whose claim of lien is based solely on performing
labor; or
(c) Subcontractors who contract for the improvement of real
property directly with the prime contractor, except as provided in
subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(3) Persons who furnish professional services, materials, or
equipment in connection with the repair, alteration, financing,
valuation, or remodel of an existing owner-occupied single-family
residence or appurtenant garage:
(a) Who contract directly with the owner-occupier or their common
law agent shall not be required to send a written notice of the right
to claim a lien and shall have a lien for the full amount due under
their contract, as provided in RCW 60.04.021; or
(b) Who do not contract directly with the owner-occupier or their
common law agent shall give notice of the right to claim a lien to the
owner-occupier. Liens of persons furnishing professional services,
materials, or equipment who do not contract directly with the owner-occupier or their common law agent may only be satisfied from amounts
not yet paid to the prime contractor by the owner at the time the
notice described in this section is received, regardless of whether
amounts not yet paid to the prime contractor are due. For the purposes
of this subsection "received" means actual receipt of notice by
personal service, or registered or certified mail, or three days after
mailing by registered or certified mail, excluding Saturdays, Sundays,
or legal holidays.
(4) The notice of right to claim a lien described in subsection (1)
of this section, shall include but not be limited to the following
information and shall substantially be in the following form, using
lower-case and upper-case ten-point type where appropriate.

NOTICE TO OWNER

IMPORTANT: READ BOTH SIDES OF THIS NOTICE CAREFULLY.

PROTECT YOURSELF FROM PAYING TWICE

Re: (description of property: Street address or general location.)

From: . . . . . . . . . . . .

AT THE REQUEST OF: (Name of person ordering the professional
services, materials, or equipment)

THIS IS NOT A LIEN: This notice is sent to you to tell you who is
providing professional services, materials, or equipment for the
improvement or financing of your property and to advise you of the
rights of these persons and your responsibilities. Also take note that
laborers on your project may claim a lien without sending you a notice.

OWNER/OCCUPIER OF EXISTING RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY

Under Washington law, those who furnish labor, professional services,
materials, or equipment for the repair, remodel, or alteration of your
owner-occupied principal residence and who are not paid, have a right
to enforce their claim for payment against your property. This claim
is known as a construction lien.

The law limits the amount that a lien claimant can claim against your
property. Claims may only be made against that portion of the contract
price you have not yet paid to your prime contractor or lender as of
the time this notice was given to you or three days after this notice
was mailed to you. Review the back of this notice for more information
and ways to avoid lien claims.

COMMERCIAL AND/OR NEW RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY

We have or will be providing professional services, materials, or
equipment for the improvement of your commercial or new residential
project. In the event you or your contractor fail to pay us, we may
file a lien against your property. A lien may be claimed for all
professional services, materials, or equipment furnished after a date
that is sixty days before this notice was given to you or mailed to
you, unless the improvement to your property is the construction of a
new single-family residence, then ten days before this notice was given
to you or mailed to you.

Sender: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Address: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Brief description of professional services, materials, or equipment
provided or to be provided: . . . . . . . . . . . .

IMPORTANT INFORMATION ON REVERSE SIDE

IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR YOUR PROTECTION

This notice is sent to inform you that we have or will provide
professional services, materials, or equipment for the improvement of
your property. We expect to be paid by the person who ordered our
services, but if we are not paid, we have the right to enforce our
claim by filing a construction lien against your property.

LEARN more about the lien laws and the meaning of this notice by
discussing them with your contractor, suppliers, Department of Labor
and Industries, the firm sending you this notice, your lender, or your
attorney.

COMMON METHODS TO AVOID CONSTRUCTION LIENS: There are several methods
available to protect your property from construction liens. The
following are two of the more commonly used methods.

DUAL PAYCHECKS (Joint Checks): When paying your contractor for
services or materials, you may make checks payable jointly to
the contractor and the firms furnishing you this notice.

LIEN RELEASES: You may require your contractor to provide lien
releases signed by all the suppliers and subcontractors from
whom you have received this notice. If they cannot obtain lien
releases because you have not paid them, you may use the dual
payee check method to protect yourself.

YOU SHOULD TAKE APPROPRIATE STEPS TO PROTECT YOUR PROPERTY FROM LIENS.

YOUR PRIME CONTRACTOR AND YOUR CONSTRUCTION LENDER ARE REQUIRED BY LAW
TO GIVE YOU WRITTEN INFORMATION ABOUT LIEN CLAIMS. IF YOU HAVE NOT
RECEIVED IT, ASK THEM FOR IT.

* * * * * * * * * * * * *

(5) Every potential lien claimant providing professional services
where no improvement as defined in RCW 60.04.011(5) (a) or (b) has been
commenced, and the professional services provided are not visible from
an inspection of the real property may record in the real property
records of the county where the property is located a notice which
shall contain the professional service provider's name, address,
telephone number, legal description of the property, the owner or
reputed owner's name, and the general nature of the professional
services provided. If such notice is not recorded, the lien claimed
shall be subordinate to the interest of any subsequent mortgagee and
invalid as to the interest of any subsequent purchaser if the mortgagee
or purchaser acts in good faith and for a valuable consideration
acquires an interest in the property prior to the commencement of an
improvement as defined in RCW 60.04.011(5) (a) or (b) without notice of
the professional services being provided. The notice described in this
subsection shall be substantially in the following form:

NOTICE OF FURNISHING PROFESSIONAL SERVICES

That on the (day) day of (month and year) , (name of
provider) began providing professional services upon or for the
improvement of real property legally described as follows:

[Legal Description is mandatory]

The general nature of the professional services provided is . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

The owner or reputed owner of the real property is . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . .

(6) A lien authorized by this chapter shall not be enforced unless
the lien claimant has complied with the applicable provisions of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 60.04 RCW
to read as follows:
A lender, mortgage broker, or appraisal management company required
to be registered under chapter 18.310 or 19.146 RCW or Title 30 RCW or
otherwise required to be registered or licensed by law, is the lender
agent of the owner for the purposes of establishing the lien created by
this chapter only if so registered or licensed. Persons dealing with
lenders, mortgage brokers or appraisal management companies may rely,
for the purposes of this section, upon a certificate of registration
issued pursuant to chapter 18.310 or 19.146 RCW or Title 30 RCW, or
other certificate or license issued pursuant to law, covering the
period when the labor, professional services, material, or equipment is
furnished, and the lien rights are not lost by suspension or revocation
of registration or license without their knowledge. Lien rights under
this chapter are not lost or denied by virtue of the absence,
suspension, or revocation of registration or license with respect to
any contractor or subcontractor not in immediate contractual privity
with the lien claimant.

Sec. 4 RCW 60.04.051 and 1992 c 126 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The lot, tract, or parcel of land which is improved is subject to
a lien to the extent of the interest of the owner at whose instance,
directly or through a common law or construction agent or lending
agent, the labor, professional services, equipment, or materials were
furnished, as the court deems appropriate for satisfaction of the lien.
If, for any reason, the title or interest in the land upon which the
improvement is situated cannot be subjected to the lien, the court in
order to satisfy the lien may order the sale and removal of the
improvement from the land which is subject to the lien.

Sec. 5 RCW 60.04.255 and 1988 c 270 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every real property lender shall provide a copy of the
informational material described in RCW 60.04.250 to all persons
obtaining loans, the proceeds of which are to be used for residential
construction or residential repair or remodeling or refinancing.
(2) Every contractor shall provide a copy of the informational
material described in RCW 60.04.250 to customers required to receive
contractor disclosure notice under RCW 18.27.114.
(3) No cause of action may lie against the state, a real property
lender, or a contractor arising from the provisions of RCW 60.04.250
and this section.
(4) For the purpose of this section, "real property lender" means
a bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union,
mortgage company, or other corporation, association, partnership, or
individual that makes loans secured by real property in this state.

--- END ---