BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature finds that quality
early care and education builds the foundation for a child's success in
school and in life. The legislature acknowledges that quality is a
necessary underpinning of the early care and education system in
Washington. The legislature recognizes that empirical evidence supports
the conclusion that high quality programs consistently yield more
positive outcomes for children, with the strongest positive impacts on
the most vulnerable children. The legislature further understands that
the proper dosage, duration of programming, and stability of care are
critical to enhancing program quality and improving child outcomes.
The legislature acknowledges that the early care and education system
must be culturally responsive and meet the needs of Washington's
diverse populations. The legislature intends to prioritize the
integration of child care and preschool in an effort to promote full
workday programming. The legislature further intends to reward quality
and create incentives for providers to participate in a quality rating
and improvement system that will also provide valuable information to
parents regarding the quality of care available in their communities.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.010 and 2013 c 323 s 3 and 2013 c 130 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, or facility that provides child care and early learning
services outside a child's own home and includes the following
irrespective of whether there is compensation to the agency:
(a) "Child day care center" means an agency that regularly provides
early childhood education and early learning services for a group of
children for periods of less than twenty-four hours;
(b) "Early learning" includes but is not limited to programs and
services for child care; state, federal, private, and nonprofit
preschool; child care subsidies; child care resource and referral;
parental education and support; and training and professional
development for early learning professionals;
(c) "Family day care provider" means a child care provider who
regularly provides early childhood education and early learning
services for not more than twelve children in the provider's home in
the family living quarters;
(d) "Nongovernmental private-public partnership" means an entity
registered as a nonprofit corporation in Washington state with a
primary focus on early learning, school readiness, and parental
support, and an ability to raise a minimum of five million dollars in
contributions;
(e) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a community
facility.
(2) "Agency" does not include the following:
(a) Persons related to the child in the following ways:
(i) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and
including first cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding
generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great;
(ii) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;
(iii) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as
well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons,
and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state
law; or
(iv) Spouses of any persons named in (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection, even after the marriage is terminated;
(b) Persons who are legal guardians of the child;
(c) Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or
children, with or without compensation, where the person providing care
for periods of less than twenty-four hours does not conduct such
activity on an ongoing, regularly scheduled basis for the purpose of
engaging in business, which includes, but is not limited to,
advertising such care;
(d) Parents on a mutually cooperative basis exchange care of one
another's children;
(e) Nursery schools that are engaged primarily in early childhood
education with preschool children and in which no child is enrolled on
a regular basis for more than four hours per day;
(f) Schools, including boarding schools, that are engaged primarily
in education, operate on a definite school year schedule, follow a
stated academic curriculum, accept only school-age children, and do not
accept custody of children;
(g) Seasonal camps of three months' or less duration engaged
primarily in recreational or educational activities;
(h) Facilities providing child care for periods of less than
twenty-four hours when a parent or legal guardian of the child remains
on the premises of the facility for the purpose of participating in:
(i) Activities other than employment; or
(ii) Employment of up to two hours per day when the facility is
operated by a nonprofit entity that also operates a licensed child care
program at the same facility in another location or at another
facility;
(i) Any entity that provides recreational or educational
programming for school-age((d)) children only and the entity meets all
of the following requirements:
(i) The entity utilizes a drop-in model for programming, where
children are able to attend during any or all program hours without a
formal reservation;
(ii) The entity does not assume responsibility in lieu of the
parent, unless for coordinated transportation;
(iii) The entity is a local affiliate of a national nonprofit; and
(iv) The entity is in compliance with all safety and quality
standards set by the associated national agency;
(j) A program operated by any unit of local, state, or federal
government or an agency, located within the boundaries of a federally
recognized Indian reservation, licensed by the Indian tribe;
(k) A program located on a federal military reservation, except
where the military authorities request that such agency be subject to
the licensing requirements of this chapter;
(l) A program that offers early learning and support services, such
as parent education, and does not provide child care services on a
regular basis.
(3) "Applicant" means a person who requests or seeks employment in
an agency.
(4) "Conviction information" means criminal history record
information relating to an incident which has led to a conviction or
other disposition adverse to the applicant.
(5) "Department" means the department of early learning.
(6) "Director" means the director of the department.
(7) "Early achievers" means a program that improves the quality of
early learning programs and supports and rewards providers for their
participation.
(8) "Early start" means an integrated high quality continuum of
early learning programs for children birth-to-five years of age.
Components of early start include, but are not limited to, the
following:
(a) Home visiting and parent education and support programs;
(b) The early achievers program described in RCW 43.215.100;
(c) Integrated full-day and part-day high quality early learning
programs; and
(d) High quality preschool for children whose family income is at
or below one hundred ten percent of the federal poverty level.
(9) "Employer" means a person or business that engages the services
of one or more people, especially for wages or salary to work in an
agency.
(10) "Enforcement action" means denial, suspension, revocation,
modification, or nonrenewal of a license pursuant to RCW 43.215.300(1)
or assessment of civil monetary penalties pursuant to RCW
43.215.300(3).
(11) "Low-income child care provider" means a person who
administers a child care program that consists of at least eighty
percent of children receiving working connections child care subsidy.
(12) "Low-income neighborhood" means a district or community where
more than twenty percent of households are below the federal poverty
level.
(13) "Negative action" means a court order, court judgment, or an
adverse action taken by an agency, in any state, federal, tribal, or
foreign jurisdiction, which results in a finding against the applicant
reasonably related to the individual's character, suitability, and
competence to care for or have unsupervised access to children in child
care. This may include, but is not limited to:
(a) A decision issued by an administrative law judge;
(b) A final determination, decision, or finding made by an agency
following an investigation;
(c) An adverse agency action, including termination, revocation, or
denial of a license or certification, or if pending adverse agency
action, the voluntary surrender of a license, certification, or
contract in lieu of the adverse action;
(d) A revocation, denial, or restriction placed on any professional
license; or
(e) A final decision of a disciplinary board.
(((12))) (14) "Nonconviction information" means arrest, founded
allegations of child abuse, or neglect pursuant to chapter 26.44 RCW,
or other negative action adverse to the applicant.
(((13))) (15) "Nonschool age child" means a child birth through six
years of age who has yet to enter kindergarten or school.
(16) "Probationary license" means a license issued as a
disciplinary measure to an agency that has previously been issued a
full license but is out of compliance with licensing standards.
(((14))) (17) "Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard
of care to be maintained by an agency.
(((15))) (18) "School-age child" means a child not less than five
years of age through twelve years of age and who is attending
kindergarten or school.
(19) "Washington state preschool program" means an education
program for children three-to-five years of age who have not yet
entered kindergarten, such as the early childhood education and
assistance program.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.215.100 and 2013 c 323 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose,)) The department, in collaboration with tribal
governments and community and statewide partners, shall implement a
voluntary quality rating and improvement system, called the early
achievers program, that is applicable to licensed or certified child
care centers and homes and early education programs. The early
achievers program establishes the framework for strengthening the
quality of the early care and education system in Washington.
(2) The ((purpose)) objectives of the early achievers program
((is)) are to:
(a) ((To)) Improve short-term and long-term outcomes for children
as measured by assessments including, but not limited to, the
Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills in RCW
28A.655.080;
(b) Give parents clear and easily accessible information about the
quality of child care and early education programs((,));
(c) Support improvement in early learning and care programs
throughout the state((,));
(d) Increase the readiness of children for school((, and));
(e) Close the disparity in access to quality care;
(f) Provide professional development opportunities to early care
and education providers; and (((b) to))
(g) Establish a common set of expectations and standards that
define, measure, and improve the quality of early learning and care
settings.
(3) Participation in the early achievers program is voluntary for
licensed or certified child care centers and homes.
(4) ((By fiscal year 2015, Washington state preschool programs
receiving state funds must enroll in the early achievers program and
maintain a minimum score level.
(5))) There are five levels in the early achievers program.
Participants are expected to actively engage in the program and
continually advance from level 1, or the foundation level, to level 5.
(5) The department has the authority to determine the rating cycle
for the early achievers program.
(a) The first rating is free for early achievers participants.
(b) Each subsequent rating within the established rating cycle is
free for early achievers participants.
(6) Early achievers participants may request to be rated at any
time after the completion of all level 2 activities.
(7) The department shall provide an early achievers participant an
update on their progress toward completing level 2 activities, after
the participant has been enrolled in the early achievers program for
fifteen months.
(8)(a) The department must charge a fee for optional rerating
requests made by program participants that are outside the established
rating cycle.
(b) Fees charged are based on, but may not exceed, the cost to the
department for the class of activities associated with the early
achievers program.
(9)(a)(i) Effective July 1, 2015, the department shall publish on
the department's web site or offer a link on its web site the early
achievers program rating levels 1 through 5 for all child care programs
that receive state subsidy, early childhood education and assistance
programs, and federal head start programs in Washington.
(ii) Child care programs that do not receive state subsidy may have
their early achievers program rating level published by the department.
(b) Early achievers program participants who have published rating
levels on the department's web site or on a link on the department's
web site may include a brief description of their program, contingent
upon the review and approval by the department, as determined by
established marketing standards.
(c) The early achievers program ratings must be published on the
department's web site or have a link on the department's web site
within thirty days from the time a program becomes licensed or
certified or receives a rating.
(d) The early achievers program rating levels must be published on
the department's web site or have a link on the department's web site
in a manner that is easily accessible to parents and caregivers and
takes into account the linguistic needs of parents and caregivers.
(e) To the extent possible, the department must create a single
source of information for parents and caregivers to access details on
a provider's early achievers program rating level, licensing history,
and other indicators of quality and safety that will help parents and
caregivers make informed choices.
(10)(a) The department shall create a professional development
pathway for early achievers participants to obtain a high school
diploma or equivalency or higher education credential in early
childhood education, early childhood studies, child development, or an
academic field related to early care and education.
(b) The professional development pathway must include opportunities
for scholarships and grants to assist early achievers participants with
the costs associated with obtaining an educational degree.
(c) The professional development pathway must be culturally and
linguistically reflective of the needs and demographics of
participants.
(11) The department shall implement tiered reimbursement for early
achievers participants rating at level 3, 4, or 5.
(12) The early achievers quality improvement awards shall be
reserved for participants offering programs that are composed of at
least five percent of children receiving subsidy.
(13) The department shall design a plan to incorporate school-age
child care providers into the early achievers program.
(14) In collaboration with tribal governments, and community and
statewide partners, the department shall develop a protocol for
granting early achievers program participants an extension in meeting
rating level requirement timelines outlined for the working connections
child care program and the early childhood education and assistance
program.
(a) At the department's discretion, extensions may be granted when
early achievers program participants experience an unexpected life
circumstance, such as, but not limited to, an illness.
(b) Extensions may only be granted to early achievers program
participants who have demonstrated engagement in the early achievers
program.
(c) A report outlining the early achievers program extension
protocol shall be delivered to the appropriate committees of
legislature by December 31, 2014.
(15) Before final implementation of the early achievers program,
the department shall report on program progress, as defined within the
race to the top federal grant award, and expenditures to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature. Nothing
in this section changes the department's responsibility to collectively
bargain over mandatory subjects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
REDUCTION OF BARRIERS--LOW-INCOME PROVIDERS AND PROGRAMS. Subject
to the amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department
shall, in collaboration with tribal governments and community and
statewide partners, implement a protocol to maximize and encourage
participation in the early achievers program for low-income center and
family home child care providers and providers who offer programming in
low-income neighborhoods. The protocol should address barriers to
early achievers program participation and include at a minimum the
following:
(1) The creation of a substitute pool; and
(2) The establishment of needs-based grants for providers at level
2 in the early achievers program to assist with purchasing curriculum
development, instructional materials, supplies, and equipment to
improve program quality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
THE EARLY ACHIEVERS PROGRAM DATA COLLECTION AND EVALUATION. (1)
The department shall collect longitudinal, student-level data on all
children attending a working connections child care program or an early
childhood education and assistance program. Data collected should
capture at a minimum the following characteristics:
(a) Daily program attendance;
(b) Identification of classroom and teacher;
(c) Early achievers program quality level rating;
(d) Program hours;
(e) Program duration;
(f) Distinct ethnic categories within racial subgroups that align
with categories established by the education data center established in
RCW 43.41.400; and
(g) Developmental results from the Washington kindergarten
inventory of developing skills in RCW 28A.655.080.
(2) Data collected pursuant to this section shall be provided to
the education data center established in RCW 43.41.400.
(3) Data collected pursuant to this section shall be provided to
the Washington state institute for public policy.
(4) The department shall provide child care and early learning
providers student-level data collected pursuant to this section that
are specific to the child care provider's or the early learning
provider's program.
(5)(a) The Washington state institute for public policy shall
conduct a longitudinal analysis examining relationships between the
early achievers program quality ratings levels and outcomes for
children participating in subsidized early care and education programs.
(b) The institute shall submit the first report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 31, 2017. The institute
shall submit subsequent reports annually to the appropriate committees
of the legislature by December 31st, with the final report due December
31, 2020. The final report shall include a cost-benefit analysis.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.215.135 and 2013 c 323 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and implement policies in the
working connections child care program to promote stability ((and)),
quality of care for children from low-income households, and support
school readiness for young learners. Policies for the expenditure of
funds constituting the working connections child care program must be
consistent with the outcome measures defined in RCW 74.08A.410 and the
standards established in this section intended to promote quality early
care and education programming, and stability and continuity of care
for children.
(2) ((Beginning in fiscal year 2013,)) Authorizations for the
working connections child care subsidy ((shall be)) are effective for
twelve months ((unless a change in circumstances necessitates
reauthorization sooner than twelve months. The twelve-month
certification applies only if the enrollments in the child care subsidy
or working connections child care program are capped.
(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, beginning September 1, 2013, working connections
child care providers shall receive a five percent increase in the
subsidy rate for enrolling in level 2 in the early achievers programs.
Providers must complete level 2 and advance to level 3 within thirty
months in order to maintain this increase)). A child is eligible for
working connections child care for a twelve-month enrollment period and
may not be deemed ineligible due to any change in circumstance
including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) A change in family composition or household;
(b) A change in a parent's or a caregiver's employment status;
(c) A change in a parent's or a caregiver's employment status due
to health, maternity or paternity leave, or other family leave
condition as provided for in chapter 49.78 RCW; or
(d) A change in a parent's or a caregiver's income.
(3) Working connections child care is a capped program. The
working connections child care cap is established in the operating
budget.
(4)(a) The department shall adopt rules pertaining to the working
connections child care program for both contracted slots and child care
vouchers that outline the following:
(i) Allowable periods of child absences;
(ii) Required contact with parents or caregivers to discuss child
absences and encourage regular program attendance; and
(iii) A de-enrollment procedure when allowable child absences are
exceeded.
(b) The implementation of rules pertaining to child absences and
de-enrollment procedures must align with the implementation of the
electronic time and attendance record system. Rules pertaining to
child absences and de-enrollment procedures shall be adopted no later
than July 31, 2015.
(5) Child care providers serving nonschool age children and
receiving state subsidy payments must enroll in the early achievers
program and complete level 2 activities by July 1, 2017, or the
provider can no longer receive a state subsidy under this section.
(6)(a) Child care providers serving nonschool age children and
receiving state subsidy payments must be rated at level 3 in the early
achievers program by July 1, 2019, or the provider can no longer
receive state subsidy under this section.
(b) If a child care provider serving nonschool age children and
receiving state subsidy payments has completed all of level 2
activities and is approved and waiting for a rating by July 1, 2019,
the provider may continue to receive state subsidy pending the
successful completion of the level 3 rating activity. If the provider
does not rate at a level 3 or higher during the level 3 rating
activity, the provider can no longer receive state subsidy under this
section.
(7) Effective July 1, 2015, a new child care provider serving
nonschool age children and receiving state subsidy payments must
complete the following activities or the provider can no longer receive
a state subsidy under this section:
(a) Enroll in the early achievers program within thirty days;
(b) Complete the early achievers program quality level 2 activities
within twelve months from receiving a state subsidy; and
(c) Rate as an early achievers program quality level 3 within
thirty months from receiving a state subsidy payment.
(8)(a) Family, friend, and neighbor child care providers who
receive state subsidy payments and are exempt from child care licensure
are not required to join early achievers while qualifying as an
unlicensed provider.
(b) Family, friend, and neighbor child care providers who receive
state subsidy payments are required to obtain a child care license no
later than thirty-six paid months after the effective date of this
section or thirty-six paid months after receiving the first subsidy
payment, whichever occurs later, or after simultaneously or
consecutively caring for more than six unrelated children unless one of
the following conditions apply:
(i) The provider is an adult sibling, half-sibling, or stepsibling
of the child or children receiving care and lives outside of the
child's or children's home;
(ii) The provider is an extended tribal family member of the child
or children receiving care;
(iii) The provider is a grandparent, stepgrandparent, half-grandparent or great-grandparent, stepgreat-grandparent, or
half-great-grandparent of the child or children receiving care; or
(iv) The provider is an aunt or uncle, step-aunt or step-uncle,
half-aunt or half-uncle, or great-aunt or great-uncle, step-great-aunt
or step-great-uncle, or half-great-aunt or half-great-uncle of the
child or children receiving care.
(c) Family, friend, and neighbor child care providers who do not
obtain child care licensure under this section are not able to receive
state subsidies.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.215.1352 and 2012 c 251 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
When an applicant or recipient applies for or receives working
connections child care benefits, ((he or she)) the applicant or
recipient is required to((:
(1))) notify the department of social and health services, within
five days, of any change in providers((; and
(2) Notify the department of social and health services, within ten
days, about any significant change related to the number of child care
hours the applicant or recipient needs, cost sharing, or eligibility)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
CONTRACTED CHILD CARE SLOTS. (1) The department shall employ a
combination of vouchers and contracted slots for the subsidized child
care program in RCW 43.215.135. Child care vouchers preserve parental
choice. Child care contracted slots promote access to continuous
quality care for children, provide parents and caregivers stable child
care that supports employment, and allow providers to have predictable
funding.
(2) The department shall contract at least twenty percent of the
working connections child care program slots by January 1, 2016.
(3) Only a child care provider who participates in the early
achievers program and rates at a level 3, 4, or 5 is eligible to be
awarded a contracted slot.
(4) Only providers offering full workday early care and education
opportunities are eligible to be awarded a contracted slot.
(5) The department is required to use data to calculate a set
number of targeted contracted slots. In calculating this number, the
department must take into account a representative balance of family
home and center child care programs and the overall geographic
distribution of child care programs in the state. The targeted
contracted slots are reserved for programs meeting both of the
following conditions:
(a) Programs in low-income neighborhoods; and
(b) Programs that consist of at least fifty percent of children
receiving subsidy pursuant to RCW 43.215.135.
(6) The department shall award the remaining contracted slots via
a competitive process and prioritize child care programs with at least
one of the following characteristics:
(a) Programs located in a high-need geographic area;
(b) Programs partnering with elementary schools to offer
transitional planning and support to children as they advance to
kindergarten; or
(c) Programs serving children involved in the child welfare system
or children diagnosed with a special need.
(7) The department shall pay a provider for each contracted slot,
unless a contracted slot is not used for thirty days.
(8) The department shall charge a child care copayment for each
contracted slot and establish the copayment fee by rule.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.215.425 and 1994 c 166 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for
the administration of the early childhood education and assistance
program. Approved early childhood education and assistance programs
shall conduct needs assessments of their service area, identify any
targeted groups of children, to include but not be limited to children
of seasonal and migrant farmworkers and native American populations
living either on or off reservation, and provide to the department a
service delivery plan, to the extent practicable, that addresses these
targeted populations.
(2) The department, in developing rules for the early childhood
education and assistance program, shall consult with the advisory
committee, and shall consider such factors as coordination with
existing head start and other early childhood programs, the preparation
necessary for instructors, qualifications of instructors, adequate
space and equipment, and special transportation needs. The rules shall
specifically require the early childhood programs to provide for
parental involvement in participation with their child's program, in
local program policy decisions, in development and revision of service
delivery systems, and in parent education and training.
(3)(a) The department shall adopt rules pertaining to the early
childhood education and assistance program that outline allowable
periods of child absences, required contact with parents or caregivers
to discuss child absences and encourage regular attendance, and a
de-enrollment procedure when allowable child absences are exceeded.
(b) The implementation of rules pertaining to child absences and
de-enrollment procedures must align with the implementation of the
electronic time and attendance record system.
(c) Rules pertaining to child absences and de-enrollment procedures
shall be adopted no later than July 31, 2015.
(4) The department shall adopt rules requiring early childhood
education and assistance program employees and volunteers who have
access to children to submit to a fingerprint background check.
Fingerprint background check procedures for the early childhood
education and assistance program shall be the same as the background
check procedures in RCW 43.215.215.
(5) By July 1, 2016, the department shall develop a pathway for
family home providers to administer an early childhood education and
assistance program.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.215.415 and 1994 c 166 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Approved early childhood programs shall receive state-funded
support through the department. Public or private nonsectarian
organizations, including, but not limited to school districts,
educational service districts, community and technical colleges, local
governments, or nonprofit organizations, are eligible to participate as
providers of the state early childhood program.
(2) Funds appropriated for the state program shall be used to
continue to operate existing programs or to establish new or expanded
early childhood programs((, and shall not be used to supplant federally
supported head start programs)).
(3) Funds obtained by providers through voluntary grants or
contributions from individuals, agencies, corporations, or
organizations may be used to expand or enhance preschool programs so
long as program standards established by the department are
maintained((, but shall not be used to supplant federally supported
head start programs or state-supported early childhood programs)).
(4) Persons applying to conduct the early childhood program shall
identify targeted groups and the number of children to be served,
program components, the qualifications of instructional and special
staff, the source and amount of grants or contributions from sources
other than state funds, facilities and equipment support, and
transportation and personal care arrangements.
(5) Early childhood education and assistance providers must enroll
in the early achievers program and be rated at a level 3 by July 1,
2015.
(6) Early childhood education and assistance providers must be
rated at a level 4 in the early achievers program by July 1, 2019.
(7) Effective January 1, 2015, new early childhood education and
assistance program slots are only available to early achievers program
participants rated at a level 3, 4, or 5.
(8) Effective July 1, 2017, any provider administering an early
childhood education and assistance program must institute a working
connections child care program and maintain an optional full workday
program.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.215.455 and 2010 c 231 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning September 1, 2011, an early learning program to
provide voluntary preschool opportunities for children three and four
years of age shall be implemented according to the funding and
implementation plan in RCW ((43.215.142)) 43.215.456. The program must
be a comprehensive program providing early childhood education and
family support, options for parental involvement, and health
information, screening, and referral services, as family need is
determined. Participation in the program is voluntary. On a space
available basis, the program may allow enrollment of children who are
not otherwise eligible by assessing a fee.
(2) The first phase of the program shall be implemented by
utilizing the program standards and eligibility criteria in the early
childhood education and assistance program in RCW 43.215.400 through
43.215.450.
(3) For the 2014-15 school year, the program implementation in this
section shall prioritize programs meeting at least one of the following
characteristics:
(a) Programs located in a high-need geographical area;
(b) Programs offering full workday early care and education
programming;
(c) Providers participating in the early achievers program and
rated at level 3, 4, or 5; or
(d) Programs offering services to children diagnosed with a special
need or children involved in the child welfare system.
(4) For the 2014-15 school year, eighty percent of the slots for
program implementation described in this section are reserved for
providers offering full workday early care and education programming.
(5) For the 2015-16 school year, the program implementation in this
section shall prioritize programs meeting at least one of the following
characteristics:
(a) Programs located in a high-need geographical area;
(b) Programs offering full workday early care and education
programming; or
(c) Programs offering services to children diagnosed with a special
need or children involved in the child welfare system.
(6) For the 2015-16 school year, only providers participating in
the early achievers program and rated at a level 3, 4, or 5 are
eligible for the program implementation under this section.
(7) For the 2015-16 school year, eighty percent of the slots for
program implementation described in this section are reserved for
providers offering full workday early care and education programming.
(8) The director shall adopt rules for the following program
components, as appropriate and necessary during the phased
implementation of the program:
(a) Minimum program standards, including lead teacher, assistant
teacher, and staff qualifications;
(b) Approval of program providers; and
(c) Accountability and adherence to performance standards.
(((4))) (9) The department has administrative responsibility for:
(a) Approving and contracting with providers according to rules
developed by the director under this section;
(b) In partnership with school districts, monitoring program
quality and assuring the program is responsive to the needs of eligible
children;
(c) Assuring that program providers work cooperatively with school
districts to coordinate the transition from preschool to kindergarten
so that children and their families are well-prepared and supported;
and
(d) Providing technical assistance to contracted providers.
(10) The department shall complete an annual program implementation
report on preschool and the working connections child care program.
The first report is due by December 31, 2014, and the final report is
due by December 31, 2018. The preschool program implementation report
must be posted annually on the department's web site and delivered
annually to the appropriate committees of the legislature. The
preschool program implementation report must address the following:
(a) Progress on preschool program implementation as required
pursuant to this section and RCW 43.215.415;
(b) An examination of the regional distribution of new preschool
programming by zip code;
(c) An analysis of the impact of preschool expansion on low-income
neighborhoods and communities;
(d) Recommendations to address any identified barriers to access to
quality preschool for children living in low-income neighborhoods;
(e) An analysis of any impact of quality strengthening efforts on
the availability of infant and toddler care;
(f) An analysis of any impact of full workday early care and
education opportunities directives; and
(g) An examination of any identified barriers for providers to
offer full workday early care and education opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 43.215
RCW to read as follows:
SINGLE SET OF LICENSING STANDARDS. No later than July 1, 2015, the
department shall implement a single set of licensing standards for
child care and the early childhood education and assistance program.
The new licensing standards must:
(1) Use the early achievers program as a foundational framework and
eliminate additional burdensome regulations for providers who
demonstrate higher levels of quality care;
(2) Take into account the separate needs of family care providers
and child care centers; and
(3) Promote the continued safety of child care settings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 43.215
RCW to read as follows:
INTEGRATION WITH LOCAL GOVERNMENT EFFORTS. (1) The foundation of
the early care and education system in Washington is the quality rating
and improvement system entitled the early achievers program. In an
effort to build on the existing quality framework, enhance access to
quality care for children, and strengthen the entire early care and
education system in the state, it is important to integrate the efforts
of local government.
(2) Local government is encouraged to collaborate with the
department when establishing early learning programs for residents.
(3) Local government may contribute funds to the department for the
following purposes:
(a) Initial investments to build capacity and quality in local
early care and education programming; and
(b) Reductions in copayments charged to parents or caregivers.
(4) Funds contributed to the department by local government must be
deposited in the early start account established in section 14 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 43.215
RCW to read as follows:
The early start account is created in the state treasury. Revenues
in the account shall consist of appropriations by the legislature and
all other sources deposited into the account. Moneys in the account
may only be used after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be used only to improve the quality of early care and education
programming. The department oversees the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 43.215
RCW to read as follows:
The department shall implement an electronic time and attendance
records system by July 1, 2015. The savings generated from the
electronic time and attendance records system shall be used to improve
quality in the early learning system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 2013 2nd sp.s. c 16 s 2 (uncodified) is
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 43.215
RCW to read as follows:
Chapter . . ., Laws of 2014 (this act) may be known and cited as
the early start act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2014, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---