BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.205.040 and 2008 c 135 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, nothing
in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the use of the title
"certified chemical dependency professional" or "certified chemical
dependency professional trainee" when treating patients in settings
other than programs approved under chapter 70.96A RCW.
(2) A person credentialed as a "certified chemical dependency
professional" or a "certified chemical dependency professional trainee"
may use such title when treating patients in settings other than
programs approved under chapter 70.96A RCW if the person also holds a
license as: An advanced registered nurse practitioner under chapter
18.79 RCW; a marriage and family therapist, mental health counselor,
advanced social worker, or independent clinical social health worker
under chapter 18.225 RCW; a psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW;
osteopathic physician under chapter 18.57 RCW; osteopathic physician
assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW; physician under chapter 18.71 RCW;
or physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW.

--- END ---