BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of commerce shall submit
a report to the legislature by November 1, 2014, evaluating the data
and information collection methodologies used by sponsoring local
governments to comply with the requirements of RCW 39.102.140. The
report must include: (a) An evaluation of the methodologies used by
sponsoring local governments to collect data and information; (b) an
evaluation of the reliability of the data and information reported by
sponsoring local governments; and (c) recommendations for changes to
the reporting requirements, the data and information collection
methodologies used by sponsoring local governments, or other features
of the local infrastructure financing tool program in order to ensure
that the information reported under RCW 39.102.140 is suitable for
evaluating the effectiveness of the local infrastructure financing tool
program.
(2) Sponsoring local governments must, upon request, provide the
department of commerce with information necessary for the completion of
the report required under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.102.140 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 21 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government shall provide a report to the
board and the department by March 1st of each year. The report shall
contain the following information:
(a) The amount of local excise tax allocation revenues, local
property tax allocation revenues, other revenues from local public
sources, and taxes under RCW 82.14.475 received by the sponsoring local
government, cosponsoring local government, or any participating local
government during the preceding calendar year that were dedicated to
pay the public improvements financed in whole or in part with local
infrastructure financing, and a summary of how these revenues were
expended;
(b) The names of any businesses locating within the revenue
development area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by
the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with
local infrastructure financing;
(c) The total number of permanent jobs created in the revenue
development area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by
the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with
local infrastructure financing;
(d) The average wages and benefits received by all employees of
businesses locating within the revenue development area as a result of
the public improvements undertaken by the sponsoring local government
and financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure financing;
(e) That the sponsoring local government is in compliance with RCW
39.102.070; and
(f) Beginning with the reports due March 1, 2010, the following
must also be included:
(i) A list of public improvements financed on a pay-as-you-go basis
in previous calendar years and by indebtedness issued under this
chapter;
(ii) The date when any indebtedness issued under this chapter is
expected to be retired;
(iii) At least once every three years, updated estimates of state
excise tax allocation revenues, state property tax allocation revenues,
and local excise tax increments, as determined by the sponsoring local
government, that are estimated to have been received by the state, any
participating local government, sponsoring local government, and
cosponsoring local government, since the approval of the project award
under RCW 39.102.040 by the board; and
(iv) Any other information required by the department or the board
to enable the department or the board to fulfill its duties under this
chapter and RCW 82.14.475.
(2) The board shall make a report available to the public and the
legislature by June 1st of each even-numbered year. The report shall
include a list of public improvements undertaken by sponsoring local
governments and financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure
financing and it shall also include a summary of the information
provided to the department by sponsoring local governments under
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The department, upon request, must assist a sponsoring local
government in estimating the amount of state excise tax allocation
revenues and local excise tax increments required in subsection
(1)(f)(iii) of this section.
(4) The board, the department, the department of commerce, the
employment security department, and sponsoring local governments must,
upon request, provide the joint legislative audit and review committee
with assistance in collecting data and information necessary for the
completion of the report required in RCW 39.102.200.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.102.200 and 2006 c 181 s 601 are each amended to
read as follows:
Beginning September 1, 2013, and continuing every five years
thereafter, the joint legislative audit and review committee shall
submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
evaluating the economic activity in revenue development areas.
(1) ((The report shall, at a minimum, evaluate the effectiveness of
the local infrastructure financing tool program, including a
project-by-project review. The report shall evaluate the project's
interim results based on the selection criteria. The report shall also
measure:
(a) Employment changes in the revenue development area;
(b) Property tax changes in the revenue development area;
(c) Sales and use tax changes in the revenue development area;
(d) Property value changes in the revenue development area; and
(e) Changes in housing and existing commercial activities based on
the impact analysis and mitigation plan required in RCW 39.102.080(2)))
The report must include:
(a) A description of the information used to evaluate the economic
activity within each revenue development area;
(b) An assessment of whether economic activity has increased,
decreased, or remained stagnant within each revenue development area,
which may include an analysis of employment changes, property tax
changes, sales and use tax changes, property value changes, or any
other appropriate measures of economic activity; and
(c) An assessment of whether a change in economic activity in each
revenue development area can be attributed to the local infrastructure
financing tool program, unless completion of the assessment is not
possible with the information available to the joint legislative audit
and review committee.
(2) The report that is due September 1, 2028, should also include
any recommendations regarding whether or not the program should be
expanded statewide and what impact the expansion would have on economic
development in Washington.
(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee may use
information collected by the board, the department, the department of
commerce, sponsoring local governments, the employment security
department, and other entities as needed to complete reports. The
joint legislative audit and review committee may request information
and assistance from the board, the department, the department of
commerce, sponsoring local governments, and the employment security
department as needed to complete reports.
(4) The joint legislative audit and review committee is not
required to comply with the "Government Auditing Standards" under RCW
44.28.065 in completing reports under this section if the legislative
auditor finds that compliance with those standards is not possible as
a result of incomplete or inaccurate information. In such case, the
report must include: (a) Notice that the evaluation was not completed
in accordance with the "Government Auditing Standards;" (b) an
assessment of the reliability of the evaluation and report; and (c) a
description of the information or assistance necessary to complete the
next report in accordance with the "Government Auditing Standards."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) 2010 c 164 s 13 (uncodified);
(2) 2009 c 518 s 25 (uncodified);
(3) 2009 c 267 s 9 (uncodified);
(4) 2008 c 209 s 2 (uncodified); and
(5) 2007 c 229 s 17 (uncodified).

--- END ---