BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.28.010 and 2012 c 56 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the
following words and phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter shall
have the following meanings:
(1) "Debt adjuster," which includes any person known as a debt
pooler, debt manager, debt consolidator, debt prorater, or credit
counselor, is any person engaging in or holding himself or herself out
as engaging in the business of debt adjusting for compensation. The
term shall not include:
(a) Attorneys-at-law licensed in Washington, escrow agents,
accountants, broker-dealers in securities, or investment advisors in
securities, while performing services solely incidental to the practice
of their professions;
(b) Any person, partnership, association, or corporation doing
business under and as permitted by any law of this state or of the
United States relating to banks, consumer finance businesses, consumer
loan companies, trust companies, mutual savings banks, savings and loan
associations, building and loan associations, credit unions, crop
credit associations, development credit corporations, industrial
development corporations, title insurance companies, insurance
companies, or third-party account administrators;
(c) Persons who, as employees on a regular salary or wage of an
employer not engaged in the business of debt adjusting, perform credit
services for their employer;
(d) Public officers while acting in their official capacities and
persons acting under court order;
(e) Any person while performing services incidental to the
dissolution, winding up or liquidation of a partnership, corporation,
or other business enterprise;
(f) Nonprofit organizations dealing exclusively with debts owing
from commercial enterprises to business creditors;
(g) Nonprofit organizations engaged in debt adjusting and which do
not assess against the debtor a service charge in excess of fifteen
dollars per month.
(2) "Debt adjusting" means the managing, counseling, settling,
adjusting, prorating, or liquidating of the indebtedness of a debtor,
or receiving funds for the purpose of distributing said funds among
creditors in payment or partial payment of obligations of a debtor.
(3) "Debt adjusting agency" is any partnership, corporation, or
association engaging in or holding itself out as engaging in the
business of debt adjusting.
(4) "Enrolled debt" means a debt or debts that a debt adjuster has
agreed to settle, adjust, or otherwise act upon on behalf of or for the
benefit of a debtor.
(5) "Financial institution" means any person doing business under
the laws of any state or the United States relating to commercial
banks, bank holding companies, savings banks, savings and loan
associations, trust companies, or credit unions.
(((5))) (6) "Principal amount of the debt" means the total amount
or outstanding balance owed by a debtor to one or more creditors for a
debt that is included in a contract for debt adjusting at the time when
the debtor enters into the contract.
(7) "Savings" means the difference between the present value of the
principal amount of the debt and the amount paid by the debt adjuster
to a creditor or negotiated by the debt adjuster and paid by the debtor
to the creditor pursuant to a settlement negotiated by the debt
adjuster on behalf of the debtor as full and complete satisfaction of
the creditor's claim with regard to that debt.
(8) "Third-party account administrator" means an independent entity
that holds or administers a dedicated bank account for fees and
payments to creditors, debt collectors, debt adjusters, or debt
adjusting agencies in connection with the renegotiation, settlement,
reduction, or other alteration of the terms of payment or other terms
of a debt.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.28.080 and 2012 c 56 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A debt adjuster may enroll a debtor in a debt adjusting
contract only if, after a written evaluation of the debtor's current
income, expenses, assets, and liabilities, the debt adjuster reasonably
concludes that the debt adjuster's services will provide a tangible net
benefit to the debtor and the debtor can afford the services. The
written evaluation must consider:
(a) Whether the debtor's creditors are likely to settle debts for
less than the full principal amount of debt owed;
(b) Whether bankruptcy is a more viable option; and
(c) Whether the debtor's income is protected from garnishment,
attachment, or other legal process.
(2) By contract a debt adjuster may charge a reasonable fee for
debt adjusting services((.)) subject to the following:
(a) The total fee for debt adjusting services, including, but not
limited to, any fee charged by a financial institution or a third-party
account administrator, may not exceed fifteen percent of the ((total
debt listed by the debtor on the contract.)) savings;
(b) The fee retained by the debt adjuster from any one payment made
by or on behalf of the debtor may not exceed fifteen percent of the
payment((.));
(c) The debt adjuster may make an initial charge of up to twenty-five dollars which shall be considered part of the total fee. If an
initial charge is made, no additional fee may be retained which will
bring the total fee retained to date to more than fifteen percent of
the total payments made to date((.));
(d) No fee whatsoever shall be applied against rent and utility
payments for housing((.)); and
(e) In the event of cancellation or default on performance of the
contract by the debtor prior to its successful completion, the debt
adjuster may collect in addition to fees previously received, six
percent of that portion of the remaining ((indebtedness listed on said
contract)) enrolled debt which was due when the contract was entered
into, but not to exceed twenty-five dollars.
(((2))) (3) A debt adjuster shall not be entitled to retain any fee
until notifying all creditors listed by the debtor that the debtor has
engaged the debt adjuster in a program of debt adjusting.
(((3))) (4) Any debtor who received debt adjusting services from a
debt adjuster and did not receive a tangible net benefit as a result of
those services is entitled to void the debt adjustment contract, a
refund of any moneys paid to the debt adjuster, damages equal to the
monetary loss suffered by the debtor as a direct result of the debt
adjuster's services, and any other remedies provided by law.
(5) The department of financial institutions has authority to
enforce compliance with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person or entity that provides debt adjusting services in
this state shall provide the following information annually to the
department of financial institutions by September 1, 2014, and
thereafter annually on September 1st:
(a) The number and percentage of Washington debtors for whom the
debt adjuster provides or provided debt adjusting services in the
previous year who became inactive in, cancelled, or terminated those
services without settlement of all of the debtor's debts, by year of
enrollment;
(b) The total fees collected from Washington debtors during the
previous year;
(c) For each debtor for whom the debt adjuster provides debt
adjusting services:
(i) The date of contracting;
(ii) The number of debts included in the contract between the debt
adjuster and the debtor;
(iii) The principal amount of each debt at the time the contract
was signed;
(iv) Whether each debt is active, terminated, or settled;
(v) If a debt has been settled, the settlement amount of the debt
and the savings amount, calculated by subtracting the amount paid to
settle the debt from the principal amount of the debt at the time the
contract was signed; and
(vi) The total fees charged to the debtor and how the fees were
calculated;
(d) For Washington debtors who became inactive in, cancelled, or
terminated debt adjuster services during the previous year, the number
and percentage of debtors who, as measured by the aggregate amount of
each debtor's enrolled debts:
(i) Settled zero percent of their enrolled debt;
(ii) Settled up to twenty-five percent of their enrolled debt;
(iii) Settled twenty-five percent to fifty percent of their
enrolled debt;
(iv) Settled fifty-one percent to seventy-five percent of their
enrolled debt;
(v) Settled seventy-six percent to ninety-nine percent of their
enrolled debt; and
(e) The number and percentage of Washington debtors for whom the
debt adjuster provides or provided debt adjusting services in the
previous three years who fully settled one hundred percent of their
enrolled debt through those debt adjusting services, by year of
enrollment.
(2) The department of financial institutions shall make public and
submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
summarizing the information received under subsection (1) of this
section by December 1, 2014, and annually thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to obtaining a debtor's personal information, a debt
adjuster shall provide a clear and conspicuous disclosure to the debtor
of the debt adjuster's policies and practices with respect to:
(a) Disclosing the debtor's personal information to others,
including the categories of personal information that may be disclosed;
(b) Disclosing the personal information of persons for whom the
debt adjuster is no longer providing a debt adjusting service or
product; and
(c) Protecting the debtor's personal information.
(2) The disclosure required by subsection (1) of this section must
also be provided to the debtor at least annually while the debt
adjuster is providing debt adjusting services or products to the
debtor.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.28.120 and 1999 c 151 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
A debt adjuster shall not:
(1) Take any contract, or other instrument which has any blank
spaces when signed by the debtor;
(2) Receive or charge any fee in the form of a promissory note or
other promise to pay or receive or accept any mortgage or other
security for any fee, whether as to real or personal property;
(3) Lend money or credit;
(4) Take any confession of judgment or power of attorney to confess
judgment against the debtor or appear as the debtor in any judicial
proceedings;
(5) Take, concurrent with the signing of the contract or as a part
of the contract or as part of the application for the contract, a
release of any obligation to be performed on the part of the debt
adjuster;
(6) Advertise services, display, distribute, broadcast or televise,
or permit services to be displayed, advertised, distributed,
broadcasted or televised in any manner whatsoever wherein any false,
misleading or deceptive statement or representation with regard to the
services to be performed by the debt adjuster, or the charges to be
made therefor, is made;
(7) Offer, pay, or give any cash, fee, gift, bonus, premiums,
reward, or other compensation to any person for referring any
prospective customer to the debt adjuster;
(8) Receive any cash, fee, gift, bonus, premium, reward, or other
compensation from any person other than the debtor or a person in the
debtor's behalf in connection with his or her activities as a debt
adjuster; ((or))
(9) Disclose to anyone the debtors who have contracted with the
debt adjuster; nor shall the debt adjuster disclose the creditors of a
debtor to anyone other than: (a) The debtor; or (b) another creditor
of the debtor and then only to the extent necessary to secure the
cooperation of such a creditor in a debt adjusting plan; or
(10) Take an appointment as attorney-in-fact or power of attorney.

--- END ---