BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.28 RCW
to read as follows:
A debt adjuster has a fiduciary relationship with the debtor, and
each debt adjuster is subject to all requirements for fiduciaries
otherwise applicable under state law.

--- END ---