BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Washington
saltwater coast should be recognized as a unique and integral part of
our state and national heritage. This coastal landscape has supported
the development of a rich and diverse maritime heritage, including the
canoe cultures of the original native American inhabitants, the spirit
of exploration, and the growth of marine industries. The water touches
all aspects of daily life on the coast involving transportation, jobs,
recreation, and community activities. The purpose of designating the
Washington coast as a state maritime heritage area is to preserve and
share our cultural resources, to promote tourism and local economic
development, and to encourage congress to recognize the Washington
coast as a national maritime heritage area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The state of Washington's saltwater
coast is designated as the state maritime heritage area. The
designated area includes all federal, state, local, and tribal lands
that allow public access and are partly located within one-quarter mile
landward of the saltwater shoreline, within the following counties:
Clallam, Grays Harbor, Island, Jefferson, King, Kitsap, Mason, Pierce,
San Juan, Skagit, Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom. The Lake
Washington ship canal and the Lake Union shoreline are included in the
designated area.
(2) The designation of the state maritime heritage area is intended
to facilitate partnerships among federal, state, local, and tribal
governments, businesses, heritage organizations, individuals, and other
entities to:
(a) Honor the cultural resources of the maritime heritage area;
(b) Increase public awareness and appreciation for the natural,
historic, scenic, recreational, and cultural resources of the maritime
heritage area;
(c) Promote tourism and economic development within the state and
local jurisdictions; and
(d) Encourage congress to designate the Washington saltwater coast
as a national maritime heritage area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The maritime heritage area designation may
only be used for the purposes of heritage and tourism promotion,
consistent with section 2 of this act. Nothing in this chapter:
(1) Creates any regulatory jurisdiction or grants any regulatory
authority to any government or other entity;
(2) Abridges the rights of any owner of public or private property
within the designated area; or
(3) Establishes any legal rights or obligations, including in
regards to any environmental or administrative review process involving
land use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 27 RCW.

--- END ---