BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.327 and 2001 c 80 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The public health supplemental account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from gifts, bequests, devises, or funds, whose
use is determined to further the purpose of maintaining and improving
the health of Washington residents through the public health system
must be deposited into the account. Money in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for maintaining and improving the health of Washington residents
through the public health system, which may include funding for staff.
((Expenditures from the account shall not be used to pay for or add
permanent full-time equivalent staff positions.))
(2) The department shall file an annual statement of the financial
condition, transactions, and affairs of any program funded under this
section in a form and manner prescribed by the office of financial
management. A copy of the annual statement shall be filed with the
speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the
senate.

--- END ---