BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of licensing shall
conduct a review of the need for regulation of persons who serve legal
process using the public interest criteria set forth in RCW 18.118.010.
In conducting the review, the department of licensing shall:
(a) Consult with representatives of process servers, courts,
attorneys, and law enforcement, and any entity or individual that may
assist in identifying areas of concern regarding professionalism and
qualifications of process servers;
(b) Examine the regulation of process servers in other states; and
(c) Conduct one or more public hearings to allow for industry and
general public testimony.
(2) By November 1, 2014, the department of licensing shall submit
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature
regarding:
(a) The need for regulation of process servers; and
(b) If some form of regulation is recommended, the minimum
qualifications and oversight required to meet the regulatory standard.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2015.

--- END ---