BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state property tax levy for collection in 2015 through 2039
must be reduced by three hundred forty million dollars each calendar
year from the amount that would otherwise be allowed under this chapter
without regard to this section.
(2) State levies for collection in 2040 and thereafter must be set
at the amount that would be allowed otherwise under this chapter if the
state levies for collection in 2015 through 2039 had been set without
the reduction under subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---