BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.101.020 and 1974 ex.s. c 94 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created and established a state commission to be
known and designated as the Washington state criminal justice training
commission.
The purpose of such commission shall be to provide programs and
standards for the training of criminal justice personnel including, but
not limited to, peace officers and enforcement officers of the state
liquor control board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
Admittance to the commission's basic law enforcement academy is
open to all law enforcement personnel including an employee who is a
peace officer or enforcement officer of the state liquor control board.

--- END ---