BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The study of world languages in elementary and secondary
schools should be encouraged because it contributes to students'
cognitive development and to the national economy and security;
(b) Proficiency in multiple languages enables Washington to
participate more effectively in the current global political, social,
and economic context;
(c) The benefits to employers of having employees who are fluent in
more than one language are clear: Increased access to expanding
markets, better service of customers' needs, and expanded trading
opportunities with other countries; and
(d) Protecting the state's rich heritage of multiple cultures and
languages, as well as building trust and understanding across the
multiple cultures and languages of diverse communities, requires
multilingual communication skills.
(2) Therefore, the legislature's intent is to promote and recognize
linguistic proficiency and cultural literacy in one or more world
languages in addition to English through the establishment of a
Washington state seal of biliteracy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state seal of biliteracy is established to
recognize public high school graduates who have attained a high level
of proficiency in speaking, reading, and writing in one or more world
languages in addition to English. School districts are encouraged to
award the seal of biliteracy to graduating high school students who
meet the criteria established by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction under this section. Participating school districts
shall place a notation on a student's high school diploma and high
school transcript indicating that the student has earned the seal.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt rules establishing criteria for award of the Washington state
seal of biliteracy. The criteria must require a student to demonstrate
proficiency in English by meeting state high school graduation
requirements in English, including through state assessments and
credits, and proficiency in one or more world languages other than
English. The criteria must permit a student to demonstrate proficiency
in another world language through multiple methods including nationally
or internationally recognized language proficiency tests and
competency-based world language credits awarded under the model policy
adopted by the Washington state school directors' association.
(3) For the purposes of this section, a world language other than
English must include American sign language and Native American
languages.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.230.125 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 130 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the four-year institutions as defined in RCW 28B.76.020, the state
board for community and technical colleges, and the workforce training
and education coordinating board, shall develop for use by all public
school districts a standardized high school transcript. The
superintendent shall establish clear definitions for the terms
"credits" and "hours" so that school programs operating on the quarter,
semester, or trimester system can be compared.
(2) The standardized high school transcript shall include a
notation of whether the student has earned a certificate of individual
achievement or a certificate of academic achievement.
(3) The standardized high school transcript may include a notation
of whether the student has earned the Washington state seal of
biliteracy established under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2014, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---