BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that low-income
students and students of color often do not have access to dual credit
programs that allow students to earn both high school and college
credits. Low-income students and students of color are
underrepresented in the running start program. Running start provides
a cost-effective way for high school students to obtain college credits
and also accelerates their progress through the education system.
Because low-income students and students of color are
underrepresented in the running start program, they are unable to take
advantage of its benefits. Therefore, a comprehensive review of the
program and barriers to participating in the program is necessary to
improve enrollment among those populations and to ensure that the
running start program is accessible to all students.
It is also necessary to improve collaboration between K-12 schools
and running start institutions, and for those institutions and schools
to develop concrete plans for improving underrepresented student
enrollment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The student achievement council shall
conduct a comprehensive analysis of the running start program. The
analysis must include a review of the barriers that students face in
participating in the program, identification of best practices in
making the program accessible and preparing students academically for
the program, and the degree completion outcomes of students who
participate in the program. The council shall submit a report based on
this analysis to the education committees of the legislature by January
1, 2015.
(2) This section expires August 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Participation plans shall be developed to increase
enrollment of underrepresented students in the running start program.
(b) Development of the plans shall be facilitated by the office of
the superintendent of public instruction and through close
collaboration and coordination between participating institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28A.600.300 that have over fifty
students participating in the running start program and school
districts with students participating in the program. School districts
of the second class and nonhigh districts are not required to
participate.
(c) School districts must meet with participating institutions of
higher education located within their district and identify a plan for
increasing enrollment of underrepresented students in the running start
program. These meetings may include more than one school district or
participating institution of higher education.
(d) A plan identified by each school district and partnering
running start institution must be provided to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction by November 1, 2014.
(2) Each plan identified under subsection (1) of this section must
include a focus on:
(a) Identifying and implementing strategies to provide outreach
regarding the running start program to underrepresented populations at
middle schools and high schools to ensure that students and families
have information on the program, including outreach efforts conducted
by students from underrepresented populations, representatives from
participating institutions of higher education visiting local high
schools, and school districts providing explicit information sessions
regarding running start; and
(b) Ensuring better coordination between middle schools, high
schools, and participating institutions of higher education to provide
academic guidance to students who have been underrepresented in the
running start program so that these students are better able to
participate in the program.
(3) By January 1, 2015, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction must provide to the appropriate committees of the
legislature guidelines for improving outreach to students who have been
underrepresented in the running start program and for collaboration
among middle schools, high schools, and participating institutions of
higher education based on the plans that were reported under subsection
(1) of this section by school districts and participating institutions
of higher education.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
collect current demographic data from each school district related to
student participation in the running start program. This data shall be
compared with data collected after two years of collaboration as
described in subsection (1) of this section, and submitted to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2017.
(5) This section expires August 1, 2018.

--- END ---