BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that employment is a
key factor to the successful reintegration to society of people with
criminal histories, and is critical to reducing recidivism, promoting
public safety, and encouraging personal responsibility.
Occupational licensing and employment laws regulate many
professions as well as unskilled and semiskilled occupations. Examples
of regulated occupations include alcohol servers, barbers and
cosmetologists, body piercers, commercial fishers, contractors,
drivers, embalmers, engineers, healthcare workers, insurance adjusters,
real estate professionals, tattoo artists, and waste management
workers. Individuals with criminal histories may meet the competency
requirements for these occupations through training, experience, or
education, but may be disqualified from them based on their criminal
history.
Certificates of restoration of opportunity help reduce some
barriers to employment for adults and juveniles by providing an
opportunity for individuals to become more employable and to more
successfully reintegrate into society after they have served their
sentence, demonstrated a period of law-abiding behavior consistent with
successful reentry, and proved that they have turned their lives around
following a conviction. Applicants for a license must also meet all
other statutory licensing requirements.
Certificates of restoration of opportunity offer potential public
and private employers or housing providers concrete and objective
information about an individual under consideration for an opportunity.
These certificates can facilitate the successful societal reintegration
of individuals with a criminal history whose behavior demonstrates that
they are taking responsibility for their past criminal conduct and
pursuing a positive law-abiding future. A certificate of restoration
of opportunity provides a process for people previously sentenced by a
Washington court who have successfully changed their lives to present
evidence of this change to a Washington court and to seek a document
confirming their changed circumstances.
A certificate of restoration of opportunity does not affect any
employer's or housing provider's discretion to individually assess
every applicant and to hire or rent to the applicants of their choice.
Employers will not have to forego hiring their chosen applicants
because they face statutory bars that prevent obtaining the necessary
occupational credentials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Qualified applicant" means any adult or juvenile who meets the
following requirements:
(a) One year has passed from sentencing for those sentenced by a
Washington state court to probation, or receiving a deferred sentence
or other noncustodial sentencing for a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
offense or an equivalent juvenile adjudication; or
(b) Eighteen months has passed from release from total confinement
from a Washington prison or jail or juvenile facility for those
sentenced by a Washington state court to incarceration for a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor or an equivalent juvenile
adjudication; or
(c) Two years have passed from release from total confinement from
a Washington prison or jail or juvenile facility for those sentenced by
a Washington state court for a class B or C felony or an equivalent
juvenile adjudication; or
(d) Three years have passed from release from total confinement
from a Washington prison or jail or juvenile facility for those
sentenced by a Washington state court for a class A felony or an
equivalent juvenile adjudication; and the applicant:
(i) Is in compliance or has completed all sentencing requirements
imposed by a court except for court-ordered legal financial obligations
as long as he or she has a payment plan in place and has made at least
nine payments in the last twelve months, or has good cause for missing
payments during this period;
(ii) Has never been convicted of a sex offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030 or a crime that includes sexual motivation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.835 (sexual motivation for adults), RCW 13.40.135 (sexual
motivation for juveniles), RCW 9.94A.535(3)(f) (departures from the
guidelines, sexual motivation,) and is not required to register as a
sex offender pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130 (registration of sex offenders
and kidnapping offenders--Procedures--Definition--Penalties); and
(iii) Has not been arrested for nor convicted of a new crime and
has no pending criminal charge, and there is no information presented
to a qualified court that such a charge is imminent.
(2) "Qualified court" means any Washington court of record or court
of limited jurisdiction that has sentenced or adjudicated the qualified
applicant. If a court that has sentenced the applicant no longer
exists, the applicant may file for a certificate of restoration of
opportunity in the successor court.
(3) "Restoration" means the process by which an individual restores
himself or herself to a useful and constructive place in society
through some form of vocational, correctional, or therapeutic effort.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 No state, county, or municipal department,
board, officer, or agency authorized to assess the qualifications of
any applicant for a license, certificate of authority, qualification to
engage in the practice of a profession or business, or for admission to
an examination to qualify for such a license or certificate may
disqualify a qualified applicant, solely based on the applicant's
criminal history, if the qualified applicant has obtained a certificate
of restoration of opportunity and the applicant meets all other
statutory and regulatory requirements. Nothing in this section is
interpreted as restoring or creating a means to restore any firearms
rights or requiring the removal of a protection order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A qualified court has jurisdiction to
issue a certificate of restoration of opportunity to a qualified
applicant. A certificate applies to all past criminal history. The
certificate does not apply to any future criminal justice involvement.
(2) A court must determine whether to issue a certificate by:
(a) Considering the nature and seriousness of the applicant's
criminal history;
(b) Considering material evidence of the applicant's restoration;
(c) Determining that the applicant is a qualified applicant as
defined by section 2 of this act;
(d) Finding that issuing a certificate assists in the successful
reintegration of the offender; and
(e) Finding that issuing a certificate does not pose a substantial
risk to public safety.
(3) The court must determine the nature and seriousness of the
applicant's criminal history by examining the applicant's judgment and
sentence, criminal history and offender score, if applicable, and any
certificate of discharge, if obtained by applicant.
(4) Material evidence of restoration includes, but is not limited
to:
(a) Good conduct in the community or in a correctional facility as
documented by the following nonexclusive list:
(i) Any order discharging the applicant from community custody,
probation, or treatment;
(ii) Letters or declarations from the applicant's housing provider,
clergy, twelve-step sponsor, sentencing judge, mentor, or other
individual with knowledge of the applicant's changed circumstances;
(iii) Awards, certificates, or other relevant achievements; or
(iv) Reports by a probation or community corrections officer,
parole board, or department of corrections or similar entity.
(b) Counseling, psychiatric, or substance abuse treatment as
documented by the following nonexclusive list:
(i) Letters or declarations from the applicant's doctors,
counselors, treatment providers, social service providers, or other
health care providers;
(ii) Completion or compliance with drug, mental health, or other
relevant alternative courts; or
(iii) Signed twelve-step attendance sheets.
(c) Acquisition of subsequent academic or vocational schooling,
employment, or volunteer work as documented by the following
nonexclusive list:
(i) Successful participation in correctional vocational or work
release programs;
(ii) School transcripts;
(iii) Certificate of completion of training;
(iv) Diploma or equivalent; or
(v) Proof of volunteer work or employment.
(5) Restoration must be proven to the court by a preponderance of
the evidence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 An employer or housing provider may, in its
sole discretion, determine whether to consider a certificate of
restoration of opportunity issued under this chapter in making
employment or rental decisions. Nothing in this section is construed
to create a protected class, private right of action, any right,
privilege, or duty, or to change any right, privilege, or duty existing
under law related to employment or housing except as provided in
section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Department of social and health services
abuse and neglect registry: A certificate of restoration of
opportunity does not apply to the state abuse and neglect registry. No
finding of abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property may be
removed from the registry based solely on a certificate. The
department must include such certificates as part of its criminal
history record reports, qualifying letters, or other assessments
pursuant to RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.838.
(2) Washington state patrol: The Washington state patrol is not
required to remove any records based solely on a certificate of
restoration of opportunity. The state patrol must include a
certificate as part of its criminal history record report.
(3) State court records:
(a) A certificate of restoration of opportunity has no effect on
any other records kept by the Washington administrative office of the
courts, including its judicial information system. The court records
related to a certificate of restoration of opportunity must be
processed and recorded in the same manner as any other record.
(b) The qualified court where the applicant seeks the certificate
of rehabilitation must administer the court records regarding the
certificate in the same manner as it does regarding all other
proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 In all cases, a qualified applicant must
provide notice to the prosecutor in the county where he or she seeks a
certificate of restoration of opportunity of the pendency of such
application. The qualified applicant must also notify the prosecuting
attorney of any other jurisdiction in which he or she was sentenced
within five years of the application for a certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A reasonable processing fee, not to exceed
fifty dollars, may be charged by the clerk of the court at the time the
application for a certificate of restoration of opportunity is filed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 9 RCW.

--- END ---