BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that mentoring and
service learning opportunities help to improve the academic success of
low-performing, high-risk students in K-12 and postsecondary education
in addition to other benefits. The legislature intends to increase
mentoring and service learning opportunities for K-12 and postsecondary
education students who are at risk of not completing their programs of
study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Western Washington University shall host a statewide consortium
of public and private institutions of higher education with the purpose
of providing and increasing the number of campus-based mentoring and
service learning opportunities in K-12 education and at eligible
institutions as defined in RCW 28B.12.030. The consortium shall
develop and administer a state campus compact between eligible
institutions, and shall partner with nonprofit organizations that
provide mentoring services including:
(a) A nonprofit organization that provides higher education
advocacy and opportunity to young people struggling to overcome poverty
and adversity in King county; and
(b) A nonprofit organization that provides opportunities for fifth
to twelfth grade students from traditionally underrepresented and
diverse backgrounds in Whatcom and Skagit counties to be mentored by
university students.
(2) The mentoring and service learning opportunities developed
under the state campus compact are intended to serve the following
target populations of students:
(a) For K-12 students, those who are at risk of dropping out of
school, not on track to complete their high school diploma on time,
from a low-income family, in or transitioning from foster care, or from
a family with no previous experience in attending college; and
(b) For postsecondary education students, those who are not on
track to complete their degree or certificate on time, enrolled in one
or more precollege level courses or programs, from a low-income family,
in or transitioning from foster care, from a family with no previous
experience in attending college, or veterans of the armed services.
(3) The mentoring and service-learning opportunities of the state
campus compact shall be designed to:
(a) Increase student engagement in learning and postsecondary
education;
(b) Develop workforce, financial literacy, and citizenship skills;
(c) Improve student attitudes and behaviors; and
(d) Improve academic success and retention.
(4) The state campus compact shall address:
(a) Training and outreach to postsecondary students to serve as
mentors and increase the number and retention of participating mentors;
(b) Coordination of service learning projects;
(c) Training for successful partnerships between institutions and
schools;
(d) Financial literacy training for mentors and mentees;
(e) Methods to improve the accountability of the program by
compiling statewide data to measure the impact of mentoring programs
and implementing statewide assessment tools by measuring:
(i) Academic improvement;
(ii) Retention and completion rates;
(iii) Access to institutions of higher education; and
(iv) Development of workforce and citizenship skills, attitudes,
and behaviors;
(f) Increased tutoring support for developmental education students
taking online math courses; and
(g) Dissemination of best practices and impacts of mentoring
programs statewide.

--- END ---