BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that the lack
of properly working smoke alarms poses a serious threat. National fire
protection association statistics indicate that ninety-four percent of
households in the United States have smoke detectors, but thirty
percent of those alarms are inoperable. The death rate per one hundred
reported fires is twice as high in homes without working smoke alarms
as it is in home fires with protection. Further, two-thirds of all
home fire deaths occur in residences with no smoke alarm or no working
smoke alarm, primarily due to dead or missing batteries. The
legislature finds that smoke alarms with nonremovable, nonreplaceable
batteries eliminate the need to replace the battery, something many
homeowners fail to do.
(2) The average time to escape in a residential fire is about three
minutes. A working alarm that can give advance warning to alert
residents of a fire incident is important to reduce fatality and injury
of both residents and firefighters and allow firefighters to more
rapidly control the fire.
(3) In one recent incident in the Auburn area, an eight-unit
apartment burned and all eight smoke alarms were inoperable. A
December 2013 Bellingham fire in a home that contained a smoke alarm
with no battery took the life of nineteen year old Adam LaVine. It is
the intent of the legislature to prevent similar tragedies from
happening in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Commencing July 1, 2016, all smoke alarms that are solely
battery powered, including combination smoke alarms offered for retail
sale in this state for the purpose of installation in residential
buildings, must contain a nonreplaceable, nonremovable battery capable
of powering the smoke alarm for a minimum of ten years.
(2) Commencing July 1, 2016, all smoke alarms or combination smoke
alarms must:
(a) Display the date of manufacture;
(b) Provide a place on the device where the date of installation
can be written. The date of installation must be visible to the
consumer without removing the alarm from its base or mounting bracket;
and
(c) Incorporate a hush feature.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to:
(a) Smoke detectors intended to be used with a fire alarm or
household fire alarm control unit;
(b) Smoke alarms that send a supervision and battery depletion
signal to a fire alarm or household fire alarm control unit via a
low-power wireless communication signal;
(c) Smoke alarms that use low-power radio frequency wireless
communication signal for interconnection;
(d) Smoke alarms that use a low-frequency audible alarm used by the
hearing impaired or elderly that enhance waking effectiveness;
(e) Smoke alarms with multisensing technologies; or
(f) If a retailer can show proof that a product prohibited for sale
under this section was in stock and physically in the retail location
before the effective date of this section, that retail location may
sell that product until it is sold out, or until July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state building code council shall update codes in all
necessary and relevant sections regarding solely battery powered smoke
alarms in all existing occupancies to be consistent with this section
and section 2 of this act in the next code cycle.
(2) In all existing occupancies, smoke alarms must be upgraded to
comply with this section and section 2 of this act when any of the
following occurs:
(a) The existing smoke alarm exceeds ten years from the date of
manufacture;
(b) The existing smoke alarm fails to respond to operability tests
or otherwise malfunctions; or
(c) There is a change of ownership or a change of tenant in the
residential unit and the residential unit has not previously been
equipped in accordance with smoke alarms that are compliant with
section 2 of this act within the ten years preceding the change of
ownership or change of tenant.
(3) A landlord may require reimbursement from a tenant for the cost
of a smoke alarm required under section 2 of this act.

--- END ---