BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2011 c 203 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except as
provided in RCW 28A.230.122 and except those equivalencies established
by local high schools or school districts under RCW 28A.230.097. The
purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that a student is ready
for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and
citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high
school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level. Effective with the graduating class
of 2015, the state board of education may not establish a requirement
for students to complete a culminating project for graduation.
(2)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board
of education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements
for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and
technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to
a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized.
The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in
these programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of
academic achievement, complete the program and earn the program's
certificate or credential, and complete other state and local
graduation requirements.
(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high
school graduation requirements to the education committees of the
legislature for review and to the quality education council established
under RCW 28A.290.010. The legislature shall have the opportunity to
act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted
through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a
fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis
prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the
legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted
legislation.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.097 and 2013 c 241 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each high school or school district board of directors shall
adopt course equivalencies for career and technical high school courses
offered to students in high schools and skill centers. A career and
technical course equivalency may be for whole or partial credit. Each
school district board of directors shall develop a course equivalency
approval procedure. Boards of directors must approve AP computer
science courses as equivalent to high school mathematics or science,
and must denote on a student's transcript that AP computer science
qualifies as a math-based quantitative course for students who take the
course in their senior year. In order for a board to approve AP
computer science as equivalent to high school mathematics, the student
must be concurrently enrolled in or have successfully completed algebra
II.
(2) Career and technical courses determined to be equivalent to
academic core courses, in full or in part, by the high school or school
district shall be accepted as meeting core requirements, including
graduation requirements, if the courses are recorded on the student's
transcript using the equivalent academic high school department
designation and title. Full or partial credit shall be recorded as
appropriate. The high school or school district shall also issue and
keep record of course completion certificates that demonstrate that the
career and technical courses were successfully completed as needed for
industry certification, college credit, or preapprenticeship, as
applicable. The certificate shall be ((either)) part of the student's
high school and beyond plan ((or the student's culminating project, as
determined by the student)). The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall develop and make available electronic samples
of certificates of course completion.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.320.240 and 2006 c 263 s 914 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The purpose of this section is to identify quality criteria for
school library media programs that support the student learning goals
under RCW 28A.150.210, the essential academic learning requirements
under RCW 28A.655.070, and high school graduation requirements adopted
under RCW 28A.230.090.
(2) Every board of directors shall provide for the operation and
stocking of such libraries as the board deems necessary for the proper
education of the district's students or as otherwise required by law or
rule of the superintendent of public instruction.
(3) "Teacher-librarian" means a certified teacher with a library
media endorsement under rules adopted by the professional educator
standards board.
(4) "School-library media program" means a school-based program
that is staffed by a certificated teacher-librarian and provides a
variety of resources that support student mastery of the essential
academic learning requirements in all subject areas and the
implementation of the district's school improvement plan.
(5) The teacher-librarian, through the school-library media
program, shall collaborate as an instructional partner to help all
students meet the content goals in all subject areas, and assist high
school students completing ((the culminating project and)) high school
and beyond plans required for graduation.

--- END ---