BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.04.1695 and 2002 c 247 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Electric personal assistive mobility device" (EPAMD) means (1) a
self-balancing device with two wheels not in tandem, designed to
transport only one person by an electric propulsion system with an
average power of seven hundred fifty watts (one horsepower) having a
maximum speed on a paved level surface, when powered solely by such a
propulsion system while ridden by an operator weighing one hundred
seventy pounds, of less than twenty miles per hour or (2) a self-balancing device with one wheel designed to transport only one person
by an electric propulsion system with an average power of two thousand
watts (two and two-thirds horsepower) having a maximum speed on a paved
level surface, when powered solely by such a propulsion system, of less
than twenty miles per hour.

--- END ---