BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.50.071 and 2011 c 261 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The council shall receive all applications for energy facility
site certification. Each applicant shall pay ((such reasonable))
actual costs ((as are actually and necessarily)) incurred by the
council and the utilities and transportation commission in processing
an application.
(a) Each applicant shall, at the time of application submission,
deposit with the utilities and transportation commission an amount up
to fifty thousand dollars, ((or such greater amount)) as ((may be))
specified by the council after consultation with the applicant.
((Costs that may be charged against the deposit include, but are not
limited to, independent consultants' costs, councilmember's wages,
employee benefits, costs of a hearing examiner, costs of a court
reporter, staff salaries, wages and employee benefits, goods and
services, travel expenses, and miscellaneous direct expenses as arise
directly from processing an application.)) The council and the
utilities and transportation commission shall charge costs against the
deposit if the applicant withdraws its application and has not
reimbursed the commission, on behalf of the council, for all actual
expenditures incurred in considering the application.
(b) The council may commission its own independent consultant study
to measure the consequences of the proposed energy facility on the
environment or any matter that it deems essential to an adequate
appraisal of the site. The council, after consultation with the
utilities and transportation commission, shall provide an estimate of
the cost of the study to the applicant and consider applicant comments.
(c) In addition to the deposit required under (a) of this
subsection, applicants must reimburse the utilities and transportation
commission, on behalf of the council, for actual expenditures that
arise in considering the application, including the cost of any
independent consultant study. The utilities and transportation
commission, on behalf of the council, shall submit to each applicant a
statement of ((such)) actual expenditures made during the preceding
calendar quarter ((which shall be)) in sufficient detail to explain
((such)) the expenditures. The applicant shall pay the ((state
treasurer)) utilities and transportation commission the amount of
((such statement to restore the total amount on deposit to the
originally established level: PROVIDED, That such applicant may, at
the request of the council, increase the amount of funds on deposit to
cover anticipated expenses during peak periods of application
processing. Any funds remaining unexpended at the conclusion of
application processing shall be refunded to the applicant, or at the
applicant's option, credited against required deposits of certificate
holders)) the statement by the due date referenced on the statement.
(2) Each certificate holder shall pay ((such reasonable costs as
are actually and necessarily)) the actual costs incurred by the council
and utilities and transportation commission for inspection and
determination of compliance by the certificate holder with the terms of
the certification relative to monitoring the effects of construction,
operation, and site restoration of the facility.
(a) Each certificate holder shall, within thirty days of execution
of the site certification agreement, ((shall have on)) deposit with the
utilities and transportation commission an amount up to fifty thousand
dollars, ((or such greater amount)) as ((may be)) specified by the
council after consultation with the certificate holder. ((Costs that
may be charged against the deposit include, but are not limited to,
those specified in subsection (1)(a) of this section as arise from
inspection and determination of compliance by the certificate holder
with the terms of the certification.)) The council and the utilities
and transportation commission shall charge costs against the deposit if
the certificate holder ceases operations and has not reimbursed the
commission, on behalf of the council, for all actual expenditures
incurred in conducting inspections and determining compliance with the
terms of the certification.
(b) In addition to the deposit required under (a) of this
subsection, certificate holders must reimburse the utilities and
transportation commission, on behalf of the council, for actual
expenditures that arise in determining compliance. The council, after
consultation with the utilities and transportation commission, shall
submit to each certificate holder a statement of ((such)) the
expenditures actually made during the preceding calendar quarter
((which shall be)) in sufficient detail to explain ((such)) the
expenditures. The certificate holder shall pay the ((state treasurer))
utilities and transportation commission the amount of ((such statement
to restore the total amount on deposit to the originally established
level: PROVIDED, That if the actual expenditures for inspection and
determination of compliance in the preceding calendar quarter have
exceeded the amount of funds on deposit, such excess costs shall be
paid by the certificate holder)) the statement by the due date
referenced on the statement.
(3) If an applicant or certificate holder fails to provide the
initial deposit, or if subsequently required payments are not received
within thirty days following receipt of the statement from the council,
the council may (a) in the case of the applicant, suspend processing of
the application until payment is received; or (b) in the case of a
certificate holder, suspend the certification.
(4) All payments required of the applicant or certificate holder
under this section are to be made to the ((state treasurer)) utilities
and transportation commission who shall make payments as instructed by
the council from the funds submitted. All such funds shall be subject
to state auditing procedures. Any unexpended portions ((thereof)) of
the deposit shall be returned to the applicant ((or certificate
holder)) within sixty days following the conclusion of the application
process or to the certificate holder within sixty days after a
determination by the council that the certificate is no longer required
and there is no continuing need for compliance with its terms. For
purposes of this section, "conclusion of the application process" means
after the governor's decision granting or denying a certificate and the
expiration of any opportunities for judicial review.
(5)(a) Upon receipt of an application for an energy facility site
certification proposing an energy plant or alternative energy resource
that is connected to electrical transmission facilities of a nominal
voltage of at least one hundred fifteen thousand volts, the council
shall notify in writing the United States department of defense. The
notification shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
(i) A description of the proposed energy plant or alternative
energy resource;
(ii) The location of the site;
(iii) The placement of the energy plant or alternative energy
resource on the site;
(iv) The date and time by which comments must be received by the
council; and
(v) Contact information of the council and the applicant.
(b) The purpose of the written notification is to provide an
opportunity for the United States department of defense to comment upon
the application, and to identify potential issues relating to the
placement and operations of the energy plant or alternative energy
resource, before a site certification application is approved. The
time period set forth by the council for receipt of such comments shall
not extend the time period for the council's processing of the
application.
(c) In order to assist local governments required to notify the
United States department of defense under RCW 35.63.270, 35A.63.290,
and 36.01.320, the council shall post on its web site the appropriate
information for contacting the United States department of defense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Nothing in this act extends or modifies the
jurisdiction of the energy facility site evaluation council or the
utilities and transportation commission with respect to any energy
facility that is not subject to the jurisdiction of the energy facility
site evaluation council or the utility and transportation commission as
of the effective date of this section.

--- END ---