BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the apple
a day act of 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds healthy eating in
childhood and adolescence is important for optimal growth and
development. The legislature further finds that states are facing a
nutrition crisis that is unprecedented. Childhood obesity and diabetes
are serious public health concerns. The legislature further finds that
healthy lifestyle habits, including healthy eating and physical
activity, can lower the risk of becoming obese and developing diabetes
and other related diseases. The legislature further finds that public
schools are in a unique position to promote healthy eating, ensure
appropriate food and nutrient intake among students, provide students
with opportunities to access an array of healthy Washington grown foods
throughout the school day, and enable students to learn about and
practice healthy eating behaviors. The legislature further finds that
many schools across the state lack the necessary equipment and kitchen
infrastructure required to support the storage, preparation, and
service of minimally processed and whole foods. Therefore, it is the
intent of the legislature to establish a competitive equipment
assistance grant program for public schools to improve the quality of
food service meals that meet federal dietary guidelines, increase the
consumption of whole foods, increase awareness of local agriculture,
and support the use of modified scratch, from scratch, or other cooking
methods that enhance overall student nutrition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.235
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A competitive equipment assistance grant program, to be known
as the apple a day program, is established to enhance overall student
nutrition in public schools.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction must establish a
competitive process to prioritize applications for state assistance as
follows:
(a) The superintendent of public instruction must conduct a
statewide solicitation of project applications from public school
districts for common schools and public schools participating in the
national school breakfast or the national school lunch program, as
determined by the superintendent of public instruction.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction must evaluate and rank
applications in consultation with an advisory committee of at least
three members of selected organizations concerned with child nutrition,
including one Washington school nutrition association representative
and one representative from east of the crest of the Cascade mountains,
using objective criteria.
(c) The superintendent of public instruction must require
applicants to demonstrate, at a minimum, the following:
(i) Use of the proposed equipment will enhance nutrition and
improve student access to healthier foods. Applicants must submit
current school menus and proposed menus using the requested equipment;
and
(ii) Healthy eating and physical activity are actively promoted to
students, parents, teachers, and the community.
(3) In evaluating and ranking applications, the superintendent of
public instruction shall give funding priority to:
(a) Public schools in which at least fifty percent of the students
are eligible for free or reduced-priced meals;
(b) Project applications in which equipment purchases will affect
menu changes throughout an entire grade group or school district;
(c) Project applications that provide a dollar-for-dollar match
from nonstate sources. Nonstate match may include cash and in-kind
contributions, and may be applied to the equipment purchase, labor
costs associated with equipment installation or renovation, disposal of
old equipment, minor capital improvements required to accommodate the
equipment, and staff training costs;
(d) Public schools that can demonstrate nutrition is integrated
into core curriculum areas such as math, science, language arts, and
physical education, and serving healthy Washington grown food is
incorporated into the schools wellness policy;
(e) Public schools that are engaged in farm to school efforts and
support Washington farmers by purchasing Washington grown food when
available.
(4) For purposes of this section, "equipment" means articles of
nonexpendable, tangible personal property with a useful life of at
least thirteen years and a per unit acquisition cost of one thousand
dollars and may include the purchase of new equipment, renovation of
equipment, or replacement of equipment. Minor capital improvements
required to accommodate the installation of equipment may also be
eligible for state assistance.
(5) In consultation with the advisory committee, the superintendent
of public instruction must develop and track specific, quantifiable
outcome measures for the grant program. A preliminary report on the
outcome measures selected for the program must be submitted to the
legislature by January 1, 2015, and a final report on program outcomes
by January 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2014, in the omnibus capital appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

--- END ---