BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the importance of
ensuring taxes on the production and sale of recreational marijuana are
collected by the state of Washington. It is the intent of the
legislature to create a counterfeit-resistant tax stamp program that
provides the state with more secure mechanisms to ensure that taxes on
recreational marijuana are collectible, enforceable, and auditable by
the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) In consultation with the department of
revenue, the state liquor control board must develop and implement a
tax stamp program for the production and sale of recreational marijuana
in Washington state: At a minimum, the tax stamp program must include
the following provisions:
(a) All licensed marijuana producers and processors must purchase
counterfeit-resistant marijuana tax stamps from the board, and
marijuana products are prohibited from being shipped to a licensed
marijuana processor or retailer until a tax stamp is properly affixed
to the product by the producer or processor as described in (b) of this
subsection.
(b) All marijuana products leaving the marijuana producer and
processor must be sealed in highly secure tamper-resistant packaging
and affixed with a counterfeit-resistant tax stamp.
(c) A licensed retailer may only accept wholesale product that has
been sealed and stamped as described in (b) of this subsection. The
retailer is permitted to break down product as prescribed by rule by
the liquor control board.
(2) The liquor control board must develop rules to implement the
tax stamp program created under this section no later than October 1,
2014, and the tax stamp program must begin no later than January 1,
2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Every licensed marijuana producer,
processor, and retailer subject to the provisions of this chapter must
keep and preserve for a period to be determined by the liquor control
board an accurate set of records. These records must show all
transactions relating to the purchase and sale of any of the articles
taxed under this chapter and show all physical inventories performed on
those articles, all invoices, and a record of all stamps purchased or
received. All such records and all stock of taxable articles on hand
must be open to inspection at all reasonable times by the liquor
control board or its duly authorized agent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 For the purposes of this act, "marijuana"
has the same meaning as provided in RCW 69.50.101.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---