BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.13A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city or town may not assume, under this chapter, the
jurisdiction of all or part of a water-sewer district serving a
population greater than one thousand residents and containing, within
its boundaries, the territory of two or more cities or towns, or one
city or town and unincorporated territory, unless voters of the entire
water-sewer district approve a ballot proposition authorizing the
assumption under general election law. The cost of the election must
be borne by the city or town seeking approval to assume jurisdiction of
a water-sewer district.
(2) A city or town may assume jurisdiction over a water-sewer
district located within its boundaries without seeking approval of the
voters, as required under subsection (1) of this section, if the board
of commissioners of the water-sewer district consent to the assumption
of jurisdiction by the city or town. The feasibility study required
under subsection (3) of this section is not required if the board of
commissioners of the water-sewer district consents to the assumption of
jurisdiction by the city or town.
(3) Following the passage of a resolution by a city or town to
assume all or part of a special purpose water-sewer district under this
chapter, a feasibility study of the assumption must be conducted,
unless the board of commissioners of the water-sewer district consents
to the assumption of jurisdiction by the city or town as provided under
subsection (2) of this section. The study must be jointly and equally
funded by the city or town and the district through a mutually agreed
contract with a qualified independent consultant with professional
expertise involving public water and sewer systems. The study must
address the impact of the proposed assumption on both the city or town
and district. Issues to be considered must be mutually agreed to by
the city or town and the district and must include, but not be limited
to, engineering and operational impacts, costs of the assumption to the
city or town and the district including potential impacts on future
water-sewer rates, bond ratings and future borrowing costs, status of
existing water rights, and other issues jointly agreed to. The
findings of the joint study must be presented as a public record that
is available to the registered voters of the district, both within and
without the boundary of the city or town conducting the assumption,
prior to a vote on the proposed assumption by all the voters in the
district. The study must be completed within six months of the passage
of the resolution to assume the district. No vote may take place until
the study has been completed and the results have been made available
to the registered voters of the district.
(4) This section is applicable to assumptions of jurisdiction of
water-sewer districts by cities or towns that have been initiated prior
to the effective date of this section and that are pending as of that
date, as well as those assumptions of jurisdiction that are initiated
on or after the effective date of this section.
(5) Once the voters in a water-sewer district have approved or
disapproved an assumption through the ballot proposition process
required under subsection (1) of this section, a boundary review board
does not have jurisdiction, under chapter 36.93 RCW, to conduct a
review of the assumption where the attempted or completed assumption
involves not more than one city or town.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.13A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a city or town assumes jurisdiction over a water-sewer
district without seeking approval of the voters pursuant to section
2(1) of this act, the assumption is subject to referendum for forty-five days after its passage. Upon the filing of a timely and
sufficient referendum petition with the board of commissioners, signed
by registered voters in number equal to not less than ten percent of
the registered voters in the area to be assumed who voted in the last
municipal general election, the question of assumption must be
submitted to the voters of the area in a general election if one is to
be held within ninety days or at a special election called for that
purpose by the board of commissioners in accordance with RCW
29A.04.330. The election must be conducted in accordance with the
general election laws of the state. The assumption is deemed approved
by the voters unless a majority of the votes cast on the proposition
are in opposition thereto.
(2) After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding
the date the board of commissioners of the water-sewer district
consented to the assumption of jurisdiction by the city or town, if no
timely and sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the city or
town assumes jurisdiction over the water-sewer district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Nothing in this act may be construed to
preempt or modify any existing interlocal agreement, franchise, or
contract between a city or town and a water-sewer district in effect on
the effective date of this section.

--- END ---