BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Water is vital to the survival of life on the planet and is
limited in supply. One way to help extend Washington's water supply is
by promoting water efficiency and enhancing the market for water
efficient products, programs, and practices;
(2) Bathrooms are, by far, the largest user of water inside homes
and buildings, and responsible for about one-half of total indoor water
use;
(3) Toilets account for approximately thirty percent of residential
indoor water consumption. Toilets are a major source of wasted water
due to leaks or inefficiencies. Under federal and state law, toilets
sold in the United States must not exceed 1.6 gallons per flush. High
efficiency toilets go beyond the standard and use less than 1.3 gallons
per flush. Power assist and pressure assist toilets use even less
water. Tests and research demonstrate that high efficiency toilets,
meeting the United States environmental protection agency's watersense
specifications conserve water and work as well or better than high
volume toilets. If all homes and buildings in the United States
replaced old toilets with new high efficiency toilets, the savings
would be more than five hundred twenty billion gallons of water a year;
(4) Besides saving water and reducing a customer's costs, water
efficiency offers many other benefits:
(a) Less water withdrawn from rivers, lakes, and aquifers, which
helps keep these water bodies healthy;
(b) Improved water quality due to increased river flows;
(c) Less energy required to pump and treat the water and
wastewater, therefore less greenhouse gas emissions;
(d) Less wastewater that requires collection, treatment, and
disposal; and
(e) Less pollution from treated wastewater in our streams and
waterways;
(5) Current codes adopt nationally recognized performance and water
efficiency standards by which plumbing fixtures and fitting
efficiencies are measured. The current state building and plumbing
codes have adopted standards that define the terms "high efficiency
toilet," "dual flush toilet," and "single flush toilet";
(6) The state building code council adopts and maintains the state
building code and accordingly requires standards in terms of
performance and nationally accepted standards. The state building code
council regularly reviews updated versions of the model codes that
comprise the state building code, and adopts and amends the state
building code in a manner that is consistent with the state's interests
as prescribed by law; and
(7) The state building code council will commence their next update
of the state building code in 2015 and complete their rule making by
December 1, 2015.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27.170 and 1991 c 347 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state building code council shall adopt rules under chapter
34.05 RCW during the 2015 code adoption period to become effective July
1, 2016, that implement and incorporate the water conservation
performance standards in this subsection and subsections (4) and (5) of
this section. These standards shall apply to all new construction and
all remodeling involving replacement of plumbing fixtures in all
residential, hotel, motel, school, industrial, commercial use, or other
occupancies determined by the council to use significant quantities of
water.
(2) ((The legislature recognizes that a phasing-in approach to
these new standards is appropriate. Therefore, standards in subsection
(4) of this section shall take effect on July 1, 1990. The standards
in subsection (5) of this section shall take effect July 1, 1993.)) By
July 1, 2015, all fixtures, fittings, and toilets, other than toilets
used by children in day care facilities and toilets used in bariatric
applications, sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state shall
meet the requirements of subsection (4) of this section.
(3)(a) No individual, public or private corporation, firm,
political subdivision, government agency, or other legal entity may,
for purposes of use in this state, distribute, sell, offer for sale,
import, install, or approve for installation any plumbing fixtures
unless the fixtures meet the standards as provided for in this section.
(b) If a retailer is able to show proof that a product prohibited
for sale under this subsection was in stock and physically in the
retail location before the effective date of this section, that retail
location may sell that product until it is depleted, or until January
1, 2016.
(4) Standards for water use efficiency effective July 1, ((1990))
2016.
(a) Standards for waterclosets. The ((guideline)) requirement for
maximum water use allowed in gallons per flush (gpf) for any of the
following waterclosets is the following:

Tank-type toilets . . . . . . . . . . . . ((3.5))
1.28 gpf.

Flushometer((-valve)) nontank toilets . . . . . . . . . . . . ((3.5)) 1.6
gpf.

((Flushometer-tank toilets . . . . . . . . . . . . 3.5 gpf.

Electromechanical hydraulic toilets . . . . . . . . . . . . 3.5 gpf.))

(b) Standard for urinals. The ((guideline)) requirement for
maximum water use allowed for any urinal is ((3.0)) 0.5 gallons per
flush.
(c) ((Standard for showerheads. The guideline for maximum water
use allowed for any showerhead is 3.0 gallons per minute.
(d))) Standard for faucets. The ((guideline)) requirement for
maximum water use allowed in gallons per minute (gpm) for any of the
following faucets and replacement aerators is the following:

((Bathroom faucets . . . . . . . . . . . . 3.0 gpm.))

Lavatory faucets . . . . . . . . . . . . ((3.0)) 0.5
gpm.

Kitchen faucets . . . . . . . . . . . . ((3.0)) 2.2
gpm.

Replacement aerators . . . . . . . . . . . . ((3.0)) 2.2
gpm.

(((e))) (d) Except where designed and installed for use by ((the
physically handicapped)) individuals with disabilities, lavatory
faucets located in restrooms intended for use by the general public
must be equipped with a metering valve designed to close by spring or
water pressure when left unattended (self-closing). Metered faucets
must deliver a maximum of 0.26 gallons per cycle.
(((f))) (e) No urinal or watercloset that operates on a continuous
flow or continuous flush basis shall be permitted.
(f) The state building code council shall allow exceptions for
alternate technologies, such as composting and incineration toilets,
and shall allow exceptions to account for any drain line carry
deficiency conditions.
(5) Standards for water use efficiency effective July 1, ((1993))
2019.
(((a))) Standards for waterclosets. The ((guideline)) requirement
for maximum water use allowed in gallons per flush (gpf) for any of the
following waterclosets is the following:

((Tank-type toilets . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.6 gpf.))

Flushometer((-tank)) toilets . . . . . . . . . . . . ((1.6))
1.28 gpf.

((Electromechanical hydraulic toilets . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.6 gpf.

(b) Standards for urinals. The guideline for maximum water use
allowed for any urinal is 1.0 gallons per flush.
(c) Standards for showerheads. The guideline for maximum water use
allowed for any showerhead is 2.5 gallons per minute.
(d) Standards for faucets. The guideline for maximum water use
allowed in gallons per minute for any of the following faucets and
replacement aerators is the following:

Bathroom faucets . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.5 gpm.

Lavatory faucets . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.5 gpm.

Kitchen faucets . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.5 gpm.

Replacement aerators . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.5 gpm.

(e) Except where designed and installed for use by the physically
handicapped, lavatory faucets located in restrooms intended for use by
the general public must be equipped with a metering valve designed to
close by water pressure when unattended (self-closing).
(f) No urinal or watercloset that operates on a continuous flow or
continuous basis shall be permitted.))
(6) The building code council shall ((establish methods and
procedures for testing and identifying fixtures that meet the standards
established in subsection (5) of this section. The council shall use
the testing standards designated as American national standards,
written under American national standards institute procedures or other
widely recognized national testing standards. The council shall either
review test results from independent testing laboratories that are
submitted by manufacturers of plumbing fixtures or accept data
submitted to and evaluated by the international association of plumbing
and mechanical officials. The council shall publish and widely
distribute a current list of fixtures that meet the standards
established in subsection (5) of this section.
(7) The building code council shall adopt rules for marking and
labeling fixtures meeting the standards established in subsection (5)
of this section.
(8) This section shall not apply to fixtures installed before July
28, 1991, that are removed and relocated to another room or area of the
same building after July 28, 1991, nor shall it apply to fixtures, as
determined by the council, that in order to perform a specialized
function, cannot meet the standards specified in this section))
recognize conformity assessment bodies conforming to ISO/IEC 17065
requirements for bodies certifying products, processes, and services
for the testing and listing of fixtures and fittings as adopted in the
state building code and the standards as established in subsections
(1), (4), and (5) of this section.
(((9))) (7) The water conservation performance standards shall
supersede all local government codes. After July 1, ((1990)) 2016,
cities, towns, and counties shall not amend the code revisions and
standards established under subsection (4) or (5) of this section.

--- END ---