BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the lack of a
permanent address is a barrier to employment for some people who
experience homelessness in this state. The legislature intends to
create the homeless status certification pilot program to study an
approach that facilitates access to employment for persons who lack a
permanent address due to their homeless condition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.185C
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department must establish a pilot program to provide a
certification of homeless status for persons who may need a physical or
mailing address for purposes of employment. The department must choose
one county within which to implement the program, based on the support
of local homeless housing and service providers, community leaders, and
businesses willing to partner with the department. The program may be
implemented countywide, or within a city or other specific region of
the county.
(2) To develop this program, the department must:
(a) Establish a homeless status form that requires sufficient
information to verify a person's homeless status and to provide the
address and location of a homeless housing or service provider to be
used as the person's own address;
(b) Develop a procedure for collecting and maintaining the
information provided on the homeless status forms, either centrally
through the department or through one or more local homeless housing or
service providers participating in the program;
(c) Convene regular meetings with homeless housing and service
providers, community leaders, homeless persons, and businesses
interested in implementing the program. The initial meeting should
take place no later than December 31, 2014, and should include an
agenda for creating the program and defining the responsibilities of
the persons, entities, and organizations that are interested in
implementing the program; and
(d) Gather and analyze data on the different phases of the program
implementation.
(3) By December 1, 2016, the department must submit a report to the
appropriate legislative committees that includes the number of persons
who filed a homeless status form, the number of persons who obtained
employment with use of the certification, the involvement of partners
within the community in implementing the program, and an evaluation and
recommendation of the opportunities and impediments for expanding the
program statewide. The evaluation and recommendation should include
input from statewide homeless housing and service provider networks and
business associations.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Nothing in this act may be construed to
create an entitlement to services or to create judicial authority to
order the provision of services to any person if the services are
unavailable or sufficient funding has not been appropriated for this
program.

--- END ---