BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must issue a temporary homeless identification
card, containing a picture, fingerprint, current address, and signature
of the applicant, if the applicant:
(a) Does not have a valid Washington driver's license or
identicard; and
(b) Proves his or her identity and homeless status as provided in
this section.
(2) The temporary homeless identification card must be distinctly
designed so that it will not be confused with an official Washington
driver's license or identicard. The card expires one year after it is
issued, except that the department may renew it for an additional six
months upon a showing of the applicant's continued homeless status.
(3) As proof of identity, the applicant must:
(a) Meet the requirements under RCW 46.20.035, or provide the
following:
(i) A birth certificate;
(ii) A social security number; and
(iii) A fingerprint; and
(b) Verify his or her status as a homeless person, as defined in
RCW 43.185C.010, including:
(i) A certification of temporary homeless status issued by the
department of commerce; or
(ii) A written declaration by a temporary housing or homeless
service provider in the state, affirming:
(A) The applicant's current homeless status;
(B) The name and a brief physical description of the applicant; and
(C) The provider's physical and mailing address to be used as the
applicant's own address.
(4) A person unable to provide a birth certificate or social
security number as specified in subsection (3) of this section may
request that the department review other available documentation in
order to ascertain identity. The department may waive the birth
certificate and social security number requirements if it finds that
other documentation clearly establishes the identity of the applicant.
(5) The department may cancel a temporary homeless identification
card if:
(a) The card is used in violation of RCW 46.20.0921; or
(b) The department determines that the holder is no longer
homeless.
(6) If a temporary housing or homeless service provider determines
that the holder is no longer homeless, it must notify the department
and the department may cancel the temporary homeless identification
card.
(7) The department may not charge any fee to the applicant for
issuing a temporary homeless identification card. The department may
adopt any rules as are necessary to carry out this subsection.
(8) A temporary homeless identification card is only valid as
documentation for employment purposes and is not intended to be a valid
state identification card for any other purpose or subject to
compliance with the REAL ID Act of 2005, P.L. 109-13.

--- END ---