BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that alternative
fuel vehicles cost more than comparable models of conventional fuel
vehicles. The legislature further finds the higher cost of alternative
fuel vehicles incentivize consumers to purchase comparable models of
conventional fuel vehicles. The legislature further finds the federal
government provides federal tax credits and, under current law,
Washington provides a retail sales and use tax exemption on the
purchase of new and qualifying used alternative fuel vehicles to
incentivize consumers to purchase alternative fuel vehicles. The
legislature further finds incentivizing consumers to purchase
alternative fuel vehicles is an important step to reduce vehicle
greenhouse gas emissions.
(2)(a) This subsection is the tax preference performance statement
for the alternative fuel vehicle tax exemptions provided in RCW
82.08.809 and 82.12.809. The performance statement is only intended to
be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not
intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to
determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.
(b) The legislature categorizes the tax preference as one intended
to induce certain designated behavior by taxpayers and to improve
industry competitiveness indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2) (a) and (b).
(c) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to
provide a sales and use tax exemption to increase sales of alternative
fuel vehicles by ten percent by 2023 and reduce the difference of
average cost between comparable models of alternative fuel vehicles and
conventional fuel vehicles.
(d) To measure the effectiveness of the exemption provided in this
act in achieving the specific public policy objective described in (c)
of this subsection, the joint legislative audit and review committee
must, at minimum, evaluate the following:
(i) Changes in number of alternative fuel vehicles registered in
Washington;
(ii) Changes in the cost of alternative fuel vehicles;
(iii) Changes in the difference of average cost between comparable
models of alternative fuel vehicles and conventional fuel vehicles.
(e)(i) The department of licensing and department of revenue must
provide data needed for the joint legislative audit and review
committee analysis in (d) of this subsection.
(ii) In addition to the data source described under (e)(i) of this
subsection, the joint legislative audit and review committee may use
any other data it deems necessary in performing the evaluation under
(d) of this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.809 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 11 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
new passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger
vehicles, which are exclusively powered by a clean alternative fuel.
(b) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
qualifying used passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty
passenger vehicles, which were modified after their initial purchase,
with an EPA certified conversion to be exclusively powered by a clean
alternative fuel. "Qualifying used passenger cars, light duty trucks,
and medium duty passenger vehicles" means vehicles that:
(i) Are part of a fleet of at least five vehicles, all owned by the
same person;
(ii) Have an odometer reading of less than thirty thousand miles;
(iii) Are less than two years past their original date of
manufacture; and
(iv) Are being sold for the first time after modification.
(2) The seller must keep records necessary for the department to
verify eligibility under this section.
(3) For sellers who electronically file their taxes, the department
must provide a separate tax reporting line for exemption amounts
claimed under this section.
(4) As used in this section, "clean alternative fuel" means natural
gas, propane, hydrogen, or electricity, when used as a fuel in a motor
vehicle that meets the California motor vehicle emission standards in
Title 13 of the California code of regulations, effective January 1,
2005, and the rules of the Washington state department of ecology.
(((4))) (5) This section expires July 1, ((2015)) 2023.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.809 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 11 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Until July 1, ((2015)) 2023, the provisions of this chapter
do not apply in respect to the use of new passenger cars, light duty
trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles, which are exclusively
powered by a clean alternative fuel.
(b) Until July 1, ((2015)) 2023, the provisions of this chapter do
not apply to the use of qualifying used passenger cars, light duty
trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles, which were modified after
their initial purchase with an EPA certified conversion to be
exclusively powered by a clean alternative fuel. As used in this
subsection, "qualifying used passenger cars, light duty trucks, and
medium duty passenger vehicles" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.08.809.
(2) "Clean alternative fuel" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 82.08.809.
(3) A taxpayer is not liable for the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020
on the use, on or after July 1, ((2015)) 2023, of a passenger car,
light duty truck, or medium duty passenger vehicle exclusively powered
by a clean alternative fuel, if the taxpayer used such vehicle in this
state before July 1, ((2015)) 2023, and the use was exempt under this
section from the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020.

--- END ---