BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds it is essential that
the department of corrections use public resources effectively in order
to carry out the department's mission of improving public safety and
ensuring staff members are safe in their work environments. The
legislature further finds that an independent, comprehensive, and
objective review of staffing levels and staff safety measures at the
department of corrections is critical to evaluating potential needs the
legislature should address to best assist the department in achieving
its mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The office of financial management shall
contract with consultants with the requisite experience and expertise
to perform an evidence-based study and progress report of staffing
ratios and safety assessments in department of corrections facilities.
The office of financial management and the consultants shall consult
with the department of corrections, stakeholder groups that represent
the people who are served in these institutions, labor organizations
that represent employees who work in these institutions, and other
persons or entities with experience and expertise in the areas being
studied.
(2) For the purposes of the study, "department of corrections
facilities" means facilities operated by the department of corrections
to house persons convicted of a criminal offense who are in full
confinement.
(3) In conducting the study, consultants shall consider the
following factors as appropriate:
(a) The number and type of staff at each of the department of
corrections facilities;
(b) The adequacy and costs of current staffing at department of
corrections facilities;
(c) The need, availability, and costs of improving staffing at
department of corrections facilities;
(d) The geographic factors associated with staffing department of
corrections facilities, including the impact of staffing on the local
economy and the economic impact of reducing or increasing staffing at
department of corrections facilities;
(e) The safety of employees at department of corrections
facilities, including all reported incidents of all assault or other
crimes committed against such employees;
(f) A detailed review of the adequacy and costs of all current
security-related policies, procedures, and measures at department of
corrections facilities and the need, availability, and costs of
improving such policies, procedures, and measures; and
(g) The implementation and consistent application of policy
recommendations resulting from the national institute of corrections
review of prison safety and the statewide security advisory committee
regarding security issues in department of corrections facilities, as
provided for in chapter 252, Laws of 2011.
(4) The office of financial management shall submit a:
(a) Final report to the governor, the house of representatives and
senate ways and means committees, the senate human services and
corrections committee, and the house of representatives public safety
committee by December 1, 2014. The report shall provide any
recommendations and a plan, if necessary, to improve staffing ratios
and employee safety at department of corrections facilities. The
report shall include an individual assessment of staffing and safety
measures at each department of corrections facility, and any costs or
savings associated with each recommendation and plan;
(b) Report on the progress by the department of corrections of
implementing the recommendations and plan to the same committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2015.
(5) This section expires December 1, 2015.

--- END ---