BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.04.005 and 2007 c 480 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Additional fire hazard" means a condition existing on any land
in the state:
(a) Covered wholly or in part by forest debris which is likely to
further the spread of fire and thereby endanger life or property; or
(b) When, due to the effects of disturbance agents, broken, down,
dead, or dying trees exist on forest land in sufficient quantity to be
likely to further the spread of fire within areas covered by a forest
health hazard warning or order issued by the commissioner of public
lands under RCW 76.06.180. The term "additional fire hazard" does not
include green trees or snags left standing in upland or riparian areas
under the provisions of RCW 76.04.465 or chapter 76.09 RCW.
(2) "Closed season" means the period between April 15th and October
15th, unless the department designates different dates because of
prevailing fire weather conditions.
(3) "Department" means the department of natural resources, or its
authorized representatives, as defined in chapter 43.30 RCW.
(4) "Department protected lands" means all lands subject to the
forest protection assessment under RCW 76.04.610 or covered under
contract or agreement pursuant to RCW 76.04.135 by the department.
(5) "Disturbance agent" means those forces that damage or kill
significant numbers of forest trees, such as insects, diseases, wind
storms, ice storms, and fires.
(6) "Emergency fire costs" means those costs incurred or approved
by the department for emergency forest fire suppression, including the
employment of personnel, rental of equipment, and purchase of supplies
over and above costs regularly budgeted and provided for nonemergency
fire expenses for the biennium in which the costs occur.
(7) "Forest debris" includes forest slash, chips, and any other
vegetative residue resulting from activities on forest land.
(8) "Forest fire service" includes all wardens, rangers, and other
persons employed especially for preventing or fighting forest fires.
(9) "Forest land" means any unimproved lands which have enough
trees, standing or down, or flammable material, to constitute in the
judgment of the department, a fire menace to life or property.
Sagebrush and grass areas east of the summit of the Cascade mountains
may be considered forest lands when such areas are adjacent to or
intermingled with areas supporting tree growth. Forest land, for
protection purposes, does not include structures.
(10) "Forest landowner," "owner of forest land," "landowner," or
"owner" means the owner or the person in possession of any public or
private forest land.
(11) "Forest material" means forest slash, chips, timber, standing
or down, or other vegetation.
(12) "Landowner operation" means every activity, and supporting
activities, of a forest landowner and the landowner's agents,
employees, or independent contractors or permittees in the management
and use of forest land subject to the forest protection assessment
under RCW 76.04.610 for the primary benefit of the owner. The term
includes, but is not limited to, the growing and harvesting of forest
products, the development of transportation systems, the utilization of
minerals or other natural resources, and the clearing of land. The
term does not include recreational and/or residential activities not
associated with these enumerated activities.
(13) "Participating landowner" means an owner of forest land whose
land is subject to the forest protection assessment under RCW
76.04.610.
(14) "Slash" means organic forest debris such as tree tops, limbs,
brush, and other dead flammable material remaining on forest land as a
result of a landowner operation.
(15) "Slash burning" means the planned and controlled burning of
forest debris on forest lands by broadcast burning, underburning, pile
burning, or other means, for the purposes of silviculture, hazard
abatement, or reduction and prevention or elimination of a fire hazard.
(16) "Suppression" means all activities involved in the containment
and control of forest fires, including the patrolling thereof until
such fires are extinguished or considered by the department to pose no
further threat to life or property.
(17) "Unimproved lands" means those lands that will support grass,
brush and tree growth, or other flammable material when such lands are
not cleared or cultivated and, in the opinion of the department, are a
fire menace to life and property.
(18) "Exploding target" means a device:
(a) Designed for use or used as a target for ammunition or other
projectiles;
(b) Consisting of a flammable substance or combination of
substances; and
(c) Capable of exploding when struck by ammunition or other
projectiles.
(19) "Incendiary ammunition" means ammunition that is designed to
ignite or explode upon impact with or penetration of a target or
designed to trace its course in the air with a trail of smoke, chemical
incandescence, or fire.
(20) "Sky lantern" means an unmanned self-contained luminary device
that uses heated air produced by an open flame or produced by another
source to become or remain airborne.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.04.455 and 1986 c 100 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful during the closed season for any person to
((throw away)):
(a) Discard any lighted tobacco, cigars, cigarettes, matches,
fireworks, charcoal, or other lighted material ((or to)), discharge any
((tracer or)) incendiary ammunition ((in)), release a sky lantern, or
detonate an exploding target on or over any forest, brush, range, or
grain areas((.
(2) It is unlawful during the closed season for any individual
to)); or
(b) Smoke any flammable material when in forest or brush areas
except on roads, cleared landings, gravel pits, or any similar area
free of flammable material.
(((3))) (2) It is unlawful outside of the closed season for any
person to discharge any incendiary ammunition, release a sky lantern,
or detonate an exploding target on or over those lands identified under
subsection (1)(a) of this section where the person:
(a) Does not own or have lawful possession and control of the land
in question; and
(b) Did not receive prior written permission for the activity from
a person who owns or has lawful possession and control of the land in
question.
(3) Every conveyance operated through or above forest, range,
brush, or grain areas ((shall)) must be equipped in each compartment
with a suitable receptacle for the disposition of lighted tobacco,
cigars, cigarettes, matches, or other flammable material.
(4) Every person operating a public conveyance through or above
forest, range, brush, or grain areas shall post a copy of this section
in a conspicuous place within the smoking compartment of the
conveyance; and every person operating a saw mill or a logging camp in
any such areas shall post a copy of this section in a conspicuous place
upon the ground or buildings of the milling or logging operation.

--- END ---