BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that too many students
at all income levels are leaving higher education programs with high
levels of debt. The legislature recognizes that a financial aid
program that offers loans with repayments based on a student's income
would reduce the burden of debt.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.97.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 174 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The Washington advance higher education loan program is created
as a pilot program. The program is created for the following purposes:
(a) To assist students in need of additional low-cost student loans
and related loan benefits; and
(b) To meet the state's need for individuals with higher education
degrees and certificates that are in demand by employers, such as in
the fields of science, including health science, technology,
engineering, and math.
(2) The program shall be administered by the office. In
administering the program, the office ((must)) has the following powers
and duties:
(a) ((Periodically assess the needs and target the benefits to
selected students;
(b) Devise a program to address the following issues related to
loans:
(i) Issuance of low-interest educational loans;
(ii) Determining loan repayment obligations and options;
(iii) Borrowing educational loans at low interest rates;
(iv) Developing conditional loans that can be forgiven in exchange
for service; and
(v) Creating an emergency loan fund to help students until other
state and federal long-term financing can be secured;
(c) Accept public and private contributions;
(d) Publicize the program; and
(e) Work with public and private colleges and universities, the
state board for community and technical colleges, the workforce
training and education coordinating board, and with students, to
conduct periodic assessment of program needs. The office may also
consult with other groups and individuals as needed)) Design and
implement a low interest educational loan program with the following
elements:
(i) An interest rate that is less than federal student loan options
for higher education students;
(ii) Loan repayment obligations that take total loan debt and
family size into consideration;
(iii) Loan repayments that do not commence until six months after
a student has completed his or her degree or certificate, or six months
after leaving his or her program in cases where a student leaves before
completing a degree or certificate;
(b) Define other loan terms including fees and deferments;
(c) Screen and select eligible students to receive the loan;
(d) Collect and manage repayment from students who do not meet
their obligations under this chapter;
(e) Exercise discretion to revise repayment obligations in certain
cases such as in cases of economic hardship; and
(f) Adopt necessary rules.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.97.020 and 2012 c 229 s 561 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Eligible student" means a student who meets the criteria in
section 4 of this act.
(2) "Institution of higher education" means a college or university
in the state of Washington that is accredited by an accrediting
association recognized as such by rule of the student achievement
council.
(((2))) (3) "Office" means the office of student financial
assistance.
(((3))) (4) "Program" means the Washington advance higher education
loan program.
(((4))) (5) "Resident student" has the definition in RCW
28B.15.012(2) (a) through (((d))) (e).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.97 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An "eligible student" is a student who satisfies all of the
following criteria:
(a) Is a resident student;
(b) Can demonstrate financial need to access the loan in order to
enroll in or complete his or her higher education degree or certificate
program; and
(c) Is enrolled in one of the following programs:
(i) Any computer science or engineering baccalaureate degree or
applied baccalaureate degree offered by an institution of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 or independent, nonprofit
baccalaureate degree-granting institution in the state;
(ii) A program related to science, including health science,
technology, engineering, or math at Washington State University in
Vancouver, Clark College, or Heritage University;
(iii) An aerospace-related program at Everett Community College;
(iv) The MEDEX program at the University of Washington in Spokane;
(v) The doctor of osteopathic medicine program at Pacific Northwest
University of Health Sciences; or
(vi) Programs that prepare students for the following licensed
mental health professions: Mental health counselor, chemical
dependency professional, social worker, psychologist and certified
counselor offered by Heritage University, Washington State University
in Vancouver, the University of Washington in Spokane, Bellevue
College, Clark College, Everett Community College, or Pierce College.
(2) To remain an eligible student and receive continuing
disbursements under the program, a participant must be considered by
the institution of higher education to be making satisfactory progress.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28B.97 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The office, with the collaboration of participating
institutions and programs, shall submit an annual report by December
1st regarding the program to the governor and to the appropriate
committees of the legislature.
(2) The annual report shall describe the design and implementation
of the program, and shall include the following:
(a) The number of applicants for loans and their income levels at
the time of application;
(b) The number of participants in the program and their income
levels at the time of application;
(c) The number of participants in the program who complete a higher
education program;
(d) The number of participants in the program who are placed in
employment and their earnings three quarters after completion;
(e) The nature of that employment, including:
(i) The type of job; and
(ii) Whether the job is full-time, part-time, or temporary;
(f) Demographic profiles of applicants for loans and participants
in the program; and
(g) An estimate of when the program will become self-sustaining.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28B.97 RCW
to read as follows:
The office may award Washington advance higher education loans to
eligible students from the funds available in the Washington advance
higher education loan account created in section 7 of this act. The
amount of the student loan awarded an individual may not exceed tuition
and fees for the program of study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28B.97 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington advance higher education loan account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. No appropriation is required
for expenditures of funds from the account for Washington advance
higher education loan program student loans. An appropriation is
required for expenditures of funds from the account for costs
associated with program administration by the office. The account is
not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) The office shall deposit into the account all moneys received
for the program. The account shall become self-sustaining after a
sufficient number of years of program operation and consist of moneys
received for the program by the office, and receipts from participant
repayments, including principal and interest.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for student
loans to participants in the program established by this chapter and
costs associated with program administration by the office.
(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the
authorization of the office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28B.97 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter expires July 1, 2020.

--- END ---