BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.250.010 and 2007 c 253 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Athlete" means a person who participates in exercise,
recreation, sport, or games requiring physical strength,
range-of-motion, flexibility, body awareness and control, speed,
stamina, or agility, and the exercise, recreation, sports, or games are
of a type conducted in association with an educational institution or
professional, amateur, or recreational sports club or organization.
(2) "Athletic injury" means an injury or condition sustained by an
athlete that affects the person's participation or performance in
exercise, recreation, sport, or games and the injury or condition is
within the professional preparation and education of an athletic
trainer.
(3) "Athletic trainer" means a person who is licensed under this
chapter. An athletic trainer can practice athletic training through
the consultation, referral, or guidelines of a licensed health care
provider working within their scope of practice.
(4)(a) "Athletic training" means the application of the following
principles and methods as provided by a licensed athletic trainer:
(i) Risk management and prevention of athletic injuries through
preactivity screening and evaluation, educational programs, physical
conditioning and reconditioning programs, application of commercial
products, use of protective equipment, promotion of healthy behaviors,
and reduction of environmental risks;
(ii) Recognition, evaluation, and assessment of athletic injuries
by obtaining a history of the athletic injury, inspection and palpation
of the injured part and associated structures, and performance of
specific testing techniques related to stability and function to
determine the extent of an injury;
(iii) Immediate care of athletic injuries, including emergency
medical situations through the application of first-aid and emergency
procedures and techniques for nonlife-threatening or life-threatening
athletic injuries;
(iv) Treatment, rehabilitation, and reconditioning of athletic
injuries through the application of physical agents and modalities,
therapeutic activities and exercise, standard reassessment techniques
and procedures, commercial products, and educational programs, in
accordance with guidelines established with a licensed health care
provider as provided in RCW 18.250.070; ((and))
(v) Treatment, rehabilitation, and reconditioning of work-related
injuries through the application of physical agents and modalities,
therapeutic activities and exercise, standard reassessment techniques
and procedures, commercial products, and educational programs, under
the direct supervision of and in accordance with a plan of care for an
individual worker established by a provider authorized to provide
physical medicine and rehabilitation services for injured workers; and
(vi) Referral of an athlete to an appropriately licensed health
care provider if the athletic injury requires further definitive care
or the injury or condition is outside an athletic trainer's scope of
practice, in accordance with RCW 18.250.070.
(b) "Athletic training" does not include:
(i) The use of spinal adjustment or manipulative mobilization of
the spine and its immediate articulations;
(ii) Orthotic or prosthetic services with the exception of
evaluation, measurement, fitting, and adjustment of temporary,
prefabricated or direct-formed orthosis as defined in chapter 18.200
RCW;
(iii) The practice of occupational therapy as defined in chapter
18.59 RCW;
(iv) The practice of ((acupuncture)) East Asian medicine as defined
in chapter 18.06 RCW;
(v) Any medical diagnosis; and
(vi) Prescribing legend drugs or controlled substances, or surgery.
(5) "Committee" means the athletic training advisory committee.
(6) "Department" means the department of health.
(7) "Licensed health care provider" means a physician, physician
assistant, osteopathic physician, osteopathic physician assistant,
advanced registered nurse practitioner, naturopath, physical therapist,
chiropractor, dentist, massage practitioner, acupuncturist,
occupational therapist, or podiatric physician and surgeon.
(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.250.020 and 2007 c 253 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the
secretary may:
(a) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to
implement this chapter;
(b) Establish all license, examination, and renewal fees in
accordance with RCW 43.70.250;
(c) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(d) Establish administrative procedures, administrative
requirements, and fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
All fees collected under this section must be credited to the health
professions account as required under RCW 43.70.320;
(e) Develop and administer, or approve, or both, examinations to
applicants for a license under this chapter;
(f) Establish continuing education requirements by rule;
(g) Issue a license to any applicant who has met the education,
training, and examination requirements for licensure and deny a license
to applicants who do not meet the minimum qualifications for licensure.
However, denial of licenses based on unprofessional conduct or impaired
practice is governed by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130
RCW;
(((g))) (h) In consultation with the committee, approve
examinations prepared or administered by private testing agencies or
organizations for use by an applicant in meeting the licensing
requirements under RCW 18.250.060;
(((h))) (i) Determine which states have credentialing requirements
substantially equivalent to those of this state, and issue licenses to
individuals credentialed in those states that have successfully
fulfilled the requirements of RCW 18.250.080;
(((i))) (j) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff
as needed to implement and administer this chapter;
(((j))) (k) Maintain the official department record of all
applicants and licensees; and
(((k))) (l) Establish requirements and procedures for an inactive
license.
(2) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the
discipline of licensees under this chapter.

--- END ---