BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that members of the
armed forces and armed forces reserves receive high quality training
during the course of their military service. Much of this training is
recognized as equivalent to courses and credits from institutions of
higher education. Since 1945, the American council on education has
thoroughly examined all forms of military training and made
recommendations regarding the awarding of equivalent college credit.
The legislature intends also to recognize military training that
pertains to an individual's current assignment for purposes of the
state salary allocation schedule for certificated instructional staff.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.415.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 18 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Certificated personnel shall receive for each ten clock hours
of approved in-service training attended the equivalent of a one credit
college quarter course on the salary schedule developed by the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.
(2) Certificated personnel shall receive for each ten clock hours
of approved continuing education earned, as continuing education is
defined by rule adopted by the professional educator standards board,
the equivalent of a one credit college quarter course on the salary
schedule developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee.
(3) Certificated personnel shall receive for each forty clock hours
of participation in an approved internship with a business, an
industry, or government, as an internship is defined by rule of the
professional educator standards board in accordance with RCW
28A.415.025, the equivalent of a one credit college quarter course on
the salary schedule developed by the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee.
(4) An approved in-service training program shall be a program
approved by a school district board of directors, which meet standards
adopted by the professional educator standards board, and the
development of said program has been participated in by an in-service
training task force whose membership is the same as provided under RCW
28A.415.040, or a program offered by an education agency approved to
provide in-service for the purposes of continuing education as provided
for under rules adopted by the professional educator standards board,
or both.
(5) Clock hours eligible for application to the salary schedule
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee as described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
shall be those hours acquired after August 31, 1987. Clock hours
eligible for application to the salary schedule as described in
subsection (3) of this section shall be those hours acquired after
December 31, 1995.
(6) In-service training or continuing education in first peoples'
language, culture, or oral tribal traditions provided by a sovereign
tribal government participating in the Washington state first peoples'
language, culture, and oral tribal traditions teacher certification
program authorized under RCW 28A.410.045 shall be considered approved
in-service training or approved continuing education under this section
and RCW 28A.415.023.
(7) ((For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, application of
credits or credit equivalents earned under this section after October
1, 2010, to the salary schedule developed by the legislative evaluation
and accountability program committee is subject to any conditions or
limitations contained in the omnibus operating appropriations act))
Certificated personnel shall receive credits on the salary schedule
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee for military training as follows:
(a) The content of the training must pertain to the individual's
current assignment or expected assignment for the subsequent school
year;
(b) The training is documented on a military transcript or similar
form issued by the department of defense or a branch of the United
States armed forces;
(c) The number of college quarter credits recognized for the
training shall be as recommended by the military guide of the American
council on education;
(d) The training may have occurred either before or after the
awarding of the individual's first bachelor's degree; and
(e) The same training may not be used for both credits on the
salary schedule and credits applied toward an academic degree awarded
to the individual.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.415.023 and 2012 c 35 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Credits earned by certificated instructional staff after
September 1, 1995, shall be eligible for application to the salary
schedule developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee only if the course content:
(a) Is consistent with a school-based plan for mastery of student
learning goals as referenced in RCW 28A.655.110, the annual school
performance report, for the school in which the individual is assigned;
(b) Pertains to the individual's current assignment or expected
assignment for the subsequent school year;
(c) Is necessary to obtain an endorsement as prescribed by the
Washington professional educator standards board;
(d) Is specifically required to obtain advanced levels of
certification;
(e) Is included in a college or university degree program that
pertains to the individual's current assignment, or potential future
assignment, as a certified instructional staff;
(f) Addresses research-based assessment and instructional
strategies for students with dyslexia, dysgraphia, and language
disabilities when addressing learning goal one under RCW 28A.150.210,
as applicable and appropriate for individual certificated instructional
staff; or
(g) Pertains to the revised teacher evaluation system under RCW
28A.405.100, including the professional development training provided
in RCW 28A.405.106.
(2) Credits earned for military training as provided under RCW
28A.415.020 must pertain to the individual's current assignment or
expected assignment for the subsequent school year.
(3) For the purpose of this section, "credits" mean college quarter
hour credits and equivalent credits for approved in-service, approved
continuing education, military training, or approved internship hours
computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020.
(((3))) (4) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt
rules and standards consistent with the limits established by this
section for certificated instructional staff.
(((4) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, application of
credits or credit equivalents earned under this section after October
1, 2010, to the salary schedule developed by the legislative evaluation
and accountability program committee is subject to any conditions or
limitations contained in the omnibus operating appropriations act.))

--- END ---