BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.13.270 and 2007 c 285 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any territory is annexed to a city or town which is
part of a road district of the county and road district taxes have been
levied but not collected on any property within the annexed territory,
the same shall when collected by the county treasurer be paid to the
city or town and by the city or town placed in the city or town street
fund; except that road district taxes that are delinquent before the
date of annexation shall be paid to the county and placed in the county
road fund.
(2) When territory that is part of a fire district is annexed to a
city or town, the following apply:
(a) Fire district taxes on annexed property that were levied, but
not collected, and were not delinquent at the time of the annexation
shall, when collected, be paid to the annexing city or town at times
required by the county, but no less frequently than by July 10th for
collections through June 30th and January 10th for collections through
December 31st following the annexation; and
(b) Fire district taxes on annexed property that were levied, but
not collected, and were delinquent at the time of the annexation and
the pro rata share of the current year levy budgeted for general
obligation debt, when collected, shall be paid to the fire district.
(3) When territory that is part of a library district is annexed to
a city or town, the following apply:
(a) Library district taxes on annexed property that were levied,
but not collected, and were not delinquent at the time of the
annexation shall, when collected, be paid to the annexing city or town
at times required by the county, but no less frequently than by July
10th for collections through June 30th and January 10th for collections
through December 31st following the annexation; and
(b) Library district taxes on annexed property that were levied,
but not collected, and were delinquent at the time of the annexation
and the pro rata share of the current year levy budgeted for general
obligation debt, when collected, shall be paid to the library district.
(4) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section do not apply to any
special assessments due in behalf of such property.
(5) If a city or town annexes property within a fire district or
library district while any general obligation bond secured by the
taxing authority of the district is outstanding, the bonded
indebtedness of the fire district or library district remains an
obligation of the taxable property annexed as if the annexation had not
occurred.
(6) For each annexation by a city or town, the city or town ((is
required to)) must provide notification, by certified mail or
electronic means, that includes a list of annexed parcel numbers((,))
and the street address to the county treasurer and assessor, to the
light and power businesses and gas distribution businesses, and to the
fire district and library district, as appropriate, at least ((thirty))
sixty days before the effective date of the annexation. The county
treasurer is only required to remit to the city or town those road
taxes, fire district taxes, and library district taxes collected
((thirty)) sixty days or more after receipt of the notification. The
light and power businesses and gas distribution businesses are only
required to remit to the city or town those utility taxes collected
sixty days or more after receipt of the notification.
(7)(a) In counties that do not have a boundary review board, the
city or town shall provide notification to the fire district or library
district of the jurisdiction's resolution approving the annexation.
The notification required under this subsection must:
(i) Be made by certified mail within seven days of the resolution
approving the annexation; and
(ii) Include a description of the annexed area.
(b) In counties that have a boundary review board, the city or town
shall provide notification of the proposed annexation to the fire
district or library district simultaneously when notice of the proposed
annexation is provided by the jurisdiction to the boundary review board
under RCW 36.93.090.
(8) The provisions of this section regarding (a) the transfer of
fire and library district property taxes and (b) city and town
notifications to fire and library districts do not apply if the city or
town has been annexed to and is within the fire or library district
when the city or town approves a resolution to annex unincorporated
county territory.
(9) An error or accidental omission by a city or town in the
transmitted annexation notice required under this section may be
corrected by the city or town by providing an amended notice to the
county treasurer and assessor, the light and power businesses, the gas
distribution businesses, and to the fire district and library district,
as appropriate. The recipient of the amended notice is only required
to remit applicable taxes to the city or town, in accordance with the
corrected information, sixty days after its receipt of the amended
notice.
(10) For purposes of this section, "electronic means" means an
electronic format agreed to by both sender and recipient that conveys
all applicable notification information.

Sec. 2 RCW 35A.14.801 and 2007 c 285 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any territory is annexed to a code city which is part
of a road district of the county and road district taxes have been
levied but not collected on any property within the annexed territory,
the same shall when collected by the county treasurer be paid to the
code city and by the city placed in the city street fund; except that
road district taxes that are delinquent before the date of annexation
shall be paid to the county and placed in the county road fund.
(2) When territory that is part of a fire district is annexed to a
code city, the following apply:
(a) Fire district taxes on annexed property that were levied, but
not collected, and were not delinquent at the time of the annexation
shall, when collected, be paid to the annexing code city at times
required by the county, but no less frequently than by July 10th for
collections through June 30th and January 10th for collections through
December 31st following the annexation; and
(b) Fire district taxes on annexed property that were levied, but
not collected, and were delinquent at the time of the annexation and
the pro rata share of the current year levy budgeted for general
obligation debt, when collected, shall be paid to the fire district.
(3) When territory that is part of a library district is annexed to
a code city, the following apply:
(a) Library district taxes on annexed property that were levied,
but not collected, and were not delinquent at the time of the
annexation shall, when collected, be paid to the annexing code city at
times required by the county, but no less frequently than by July 10th
for collections through June 30th and January 10th for collections
through December 31st following the annexation; and
(b) Library district taxes on annexed property that were levied,
but not collected, and were delinquent at the time of the annexation
and the pro rata share of the current year levy budgeted for general
obligation debt, when collected, shall be paid to the library district.
(4) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section do not apply to any
special assessments due in behalf of such property.
(5) If a code city annexes property within a fire district or
library district while any general obligation bond secured by the
taxing authority of the district is outstanding, the bonded
indebtedness of the fire district or library district remains an
obligation of the taxable property annexed as if the annexation had not
occurred.
(6) For each annexation by a code city, the code city ((is required
to)) must provide notification, by certified mail or electronic means,
that includes a list of annexed parcel numbers((,)) and the street
address to the county treasurer and assessor, to the light and power
businesses and gas distribution businesses, and to the fire district
and library district, as appropriate, at least ((thirty)) sixty days
before the effective date of the annexation. The county treasurer is
only required to remit to the code city those road taxes, fire district
taxes, and library district taxes collected ((thirty)) sixty or more
days after receipt of the notification. The light and power businesses
and gas distribution businesses are only required to remit to the city
or town those utility taxes collected sixty days or more after receipt
of the notification.
(7)(a) In counties that do not have a boundary review board, the
code city shall provide notification to the fire district or library
district of the jurisdiction's resolution approving the annexation.
The notification required under this subsection must:
(i) Be made by certified mail within seven days of the resolution
approving the annexation; and
(ii) Include a description of the annexed area.
(b) In counties that have a boundary review board, the code city
shall provide notification of the proposed annexation to the fire
district or library district simultaneously when notice of the proposed
annexation is provided by the jurisdiction to the boundary review board
under RCW 36.93.090.
(8) The provisions of this section regarding (a) the transfer of
fire and library district property taxes and (b) code city
notifications to fire and library districts do not apply if the code
city has been annexed to and is within the fire or library district
when the code city approves a resolution to annex unincorporated county
territory.
(9) An error or accidental omission by a code city in the
transmitted annexation notice required under this section may be
corrected by the city by providing an amended notice to the county
treasurer and assessor, the light and power businesses, the gas
distribution businesses, and to the fire district and library district,
as appropriate. The recipient of the amended notice is only required
to remit applicable taxes to the city, in accordance with the corrected
information, sixty days after its receipt of the amended notice.
(10) For purposes of this section, "electronic means" means an
electronic format agreed to by both sender and recipient that conveys
all applicable notification information.

--- END ---