BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.07.050 and 2003 c 84 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The authority may, from time to time, issue its special
obligation bonds in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter and
to enable the authority to exercise any of the powers granted to it in
this chapter. The bonds shall be issued pursuant to a bond resolution
or trust indenture and shall be payable solely out of the special fund
or funds created by the authority in the bond resolution or trust
indenture. The special fund or funds shall be funded in whole or in
part from moneys paid by one or more participants for whose benefit
such bonds were issued and from the sources, if any, described in RCW
28B.07.040(9) or from the proceeds of bonds issued by the authority for
the purpose of refunding any outstanding bonds of the authority.
(2) The bonds may be secured by:
(a) A first lien against any unexpended proceeds of the bonds;
(b) A first lien against moneys in the special fund or funds
created by the authority for their payment;
(c) A first or subordinate lien against the revenue and receipts of
the participant or participants which revenue is derived in whole or in
part from the project financed by the authority;
(d) A first or subordinate security interest against any real or
personal property, tangible or intangible, of the participant or
participants, including, but not limited to, the project financed by
the authority;
(e) Any other real or personal property, tangible or intangible; or
(f) Any combination of (a) through (e) of this subsection.
Any security interest created against the unexpended bond proceeds
and against the special funds created by the authority shall be
immediately valid and binding against the moneys and any securities in
which the moneys may be invested without authority or trustee
possession, and the security interest shall be prior to any party
having any competing claim against the moneys or securities, without
filing or recording under Article 9A of the Uniform Commercial Code,
Title 62A RCW, and regardless of whether the party has notice of the
security interest.
(3) The bonds may be issued as serial bonds or as term bonds or any
such combination. The bonds shall bear such date or dates; mature at
such time or times; bear interest at such rate or rates, either fixed
or variable; be payable at such time or times; be in such
denominations; be in such form, either coupon or registered, or both;
carry such registration privileges; be made transferable, exchangeable,
and interchangeable; be payable in lawful money of the United States of
America at such place or places; be subject to such terms of
redemption; and be sold at public or private sale, in such manner, at
such time, and at such price as the authority shall determine. The
bonds shall be executed by the manual or facsimile signatures of the
chairperson and the authority's duly-elected secretary or its executive
director, and by the trustee if the authority determines to use a
trustee. At least one signature shall be manually subscribed. Coupon
bonds shall have attached interest coupons bearing the facsimile
signatures of the chairperson and the secretary or the executive
director.
(4) Any bond resolution, trust indenture, or agreement with a
participant relating to bonds issued by the authority or the financing
or refinancing made available by the authority may contain provisions,
which may be made a part of the contract with the holders or owners of
the bonds to be issued, pertaining to the following, among other
matters: (a) The security interests granted by the participant to
secure repayment of any amounts financed and the performance by the
participant of its other obligations in the financing; (b) the security
interests granted to the holders or owners of the bonds to secure
repayment of the bonds; (c) rentals, fees, and other amounts to be
charged, and the sums to be raised in each year through such charges,
and the use, investment, and disposition of the sums; (d) the
segregation of reserves or sinking funds, and the regulation,
investment, and disposition thereof; (e) limitations on the uses of the
project; (f) limitations on the purposes to which, or the investments
in which, the proceeds of the sale of any issue of bonds may be
applied; (g) terms pertaining to the issuance of additional parity
bonds; (h) terms pertaining to the incurrence of parity debt; (i) the
refunding of outstanding bonds; (j) procedures, if any, by which the
terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated; (k)
acts or failures to act which constitute a default by the participant
or the authority in their respective obligations and the rights and
remedies in the event of a default; (l) the securing of bonds by a
pooling of leases whereby the authority may assign its rights, as
lessor, and pledge rents under two or more leases with two or more
participants, as lessees; (m) terms governing performance by the
trustee of its obligation; or (n) such other additional covenants,
agreements, and provisions as are deemed necessary, useful, or
convenient by the authority for the security of the holders of the
bonds.
(5) Bonds may be issued by the authority to refund other
outstanding authority bonds, at or prior to the maturity thereof, and
to pay any redemption premium with respect thereto. Bonds issued for
such refunding purposes may be combined with bonds issued for the
financing or refinancing of new projects. Pending the application of
the proceeds of the refunding bonds to the redemption of the bonds to
be redeemed, the authority may enter into an agreement or agreements
with a corporate trustee under RCW 28B.07.080 with respect to the
interim investment of the proceeds and the application of the proceeds
and the earnings on the proceeds to the payment of the principal of and
interest on, and the redemption of the bonds to be redeemed.
(6) All bonds and any interest coupons appertaining to the bonds
shall be negotiable instruments under Title 62A RCW.
(7) Neither the members of the authority, nor its employees or
agents, nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally
on the bonds or be subject to any personal liability or accountability
by reason of the issuance of the bonds.
(8) The authority may purchase its bonds with any of its funds
available for the purchase. The authority may hold, pledge, cancel, or
resell the bonds subject to and in accordance with agreements with
bondholders.
(9) At no time shall the total outstanding bonded indebtedness of
the authority exceed one billion five hundred million dollars.

--- END ---