BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.21B.300 and 2010 c 210 s 12 and 2010 c 84 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Any civil penalty provided in RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.95.315, 70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.46.270,
90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102 and chapter 90.76 RCW
shall be imposed by a notice in writing, either by certified mail with
return receipt requested or by personal service, to the person
incurring the penalty from the department or the local air authority,
describing the violation with reasonable particularity. For penalties
issued by local air authorities, within thirty days after the notice is
received, the person incurring the penalty may apply in writing to the
authority for the remission or mitigation of the penalty. Upon receipt
of the application, the authority may remit or mitigate the penalty
upon whatever terms the authority in its discretion deems proper. The
authority may ascertain the facts regarding all such applications in
such reasonable manner and under such rules as it may deem proper and
shall remit or mitigate the penalty only upon a demonstration of
extraordinary circumstances such as the presence of information or
factors not considered in setting the original penalty.
(2) Any penalty imposed under this section may be appealed to the
pollution control hearings board in accordance with this chapter if the
appeal is filed with the hearings board and served on the department or
authority thirty days after the date of receipt by the person penalized
of the notice imposing the penalty or thirty days after the date of
receipt of the notice of disposition by a local air authority of the
application for relief from penalty.
(3) A penalty shall become due and payable on the later of:
(a) Thirty days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty;
(b) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of disposition by a
local air authority on application for relief from penalty, if such an
application is made; or
(c) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of decision of the
hearings board if the penalty is appealed.
(4) If the amount of any penalty is not paid to the department
within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the attorney
general, upon request of the department, shall bring an action in the
name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston
county, or of any county in which the violator does business, to
recover the penalty. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the
authority within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the
authority may bring an action to recover the penalty in the superior
court of the county of the authority's main office or of any county in
which the violator does business. In these actions, the procedures and
rules of evidence shall be the same as in an ordinary civil action.
(5) All penalties recovered shall be paid into the state treasury
and credited to the general fund except those penalties imposed
pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, which shall be credited to the reclamation
account as provided in RCW 18.104.155(7), RCW 70.94.431, the
disposition of which shall be governed by that provision, RCW
70.105.080, which shall be credited to the ((hazardous waste control
and elimination)) state toxics control account created by RCW
((70.105.180)) 70.105D.070, RCW 90.56.330, which shall be credited to
the coastal protection fund created by RCW 90.48.390, and RCW
90.76.080, which shall be credited to the underground storage tank
account created by RCW 90.76.100.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.93.090 and 1998 c 257 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall ((design and the director shall)) adopt by
rule ((or regulation one or more types of litter receptacles which are
reasonably uniform as to size, shape, capacity and color, for wide and
extensive distribution throughout the public places of this state.
Each such litter receptacle shall bear an anti-litter symbol as
designed and adopted by the department. In addition,)) locations for
the placement of litter receptacles. All litter receptacles shall be
designed to attract attention and to encourage the depositing of
litter.
Litter receptacles ((of the uniform design)) shall be placed along
the public highways of this state and at all parks, campgrounds,
trailer parks, drive-in restaurants, gasoline service stations, tavern
parking lots, shopping centers, grocery store parking lots, parking
lots of major industrial firms, marinas, boat launching areas, boat
moorage and fueling stations, public and private piers, beaches and
bathing areas, and such other public places within this state as
specified by rule or regulation of the director adopted pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW. The number of such receptacles required to be
placed as specified ((herein)) in this section shall be determined by
a formula related to the need for such receptacles.
It shall be the responsibility of any person owning or operating
any establishment or public place in which litter receptacles ((of the
uniform design)) are required by this section to procure and place such
receptacles at their own expense on the premises in accord with rules
and regulations adopted by the department.
Any person, other than a political subdivision, government agency,
or municipality, who fails to place such litter receptacles on the
premises in the numbers required by rule or regulation of the
department, violating the provisions of this section or rules or
regulations adopted thereunder shall be subject to a fine of ten
dollars for each day of violation.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.94.037 and 1991 c 199 s 219 are each amended to
read as follows:
In areas subject to a state implementation plan, no state agency,
metropolitan planning organization, or local government shall approve
or fund a transportation plan, program, or project within or that
affects a nonattainment area unless a determination has been made that
the plan, program, or project conforms with the state implementation
plan for air quality as required by the federal clean air act.
Conformity determination shall be made by the state or local government
or metropolitan planning organization administering or developing the
plan, program, or project. ((No later than eighteen months after May
15, 1991,)) The director of the department ((of ecology)) and the
secretary of transportation, in consultation with other state,
regional, and local agencies as appropriate, shall adopt by rule
criteria and guidance for demonstrating and assuring conformity of
plans, programs, and projects that are wholly or partially federally
funded. A project with a scope that is limited to preservation or
maintenance, or both, shall be exempted from a conformity determination
requirement.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.95.290 and 1988 c 184 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The evaluation of the solid waste stream required in RCW
70.95.280 shall include the following elements:
(a) The department shall determine which management method for each
category of solid waste will have the least environmental impact; and
(b) The department shall evaluate the costs of various management
options for each category of solid waste, including a review of market
availability, and shall take into consideration the economic impact on
affected parties;
(c) Based on the results of (a) and (b) of this subsection, the
department shall determine the best management for each category of
solid waste. Different management methods for the same categories of
waste may be developed for different parts of the state.
(2) The department shall give priority to evaluating categories of
solid waste that, in relation to other categories of solid waste,
comprise a large volume of the solid waste stream or present a high
potential of harm to human health. ((At a minimum the following
categories of waste shall be evaluated:
(a) By January 1, 1989, yard waste and other biodegradable
materials, paper products, disposable diapers, and batteries; and
(b) By January 1, 1990, metals, glass, plastics, styrofoam or rigid
lightweight cellular polystyrene, and tires.))

Sec. 5 RCW 70.95C.220 and 2005 c 274 s 338 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may review a plan, executive summary, or an
annual progress report to determine whether the plan, executive
summary, or annual progress report is adequate pursuant to the rules
developed under this section and with the provisions of RCW 70.95C.200.
In determining the adequacy of any plan, executive summary, or annual
progress report, the department shall base its determination solely on
whether the plan, executive summary, or annual progress report is
complete and prepared in accordance with the provisions of RCW
70.95C.200.
(2) Plans developed under RCW 70.95C.200 shall be retained at the
facility of the hazardous substance user or hazardous waste generator
preparing a plan. The plan is not a public record under the public
records act, chapter 42.56 RCW. A user or generator required to
prepare a plan shall permit the director or a representative of the
director to review the plan to determine its adequacy. No visit made
by the director or a representative of the director to a facility for
the purposes of this subsection may be regarded as an inspection or
investigation, and no notices or citations may be issued, nor any civil
penalty assessed, upon such a visit.
(3) If a hazardous substance user or hazardous waste generator
fails to complete an adequate plan, executive summary, or annual
progress report, the department shall notify the user or generator of
the inadequacy, identifying specific deficiencies. For the purposes of
this section, a deficiency may include failure to develop a plan,
failure to submit an executive summary pursuant to the schedule
provided in RCW 70.95C.200(5), and failure to submit an annual progress
report pursuant to the rules developed under RCW 70.95C.200(6). The
department shall specify a reasonable time frame, of not less than
ninety days, within which the user or generator shall complete a
modified plan, executive summary, or annual progress report addressing
the specified deficiencies.
(4) If the department determines that a modified plan, executive
summary, or annual progress report is inadequate, the department may,
within its discretion, either require further modification or enter an
order pursuant to subsection (5)(a) of this section.
(5)(a) If, after having received a list of specified deficiencies
from the department, a hazardous substance user or hazardous waste
generator required to prepare a plan fails to complete modification of
a plan, executive summary, or annual progress report within the time
period specified by the department, the department may enter an order
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW finding the user or generator not in
compliance with the requirements of RCW 70.95C.200. When the order is
final, the department shall ((notify the department of revenue to))
charge a penalty fee. The penalty fee shall be the greater of one
thousand dollars or three times the amount of the user's or generator's
previous year's fee, in addition to the current year's fee. If no fee
was assessed the previous year, the penalty shall be the greater of one
thousand dollars or three times the amount of the current year's fee.
The penalty assessed under this subsection shall be collected each year
after the year for which the penalty was assessed until an adequate
plan or executive summary is completed.
(b) If a hazardous substance user or hazardous waste generator
required to prepare a plan fails to complete an adequate plan,
executive summary, or annual progress report after the department has
levied against the user or generator the penalty provided in (a) of
this subsection, the user or generator shall be required to pay a
surcharge to the department whenever the user or generator disposes of
a hazardous waste at any hazardous waste incinerator or hazardous waste
landfill facility located in Washington state, until a plan, executive
summary, or annual progress report is completed and determined to be
adequate by the department. The surcharge shall be equal to three
times the fee charged for disposal. The department shall furnish the
incinerator and landfill facilities in this state with a list of
environmental protection agency/state identification numbers of the
hazardous waste generators that are not in compliance with the
requirements of RCW 70.95C.200.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.95E.010 and 1995 c 207 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
((As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Dangerous waste" ((shall have the same definition as set
forth)) has the same meaning as "dangerous wastes" as defined in RCW
70.105.010(((5))) and ((shall)) includes those wastes designated as
dangerous by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 70.105 RCW.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "EPA/state identification number" means the number assigned by
the EPA (environmental protection agency) or by the department ((of
ecology)) to each generator and/or transporter and treatment, storage,
and/or disposal facility.
(4) "Extremely hazardous waste" ((shall have the same definition as
set forth)) has the same meaning as the term is defined in RCW
70.105.010(((6))) and shall specifically include those wastes
designated as extremely hazardous by rules adopted pursuant to chapter
70.105 RCW.
(5) "Fee" means the annual fees imposed under this chapter.
(6) "Generate" means any act or process which produces hazardous
waste or first causes a hazardous waste to become subject to
regulation.
(7) "Hazardous waste" means and includes all dangerous and
extremely hazardous wastes but for the purposes of this chapter
excludes all radioactive wastes or substances composed of both
radioactive and hazardous components.
(8) "Hazardous waste generator" means all persons whose primary
business activities are identified by the department to generate any
quantity of hazardous waste in the calendar year for which the fee is
imposed.
(9) "Person" means an individual, trust, firm, joint stock company,
partnership, association, state, public or private or municipal
corporation, commission, political subdivision of a state, interstate
body, the federal government including any agency or officer thereof,
and any Indian tribe or authorized tribal organization.
(10) "Price deflator" means the figures reported by the United
States department of commerce bureau of economic analysis((,)) on the
table for "Implicit Price Deflator for Gross ((National)) Domestic
Product." ((for "Government Purchases of Goods and Services,")) If one
is available, the department must use a price deflator for "State and
Local Government." If a "State and Local Government" figure is not
included on the table, the department must use a price deflator figure
applicable to general government.
(11) "Recycled for beneficial use" means the use of hazardous
waste, either before or after reclamation, as a substitute for a
commercial product or raw material, but does not include: (a) Use
constituting disposal; (b) incineration; or (c) use as a fuel.
(12) "Waste generation site" means any geographical area that has
been assigned an EPA/state identification number.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.95I.080 and 1986 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((By January 1, 1987, the state fire protection board, in
cooperation with)) The department ((of ecology,)) shall ((develop))
maintain, as necessary, a statewide standard for the placement of
above-ground tanks to collect used oil from private individuals for
recycling purposes.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.105.160 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 89 are each
amended to read as follows:
The department shall conduct a study to determine the best
management practices for categories of waste for the priority waste
management methods established in RCW 70.105.150, with due
consideration in the course of the study to sound environmental
management and available technology. As an element of the study, the
department shall review methods that will help achieve the priority of
RCW 70.105.150(1)(a), waste reduction. Before issuing any proposed
rules, the department shall conduct public hearings regarding the best
management practices for the various waste categories studied by the
department. After conducting the study, the department shall prepare
new rules or modify existing rules as appropriate to promote
implementation of the priorities established in RCW 70.105.150 for
management practices which assure use of sound environmental management
techniques and available technology. The preliminary study shall be
completed by July 1, 1986, and the rules shall be adopted by July 1,
1987.
The studies shall be updated at least once every five years. The
funding for these studies shall be from the ((hazardous waste control
and elimination)) state toxics control account, subject to legislative
appropriation.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.105.180 and 1985 c 57 s 70 are each amended to read
as follows:
All fines and penalties collected under this chapter shall be
deposited in the ((hazardous waste control and elimination)) state
toxics control account((, which is hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account collected from fines and penalties
shall be expended exclusively by the department of ecology for the
purposes of chapter 70, Laws of 1983 1st ex. sess., subject to
legislative appropriation. Other sources of funds deposited in this
account may also be used for the purposes of chapter 70, Laws of 1983
1st ex. sess. All earnings of investments of balances in the hazardous
waste control and elimination account shall be credited to the general
fund)).

Sec. 10 RCW 70.105.210 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 13 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
((By May 31, 1990,)) The department shall ((develop and adopt))
maintain criteria for the siting of hazardous waste management
facilities. These criteria will be part of the state hazardous waste
management plan as described in RCW 70.105.200. To the extent
practical, these criteria shall be designed to minimize the short-term
and long-term risks and costs that may result from hazardous waste
management facilities. These criteria may vary by type of facilities
and may consider natural site characteristics and engineered
protection. Criteria may be established for:
(1) Geology;
(2) Surface and groundwater hydrology;
(3) Soils;
(4) Flooding;
(5) Climatic factors;
(6) Unique or endangered flora and fauna;
(7) Transportation routes;
(8) Site access;
(9) Buffer zones;
(10) Availability of utilities and public services;
(11) Compatibility with existing uses of land;
(12) Shorelines and wetlands;
(13) Sole-source aquifers;
(14) Natural hazards; and
(15) Other factors as determined by the department.

Sec. 11 RCW 70.105.220 and 1992 c 17 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each local government, or combination of contiguous local
governments, is directed to prepare a local hazardous waste plan which
shall be based on state guidelines and include the following elements:
(a) A plan or program to manage moderate-risk wastes that are
generated or otherwise present within the jurisdiction. This element
shall include an assessment of the quantities, types, generators, and
fate of moderate-risk wastes in the jurisdiction. The purpose of this
element is to develop a system of managing moderate-risk waste,
appropriate to each local area, to ensure protection of the environment
and public health;
(b) A plan or program to provide for ongoing public involvement and
public education in regard to the management of moderate-risk waste.
This element shall provide information regarding:
(i) The potential hazards to human health and the environment
resulting from improper use and disposal of the waste; and
(ii) Proper methods of handling, reducing, recycling, and disposing
of the waste;
(c) An inventory of all existing generators of hazardous waste and
facilities managing hazardous waste within the jurisdiction. This
inventory shall be based on data provided by the department;
(d) A description of the public involvement process used in
developing the plan;
(e) A description of the eligible zones designated in accordance
with RCW 70.105.225. However, the requirement to designate eligible
zones shall not be considered part of the local hazardous waste
planning requirements; and
(f) Other elements as deemed appropriate by local government.
(2) To the maximum extent practicable, the local hazardous waste
plan shall be coordinated with other hazardous materials-related plans
and policies in the jurisdiction.
(3) Local governments shall coordinate with those persons involved
in providing privately owned hazardous and moderate-risk waste
facilities and services as follows: If a local government determines
that a moderate-risk waste will be or is adequately managed by one or
more privately owned facilities or services at a reasonable price, the
local government shall take actions to encourage the use of that
private facility or service. Actions taken by a local government under
this subsection may include, but are not limited to, restricting or
prohibiting the land disposal of a moderate-risk waste at any transfer
station or land disposal facility within its jurisdiction.
(4)(a) The department shall prepare and maintain guidelines for the
development of local hazardous waste plans. The guidelines shall be
prepared and maintained in consultation with local governments ((and
shall be completed by December 31, 1986)). The guidelines shall
include a list of substances identified as hazardous household
substances.
(b) ((In preparing the guidelines under (a) of this subsection, the
department shall review and assess information on pilot projects that
have been conducted for moderate-risk waste management.)) The
department shall encourage ((additional)) pilot projects for moderate
risk waste management as needed to provide information to improve and
update the guidelines.
(5) The department shall consult with retailers, trade
associations, public interest groups, and appropriate units of local
government to encourage the development of voluntary public education
programs on the proper handling of hazardous household substances.
(6) ((Local hazardous waste plans shall be completed and submitted
to the department no later than June 30, 1990.)) Local governments may
from time to time amend the local plan.
(7) Each local government, or combination of contiguous local
governments, shall submit its local hazardous waste plan or amendments
thereto to the department. The department shall approve or disapprove
local hazardous waste plans or amendments ((by December 31, 1990, or))
within ninety days of submission((, whichever is later)). The
department shall approve a local hazardous waste plan if it determines
that the plan is consistent with this chapter and the guidelines under
subsection (4) of this section. If approval is denied, the department
shall submit its objections to the local government within ninety days
of submission. ((However, for plans submitted between January 1, 1990,
and June 30, 1990, the department shall have one hundred eighty days to
submit its objections.)) No local government is eligible for grants
under RCW 70.105.235 for implementing a local hazardous waste plan
unless the plan for that jurisdiction has been approved by the
department.
(8) Each local government, or combination of contiguous local
governments, shall implement the local hazardous waste plan for its
jurisdiction ((by December 31, 1991)).
(9) The department may waive the specific requirements of this
section for any local government if such local government demonstrates
to the satisfaction of the department that the objectives of the
planning requirements have been met.

Sec. 12 RCW 88.46.030 and 2000 c 69 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All tank vessels entering the navigable waters of the state
shall be subject to inspection to assure that they comply with all
applicable federal and state standards.
(2) The department shall review the tank vessel inspection programs
conducted by the United States coast guard and other federal agencies
to determine if the programs as actually operated by those agencies
provide the best achievable protection to the waters of the state. If
the department determines that the tank vessel inspection programs
conducted by these agencies are not adequate to protect the state's
waters, it shall ((adopt rules for a state tank vessel inspection
program. The department shall adopt rules providing for a random
review of individual tank vessel inspections conducted by federal
agencies. The department may accept a tank vessel inspection report
issued by another state if that state's tank vessel inspection program
is determined by the department to be at least as protective of the
public health and the environment as the program adopted by the
department.
(3) The state tank vessel inspection program shall ensure that all
tank vessels entering state waters are inspected at least annually. To
the maximum extent feasible, the state program shall consist of the
monitoring of existing tank vessel inspection programs conducted by the
federal government. The department shall)) consult with the coast
guard regarding the tank vessel inspection program. Any tank vessel
inspection conducted pursuant to this section shall be performed during
the vessel's scheduled stay in port.
(((4))) (3) Any violation of coast guard or other federal
regulations uncovered during a state tank vessel inspection shall be
immediately reported to the appropriate agency.

Sec. 13 RCW 90.56.310 and 2000 c 69 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, it shall
be unlawful:
(a) For the owner or operator to operate an onshore or offshore
facility without an approved contingency plan as required under RCW
90.56.210, a spill prevention plan required by RCW 90.56.200, or
financial responsibility in compliance with chapter 88.40 RCW and the
federal oil pollution act of 1990; or
(b) For the owner or operator of an onshore or offshore facility to
transfer cargo or passengers to or from a covered vessel that does not
have an approved contingency plan or an approved prevention plan
required under chapter 88.46 RCW or financial responsibility in
compliance with chapter 88.40 RCW and the federal oil pollution act of
1990.
(2) The department may assess a civil penalty under RCW 43.21B.300
of up to one hundred thousand dollars against any person who is in
violation of this section. Each day that a facility or person is in
violation of this section shall be considered a separate violation.
(3) It shall not be unlawful for a facility or other person to
operate or accept cargo or passengers from a covered vessel if:
(a) A contingency plan, a prevention plan, or financial
responsibility is not required for the facility; or
(b) A contingency and prevention plan has been submitted to the
department as required by this chapter and rules adopted by the
department and the department is reviewing the plan and has not denied
approval.
(4) Any person may rely on a copy of the statement issued by the
department pursuant to RCW 90.56.210(7) as evidence that the facility
has an approved contingency plan and the statement issued pursuant to
RCW 90.56.200(4) as evidence that the facility has an approved spill
prevention plan. Any person may rely on a copy of the statement issued
by the ((office of marine safety, or its successor agency, the))
department, pursuant to RCW 88.46.060 as evidence that the vessel has
an approved contingency plan and the statement issued pursuant to RCW
88.46.040 as evidence that the vessel has an approved prevention plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 70.94.505 (Woodsmoke emissions -- Work group) and 2007 c 339
s 3;
(2) RCW 70.95C.250 (Multimedia permit pilot program -- Air, water,
hazardous waste management) and 1998 c 245 s 134 & 1994 c 248 s 1;
(3) RCW 88.46.062 (Nonprofit corporation providing contingency
plan -- Findings -- Termination of maritime commission) and 1995 c 148 s 1;
(4) RCW 88.46.063 (Nonprofit corporation providing contingency
plan -- Transfer of functions and assets from maritime commission) and
1995 c 148 s 2;
(5) RCW 88.46.921 (Office of marine safety abolished) and 1991 c
200 s 430; and
(6) RCW 88.46.926 (Apportionments of budgeted funds) and 1991 c 200
s 435.

--- END ---