BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.29.005 and 1969 c 47 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The term)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the board of dental hygiene established in RCW
18.29.110.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(4) "Surfaces of the teeth" ((as used in this chapter)) means the
portions of the crown and root surface to which there is no periodontal
membrane attached.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.29.021 and 1996 c 191 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a license to any applicant who, as
determined by the ((secretary)) board:
(a) Has successfully completed an educational program approved by
the ((secretary)) board. This educational program shall include
coursework encompassing the subject areas within the scope of the
license to practice dental hygiene in the state of Washington;
(b) Has successfully completed an examination administered or
approved by the ((dental hygiene examining committee)) board; and
(c) Has not engaged in unprofessional conduct or is not unable to
practice with reasonable skill and safety as a result of a physical or
mental impairment.
(2) Applications for licensure must comply with administrative
procedures, administrative requirements, and fees established according
to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.29.045 and 1991 c 3 s 47 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant holding a valid license and currently engaged in
practice in another state may be granted a license without examination
required by this chapter, on the payment of any required fees, if the
((secretary in consultation with the advisory committee)) board
determines that the other state's licensing standards are substantively
equivalent to the standards in this state: PROVIDED, That the
((secretary in consultation with the advisory committee)) board may
require the applicant to: (1) File with the ((secretary)) board
documentation certifying the applicant is licensed to practice in
another state; and (2) provide information as the ((secretary)) board
deems necessary pertaining to the conditions and criteria of the
uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW and to demonstrate to the
((secretary)) board a knowledge of Washington law pertaining to the
practice of dental hygiene.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.29.056 and 2013 c 87 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to RCW 18.29.230 and (e) of this subsection, dental
hygienists licensed under this chapter with two years' practical
clinical experience with a licensed dentist within the preceding five
years may be employed, retained, or contracted by health care
facilities and senior centers to perform authorized dental hygiene
operations and services without dental supervision.
(b) Subject to RCW 18.29.230 and (e) of this subsection, dental
hygienists licensed under this chapter with two years' practical
clinical experience with a licensed dentist within the preceding five
years may perform authorized dental hygiene operations and services
without dental supervision under a lease agreement with a health care
facility or senior center.
(c) Dental hygienists performing operations and services under (a)
or (b) of this subsection are limited to removal of deposits and stains
from the surfaces of the teeth, application of topical preventive or
prophylactic agents, application of topical anesthetic agents,
polishing and smoothing restorations, and performance of root planing
and soft-tissue curettage, but shall not perform injections of
anesthetic agents, administration of nitrous oxide, or diagnosis for
dental treatment.
(d) The performance of dental hygiene operations and services in
health care facilities shall be limited to patients, students, and
residents of the facilities.
(e) A dental hygienist employed, retained, or contracted to perform
services under this section or otherwise performing services under a
lease agreement under this section in a senior center must, before
providing services:
(i) Enter into a written practice arrangement plan, approved by the
((department)) board, with a dentist licensed in this state, under
which the dentist will provide off-site supervision of the dental
services provided. This agreement does not create an obligation for
the dentist to accept referrals of patients receiving services under
the program;
(ii) Collect data on the patients treated by dental hygienists
under the program, including age, treatments rendered, insurance
coverage, if any, and patient referral to dentists. This data must be
submitted to the ((department of health)) board at the end of each
annual quarter, during the period of time between October 1, 2007, and
October 1, 2013; and
(iii) Obtain information from the patient's primary health care
provider about any health conditions of the patient that would be
relevant to the provision of preventive dental care. The information
may be obtained by the dental hygienist's direct contact with the
provider or through a written document from the provider that the
patient presents to the dental hygienist.
(f) For dental planning and dental treatment, dental hygienists
shall refer patients to licensed dentists.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Health care facilities" are limited to hospitals; nursing
homes; home health agencies; group homes serving the elderly,
individuals with disabilities, and juveniles; state-operated
institutions under the jurisdiction of the department of social and
health services or the department of corrections; and federal, state,
and local public health facilities, state or federally funded community
and migrant health centers, and tribal clinics.
(b) "Senior center" means a multipurpose community facility
operated and maintained by a nonprofit organization or local government
for the organization and provision of a combination of some of the
following: Health, social, nutritional, educational services, and
recreational activities for persons sixty years of age or older.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.29.100 and 1991 c 3 s 50 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person who shall violate any provision of this chapter shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor. It shall be the duty of the prosecuting
attorney of each county to prosecute all cases involving a violation of
this chapter arising within his or her county. The attorney general
may assist in such prosecutions and shall appear at all hearings when
requested to do so by the ((secretary of health)) board.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.29.110 and 1991 c 3 s 51 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a board of dental hygiene ((examining committee))
consisting of ((three)) four practicing dental hygienists, and one
public member, appointed by the ((secretary)) governor, to be known as
the Washington board of dental hygiene ((examining committee)). Each
dental hygiene member shall be licensed and have been actively
practicing dental hygiene for a period of not less than five years
immediately before appointment and shall not be connected with any
dental hygiene school. The public member shall not be connected with
any dental hygiene program or engaged in any practice or business
related to dental hygiene. Members of the ((committee)) board shall be
appointed by the ((secretary)) governor to prepare and conduct
examinations for dental hygiene licensure and perform other duties as
specified in this chapter. Members shall be appointed to serve for
terms of three years from October 1 of the year in which they are
appointed. Terms of the members shall be staggered. Each member shall
hold office for the term of his or her appointment and until his or her
successor is appointed and qualified. Any member of the ((committee))
board may be removed by the ((secretary)) governor for neglect of duty,
misconduct, malfeasance, or misfeasance in office, after being given a
written statement of the charges against him or her and sufficient
opportunity to be heard thereon. Members of the ((committee)) board
shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.29.120 and 1995 c 198 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary in consultation with the Washington dental hygiene
examining committee)) board shall:
(1) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to
((prepare and conduct examinations for dental hygiene licensure))
implement this chapter;
(2) Require an applicant for licensure to pass an examination
consisting of written and practical tests upon such subjects and of
such scope as the ((committee)) board determines;
(3) Set the standards for passage of the examination;
(4) Administer at least two examinations each calendar year.
Additional examinations may be given as necessary; ((and))
(5) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an
examination failure;
(6) Establish by rule the minimum education requirements for
licensure, including, but not limited to, approval of educational
programs; and
(7) Establish and implement by rule a continuing education program.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.29.130 and 1991 c 3 s 53 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary
may:
(1) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to
implement this chapter;
(2) Establish forms necessary to administer this chapter;
(3) Issue a license to any applicant who has met the education and
examination requirements for licensure and deny a license to applicants
who do not meet the minimum qualifications for licensure. Proceedings
concerning the denial of licenses based on unprofessional conduct or
impaired practice shall be governed by the uniform disciplinary act,
chapter 18.130 RCW;
(4) Employ clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as
needed to implement and administer this chapter and hire individuals,
including those licensed under this chapter, to serve as examiners or
consultants as necessary to implement and administer this chapter; and
(5) Maintain the official departmental record of all applicants and
licensees((;
(6) Establish, by rule, the minimum education requirements for
licensure, including but not limited to approval of educational
programs; and
(7) Establish and implement by rule a continuing education
program)).

Sec. 9 RCW 18.29.140 and 1991 c 3 s 54 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary)) board shall establish by rule the standards and
procedures for approval of educational programs and may contract with
individuals or organizations having expertise in the profession or in
education to report to the ((secretary)) board information necessary
for the ((secretary)) board to evaluate the educational programs. The
secretary may establish a fee for educational program evaluation. The
fee shall be set to defray the administrative costs for evaluating the
educational program, including, but not limited to, costs for site
evaluation.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.29.150 and 1991 c 3 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((secretary)) board shall establish the date and location
of the examination. Applicants who meet the education requirements for
licensure shall be scheduled for the next examination following the
filing of the application. The ((secretary)) board shall establish by
rule the examination application deadline.
(2) The examination shall contain subjects appropriate to the scope
of practice and on laws in the state of Washington regulating dental
hygiene practice.
(3) The ((committee)) board shall establish by rule the
requirements for a reexamination if the applicant has failed the
examination.
(4) The ((committee)) board may approve an examination prepared or
administered by a private testing agency or association of licensing
authorities.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.29.160 and 1991 c 3 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary, members of the ((committee)) board, and individuals
acting on their behalf are immune from suit in any action, civil or
criminal, based on any acts performed in the course of their duties.

Sec. 12 RCW 18.29.170 and 1989 c 202 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((committee)) board shall meet at least ((once)) four times a
year and at such times as may be necessary for the transaction of
business.
A majority of the ((committee)) board shall constitute a quorum.
A vacancy in the ((committee)) board membership shall not impair
the right of the remaining members of the ((committee)) board to
exercise any power or to perform any duty of the ((committee)) board,
so long as the power is exercised or the duty performed by a quorum of
the ((committee)) board.
The board shall meet at least once a year with the dental quality
assurance commission to discuss issues of mutual interest to both
disciplining authorities.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.29.180 and 2004 c 262 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following practices, acts, and operations are excepted from the
operation of this chapter:
(1) The practice of dental hygiene in the discharge of official
duties by dental hygienists in the United States armed services, coast
guard, public health services, veterans' bureau, or bureau of Indian
affairs;
(2) Dental hygiene programs approved by the ((secretary)) board and
the practice of dental hygiene by students in dental hygiene programs
approved by the ((secretary)) board, when acting under the direction
and supervision of persons licensed under chapter 18.29 or 18.32 RCW
acting as instructors;
(3) The practice of dental hygiene by students in accredited dental
hygiene educational programs when acting under the direction and
supervision of instructors licensed under chapter 18.29 or 18.32 RCW.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.29.190 and 2006 c 66 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall issue an initial limited license without
the examination required by this chapter to any applicant who, as
determined by the ((secretary)) board:
(a) Holds a valid license in another state that allows a
substantively equivalent scope of practice in subsection (3)(a) through
(j) of this section;
(b) Is currently engaged in active practice in another state. For
the purposes of this section, "active practice" means five hundred
sixty hours of practice in the preceding twenty-four months;
(c) Files with the ((secretary)) board documentation certifying
that the applicant:
(i) Has graduated from an accredited dental hygiene school approved
by the ((secretary)) board;
(ii) Has successfully completed the dental hygiene national board
examination; and
(iii) Is licensed to practice in another state;
(d) Provides information as the ((secretary)) board deems necessary
pertaining to the conditions and criteria of the uniform disciplinary
act, chapter 18.130 RCW;
(e) Demonstrates to the ((secretary)) board a knowledge of
Washington state law pertaining to the practice of dental hygiene,
including the administration of legend drugs;
(f) Pays any required fees; and
(g) Meets requirements for AIDS education.
(2) The term of the initial limited license issued under this
section is eighteen months and it is renewable upon:
(a) Demonstration of successful passage of a substantively
equivalent dental hygiene patient evaluation/prophylaxis examination;
(b) Demonstration of successful passage of a substantively
equivalent local anesthesia examination; and
(c) Demonstration of didactic and clinical competency in the
administration of nitrous oxide analgesia.
(3) A person practicing with an initial limited license granted
under this section has the authority to perform hygiene procedures that
are limited to:
(a) Oral inspection and measuring of periodontal pockets;
(b) Patient education in oral hygiene;
(c) Taking intra-oral and extra-oral radiographs;
(d) Applying topical preventive or prophylactic agents;
(e) Polishing and smoothing restorations;
(f) Oral prophylaxis and removal of deposits and stains from the
surface of the teeth;
(g) Recording health histories;
(h) Taking and recording blood pressure and vital signs;
(i) Performing subgingival and supragingival scaling; and
(j) Performing root planing.
(4)(a) A person practicing with an initial limited license granted
under this section may not perform the following dental hygiene
procedures unless authorized in (b) or (c) of this subsection:
(i) Give injections of local anesthetic;
(ii) Place restorations into the cavity prepared by a licensed
dentist and afterwards carve, contour, and adjust contacts and
occlusion of the restoration;
(iii) Soft tissue curettage; or
(iv) Administer nitrous oxide/oxygen analgesia.
(b) A person licensed in another state who can demonstrate
substantively equivalent licensing standards in the administration of
local anesthetic may receive a temporary endorsement to administer
local anesthesia. For purposes of the renewed limited license, this
endorsement demonstrates the successful passage of the local anesthesia
examination.
(c) A person licensed in another state who can demonstrate
substantively equivalent licensing standards in restorative procedures
may receive a temporary endorsement for restorative procedures.
(5)(a) A person practicing with a renewed limited license granted
under this section may:
(i) Perform hygiene procedures as provided under subsection (3) of
this section;
(ii) Give injections of local anesthetic;
(iii) Perform soft tissue curretage; and
(iv) Administer nitrous oxide/oxygen analgesia.
(b) A person practicing with a renewed limited license granted
under this section may not place restorations into the cavity prepared
by a licensed dentist and afterwards carve, contour, and adjust
contacts and occlusion of the restoration.

Sec. 15 RCW 18.29.210 and 1993 c 323 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary in consultation with the dental hygiene examining
committee)) board shall develop rules and definitions to implement this
chapter.

Sec. 16 RCW 18.29.220 and 2009 c 321 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For low-income, rural, and other at-risk populations and in
coordination with local public health jurisdictions and local oral
health coalitions, a dental hygienist licensed in this state may assess
for and apply sealants and apply fluoride varnishes, and may remove
deposits and stains from the surfaces of teeth in community-based
sealant programs carried out in schools:
(1) Without attending the ((department's)) board's school sealant
endorsement program if the dental hygienist was licensed as of April
19, 2001; or
(2) If the dental hygienist is school sealant endorsed under RCW
43.70.650.
A hygienist providing services under this section must collect data
on patients treated, including age, treatment rendered, methods of
reimbursement for treatment, evidence of coordination with local public
health jurisdictions and local oral health coalitions, and patient
referrals to dentists. This data must be submitted to the ((department
of health)) board at the end of each annual quarter, during the period
of time between October 1, 2007, and October 1, 2013.

Sec. 17 RCW 18.32.0357 and 1999 c 364 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission shall elect officers each year. Meetings of the
commission are open to the public, except the commission may hold
executive sessions to the extent permitted by chapter 42.30 RCW. The
secretary of health shall furnish such secretarial, clerical, and other
assistance as the commission may require.
A majority of the commission members appointed and serving
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of commission business. The
affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the commission is
required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass
a measure.
The commission may appoint members of panels consisting of not less
than three members. A quorum for transaction of any business shall be
a minimum of three members. A majority vote of a quorum of the panel
is required to transact business delegated to it by the commission.
The members of the commission are immune from suit in an action,
civil or criminal, based upon its disciplinary proceedings or other
official acts performed in good faith as members of the commission.
The commission may, whenever the workload of the commission
requires, request that the secretary appoint pro tempore members.
While serving as members pro tempore persons have all the powers,
duties, and immunities, and are entitled to the emoluments, including
travel expenses, of the commission.
The commission shall prepare or determine the nature of the
examinations for applicants to practice dentistry.
The commission shall establish continuing dental education
requirements.
The attorney general shall advise the commission and represent it
in all legal proceedings.
The commission shall meet at least once a year with the board of
dental hygiene to discuss issues of mutual interest to both
disciplining authorities.

Sec. 18 RCW 18.130.040 and 2013 c 171 s 7 and 2013 c 19 s 44 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iii) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(iv) Massage practitioners and businesses licensed under chapter
18.108 RCW;
(v) ((Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vi))) East Asian medicine practitioners licensed under chapter
18.06 RCW;
(((vii))) (vi) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray
technicians registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(((viii))) (vii) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under
chapter 18.89 RCW;
(((ix))) (viii) Hypnotherapists and agency affiliated counselors
registered and advisors and counselors certified under chapter 18.19
RCW;
(((x))) (ix) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, mental
health counselor associates, marriage and family therapists, marriage
and family therapist associates, social workers, social work
associates -- advanced, and social work associates -- independent clinical
under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(((xi))) (x) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under
chapter 18.52C RCW;
(((xii))) (xi) Nursing assistants registered or certified or
medication assistants endorsed under chapter 18.88A RCW;
(((xiii))) (xii) Health care assistants certified under chapter
18.135 RCW;
(((xiv))) (xiii) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under
chapter 18.138 RCW;
(((xv))) (xiv) Chemical dependency professionals and chemical
dependency professional trainees certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;
(((xvi))) (xv) Sex offender treatment providers and certified
affiliate sex offender treatment providers certified under chapter
18.155 RCW;
(((xvii))) (xvi) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73
RCW or RCW 18.71.205;
(((xviii))) (xvii) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under
chapter 18.200 RCW;
(((xix))) (xviii) Surgical technologists registered under chapter
18.215 RCW;
(((xx))) (xix) Recreational therapists registered under chapter
18.230 RCW;
(((xxi))) (xx) Animal massage practitioners certified under chapter
18.240 RCW;
(((xxii))) (xxi) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250
RCW;
(((xxiii))) (xxii) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B
RCW;
(((xxiv))) (xxiii) Genetic counselors licensed under chapter 18.290
RCW;
(((xxv))) (xxiv) Reflexologists certified under chapter 18.108 RCW;
and
(((xxvi))) (xxv) Medical assistants-certified, medical assistants-hemodialysis technician, medical assistants-phlebotomist, and medical
assistants-registered certified and registered under chapter 18.360
RCW.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW,
licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW, and
certifications issued under chapter 18.350 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The pharmacy quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.64 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and
18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW;
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW;
(xv) The board of naturopathy established in chapter 18.36A RCW;
((and))
(xvi) The board of denturists established in chapter 18.30 RCW; and
(xvii) The board of dental hygiene established in chapter 18.29
RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses.
The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to
conditions.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the uniform
disciplinary act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 19 RCW 18.130.040 and 2013 c 171 s 8 and 2013 c 19 s 45 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iii) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(iv) Massage practitioners and businesses licensed under chapter
18.108 RCW;
(v) ((Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vi))) East Asian medicine practitioners licensed under chapter
18.06 RCW;
(((vii))) (vi) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray
technicians registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(((viii))) (vii) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under
chapter 18.89 RCW;
(((ix))) (viii) Hypnotherapists and agency affiliated counselors
registered and advisors and counselors certified under chapter 18.19
RCW;
(((x))) (ix) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, mental
health counselor associates, marriage and family therapists, marriage
and family therapist associates, social workers, social work
associates -- advanced, and social work associates -- independent clinical
under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(((xi))) (x) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under
chapter 18.52C RCW;
(((xii))) (xi) Nursing assistants registered or certified or
medication assistants endorsed under chapter 18.88A RCW;
(((xiii))) (xii) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under
chapter 18.138 RCW;
(((xiv))) (xiii) Chemical dependency professionals and chemical
dependency professional trainees certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;
(((xv))) (xiv) Sex offender treatment providers and certified
affiliate sex offender treatment providers certified under chapter
18.155 RCW;
(((xvi))) (xv) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73
RCW or RCW 18.71.205;
(((xvii))) (xvi) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter
18.200 RCW;
(((xviii))) (xvii) Surgical technologists registered under chapter
18.215 RCW;
(((xix))) (xviii) Recreational therapists registered under chapter
18.230 RCW;
(((xx))) (xix) Animal massage practitioners certified under chapter
18.240 RCW;
(((xxi))) (xx) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW;
(((xxii))) (xxi) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B
RCW;
(((xxiii))) (xxii) Genetic counselors licensed under chapter 18.290
RCW;
(((xxiv))) (xxiii) Reflexologists certified under chapter 18.108
RCW; and
(((xxv))) (xxiv) Medical assistants-certified, medical assistants-hemodialysis technician, medical assistants-phlebotomist, and medical
assistants-registered certified and registered under chapter 18.360
RCW.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW,
licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW, and
certifications issued under chapter 18.350 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The pharmacy quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.64 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and
18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW;
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW;
(xv) The board of naturopathy established in chapter 18.36A RCW;
((and))
(xvi) The board of denturists established in chapter 18.30 RCW; and
(xvii) The board of dental hygiene established in chapter 18.29
RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses.
The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to
conditions.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the uniform
disciplinary act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 20 RCW 43.70.650 and 2001 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary)) board of dental hygiene is authorized to create
a school sealant endorsement program for dental hygienists and dental
assistants. The ((secretary of health)) board, in consultation with
the dental quality assurance commission ((and the dental hygiene
examining committee)), shall adopt rules to implement this section.
(1) A dental hygienist licensed in this state after April 19, 2001,
is eligible to apply for endorsement by the ((department of health))
board as a school sealant dental hygienist upon completion of the
Washington state school sealant endorsement program. While otherwise
authorized to act, currently licensed hygienists may still elect to
apply for the endorsement.
(2) A dental assistant employed after April 19, 2001, by a dentist
licensed in this state, who has worked under dental supervision for at
least two hundred hours, is eligible to apply for endorsement by the
((department of health)) board as a school sealant dental assistant
upon completion of the Washington state school sealant endorsement
program. While otherwise authorized to act, currently employed dental
assistants may still elect to apply for the endorsement.
(3) The department may impose a fee for implementation of this
section.
(4) The secretary shall provide a report to the legislature by
December 1, 2005, evaluating the outcome of chapter 93, Laws of 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Section 18 of this act expires July 1,
2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Section 19 of this act takes effect July 1,
2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 Sections 1 through 18 and 20 of this act
take effect January 1, 2015.

--- END ---