BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that nonprofit
organizations and associations engaged in the education and training of
people, located in economically disadvantaged areas, who are involved
in the creation and expansion of businesses with marketable products
and services provide many public benefits to the people of the state of
Washington. The legislature further finds that facilitating emerging
businesses in their expansion creates jobs for the state. The
legislature further finds that facilities owned by nonprofit
organizations are not afforded the same tax treatment as facilities
owned by public entities creating an unfair playing field for the
nonprofit organizations. Therefore, the legislature finds that it is
in the best interest of the state to provide a limited property tax
exemption for the use of these facilities by certain organizations in
order to be self-sustaining for their exempt purposes.
(2) It is the specific public policy object of the legislature to
provide a property tax exemption to nonprofit small business incubators
that promote economic growth and jobs for Washington. The legislature
categorizes this tax preference as one intended to provide tax relief
for nonprofit small business incubators and to create jobs, as
described in RCW 82.32.808(2) (c) and (e).
(3) In order to obtain the necessary data to perform a review of
this tax preference, the department of commerce must provide to the
joint legislative audit and review committee the annual reports
submitted by qualified small business incubators receiving the property
tax exemption provided in this act. In addition, the committee must
review the tax exemption and its actual fiscal impact on state revenues
to determine if the fiscal impact to state revenues reasonably conforms
to the fiscal estimate in the fiscal note for this legislation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The real and personal property owned or used by a nonprofit
organization is exempt from property taxes levied for any state or
local purpose if the property is:
(a) Located in an economically distressed area; and
(b) Used to provide shared use of equipment and work areas and
daily technical resources and daily management support services that
enable small start-up and emerging businesses to become successful.
(2) The organization or association must meet all of the additional
following conditions:
(a) The organization is organized and conducted for nonsectarian
purposes;
(b) The organization is qualified for exemption under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code;
(c) The organization is governed by a volunteer board of directors
of at least five members;
(d) The organization charges fair market rent to the businesses
that use that organization's work areas; and
(e) Is certified by the department of commerce as a "qualified
small business incubator" under chapter 43.176 RCW that meets the
requirements of this act.
(3) Any qualified nonprofit small business incubator organization
claiming the exemption under subsection (2) of this section must
annually report to the department of commerce:
(a) The number of businesses served by the nonprofit;
(b) The estimated number of jobs created by the businesses served,
in the year in which they were served;
(c) Specific details for the businesses served, including but not
limited to: The name of the business, the unified business identifier
of the business, the type of business identified by the North American
industry classification system, and detailed information about the
business required under subsection (5)(b)(i) and (c)(i) of this
section; and
(d) Qualified small business incubators failing to report to the
department of commerce are ineligible for the exemption under
subsection (2) of this section. The department of commerce must
compile the information provided by all qualified small business
incubators and provide the joint legislative audit and review committee
with the detailed data on an annual basis.
(4) The department may revoke a small business incubator's property
tax exemption under this section upon clear and convincing evidence
that the qualified small business incubator is not complying with the
requirements of this section. It is presumed that a small business
incubator is meeting the requirements of subsection (1)(b) of this
section if the incubator files the annual reports required under
subsection (3) of this section and the small start-up and emerging
businesses served by the incubator meet the requirements under
subsection (5)(b)(ii) and (c)(ii) of this section.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Economically distressed area" means a rural county as defined
in RCW 82.14.370, a county with a community empowerment zone under RCW
43.31C.020, or a community empowerment zone under RCW 43.31C.020.
(b) "Emerging business" means a business that is:
(i) Engaged in activities related to the development of initial
product or service offerings, such as prototype development or
establishment of initial production or services processes;
(ii) Less than five years old and during the previous fiscal year
had gross revenues of no more than two million dollars; or
(iii) In a growth mode, expanding its operation or its market.
(c) "Start-up business" means a formal business venture that:
(i) Is involved in activities related to the development of initial
product or service offerings, such as prototype development or
establishment of initial production or services processes;
(ii) Is less than three years old and during the previous fiscal
year had gross revenues of no more than two million dollars; and
(iii) Has fewer than twenty employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2015 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires January 1, 2023.

--- END ---