BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that persons
purchasing long-term care insurance typically pay premiums for many
years before receiving coverage for benefits offered under the policy.
While maintaining the policy, many consumers are faced with increases
in premiums that are surprising and may impact the consumer's ability
to maintain the policy. The legislature finds that many older policies
may not provide adequate consumer protection and notifications on
premium increases and the options that may be available for consumers,
and where possible these consumer protections should be added to the
contract terms retroactively as well as prospectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.83 RCW
to read as follows:
The issuer must provide notice of an upcoming premium rate schedule
increase to all policyholders or certificate holders, as applicable, at
least forty-five days prior to the implementation of any premium rate
schedule increase by the issuer. At a minimum, the notice must include
the following information:
(1) An explanation of the potential premium rate revisions, and the
policyholder's or certificate holder's options in the event of a
premium rate revision;
(2) A general explanation for applying a premium rate or rate
schedule including a description of when the premium rate or rate
schedule adjustments will be effective, such as the next anniversary
date or next billing date;
(3) Information regarding each premium rate increase on the policy
form or similar policy forms over the past ten years for this state or
any other state that, at a minimum, identifies the policy forms for
which premium rates have been increased, the calendar years when the
form was available for purchase, and the amount or percent of each
increase. The issuer, in a fair manner, may provide additional
explanatory information related to the rate increases; and
(4) Contact information for the issuer, including a web site or
phone number, for more information on the increase and the
policyholder's or certificate holder's options.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.84 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The purpose of this section is to provide policyholders or
certificate holders additional information on premium rate changes.
This section applies to long-term care insurance policies, contracts,
or riders delivered or issued for delivery in this state before January
1, 2009.
(2) The issuer must provide notice of an upcoming premium rate
schedule increase to all policyholders or certificate holders, as
applicable, at least forty-five days prior to the implementation of any
premium rate schedule increase by the issuer. At a minimum, the notice
must include the following information:
(a) An explanation of the potential premium rate revisions, and the
policyholder's or certificate holder's options in the event of a
premium rate revision;
(b) A general explanation for applying a premium rate or rate
schedule including a description of when the premium rate or rate
schedule adjustments will be effective, such as the next anniversary
date or next billing date;
(c) Information regarding each premium rate increase on the policy
form or similar policy forms over the past ten years for this state or
any other state that, at a minimum, identifies the policy forms for
which premium rates have been increased, the calendar years when the
form was available for purchase, and the amount or percent of each
increase. The issuer, in a fair manner, may provide additional
explanatory information related to the rate increases; and
(d) Contact information for the issuer, including a web site or
phone number, for more information on the increase and the
policyholder's or certificate holder's options.

--- END ---