BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the state
employment disability parity act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that seven percent of the state's population
consists of persons with disabilities, that persons with disabilities
suffer significantly higher rates of unemployment and underemployment
than in the general population, and that representation of disabled
persons in the state workforce has declined in recent years. The
legislature further finds that there is no policy similar to Schedule
A in the federal civil service system for priority hiring of persons
with disabilities. The legislature further finds that state government
human resource managers do not coordinate with the department of social
and health services' division of vocational rehabilitation regarding
opportunities to employ persons with disabilities. Therefore, the
legislature intends to increase the hiring of persons with disabilities
in the state workforce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 31st of each year, state agencies employing thirty
or more people must submit a report to the human resources director,
with copies to the director of the department of social and health
services' division of vocational rehabilitation and the governor's
committee on disabilities and employment.
(2) The report must include the following information:
(a) The number of employees from the previous calendar year;
(b) The number of employees classified as individuals with
disabilities;
(c) The number of employees that separated from the state agency
the previous year;
(d) The number of employees that were hired by the state agency the
previous year;
(e) The number of employees hired from a division of vocational
rehabilitation program the previous year;
(f) Planned hires for the current year; and
(g) Opportunities for internships for a division of vocational
rehabilitation client placement leading to an entry-level position
placement upon successful completion for the current year.

--- END ---