BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that veterans are
an important part of our community and that current policies and
programs fail to consider their relevant experience in driving
commercial vehicles while serving our country. Further, the
legislature recognizes that commercial vehicles are an integral part of
our state's economy and that many employers are facing a shortage of
qualified employees. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to
establish an accelerated pathway for military veterans, and veterans of
the national guard, who have relevant truck driving experience to
receive a commercial driver's license.
As it stands, military veterans are eligible to take an eight-week
course while working toward receiving a commercial driver's license.
It is the intent of the legislature to create an alternative pilot
program for veterans that will allow them to take a shorter course
instead, and to accomplish this goal, will establish a partnership
between an institute of higher learning, the Washington state
department of veteran affairs, and local trucking companies.

--- END ---