BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that water quality
trading is an innovative approach adopted in at least seventeen other
states that can lead to a more efficient achievement of water quality
goals. The premise of water quality trading is based on the fact that
certain sources in a given watershed can have very different costs to
control the same pollutant. Trading programs allow facilities facing
higher pollution control costs to meet their regulatory obligations by
purchasing environmentally equivalent or superior pollution reductions
from another source at a lower cost. This trading achieves the same
water quality improvement at lower overall cost.
(2) The legislature further finds that the United States
environmental protection agency has been supportive of water quality
trading programs since 1993 when it issued an initial document called
the National Water Quality Trading Policy. With this publication, the
environmental protection agency sent a clear signal of federal support
for this innovative, market-based approach to improving water quality.
(3) The legislature further finds that water quality trading is,
and should remain, a voluntary option that regulated point sources can
use to meet the discharge limits in their national pollutant discharge
elimination system permits.
(4) The legislature recognizes that setting up a water quality
trading program can be a complex task that needs to be transparent,
must have real, accountable deductions in pollution inputs, must be
defensible, and must be enforceable. A water quality trading program
may not be suitable for many watersheds in the state. However, the
legislature also finds that the state of Washington should explore the
option as a tool for achieving water quality goals and investigate
whether this tool is viable given the specific, local water quality
concerns facing Washington's water bodies.
(5) The legislature further recognizes that the department of
ecology has produced a draft water quality trading framework that
enables trading in Washington and that to date a major barrier to
trading is a lack of interested credit purchasers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 89.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state conservation commission, in partnership with the
department of ecology, shall build upon the report on conservation
markets produced pursuant to chapter 133, Laws of 2008 and explore
whether there are potential buyers and sellers in Washington watersheds
for a water quality trading program. Specifically, the state
conservation commission should examine watersheds in which total
maximum daily loads have been produced, and assess whether there are
potential buyers, or permit holders, and sellers of credit to support
a water quality trading program consistent with the water quality
trading framework developed by the department of ecology.
(2) The state conservation commission must coordinate with Indian
tribes, the department of agriculture and other state agencies, local
governments, and other interested stakeholders in completing the
assessment and report required by this section. Prior to finalizing
the assessment and report, the state conservation commission must
ensure that the department of ecology concurs with its determination of
whether or not there is the potential for a viable water quality
trading program.
(3) The state conservation commission must report its findings to
the legislature consistent with RCW 43.01.036 by October 31, 2017.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2018.

--- END ---