BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that section 45,
chapter 291, Laws of 2013 required the department of natural resources,
in consultation with the department of ecology, to evaluate potential
changes to laws and rules related to derelict and abandoned vessels
that increase vessel owner responsibility and address challenges
associated with the economics of removing vessels from the water.
(2) The legislature further finds that, during the 2013 legislative
interim, the two responsible agencies engaged in a thorough process to
satisfy their legislative charge. This process involved exhausting in-state expertise on various topics and reaching out to experts in vessel
deconstruction, surety bonding, letters of credit, marine insurance,
taxation, federal regulation, similar programs in other states, and
more. The process also involved two open invitation public meetings.
(3) The legislature further finds that a significant number of
various and competing options were discussed, analyzed, and ultimately
dismissed during the process undertaken by the two agencies. It is the
intent of the legislature to capture the recommendations for meeting
the goals of increased vessel owner responsibility and addressing the
challenges associated with the economics of removing vessels from the
water that rose to the top from the process undertaken by the agencies.
(4) It is the further intent of the legislature that this act serve
as the final report due by the department of natural resources under
section 45, chapter 291, Laws of 2013.

Part One--Vessel Owner Responsibility
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 79.100
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Any individual or company that purchases or otherwise receives
a used vessel greater than sixty-five feet in length and more than
forty years old must, prior to or concurrent with the transfer of
ownership, secure a marine insurance policy consistent with this
section. Proof of the marine insurance policy must be provided to:
(a) The transferor of the vessel upon purchase; and
(b) If applicable, the department of licensing upon registration or
the department of revenue upon the payment of any taxes.
(2) The transferor of a vessel greater than sixty-five feet in
length and more than forty years old has an affirmative duty to ensure
that any potential transferee has secured a marine insurance policy
consistent with this section prior to or concurrent with the
finalization of any sale. Nothing in this section prohibits the sale
or other transfer of a vessel greater than sixty-five feet in length
and more than forty years old to a transferee that fails to secure a
marine insurance policy. However, a transferor that chooses to
finalize a sale or other transfer with a transferee not in possession
of a marine insurance policy assumes secondary liability for the vessel
consistent with RCW 79.100.060 if the vessel is later abandoned by the
transferee or becomes derelict prior to a subsequent ownership
transfer.
(3) The marine insurance policy required under this section must be
secured by the transferee prior to, or concurrent with, assuming
ownership of a vessel greater than sixty-five feet in length and more
than forty years old. The marine insurance policy must satisfy the
following conditions:
(a) Have a term of at least twelve months following the
transferee's assumption of vessel ownership;
(b) Provide coverage of an amount that is, unless otherwise
provided by the department by rule, at least three hundred thousand
dollars;
(c) Provide, unless otherwise provided by the department by rule,
coverage for the removal of the vessel if it should sink and coverage
should it cause a pollution event.
(4) The purchaser of marine insurance under this section may
satisfy the requirements of this section through the purchase of
multiple policies as necessary.
(5) The department may, by rule, provide for a purchaser of a
vessel to also satisfy the insurance requirements of this section
through the posting of adequate security with a financial institution.
(6) It is a gross misdemeanor for a person required to show proof
of insurance under this section to cancel a marine insurance policy
obtained consistent with this section prior to the end of the twelfth
month of vessel ownership or to a subsequent transfer of ownership,
whichever occurs first, without obtaining a marine insurance policy in
its place that satisfies the requirements of this section. The
department may contact any vessel owner required by this section to
have a marine insurance policy to ensure compliance with this section.

Sec. 102 RCW 79.100.150 and 2013 c 291 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A vessel owner must obtain a vessel inspection under this
section prior to transferring a vessel that is:
(a) More than sixty-five feet in length and more than forty years
old; and
(b) Either:
(i) Is registered or required to be registered under chapter 88.02
RCW; or
(ii) Is listed or required to be listed under chapter 84.40 RCW.
(2) If the vessel inspection determines that the vessel is not
seaworthy and that the value of the vessel is less than the anticipated
costs required to return the vessel to seaworthiness, then the vessel
owner may not sell or transfer ownership of the vessel unless:
(a) The vessel is repaired to a seaworthy state prior to the
transfer of ownership; or
(b) The vessel is being sold for scrap, salvage, or another use
that will remove the vessel from state waters.
(3) Where required under subsection (1) of this section, a vessel
owner must provide a copy of the vessel inspection documentation to the
transferee and, if the department did not conduct the inspection, to
the department prior to the transfer.
(((3))) (4) Unless rules adopted by the department provide
otherwise, the vessel inspection required under this section must be
contained in a formal marine survey conducted by a third party to the
transaction. The survey must include, at a minimum, a conclusion
relating to the seaworthiness of the vessel, an estimate of the
vessel's fair market value, and, if applicable, an estimate as to the
anticipated cost of repairs necessary to return the vessel to
seaworthiness.
(5) The department may, by rule, allow other forms of vessel
condition determinations, such as United States coast guard
certificates of inspection, to replace the requirements for a formal
marine survey under this section.
(6) Failure to comply with the requirements of ((subsections (1)
and (2) of)) this section will result in the transferor having
secondary liability under RCW 79.100.060 if the vessel is later
abandoned by the transferee or becomes derelict prior to a subsequent
ownership transfer.
(7) Nothing in this section prevents a vessel owner from removing,
dismantling, and lawfully disposing of any vessel lawfully under the
vessel owner's control.

Part Two--Authorities and Requirements Applicable to Marinas
Sec. 201 RCW 79.100.130 and 2013 c 291 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A private moorage facility owner, as those terms are defined in
RCW 88.26.010, may contract with the department or a local government
for the purpose of participating in the derelict vessel removal
program.
(2) If a contract is completed under this section, the department
or local government shall serve as the authorized public entity for the
removal of a derelict or abandoned vessel from the property of the
private moorage facility owner. The contract must provide for the
private moorage facility owner to be financially responsible for the
removal and disposal costs that are not reimbursed by the department as
provided under RCW 79.100.100, and any additional reasonable
administrative costs incurred by the department or local government
during the removal of the derelict or abandoned vessel.
(3) Prior to the commencement of any removal ((which)) under this
section for which a local government serves as the authorized public
entity and that will seek reimbursement from the derelict vessel
removal program, the contract and the proposed vessel removal shall be
submitted to the department for review and approval. The local
government shall use the procedure specified under RCW
79.100.100(((6))).
(4) If the private moorage facility owner has already seized the
vessel under chapter 88.26 RCW and title has reverted to the moorage
facility, the moorage facility is not considered the owner under this
chapter for purposes of cost recovery for actions taken under this
section.
(5)(a) The department and all local governments have the discretion
as to whether to enter into contracts to serve as the authorized public
entity under this section for vessels located at a private moorage
facility.
(b) The department may not enter into a contract to serve as the
authorized public entity under this section for vessels located at a
private moorage facility if the private moorage facility is not in
compliance with the mandatory insurance requirements of section 202 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to chapter 88.26
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Every private moorage facility operator must:
(a) Obtain and maintain insurance coverage for the private moorage
facility;
(b) Require, as a condition of moorage, all vessels other than
transient vessels to display proof of marine insurance when a moorage
agreement is finalized.
(2) Unless rules adopted by the department require otherwise,
insurance maintained by private moorage facility operators and required
of moored vessels must:
(a) Provide coverage at liability limits of at least three hundred
thousand dollars per occurrence; and
(b) Include, at a minimum, general, legal, and pollution liability
coverage.
(3) The purchaser of marine insurance under this section may
satisfy the requirements of this section through the purchase of
multiple policies as necessary.
(4) The requirement under this section for private moorage facility
operators to require proof of marine insurance from mooring vessels
applies at the time a moorage agreement is entered into and at the time
of any renewals of the agreement. The private moorage facility
operator is not responsible for any change in insurance coverage
applicable to the vessel that occurs after the initial agreement is
entered into or in the time period between agreement renewals.
(5) Any private moorage facility operator who fails to satisfy the
requirements of this section incurs secondary liability under RCW
79.100.060 for any vessel located at the private moorage facility that
meets the definition of derelict vessel or abandoned vessel as those
terms are defined in RCW 79.100.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 53.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Every moorage facility operator must:
(a) Obtain and maintain insurance coverage for the moorage
facility;
(b) Require, as a condition of moorage, all vessels other than
transient vessels to display proof of marine insurance.
(2) Unless rules adopted by the department require otherwise,
insurance maintained by moorage facility operators and required of
moored vessels must:
(a) Provide coverage at liability limits of at least three hundred
thousand dollars per occurrence; and
(b) Include, at a minimum, general, legal, and pollution liability
coverage.
(3) The purchaser of marine insurance under this section may
satisfy the requirements of this section through the purchase of
multiple policies as necessary.
(4) The requirement under this section for moorage facility
operators to require proof of marine insurance from mooring vessels
applies at the time a moorage agreement is entered into and at the time
of any renewals of the agreement. The moorage facility operator is not
responsible for any change in insurance coverage applicable to the
vessel that occurs after the initial agreement is entered into or in
the time period between agreement renewals.
(5) Any moorage facility operator who fails to satisfy the
requirements of this section incurs secondary liability under RCW
79.100.060 for any vessel located at the moorage facility that meets
the definition of derelict vessel or abandoned vessel as those terms
are defined in RCW 79.100.010.

Sec. 204 RCW 53.08.310 and 1986 c 260 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this section, section 203 of this act,
and RCW 53.08.320.
(1) "Port charges" mean charges of a moorage facility operator for
moorage and storage, and all other charges owing or to become owing
under a contract between a vessel owner and the moorage facility
operator, or under an officially adopted tariff including, but not
limited to, costs of sale and related legal expenses.
(2) "Vessel" means every species of watercraft or other artificial
contrivance capable of being used as a means of transportation on water
and which does not exceed two hundred feet in length. "Vessel"
includes any trailer used for the transportation of watercraft.
(3) "Moorage facility" means any properties or facilities owned or
operated by a moorage facility operator which are capable of use for
the moorage or storage of vessels.
(4) "Moorage facility operator" means any port district, city,
town, metropolitan park district, or county which owns and/or operates
a moorage facility.
(5) "Owner" means every natural person, firm, partnership,
corporation, association, or organization, or agent thereof, with
actual or apparent authority, who expressly or impliedly contracts for
use of a moorage facility.
(6) "Transient vessel" means a vessel using a moorage facility and
which belongs to an owner who does not have a moorage agreement with
the moorage facility operator. Transient vessels include, but are not
limited to: Vessels seeking a harbor of refuge, day use, or overnight
use of a moorage facility on a space-as-available basis.

Part Three--Encouraging Vessel Removal and Deconstruction
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
vessel deconstruction performed at:
(a) A qualified vessel deconstruction facility; or
(b) An area over water that has been permitted under section 402 of
the clean water act of 1972 (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1342) for vessel
deconstruction.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a)(i) "Vessel deconstruction" means permanently dismantling a
vessel, including: Abatement and removal of hazardous materials; the
removal of mechanical, hydraulic, or electronic components or other
vessel machinery and equipment; and either the cutting apart or
disposal, or both, of vessel infrastructure. For the purposes of this
subsection, "hazardous materials" includes fuel, lead, asbestos,
polychlorinated biphenyls, and oils.
(ii) "Vessel deconstruction" does not include vessel modification
or repair.
(b) "Qualified vessel deconstruction facility" means structures,
including floating structures, that are permitted under section 402 of
the clean water act of 1972 (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1342) for vessel
deconstruction.
(3) Sellers making tax-exempt sales under this section must obtain
from the purchaser an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files. In lieu of an exemption
certificate, a seller may capture the relevant data elements as allowed
under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to the use of vessel deconstruction
services performed at:
(a) A qualified vessel deconstruction facility; or
(b) An area over water that has been permitted under section 402 of
the federal clean water act of 1972 (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1342) for vessel
deconstruction.
(2) The definitions in section 301(2) of this act apply to this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to chapter 44.28
RCW to read as follows:
(1) This section is the tax preference performance statement for
the tax preference contained in sections 301 and 302 of this act. This
performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent
evaluation of this tax preference. It is not intended to create a
private right of action by any party or be used to determine
eligibility for preferential tax treatment.
(2) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as intended to
induce certain designated behavior by taxpayers as indicated in RCW
82.32.808(2)(a).
(3) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to
decrease the number of abandoned and derelict vessels by providing
incentives to increase vessel deconstruction in Washington by lowering
the cost of deconstruction. It is the legislature's intent to provide
businesses engaged in vessel deconstruction a sales and use tax
exemption for sales of vessel deconstruction. This incentive will
lower the costs associated with vessel deconstruction and encourage
businesses to make investments in vessel deconstruction facilities.
Pursuant to chapter 43.136 RCW, the joint legislative audit and review
committee must review the sales tax exemptions provided under sections
301 and 302 of this act by December 1, 2018.
(4) If a review finds that the increase in available capacity to
deconstruct derelict vessels or a reduction in the average cost to
deconstruct vessels has resulted in an increase of the number of
derelict vessels removed from Washington's waters as compared to before
the effective date of this section, then the legislature intends for
the legislative auditor to recommend extending the expiration date of
the tax preference.
(5) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in
subsection (3) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review
committee should refer to data kept and maintained by the department of
natural resources.
(6) This section expires January 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 Sections 301 and 302 of this act take
effect October 1, 2014.

Part Four--Revenue to Support the Derelict Vessel Removal Program
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Derelict and abandoned vessels are a threat to the safety of
the public waterways, an environmental hazard for humans and marine
life, and an occupational danger for persons that make their living on
the waters of this state;
(b) Derelict vessel removal fees are imposed when recreational
vessels are registered with the department of licensing. The
accumulation of these fees is sufficient for the removal and disposal
of recreational vessels that become derelict or abandoned;
(c) Derelict vessel removal fees do not apply to commercial
vessels. Former commercial vessels are among the most costly to remove
from Washington waters and to dispose of in an environmentally
responsible manner. The costs for removing and disposing of these
vessels far exceeds the funding provided by the derelict vessel removal
fees paid by recreational vessels;
(d) According to the department of natural resources, as of the
effective date of this section, there is a significant backlog of
abandoned or derelict vessels that are former commercial vessels; and
(e) The use of general fund revenue to pay for the removal and
disposal of derelict or abandoned vessels places an undue burden on the
nonboating public and reduces the revenue available to pay for
necessary governmental services.
(2) The legislature intends for either the owners or operators, or
both, of commercial vessels to pay their fair share for the removal of
abandoned or derelict vessels by imposing a fee for the moorage of
commercial vessels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to chapter 79.100
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, an
annual derelict vessel removal fee is imposed upon all persons required
by RCW 84.40.065 to list any ship or vessel with the department of
revenue for state property tax purposes.
(b) The derelict vessel removal fee imposed in (a) of this
subsection does not apply in any year that a person required to list a
ship or vessel does not owe the state property tax levied for
collection in that year with respect to that ship or vessel.
(c) The annual derelict vessel removal fee is equal to three
dollars per vessel foot measured by extreme length of the vessel,
rounded up to the nearest whole foot.
(2) Each year, the department of revenue must include the amount of
the derelict vessel removal fee due under this section for that
calendar year in the tax statement required in RCW 84.40.065.
(3) The person listing a ship or vessel and the owner of the ship
or vessel, if not the same person, are jointly and severally liable for
the fee imposed in this section.
(4) The department of revenue must collect the derelict vessel
removal fee imposed in this section as provided in RCW 84.56.440.
(5) All derelict vessel removal fees collected under this section
must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal account created in
RCW 79.100.100.

Sec. 403 RCW 84.56.440 and 2008 c 181 s 511 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of revenue shall collect the derelict vessel
removal fee imposed under section 402 of this act and all ad valorem
taxes upon ships and vessels listed with the department in accordance
with RCW 84.40.065, and all applicable interest and penalties on such
taxes and fees. The taxes and derelict vessel removal fee shall be due
and payable to the department on or before the thirtieth day of April
and shall be delinquent after that date.
(2) If payment of the tax, derelict vessel removal fee, or both, is
not received by the department by the due date, there shall be imposed
a penalty of five percent of the amount of the unpaid tax and fee; and
if the tax ((is)) and fee are not received within thirty days after the
due date, there shall be imposed a total penalty of ten percent of the
amount of the unpaid tax and fee; and if the tax ((is)) and fee are not
received within sixty days after the due date, there shall be imposed
a total penalty of twenty percent of the amount of the unpaid tax and
fee. No penalty so added shall be less than five dollars.
(3) Delinquent taxes under this section are subject to interest at
the rate set forth in RCW 82.32.050 from the date of delinquency until
paid. Delinquent derelict vessel removal fees are also subject to
interest at the same rate and in the same manner as provided for
delinquent taxes under RCW 82.32.050. Interest or penalties collected
on delinquent taxes and derelict vessel removal fees under this section
shall be paid by the department into the general fund of the state
treasury.
(4) If upon information obtained by the department it appears that
any ship or vessel required to be listed according to the provisions of
RCW 84.40.065 is not so listed, the department shall value the ship or
vessel and assess against the owner of the vessel the taxes and
derelict vessel removal fees found to be due and shall add thereto
interest at the rate set forth in RCW 82.32.050 from the original due
date of the tax and fee until the date of payment. The department
shall notify the vessel owner by mail of the amount and the same shall
become due and shall be paid by the vessel owner within thirty days of
the date of the notice. If payment is not received by the department
by the due date specified in the notice, the department shall add a
penalty of ten percent of the tax and fee found due. A person who
willfully gives a false listing or willfully fails to list a ship or
vessel as required by RCW 84.40.065 shall be subject to the penalty
imposed by RCW 84.40.130(2), which shall be assessed and collected by
the department.
(5) Delinquent taxes and fees under this section, along with all
penalties and interest thereon, shall be collected by the department
according to the procedures set forth in chapter 82.32 RCW for the
filing and execution of tax warrants, including the imposition of
warrant interest. In the event a warrant is issued by the department
for the collection of taxes, derelict vessel removal fees, or both,
under this section, the department shall add a penalty of five percent
of the amount of the delinquent tax and fee, but not less than ten
dollars.
(6) ((The department shall also collect all delinquent taxes
pertaining to ships and vessels appearing on the records of the county
treasurers for each of the counties of this state as of December 31,
1993, including any applicable interest or penalties. The provisions
of subsection (5) of this section shall apply to the collection of such
delinquent taxes.
(7))) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer
affected by the emergency, may grant extensions of the due date of any
taxes and fees payable under this section as the department deems
proper.
(7) The department of revenue must withhold the decals required
under RCW 88.02.570(10) for failure to pay the state property tax or
derelict vessel removal fee collectible under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 Sections 401 through 403 of this act take
effect January 1, 2015.

Part Five--Incentivizing the Registration of Moored Vessels
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 A new section is added to chapter 88.02
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A moorage provider that provides long-term moorage must obtain
the following information and documentation from persons entering into
long-term moorage agreements with the moorage provider:
(a) The name of the legal owner of the vessel;
(b) A local contact person and that person's address and telephone
number, if different than the owner;
(c) The owner's address and telephone number;
(d) The vessel's hull identification number;
(e) If applicable, the vessel's coast guard registration;
(f) The vessel's home port;
(g) The date on which the moorage began;
(h) The vessel's country or state of registration and registration
number; and
(i) Proof of vessel registration, a written statement of the
lessee's intent to register a vessel, or an affidavit in a form and
manner approved by the department certifying that the vessel is exempt
from state vessel registration requirements as provided by RCW
88.02.570.
(2) For moorage agreements entered into effective on or after July
1, 2014, a long-term moorage agreement for vessels not registered in
this state must include, in a form and manner approved by the
department and the department of revenue, notice of state vessel
registration requirements as provided by this chapter and tax
requirements as provided by chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.49 RCW and
listing requirements as provided by RCW 84.40.065.
(3) A moorage provider must maintain records of the information and
documents required under this section for at least two years. Upon
request, a moorage provider must:
(a) Permit any authorized agent of a requesting agency to:
(i) Inspect the moorage facility for vessels that are not
registered as required by this chapter or listed as required under RCW
84.40.065; and
(ii) Inspect and copy records identified in subsection (1) of this
section for vessels that the requesting agency determines are not
properly registered or listed as required by law; or
(b) Provide to the requesting agency:
(i) Information as provided in subsection (1)(a), (c), (d), and (e)
of this section; and
(ii) Information as provided in subsection (1)(b), (f), (g), (h),
and (i) of this section for those vessels that the requesting agency
subsequently determines are not registered as required by this chapter
or listed as required under RCW 84.40.065.
(4) Requesting agencies must coordinate their requests to ensure
that a moorage provider does not receive more than two requests per
calendar year. For the purpose of enforcing vessel registration and
vessel listing requirements, requesting agencies may share the results
of information requests with each other.
(5) The information required to be collected under this section
must be collected at the time the long-term moorage agreement is
entered into and at the time of any renewals of the agreement. The
moorage provider is not responsible for updating any changes in the
information that occurs after the initial agreement is entered into or
in the time period between agreement renewals.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Long-term moorage" means moorage provided for more than thirty
consecutive days.
(b) "Moorage facility" means any properties or facilities located
in this state that are used for the moorage of vessels and are owned or
operated by a moorage provider.
(c) "Moorage facility operator" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 53.08.310.
(d) "Moorage provider" means any public or private entity that owns
or operates any moorage facility, including a moorage facility
operator, private moorage facility operator, the state of Washington,
or any other person.
(e) "Private moorage facility operator" has the same meaning as
defined in RCW 88.26.010.
(f) "Requesting agency" means the department, the department of
revenue, or the department of natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 A new section is added to chapter 82.49
RCW to read as follows:
(1) An owner of a vessel that is not registered as required by
chapter 88.02 RCW and for which watercraft excise tax is due under this
chapter is liable for a penalty in the following amount:
(a) One hundred dollars for the owner's first violation;
(b) Two hundred dollars for the owner's second violation involving
the same or any other vessel; or
(c) Four hundred dollars for the owner's third and successive
violations involving the same or any other vessel.
(2) The department of revenue may collect this penalty under the
procedures established in chapter 82.32 RCW. The penalty imposed under
this section is in addition to any other civil or criminal penalty
imposed by law.

Sec. 503 RCW 82.49.010 and 2010 c 161 s 1044 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An excise tax is imposed for the privilege of using a vessel
upon the waters of this state, except vessels exempt under RCW
82.49.020. The annual amount of the excise tax is one-half of one
percent of fair market value, as determined under this chapter, or five
dollars, whichever is greater. Violation of this subsection is a
misdemeanor.
(2) ((Persons who are)) A person who is required under chapter
88.02 RCW to register a vessel in this state and who fails to register
the vessel in this state or registers the vessel in another state or
foreign country and avoids the Washington watercraft excise tax ((are))
is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and ((are)) is liable for such unpaid
excise tax. The department of revenue may assess and collect the
unpaid excise tax under chapter 82.32 RCW, including the penalty
imposed in section 502 of this act and penalties and interest provided
in chapter 82.32 RCW.
(3) The excise tax upon a vessel registered for the first time in
this state shall be imposed for a twelve-month period, including the
month in which the vessel is registered, unless the director of
licensing extends or diminishes vessel registration periods for the
purpose of staggered renewal periods under RCW 88.02.560. A vessel is
registered for the first time in this state when the vessel was not
registered in this state for the immediately preceding registration
year, or when the vessel was registered in another jurisdiction for the
immediately preceding year.

Part Six--Miscellaneous and Technical
Sec. 601 RCW 79.100.060 and 2013 c 291 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The owner of an abandoned or derelict vessel, or any person or
entity that has incurred secondary liability ((under RCW 79.100.150))
for an abandoned or derelict vessel under this chapter or section 202
or 203 of this act, is responsible for reimbursing an authorized public
entity for all reasonable and auditable costs associated with the
removal or disposal of the owner's vessel under this chapter. These
costs include, but are not limited to, costs incurred exercising the
authority granted in RCW 79.100.030, all administrative costs incurred
by the authorized public entity during the procedure set forth in RCW
79.100.040, removal and disposal costs, and costs associated with
environmental damages directly or indirectly caused by the vessel. An
authorized public entity that has taken temporary possession of a
vessel may require that all reasonable and auditable costs associated
with the removal of the vessel be paid before the vessel is released to
the owner.
(2) Reimbursement for costs may be sought from an owner, or any
person or entity that has incurred secondary liability under ((RCW
79.100.150)) this chapter or section 202 or 203 of this act, who is
identified subsequent to the vessel's removal and disposal.
(3) If the full amount of all costs due to the authorized public
entity under this chapter is not paid to the authorized public entity
within thirty days after first notifying the responsible parties of the
amounts owed, the authorized public entity or the department may bring
an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to recover the costs,
plus reasonable attorneys' fees and costs incurred by the authorized
public entity.

Sec. 602 RCW 79.100.120 and 2013 c 291 s 32 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((A person)) (a) An owner or lien holder seeking to contest an
authorized public entity's decision to take temporary possession or
custody of a vessel under this chapter, or to contest the amount of
reimbursement owed to an authorized public entity under this chapter,
may request a hearing in accordance with this section.
(b) A transferor with secondary liability under this chapter or
section 202 or 203 of this act may commence a lawsuit in the superior
court for the county in which custody of the vessel was taken to
contest the transferor's liability or the amount of reimbursement owed
the authorized public entity under this chapter.
(2)(a) If the contested decision or action was undertaken by a
state agency, a written request for a hearing related to the decision
or action must be filed with the pollution control hearings board and
served on the state agency in accordance with RCW 43.21B.230 (2) and
(3) within thirty days of the date the authorized public entity
acquires custody of the vessel under RCW 79.100.040, or if the vessel
is redeemed before the authorized public entity acquires custody, the
date of redemption, or the right to a hearing is deemed waived and the
vessel's owner is liable for any costs owed the authorized public
entity. In the event of litigation, the prevailing party is entitled
to reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.
(b) Upon receipt of a timely hearing request, the pollution control
hearings board shall proceed to hear and determine the validity of the
decision to take the vessel into temporary possession or custody and
the reasonableness of any towing, storage, or other charges permitted
under this chapter. Within five business days after the request for a
hearing is filed, the pollution control hearings board shall notify the
vessel owner requesting the hearing and the authorized public entity of
the date, time, and location for the hearing. Unless the vessel is
redeemed before the request for hearing is filed, the pollution control
hearings board shall set the hearing on a date that is within ten
business days of the filing of the request for hearing. If the vessel
is redeemed before the request for a hearing is filed, the pollution
control hearings board shall set the hearing on a date that is within
sixty days of the filing of the request for hearing.
(c) Consistent with RCW 43.21B.305, a proceeding brought under this
subsection may be heard by one member of the pollution control hearings
board, whose decision is the final decision of the board.
(3)(a) If the contested decision or action was undertaken by a
metropolitan park district, port district, city, town, or county, which
has adopted rules or procedures for contesting decisions or actions
pertaining to derelict or abandoned vessels, those rules or procedures
must be followed in order to contest a decision to take temporary
possession or custody of a vessel, or to contest the amount of
reimbursement owed.
(b) If the metropolitan park district, port district, city, town,
or county has not adopted rules or procedures for contesting decisions
or actions pertaining to derelict or abandoned vessels, then ((a
person)) an owner or lien holder requesting a hearing under this
section must follow the procedure established in subsection (2) of this
section.

Sec. 603 RCW 79.100.100 and 2013 c 291 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The derelict vessel removal account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from RCW 79.100.050 and 79.100.060 and those
moneys specified in RCW 88.02.640 must be deposited into the account.
The account is authorized to receive fund transfers and appropriations
from the general fund, deposits from the derelict vessel removal
surcharge under RCW 88.02.640(4), deposits under section 402 of this
act, as well as gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private
sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for
the use and benefit of the purposes of this chapter and expend the same
or any income according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or
endowments provided those terms do not conflict with any provisions of
this section or any guidelines developed to prioritize reimbursement of
removal projects associated with this chapter.
(b) Moneys in the account may only be spent after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may only be used by the department for
developing and administering the vessel turn-in program created in RCW
79.100.160 and to reimburse authorized public entities for up to ninety
percent of the total reasonable and auditable administrative, removal,
disposal, and environmental damage costs of abandoned or derelict
vessels when the previous owner is either unknown after a reasonable
search effort or insolvent. Reimbursement may not be made unless the
department determines that the public entity has made reasonable
efforts to identify and locate the party responsible for the vessel, or
any other person or entity that has incurred secondary liability
((under RCW 79.100.150)) for the vessel under this chapter or section
202 or 203 of this act, regardless of the title of owner of the vessel.
(c) Funds in the account resulting from transfers from the general
fund or from the deposit of funds from the watercraft excise tax as
provided for under RCW 82.49.030 must be used to reimburse one hundred
percent of costs and should be prioritized for the removal of large
vessels.
(d) Costs associated with the removal and disposal of an abandoned
or derelict vessel under the authority granted in RCW 53.08.320 also
qualify for reimbursement from the derelict vessel removal account.
(e) In each biennium, up to twenty percent of the expenditures from
the derelict vessel removal account may be used for administrative
expenses of the department of licensing and department of natural
resources in implementing this chapter.
(2) Priority for use of this account is for the removal of derelict
and abandoned vessels that are in danger of sinking, breaking up, or
blocking navigation channels, or that present environmental risks such
as leaking fuel or other hazardous substances. The department must
develop criteria, in the form of informal guidelines, to prioritize
removal projects associated with this chapter, but may not consider
whether the applicant is a state or local entity when prioritizing.
The guidelines must also include guidance to the authorized public
entities as to what removal activities and associated costs are
reasonable and eligible for reimbursement.
(3) The department must keep all authorized public entities
apprised of the balance of the derelict vessel removal account and the
funds available for reimbursement. The guidelines developed by the
department must also be made available to the other authorized public
entities. This subsection (3) must be satisfied by utilizing the least
costly method, including maintaining the information on the
department's internet web site, or any other cost-effective method.
(4) An authorized public entity may contribute its ten percent of
costs that are not eligible for reimbursement by using in-kind
services, including the use of existing staff, equipment, and
volunteers.
(5) This chapter does not guarantee reimbursement for an authorized
public entity. Authorized public entities seeking certainty in
reimbursement prior to taking action under this chapter may first
notify the department of their proposed action and the estimated total
costs. Upon notification by an authorized public entity, the
department must make the authorized public entity aware of the status
of the fund and the likelihood of reimbursement being available. The
department may offer technical assistance and assure reimbursement for
up to two years following the removal action if an assurance is
appropriate given the balance of the fund and the details of the
proposed action.

Sec. 604 2013 c 291 s 39 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) By December 31, ((2013)) 2014, the department of natural
resources shall adopt by rule initial procedures and standards for the
vessel inspections required under ((section 38 of this act)) RCW
79.100.150. The procedures and standards must identify the public or
private entities authorized to conduct inspections, the required
elements of an inspection, and the manner in which inspection results
must be documented. The vessel inspection required under this section
must be designed to:
(a) Provide the transferee with current information about the
condition of the vessel, including the condition of its hull and key
operating systems, prior to the transfer;
(b) Provide the department of natural resources with information
under (a) of this subsection for each applicable vessel and, more
broadly, to improve the department's understanding of the condition of
the larger, older boats in the state's waters;
(c) Discourage the future abandonment or dereliction of the vessel;
and
(d) Maximize the efficiency and effectiveness of the inspection
process, including with respect to the time and resources of the
transferor, transferee, and the state.
(2) The department of natural resources shall work with appropriate
government agencies and stakeholders in designing the inspection
process and standards under this section.
(3) This section expires July 31, ((2014)) 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---