BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
INVASIVE SPECIES--MANAGEMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature finds that:
(1) The state's fish, wildlife, and habitat are exceptionally
valuable environmental resources for the state's citizens.
(2) The state's fish, wildlife, and habitat also provide
exceptionally valuable economic, cultural, and recreational resources.
These include hydroelectric power, agriculture, forests, water
supplies, commercial and recreational fisheries, aquaculture, and
public access to outdoor recreational opportunities.
(3) Invasive species pose a grave threat to these environmental and
economic resources, especially to salmon recovery and state and
federally listed threatened and endangered species. Because of the
significant harm invasive species can cause, invasive species
constitute a public nuisance.
(4) If allowed to become established, invasive species can threaten
human health and cause environmental and economic disasters affecting
not only our state, but other states and nations.
(5) The risk of invasive species spreading into Washington
increases as travel and commerce grows in volume and efficiency.
(6) Prevention of invasive species is a cost-effective, successful,
and proven management strategy. Prevention is the state's highest
management priority with an emphasis on education and outreach,
inspections, and rapid response.
(7) The integrated management of invasive species through pathways
regulated by the department is critical to preventing the introduction
and spread of a broad range of such species, including plants,
diseases, and parasites.
(8) Washington's citizens must work together to protect the state
from invasive species.
(9) Public and private partnerships, cooperative agreements, and
compacts are important for preventing new arrivals and managing
existing populations of invasive species, and coordinating these
actions on local, state, national, and international levels.
(10) The department requires authority for this mission to
effectively counter the unpredictable nature of invasive species'
introductions and spread, enable the utilization of new advances in
invasive ecology science, and implement applicable techniques and
technology to address invasive species.
(11) An integrated management approach provides the best way for
the state to manage invasive species and includes opportunities for
creating an informed public, encouraging public involvement, and
striving for local, regional, national, and international cooperation
and consistency on management standards. An integrated management
approach also applies sound science to minimize the chance that
invasive species used for beneficial purposes will result in
environmental harm.
(12) This chapter provides authority for the department to
effectively address invasive species using an integrated management
approach.
(13) The department of fish and wildlife currently has sufficient
statutory authority to effectively address invasive species risks posed
through discharge of ballast water under chapter 77.120 RCW and by
private sector shellfish aquaculture operations regulated under chapter
77.115 RCW. The programs developed by the department under these
chapters embody the principles of prevention as the highest priority,
integrated management of pathways, public-private partnerships, clean
and drain principles, and rapid response capabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aquatic conveyance" means transportable personal property
having the potential to move an aquatic invasive species from one
aquatic environment to another. Aquatic conveyances include but are
not limited to watercraft and associated equipment, float planes,
construction equipment, fish tanker trucks, hydroelectric and
irrigation equipment, personal fishing and hunting gear, and materials
used for aquatic habitat mitigation or restoration.
(2) "Aquatic invasive species" means an invasive species of the
animal kingdom with a life cycle that is at least partly dependent upon
fresh, brackish, or marine waters. Examples include nutria, waterfowl,
amphibians, fish, and shellfish.
(3) "Aquatic plant" means a native or nonnative emergent,
submersed, partially submersed, free-floating, or floating-leaved plant
species that is dependent upon fresh, brackish, or marine water
ecosystems and includes all stages of development and parts.
(4) "Certificate of inspection" means a department-approved
document that declares, to the extent technically or measurably
possible, that an aquatic conveyance does not carry or contain an
invasive species. Certification may be in the form of a decal, label,
rubber stamp imprint, tag, permit, locking seal, or written statement.
(5) "Clean and drain" means to remove the following from areas on
or within an aquatic conveyance to the extent technically and
measurably possible:
(a) Visible native and nonnative aquatic animals, plants, or other
organisms; and
(b) Raw water.
(6) "Commercial watercraft" means a management category of aquatic
conveyances:
(a) Required to have valid marine documentation as a vessel of the
United States or similar required documentation for a country other
than the United States; and
(b) Not subject to watercraft registration requirements under
chapter 88.02 RCW or ballast water requirements under chapter 77.120
RCW.
(7) "Cryptogenic species" means a species that scientists cannot
commonly agree are native or nonnative or are part of the animal
kingdom.
(8) "Decontaminate" means, to the extent technically and measurably
possible, the application of a treatment to kill, destroy, remove, or
otherwise eliminate all known or suspected invasive species carried on
or contained within an aquatic conveyance or structural property by use
of physical, chemical, or other methods. Decontamination treatments
may include drying an aquatic conveyance for a time sufficient to kill
aquatic invasive species through desiccation.
(9) "Detect" means the verification of invasive species' presence
as defined by the department.
(10) "Eradicate" means, to the extent technically and measurably
possible, to kill, destroy, remove, or otherwise eliminate an invasive
species from a water body or property using physical, chemical, or
other methods.
(11) "Infested site management" means management actions as
provided under section 109 of this act that may include long-term
actions to contain, control, or eradicate a prohibited species.
(12) "Introduce" means to intentionally or unintentionally release,
place, or allow the escape, dissemination, or establishment of an
invasive species on or into a water body or property as a result of
human activity or a failure to act.
(13) "Invasive species" means nonnative species of the animal
kingdom that are not naturally occurring in Washington for purposes of
breeding, resting, or foraging, and that pose an invasive risk of
harming or threatening the state's environmental, economic, or human
resources. Invasive species include all stages of species development
and body parts. They may also include genetically modified or
cryptogenic species.
(14) "Invasive species council" means the Washington invasive
species council established in RCW 79A.25.310 or a similar
collaborative state agency forum. The term includes the council and
all of its officers, employees, agents, and contractors.
(15) "Mandatory check station" means a location where a person
transporting an aquatic conveyance must stop and allow the conveyance
to be inspected for aquatic invasive species.
(16) "Possess" means to have authority over the use of an invasive
species or use of an aquatic conveyance that may carry or contain an
invasive species. For the purposes of this subsection, "authority
over" includes the ability to intentionally or unintentionally hold,
import, export, transport, purchase, sell, barter, distribute, or
propagate an invasive species.
(17) "Prohibited species" means a classification category of
nonnative species as provided in section 104 of this act.
(18) "Property" means both real and personal property.
(19) "Quarantine declaration" means a management action as provided
under section 107 of this act involving the prohibition or conditioning
of the movement of aquatic conveyances and waters from a place or an
area that is likely to contain a prohibited species.
(20) "Rapid response" means expedited management actions as
provided under section 108 of this act triggered when invasive species
are detected, for the time-sensitive purpose of containing or
eradicating the species before it spreads or becomes further
established.
(21) "Raw water" means water from a water body and held on or
within property. "Raw water" does not include water from precipitation
that is captured in a conveyance, structure, or depression that is not
otherwise intended to function as a water body, or water from a potable
water supply system, unless the water contains visible aquatic
organisms.
(22) "Regulated species" means a classification category of
nonnative species as provided in section 104 of this act.
(23) "Registered watercraft" means a management category of aquatic
conveyances required to register as vessels under RCW 88.02.550 or
similar requirements for a state other than Washington or a country
other than the United States.
(24) "Seaplane" means a management category of aquatic conveyances
capable of landing on or taking off from water and required to register
as an aircraft under RCW 47.68.250 or similar registration in a state
other than Washington or a country other than the United States.
(25) "Small watercraft" means a management category of aquatic
conveyances:
(a) Including inflatable and hard-shell watercraft used or capable
of being used as a means of transportation on the water, such as
kayaks, canoes, sailboats, and rafts that:
(i) Do not meet watercraft registration requirements under chapter
88.02 RCW; and
(ii) Are ten feet or more in length with or without mechanical
propulsion or less than ten feet in length and fitted with mechanical
propulsion.
(b) Excluding nonmotorized aquatic conveyances of any size not
designed or modified to be used as a means of transportation on the
water, such as inflatable air mattresses and tubes, beach and water
toys, surf boards, and paddle boards.
(26) "Water body" means an area that carries or contains a
collection of water, regardless of whether the feature carrying or
containing the water is natural or nonnatural. Examples include
basins, bays, coves, streams, rivers, springs, lakes, wetlands,
reservoirs, ponds, tanks, irrigation canals, and ditches.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 (1) The department is the lead agency for
managing invasive species of the animal kingdom statewide. This lead
responsibility excludes pests, domesticated animals, or livestock
managed by the department of agriculture under Titles 15, 16, and 17
RCW, forest invasive insect and disease species managed by the
department of natural resources under Title 76 RCW, and mosquito and
algae control and shellfish sanitation managed by the department of
health under Titles 69, 70, and 90 RCW.
(2) Subject to the availability of funding for these specific
purposes, the department may:
(a) Develop and implement integrated invasive species management
actions and programs authorized by this chapter, including rapid
response, early detection and monitoring, prevention, containment,
control, eradication, and enforcement;
(b) Establish and maintain an invasive species outreach and
education program, in coordination with the Washington invasive species
council, that covers public, commercial, and professional pathways and
interests;
(c) Align management classifications, standards, and enforcement
provisions by rule with regional, national, and international standards
and enforcement provisions;
(d) Manage invasive species to support the preservation of native
species, salmon recovery, and the overall protection of threatened or
endangered species;
(e) Participate in local, state, regional, national, and
international efforts regarding invasive species to support the intent
of this chapter;
(f) Provide technical assistance or other support to tribes,
federal agencies, local governments, and private groups to promote an
informed public and assist the department in meeting the intent of this
chapter;
(g) Enter into partnerships, cooperative agreements, and state or
interstate compacts as necessary to accomplish the intent of this
chapter;
(h) Research and develop invasive species management tools,
including standard methods for decontaminating aquatic conveyances and
controlling or eradicating invasive species from water bodies and
properties;
(i) Post invasive species signs and information at port districts,
privately or publicly owned marinas, state parks, and all boat launches
owned or leased by state agencies or political subdivisions; and
(j) Adopt rules as needed to implement the provisions of this
chapter.
(3) The department may delegate selected and clearly identified
elements of its authorities and duties to another agency of the state
with appropriate expertise or administrative capacity upon cooperative
agreement with that agency. This delegation may include provisions of
funding for implementation of the delegations. The department retains
primary authority and responsibility for all requirements of this
chapter unless otherwise directed in this chapter.
(4) This chapter does not apply to the possession or introduction
of nonnative aquatic animal species by:
(a) Ballast water held or discharged by vessels regulated under
chapter 77.120 RCW; or
(b) Private sector aquaculture operations, transfers, or
conveyances regulated under chapter 77.115 RCW.
(5) This chapter does not preempt or replace other department
species classification systems or other management requirements under
this title. However, the department must streamline invasive species
requirements under this chapter into existing permits and cooperative
agreements as possible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 (1) The department, in consultation with
the invasive species council, may classify or reclassify and list by
rule nonnative aquatic animal species as prohibited level 1, level 2,
or level 3, based on the degree of invasive risk, the type of
management action required, and resources available to conduct the
management action.
(a) Species classified as prohibited level 1 pose a high invasive
risk and are a priority for prevention and expedited rapid response
management actions.
(b) Species classified as prohibited level 2 pose a high invasive
risk and are a priority for long-term infested site management actions.
(c) Species classified as prohibited level 3 pose a moderate to
high invasive risk and may be appropriate for prevention, rapid
response, or other prohibited species management plan actions by the
department, another agency, a local government, tribes, or the public.
(2) The department, in consultation with the invasive species
council, may classify and list by rule regulated type A species. This
classification is used for nonnative aquatic animal species that pose
a low to moderate invasive risk that can be managed based on intended
use or geographic scope of introduction, have a beneficial use, and are
a priority for department-led or department-approved management of the
species' beneficial use and invasive risks.
(3) Nonnative aquatic animal species not classified as prohibited
level 1, level 2, or level 3 under subsection (1) of this section, or
as regulated type A species under subsection (2) of this section, are
automatically managed statewide as regulated type B species or
regulated type C species and do not require listing by rule.
(a) Species managed as regulated type B pose a low or unknown
invasive risk and are possessed for personal or commercial purposes,
such as for aquariums, live food markets, or as nondomesticated pets.
(b) Species managed as regulated type C pose a low or unknown
invasive risk and include all other species that do not meet the
criteria for management as a regulated type B invasive species.
(4) Classification of prohibited and regulated species:
(a) May be by individual species or larger taxonomic groups up to
the family name;
(b) Must align, as practical and appropriate, with regional and
national classification levels;
(c) Must be statewide unless otherwise designated by a water body,
property, or other geographic region or area; and
(d) May define general possession and introduction conditions
acceptable under department authorization, a permit, or as otherwise
provided by rule.
(5) Prior to or at the time of classifying species by rule as
prohibited or regulated under subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
the department, in consultation with the invasive species council, must
adopt rules establishing standards for determining invasive risk levels
and criteria for determining beneficial use that take into
consideration environmental impacts, and especially effects on the
preservation of native species, salmon recovery, and threatened or
endangered species.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 (1) Until the department adopts rules
classifying species pursuant to chapter 77.--- RCW (the new chapter
created in section 122 of this act), species and classifications
identified in this section are automatically managed as follows:
(a) Zebra mussels (Dreissena polymorpha), quagga mussels (Dreissena
rostriformis bugensis), European green crab (Carcinus maenas), and all
members of the genus Eriocheir (including Chinese mitten crab), all
members of the walking catfish family (Clariidae), all members of the
snakehead family (Channidae), silver carp (Hypophthalmichthys
molitrix), largescale silver carp (Hypophthalmichthys harmandi), black
carp (Mylopharyngodon piceus), and bighead carp (Hypophthalmichthys
nobilis) are prohibited level 1 species statewide;
(b) Prohibited aquatic animal species classified under WAC 220-12-090(1), in effect on July 1, 2014, except those as noted in this
subsection are prohibited level 3 species statewide;
(c) Regulated aquatic animal species classified under WAC 220-12-090(2), in effect on July 1, 2014, are regulated type A species
statewide; and
(d) Nonnative aquatic animal species classified as game fish under
WAC 232-12-019, in effect on July 1, 2014, or food fish under WAC 220-12-010, in effect on July 1, 2014, are regulated type A species
statewide.
(2) The department, in consultation with the invasive species
council, may change these classifications by rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 (1) Prohibited level 1, level 2, and level
3 species may not be possessed, introduced on or into a water body or
property, or trafficked, without department authorization, a permit, or
as otherwise provided by rule.
(2) Regulated type A, type B, and type C species may not be
introduced on or into a water body or property without department
authorization, a permit, or as otherwise provided by rule.
(3) Regulated type B species, when being actively used for
commercial purposes, must be readily and clearly identified in writing
by taxonomic species name or subspecies name to distinguish the
subspecies from another prohibited species or a regulated type A
species. Nothing in this section precludes using additional
descriptive language or trade names to describe regulated type B
species as long as the labeling requirements of this section are met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 (1) If the department determines it is
necessary to protect the environmental, economic, or human health
interests of the state from the threat of a prohibited level 1 or level
2 species, the department may declare a quarantine against a water
body, property, or region within the state. The department may
prohibit or condition the movement of aquatic conveyances and waters
from such a quarantined place or area that are likely to contain a
prohibited species.
(2) A quarantine declaration under this section may be implemented
separately or in conjunction with rapid response management actions
under section 108 of this act and infested site management actions
under section 109 of this act in a manner and for a duration necessary
to protect the interests of the state from the threat of a prohibited
level 1 or level 2 species. A quarantine declaration must include:
(a) The reasons for the action including the prohibited level 1 or
level 2 species triggering the quarantine;
(b) The boundaries of the area affected;
(c) The action timeline;
(d) Types of aquatic conveyances and waters affected by the
quarantine and any prohibition or conditions on the movement of those
aquatic conveyances and waters from the quarantine area; and
(e) Inspection and decontamination requirements for aquatic
conveyances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 (1) The department may implement rapid
response management actions where a prohibited level 1 species is
detected in or on a water body or property. Rapid response management
actions may: Include expedited actions to contain, control, or
eradicate the prohibited species; and, if applicable, be implemented in
conjunction with a quarantine declaration. Rapid response management
actions must be terminated by the department when it determines that
the targeted prohibited level 1 species are:
(a) Eradicated;
(b) Contained or controlled without need for further management
actions;
(c) Reclassified for that water body; or
(d) Being managed under infested site management actions pursuant
to section 109 of this act.
(2) If a rapid response management action exceeds seven days, the
department may implement an incident command system for rapid response
management including scope, duration, and types of actions and to
support mutual assistance and cooperation between the department and
other affected state and federal agencies, tribes, local governments,
and private water body or property owners. The purpose of this system
is to coordinate a rapid, effective, and efficient response to contain,
control, and eradicate if feasible, a prohibited level 1 species.
Mutual assistance and coordination by other state agencies is
especially important to assist the department in expediting necessary
state and federal environmental permits.
(3) The department may enter into cooperative agreements with
national, regional, state, and local rapid response management action
partners to establish incident command system structures, secure or
prepare submission-ready environmental permits, and identify mutual
assistance commitments in preparation for potential future actions.
(4) The department may perform simulated rapid response exercises,
testing, or other training activities to prepare for future rapid
response management actions.
(5) In implementing rapid response management actions, the
department may enter upon property consistent with the process
established under section 120 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 (1) The department may implement infested
site management actions where a prohibited level 2 species is detected
in or on a water body or property. Infested site management actions
may: Include long-term actions to contain, control, or eradicate the
prohibited species; and, if applicable, be implemented in conjunction
with a quarantine declaration. Infested site management actions must
be terminated by the department when it determines that the targeted
prohibited level 2 species are:
(a) Eradicated;
(b) Contained or controlled without need for further management
actions; or
(c) Reclassified for that water body.
(2) The department must consult with affected state and federal
agencies, tribes, local governments, and private water body or property
owners prior to implementing infested site management actions. The
purpose of the consultation is to support mutual assistance and
cooperation in providing an effective and efficient response to
contain, control, and eradicate, if feasible, a prohibited level 2
species.
(3) The department may enter into cooperative agreements with
national, regional, state, and local infested site management action
partners to establish management responsibilities, secure or prepare
submission-ready environmental permits, and identify mutual assistance
commitments.
(4) In implementing infested site management actions, the
department may enter upon property consistent with the process
established under section 120 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 (1) To the extent possible, the
department's quarantine declarations under section 107 of this act,
rapid response management actions under section 108 of this act, and
infested site management actions under section 109 of this act must be
implemented in a manner best suited to contain, control, and eradicate
prohibited level 1 and level 2 species while protecting human safety,
minimizing adverse environmental impacts to a water body or property,
and minimizing adverse economic impacts to owners of an affected water
body or property.
(2) The department is the lead agency for quarantine declarations,
rapid response, and infested site management actions. Where the
infested water body is subject to tribal, federal, or other sovereign
jurisdiction, the department:
(a) Must consult with appropriate federal agencies, tribal
governments, other states, and Canadian government entities to develop
and implement coordinated management actions on affected water bodies
under shared jurisdiction;
(b) May assist in infested site management actions where these
actions may prevent the spread of prohibited species into state water
bodies; and
(c) May assist other states and Canadian government entities, in
the Columbia river basin, in management actions on affected water
bodies outside of the state where these actions may prevent the spread
of the species into state water bodies.
(3)(a) The department must provide notice of quarantine
declarations, rapid response, and infested site management actions to
owners of an affected water body or property. Notice may be provided
by any reasonable means, such as in person, by United States postal
service, by publication in a local newspaper, by electronic publication
including social media or postings on the department's public web site,
or by posting signs at the water body.
(b) The department must provide updates to owners of an affected
water body or property based on management action type as follows:
(i) Every seven days for a rapid response management action and, if
applicable, a quarantine declaration implemented in conjunction with a
rapid response management action;
(ii) Every six months for a separate quarantine declaration;
(iii) Annually for the duration of an infested site management
action and, if applicable, a quarantine declaration implemented in
conjunction with an infested site management action; and
(iv) A final update at the conclusion of any management action.
(c) In addition to owners of an affected water body or property,
the department must provide notice of a quarantine declaration to
members of the public by any reasonable means for an area subject to a
quarantine declaration, such as by publication in a local newspaper, by
electronic publication including social media or postings on the
department's public web site, or by posting signs at the water body.
The department must provide updates at reasonable intervals and a final
update at the conclusion of the quarantine declaration.
(4) The department must publicly list those water bodies or
portions of water bodies in which a prohibited level 1 or level 2
species has been detected. The department may list those areas in
which a prohibited level 3 species has been detected.
(5) When posting signs at a water body or property where a
prohibited species has been detected, the department must consult with
owners of the affected water body or property regarding placement of
those signs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 (1) If the director finds that there
exists an imminent danger of a prohibited level 1 or level 2 species
detection that seriously endangers or threatens the environment,
economy, human health, or well-being of the state of Washington, the
director must ask the governor to order, under RCW 43.06.010(14),
emergency measures to prevent or abate the prohibited species. The
director's findings must contain an evaluation of the effect of the
emergency measures on environmental factors such as fish listed under
the endangered species act, economic factors such as public and private
access, human health factors such as water quality, or well-being
factors such as cultural resources.
(2) If an emergency is declared pursuant to RCW 43.06.010(14), the
director may consult with the invasive species council to advise the
governor on emergency measures necessary under RCW 43.06.010(14) and
this section, and make subsequent recommendations to the governor. The
invasive species council must involve owners of the affected water body
or property, state and local governments, federal agencies, tribes,
public health interests, technical service providers, and environmental
organizations, as appropriate.
(3) Upon the governor's approval of emergency measures, the
director may implement these measures to prevent, contain, control, or
eradicate invasive species that are the subject of the emergency order,
notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 15.58 or 17.21 RCW or any
other statute. These measures, after evaluation of all other
alternatives, may include the surface and aerial application of
pesticides.
(4) The director must continually evaluate the effects of the
emergency measures and report these to the governor at intervals of not
less than ten days. The director must immediately advise the governor
if the director finds that the emergency no longer exists or if certain
emergency measures should be discontinued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 (1) A person in possession of an aquatic
conveyance who enters Washington by road, air, or water is required to
have a certificate of inspection. A person must provide this
certificate of inspection upon request by a fish and wildlife officer
or ex officio fish and wildlife officer.
(2) The department must adopt rules to implement this section
including:
(a) Types of aquatic conveyances required to have a certificate of
inspection;
(b) Allowable certificate of inspection forms including passport
type systems and integration with existing similar permits;
(c) Situations when authorization can be obtained for transporting
an aquatic conveyance not meeting inspection requirements to a
specified location within the state where certificate of inspection
requirements can be provided; and
(d) Situations where aquatic conveyances are using shared boundary
waters of the state, such as portions of the Columbia river, lake
Osoyoos, and the Puget Sound.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 (1) A person in possession of an aquatic
conveyance must meet clean and drain requirements after the
conveyance's use in or on a water body or property. A certificate of
inspection is not needed to meet clean and drain requirements.
(2) A fish and wildlife officer or ex officio fish and wildlife
officer may order a person transporting an aquatic conveyance not
meeting clean and drain requirements to:
(a) Clean and drain the conveyance at the discovery site, if the
department determines there are sufficient resources available; or
(b) Transport the conveyance to a reasonably close location where
resources are sufficient to meet the clean and drain requirements.
(3) This section may be enforced immediately on the transportation
of aquatic plants by registered watercraft, small watercraft,
seaplanes, and commercial watercraft. The department must adopt rules
to implement all other aspects of clean and drain requirements,
including:
(a) Other types of aquatic conveyances subject to this requirement;
(b) When transport of an aquatic conveyance is authorized if clean
and drain services are not readily available at the last water body
used; and
(c) Exemptions to clean and drain requirements where the department
determines there is minimal risk of spreading invasive species.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 (1) The department may establish mandatory
check stations to inspect aquatic conveyances for clean and drain
requirements and aquatic invasive species. The check stations must be
operated by at least one fish and wildlife officer, an ex officio fish
and wildlife officer in coordination with the department, or
department-authorized representative, and must be plainly marked by
signs and operated in a safe manner.
(2) Aquatic conveyances required to stop at mandatory check
stations include registered watercraft, commercial watercraft, and
small watercraft. The department may establish rules governing other
types of aquatic conveyances that must stop at mandatory check
stations. The rules must provide sufficient guidance so that a person
transporting the aquatic conveyance readily understands that he or she
is required to stop.
(3) A person who encounters a mandatory check station while
transporting an aquatic conveyance must:
(a) Stop at the mandatory check station;
(b) Allow the aquatic conveyance to be inspected for clean and
drain requirements and aquatic invasive species;
(c) Follow clean and drain orders if clean and drain requirements
are not met pursuant to section 113 of this act; and
(d) Follow decontamination orders pursuant to section 115 of this
act if an aquatic invasive species is found.
(4) A person who complies with the department directives under this
section is exempt from criminal penalties under sections 205 and 206 of
this act, civil penalties under RCW 77.15.160(4), and civil forfeiture
under RCW 77.15.070, unless the person has a prior conviction for an
invasive species violation within the past five years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 (1) Upon discovery of an aquatic
conveyance that carries or contains an aquatic invasive species without
department authorization, a permit, or as otherwise provided by rule,
a fish and wildlife officer or ex officio fish and wildlife officer may
issue a decontamination order:
(a) Requiring decontamination at the discovery site, if the
situation presents a low risk of aquatic invasive species introduction,
and sufficient department resources are available at the discovery
site;
(b) Prohibiting the launch of the aquatic conveyance in a water
body until decontamination is completed and certified, if the situation
presents a low risk of aquatic invasive species introduction, and
sufficient department resources are not available at the discovery
site;
(c) Requiring immediate transport of the conveyance to an approved
decontamination station, and prohibiting the launch of the conveyance
in a water body until decontamination is completed and certified, if
the situation presents a moderate risk of aquatic invasive species
introduction, and sufficient department resources are not available at
the discovery site; or
(d) Seizing and transporting the aquatic conveyance to an approved
decontamination station until decontamination is completed and
certified, if the situation presents a high risk of aquatic invasive
species introduction, and sufficient department resources are not
available at the discovery site.
(2) The person possessing the aquatic conveyance that is subject to
orders issued under subsection (1)(b) through (d) of this section must
bear any costs for seizure, transportation, or decontamination.
(3) Orders issued under subsection (1)(b) through (d) of this
section must be in writing and must include notice of the opportunity
for a hearing pursuant to section 116 of this act to determine the
validity of the orders.
(4) If a decontamination order is issued under subsection (1)(d) of
this section, the department may seize the aquatic conveyance for two
working days or a reasonable additional period of time thereafter as
needed to meet decontamination requirements. The decontamination
period must be based on factors including conveyance size and
complexity, type and number of aquatic invasive species present, and
decontamination station resource capacity.
(5) If an aquatic conveyance is subject to forfeiture under RCW
77.15.070, the timelines and other provisions under that section apply
to the seizure.
(6) Upon decontamination and issuing a certificate of inspection,
an aquatic conveyance must be released to the person in possession of
the aquatic conveyance at the time the decontamination order was
issued, or to the owner of the aquatic conveyance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 (1) A person aggrieved or adversely
affected by a quarantine declaration under section 107 of this act, a
rapid response management action under section 108 of this act, an
infested site management action under section 109 of this act, or a
decontamination order under section 115 of this act may contest the
validity of the department's actions by requesting a hearing in writing
within twenty days of the department's actions.
(2) Hearings must be conducted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW and
the burden of demonstrating the invalidity of agency action is on the
party asserting invalidity. The hearing may be conducted by the
director or the director's designee and may occur telephonically.
(3) A hearing on a decontamination order is limited to the issues
of whether decontamination was necessary and the reasonableness of
costs assessed for any seizure, transportation, and decontamination.
If the person in possession of the aquatic conveyance that was
decontaminated prevails at the hearing, the person is entitled to
reimbursement by the department for any costs assessed by the
department or decontamination station operator for the seizure,
transportation, and decontamination. If the department prevails at the
hearing, the department is not responsible for and may not reimburse
any costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 (1) The department may operate aquatic
conveyance inspection and decontamination stations statewide for
voluntary use by the public or for mandatory use where directed by the
department to meet inspection and decontamination requirements of this
chapter. Decontamination stations can be part of or separate from
inspection stations. Inspection and decontamination stations are
separate from commercial vehicle weigh stations operated by the
Washington state patrol.
(2) Inspection station staff must inspect aquatic conveyances to
determine whether the conveyances carry or contain aquatic invasive
species. If an aquatic conveyance is free of aquatic invasive species,
then inspection station staff must issue a certificate of inspection.
A certificate of inspection is valid until the conveyance's next use in
a water body.
(3) If a conveyance carries or contains aquatic invasive species,
then inspection station staff must require the conveyance's
decontamination before issuing a certificate of inspection. The
certificate of inspection is valid until the conveyance's next use in
a water body.
(4) The department must identify, in a way that is readily
available to the public, the location and contact information for
inspection and decontamination stations.
(5) The department must adopt by rule standards for inspection and
decontamination that, where practical and appropriate, align with
regional, national, and international standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 (1) The department may authorize
representatives to operate its inspection and decontamination stations
and mandatory check stations. Department-authorized representatives
may be department volunteers, other law enforcement agencies, or
independent businesses.
(2) The department must adopt rules governing the types of services
that department-authorized representatives may perform under this
chapter.
(3) Department-authorized representatives must have official
identification, training, and administrative capacity to fulfill their
responsibilities under this section.
(4) Within two years of the effective date of this section, the
department must provide the legislature with recommendations for a fee
schedule that department-authorized representatives may charge users
whose aquatic conveyances receive inspection and decontamination
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 (1) The aquatic invasive species
prevention account is created in the state treasury. All receipts
directed to the account from RCW 88.02.640, as well as legislative
appropriations, gifts, donations, fees, and penalties for aquatic
invasive species management received under this chapter, must be
deposited into the account.
(2) Expenditures from the account may only be used to implement the
provisions of this chapter.
(3) Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 (1) The department may enter upon a
property or water body at any reasonable time for the purpose of
administering this chapter, including inspecting and decontaminating
aquatic conveyances, collecting invasive species samples, implementing
rapid response management actions or infested site management actions,
and containing, controlling, or eradicating invasive species.
(2) Prior to entering the property or water body, the department
shall make a reasonable attempt to notify the owner of the property or
water body as to the purpose and need for the entry. Should the
department be denied access to any property or water body where access
is sought for the purposes set forth in this chapter, the department
may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for a warrant
authorizing access to the property.
(3) Upon such an application, the court may issue the warrant for
the purposes requested where the court finds reasonable cause to
believe it is necessary to achieve the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121 The provisions of this chapter must be
liberally construed to carry out the intent of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 Sections 102 through 104, 106 through 119,
and 120 and 121 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

PART 2
INVASIVE SPECIES--ENFORCEMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 77.15
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Based upon reasonable suspicion that a person possesses an
aquatic conveyance that has not been cleaned and drained or carries or
contains aquatic invasive species in violation of this title, fish and
wildlife officers or ex officio fish and wildlife officers may
temporarily stop the person and inspect the aquatic conveyance for
compliance with the requirements of this title.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in both RCW 77.08.010 and section 102 of this act apply throughout this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to chapter 77.15
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Upon a showing of probable cause that there has been a
violation of an invasive species law of the state of Washington, or
upon a showing of probable cause to believe that evidence of such a
violation may be found at a place, a court must issue a search warrant
or arrest warrant. Fish and wildlife officers or ex officio fish and
wildlife officers may execute any such search or arrest warrant
reasonably necessary to carry out their duties under this title with
regard to an invasive species law and may seize invasive species or any
evidence of a crime and the fruits or instrumentalities of a crime as
provided by warrant. The court may have property opened or entered and
the contents examined.
(2) Seizure of property as evidence of a crime does not preclude
seizure of the property for forfeiture as authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 77.15
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Upon a showing of probable cause that a water body or property
has an invasive species in or on it, and the owner refuses permission
to allow inspection of the water body or property, a court in the
county in which the water body or property is located may, upon the
request of the director or the director's designee, issue a warrant to
the director or the director's designee authorizing the taking of
specimens of invasive species, general inspection of the property or
water body, and the performance of containment, eradication, or control
work.
(2) Application for issuance, execution, and return of the warrant
authorized by this section must be in accordance with the applicable
rules of the superior courts or the district courts.

Sec. 204 RCW 77.15.160 and 2013 c 307 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following acts are infractions and must be cited and punished
as provided under chapter 7.84 RCW:
(1) Fishing and shellfishing infractions:
(a) Barbed hooks: Fishing for personal use with barbed hooks in
violation of any department rule.
(b) Catch recording: Failing to immediately record a catch of fish
or shellfish on a catch record card as required by RCW 77.32.430 or
department rule.
(c) Catch reporting: Failing to return a catch record card to the
department for other than Puget Sound Dungeness crab, as required by
department rule.
(d) Recreational fishing: Fishing for fish or shellfish and,
without yet possessing fish or shellfish, the person:
(i) Owns, but fails to have in the person's possession the license
or the catch record card required by chapter 77.32 RCW for such an
activity; or
(ii) Violates any department rule regarding seasons, closed areas,
closed times, or any other rule addressing the manner or method of
fishing for fish or shellfish. This subsection does not apply to use
of a net to take fish under RCW 77.15.580 or the unlawful use of
shellfish gear for personal use under RCW 77.15.382.
(e) Seaweed: Taking, possessing, or harvesting less than two times
the daily possession limit of seaweed:
(i) While owning, but not having in the person's possession, the
license required by chapter 77.32 RCW; or
(ii) In violation of any rule of the department or the department
of natural resources regarding seasons, closed areas, closed times, or
any other rule addressing the manner or method of taking, possessing,
or harvesting of seaweed.
(f) Unclassified fish or shellfish: Taking unclassified fish or
shellfish in violation of any department rule by killing, fishing,
taking, holding, possessing, or maliciously injuring or harming fish or
shellfish that is not classified as game fish, food fish, shellfish,
protected fish, or endangered fish.
(g) Wasting fish or shellfish: Killing, taking, or possessing fish
or shellfish having a value of less than two hundred fifty dollars and
allowing the fish or shellfish to be wasted.
(2) Hunting infractions:
(a) Eggs or nests: Maliciously, and without permit authorization,
destroying, taking, or harming the eggs or active nests of a wild bird
not classified as endangered or protected. For purposes of this
subsection, "active nests" means nests that contain eggs or fledglings.
(b) Unclassified wildlife: Taking unclassified wildlife in
violation of any department rule by killing, hunting, taking, holding,
possessing, or maliciously injuring or harming wildlife that is not
classified as big game, game animals, game birds, protected wildlife,
or endangered wildlife.
(c) Wasting wildlife: Killing, taking, or possessing wildlife that
is not classified as big game and has a value of less than two hundred
fifty dollars, and allowing the wildlife to be wasted.
(d) Wild animals: Hunting for wild animals not classified as big
game and, without yet possessing the wild animals, the person owns, but
fails to have in the person's possession, all licenses, tags, or
permits required by this title.
(e) Wild birds: Hunting for and, without yet possessing a wild
bird or birds, the person:
(i) Owns, but fails to have in the person's possession, all
licenses, tags, stamps, and permits required under this title; or
(ii) Violates any department rule regarding seasons, closed areas,
closed times, or any other rule addressing the manner or method of
hunting wild birds.
(3) Trapping, taxidermy, fur dealing, and wildlife meat cutting
infractions:
(a) Recordkeeping and reporting: If a person is a taxidermist, fur
dealer, or wildlife meat cutter who is processing, holding, or storing
wildlife for commercial purposes, failing to:
(i) Maintain records as required by department rule; or
(ii) Report information from these records as required by
department rule.
(b) Trapper's report: Failing to report trapping activity as
required by department rule.
(4) ((Aquatic invasive species infraction: Entering Washington by
road and transporting a recreational or commercial watercraft that has
been used outside of Washington without meeting documentation
requirements as provided under RCW 77.12.879.)) (a) Invasive species
management infractions:
(i) Out-of-state certification: Entering Washington in possession
of an aquatic conveyance that does not meet certificate of inspection
requirements as provided under section 112 of this act;
(ii) Clean and drain requirements: Possessing an aquatic
conveyance that does not meet clean and drain requirements under
section 113 of this act;
(iii) Clean and drain orders: Possessing an aquatic conveyance and
failing to obey a clean and drain order under section 113 or 114 of
this act; and
(iv) Transporting aquatic plants: Transporting aquatic plants on
any state or public road, including forest roads. However, this
subsection does not apply to plants that are:
(A) Being transported to the department or to another destination
designated by the director, in a manner designated by the department,
for purposes of identifying a species or reporting the presence of a
species;
(B) Legally obtained for aquarium use, wetland or lakeshore
restoration, or ornamental purposes;
(C) Located within or on a commercial aquatic plant harvester that
is being transported to a suitable location to remove aquatic plants;
(D) Being transported in a manner that prevents their unintentional
dispersal, to a suitable location for disposal, research, or
educational purposes; or
(E) Being transported in such a way as the commission may otherwise
prescribe.
(b) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in both RCW 77.08.010 and section 102 of this act apply throughout this
subsection (4).
(5) Other infractions:
(a) Contests: Conducting, holding, or sponsoring a hunting
contest, a fishing contest involving game fish, or a competitive field
trial using live wildlife.
(b) Other rules: Violating any other department rule that is
designated by rule as an infraction.
(c) Posting signs: Posting signs preventing hunting or fishing on
any land not owned or leased by the person doing the posting, or
without the permission of the person who owns, leases, or controls the
land posted.
(d) Scientific permits: Using a scientific permit issued by the
director for fish, shellfish, or wildlife, but not including big game
or big game parts, and the person:
(i) Violates any terms or conditions of the scientific permit; or
(ii) Violates any department rule applicable to the issuance or use
of scientific permits.
(((e) Transporting aquatic plants: Transporting aquatic plants on
any state or public road, including forest roads. However:
(i) This subsection does not apply to plants that are:
(A) Being transported to the department or to another destination
designated by the director, in a manner designated by the department,
for purposes of identifying a species or reporting the presence of a
species;
(B) Legally obtained for aquarium use, wetland or lakeshore
restoration, or ornamental purposes;
(C) Located within or on a commercial aquatic plant harvester that
is being transported to a suitable location to remove aquatic plants;
(D) Being transported in a manner that prevents their unintentional
dispersal, to a suitable location for disposal, research, or
educational purposes; or
(E) Being transported in such a way as the commission may otherwise
prescribe; and
(ii) This subsection does not apply to a person who:
(A) Is stopped at an aquatic invasive species check station and
possesses a recreational or commercial watercraft that is contaminated
with an aquatic invasive plant species if that person complies with all
department directives for the proper decontamination of the watercraft
and equipment; or
(B) Has voluntarily submitted a recreational or commercial
watercraft for inspection by the department or its designee and has
received a receipt verifying that the watercraft has not been
contaminated since its last use.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 A new section is added to chapter 77.15
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful use of invasive species in the
second degree if the person:
(a) Fails to stop at a mandatory check station or to return to the
mandatory check station for inspection if directed to do so by a fish
and wildlife officer or ex officio fish and wildlife officer;
(b) Fails to allow an aquatic conveyance stopped at a mandatory
check station to be inspected for clean and drain requirements or
aquatic invasive species;
(c) Fails to comply with a decontamination order;
(d) Possesses, except in the case of trafficking, a prohibited
level 1 or level 2 species without department authorization, a permit,
or as otherwise provided by rule;
(e) Possesses, introduces on or into a water body or property, or
traffics in a prohibited level 3 species without department
authorization, a permit, or as otherwise provided by rule;
(f) Introduces on or into a water body or property a regulated type
A, type B, or type C species without department authorization, a
permit, or as otherwise provided by rule;
(g) Fails to readily and clearly identify in writing by taxonomic
species name or subspecies name a regulated type B species used for
commercial purposes; or
(h) Knowingly violates a quarantine declaration under section 107
of this act.
(2) A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a gross
misdemeanor. In addition to criminal penalties, a court may order the
person to pay all costs in capturing, killing, or controlling the
invasive species, including its progeny. This subsection does not
affect the authority of the department to bring a separate civil action
to recover habitat restoration costs necessitated by the person's
unlawful use of invasive species.
(3) This section does not apply to:
(a) A person who complies with the department directives pursuant
to section 114 of this act for mandatory check stations. Such a person
is exempt from criminal penalties under this section or section 206 of
this act, and forfeiture under this chapter, unless the person has a
prior conviction under those sections within the past five years;
(b) A person who possesses an aquatic invasive species, if the
person is in the process of:
(i) Removing it from the aquatic conveyance in a manner specified
by the department; or
(ii) Releasing it if caught while fishing and immediately returning
it to the water body from which it came;
(c) Possessing or introducing nonnative aquatic animal species by
ballast water held or discharged by vessels regulated under chapter
77.120 RCW; or
(d) Possessing or introducing nonnative aquatic animal species
through private sector shellfish aquaculture operations, transfers, or
conveyances regulated under chapter 77.115 RCW.
(4) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in both RCW 77.08.010 and section 102 of this act apply throughout this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 A new section is added to chapter 77.15
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful use of invasive species in the
first degree if the person:
(a) Traffics or introduces on or into a water body or property a
prohibited level 1 or level 2 species without department authorization,
a permit, or as otherwise provided by rule; or
(b) Commits a subsequent violation of unlawful use of invasive
species in the second degree within five years of the date of a prior
conviction under section 205 of this act.
(2) A violation of this section is a class C felony. In addition
to criminal penalties, a court may order the person to pay all costs in
managing the invasive species, including the species' progeny. This
subsection does not affect the authority of the department to bring a
separate civil action to recover habitat restoration costs necessitated
by the person's unlawful use of invasive species.
(3) This section does not apply to:
(a) A person who complies with department directives pursuant to
section 114 of this act for mandatory check stations, and who is exempt
from criminal penalties under this section and forfeiture under this
chapter, unless the person has a prior conviction under this section or
section 205 of this act within the past five years; or
(b) A person who possesses an aquatic invasive species, if the
person is in the process of:
(i) Removing it from the aquatic conveyance in a manner specified
by the department; or
(ii) Releasing it if caught while fishing and is immediately
returning it to the water body from which it came.
(4) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in both RCW 77.08.010 and section 102 of this act apply throughout this
section.

PART 3
INVASIVE SPECIES--OTHER PROVISIONS
Sec. 301 RCW 77.08.010 and 2012 c 176 s 4 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this title or
rules adopted under this title unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Anadromous game fish buyer" means a person who purchases or
sells steelhead trout and other anadromous game fish harvested by
Indian fishers lawfully exercising fishing rights reserved by federal
statute, treaty, or executive order, under conditions prescribed by
rule of the director.
(2) "Angling gear" means a line attached to a rod and reel capable
of being held in hand while landing the fish or a hand-held line
operated without rod or reel.
(3) (("Aquatic invasive species" means any invasive, prohibited,
regulated, unregulated, or unlisted aquatic animal or plant species as
defined under subsections (4), (34), (49), (53), (70), and (71) of this
section, aquatic noxious weeds as defined under RCW 17.26.020(5)(c),
and aquatic nuisance species as defined under RCW 77.60.130(1).
(4) "Aquatic plant species" means an emergent, submersed, partially
submersed, free-floating, or floating-leaving plant species that grows
in or near a body of water or wetland.
(5))) "Bag limit" means the maximum number of game animals, game
birds, or game fish which may be taken, caught, killed, or possessed by
a person, as specified by rule of the commission for a particular
period of time, or as to size, sex, or species.
(((6))) (4) "Building" means a private domicile, garage, barn, or
public or commercial building.
(((7))) (5) "Closed area" means a place where the hunting of some
or all species of wild animals or wild birds is prohibited.
(((8))) (6) "Closed season" means all times, manners of taking, and
places or waters other than those established by rule of the commission
as an open season. "Closed season" also means all hunting, fishing,
taking, or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish, food
fish, or shellfish that do not conform to the special restrictions or
physical descriptions established by rule of the commission as an open
season or that have not otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish,
take, harvest, or possess by rule of the commission as an open season.
(((9))) (7) "Closed waters" means all or part of a lake, river,
stream, or other body of water, where fishing or harvesting is
prohibited.
(((10))) (8) "Commercial" means related to or connected with
buying, selling, or bartering.
(((11))) (9) "Commission" means the state fish and wildlife
commission.
(((12))) (10) "Concurrent waters of the Columbia river" means those
waters of the Columbia river that coincide with the Washington-Oregon
state boundary.
(((13))) (11) "Contraband" means any property that is unlawful to
produce or possess.
(((14))) (12) "Deleterious exotic wildlife" means species of the
animal kingdom not native to Washington and designated as dangerous to
the environment or wildlife of the state.
(((15))) (13) "Department" means the department of fish and
wildlife.
(((16))) (14) "Director" means the director of fish and wildlife.
(((17))) (15) "Endangered species" means wildlife designated by the
commission as seriously threatened with extinction.
(((18))) (16) "Ex officio fish and wildlife officer" means:
(a) A commissioned officer of a municipal, county, or state agency
having as its primary function the enforcement of criminal laws in
general, while the officer is acting in the respective jurisdiction of
that agency;
(b) An officer or special agent commissioned by one of the
following: The national marine fisheries service; the Washington state
parks and recreation commission; the United States fish and wildlife
service; the Washington state department of natural resources; the
United States forest service; or the United States parks service, if
the agent or officer is in the respective jurisdiction of the primary
commissioning agency and is acting under a mutual law enforcement
assistance agreement between the department and the primary
commissioning agency;
(c) A commissioned fish and wildlife peace officer from another
state who meets the training standards set by the Washington state
criminal justice training commission pursuant to RCW 10.93.090,
43.101.080, and 43.101.200, and who is acting under a mutual law
enforcement assistance agreement between the department and the primary
commissioning agency; or
(d) A Washington state tribal police officer who successfully
completes the requirements set forth under RCW 43.101.157, is employed
by a tribal nation that has complied with RCW 10.92.020(2) (a) and (b),
and is acting under a mutual law enforcement assistance agreement
between the department and the tribal government.
(((19))) (17) "Fish" includes all species classified as game fish
or food fish by statute or rule, as well as all fin fish not currently
classified as food fish or game fish if such species exist in state
waters. The term "fish" includes all stages of development and the
bodily parts of fish species.
(((20))) (18) "Fish and wildlife officer" means a person appointed
and commissioned by the director, with authority to enforce this title
and rules adopted pursuant to this title, and other statutes as
prescribed by the legislature. Fish and wildlife officer includes a
person commissioned before June 11, 1998, as a wildlife agent or a
fisheries patrol officer.
(((21))) (19) "Fish broker" means a person whose business it is to
bring a seller of fish and shellfish and a purchaser of those fish and
shellfish together.
(((22))) (20) "Fish buyer" means a person engaged by a wholesale
fish dealer to purchase food fish or shellfish from a licensed
commercial fisher.
(((23))) (21) "Fishery" means the taking of one or more particular
species of fish or shellfish with particular gear in a particular
geographical area.
(((24))) (22) "Food, food waste, or other substance" includes human
and pet food or other waste or garbage that could attract large wild
carnivores.
(((25))) (23) "Freshwater" means all waters not defined as
saltwater including, but not limited to, rivers upstream of the river
mouth, lakes, ponds, and reservoirs.
(((26))) (24) "Fur-bearing animals" means game animals that shall
not be trapped except as authorized by the commission.
(((27))) (25) "Fur dealer" means a person who purchases, receives,
or resells raw furs for commercial purposes.
(((28))) (26) "Game animals" means wild animals that shall not be
hunted except as authorized by the commission.
(((29))) (27) "Game birds" means wild birds that shall not be
hunted except as authorized by the commission.
(((30))) (28) "Game farm" means property on which wildlife is held,
confined, propagated, hatched, fed, or otherwise raised for commercial
purposes, trade, or gift. The term "game farm" does not include
publicly owned facilities.
(((31))) (29) "Game reserve" means a closed area where hunting for
all wild animals and wild birds is prohibited.
(((32))) (30) "Illegal items" means those items unlawful to be
possessed.
(((33))) (31)(a) "Intentionally feed, attempt to feed, or attract"
means to purposefully or knowingly provide, leave, or place in, on, or
about any land or building any food, food waste, or other substance
that attracts or could attract large wild carnivores to that land or
building.
(b) "Intentionally feed, attempt to feed, or attract" does not
include keeping food, food waste, or other substance in an enclosed
garbage receptacle or other enclosed container unless specifically
directed by a fish and wildlife officer or animal control authority to
secure the receptacle or container in another manner.
(((34) "Invasive species" means a plant species or a nonnative
animal species that either:
(a) Causes or may cause displacement of, or otherwise threatens,
native species in their natural communities;
(b) Threatens or may threaten natural resources or their use in the
state;
(c) Causes or may cause economic damage to commercial or
recreational activities that are dependent upon state waters; or
(d) Threatens or harms human health.
(35))) (32) "Large wild carnivore" includes wild bear, cougar, and
wolf.
(((36))) (33) "License year" means the period of time for which a
recreational license is valid. The license year begins April 1st, and
ends March 31st.
(((37))) (34) "Limited-entry license" means a license subject to a
license limitation program established in chapter 77.70 RCW.
(((38))) (35) "Money" means all currency, script, personal checks,
money orders, or other negotiable instruments.
(((39))) (36) "Natural person" means a human being.
(((40))) (37)(a) "Negligently feed, attempt to feed, or attract"
means to provide, leave, or place in, on, or about any land or building
any food, food waste, or other substance that attracts or could attract
large wild carnivores to that land or building, without the awareness
that a reasonable person in the same situation would have with regard
to the likelihood that the food, food waste, or other substance could
attract large wild carnivores to the land or building.
(b) "Negligently feed, attempt to feed, or attract" does not
include keeping food, food waste, or other substance in an enclosed
garbage receptacle or other enclosed container unless specifically
directed by a fish and wildlife officer or animal control authority to
secure the receptacle or container in another manner.
(((41))) (38) "Nonresident" means a person who has not fulfilled
the qualifications of a resident.
(((42))) (39) "Offshore waters" means marine waters of the Pacific
Ocean outside the territorial boundaries of the state, including the
marine waters of other states and countries.
(((43))) (40) "Open season" means those times, manners of taking,
and places or waters established by rule of the commission for the
lawful hunting, fishing, taking, or possession of game animals, game
birds, game fish, food fish, or shellfish that conform to the special
restrictions or physical descriptions established by rule of the
commission or that have otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish,
take, harvest, or possess by rule of the commission. "Open season"
includes the first and last days of the established time.
(((44))) (41) "Owner" means the person in whom is vested the
ownership dominion, or title of the property.
(((45))) (42) "Person" means and includes an individual; a
corporation; a public or private entity or organization; a local,
state, or federal agency; all business organizations, including
corporations and partnerships; or a group of two or more individuals
acting with a common purpose whether acting in an individual,
representative, or official capacity.
(((46))) (43) "Personal property" or "property" includes both
corporeal and incorporeal personal property and includes, among other
property, contraband and money.
(((47))) (44) "Personal use" means for the private use of the
individual taking the fish or shellfish and not for sale or barter.
(((48))) (45) "Predatory birds" means wild birds that may be hunted
throughout the year as authorized by the commission.
(((49) "Prohibited aquatic animal species" means an invasive
species of the animal kingdom that has been classified as a prohibited
aquatic animal species by the commission.
(50))) (46) "Protected wildlife" means wildlife designated by the
commission that shall not be hunted or fished.
(((51))) (47) "Raffle" means an activity in which tickets bearing
an individual number are sold for not more than twenty-five dollars
each and in which a permit or permits are awarded to hunt or for access
to hunt big game animals or wild turkeys on the basis of a drawing from
the tickets by the person or persons conducting the raffle.
(((52) "Recreational and commercial watercraft" includes the boat,
as well as equipment used to transport the boat, and any auxiliary
equipment such as attached or detached outboard motors.
(53) "Regulated aquatic animal species" means a potentially
invasive species of the animal kingdom that has been classified as a
regulated aquatic animal species by the commission.
(54))) (48) "Resident" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
77.08.075.
(((55))) (49) "Retail-eligible species" means commercially
harvested salmon, crab, and sturgeon.
(((56))) (50) "Saltwater" means those marine waters seaward of
river mouths.
(((57))) (51) "Seaweed" means marine aquatic plant species that are
dependent upon the marine aquatic or tidal environment, and exist in
either an attached or free floating form, and includes but is not
limited to marine aquatic plants in the classes Chlorophyta,
Phaeophyta, and Rhodophyta.
(((58))) (52) "Senior" means a person seventy years old or older.
(((59))) (53) "Shark fin" means a raw, dried, or otherwise
processed detached fin or tail of a shark.
(((60))) (54)(a) "Shark fin derivative product" means any product
intended for use by humans or animals that is derived in whole or in
part from shark fins or shark fin cartilage.
(b) "Shark fin derivative product" does not include a drug approved
by the United States food and drug administration and available by
prescription only or medical device or vaccine approved by the United
States food and drug administration.
(((61))) (55) "Shellfish" means those species of marine and
freshwater invertebrates that have been classified and that shall not
be taken except as authorized by rule of the commission. The term
"shellfish" includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of
shellfish species.
(((62))) (56) "State waters" means all marine waters and fresh
waters within ordinary high water lines and within the territorial
boundaries of the state.
(((63))) (57) "Taxidermist" means a person who, for commercial
purposes, creates lifelike representations of fish and wildlife using
fish and wildlife parts and various supporting structures.
(((64))) (58) "To fish," "to harvest," and "to take," and their
derivatives means an effort to kill, injure, harass, or catch a fish or
shellfish.
(((65))) (59) "To hunt" and its derivatives means an effort to
kill, injure, capture, or harass a wild animal or wild bird.
(((66))) (60) "To process" and its derivatives mean preparing or
preserving fish, wildlife, or shellfish.
(((67))) (61) "To trap" and its derivatives means a method of
hunting using devices to capture wild animals or wild birds.
(((68))) (62) "Trafficking" means offering, attempting to engage,
or engaging in sale, barter, or purchase of fish, shellfish, wildlife,
or deleterious exotic wildlife.
(((69))) (63) "Unclaimed" means that no owner of the property has
been identified or has requested, in writing, the release of the
property to themselves nor has the owner of the property designated an
individual to receive the property or paid the required postage to
effect delivery of the property.
(((70) "Unlisted aquatic animal species" means a nonnative animal
species that has not been classified as a prohibited aquatic animal
species, a regulated aquatic animal species, or an unregulated aquatic
animal species by the commission.
(71) "Unregulated aquatic animal species" means a nonnative animal
species that has been classified as an unregulated aquatic animal
species by the commission.
(72))) (64) "Wholesale fish dealer" means a person who, acting for
commercial purposes, takes possession or ownership of fish or shellfish
and sells, barters, or exchanges or attempts to sell, barter, or
exchange fish or shellfish that have been landed into the state of
Washington or entered the state of Washington in interstate or foreign
commerce.
(((73))) (65) "Wild animals" means those species of the class
Mammalia whose members exist in Washington in a wild state. The term
"wild animal" does not include feral domestic mammals or old world rats
and mice of the family Muridae of the order Rodentia.
(((74))) (66) "Wild birds" means those species of the class Aves
whose members exist in Washington in a wild state.
(((75))) (67) "Wildlife" means all species of the animal kingdom
whose members exist in Washington in a wild state. This includes but
is not limited to mammals, birds, reptiles, amphibians, fish, and
invertebrates. The term "wildlife" does not include feral domestic
mammals, old world rats and mice of the family Muridae of the order
Rodentia, or those fish, shellfish, and marine invertebrates classified
as food fish or shellfish by the director. The term "wildlife"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of wildlife
members.
(((76))) (68) "Wildlife meat cutter" means a person who packs,
cuts, processes, or stores wildlife for consumption for another for
commercial purposes.
(((77))) (69) "Youth" means a person fifteen years old for fishing
and under sixteen years old for hunting.

Sec. 302 RCW 77.12.020 and 2002 c 281 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director shall investigate the habits and distribution of
the various species of wildlife native to or adaptable to the habitats
of the state. The commission shall determine whether a species should
be managed by the department and, if so, classify it under this
section.
(2) The commission may classify by rule wild animals as game
animals and game animals as fur-bearing animals.
(3) The commission may classify by rule wild birds as game birds or
predatory birds. All wild birds not otherwise classified are protected
wildlife.
(4) In addition to those species listed in RCW 77.08.020, the
commission may classify by rule as game fish other species of the class
Osteichthyes that are commonly found in freshwater except those
classified as food fish by the director.
(5) The director may recommend to the commission that a species of
wildlife should not be hunted or fished. The commission may designate
species of wildlife as protected.
(6) If the director determines that a species of wildlife is
seriously threatened with extinction in the state of Washington, the
director may request its designation as an endangered species. The
commission may designate an endangered species.
(7) If the director determines that a species of the animal
kingdom, not native to Washington, is dangerous to the environment or
wildlife of the state, the director may request its designation as
deleterious exotic wildlife. The commission may designate deleterious
exotic wildlife.
(8) ((Upon recommendation by the director, the commission may
classify nonnative aquatic animal species according to the following
categories:
(a) Prohibited aquatic animal species: These species are
considered by the commission to have a high risk of becoming an
invasive species and may not be possessed, imported, purchased, sold,
propagated, transported, or released into state waters except as
provided in RCW 77.15.253;
(b) Regulated aquatic animal species: These species are considered
by the commission to have some beneficial use along with a moderate,
but manageable risk of becoming an invasive species, and may not be
released into state waters, except as provided in RCW 77.15.253. The
commission shall classify the following commercial aquaculture species
as regulated aquatic animal species, and allow their release into state
waters pursuant to rule of the commission: Pacific oyster (Crassostrea
gigas), kumamoto oyster (Crassostrea sikamea), European flat oyster
(Ostrea edulis), eastern oyster (Crassostrea virginica), manila clam
(Tapes philippinarum), blue mussel (Mytilus galloprovincialis), and
suminoe oyster (Crassostrea ariankenisis);
(c) Unregulated aquatic animal species: These species are
considered by the commission as having some beneficial use along with
a low risk of becoming an invasive species, and are not subject to
regulation under this title;
(d) Unlisted aquatic animal species: These species are not
designated as a prohibited aquatic animal species, regulated aquatic
animal species, or unregulated aquatic animal species by the
commission, and may not be released into state waters. Upon request,
the commission may determine the appropriate category for an unlisted
aquatic animal species and classify the species accordingly;
(e) This subsection (8) does not apply to the transportation or
release of nonnative aquatic animal species by ballast water or ballast
water discharge.
(9))) Upon recommendation by the director, the commission may
develop a work plan to eradicate native aquatic species that threaten
human health. Priority shall be given to water bodies that the
department of health has classified as representing a threat to human
health based on the presence of a native aquatic species.

Sec. 303 RCW 77.15.080 and 2012 c 176 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) Based upon articulable facts that a person is engaged in
fishing, harvesting, or hunting activities, fish and wildlife officers
and ex officio fish and wildlife officers have the authority to
temporarily stop the person and check for valid licenses, tags,
permits, stamps, or catch record cards, and to inspect all fish,
shellfish, seaweed, and wildlife in possession as well as the equipment
being used to ensure compliance with the requirements of this title.
Fish and wildlife officers and ex officio fish and wildlife officers
also may request that the person write his or her signature for
comparison with the signature on his or her fishing, harvesting, or
hunting license. Failure to comply with the request is prima facie
evidence that the person is not the person named on the license. Fish
and wildlife officers may require the person, if age sixteen or older,
to exhibit a driver's license or other photo identification.
(((2) Based upon articulable facts that a person is transporting a
prohibited aquatic animal species or any aquatic plant, fish and
wildlife officers and ex officio fish and wildlife officers have the
authority to temporarily stop the person and inspect the watercraft to
ensure that the watercraft and associated equipment are not
transporting prohibited aquatic animal species or aquatic plants.))

Sec. 304 RCW 77.15.290 and 2012 c 176 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful transportation of fish or
wildlife in the second degree if the person:
(a) Knowingly imports, moves within the state, or exports fish,
shellfish, or wildlife in violation of any department rule governing
the transportation or movement of fish, shellfish, or wildlife and the
transportation does not involve big game, endangered fish or wildlife,
deleterious exotic wildlife, or fish, shellfish, or wildlife having a
value greater than two hundred fifty dollars; or
(b) Possesses but fails to affix or notch a big game transport tag
as required by department rule.
(2) A person is guilty of unlawful transportation of fish or
wildlife in the first degree if the person:
(a) Knowingly imports, moves within the state, or exports fish,
shellfish, or wildlife in violation of any department rule governing
the transportation or movement of fish, shellfish, or wildlife and the
transportation involves big game, endangered fish or wildlife,
deleterious exotic wildlife, or fish, shellfish, or wildlife with a
value of two hundred fifty dollars or more; or
(b) Knowingly transports shellfish, shellstock, or equipment used
in commercial culturing, taking, handling, or processing shellfish
without a permit required by authority of this title.
(3)(a) Unlawful transportation of fish or wildlife in the second
degree is a misdemeanor.
(b) Unlawful transportation of fish or wildlife in the first degree
is a gross misdemeanor.
(4) This section does not apply to((: (a) Any person stopped at an
aquatic)) invasive species ((check station who possesses a recreational
or commercial watercraft that is contaminated with an aquatic invasive
species if that person complies with all department directives for the
proper decontamination of the watercraft and equipment; or (b) any
person who has voluntarily submitted a recreational or commercial
watercraft for inspection by the department or its designee and has
received a receipt verifying that the watercraft has not been
contaminated since its last use)).

Sec. 305 RCW 43.06.010 and 1994 c 223 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to those prescribed by the Constitution, the governor
may exercise the powers and perform the duties prescribed in this and
the following sections:
(1) The governor shall supervise the conduct of all executive and
ministerial offices;
(2) The governor shall see that all offices are filled, including
as provided in RCW 42.12.070, and the duties thereof performed, or in
default thereof, apply such remedy as the law allows; and if the remedy
is imperfect, acquaint the legislature therewith at its next session;
(3) The governor shall make the appointments and supply the
vacancies mentioned in this title;
(4) The governor is the sole official organ of communication
between the government of this state and the government of any other
state or territory, or of the United States;
(5) Whenever any suit or legal proceeding is pending against this
state, or which may affect the title of this state to any property, or
which may result in any claim against the state, the governor may
direct the attorney general to appear on behalf of the state, and
report the same to the governor, or to any grand jury designated by the
governor, or to the legislature when next in session;
(6) The governor may require the attorney general or any
prosecuting attorney to inquire into the affairs or management of any
corporation existing under the laws of this state, or doing business in
this state, and report the same to the governor, or to any grand jury
designated by the governor, or to the legislature when next in session;
(7) The governor may require the attorney general to aid any
prosecuting attorney in the discharge of the prosecutor's duties;
(8) The governor may offer rewards, not exceeding one thousand
dollars in each case, payable out of the state treasury, for
information leading to the apprehension of any person convicted of a
felony who has escaped from a state correctional institution or for
information leading to the arrest of any person who has committed or is
charged with the commission of a felony;
(9) The governor shall perform such duties respecting fugitives
from justice as are prescribed by law;
(10) The governor shall issue and transmit election proclamations
as prescribed by law;
(11) The governor may require any officer or board to make, upon
demand, special reports to the governor, in writing;
(12) The governor may, after finding that a public disorder,
disaster, energy emergency, or riot exists within this state or any
part thereof which affects life, health, property, or the public peace,
proclaim a state of emergency in the area affected, and the powers
granted the governor during a state of emergency shall be effective
only within the area described in the proclamation;
(13) The governor may, after finding that there exists within this
state an imminent danger of infestation of plant pests as defined in
RCW 17.24.007 or plant diseases which seriously endangers the
agricultural or horticultural industries of the state of Washington, or
which seriously threatens life, health, or economic well-being, order
emergency measures to prevent or abate the infestation or disease
situation, which measures, after thorough evaluation of all other
alternatives, may include the aerial application of pesticides;
(14) The governor, after finding that a prohibited level 1 or level
2 species as defined in chapter 77.-- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 122 of this act) has been detected and after finding that the
detected species seriously endangers or threatens the environment,
economy, human health, or well-being of the state of Washington, may
order emergency measures to prevent or abate the prohibited species,
which measures, after thorough evaluation of all other alternatives,
may include the surface or aerial application of pesticides;
(15) On all compacts forwarded to the governor pursuant to RCW
9.46.360(6), the governor is authorized and empowered to execute on
behalf of the state compacts with federally recognized Indian tribes in
the state of Washington pursuant to the federal Indian Gaming
Regulatory Act, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq., for conducting class III
gaming, as defined in the Act, on Indian lands.

Sec. 306 RCW 43.43.400 and 2011 c 171 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Aquatic invasive species" means any invasive, prohibited,
regulated, unregulated, or unlisted aquatic animal or plant species as
defined under RCW 77.08.010 [(3),] (28), (40), (44), (58), and (59),
aquatic noxious weeds as defined under RCW 17.26.020(5)(c), and aquatic
nuisance species as defined under RCW 77.60.130(1).
(b) "Recreational and commercial watercraft" includes the boat, as
well as equipment used to transport the boat, and any auxiliary
equipment such as attached or detached outboard motors.
(2))) The aquatic invasive species enforcement account is created
in the state treasury. Moneys directed to the account from RCW
88.02.640 must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the
account may only be used as provided in this section. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation.
(((3) Funds in the aquatic invasive species enforcement account may
be appropriated to the Washington state patrol and the department of
fish and wildlife to develop an aquatic invasive species enforcement
program for recreational and commercial watercraft, which includes
equipment used to transport the watercraft and auxiliary equipment such
as attached or detached outboard motors. Funds must be expended as
follows:
(a) By the Washington state patrol, to inspect recreational and
commercial watercraft that are required to stop at port of entry weigh
stations managed by the Washington state patrol. The watercraft must
be inspected for the presence of aquatic invasive species; and
(b) By the department of fish and wildlife to:
(i) Establish random check stations, to inspect recreational and
commercial watercraft as provided for in RCW 77.12.879(3);
(ii) Inspect or delegate inspection of recreational and commercial
watercraft. If the department conducts the inspection, there will be
no cost to the person requesting the inspection;
(iii) Provide training to all department employees that are
deployed in the field to inspect recreational and commercial
watercraft; and
(iv) Provide an inspection receipt verifying that the watercraft is
not contaminated after the watercraft has been inspected at a check
station or has been inspected at the request of the owner of the
recreational or commercial watercraft. The inspection receipt is valid
until the watercraft is used again.
(4) The Washington state patrol and the department of fish and
wildlife shall submit a biennial report to the appropriate legislative
committees describing the actions taken to implement this section along
with suggestions on how to better fulfill the intent of chapter 464,
Laws of 2005. The first report is due December 1, 2007.))
(2) Expenditures from the account by the Washington state patrol
may only be used to inspect for the presence of aquatic invasive
species on aquatic conveyances that are required to stop at a
Washington state patrol port of entry weigh station.
(3) Expenditures from the account by the department of fish and
wildlife may only be used to develop and implement an: (a) Aquatic
invasive species local management grant program; and (b) aquatic
invasive species enforcement program including enforcement of chapter
77.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 122 of this act),
enforcement of aquatic invasive species provisions in chapter 77.15
RCW, and training Washington state patrol employees working at port of
entry weigh stations on how to inspect aquatic conveyances for the
presence of aquatic invasive species.
(4) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in both RCW 77.08.010 and section 102 of this act apply throughout this
section.

Sec. 307 RCW 10.31.100 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 35 s 22 are each
amended to read as follows:
A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has
committed or is committing a felony shall have the authority to arrest
the person without a warrant. A police officer may arrest a person
without a warrant for committing a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
only when the offense is committed in the presence of the officer,
except as provided in subsections (1) through (11) of this section.
(1) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor, involving physical harm or threats of harm to any person
or property or the unlawful taking of property or involving the use or
possession of cannabis, or involving the acquisition, possession, or
consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one years
under RCW 66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070
or 9A.52.080, shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(2) A police officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending
release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person
without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that:
(a) An order has been issued of which the person has knowledge
under RCW 26.44.063, or chapter 7.92, 7.90, 9A.46, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10,
26.26, 26.50, or 74.34 RCW restraining the person and the person has
violated the terms of the order restraining the person from acts or
threats of violence, or restraining the person from going onto the
grounds of or entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or
prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly
remaining within, a specified distance of a location or, in the case of
an order issued under RCW 26.44.063, imposing any other restrictions or
conditions upon the person; or
(b) A foreign protection order, as defined in RCW 26.52.010, has
been issued of which the person under restraint has knowledge and the
person under restraint has violated a provision of the foreign
protection order prohibiting the person under restraint from contacting
or communicating with another person, or excluding the person under
restraint from a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or
prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly
remaining within, a specified distance of a location, or a violation of
any provision for which the foreign protection order specifically
indicates that a violation will be a crime; or
(c) The person is sixteen years or older and within the preceding
four hours has assaulted a family or household member as defined in RCW
10.99.020 and the officer believes: (i) A felonious assault has
occurred; (ii) an assault has occurred which has resulted in bodily
injury to the victim, whether the injury is observable by the
responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical action has
occurred which was intended to cause another person reasonably to fear
imminent serious bodily injury or death. Bodily injury means physical
pain, illness, or an impairment of physical condition. When the
officer has probable cause to believe that family or household members
have assaulted each other, the officer is not required to arrest both
persons. The officer shall arrest the person whom the officer believes
to be the primary physical aggressor. In making this determination,
the officer shall make every reasonable effort to consider: (i) The
intent to protect victims of domestic violence under RCW 10.99.010;
(ii) the comparative extent of injuries inflicted or serious threats
creating fear of physical injury; and (iii) the history of domestic
violence of each person involved, including whether the conduct was
part of an ongoing pattern of abuse; or
(d) The person has violated RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an
equivalent local ordinance and the police officer has knowledge that
the person has a prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055 within ten
years.
(3) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of any of the
following traffic laws shall have the authority to arrest the person:
(a) RCW 46.52.010, relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(b) RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(c) RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or
racing of vehicles;
(d) RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(e) RCW 46.61.503 or 46.25.110, relating to persons having alcohol
or THC in their system;
(f) RCW 46.20.342, relating to driving a motor vehicle while
operator's license is suspended or revoked;
(g) RCW 46.61.5249, relating to operating a motor vehicle in a
negligent manner.
(4) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor
vehicle accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle involved in
the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the
driver has committed in connection with the accident a violation of any
traffic law or regulation.
(5)(a) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a
motor vessel accident may arrest the operator of a motor vessel
involved in the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe
that the operator has committed, in connection with the accident, a
criminal violation of chapter 79A.60 RCW.
(b) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor
vessel accident may issue a citation for an infraction to the operator
of a motor vessel involved in the accident if the officer has probable
cause to believe that the operator has committed, in connection with
the accident, a violation of any boating safety law of chapter 79A.60
RCW.
(6) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of RCW 79A.60.040
shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(7) An officer may act upon the request of a law enforcement
officer in whose presence a traffic infraction was committed, to stop,
detain, arrest, or issue a notice of traffic infraction to the driver
who is believed to have committed the infraction. The request by the
witnessing officer shall give an officer the authority to take
appropriate action under the laws of the state of Washington.
(8) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing any act of indecent exposure, as
defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may arrest the person.
(9) A police officer may arrest and take into custody, pending
release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person
without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that
an order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under
chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated the terms of that order.
(10) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has, within twenty-four hours of the alleged violation,
committed a violation of RCW 9A.50.020 may arrest such person.
(11) A police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person illegally possesses or illegally has possessed a firearm or
other dangerous weapon on private or public elementary or secondary
school premises shall have the authority to arrest the person.
For purposes of this subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).
(12) A law enforcement officer having probable cause to believe
that a person has committed a violation under RCW 77.15.160(4) may
issue a citation for an infraction to the person in connection with the
violation.
(13) A law enforcement officer having probable cause to believe
that a person has committed a criminal violation under section 205 or
206 of this act may arrest the person in connection with the violation.
(14) Except as specifically provided in subsections (2), (3), (4),
and (7) of this section, nothing in this section extends or otherwise
affects the powers of arrest prescribed in Title 46 RCW.
(((13))) (15) No police officer may be held criminally or civilly
liable for making an arrest pursuant to subsection (2) or (9) of this
section if the police officer acts in good faith and without malice.

Sec. 308 RCW 77.15.360 and 2007 c 337 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful interfering in department
operations if the person prevents department employees from carrying
out duties authorized by this title, including but not limited to
interfering:
(a) In the operation of department vehicles, vessels, or aircraft;
((or))
(b) With the collection of samples of tissue, fluids, or other
bodily parts of fish, wildlife, and shellfish under RCW 77.12.071; or
(c) With actions authorized by a warrant issued under section 120
or 203 of this act.
(2) Unlawful interfering in department operations is a gross
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 77.12.875 (Prohibited aquatic animal species -- Infested
state waters) and 2002 c 281 s 5;
(2) RCW 77.12.878 (Infested waters -- Rapid response plan) and 2002
c 281 s 6;
(3) RCW 77.12.879 (Aquatic invasive species prevention account--Aquatic invasive species prevention program for recreational and
commercial watercraft -- Enforcement program -- Check stations -- Training--
Report to the legislature) and 2013 c 307 s 1, 2011 c 171 s 113, 2011
c 169 s 4, 2009 c 333 s 22, 2007 c 350 s 3, & 2005 c 464 s 3;
(4) RCW 77.12.882 (Aquatic invasive species -- Inspection of
recreational and commercial watercraft -- Rules -- Signage) and 2007 c 350
s 4;
(5) RCW 77.15.253 (Unlawful use of prohibited aquatic animal
species -- Penalty) and 2007 c 350 s 5 & 2002 c 281 s 4;
(6) RCW 77.15.293 (Unlawfully avoiding aquatic invasive species
check stations -- Penalty) and 2007 c 350 s 7;
(7) RCW 77.60.110 (Zebra mussels and European green crabs -- Draft
rules -- Prevention of introduction and dispersal) and 1998 c 153 s 2;
and
(8) RCW 77.60.120 (Infested waters -- List published) and 1998 c 153
s 3.

--- END ---