BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.155 and 2013 c 23 s 243 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a) When purchasing any hunting license, persons under the age
of eighteen shall present certification of completion of a course of
instruction of at least ten hours in the safe handling of firearms,
safety, conservation, and sporting/hunting behavior. All persons
purchasing any hunting license for the first time, if born after
January 1, 1972, shall present such certification.
(b)(i))) The ((director may establish)) department is authorized to
create and administer a program for training persons in the safe
handling of firearms, outdoor safety, wildlife conservation, and
((sporting/)) ethical hunting behavior and shall prescribe the type of
instruction and the qualifications of the instructors. ((The director
shall, as part of establishing the training program, exempt members of
the United States military from the firearms skills portion of any
instruction course completed over the internet.
(ii) The director may cooperate with the national rifle
association, organized sports/outdoor enthusiasts' groups, or other
public or private organizations when establishing the training program.
(c) Upon the successful completion of a course established under
this section, the trainee shall receive a hunter education certificate
signed by an authorized instructor. The certificate is evidence of
compliance with this section.
(d) The director may accept certificates from other states that
persons have successfully completed firearm safety, hunter education,
or similar courses as evidence of compliance with this section.))
(2) To purchase a Washington hunting license for the first time, a
person born after January 1, 1972, must present proof of successfully
passing a hunter education training course. Proof must be in the form
of either:
(a) A hunter education certificate of completion from a course
instructed by or being taught under a contract with the department in
the safe handling of firearms, outdoor safety, wildlife conservation,
and ethical hunting behavior; or
(b) A hunter education certificate from another state or country
whose course is department approved.
(3) No one under age eight is eligible to take a hunter education
training course in Washington.
(4) Active duty members of the United States military who are
residents of or stationed in Washington, or honorably discharged armed
service members who are residents of Washington, are exempt from the
firearms skills portion of any Washington hunter education training
course instructed by or being taught under a contract with the
department and completed over the internet.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2014, the department is authorized to charge
a registration fee of not more than twenty dollars for any hunter
education training course. This fee must be collected as program
income as defined in 50 C.F.R. Sec. 80.120 (2011).
(6) Upon the successful completion of a hunter education training
course instructed by or being taught under a contract with the
department in the safe handling of firearms, outdoor safety, wildlife
conservation, and ethical hunting behavior, the trainee must receive an
approved hunter education certificate.
(7) The department is authorized to collect an application fee, not
to exceed ten dollars, for providing a duplicate hunter education
certificate. This fee must be collected as program income as defined
in 50 C.F.R. Sec. 80.120 (2011).
(8)(a) The ((director)) department may authorize a once in a
lifetime, one license year deferral of hunter education training for
individuals who are accompanied ((by a nondeferred Washington-licensed
hunter who has held a Washington hunting license for the prior three
years and is over eighteen years of age)), while hunting, by a hunter
currently licensed to hunt in Washington, age eighteen or older, and
whose Washington license is not a one-year deferral license. The
commission shall adopt rules for the administration of this subsection
to avoid potential fraud and abuse.
(b) The ((director)) department is authorized to collect an
application fee, not to exceed twenty dollars, for obtaining the once
in a lifetime, one license year deferral of hunter education training
from the department. This fee must be collected as program income as
defined in 50 C.F.R. Sec. 80.120 (2011), deposited into the fish and
wildlife enforcement reward account, and ((must be)) used exclusively
to administer the deferral program created in this subsection.
(((c))) (9) For the purposes of this ((subsection)) section,
"accompanied" means to go along with another person while staying
within a range of the other person that permits continual unaided
visual and auditory communication.
(((3))) (10)(a) To encourage the participation of an adequate
number of instructors for ((the)) hunter education training ((program))
courses, the commission shall develop nonmonetary incentives available
to individuals who commit to serving as an instructor. The incentives
may include additional hunting opportunities for instructors.
(b) The department may provide reimbursement for instructor
expenditures incurred in providing hunter education training courses.
(c) The commission shall adopt rules specifying the use of program
funds for reimbursing instructors. In no case may the total amount of
all reimbursements exceed annual program income generated by fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All hunters under age fourteen must be accompanied, while
hunting:
(a) By a hunter:
(i) Who is currently licensed to hunt in Washington;
(ii) Whose Washington hunting license is not a one-year deferral
license; and
(iii) Who is age eighteen or older;
(b) By a person who is age eighteen or older who has successfully
completed a hunter education training course as described in RCW
77.32.155; or
(c) By a person who was born on or before January 1, 1972.
(2) However, a hunter under the age of fourteen is not required to
be accompanied if he or she is the immediate family member of a private
property owner or lessee and is hunting on property his or her family
owns or is leasing.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the term "accompanied" has
the same meaning as defined in RCW 77.32.155.
(4) A violation of this section is a natural resource infraction
subject to the provisions of chapter 7.84 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.32.010 and 2011 c 320 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a recreational
license issued by the ((director)) department is required to hunt for
or take wild animals or wild birds, fish for, take, or harvest fish,
shellfish, and seaweed. A recreational fishing or shellfish license is
not required for carp, smelt, and crawfish, and a hunting license is
not required for bullfrogs.
(b) A person must be at least eight years old and in compliance
with RCW 77.32.155 to be issued a hunting license, unless that person
has been issued a Washington hunter education certificate prior to the
effective date of this section.
(c) All hunters under the age of fourteen are required to hunt in
compliance with section 2 of this act.
(2) A pass or permit issued under RCW 79A.80.020, 79A.80.030, or
79A.80.040 is required to park or operate a motor vehicle on a
recreation site or lands, as defined in RCW 79A.80.010.
(3) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium to enable the
implementation of the pilot project established in section 307, chapter
329, Laws of 2008, a fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the
Colville Tribes shall satisfy the license requirements in subsection
(1) of this section on the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north
shore of Lake Rufus Woods, and a Colville Tribes tribal member
identification card shall satisfy the license requirements in
subsection (1) of this section on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.12.184 and 2009 c 333 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall deposit all moneys received from the
following activities into the state wildlife account created in RCW
77.12.170, except for moneys received for the purposes of providing the
hunter education program as described in RCW 77.32.155:
(a) The sale of interpretive, recreational, historical,
educational, and informational literature and materials;
(b) The sale of advertisements in regulation pamphlets and other
appropriate mediums; and
(c) Enrollment fees in department-sponsored educational training
events.
(2) Moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section shall be
spent primarily for producing regulation booklets for users and for the
development, production, reprinting, and distribution of informational
and educational materials. The department may also spend these moneys
for necessary expenses associated with training activities, and other
activities as determined by the ((director)) department.
(3) Regulation pamphlets may be subsidized through appropriate
advertising, but must be made available free of charge to the users.
(4) The ((director)) department may enter into joint ventures with
other agencies and organizations to generate revenue for providing
public information and education on wildlife and hunting and fishing
rules.

--- END ---