BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.31B.005 and 1993 c 462 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
set forth in this section, unless the context requires otherwise.)) The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) ((An)) "Affiliate" means an affiliate of, or person
(("))affiliated((")) with, a specific person, ((is)) and includes a
person ((who)) that directly, or indirectly through one or more
intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common
control with, the person specified.
(2) ((The term)) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner,
the commissioner's deputies, or the office of the insurance
commissioner, as appropriate.
(3) "Control" means as follows:
(a) For a for-profit person, "control," including the terms "con-
trolling," "controlled by," and "under common control with," means the
possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the
direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through
the ownership of voting securities, by contract other than a commercial
contract for goods or nonmanagement services, or otherwise, unless the
power is the result of an official position with or corporate office
held by the person. Control is presumed to exist if ((a)) any person,
directly or indirectly, owns, controls, holds with the power to vote,
or holds proxies representing, ten percent or more of the voting
securities of any other person. This presumption may be rebutted by a
showing made in a manner similar to that provided by RCW 48.31B.025(11)
that control does not exist in fact. The commissioner may determine,
after furnishing all persons in interest notice and opportunity to be
heard and making specific findings of fact to support such
determination, that control exists in fact, notwithstanding the absence
of a presumption to that effect.
(((3) An)) (b) For a nonprofit corporation organized under chapters
24.03 and 24.06 RCW, control exists if a person, directly or
indirectly, owns, controls, holds with the power to vote, or holds
proxies representing a majority of voting rights of the person or the
power to elect or appoint a majority of the board of directors,
trustees, or other governing body of the person, unless the power is
the result of an official position of, or corporate office held by, the
person; and
(c) Control includes either permanent or temporary control.
(4) "Enterprise risk" means any activity, circumstance, event, or
series of events involving one or more affiliates of an insurer that,
if not remedied promptly, is likely to have a material adverse effect
upon the financial condition or liquidity of the insurer or its
insurance holding company system as a whole including, but not limited
to, anything that would cause the insurer's risk-based capital to fall
into company action level as set forth in RCW 48.05.440 or 48.43.310 or
would cause the insurer to be in hazardous financial condition as
defined in WAC 284-16-310.
(5) "Insurance holding company system" means a system that consists
of two or more affiliated persons, one or more of which is an insurer.
(((4) The term)) (6) "Insurer" ((has the same meaning as set forth
in RCW 48.01.050;)) includes an insurer authorized under chapter 48.05
RCW, a fraternal mutual insurer or society holding a license under RCW
48.36A.290, a health care service contractor registered under chapter
48.44 RCW, a health maintenance organization registered under chapter
48.46 RCW, and a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement
under chapter 48.125 RCW, as well as all persons engaged as, or
purporting to be engaged as insurers, fraternal benefit societies,
health care service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or
self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangements in this state, and
to persons in process of organization to become insurers, fraternal
benefit societies, health care service contractors, health maintenance
organizations, or self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangements,
except it does not include agencies, authorities, or instrumentalities
of the United States, its possessions and territories, the commonwealth
of Puerto Rico, the District of Columbia, or a state or political
subdivision of a state.
(((5) A)) (7) "Person" ((is)) means an individual, a corporation,
a partnership, an association, a joint stock company, a trust, an
unincorporated organization, ((a)) any similar entity, or any
combination of the foregoing acting in concert, but does not include a
joint venture partnership exclusively engaged in owning, managing,
leasing, or developing real or tangible personal property.
(((6) A)) (8) "Securityholder" means a securityholder of a
specified person ((is one)) who owns ((a)) any security of that person,
including common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations, and any
other security convertible into or evidencing the right to acquire any
of the foregoing.
(((7) A)) (9) "Subsidiary" means a subsidiary of a specified person
who is an affiliate controlled by that person directly or indirectly
through one or more intermediaries.
(((8) The term)) (10) "Supervisory colleges" means a forum for
cooperation and communication among involved regulators and
international supervisors facilitating the effectiveness of supervision
of entities which belong to an insurance group and supervision of the
group as a whole on a group-wide basis and improving the legal entity
supervision of the entities within the insurance group.
(11) "Voting security" includes ((a)) any security convertible into
or evidencing a right to acquire a voting security.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.31B.010 and 1993 c 462 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A domestic insurer, either by itself or in cooperation with one
or more persons, may organize or acquire one or more subsidiaries. The
subsidiaries may conduct any kind of business or businesses authorized
in RCW 48.13.061(4) and subject to the percentage limitations contained
in chapter 48.13 RCW.
(2) If an insurer ceases to control a subsidiary, it shall dispose
of any investment in the subsidiary within three years from the time of
the cessation of control or within such further time as the
commissioner may prescribe, unless at any time after the investment
((has been)) was made, the investment ((meets)) met the requirements
for investment under any other section of this title, and the insurer
has notified the commissioner thereof.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.31B.015 and 1993 c 462 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No person other than the issuer may make a tender offer for
or a request or invitation for tenders of, or enter into an agreement
to exchange securities of, seek to acquire, or acquire, in the open
market or otherwise, voting security of a domestic insurer if, after
the consummation thereof, the person would, directly or indirectly, or
by conversion or by exercise of a right to acquire, be in control of
the insurer((.)) and no person may enter into an agreement to merge
with or otherwise to acquire control of a domestic insurer or any
person controlling a domestic insurer unless, at the time the offer,
request, or invitation is made or the agreement is entered into, or
((before)) prior to the acquisition of the securities if no offer or
agreement is involved, the person has filed with the commissioner and
has sent to the insurer, a statement containing the information
required by this section and the offer, request, invitation, agreement,
or acquisition has been approved by the commissioner as prescribed in
this ((section)) chapter.
(b) For purposes of this section, any controlling person of a
domestic insurer seeking to divest its controlling interest in the
domestic insurer, in any manner, must file with the commissioner, with
a copy to the insurer, notice of its proposed divestiture at least
thirty days prior to the cessation of control. If the statement
referred to in (a) of this subsection is otherwise filed, this
subsection does not apply.
(c) With respect to a transaction subject to this section, the
acquiring person must also file a preacquisition notification with the
commissioner, which must contain the information set forth in RCW
48.31B.020(3)(a). A failure to file the notification may be subject to
penalties specified in RCW 48.31B.020(5)(c).
(d) For purposes of this section a domestic insurer includes a
person controlling a domestic insurer unless the person, as determined
by the commissioner, is either directly or through its affiliates
primarily engaged in business other than the business of insurance.
((However, the person shall file a preacquisition notification with the
commissioner containing the information set forth in RCW
48.31B.020(3)(a) sixty days before the proposed effective date of the
acquisition. Persons who fail to file the required preacquisition
notification with the commissioner are subject to the penalties in RCW
48.31B.020(5)(c).)) For the purposes of this section, "person" does
not include ((a)) any securities broker holding, in usual and customary
broker's function, less than twenty percent of the voting securities of
an insurance company or of ((a)) any person who controls an insurance
company.
(2) The statement to be filed with the commissioner under this
section must be made under oath or affirmation and must contain the
following ((information)):
(a) The name and address of each person by whom or on whose behalf
the merger or other acquisition of control referred to in subsection
(1) of this section is to be effected, ((hereinafter called ")) and
referred to in this section as the acquiring party((,")) and:
(i) If that person is an individual, his or her principal
occupation and all offices and positions held during the past five
years, and any conviction of crimes other than minor traffic violations
during the past ten years; and
(ii) If that person is not an individual, a report of the nature of
its business operations during the past five years or for such lesser
period as the person and any predecessors have been in existence; an
informative description of the business intended to be done by the
person and the person's subsidiaries; any convictions of crimes during
the past ten years; and a list of all individuals who are or who have
been selected to become directors or executive officers of the person,
or who perform or will perform functions appropriate to those
positions. The list must include for each such individual the
information required by (a)(i) of this subsection((.));
(b) The source, nature, and amount of the consideration used or to
be used in effecting the merger or other acquisition of control, a
description of any transaction ((in which)) where funds were or are to
be obtained for any such purpose, including ((a)) any pledge of the
insurer's stock((,)) or the stock of any of its subsidiaries or
controlling affiliates, and the identity of persons furnishing ((the))
consideration. However, ((where)) when a source of ((the))
consideration is a loan made in the lender's ordinary course of
business, the identity of the lender must remain confidential, if the
person filing the statement so requests((.));
(c) Fully audited financial information as to the earnings and
financial condition of each acquiring party for the preceding five
fiscal years of each acquiring party, or for such lesser period as the
acquiring party and any predecessors have been in existence, and
similar unaudited information as of a date not earlier than ninety days
((before)) prior to the filing of the statement((.));
(d) Any plans or proposals that each acquiring party may have to
liquidate the insurer, to sell its assets or merge or consolidate it
with any person, or to make any other material change in its business
or corporate structure or management((.));
(e) The number of shares of any security referred to in subsection
(1) of this section ((that)) which each acquiring party proposes to
acquire, the terms of the offer, request, invitation, agreement, or
acquisition referred to in subsection (1) of this section, and a
statement as to the method by which the fairness of the proposal was
arrived at((.));
(f) The amount of each class of any security referred to in
subsection (1) of this section that is beneficially owned or concerning
which there is a right to acquire beneficial ownership by each
acquiring party((.));
(g) A full description of any contracts, arrangements, or
understandings with respect to any security referred to in subsection
(1) of this section in which an acquiring party is involved, including
but not limited to transfer of any of the securities, joint ventures,
loan or option arrangements, puts or calls, guarantees of loans,
guarantees against loss or guarantees of profits, division of losses or
profits, or the giving or withholding of proxies. The description must
identify the persons with whom the contracts, arrangements, or
understandings have been entered into((.));
(h) A description of the purchase of any security referred to in
subsection (1) of this section during the twelve calendar months
((before)) preceding the filing of the statement, by an acquiring
party, including the dates of purchase, names of the purchasers, and
consideration paid or agreed to be paid ((for the security.));
(i) A description of any recommendations to purchase any security
referred to in subsection (1) of this section made during the twelve
calendar months ((before)) preceding the filing of the statement, by an
acquiring party, or by anyone based upon interviews or at the
suggestion of the acquiring party((.));
(j) Copies of all tender offers for, requests or invitations for
tenders of, exchange offers for, and agreements to acquire or exchange
any securities referred to in subsection (1) of this section, and, if
distributed, of additional soliciting material relating to ((the
securities.)) them;
(k) The term of an agreement, contract, or understanding made with
or proposed to be made with ((a)) any broker-dealer as to solicitation
or securities referred to in subsection (1) of this section for tender,
and the amount of fees, commissions, or other compensation to be paid
to broker-dealers with regard ((to the securities.)) thereto;
(l) An agreement by the person required to file the statement
referred to in subsection (1) of this section that it will provide the
annual report, specified in RCW 48.31B.025(12), for so long as control
exists;
(m) An acknowledgement by the person required to file the statement
referred to in subsection (1) of this section that the person and all
subsidiaries within its control in the insurance holding company system
will provide information to the commissioner upon request as necessary
to evaluate enterprise risk to the insurer;
(n) Such additional information as the commissioner may prescribe
by rule as necessary or appropriate for the protection of policyholders
of the insurer or in the public interest((.));
(o) If the person required to file the statement referred to in
subsection (1) of this section is a partnership, limited partnership,
syndicate, or other group, the commissioner may require that the
information called for by (a) through (((l))) (n) of this subsection
shall be given with respect to each partner of the partnership or
limited partnership, each member of the syndicate or group, and each
person who controls a partner or member. If ((a)) any partner, member,
or person is a corporation((,)) or the person required to file the
statement referred to in subsection (1) of this section is a
corporation, the commissioner may require that the information called
for by (a) through (((l))) (n) of this subsection ((shall)) be given
with respect to the corporation, each officer and director of the
corporation, and each person who is directly or indirectly the
beneficial owner of more than ten percent of the outstanding voting
securities of the corporation((.));
(p) If ((a)) any material change occurs in the facts set forth in
the statement filed with the commissioner and sent to the insurer under
this section, an amendment setting forth the change, together with
copies of all documents and other material relevant to the change, must
be filed with the commissioner and sent to the insurer within two
business days after the person learns of the change.
(3) If ((an)) any offer, request, invitation, agreement, or
acquisition referred to in subsection (1) of this section is proposed
to be made by means of a registration statement under the securities
act of 1933 or in circumstances requiring the disclosure of similar
information under the securities exchange act of 1934, or under a state
law requiring similar registration or disclosure, the person required
to file the statement referred to in subsection (1) of this section may
((use those)) utilize the documents in furnishing the information
called for by that statement.
(4)(a) The commissioner shall approve a merger or other acquisition
of control referred to in subsection (1) of this section unless, after
a public hearing thereon, he or she finds that:
(i) After the change of control, the domestic insurer referred to
in subsection (1) of this section would not be able to satisfy the
requirements for the issuance of a license to write the line or lines
of insurance for which it is presently licensed;
(ii) The effect of the merger or other acquisition of control would
be substantially to lessen competition in insurance in this state or
tend to create a monopoly therein. In applying the competitive
standard in this subsection (4)(a)(ii) ((of this subsection)):
(A) The informational requirements of RCW 48.31B.020(3)(a) and the
standards of RCW 48.31B.020(4)(b) apply;
(B) The ((commissioner may not disapprove the)) merger or other
acquisition may not be disapproved if the commissioner finds that any
of the situations meeting the criteria provided by RCW 48.31B.020(4)(c)
exist; and
(C) The commissioner may condition the approval of the merger or
other acquisition on the removal of the basis of disapproval within a
specified period of time;
(iii) The financial condition of ((an)) any acquiring party is such
as might jeopardize the financial stability of the insurer, or
prejudice the interest of its policyholders;
(iv) The plans or proposals ((that)) which the acquiring party has
to liquidate the insurer, sell its assets, consolidate or merge it with
any person, or to make any other material change in its business or
corporate structure or management, are unfair and unreasonable to
policyholders of the insurer and not in the public interest;
(v) The competence, experience, and integrity of those persons who
would control the operation of the insurer are such that it would not
be in the interest of policyholders of the insurer and of the public to
permit the merger or other acquisition of control; or
(vi) The acquisition is likely to be hazardous or prejudicial to
the insurance-buying public.
(b) The commissioner shall approve an exchange or other acquisition
of control referred to in this section within sixty days after he or
she declares the statement filed under this section to be complete and
after holding a public hearing. At the hearing, the person filing the
statement, the insurer, and any person whose significant interest is
determined by the commissioner to be affected may present evidence,
examine and cross-examine witnesses, and offer oral and written
arguments and in connection therewith may conduct discovery proceedings
in the same manner as is allowed in the superior court of this state.
All discovery proceedings must be concluded not later than three days
before the commencement of the public hearing.
(c) If the proposed acquisition of control will require the
approval of more than one commissioner, the public hearing referred to
in (b) of this subsection may be held on a consolidated basis upon
request of the person filing the statement referred to in subsection
(1) of this section. Such person shall file the statement referred to
in subsection (1) of this section with the national association of
insurance commissioners within five days of making the request for a
public hearing. A commissioner may opt out of a consolidated hearing,
and shall provide notice to the applicant of the opt out within ten
days of the receipt of the statement referred to in subsection (1) of
this section. A hearing conducted on a consolidated basis shall be
public and shall be held within the United States before the
commissioners of the states in which the insurers are domiciled. Such
commissioners shall hear and receive evidence. A commissioner may
attend such hearing, in person, or by telecommunication.
(d) In connection with a change of control of a domestic insurer,
any determination by the commissioner that the person acquiring control
of the insurer shall be required to maintain or restore the capital of
the insurer to the level required by the laws and rules of this state
shall be made not later than sixty days after the date of notification
of the change in control submitted pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of
this section.
(e) The commissioner may retain at the acquiring person's expense
any attorneys, actuaries, accountants, and other experts not otherwise
a part of the commissioner's staff as may be reasonably necessary to
assist the commissioner in reviewing the proposed acquisition of
control. All reasonable costs of a hearing held under this section, as
determined by the commissioner, including costs associated with the
commissioner's use of investigatory, professional, and other necessary
personnel, mailing of required notices and other information, and use
of equipment or facilities, must be paid before issuance of the
commissioner's order by the acquiring person.
(5) This section does not apply to:
(a) ((A)) Any transaction that is subject to RCW 48.31.010, dealing
with the merger or consolidation of two or more insurers;
(b) An offer, request, invitation, agreement, or acquisition
((that)) which the commissioner by order ((has exempted from this
section as: (i) Not)) exempts as not having been made or entered into
for the purpose and not having the effect of changing or influencing
the control of a domestic insurer, or (((ii))) as otherwise not
comprehended within the purposes of this section.
(6) The following are violations of this section:
(a) The failure to file a statement, amendment, or other material
required to be filed under subsection (1) or (2) of this section; or
(b) The effectuation or an attempt to effectuate an acquisition of
control of, divestiture of, or merger with, a domestic insurer unless
the commissioner has given approval thereto.
(7) The courts of this state ((have)) are hereby vested with
jurisdiction over every person not resident, domiciled, or authorized
to do business in this state who files a statement with the
commissioner under this section, and over all actions involving that
person arising out of violations of this section, and each such person
is deemed to have performed acts equivalent to and constituting an
appointment by that person of the commissioner to be the person's true
and lawful attorney upon whom may be served all lawful process in an
action, suit, or proceeding arising out of violations of this section.
Copies of all ((such)) lawful process ((shall)) must be served on the
commissioner and transmitted by registered or certified mail by the
commissioner to such person at the person's last known address.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.31B.020 and 1993 c 462 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following definitions ((in this subsection)) apply ((only))
for the purposes of this section((.)) only:
(a) "Acquisition" means ((an)) any agreement, arrangement, or
activity((,)) the consummation of which results in a person acquiring
directly or indirectly the control of another person, and includes but
is not limited to the acquisition of voting securities, the acquisition
of assets, bulk reinsurance, and mergers.
(b) An "involved insurer" includes an insurer which either acquires
or is acquired, is affiliated with an acquirer or acquired, or is the
result of a merger.
(2)(a) Except as exempted in (b) of this subsection, this section
applies to any acquisition in which there is a change in control of an
insurer authorized to do business in this state.
(b) This section does not apply to the following:
(i) ((An acquisition subject to approval or disapproval by the
commissioner under RCW 48.31B.015;
(ii))) A purchase of securities solely for investment purposes so
long as the securities are not used by voting or otherwise to cause or
attempt to cause the substantial lessening of competition in any
insurance market in this state. If a purchase of securities results in
a presumption of control under RCW 48.31B.005(((2))) (3), it is not
solely for investment purposes unless the commissioner of the insurer's
state of domicile accepts a disclaimer of control or affirmatively
finds that control does not exist and the disclaimer action or
affirmative finding is communicated by the domiciliary commissioner to
the commissioner of this state;
(((iii))) (ii) The acquisition of a person by another person when
neither person is directly nor through affiliates primarily engaged in
the business of insurance, if preacquisition notification is filed with
the commissioner in accordance with subsection (3)(a) of this section
sixty days ((before)) prior to the proposed effective date of the
acquisition. However, the preacquisition notification is not required
for exclusion from this section if the acquisition would otherwise be
excluded from this section by this subsection (2)(b);
(((iv))) (iii) The acquisition of already affiliated persons;
(((v))) (iv) An acquisition if, as an immediate result of the
acquisition:
(A) In no market would the combined market share of the involved
insurers exceed five percent of the total market;
(B) There would be no increase in any market share; or
(C) In no market would the:
(I) ((The)) Combined market share of the involved insurers exceed
twelve percent of the total market; and
(II) ((The)) Market share increase by more than two percent of the
total market.
For the purpose of this subsection (2)(b)(((v) of this subsection))
(iv), a (("))market((")) means direct written insurance premium in this
state for a line of business as contained in the annual statement
required to be filed by insurers licensed to do business in this state;
(((vi))) (v) An acquisition for which a preacquisition notification
would be required under this section due solely to the resulting effect
on the ocean marine insurance line of business;
(((vii))) (vi) An acquisition of an insurer whose domiciliary
commissioner affirmatively finds((:)) that the insurer is in failing
condition((;)), there is a lack of feasible alternative to improving
such condition((;)), and the public benefits of improving the insurer's
condition through the acquisition exceed the public benefits that would
arise from not lessening competition; and the findings are communicated
by the domiciliary commissioner to the commissioner of this state.
(3) An acquisition covered by subsection (2) of this section may be
subject to an order under subsection (5) of this section unless the
acquiring person files a preacquisition notification and the waiting
period has expired. The acquired person may file a preacquisition
notification.
(a) The preacquisition notification must be in such form and
contain such information as prescribed by the national association of
insurance commissioners relating to those markets that, under
subsection (2)(b)(((v))) (iv) of this section, cause the acquisition
not to be exempted from this section. The commissioner may require
such additional material and information as he or she deems necessary
to determine whether the proposed acquisition, if consummated, would
violate the competitive standard of subsection (4) of this section.
The required information may include an opinion of an economist as to
the competitive impact of the acquisition in this state accompanied by
a summary of the education and experience of the person indicating his
or her ability to render an informed opinion.
(b) The waiting period required begins on the date the commissioner
declares the preacquisition notification to be complete and ends on the
earlier of the sixtieth day after the date of the declaration or the
termination of the waiting period by the commissioner. ((Before))
Prior to the end of the waiting period, the commissioner on a one-time
basis may require the submission of additional needed information
relevant to the proposed acquisition((. If additional information is
required)), in which event the waiting period ends on the earlier of
the sixtieth day after ((the commissioner declares he or she has
received)) receipt of the additional information by the commissioner or
the termination of the waiting period by the commissioner.
(4)(a) The commissioner may enter an order under subsection (5)(a)
of this section with respect to an acquisition if there is substantial
evidence that the effect of the acquisition may be substantially to
lessen competition in a line of insurance in this state or tend to
create a monopoly therein or if the insurer fails to file adequate
information in compliance with subsection (3) of this section.
(b) In determining whether a proposed acquisition would violate the
competitive standard of (a) of this subsection, the commissioner shall
consider the following:
(i) An acquisition covered under subsection (2) of this section
involving two or more insurers competing in the same market is prima
facie evidence of violation of the competitive standards, as follows:
(A) If the market is highly concentrated and the involved insurers
possess the following shares of the market:

Insurer A Insurer B

4% 4% or more

10% 2% or more

15% 1% or more; or

(B) If the market is not highly concentrated and the involved
insurers possess the following shares of the market:

Insurer A Insurer B

5% 5% or more

10% 4% or more

15% 3% or more

19% 1% or more

A highly concentrated market is one in which the share of the four
largest insurers is seventy-five percent or more of the market.
Percentages not shown in the tables are interpolated proportionately to
the percentages that are shown. If more than two insurers are
involved, exceeding the total of the two columns in the table is prima
facie evidence of violation of the competitive standard in (a) of this
subsection. For the purpose of this subsection (4)(b)(i) ((of this
subsection)), the insurer with the largest share of the market is
Insurer A.
(ii) There is a significant trend toward increased concentration
when the aggregate market share of a grouping of the largest insurers
in the market, from the two largest to the eight largest, has increased
by seven percent or more of the market over a period of time extending
from a base year five to ten years before the acquisition up to the
time of the acquisition. An acquisition or merger covered under
subsection (2) of this section involving two or more insurers competing
in the same market is prima facie evidence of violation of the
competitive standard in (a) of this subsection if:
(A) There is a significant trend toward increased concentration in
the market;
(B) One of the insurers involved is one of the insurers in a
grouping of such large insurers showing the requisite increase in the
market share; and
(C) Another involved insurer's market is two percent or more.
(iii) For the purposes of this subsection (4)(b) ((of this
subsection)):
(A) ((The term)) "Insurer" includes ((a)) any company or group of
companies under common management, ownership, or control;
(B) ((The term)) "Market" means the relevant product and
geographical markets. In determining the relevant product and
geographical markets, the commissioner shall give due consideration to,
among other things, the definitions or guidelines, if any, adopted by
the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and to information,
if any, submitted by parties to the acquisition. In the absence of
sufficient information to the contrary, the relevant product market is
assumed to be the direct written insurance premium for a line of
business, such line being that used in the annual statement required to
be filed by insurers doing business in this state, and the relevant
geographical market is assumed to be this state;
(C) The burden of showing prima facie evidence of violation of the
competitive standard rests upon the commissioner.
(iv) Even though an acquisition is not prima facie violative of the
competitive standard under (b)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, the
commissioner may establish the requisite anticompetitive effect based
upon other substantial evidence. Even though an acquisition is prima
facie violative of the competitive standard under (b)(i) and (ii) of
this subsection, a party may establish the absence of the requisite
anticompetitive effect based upon other substantial evidence. Relevant
factors in making a determination under (((b)(iv) of)) this subsection
include, but are not limited to, the following: Market shares,
volatility of ranking of market leaders, number of competitors,
concentration, trend of concentration in the industry, and ease of
entry and exit into the market.
(c) An order may not be entered under subsection (5)(a) of this
section if:
(i) The acquisition will yield substantial economies of scale or
economies in resource use that cannot be feasibly achieved in any other
way, and the public benefits that would arise from the economies exceed
the public benefits that would arise from not lessening competition; or
(ii) The acquisition will substantially increase the availability
of insurance, and the public benefits of the increase exceed the public
benefits that would arise from not lessening competition.
(5)(a)(i) If an acquisition violates the standards of this section,
the commissioner may enter an order:
(A) Requiring an involved insurer to cease and desist from doing
business in this state with respect to the line or lines of insurance
involved in the violation; or
(B) Denying the application of an acquired or acquiring insurer for
a license to do business in this state.
(ii) ((The commissioner)) Such an order may not ((enter the order))
be entered unless:
(A) There is a hearing;
(B) Notice of the hearing is issued ((before)) prior to the end of
the waiting period and not less than fifteen days ((before)) prior to
the hearing; and
(C) The hearing is concluded and the order is issued no later than
sixty days after the ((end of the waiting period)) filing of the
preacquisition notification with the commissioner.
(iii) Every order must be accompanied by a written decision of the
commissioner setting forth ((his or her)) findings of fact and
conclusions of law.
(((iii))) (iv) An order entered under this subsection (5)(a) ((of
this subsection)) may not become final earlier than thirty days after
it is issued, during which time the involved insurer may submit a plan
to remedy the anticompetitive impact of the acquisition within a
reasonable time. Based upon the plan or other information, the
commissioner shall specify the conditions, if any, under the time
period during which the aspects of the acquisition causing a violation
of the standards of this section would be remedied and the order
vacated or modified.
(((iv))) (v) An order pursuant to this subsection (5)(a) ((of this
subsection)) does not apply if the acquisition is not consummated.
(b) ((A)) Any person who violates a cease and desist order of the
commissioner under (a) of this subsection and while the order is in
effect, may, after notice and hearing and upon order of the
commissioner, be subject at the discretion of the commissioner to one
or more of the following:
(i) A monetary ((penalty)) fine of not more than ten thousand
dollars for every day of violation; or
(ii) Suspension or revocation of the person's license; or
(iii) Both (b)(i) and (((b)))(ii) of this subsection.
(c) ((An)) Any insurer or other person who fails to make a filing
required by this section, and who also fails to demonstrate a good
faith effort to comply with the filing requirement, is subject to a
civil penalty of not more than fifty thousand dollars.
(6) RCW 48.31B.045 (2) and (3) and 48.31B.050 do not apply to
acquisitions covered under subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.31B.025 and 2000 c 214 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every insurer that is authorized to do business in this state
((that)) and is a member of an insurance holding company system shall
register with the commissioner, except a foreign insurer subject to
registration requirements and standards adopted by statute or
regulation in the jurisdiction of its domicile that are substantially
similar to those contained in:
(a) This section;
(b) RCW 48.31B.030 (1)(a), (2), and (3); and
(c) Either RCW 48.31B.030(1)(b) or a provision such as the
following: Each registered insurer shall keep current the information
required to be disclosed in its registration statement by reporting all
material changes or additions within fifteen days after the end of the
month in which it learns of each change or addition.
((An)) Any insurer which is subject to registration under this
section shall register within fifteen days after it becomes subject to
registration, and annually thereafter by ((May 15th)) April 30th of
each year for the previous calendar year, unless the commissioner for
good cause shown extends the time for registration, and then within the
extended time. The commissioner may require ((an)) any insurer
authorized to do business in the state that is a member of a holding
company system, ((but that)) and which is not subject to registration
under this section, to furnish a copy of the registration statement,
the summary specified in subsection (3) of this section, or other
information filed by the insurance company with the insurance
regulatory authority of its domiciliary jurisdiction.
(2) ((An)) Every insurer subject to registration shall file the
registration statement on a form and in a format prescribed by the
national association of insurance commissioners, containing the
following current information:
(a) The capital structure, general financial condition, ownership,
and management of the insurer and any person controlling the insurer;
(b) The identity and relationship of every member of the insurance
holding company system;
(c) The following agreements in force, and transactions currently
outstanding or that have occurred during the last calendar year between
the insurer and its affiliates:
(i) Loans, other investments, or purchases, sales, or exchanges of
securities of the affiliates by the insurer or of the insurer by its
affiliates;
(ii) Purchases, sales, or exchange of assets;
(iii) Transactions not in the ordinary course of business;
(iv) Guarantees or undertakings for the benefit of an affiliate
that result in an actual contingent exposure of the insurer's assets to
liability, other than insurance contracts entered into in the ordinary
course of the insurer's business;
(v) All management agreements, service contracts, and cost-sharing
arrangements;
(vi) Reinsurance agreements;
(vii) Dividends and other distributions to shareholders; and
(viii) Consolidated tax allocation agreements;
(d) Any pledge of the insurer's stock, including stock of
subsidiary or controlling affiliate, for a loan made to a member of the
insurance holding company system;
(e) If requested by the commissioner, the insurer must include
financial statements of or within an insurance holding company system,
including all affiliates. Financial statements may include but are not
limited to annual audited financial statements filed with the United
States securities and exchange commission pursuant to the securities
act of 1933, as amended, or the securities exchange act of 1934, as
amended. An insurer required to file financial statements pursuant to
this subsection (2)(e) may satisfy the request by providing the
commissioner with the most recently filed parent corporation financial
statements that have been filed with the United States securities and
exchange commission;
(f) Other matters concerning transactions between registered
insurers and any affiliates as may be included from time to time in
registration forms adopted or approved by the commissioner;
(g) Statements that the insurer's board of directors oversees
corporate governance and internal controls and that the insurer's
officers or senior management have approved, implemented, and continue
to maintain and monitor corporate governance and internal control
procedures; and
(h) Any other information required by the commissioner by rule.
(3) All registration statements must contain a summary outlining
all items in the current registration statement representing changes
from the prior registration statement.
(4) No information need be disclosed on the registration statement
filed under subsection (2) of this section if the information is not
material for the purposes of this section. Unless the commissioner by
rule or order provides otherwise, sales, purchases, exchanges, loans or
extensions of credit, investments, or guarantees involving one-half of
one percent or less of an insurer's admitted assets as of ((the 31st
day of the previous)) December 31st next preceding are not material for
purposes of this section.
(5)(a) Subject to RCW 48.31B.030(2), each registered insurer shall
report to the commissioner all dividends and other distributions to
shareholders within five business days after their declaration and ((at
least)) fifteen business days before payment, and shall provide the
commissioner such other information as may be required by rule.
(b) If the commissioner determines that a registered insurer's
surplus as regards policyholders is not reasonable in relation to the
insurer's outstanding liabilities and adequate to its financial needs,
the commissioner may order the registered insurance company to limit or
discontinue the payment of stockholder dividends until such time as the
surplus is adequate.
(6) ((A)) Any person within an insurance holding company system
subject to registration ((shall)) is required to provide complete and
accurate information to an insurer, where the information is reasonably
necessary to enable the insurer to comply with this chapter.
(7) The commissioner shall terminate the registration of an insurer
that demonstrates that it no longer is a member of an insurance holding
company system.
(8) The commissioner may require or allow two or more affiliated
insurers subject to registration under this section to file a
consolidated registration statement.
(9) The commissioner may allow an insurer authorized to do business
in this state and which is part of an insurance holding company system
to register on behalf of an affiliated insurer ((that)) which is
required to register under subsection (1) of this section and to file
all information and material required to be filed under this section.
(10) This section does not apply to an insurer, information, or
transaction if and to the extent that the commissioner by rule or order
exempts the insurer, information, or transaction from this section.
(11) ((A)) Any person may file with the commissioner a disclaimer
of affiliation with ((an)) any authorized insurer, or ((an)) any
insurer or ((a)) any member of ((an)) any insurance holding company
system may file the disclaimer. The person making such a filing with
the commissioner shall at the same time deliver a complete copy of the
filing to each domestic insurer which is the subject of such filing.
The disclaimer must fully disclose all material relationships and bases
for affiliation between the person and the insurer as well as the basis
for disclaiming the affiliation. ((After a disclaimer has been filed,
the insurer is relieved of any duty to register or report under this
section that may arise out of the insurer's relationship with the
person unless and until the commissioner disallows the disclaimer. The
commissioner shall disallow the disclaimer only after furnishing all
parties in interest with notice and opportunity to be heard and after
making specific findings of fact to support the disallowance.
(12))) A disclaimer of affiliation is deemed to have been granted
unless the commissioner, within thirty days following receipt of a
complete disclaimer, notifies the filing party the disclaimer is
disallowed. In the event of disallowance, the disclaiming party may
request an administrative hearing, which shall be granted. The
disclaiming party is relieved of its duty to register under this
section if approval of the disclaimer has been granted by the
commissioner, or if the disclaimer is deemed to have been approved.
(12) The ultimate controlling person of every insurer subject to
registration shall also file an annual enterprise risk report. The
report must, to the best of the ultimate controlling person's knowledge
and belief, identify the material risks within the insurance holding
company system that could pose enterprise risk to the insurer. The
report must be filed with the lead state commissioner of the insurance
holding company system as determined by the procedures within the
financial analysis handbook adopted by the national association of
insurance commissioners.
(13) The failure to file a registration statement or ((a)) any
summary of the registration statement or enterprise risk filing
required by this section within the time specified for ((the)) filing
is a violation of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.31B.030 and 1993 c 462 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Transactions within ((a)) an insurance holding company
system to which an insurer subject to registration is a party are
subject to the following standards:
(i) The terms must be fair and reasonable;
(ii) Agreements for cost-sharing services and management must
include such provisions as required by rule issued by the commissioner;
(iii) Charges or fees for services performed must be fair and
reasonable;
(((iii))) (iv) Expenses incurred and payment received must be
allocated to the insurer in conformity with customary insurance
accounting practices consistently applied;
(((iv))) (v) The books, accounts, and records of each party to all
such transactions must be so maintained as to clearly and accurately
disclose the nature and details of the transactions((,)) including such
accounting information as is necessary to support the reasonableness of
the charges or fees to the respective parties; and
(((v))) (vi) The insurer's surplus regarding policyholders
((after)) following any dividends or distributions to shareholders or
affiliates must be reasonable in relation to the insurer's outstanding
liabilities and adequate to its financial needs.
(b) The following transactions involving a domestic insurer and a
person in its insurance holding company system, including amendments or
modifications of affiliate agreements previously filed pursuant to this
section, which are subject to the materiality standards contained in
this subsection, may not be entered into unless the insurer has
notified the commissioner in writing of its intention to enter into the
transaction and the commissioner declares the notice to be sufficient
at least sixty days before, or such shorter period as the commissioner
may permit, and the commissioner has not disapproved it within that
period. The notice for amendments or modifications must include the
reasons for the change and the financial impact on the domestic
insurer. Informal notice must be reported, within thirty days after a
termination of a previously filed agreement, to the commissioner for
determination of the type of filing required, if any:
(i) Sales, purchases, exchanges, loans or extensions of credit,
guarantees, or investments if the transactions are equal to or exceed:
(A) With respect to nonlife insurers and not including health care
service contractors and health maintenance organizations, the lesser of
three percent of the insurer's admitted assets or twenty-five percent
of surplus as regards policyholders;
(B) With respect to life insurers, three percent of the insurer's
admitted assets((; each as of the 31st day of the previous December))
as of December 31st next preceding;
(C) With respect to health care service contractors and health
maintenance organizations, the lesser of five percent of the insurer's
admitted assets or twenty-five percent of its capital and surplus or
net worth as of December 31st next preceding;
(ii) Loans or extensions of credit to any person who is not an
affiliate, where the insurer makes the loans or extensions of credit
with the agreement or understanding that the proceeds of the
transactions, in whole or in substantial part, are to be used to make
loans or extensions of credit to, to purchase assets of, or to make
investments in, an affiliate of the insurer making the loans or
extensions of credit if the transactions are equal to or exceed:
(A) With respect to nonlife insurers and not including health care
service contractors and health maintenance organizations, the lesser of
three percent of the insurer's admitted assets or twenty-five percent
of surplus as regards policyholders;
(B) With respect to life insurers, three percent of the insurer's
admitted assets((; each as of the 31st day of the previous December))
as of December 31st next preceding;
(C) With respect to health care service contractors and health
maintenance organizations, the lesser of five percent of the insurer's
admitted assets or twenty-five percent of its capital and surplus or
net worth as of December 31st next preceding;
(iii) Reinsurance agreements or modifications ((to them)) thereto,
including:
(A) All reinsurance pooling agreements;
(B) Agreements in which the reinsurance premium or a change in the
insurer's liabilities, or the projected reinsurance premium or a change
in the insurer's liabilities in any of the next three years, equals or
exceeds five percent of the insurer's surplus as regards policyholders,
as of ((the 31st day of the previous)) December 31st next preceding,
including those agreements that may require as consideration the
transfer of assets from an insurer to a nonaffiliate, if an agreement
or understanding exists between the insurer and nonaffiliate that any
portion of the assets will be transferred to one or more affiliates of
the insurer;
(iv) All management agreements, service contracts, tax allocation
agreements, guarantees, and all cost-sharing arrangements; ((and))
(v) Guarantees when made by a domestic insurer. However, a
guarantee which is quantifiable as to amount is not subject to the
notice requirements of this subsection (1)(b)(v) unless it exceeds the
lesser of one-half of one percent of the insurer's admitted assets or
ten percent of surplus as regards policyholders as of December 31st
next preceding. Further, all guarantees which are not quantifiable as
to amount are subject to the notice requirements of this subsection
(1)(b)(v);
(vi) Direct or indirect acquisitions or investments in a person
that controls the insurer or in an affiliate of the insurer in an
amount which, together with its present holdings in such investments,
exceeds two and one-half percent of the insurer's surplus to
policyholders. Direct or indirect acquisitions or investments in
subsidiaries acquired or authorized pursuant to chapter 48.13 RCW, or
in nonsubsidiary insurance affiliates that are subject to this chapter,
are exempt from this requirement; and
(vii) Any material transactions, specified by rule, ((that)) which
the commissioner determines may adversely affect the interests of the
insurer's policyholders.
((Nothing contained in this section authorizes or permits a)) This
subsection does not authorize or permit any transaction ((that)) which,
in the case of an insurer not a member of the same insurance holding
company system, would be otherwise contrary to law.
(c) A domestic insurer may not enter into transactions ((that))
which are part of a plan or series of like transactions with persons
within the insurance holding company system if the purpose of those
separate transactions is to avoid the statutory threshold amount and
thus avoid the review that would occur otherwise. If the commissioner
determines that the separate transactions were entered into over ((a))
any twelve-month period for that purpose, the commissioner may apply
for an order as described in RCW 48.31B.045(1).
(d) The commissioner, in reviewing transactions under (b) of this
subsection, ((shall)) must consider whether the transactions comply
with the standards set forth in (a) of this subsection and whether they
may adversely affect the interests of policyholders.
(e) The commissioner ((shall)) must be notified within thirty days
of an investment of the domestic insurer in any one corporation if the
total investment in the corporation by the insurance holding company
system exceeds ten percent of the corporation's voting securities.
(2)(a) ((No)) A domestic insurer may not pay an extraordinary
dividend or make any other extraordinary distribution to its
shareholders until((: (i))) thirty days after the commissioner
declares that he or she has received sufficient notice of the
declaration thereof and has not within that period disapproved the
payment((;)), or (((ii))) until the commissioner has approved the
payment within the thirty-day period.
(b) For purposes of this section, an extraordinary dividend or
distribution is ((a)) any dividend or distribution of cash or other
property, whose fair market value((,)) together with that of other
dividends or distributions made within the ((period of)) preceding
twelve ((consecutive)) months ((ending on the date on which the
proposed dividend is scheduled for payment or distribution,)) exceeds
the greater of:
(i) Ten percent of the ((company's)) insurer's surplus as regards
policyholders or net worth as of ((the 31st day of the previous))
December next preceding; or
(ii) The net gain from operations of the ((company)) insurer, if
the ((company)) insurer is a life insurance company, or the net income
if the company is not a life insurance company, for the twelve month
period ending ((the 31st day of the previous)) December next preceding,
but does not include pro rata distributions of any class of the
((company's)) insurer's own securities.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an insurer may
declare an extraordinary dividend or distribution that is conditional
upon the commissioner's approval. The declaration confers no rights
upon shareholders until: (i) The commissioner has approved the payment
of the dividend or distribution; or (ii) the commissioner has not
disapproved the payment within the thirty-day period referred to in (a)
of this subsection.
(3) For purposes of this chapter, in determining whether an
insurer's surplus as regards policyholders is reasonable in relation to
the insurer's outstanding liabilities and adequate to its financial
needs, the following factors, among others, ((may)) must be considered:
(a) The size of the insurer as measured by its assets, capital and
surplus, reserves, premium writings, insurance in force, and other
appropriate criteria;
(b) The extent to which the insurer's business is diversified among
((the)) several lines of insurance;
(c) The number and size of risks insured in each line of business;
(d) The extent of the geographical dispersion of the insurer's
insured risks;
(e) The nature and extent of the insurer's reinsurance program;
(f) The quality, diversification, and liquidity of the insurer's
investment portfolio;
(g) The recent past and projected future trend in the size of the
insurer's surplus as regards policyholders;
(h) The surplus as regards policyholders maintained by other
comparable insurers;
(i) The adequacy of the insurer's reserves;
(j) The quality and liquidity of investments in affiliates. The
commissioner may ((discount)) treat any such investment ((or may treat
any such investment)) as a disallowed asset for purposes of determining
the adequacy of surplus as regards policyholders whenever in ((his or
her)) the judgment of the commissioner the investment so warrants; and
(k) The quality of the insurer's earnings and the extent to which
the reported earnings include extraordinary items.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding the control of a domestic insurer by any
person, the officers and directors of the insurer are not thereby
relieved of any obligation or liability to which they would otherwise
be subject by law, and the insurer must be managed so as to assure its
separate operating identity consistent with this title.
(b) This section does not preclude a domestic insurer from having
or sharing a common management or cooperative or joint use of
personnel, property, or services with one or more other persons under
arrangements meeting the standards of subsection (1)(a) of this
section.
(c) At least one-third of a domestic insurer's directors and at
least one-third of the members of each committee of the insurer's board
of directors must be persons who are not: (i) Officers or employees of
the insurer or of any entity that controls, is controlled by, or is
under common control with the insurer; or (ii) beneficial owners of a
controlling interest in the voting securities of the insurer or of an
entity that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with
the insurer. A quorum for transacting business at a meeting of the
insurer's board of directors or any committee of the board of directors
must include at least one person with the qualifications described in
(a) of this subsection.
(d)(i) For a for-profit person, the board of directors of a
domestic insurer shall establish one or more committees comprised
solely of directors who are not officers or employees of the insurer or
of any entity controlling, controlled by, or under common control with
the insurer and who are not beneficial owners of a controlling interest
in the voting stock of the insurer or any such entity. The committee
or committees have responsibility for nominating candidates for
director for election by shareholders or policyholders, evaluating the
performance of officers deemed to be principal officers of the insurer,
and recommending to the board of directors the selection and
compensation of the principal officers.
(ii) For a nonprofit person, the board of directors of a domestic
insurer shall establish one or more committees comprised solely of
directors who are not officers or employees of the insurer or of any
entity controlling, controlled by, or under common control with the
insurer. The committee or committees have responsibility for
nominating candidates for director for election, evaluating the
performance of officers deemed to be principal officers of the insurer,
and recommending to the board of directors the selection and
compensation of the principal officers.
(e) The provisions of (c) and (d) of this subsection do not apply
to a domestic insurer if the person controlling the insurer has a board
of directors and committees thereof that meet the requirements of (c)
and (d) of this subsection with respect to such controlling entity.
(f) An insurer may make application to the commissioner for a
waiver from the requirements of this subsection, if the insurer's
annual direct written and assumed premium, excluding premiums reinsured
with the federal crop insurance corporation and federal flood program,
is less than three hundred million dollars. An insurer may also make
application to the commissioner for a waiver from the requirements of
this subsection based upon unique circumstances. The commissioner may
consider various factors including, but not limited to, the type of
business entity, volume of business written, availability of qualified
board members, or the ownership or organizational structure of the
entity.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.31B.035 and 1993 c 462 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitation contained in this section and in
addition to the powers that the commissioner has under chapter 48.03
RCW relating to the examination of insurers, the commissioner ((also
may order an insurer registered under RCW 48.31B.025 to produce such
records, books, or other information papers in the possession of the
insurer or its affiliates as are reasonably necessary to ascertain the
financial condition of the insurer or to determine compliance with this
title. If the insurer fails to comply with the order, the commissioner
may examine the affiliates to obtain the information)) has the power to
examine any insurer registered under RCW 48.31B.025 and its affiliates
to ascertain the financial condition of the insurer, including the
enterprise risk to the insurer by the ultimate controlling party, or by
any entity or combination of entities within the insurance holding
company system, or by the insurance holding company system on a
consolidated basis.
(2)(a) The commissioner may order any insurer registered under RCW
48.31B.025 to produce such records, books, or other information papers
in the possession of the insurer or its affiliates as are reasonably
necessary to determine compliance with this title.
(b) To determine compliance with this title, the commissioner may
order any insurer registered under RCW 48.31B.025 to produce
information not in the possession of the insurer if the insurer can
obtain access to such information pursuant to contractual
relationships, statutory obligations, or other method. In the event
the insurer cannot obtain the information requested by the
commissioner, the insurer shall provide the commissioner a detailed
explanation of the reason that the insurer cannot obtain the
information and the identity of the holder of information. Whenever it
appears to the commissioner that the detailed explanation is without
merit, the commissioner may require, after notice and hearing, the
insurer to pay a fine of ten thousand dollars for each day's delay, or
may suspend or revoke the insurer's license. The commissioner shall
transfer the fine collected under this section to the state treasurer
for deposit into the general fund.
(3) The commissioner may retain at the registered insurer's expense
such attorneys, actuaries, accountants, and other experts not otherwise
a part of the commissioner's staff as are reasonably necessary to
assist in the conduct of the examination under subsection (1) of this
section. Any persons so retained are under the direction and control
of the commissioner and shall act in a purely advisory capacity.
(((3))) (4) Notwithstanding the provisions under RCW 48.03.060,
each registered insurer producing for examination records, books, and
papers under subsection (1) of this section ((are)) is liable for and
((shall)) must pay the expense of the examination ((in accordance with
RCW 48.03.060)).
(5) In the event the insurer fails to comply with an order, the
commissioner has the power to examine the affiliates to obtain the
information. The commissioner also has the power to issue subpoenas,
to administer oaths, and to examine under oath any person for purposes
of determining compliance with this section. Upon the failure or
refusal of any person to obey a subpoena, the commissioner may petition
a court of competent jurisdiction, and upon proper showing, the court
may enter an order compelling the witness to appear and testify or
produce documentary evidence. Failure to obey the court order is
punishable as contempt of court. Every person is required to attend as
a witness at the place specified in the subpoena, when subpoenaed,
anywhere within the state. Every person is entitled to the same fees
and mileage, if claimed, as a witness as provided in RCW 48.03.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 48.31B RCW
to read as follows:
(1) With respect to any insurer registered under RCW 48.31B.025,
and in accordance with subsection (3) of this section, the commissioner
has the power to participate in a supervisory college for any domestic
insurer that is part of an insurance holding company system with
international operations in order to determine compliance by the
insurer with this title. The powers of the commissioner with respect
to supervisory colleges include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) Initiating the establishment of a supervisory college;
(b) Clarifying the membership and participation of other
supervisors in the supervisory college;
(c) Clarifying the functions of the supervisory college and the
role of other regulators, including the establishment of a group-wide
supervisor;
(d) Coordinating the ongoing activities of the supervisory college,
including planning meetings, supervisory activities, and processes for
information sharing; and
(e) Establishing a crisis management plan.
(2) Each registered insurer subject to this section is liable for
and must pay the reasonable expenses of the commissioner's
participation in a supervisory college in accordance with subsection
(3) of this section, including reasonable travel expenses. For
purposes of this section, a supervisory college may be convened as
either a temporary or permanent forum for communication and cooperation
between the regulators charged with the supervision of the insurer or
its affiliates, and the commissioner may establish a regular assessment
to the insurer for the payment of these expenses.
(3) In order to assess the business strategy, financial position,
legal and regulatory position, risk exposure, risk management, and
governance processes, and as part of the examination of individual
insurers in accordance with RCW 48.31B.035, the commissioner may
participate in a supervisory college with other regulators charged with
supervision of the insurer or its affiliates, including other state,
federal, and international regulatory agencies. The commissioner may
enter into agreements in accordance with section 9(3) of this act
providing the basis for cooperation between the commissioner and the
other regulatory agencies, and the activities of the supervisory
college. This section does not delegate to the supervisory college the
authority of the commissioner to regulate or supervise the insurer or
its affiliates within its jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 48.31B RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Documents, materials, or other information in the possession or
control of the commissioner that are obtained by or disclosed to the
commissioner or any other person in the course of an examination or
investigation made pursuant to RCW 48.31B.035 and all information
reported pursuant to RCW 48.31B.015(2) (l) and (m), 48.31B.025,
48.31B.030, and section 8 of this act are confidential by law and
privileged, are not subject to chapter 42.56 RCW, are not subject to
subpoena, and are not subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in
any private civil action. However, the commissioner is authorized to
use the documents, materials, or other information in the furtherance
of any regulatory or legal action brought as a part of the
commissioner's official duties. The commissioner shall not otherwise
make the documents, materials, or other information public without the
prior written consent of the insurer to which it pertains unless the
commissioner, after giving the insurer and its affiliates who would be
affected thereby, notice and opportunity to be heard, determines that
the interest of policyholders, shareholders, or the public is served by
the publication thereof, in which event the commissioner may publish
all or any part in such manner as may be deemed appropriate.
(2) Neither the commissioner nor any person who received documents,
materials, or other information while acting under the authority of the
commissioner or with whom such documents, materials, or other
information are shared pursuant to this chapter is permitted or may be
required to testify in any private civil action concerning any
confidential documents, materials, or information subject to subsection
(1) of this section.
(3) In order to assist in the performance of the commissioner's
duties, the commissioner:
(a) May share documents, materials, or other information, including
the confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information
subject to subsection (1) of this section, with other state, federal,
and international regulatory agencies, with the national association of
insurance commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, with the
international association of insurance supervisors and the bank for
international settlements and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and with
state, federal, and international law enforcement authorities,
including members of any supervisory college described in section 8 of
this act, provided the recipient agrees in writing to maintain the
confidentiality and privileged status of the document, material, or
other information, and has verified in writing the legal authority to
maintain confidentiality;
(b) Notwithstanding (a) of this subsection, may only share
confidential and privileged documents, material, or information
reported pursuant to RCW 48.31B.025(12) with commissioners of states
having statutes or rules substantially similar to subsection (1) of
this section and who have agreed in writing not to disclose such
information;
(c) May receive documents, materials, or information, including
otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials, or
information from the national association of insurance commissioners
and its affiliates and subsidiaries, the international association of
insurance supervisors and the bank for international settlements and
its affiliates and subsidiaries, and from regulatory and law
enforcement officials of other foreign or domestic jurisdictions, and
shall maintain as confidential or privileged any document, material, or
information received with notice or the understanding that it is
confidential or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is
the source of the document, material, or information; and
(d) Shall enter into written agreements with the national
association of insurance commissioners governing sharing and use of
information provided pursuant to this chapter consistent with this
subsection that shall:
(i) Specify procedures and protocols regarding the confidentiality
and security of information shared with the national association of
insurance commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries pursuant to
this chapter, including procedures and protocols for sharing by the
national association of insurance commissioners with other state,
federal, or international regulators including the international
association of insurance supervisors and the bank for international
settlements and its affiliates and subsidiaries;
(ii) Specify that ownership of information shared with the national
association of insurance commissioners and its affiliates and
subsidiaries pursuant to this chapter remains with the commissioner and
the national association of insurance commissioners' use of the
information is subject to the direction of the commissioner;
(iii) Require prompt notice to be given to an insurer whose
confidential information in the possession of the national association
of insurance commissioners pursuant to this chapter is subject to a
request or subpoena to the national association of insurance
commissioners for disclosure or production; and
(iv) Require the national association of insurance commissioners
and its affiliates and subsidiaries to consent to intervention by an
insurer in any judicial or administrative action in which the national
association of insurance commissioners and its affiliates and
subsidiaries may be required to disclose confidential information about
the insurer shared with the national association of insurance
commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries pursuant to this
chapter.
(4) The sharing of information by the commissioner pursuant to this
chapter does not constitute a delegation of regulatory authority or
rule making, and the commissioner is solely responsible for the
administration, execution, and enforcement of this chapter.
(5) No waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of
confidentiality in the documents, materials, or information shall occur
as a result of disclosure to the commissioner under this section or as
a result of sharing as authorized in subsection (3) of this section.
(6) Documents, materials, or other information in the possession or
control of the national association of insurance commissioners pursuant
to this chapter are confidential by law and privileged, are not subject
to chapter 42.56 RCW, are not subject to subpoena, and are not subject
to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil action.

Sec. 10 RCW 48.31B.040 and 1993 c 462 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commissioner may, ((upon notice and opportunity for all
interested persons to be heard, adopt rules and issue orders that are
necessary to carry out)) in accordance with the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, adopt rules interpreting and
implementing this chapter.

Sec. 11 RCW 48.31B.050 and 1993 c 462 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall require, after notice and hearing, an
insurer failing, without just cause, to file a registration statement
as required in this chapter, to pay a penalty of not more than ten
thousand dollars per day. The maximum penalty under this section is
one million dollars. The commissioner may reduce the penalty if the
insurer demonstrates to the commissioner that the imposition of the
penalty would constitute a financial hardship to the insurer. The
commissioner shall pay a fine collected under this section to the state
treasurer for the account of the general fund.
(2) Every director or officer of an insurance holding company
system who knowingly violates this chapter, or participates in, or
assents to, or who knowingly permits an officer or agent of the insurer
to engage in transactions or make investments that have not been
properly reported or submitted under RCW 48.31B.025(1) or
48.31B.030(1)(b) or (2), or that violate this chapter, shall pay, in
their individual capacity, a civil forfeiture of not more than ten
thousand dollars per violation, after notice and hearing before the
commissioner. In determining the amount of the civil forfeiture, the
commissioner shall take into account the appropriateness of the
forfeiture with respect to the gravity of the violation, the history of
previous violations, and such other matters as justice may require.
(3) Whenever it appears to the commissioner that an insurer subject
to this chapter or a director, officer, employee, or agent of the
insurer has engaged in a transaction or entered into a contract that is
subject to RCW 48.31B.030 and that would not have been approved had
approval been requested, the commissioner may order the insurer to
cease and desist immediately any further activity under that
transaction or contract. After notice and hearing the commissioner may
also order the insurer to void any such contracts and restore the
status quo if that action is in the best interest of the policyholders,
creditors, or the public.
(4) Whenever it appears to the commissioner that an insurer or a
director, officer, employee, or agent of the insurer has committed a
willful violation of this chapter, the commissioner may refer the
matter to the prosecuting attorney of Thurston county or the county in
which the principal office of the insurer is located. An insurer that
willfully violates this chapter may be fined not more than one million
dollars. Any individual who willfully violates this chapter may be
fined in his or her individual capacity not more than ten thousand
dollars, or be imprisoned for not more than three years, or both.
(5) An officer, director, or employee of an insurance holding
company system who willfully and knowingly subscribes to or makes or
causes to be made a false statement or false report or false filing
with the intent to deceive the commissioner in the performance of his
or her duties under this chapter, upon conviction thereof, shall be
imprisoned for not more than three years or fined not more than ten
thousand dollars or both. The officer, director, or employee upon whom
the fine is imposed shall pay the fine in his or her individual
capacity.
(6) Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has
committed a violation of RCW 48.31B.015 and which prevents the full
understanding of the enterprise risk to the insurer by affiliates or by
the insurance holding company system, the violation may serve as an
independent basis for disapproving dividends or distributions and for
placing the insurer under an order of supervision in accordance with
RCW 48.31.400.

Sec. 12 RCW 48.31B.070 and 1993 c 462 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person aggrieved by an act, determination, rule, order, or
any other action of the commissioner under this chapter may proceed in
accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) A person aggrieved by a failure of the commissioner to act or
make a determination required by this chapter may petition the
commissioner under the procedure described in ((RCW 34.05.330)) the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 13 RCW 42.56.400 and 2013 c 277 s 5 and 2013 c 65 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following information relating to insurance and financial
institutions is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance appeals
that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation claims filed
with the board under RCW 7.68.110;
(2) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW;
(3) The names and individual identification data of either all
owners or all insureds, or both, received by the insurance commissioner
under chapter 48.102 RCW;
(4) Information provided under RCW 48.30A.045 through 48.30A.060;
(5) Information provided under RCW 48.05.510 through 48.05.535,
48.43.200 through 48.43.225, 48.44.530 through 48.44.555, and 48.46.600
through 48.46.625;
(6) Examination reports and information obtained by the department
of financial institutions from banks under RCW 30.04.075, from savings
banks under RCW 32.04.220, from savings and loan associations under RCW
33.04.110, from credit unions under RCW 31.12.565, from check cashers
and sellers under RCW 31.45.030(3), and from securities brokers and
investment advisers under RCW 21.20.100, all of which is confidential
and privileged information;
(7) Information provided to the insurance commissioner under RCW
48.110.040(3);
(8) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.02.065, all of which are confidential and
privileged;
(9) ((Confidential proprietary and trade secret information
provided to the commissioner under RCW 48.31C.020 through 48.31C.050
and 48.31C.070)) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the
insurance commissioner under RCW 48.31B.015(2) (l) and (m), 48.31B.025,
48.31B.030, 48.31B.035, and section 8 of this act, all of which are
confidential and privileged;
(10) Data filed under RCW 48.140.020, 48.140.030, 48.140.050, and
7.70.140 that, alone or in combination with any other data, may reveal
the identity of a claimant, health care provider, health care facility,
insuring entity, or self-insurer involved in a particular claim or a
collection of claims. For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Claimant" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(2).
(b) "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(6).
(c) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(7).
(d) "Insuring entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(8).
(e) "Self-insurer" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(11);
(11) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.135.060;
(12) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.060;
(13) Confidential and privileged documents obtained or produced by
the insurance commissioner and identified in RCW 48.37.080;
(14) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.140;
(15) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.17.595;
(16) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.102.051(1) and 48.102.140 (3) and (7)(a)(ii);
(17) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner in the commissioner's capacity as receiver under RCW
48.31.025 and 48.99.017, which are records under the jurisdiction and
control of the receivership court. The commissioner is not required to
search for, log, produce, or otherwise comply with the public records
act for any records that the commissioner obtains under chapters 48.31
and 48.99 RCW in the commissioner's capacity as a receiver, except as
directed by the receivership court;
(18) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.13.151;
(19) Data, information, and documents provided by a carrier
pursuant to section 1, chapter 172, Laws of 2010;
(20) Information in a filing of usage-based insurance about the
usage-based component of the rate pursuant to RCW 48.19.040(5)(b);
(21) Data, information, and documents, other than those described
in RCW 48.02.210(2), that are submitted to the office of the insurance
commissioner by an entity providing health care coverage pursuant to
RCW 28A.400.275 and 48.02.210; ((and))
(22) Data, information, and documents obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.29.017; and
(23) Information not subject to public inspection or public
disclosure under RCW 48.43.730(5).

Sec. 14 RCW 42.56.400 and 2013 c 65 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to insurance and financial
institutions is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance appeals
that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation claims filed
with the board under RCW 7.68.110;
(2) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW;
(3) The names and individual identification data of either all
owners or all insureds, or both, received by the insurance commissioner
under chapter 48.102 RCW;
(4) Information provided under RCW 48.30A.045 through 48.30A.060;
(5) Information provided under RCW 48.05.510 through 48.05.535,
48.43.200 through 48.43.225, 48.44.530 through 48.44.555, and 48.46.600
through 48.46.625;
(6) Examination reports and information obtained by the department
of financial institutions from banks under RCW 30.04.075, from savings
banks under RCW 32.04.220, from savings and loan associations under RCW
33.04.110, from credit unions under RCW 31.12.565, from check cashers
and sellers under RCW 31.45.030(3), and from securities brokers and
investment advisers under RCW 21.20.100, all of which is confidential
and privileged information;
(7) Information provided to the insurance commissioner under RCW
48.110.040(3);
(8) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.02.065, all of which are confidential and
privileged;
(9) ((Confidential proprietary and trade secret information
provided to the commissioner under RCW 48.31C.020 through 48.31C.050
and 48.31C.070)) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the
insurance commissioner under RCW 48.31B.015(2) (l) and (m), 48.31B.025,
48.31B.030, 48.31B.035, and section 8 of this act, all of which are
confidential and privileged;
(10) Data filed under RCW 48.140.020, 48.140.030, 48.140.050, and
7.70.140 that, alone or in combination with any other data, may reveal
the identity of a claimant, health care provider, health care facility,
insuring entity, or self-insurer involved in a particular claim or a
collection of claims. For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Claimant" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(2).
(b) "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(6).
(c) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(7).
(d) "Insuring entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(8).
(e) "Self-insurer" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(11);
(11) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.135.060;
(12) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.060;
(13) Confidential and privileged documents obtained or produced by
the insurance commissioner and identified in RCW 48.37.080;
(14) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.140;
(15) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.17.595;
(16) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.102.051(1) and 48.102.140 (3) and (7)(a)(ii);
(17) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner in the commissioner's capacity as receiver under RCW
48.31.025 and 48.99.017, which are records under the jurisdiction and
control of the receivership court. The commissioner is not required to
search for, log, produce, or otherwise comply with the public records
act for any records that the commissioner obtains under chapters 48.31
and 48.99 RCW in the commissioner's capacity as a receiver, except as
directed by the receivership court;
(18) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.13.151;
(19) Data, information, and documents provided by a carrier
pursuant to section 1, chapter 172, Laws of 2010;
(20) Information in a filing of usage-based insurance about the
usage-based component of the rate pursuant to RCW 48.19.040(5)(b);
(21) Data, information, and documents, other than those described
in RCW 48.02.210(2), that are submitted to the office of the insurance
commissioner by an entity providing health care coverage pursuant to
RCW 28A.400.275 and 48.02.210; and
(22) Data, information, and documents obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.29.017.

Sec. 15 RCW 48.02.065 and 2007 c 126 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Documents, materials, or other information as described in
either subsection (5) or (6), or both, of this section are confidential
by law and privileged, are not subject to public disclosure under
chapter 42.56 RCW, and are not subject to subpoena directed to the
commissioner or any person who received documents, materials, or other
information while acting under the authority of the commissioner. The
commissioner is authorized to use such documents, materials, or other
information in the furtherance of any regulatory or legal action
brought as a part of the commissioner's official duties. The
confidentiality and privilege created by this section and RCW
42.56.400(((9))) (8) applies only to the commissioner, any person
acting under the authority of the commissioner, the national
association of insurance commissioners and its affiliates and
subsidiaries, regulatory and law enforcement officials of other states
and nations, the federal government, and international authorities.
(2) Neither the commissioner nor any person who received documents,
materials, or other information while acting under the authority of the
commissioner is permitted or required to testify in any private civil
action concerning any confidential and privileged documents, materials,
or information subject to subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The commissioner:
(a) May share documents, materials, or other information, including
the confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information
subject to subsection (1) of this section, with (i) the national
association of insurance commissioners and its affiliates and
subsidiaries, and (ii) regulatory and law enforcement officials of
other states and nations, the federal government, and international
authorities, if the recipient agrees to maintain the confidentiality
and privileged status of the document, material, or other information;
(b) May receive documents, materials, or information, including
otherwise either confidential or privileged, or both, documents,
materials, or information, from (i) the national association of
insurance commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and (ii)
regulatory and law enforcement officials of other states and nations,
the federal government, and international authorities and shall
maintain as confidential and privileged any document, material, or
information received that is either confidential or privileged, or
both, under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the
document, material, or information; and
(c) May enter into agreements governing the sharing and use of
information consistent with this subsection.
(4) No waiver of an existing privilege or claim of confidentiality
in the documents, materials, or information may occur as a result of
disclosure to the commissioner under this section or as a result of
sharing as authorized in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Documents, materials, or information, which is either
confidential or privileged, or both, which has been provided to the
commissioner by (a) the national association of insurance commissioners
and its affiliates and subsidiaries, (b) regulatory or law enforcement
officials of other states and nations, the federal government, or
international authorities, or (c) agencies of this state, is
confidential and privileged only if the documents, materials, or
information is protected from disclosure by the applicable laws of the
jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material, or
information.
(6) Working papers, documents, materials, or information produced
by, obtained by, or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person
in the course of a financial or market conduct examination, or in the
course of financial analysis or market conduct desk audit, are not
required to be disclosed by the commissioner unless cited by the
commissioner in connection with an agency action as defined in RCW
34.05.010(3). The commissioner shall notify a party that produced the
documents, materials, or information five business days before
disclosure in connection with an agency action. The notified party may
seek injunctive relief in any Washington state superior court to
prevent disclosure of any documents, materials, or information it
believes is confidential or privileged. In civil actions between
private parties or in criminal actions, disclosure to the commissioner
under this section does not create any privilege or claim of
confidentiality or waive any existing privilege or claim of
confidentiality.
(7)(a) After receipt of a public disclosure request, the
commissioner shall disclose the documents, materials, or information
under subsection (6) of this section that relate to a financial or
market conduct examination undertaken as a result of a proposed change
of control of a nonprofit or mutual health insurer governed in whole or
in part by chapter 48.31B ((or 48.31C)) RCW.
(b) The commissioner is not required to disclose the documents,
materials, or information in (a) of this subsection if:
(i) The documents, materials, or information are otherwise
privileged or exempted from public disclosure; or
(ii) The commissioner finds that the public interest in disclosure
of the documents, materials, or information is outweighed by the public
interest in nondisclosure in that particular instance.
(8) Any person may petition a Washington state superior court to
allow inspection of information exempt from public disclosure under
subsection (6) of this section when the information is connected to
allegations of negligence or malfeasance by the commissioner related to
a financial or market conduct examination. The court shall conduct an
in-camera review after notifying the commissioner and every party that
produced the information. The court may order the commissioner to
allow the petitioner to have access to the information provided the
petitioner maintains the confidentiality of the information. The
petitioner must not disclose the information to any other person,
except upon further order of the court. After conducting a regular
hearing, the court may order that the information can be disclosed
publicly if the court finds that there is a public interest in the
disclosure of the information and the exemption of the information from
public disclosure is clearly unnecessary to protect any individual's
right of privacy or any vital governmental function.

Sec. 16 RCW 48.13.061 and 2011 c 188 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following classes of investments may be counted for the
purposes specified in RCW 48.13.101, whether they are made directly or
as a participant in a partnership, joint venture, or limited liability
company. Investments in partnerships, joint ventures, and limited
liability companies are authorized investments only pursuant to
subsection (12) of this section:
(1) Cash in the direct possession of the insurer or on deposit with
a financial institution regulated by any federal or state agency of the
United States;
(2) Bonds, debt-like preferred stock, and other evidences of
indebtedness of governmental units in the United States or Canada, or
the instrumentalities of the governmental units, or private business
entities domiciled in the United States or Canada, including asset-backed securities and securities valuation office listed mutual funds;
(3) Loans secured by first mortgages, first trust deeds, or other
first security interests in real property located in the United States
or Canada or secured by insurance against default issued by a
government insurance corporation of the United States or Canada or by
an insurer authorized to do business in this state;
(4) Common stock or equity-like preferred stock or equity interests
in any United States or Canadian business entity, or shares of mutual
funds registered with the securities and exchange commission of the
United States under the investment company act of 1940, other than
securities valuation office listed mutual funds, and, subsidiaries, as
defined in RCW 48.31B.005 ((or 48.31C.010)), engaged exclusively in the
following businesses:
(a) Acting as an insurance producer, surplus line broker, or title
insurance agent for its parent or for any of its parent's insurer
subsidiaries or affiliates;
(b) Investing, reinvesting, or trading in securities or acting as
a securities broker or dealer for its own account, that of its parent,
any subsidiary of its parent, or any affiliate or subsidiary;
(c) Rendering management, sales, or other related services to any
investment company subject to the federal investment company act of
1940, as amended;
(d) Rendering investment advice;
(e) Rendering services related to the functions involved in the
operation of an insurance business including, but not limited to,
actuarial, loss prevention, safety engineering, data processing,
accounting, claims appraisal, and collection services;
(f) Acting as administrator of employee welfare benefit and pension
plans for governments, government agencies, corporations, or other
organizations or groups;
(g) Ownership and management of assets which the parent could
itself own and manage: PROVIDED, that the aggregate investment by the
insurer and its subsidiaries acquired pursuant to this subsection
(4)(g) shall not exceed the limitations otherwise applicable to such
investments by the parent;
(h) Acting as administrative agent for a government instrumentality
which is performing an insurance function or is responsible for a
health or welfare program;
(i) Financing of insurance premiums;
(j) Any other business activity reasonably ancillary to an
insurance business;
(k) Owning one or more subsidiary;
(i) Insurers, health care service contractors, or health
maintenance organizations to the extent permitted by this chapter;
(ii) Businesses specified in (a) through (k) of this subsection
inclusive; or
(iii) Any combination of such insurers and businesses;
(5) Real property necessary for the convenient transaction of the
insurer's business;
(6) Real property, together with the fixtures, furniture,
furnishings, and equipment pertaining thereto in the United States or
Canada, which produces or after suitable improvement can reasonably be
expected to produce income;
(7) Loans, securities, or other investments of the types described
in subsections (1) through (6) of this section in national association
of insurance commissioners securities valuation office 1 debt rated
countries other than the United States and Canada;
(8) Bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of international
development organizations of which the United States is a member;
(9) Loans upon the security of the insurer's own policies in
amounts that are adequately secured by the policies and that in no case
exceed the surrender values of the policies;
(10) Tangible personal property under contract of sale or lease
under which contractual payments may reasonably be expected to return
the principal of and provide earnings on the investment within its
anticipated useful life;
(11) Other investments the commissioner authorizes by rule; and
(12) Investments not otherwise permitted by this section, and not
specifically prohibited by statute, to the extent of not more than five
percent of the first five hundred million dollars of the insurer's
admitted assets plus ten percent of the insurer's admitted assets
exceeding five hundred million dollars.

Sec. 17 RCW 48.97.005 and 2008 c 217 s 75 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Accredited state" means a state in which the insurance
department or regulatory agency has qualified as meeting the minimum
financial regulatory standards promulgated and established from time to
time by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.
(2) "Control" or "controlled by" has the meaning ascribed in RCW
48.31B.005(((2))) (3).
(3) "Controlled insurer" means a licensed insurer that is
controlled, directly or indirectly, by a broker.
(4) "Controlling producer" means a producer who, directly or
indirectly, controls an insurer.
(5) "Licensed insurer" or "insurer" means a person, firm,
association, or corporation licensed to transact property and casualty
insurance business in this state. The following, among others, are not
licensed insurers for purposes of this chapter:
(a) ((Risk retention groups as defined in the Superfund Amendments
Reauthorization Act of 1986, P.L. 99-499, 100 Stat. 1613 (1986), the
Risk Retention Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 3901 et seq. (1982 Supp. 1986), and
chapter 48.92 RCW;
(b))) All residual market pools and joint underwriting
associations; and
(((c) Captive insurers. For the purposes of this chapter,)) (b)
captive insurers other than risk retention groups as defined in 15
U.S.C. Sec. 3901 et seq. and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9671 are insurance
companies owned by another organization((,)) whose exclusive purpose is
to insure risks of the parent organization and affiliated companies or,
in the case of groups and associations, insurance organizations owned
by the insureds whose exclusive purpose is to insure risks to member
organizations or group members, or both, and their affiliates.
(6) "Producer" means an insurance broker or brokers or any other
person, firm, association, or corporation when, for compensation,
commission, or other thing of value, the person, firm, association, or
corporation acts or aids in any manner in soliciting, negotiating, or
procuring the making of an insurance contract on behalf of an insured
other than the person, firm, association, or corporation.

Sec. 18 RCW 48.125.140 and 2004 c 260 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commissioner may make an examination of the operations of
any self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement as often as he or
she deems necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(2) Every self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement shall
submit its books and records relating to its operation for financial
condition and market conduct examinations and in every way facilitate
them. For the purpose of examinations, the commissioner may issue
subpoenas, administer oaths, and examine the officers and principals of
the (([self-funded])) self-funded multiple employer welfare
arrangement.
(3) The commissioner may elect to accept and rely on audit reports
made by an independent certified public accountant for the self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangement in the course of that part of the
commissioner's examination covering the same general subject matter as
the audit. The commissioner may incorporate the audit report in his or
her report of the examination.
(4)(a) The commissioner may also examine any affiliate of the self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement. An examination of an
affiliate is limited to the activities or operations of the affiliate
that may impact the financial position of the arrangement.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "affiliate" has the same
meaning as defined in RCW ((48.31C.010)) 48.31B.005.
(5) Whenever an examination is made, all of the provisions of
chapter 48.03 RCW not inconsistent with this chapter shall be
applicable. In lieu of making an examination himself or herself, the
commissioner may, in the case of a foreign self-funded multiple
employer welfare arrangement, accept an examination report of the
applicant by the regulatory official in its state of domicile. In the
case of a domestic self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement,
the commissioner may accept an examination report of the applicant by
the regulatory official of a state that has already licensed the
arrangement.

Sec. 19 RCW 48.155.010 and 2010 c 27 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Affiliate" means a person that directly, or indirectly through
one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under
common control with, the person specified.
(2) "Commissioner" means the Washington state insurance
commissioner.
(3)(a) "Control" or "controlled by" or "under common control with"
means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or
cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether
through the ownership of voting securities, by contract other than a
commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement services, or otherwise,
unless the power is the result of an official position with or
corporate office held by the person.
(b) Control exists when any person, directly or indirectly, owns,
controls, holds with the power to vote, or holds proxies representing
ten percent or more of the voting securities of any other person. A
presumption of control may be rebutted by a showing made in the manner
provided by RCW 48.31B.005(((2))) (3) and 48.31B.025(11) that control
does not exist in fact. The commissioner may determine, after
furnishing all persons in interest notice and opportunity to be heard
and making specific findings of fact to support the determination, that
control exists in fact, notwithstanding the absence of a presumption to
that effect.
(4)(a) "Discount plan" means a business arrangement or contract in
which a person or organization, in exchange for fees, dues, charges, or
other consideration, provides or purports to provide discounts to its
members on charges by providers for health care services.
(b) "Discount plan" does not include:
(i) A plan that does not charge a membership or other fee to use
the plan's discount card;
(ii) A patient access program as defined in this chapter;
(iii) A medicare prescription drug plan as defined in this chapter;
or
(iv) A discount plan offered by a health carrier authorized under
chapter 48.20, 48.21, 48.44, or 48.46 RCW.
(5)(a) "Discount plan organization" means a person that, in
exchange for fees, dues, charges, or other consideration, provides or
purports to provide access to discounts to its members on charges by
providers for health care services. "Discount plan organization" also
means a person or organization that contracts with providers, provider
networks, or other discount plan organizations to offer discounts on
health care services to its members. This term also includes all
persons that determine the charge to or other consideration paid by
members.
(b) "Discount plan organization" does not mean:
(i) Pharmacy benefit managers;
(ii) Health care provider networks, when the network's only
involvement in discount plans is contracting with the plan to provide
discounts to the plan's members;
(iii) Marketers who market the discount plans of discount plan
organizations which are licensed under this chapter as long as all
written communications of the marketer in connection with a discount
plan clearly identify the licensed discount plan organization as the
responsible entity; or
(iv) Health carriers, if the discount on health care services is
offered by a health carrier authorized under chapter 48.20, 48.21,
48.44, or 48.46 RCW.
(6) "Health care facility" or "facility" has the same meaning as in
RCW 48.43.005(((15))) (22).
(7) "Health care provider" or "provider" has the same meaning as in
RCW 48.43.005(((16))) (23).
(8) "Health care provider network," "provider network," or
"network" means any network of health care providers, including any
person or entity that negotiates directly or indirectly with a discount
plan organization on behalf of more than one provider to provide health
care services to members.
(9) "Health care services" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.43.005(((17))) (24).
(10) "Health carrier" or "carrier" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.43.005(((18))) (25).
(11) "Marketer" means a person or entity that markets, promotes,
sells, or distributes a discount plan, including a contracted marketing
organization and a private label entity that places its name on and
markets or distributes a discount plan pursuant to a marketing
agreement with a discount plan organization.
(12) "Medicare prescription drug plan" means a plan that provides
a medicare part D prescription drug benefit in accordance with the
requirements of the federal medicare prescription drug improvement and
modernization act of 2003.
(13) "Member" means any individual who pays fees, dues, charges, or
other consideration for the right to receive the benefits of a discount
plan, but does not include any individual who enrolls in a patient
access program.
(14) "Patient access program" means a voluntary program sponsored
by a pharmaceutical manufacturer, or a consortium of pharmaceutical
manufacturers, that provides free or discounted health care products
for no additional consideration directly to low-income or uninsured
individuals either through a discount card or direct shipment.
(15) "Person" means an individual, a corporation, a governmental
entity, a partnership, an association, a joint venture, a joint stock
company, a trust, an unincorporated organization, any similar entity,
or any combination of the persons listed in this subsection.
(16)(a) "Pharmacy benefit manager" means a person that performs
pharmacy benefit management for a covered entity.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, a "covered entity" means an
insurer, a health care service contractor, a health maintenance
organization, or a multiple employer welfare arrangement licensed,
certified, or registered under the provisions of this title. "Covered
entity" also means a health program administered by the state as a
provider of health coverage, a single employer that provides health
coverage to its employees, or a labor union that provides health
coverage to its members as part of a collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 20 RCW 48.155.015 and 2009 c 175 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies to all discount plans and all discount
plan organizations doing business in or from this state or that affect
subjects located wholly or in part or to be performed within this
state, and all persons having to do with this business.
(2) A discount plan organization that is a health carrier, as
defined under RCW 48.43.005, with a license, certificate of authority,
or registration ((under RCW 48.05.030 or chapter 48.31C RCW)):
(a) Is not required to obtain a license under RCW 48.155.020,
except that any of its affiliates that operate as a discount plan
organization in this state must obtain a license under RCW 48.155.020
and comply with all other provisions of this chapter;
(b) Is required to comply with RCW 48.155.060 through 48.155.090
and report, in the form and manner as the commissioner may require, any
of the information described in RCW 48.155.110(2) (b), (c), or (d) that
is not otherwise already reported; and
(c) Is subject to RCW 48.155.130 and 48.155.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 48.31C.010 (Definitions) and 2001 c 179 s 1;
(2) RCW 48.31C.020 (Acquisition of a foreign health carrier--Preacquisition notification -- Review) and 2001 c 179 s 2;
(3) RCW 48.31C.030 (Acquisition of a domestic health carrier--Filing -- Review--Jurisdiction of courts) and 2001 c 179 s 3;
(4) RCW 48.31C.040 (Registration with commissioner -- Information
required -- Rule making -- Disclaimer of affiliation -- Failure to file) and
2001 c 179 s 4;
(5) RCW 48.31C.050 (Health carrier subject to registration--Standards for transactions within a holding company system -- Notice to
commissioner -- Review) and 2001 c 179 s 5;
(6) RCW 48.31C.060 (Extraordinary dividends or distributions--Restrictions -- Definition of distribution) and 2001 c 179 s 6;
(7) RCW 48.31C.070 (Examination of health carriers -- Commissioner
may order production of information -- Failure to comply -- Costs) and 2001
c 179 s 7;
(8) RCW 48.31C.080 (Violations of chapter -- Commissioner may seek
superior court order) and 2001 c 179 s 8;
(9) RCW 48.31C.090 (Violations of chapter -- Penalties -- Civil
forfeitures -- Orders -- Referral to prosecuting attorney -- Imprisonment)
and 2001 c 179 s 9;
(10) RCW 48.31C.100 (Violations of chapter -- Impairment of financial
condition) and 2001 c 179 s 10;
(11) RCW 48.31C.110 (Order for liquidation or rehabilitation--Recovery of distributions or payments -- Liability -- Maximum amount
recoverable) and 2001 c 179 s 11;
(12) RCW 48.31C.120 (Violations of chapter -- Contrary to interests
of subscribers or the public) and 2001 c 179 s 12;
(13) RCW 48.31C.130 (Confidential proprietary and trade secret
information -- Exempt from public disclosure -- Exceptions) and 2001 c 179
s 13;
(14) RCW 48.31C.140 (Person aggrieved by actions of commissioner)
and 2001 c 179 s 15;
(15) RCW 48.31C.150 (Rule making) and 2001 c 179 s 16;
(16) RCW 48.31C.160 (Dual holding company system membership) and
2001 c 179 s 17;
(17) RCW 48.31C.900 (Severability -- 2001 c 179) and 2001 c 179 s 18;
and
(18) RCW 48.31C.901 (Effective date -- 2001 c 179) and 2001 c 179 s
19.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 PURPOSE AND SCOPE. (1) The purpose of this
chapter is to provide the requirements for maintaining a risk
management framework and completing an own risk and solvency assessment
and provide guidance and instructions for filing an ORSA summary report
with the insurance commissioner of this state.
(2) The requirements of this chapter apply to all insurers
domiciled in this state unless exempt pursuant to section 27 of this
act.
(3) The legislature finds and declares that the ORSA summary report
contains confidential and sensitive information related to an insurer
or insurance group's identification of risks material and relevant to
the insurer or insurance group filing the report. This information
includes proprietary and trade secret information that has the
potential for harm and competitive disadvantage to the insurer or
insurance group if the information is made public. It is the intent of
this legislature that the ORSA summary report is a confidential
document filed with the commissioner, that the ORSA summary report may
be shared only as stated in this chapter and to assist the commissioner
in the performance of his or her duties, and that in no event may the
ORSA summary report be subject to public disclosure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Insurance group" means, for the purposes of conducting an
ORSA, those insurers and affiliates included within an insurance
holding company system as defined in RCW 48.31B.005.
(2) "Insurer" includes an insurer authorized under chapter 48.05
RCW, a fraternal mutual insurer or society holding a license under RCW
48.36A.290, a health care service contractor registered under chapter
48.44 RCW, a health maintenance organization registered under chapter
48.46 RCW, and a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement
under chapter 48.125 RCW, as well as all persons engaged as, or
purporting to be engaged as insurers, fraternal benefit societies,
health care service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or
self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangements in this state, and
to persons in process of organization to become insurers, fraternal
benefit societies, health care service contractors, health maintenance
organizations, or self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangements,
except that it does not include agencies, authorities, or
instrumentalities of the United States, its possessions and
territories, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the District of Columbia,
or a state or political subdivision of a state.
(3) "Own risk and solvency assessment" or "ORSA" means a
confidential internal assessment, appropriate to the nature, scale, and
complexity of an insurer or insurance group, conducted by that insurer
or insurance group of the material and relevant risks associated with
the insurer or insurance group's current business plan, and the
sufficiency of capital resources to support those risks.
(4) "ORSA guidance manual" means the own risk and solvency
assessment guidance manual developed and adopted by the national
association of insurance commissioners.
(5) "ORSA summary report" means a confidential high-level ORSA
summary of an insurer or insurance group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 RISK MANAGEMENT FRAMEWORK. An insurer
shall maintain a risk management framework to assist the insurer with
identifying, assessing, monitoring, managing, and reporting on its
material and relevant risks. This requirement is satisfied if the
insurance group of which the insurer is a member maintains a risk
management framework applicable to the operations of the insurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 ORSA REQUIREMENT. Subject to section 27 of
this act, an insurer, or the insurance group of which the insurer is a
member, shall regularly conduct an ORSA consistent with a process
comparable to the ORSA guidance manual. The ORSA must be conducted
annually but also at any time when there are significant changes to the
risk profile of the insurer or the insurance group of which the insurer
is a member.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 ORSA SUMMARY REPORT. (1) Upon the
commissioner's request, and no more than once each year, an insurer
shall submit to the commissioner an ORSA summary report or any
combination of reports that together contain the information described
in the ORSA guidance manual, applicable to the insurer or the insurance
group of which it is a member. Notwithstanding any request from the
commissioner, if the insurer is a member of an insurance group, the
insurer shall submit the report or set of reports required by this
subsection if the commissioner is the lead state commissioner of the
insurance group as determined by the procedures within the financial
analysis handbook adopted by the national association of insurance
commissioners.
(2) The report shall include a signature of the insurer or
insurance group's chief risk officer or other executive having
responsibility for the oversight of the insurer's enterprise risk
management process attesting to the best of his or her belief and
knowledge that the insurer applies the enterprise risk management
process described in the ORSA summary report and that a copy of the
report has been provided to the insurer's board of directors or the
appropriate governing committee.
(3) An insurer may comply with subsection (1) of this section by
providing the most recent and substantially similar report or reports
provided by the insurer or another member of an insurance group of
which the insurer is a member to the commissioner of another state or
to a supervisor or regulator of a foreign jurisdiction, if that report
provides information that is comparable to the information described in
the ORSA guidance manual. Any such report in a language other than
English must be accompanied by a translation of that report into the
English language.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 EXEMPTIONS. (1) An insurer is exempt from
the requirements of this chapter, if:
(a) The insurer has annual direct written and unaffiliated assumed
premium including international direct and assumed premium, but
excluding premium reinsured with the federal crop insurance corporation
and federal flood program, less than five hundred million dollars; and
(b) The insurance group of which the insurer is a member has annual
direct written and unaffiliated assumed premium including international
direct and assumed premium, but excluding premium reinsured with the
federal crop insurance corporation and federal flood program, less than
one billion dollars.
(2) If an insurer qualifies for exemption pursuant to subsection
(1)(a) of this section, but the insurance group of which the insurer is
a member does not qualify for exemption pursuant to subsection (1)(b)
of this section, then the ORSA summary report that may be required
pursuant to section 26 of this act must include every insurer within
the insurance group. This requirement is satisfied by the submission
of more than one ORSA summary report for any combination of insurers,
provided any combination of reports includes every insurer within the
insurance group.
(3) If an insurer does not qualify for exemption pursuant to
subsection (1)(a) of this section, but the insurance group of which the
insurer is a member does qualify for exemption pursuant to subsection
(1)(b) of this section, then the only ORSA summary report that may be
required pursuant to section 26 of this act is the report applicable to
that insurer.
(4) If an insurer does not qualify for exemption pursuant to
subsection (1)(a) of this section, the insurer may apply to the
commissioner for a waiver from the requirements of this chapter based
upon unique circumstances. In deciding whether to grant the insurer's
request for waiver, the commissioner may consider the type and volume
of business written, ownership and organizational structure, and any
other factor the commissioner considers relevant to the insurer or
insurance group of which the insurer is a member. If the insurer is a
part of an insurance group with insurers domiciled in more than one
state, the commissioner shall coordinate with the lead state
commissioner and with the other domiciliary commissioners in
considering whether to grant the insurer's request for a waiver.
(5) Notwithstanding the exemptions stated in this section, the
commissioner may require that an insurer maintain a risk management
framework, conduct an ORSA, and file an ORSA summary report (a) based
on unique circumstances including, but not limited to, the type and
volume of business written, ownership and organizational structure,
federal agency requests, and international supervisor requests; and (b)
if the insurer has risk-based capital at the company action level event
as set forth in RCW 48.05.440 or 48.43.310, meets one or more of the
standards of an insurer deemed to be in hazardous financial condition
as defined in WAC 284-16-310, or otherwise exhibits qualities of a
troubled insurer as determined by the commissioner.
(6) If an insurer that qualifies for exemption pursuant to
subsection (1)(a) of this section subsequently no longer qualifies for
that exemption due to changes in premium reflected in the insurer's
most recent annual statement or in the most recent annual statements of
the insurers within the insurance group of which the insurer is a
member, the insurer has one year following the year the threshold is
exceeded to comply with the requirement of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 CONTENTS OF ORSA SUMMARY REPORT. (1) The
ORSA summary report shall be prepared consistent with the ORSA guidance
manual, subject to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section.
Documentation and supporting information must be maintained and made
available upon examination or upon the request of the commissioner.
(2) The review of the ORSA summary report, and any additional
requests for information, must be made using similar procedures
currently used in the analysis and examination of multistate or global
insurers and insurance groups.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 CONFIDENTIAL TREATMENT. (1) Documents,
materials, or other information, including the ORSA summary report, in
the possession or control of the commissioner that are obtained by,
created by, or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person under
this chapter, is recognized by this state as being proprietary and to
contain trade secrets. All such documents, materials, or other
information is confidential by law and privileged, is not subject to
chapter 42.56 RCW, is not subject to subpoena, and is not subject to
discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil action.
However, the commissioner is authorized to use the documents,
materials, or other information in the furtherance of any regulatory or
legal action brought as a part of the commissioner's official duties.
The commissioner may not otherwise make the documents, materials, or
other information public without the prior written consent of the
insurer.
(2) Neither the commissioner nor any person who received documents,
materials, or other ORSA-related information, through examination or
otherwise, while acting under the authority of the commissioner or with
whom such documents, materials, or other information are shared
pursuant to this chapter, is permitted or required to testify in any
private civil action concerning any confidential documents, materials,
or information subject to subsection (1) of this section.
(3) In order to assist in the performance of the commissioner's
regulatory duties, the commissioner:
(a) May share documents, materials, or other ORSA-related
information, including the confidential and privileged documents,
materials, or information subject to subsection (1) of this section,
including proprietary and trade secret documents and materials with
other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies, including
members of any supervisory college under section 8(3) of this act, with
the national association of insurance commissioners, with the
international association of insurance supervisors and the bank for
international settlements, and with any third-party consultants
designated by the commissioner, provided that the recipient agrees in
writing to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the
ORSA-related documents, materials, or other information and has
verified in writing the legal authority to maintain confidentiality;
(b) May receive documents, materials, or ORSA-related information,
including otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials,
or information, including proprietary and trade secret information or
documents, from regulatory officials of other foreign or domestic
jurisdictions, including members of any supervisory college under
section 8(3) of this act, from the national association of insurance
commissioners, the international association of insurance supervisors
and the bank for international settlements, and must maintain as
confidential or privileged any document, material, or information
received with notice or the understanding that it is confidential or
privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the
document, material, or information;
(c) Shall enter into written agreements with the national
association of insurance commissioners or a third-party consultant
governing sharing and use of information provided pursuant to this
chapter, consistent with this subsection that specifies procedures and
protocols regarding the confidentiality and security of information
shared with the national association of insurance commissioners or
third-party consultant pursuant to this chapter, including procedures
and protocols for sharing by the national association of insurance
commissioners with other state regulators from states in which the
insurance group has domiciled insurers. The agreement must provide
that the recipient agrees in writing to maintain the confidentiality
and privileged status of the ORSA-related documents, materials, or
other information and has verified in writing the legal authority to
maintain confidentiality;
(d) Shall specify that ownership of information shared with the
national association of insurance commissioners or third-party
consultants pursuant to this chapter remains with the commissioner and
the national association of insurance commissioners' or a third-party
consultant's use of the information is subject to the direction of the
commissioner;
(e) Shall prohibit the national association of insurance
commissioners or third-party consultant from storing the information
shared pursuant to this chapter in a permanent database after the
underlying analysis is completed;
(f) Shall require prompt notice to be given to an insurer whose
confidential information in the possession of the national association
of insurance commissioners or a third-party consultant pursuant to this
chapter is subject to a request or subpoena to the national association
of insurance commissioners for disclosure or production;
(g) Shall require the national association of insurance
commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries to consent to
intervention by an insurer in any judicial or administrative action in
which the national association of insurance commissioners and its
affiliates and subsidiaries may be required to disclose confidential
information about the insurer shared with the national association of
insurance commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries pursuant to
this chapter; and
(h) In the case of an agreement involving a third-party consultant,
shall provide the insurer's written consent.
(4) The sharing of information by the commissioner pursuant to this
chapter shall not constitute a delegation of regulatory authority or
rule making, and the commissioner is solely responsible for the
administration, execution, and enforcement of the provisions of this
chapter.
(5) A waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of
confidentiality in the documents, materials, or information shall not
occur as a result of disclosure to the commissioner under this section
or as a result of sharing as authorized in this chapter.
(6) Documents, materials, or other information in the possession or
control of the national association of insurance commissioners pursuant
to this chapter are confidential by law and privileged, are not
subject to chapter 42.56 RCW, are not subject to subpoena, and are not
subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil
action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 SANCTIONS. The commissioner shall require
any insurer failing, without just cause, to file the ORSA summary
report as required in this chapter, after notice and hearing, to pay a
fine of five hundred dollars for each day's delay, to be recovered by
the commissioner and the fine collected shall be transferred to the
treasurer for deposit into the state general fund. The maximum fine
under this section is one hundred thousand dollars. The commissioner
may reduce the fine if the insurer demonstrates to the commissioner
that the imposition of the fine would constitute a financial hardship
to the insurer.

Sec. 31 RCW 42.56.400 and 2013 c 277 s 5 and 2013 c 65 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following information relating to insurance and financial
institutions is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance appeals
that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation claims filed
with the board under RCW 7.68.110;
(2) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW;
(3) The names and individual identification data of either all
owners or all insureds, or both, received by the insurance commissioner
under chapter 48.102 RCW;
(4) Information provided under RCW 48.30A.045 through 48.30A.060;
(5) Information provided under RCW 48.05.510 through 48.05.535,
48.43.200 through 48.43.225, 48.44.530 through 48.44.555, and 48.46.600
through 48.46.625;
(6) Examination reports and information obtained by the department
of financial institutions from banks under RCW 30.04.075, from savings
banks under RCW 32.04.220, from savings and loan associations under RCW
33.04.110, from credit unions under RCW 31.12.565, from check cashers
and sellers under RCW 31.45.030(3), and from securities brokers and
investment advisers under RCW 21.20.100, all of which is confidential
and privileged information;
(7) Information provided to the insurance commissioner under RCW
48.110.040(3);
(8) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.02.065, all of which are confidential and
privileged;
(9) ((Confidential proprietary and trade secret information
provided to the commissioner under RCW 48.31C.020 through 48.31C.050
and 48.31C.070)) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the
insurance commissioner under RCW 48.31B.015(2) (l) and (m), 48.31B.025,
48.31B.030, 48.31B.035, and section 8 of this act, all of which are
confidential and privileged;
(10) Data filed under RCW 48.140.020, 48.140.030, 48.140.050, and
7.70.140 that, alone or in combination with any other data, may reveal
the identity of a claimant, health care provider, health care facility,
insuring entity, or self-insurer involved in a particular claim or a
collection of claims. For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Claimant" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(2).
(b) "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(6).
(c) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(7).
(d) "Insuring entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(8).
(e) "Self-insurer" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(11);
(11) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.135.060;
(12) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.060;
(13) Confidential and privileged documents obtained or produced by
the insurance commissioner and identified in RCW 48.37.080;
(14) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.140;
(15) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.17.595;
(16) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.102.051(1) and 48.102.140 (3) and (7)(a)(ii);
(17) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner in the commissioner's capacity as receiver under RCW
48.31.025 and 48.99.017, which are records under the jurisdiction and
control of the receivership court. The commissioner is not required to
search for, log, produce, or otherwise comply with the public records
act for any records that the commissioner obtains under chapters 48.31
and 48.99 RCW in the commissioner's capacity as a receiver, except as
directed by the receivership court;
(18) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.13.151;
(19) Data, information, and documents provided by a carrier
pursuant to section 1, chapter 172, Laws of 2010;
(20) Information in a filing of usage-based insurance about the
usage-based component of the rate pursuant to RCW 48.19.040(5)(b);
(21) Data, information, and documents, other than those described
in RCW 48.02.210(2), that are submitted to the office of the insurance
commissioner by an entity providing health care coverage pursuant to
RCW 28A.400.275 and 48.02.210; ((and))
(22) Data, information, and documents obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.29.017; ((and))
(23) Information not subject to public inspection or public
disclosure under RCW 48.43.730(5); and
(24) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under chapter 48.-- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 34 of this act).

Sec. 32 RCW 42.56.400 and 2013 c 65 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to insurance and financial
institutions is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance appeals
that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation claims filed
with the board under RCW 7.68.110;
(2) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW;
(3) The names and individual identification data of either all
owners or all insureds, or both, received by the insurance commissioner
under chapter 48.102 RCW;
(4) Information provided under RCW 48.30A.045 through 48.30A.060;
(5) Information provided under RCW 48.05.510 through 48.05.535,
48.43.200 through 48.43.225, 48.44.530 through 48.44.555, and 48.46.600
through 48.46.625;
(6) Examination reports and information obtained by the department
of financial institutions from banks under RCW 30.04.075, from savings
banks under RCW 32.04.220, from savings and loan associations under RCW
33.04.110, from credit unions under RCW 31.12.565, from check cashers
and sellers under RCW 31.45.030(3), and from securities brokers and
investment advisers under RCW 21.20.100, all of which is confidential
and privileged information;
(7) Information provided to the insurance commissioner under RCW
48.110.040(3);
(8) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.02.065, all of which are confidential and
privileged;
(9) ((Confidential proprietary and trade secret information
provided to the commissioner under RCW 48.31C.020 through 48.31C.050
and 48.31C.070)) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the
insurance commissioner under RCW 48.31B.015(2) (l) and (m), 48.31B.025,
48.31B.030, 48.31B.035, and section 8 of this act, all of which are
confidential and privileged;
(10) Data filed under RCW 48.140.020, 48.140.030, 48.140.050, and
7.70.140 that, alone or in combination with any other data, may reveal
the identity of a claimant, health care provider, health care facility,
insuring entity, or self-insurer involved in a particular claim or a
collection of claims. For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Claimant" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(2).
(b) "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(6).
(c) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(7).
(d) "Insuring entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(8).
(e) "Self-insurer" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(11);
(11) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.135.060;
(12) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.060;
(13) Confidential and privileged documents obtained or produced by
the insurance commissioner and identified in RCW 48.37.080;
(14) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.140;
(15) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.17.595;
(16) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.102.051(1) and 48.102.140 (3) and (7)(a)(ii);
(17) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner in the commissioner's capacity as receiver under RCW
48.31.025 and 48.99.017, which are records under the jurisdiction and
control of the receivership court. The commissioner is not required to
search for, log, produce, or otherwise comply with the public records
act for any records that the commissioner obtains under chapters 48.31
and 48.99 RCW in the commissioner's capacity as a receiver, except as
directed by the receivership court;
(18) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.13.151;
(19) Data, information, and documents provided by a carrier
pursuant to section 1, chapter 172, Laws of 2010;
(20) Information in a filing of usage-based insurance about the
usage-based component of the rate pursuant to RCW 48.19.040(5)(b);
(21) Data, information, and documents, other than those described
in RCW 48.02.210(2), that are submitted to the office of the insurance
commissioner by an entity providing health care coverage pursuant to
RCW 28A.400.275 and 48.02.210; ((and))
(22) Data, information, and documents obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.29.017; and
(23) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under chapter 48.-- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 34 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 Sections 22 through 30 and 35 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be known and
cited as the risk management and solvency assessment act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 EFFECTIVE DATE. Except for sections 14 and
32 of this act, which take effect July 1, 2017, this act takes effect
January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 Sections 13 and 31 of this act expire July
1, 2017.

--- END ---