BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.12.0263 and 1980 c 37 s 62 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) do not apply in respect to
the use of biomass fuel by the extractor or manufacturer thereof when
used directly in the operation of the particular extractive operation
or manufacturing plant which produced or manufactured the same. For
purposes of this section, "biomass fuel" means wood waste and other
wood residuals, including forest derived biomass, but does not include
firewood or wood pellets. "Biomass fuel" also includes partially
organic by-products of pulp, paper, and wood manufacturing processes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The value of the article used with respect to refinery fuel gas
under this chapter is the most recent monthly United States natural gas
wellhead price, as published by the federal energy information
administration.
(2) Taxes collected under this chapter on the use of refinery fuel
gas must be deposited in the education legacy trust account. The
department must establish a separate reporting code for taxes collected
under this chapter on the use of refinery fuel gas.
(3) This section applies to the use of refinery fuel gas occurring
on or after July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---