BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A work group on preservation of evidence
for criminal justice purposes is established to study and make
recommendations relating to establishing statewide standards for
preserving biological material in felony cases in Washington state.
(2) The work group shall consist of the following members:
(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(c) The chief of the Washington state patrol or the chief's
designee;
(d) The executive director of the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs or the executive director's designee;
(e) One member representing the superior court judges' association;
(f) One member representing the district and municipal court
judges' association;
(g) One member representing the Washington state association of
counties;
(h) One member representing the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys;
(i) One member representing the Washington defender's association
or the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers;
(j) One member representing the Washington state association of
cities;
(k) One member representing the Washington association of county
officials;
(l) One evidence room technician who is employed by a county or
city law enforcement agency;
(m) Two persons representing victims of crimes and their family
members and friends; and
(n) Two members, appointed by the governor, who represent the
community from the innocence network in Washington state.
(3) Members of the work group shall select a chair.
(4) At a minimum, the work group shall research, review, and make
recommendations on whether to:
(a) Preserve all items of biological material relating to felony
offenses;
(b) Ensure biological material is not lost, destroyed, or
contaminated;
(c) Determine consistent specified time periods that biological
material be retained and secured in connection with a felony criminal
investigation;
(d) Develop a model policy for the collection, tracking, packaging,
storing, and disposition of biological material, including the length
of time biological material should be retained by a governmental
entity; and
(e) Develop a statewide policy that provides clear direction for
the disposal of recovered property from misdemeanor criminal
investigations when storage of evidence is an issue for felony criminal
investigations.
(5) The work group shall compile its findings and recommendations
for the retention and disposition of biological material into a final
report and provide its report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and governor by December 1, 2014.
(6) The work group shall function within existing resources and no
specific budget may be provided to complete the report. The
participants are encouraged to donate their time to offset any costs.
(7) This section expires January 1, 2015.

--- END ---