BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.21 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the agricultural industry is a vital
component of Washington's economy, providing thousands of jobs
throughout the state. The legislature further finds that Washington
state is the ideal location for distribution centers for agricultural
crop protection products because Washington is an efficient
transportation hub for Pacific Northwest farmers. However, products
being warehoused in the state are diminishing because agricultural crop
protection products that are both produced and ultimately sold out-of-state are being redirected to out-of-state distribution centers because
of Washington's tax burden. Relocation of this economic activity is
detrimental to Washington's economy through the direct loss of jobs and
tax revenue, in addition to the negative impact on the supply chain for
Washington farmers. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to
encourage the regional competitiveness of agricultural distribution by
providing an exemption from the hazardous substance tax for
agricultural crop protection products that are manufactured out-of-state, warehoused or transported in the state, but ultimately shipped
and sold out of Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This section is the tax preference
performance statement for the tax exemption contained in RCW 82.21.040.
This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent
evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a
private right of action by any party or be used to determine
eligibility for preferential tax treatment.
(1) The legislature categorizes this tax exemption as one intended
to retain jobs, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(c).
(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to
retain existing jobs performed to warehouse and transport agricultural
crop protection products. It is the legislature's intent to exempt
only agricultural crop protection products that are shipped into
Washington state, warehoused in the state, and ultimately shipped and
sold out of Washington state from the hazardous substance tax, in order
to reduce the cost of warehousing and shipping products that are held
but not ultimately used in the state, thereby inducing out-of-state
customers to utilize Washington as a transportation hub, thereby
retaining existing jobs for warehousing such products in Washington
state.
(3) If a review finds that the average employment in the
agricultural crop protection warehousing industry remains at least
steady following the enactment of this preference, then the legislature
intends to extend the expiration date of the tax preference.
(4) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in
subsection (3) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review
committee may refer to employment data available from the employment
security department.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.21.040 and 1989 c 2 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following are exempt from the tax imposed in this chapter:
(1) Any successive possession of a previously taxed hazardous
substance. If tax due under this chapter has not been paid with
respect to a hazardous substance, the department may collect the tax
from any person who has had possession of the hazardous substance. If
the tax is paid by any person other than the first person having
taxable possession of a hazardous substance, the amount of tax paid
shall constitute a debt owed by the first person having taxable
possession to the person who paid the tax.
(2) Any possession of a hazardous substance by a natural person
under circumstances where the substance is used, or is to be used, for
a personal or domestic purpose (and not for any business purpose) by
that person or a relative of, or person residing in the same dwelling
as, that person.
(3) Any possession of a hazardous substance amount which is
determined as minimal by the department of ecology and which is
possessed by a retailer for the purpose of making sales to ultimate
consumers. This exemption does not apply to pesticide or petroleum
products.
(4) Any possession of alumina or natural gas.
(5)(a) Any possession of a hazardous substance as defined in RCW
82.21.020(1)(c) that is solely for use by a farmer as an agricultural
crop protection product and warehoused in this state or transported to
or from this state, provided that the person possessing the substance
does not otherwise use, manufacture, package for sale, or sell the
substance in this state.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (5), the following
definitions apply:
(i) "Farmer" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.213.
(ii) "Use" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.12.010.
(6) Persons or activities which the state is prohibited from taxing
under the United States Constitution.
(((6) Any persons possessing a hazardous substance where such
possession first occurred before March 1, 1989.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---