BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16A.120 and 2012 c 83 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each court and government agency located in this state having
jurisdiction over standing, stopping, and parking violations, the use
of a photo toll system under RCW 46.63.160, the use of automated
traffic safety cameras under RCW 46.63.170, and the use of automated
school bus safety cameras under RCW 46.63.180 may forward to the
department any outstanding:
(a) Standing, stopping, and parking violations;
(b) Civil penalties for toll nonpayment detected through the use of
photo toll systems issued under RCW 46.63.160;
(c) Automated traffic safety camera infractions issued under RCW
46.63.030(1)(d); and
(d) Automated school bus safety camera infractions issued under RCW
46.63.030(1)(e).
(2) Violations, civil penalties, and infractions described in
subsection (1) of this section must be reported to the department in
the manner described in RCW 46.20.270(3).
(3) The department shall:
(a) Record the violations, civil penalties, and infractions on the
matching vehicle records; and
(b) Send notice approximately one hundred twenty days in advance of
the current vehicle registration expiration date to the registered
owner listing the dates and jurisdictions in which the violations,
civil penalties, and infractions occurred, the amounts of unpaid fines
and penalties, and the surcharge to be collected. Only those
violations, civil penalties, and infractions received by the department
one hundred twenty days or more before the current vehicle registration
expiration date will be included in the notice. Violations, civil
penalties, and infractions received by the department later than one
hundred twenty days before the current vehicle registration expiration
date that are not satisfied will be delayed until the next vehicle
registration expiration date.
(4) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall not renew a vehicle registration;
including the registration of a rental car, if there are any
outstanding standing, stopping, and parking violations, and other civil
penalties issued under RCW 46.63.160 for the vehicle unless:
(a) The outstanding standing, stopping, or parking violations and
civil penalties were received by the department within one hundred
twenty days before the current vehicle registration expiration;
(b) There is a change in registered ownership; ((or))
(c) The registered owner presents proof of payment of each
violation, civil penalty, and infraction provided in this section and
the registered owner pays the surcharge required under RCW 46.17.030;
or
(d) The registered owner provides proof that an appeal of the
violation, civil penalty, or infraction has been timely filed and is
still pending.
(5) The department shall:
(a) Forward a change in registered ownership information to the
court or government agency who reported the outstanding violations,
civil penalties, or infractions; and
(b) Remove the outstanding violations, civil penalties, and
infractions from the vehicle record.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.270 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 35 s 17 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Every court having jurisdiction over offenses committed under
this chapter, or any other act of this state or municipal ordinance
adopted by a local authority regulating the operation of motor vehicles
on highways, or any federal authority having jurisdiction over offenses
substantially the same as those set forth in this title which occur on
federal installations within this state, shall immediately forward to
the department a forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure
the defendant's appearance in court, a payment of a fine, penalty, or
court cost, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or a finding of guilt,
or a finding that any person has committed a traffic infraction an
abstract of the court record in the form prescribed by rule of the
supreme court, showing the conviction of any person or the finding that
any person has committed a traffic infraction in said court for a
violation of any said laws other than regulations governing standing,
stopping, parking, and pedestrian offenses.
(2)(a) Every state agency or municipality having jurisdiction over
offenses committed under this chapter, or under any other act of this
state or municipal ordinance adopted by a state or local authority
regulating the operation of motor vehicles on highways, may forward to
the department within ten days of failure to respond, failure to pay a
penalty, failure to appear at a hearing to contest the determination
that a violation of any statute, ordinance, or regulation relating to
standing, stopping, parking, or civil penalties issued under RCW
46.63.160 has been committed, or failure to appear at a hearing to
explain mitigating circumstances, an abstract of the citation record in
the form prescribed by rule of the department, showing the finding by
such municipality that two or more violations of laws governing
standing, stopping, and parking or one or more civil penalties issued
under RCW 46.63.160 have been committed and indicating the nature of
the defendant's failure to act. Such violations or infractions may not
have occurred while the vehicle is stolen from the registered owner
((or is leased or rented under a bona fide commercial vehicle lease or
rental agreement between a lessor engaged in the business of leasing
vehicles and a lessee who is not the vehicle's registered owner)). The
department may enter into agreements of reciprocity with the duly
authorized representatives of the states for reporting to each other
violations of laws governing standing, stopping, and parking.
(b) For violations identified in (a) of this subsection that are
related to infractions issued to a vehicle that is registered as a
rental car pursuant to RCW 46.87.023(2), any state agency or
municipality having jurisdiction over such violations may forward to
the department within ten days of failure to respond, failure to pay a
penalty, failure to appear at a hearing to contest the determination
that a violation of any statute, ordinance, or regulation relating to
standing, stopping, parking, or civil penalties issued under RCW
46.63.160 has been committed, or failure to appear at a hearing to
explain mitigating circumstances, an abstract of the citation record in
the form prescribed by rule of the department, showing the finding by
such state agency or municipality that one or more violations of laws
governing standing, stopping, and parking or one or more civil
penalties issued under RCW 46.63.160 have been committed and indicating
the nature of the defendant's failure to act.
(3) For the purposes of this title and except as defined in RCW
46.25.010, "conviction" means a final conviction in a state or
municipal court or by any federal authority having jurisdiction over
offenses substantially the same as those set forth in this title which
occur on federal installations in this state, an unvacated forfeiture
of bail or collateral deposited to secure a defendant's appearance in
court, the payment of a fine or court cost, a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere, or a finding of guilt on a traffic law violation charge,
regardless of whether the imposition of sentence or sanctions are
deferred or the penalty is suspended, but not including entry into a
deferred prosecution agreement under chapter 10.05 RCW.
(4) Perfection of a notice of appeal shall stay the execution of
the sentence pertaining to the withholding of the driving privilege.
(5) For the purposes of this title, "finding that a traffic
infraction has been committed" means a failure to respond to a notice
of infraction or a determination made by a court pursuant to this
chapter. Payment of a monetary penalty made pursuant to RCW
46.63.070(2) is deemed equivalent to such a finding.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.63.073 and 2007 c 372 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the event a traffic infraction is based on a vehicle's
identification, and the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car
business, the law enforcement agency shall, before a notice of
infraction may be issued, provide a written notice to the rental car
business that a notice of infraction may be issued to the rental car
business if the rental car business does not, within thirty days of
receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing agency by return
mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b)(i) A statement under oath that the business is unable to
determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the
infraction occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the
infraction. A statement provided under this subsection must be
accompanied by a copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle
theft.
((Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement
agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this
chapter for the notice of infraction.)) (ii) In lieu of identifying
the vehicle operator, the rental car business may pay the applicable
penalty. For the purpose of this subsection, a "traffic infraction
based on a vehicle's identification" includes, but is not limited to,
parking infractions, high occupancy toll lane violations, and
violations recorded by automated traffic safety cameras.
(2)(a) If an infraction identified in subsection (1) of this
section has not been paid at the time of vehicle registration renewal,
the rental car business, pursuant to RCW 46.16A.120, must pay any
monetary penalty accompanying the infraction to complete the
registration renewal, unless the rental car business provides proof of
a timely appeal pending for the infraction.
(b) A rental car business may seek reimbursement for any such
monetary penalty, including reasonable administrative fees, from the
individual renting the vehicle at the time the infraction was issued by
the following means:
(i) The rental car business may add the total amount to the charge
for a subsequent rental by the same individual; or
(ii) The rental car business may charge the renter's credit card
directly for the total amount. Notice of such a charge for infractions
accrued during a rental period must be posted at each location of the
rental car business and be included in any rental agreement, including
any electronic rental agreement.
(3) In the event a parking infraction is issued by a private
parking facility and is based on a vehicle's identification, and the
registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car business, the parking
facility shall, before a notice of infraction may be issued, provide a
written notice to the rental car business that a notice of infraction
may be issued to the rental car business if the rental car business
does not, within thirty days of receiving the written notice, provide
to the parking facility by return mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b)(i) A statement under oath that the business is unable to
determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the
infraction occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the
infraction. A statement provided under this subsection must be
accompanied by a copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle
theft.
(ii) Timely mailing of this statement to the parking facility
relieves a rental car business of any liability under this chapter for
the notice of infraction. In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator,
the rental car business may pay the applicable penalty. For the
purpose of this subsection, a "parking infraction based on a vehicle's
identification" is limited to parking infractions occurring on a
private parking facility's premises.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.63.160 and 2013 c 226 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies only to civil penalties for nonpayment of
tolls detected through use of photo toll systems.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement officer
from issuing a notice of traffic infraction to a person in control of
a vehicle at the time a violation occurs under RCW 46.63.030(1) (a),
(b), or (c).
(3) A notice of civil penalty may be issued by the department of
transportation when a toll is assessed through use of a photo toll
system and the toll is not paid by the toll payment due date, which is
eighty days from the date the vehicle uses the toll facility and incurs
the toll charge.
(4) Any registered owner or renter of a vehicle traveling upon a
toll facility operated under chapter 47.56 or 47.46 RCW is subject to
a civil penalty governed by the administrative procedures set forth in
this section when the vehicle incurs a toll charge and the toll is not
paid by the toll payment due date, which is eighty days from the date
the vehicle uses the toll facility and incurs the toll charge.
(5)(a) Consistent with chapter 34.05 RCW, the department of
transportation shall develop an administrative adjudication process to
review appeals of civil penalties issued by the department of
transportation for toll nonpayment detected through the use of a photo
toll system under this section. The department of transportation shall
submit to the transportation committees of the legislature an annual
report on the number of times adjudicators reduce or dismiss the civil
penalty as provided in (b) of this subsection and the total amount of
the civil penalties dismissed. The report must be submitted by
December 1st of each year.
(b) During the adjudication process, the alleged violator must have
an opportunity to explain mitigating circumstances. Hospitalization,
a divorce decree or legal separation agreement resulting in a transfer
of the vehicle, an active duty member of the military or national guard
covered by the federal service members civil relief act, 50 U.S.C. Sec.
501 et seq., or state service members' civil relief act, chapter 38.42
RCW, eviction, homelessness, the death of the alleged violator or of an
immediate family member, or if the alleged violator did not receive a
toll charge bill or notice of civil penalty are valid mitigating
circumstances. All of these reasons that constitute mitigating
circumstances must occur within a reasonable time of the alleged toll
violation. In response to these circumstances, the adjudicator may
reduce or dismiss the civil penalty.
(6) The use of a photo toll system is subject to the following
requirements:
(a) Photo toll systems may take photographs, digital photographs,
microphotographs, videotapes, or other recorded images of the vehicle
and vehicle license plate only.
(b) A notice of civil penalty must include with it a certificate or
facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of photographs,
microphotographs, videotape, or other recorded images produced by a
photo toll system, stating the facts supporting the notice of civil
penalty. This certificate or facsimile is prima facie evidence of the
facts contained in it and is admissible in a proceeding established
under subsection (5) of this section. The photographs, digital
photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or other recorded images
evidencing the toll nonpayment civil penalty must be available for
inspection and admission into evidence in a proceeding to adjudicate
the liability for the civil penalty.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs,
digital photographs, microphotographs, videotape, other recorded
images, or other records identifying a specific instance of travel
prepared under this section are for the exclusive use of the tolling
agency for toll collection and enforcement purposes and are not open to
the public and may not be used in a court in a pending action or
proceeding unless the action or proceeding relates to a civil penalty
under this section. No photograph, digital photograph,
microphotograph, videotape, other recorded image, or other record
identifying a specific instance of travel may be used for any purpose
other than toll collection or enforcement of civil penalties under this
section. Records identifying a specific instance of travel by a
specific person or vehicle must be retained only as required to ensure
payment and enforcement of tolls and to comply with state records
retention policies.
(d) All locations where a photo toll system is used must be clearly
marked by placing signs in locations that clearly indicate to a driver
that he or she is entering a zone where tolls are assessed and enforced
by a photo toll system.
(e) Within existing resources, the department of transportation
shall conduct education and outreach efforts at least six months prior
to activating an all-electronic photo toll system. Methods of outreach
shall include a department presence at community meetings in the
vicinity of a toll facility, signage, and information published in
local media. Information provided shall include notice of when all
electronic photo tolling shall begin and methods of payment.
Additionally, the department shall provide quarterly reporting on
education and outreach efforts and other data related to the issuance
of civil penalties.
(f) The envelope containing a toll charge bill or related notice
issued pursuant to RCW 47.46.105 or 47.56.795, or a notice of civil
penalty issued under this section, must prominently indicate that the
contents are time sensitive and related to a toll violation.
(7) Civil penalties for toll nonpayment detected through the use of
photo toll systems must be issued to the registered owner of the
vehicle identified by the photo toll system, but are not part of the
registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120.
(8) The civil penalty for toll nonpayment detected through the use
of a photo toll system is forty dollars plus the photo toll and
associated fees.
(9) Except as provided otherwise in this subsection, all civil
penalties, including the photo toll and associated fees, collected
under this section must be deposited into the toll facility account of
the facility on which the toll was assessed. However, through June 30,
2013, civil penalties deposited into the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account created under RCW 47.56.165 that are in excess of amounts
necessary to support the toll adjudication process applicable to toll
collection on the Tacoma Narrows bridge must first be allocated toward
repayment of operating loans and reserve payments provided to the
account from the motor vehicle account under section 1005(15), chapter
518, Laws of 2007. Additionally, all civil penalties, resulting from
nonpayment of tolls on the state route number 520 corridor, shall be
deposited into the state route number 520 civil penalties account
created under section 4, chapter 248, Laws of 2010 but only if chapter
248, Laws of 2010 is enacted by June 30, 2010.
(10)(a) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car
business, the department of transportation shall, before a toll bill is
issued, provide a written notice to the rental car business that a toll
bill may be issued to the rental car business if the rental car
business does not, within thirty days of the mailing of the written
notice, provide to the issuing agency by return mail:
(((a))) (i) A statement under oath stating the name and known
mailing address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when
the toll was assessed; or
(((b))) (ii) A statement under oath that the business is unable to
determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the toll
was assessed because the vehicle was stolen at the time the toll was
assessed. A statement provided under this subsection must be
accompanied by a copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle
theft; or
(((c))) (iii) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the
rental car business may pay the applicable toll and fee.
((Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing agency relieves
a rental car business of any liability under this section for the
payment of the toll.))
(b)(i) If a toll bill or notice of civil penalty has not been paid
at the time of vehicle registration renewal, the rental car business,
pursuant to RCW 46.16A.120, must pay the toll bill or notice of civil
penalty and any monetary penalty accompanying the toll bill or notice
of civil penalty to complete the registration renewal, unless the
rental car business provides proof of a timely appeal pending for the
toll bill or notice of civil penalty.
(ii) A rental car business may seek reimbursement for any such toll
bill and monetary penalty, including reasonable administrative fees,
from the individual renting the vehicle at the time the infraction was
issued by the following means:
(A) The rental car business may add the total amount to the charge
for a subsequent rental by the same individual; or
(B) The rental car business may charge the renter's credit card
directly for the total amount. Notice of such a charge for toll bills
and monetary penalties accrued during a rental period must be posted at
each location of the rental car business and be included in any rental
agreement, including any electronic rental agreement.
(11) Consistent with chapter 34.05 RCW, the department of
transportation shall develop rules to implement this section.
(12) For the purposes of this section, "photo toll system" means
the system defined in RCW 47.56.010 and 47.46.020.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.63.170 and 2013 c 306 s 711 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The use of automated traffic safety cameras for issuance of
notices of infraction is subject to the following requirements:
(a) The appropriate local legislative authority must prepare an
analysis of the locations within the jurisdiction where automated
traffic safety cameras are proposed to be located: (i) Before enacting
an ordinance allowing for the initial use of automated traffic safety
cameras; and (ii) before adding additional cameras or relocating any
existing camera to a new location within the jurisdiction. Automated
traffic safety cameras may be used to detect one or more of the
following: Stoplight, railroad crossing, or school speed zone
violations. At a minimum, the local ordinance must contain the
restrictions described in this section and provisions for public notice
and signage. Cities and counties using automated traffic safety
cameras before July 24, 2005, are subject to the restrictions described
in this section, but are not required to enact an authorizing
ordinance. Beginning one year after June 7, 2012, cities and counties
using automated traffic safety cameras must post an annual report of
the number of traffic accidents that occurred at each location where an
automated traffic safety camera is located as well as the number of
notices of infraction issued for each camera and any other relevant
information about the automated traffic safety cameras that the city or
county deems appropriate on the city's or county's web site.
(b) Use of automated traffic safety cameras is restricted to the
following locations only: (i) Intersections of two arterials with
traffic control signals that have yellow change interval durations in
accordance with RCW 47.36.022, which interval durations may not be
reduced after placement of the camera; (ii) railroad crossings; and
(iii) school speed zones.
(c) During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, automated
traffic safety cameras may be used to detect speed violations for the
purposes of section 201(2), chapter 367, Laws of 2011 and section
201(4), chapter 306, Laws of 2013 if the local legislative authority
first enacts an ordinance authorizing the use of cameras to detect
speed violations.
(d) Automated traffic safety cameras may only take pictures of the
vehicle and vehicle license plate and only while an infraction is
occurring. The picture must not reveal the face of the driver or of
passengers in the vehicle. The primary purpose of camera placement is
to take pictures of the vehicle and vehicle license plate when an
infraction is occurring. Cities and counties shall consider installing
cameras in a manner that minimizes the impact of camera flash on
drivers.
(e) A notice of infraction must be mailed to the registered owner
of the vehicle within fourteen days of the violation, or to the renter
of a vehicle within fourteen days of establishing the renter's name and
address under subsection (3)(a)(i) of this section. The law
enforcement officer issuing the notice of infraction shall include with
it a certificate or facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of
photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images produced by an
automated traffic safety camera, stating the facts supporting the
notice of infraction. This certificate or facsimile is prima facie
evidence of the facts contained in it and is admissible in a proceeding
charging a violation under this chapter. The photographs,
microphotographs, or electronic images evidencing the violation must be
available for inspection and admission into evidence in a proceeding to
adjudicate the liability for the infraction. A person receiving a
notice of infraction based on evidence detected by an automated traffic
safety camera may respond to the notice by mail.
(f) The registered owner of a vehicle is responsible for an
infraction under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d) unless the registered owner
overcomes the presumption in RCW 46.63.075, or, in the case of a rental
car business, satisfies the conditions under subsection (3) of this
section. If appropriate under the circumstances, a renter identified
under subsection (3)(a)(i) of this section is responsible for an
infraction.
(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs,
microphotographs, or electronic images prepared under this section are
for the exclusive use of law enforcement in the discharge of duties
under this section and are not open to the public and may not be used
in a court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or
proceeding relates to a violation under this section. No photograph,
microphotograph, or electronic image may be used for any purpose other
than enforcement of violations under this section nor retained longer
than necessary to enforce this section.
(h) All locations where an automated traffic safety camera is used
must be clearly marked at least thirty days prior to activation of the
camera by placing signs in locations that clearly indicate to a driver
that he or she is entering a zone where traffic laws are enforced by an
automated traffic safety camera. Signs placed in automated traffic
safety camera locations after June 7, 2012, must follow the
specifications and guidelines under the manual of uniform traffic
control devices for streets and highways as adopted by the department
of transportation under chapter 47.36 RCW.
(i) If a county or city has established an authorized automated
traffic safety camera program under this section, the compensation paid
to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based only
upon the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in
support of the system, and may not be based upon a portion of the fine
or civil penalty imposed or the revenue generated by the equipment.
(2) Infractions detected through the use of automated traffic
safety cameras are not part of the registered owner's driving record
under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, infractions generated
by the use of automated traffic safety cameras under this section shall
be processed in the same manner as parking infractions, including for
the purposes of RCW 3.50.100, 35.20.220, 46.16A.120, and
46.20.270(((3))) (2). The amount of the fine issued for an infraction
generated through the use of an automated traffic safety camera shall
not exceed the amount of a fine issued for other parking infractions
within the jurisdiction. However, the amount of the fine issued for a
traffic control signal violation detected through the use of an
automated traffic safety camera shall not exceed the monetary penalty
for a violation of RCW 46.61.050 as provided under RCW 46.63.110,
including all applicable statutory assessments.
(3)(a) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car
business, the law enforcement agency shall, before a notice of
infraction being issued under this section, provide a written notice to
the rental car business that a notice of infraction may be issued to
the rental car business if the rental car business does not, within
eighteen days of receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing
agency by return mail:
(((a))) (i) A statement under oath stating the name and known
mailing address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when
the infraction occurred; or
(((b))) (ii) A statement under oath that the business is unable to
determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the
infraction occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the
infraction. A statement provided under this subsection must be
accompanied by a copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle
theft; or
(((c))) (iii) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the
rental car business may pay the applicable penalty.
((Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement
agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this
chapter for the notice of infraction.))
(b)(i) If an infraction detected through the use of an automated
traffic safety camera has not been paid at the time of vehicle
registration renewal, the rental car business, pursuant to RCW
46.16A.120, must pay any monetary penalty accompanying the infraction
to complete the registration renewal, unless the rental car business
provides proof of a timely appeal pending for the infraction.
(ii) A rental car business may seek reimbursement for any such
monetary penalty, including reasonable administrative fees, from the
individual renting the vehicle at the time the infraction was issued by
the following means:
(A) The rental car business may add the total amount to the charge
for a subsequent rental by the same individual; or
(B) The rental car business may charge the renter's credit card
directly for the total amount. Notice of such a charge for infractions
and monetary penalties accrued during a rental period must be posted at
each location of the rental business and be included in any rental
agreement, including any electronic rental agreement.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement officer
from issuing a notice of traffic infraction to a person in control of
a vehicle at the time a violation occurs under RCW 46.63.030(1) (a),
(b), or (c).
(5) For the purposes of this section, "automated traffic safety
camera" means a device that uses a vehicle sensor installed to work in
conjunction with an intersection traffic control system, a railroad
grade crossing control system, or a speed measuring device, and a
camera synchronized to automatically record one or more sequenced
photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images of the rear of a
motor vehicle at the time the vehicle fails to stop when facing a
steady red traffic control signal or an activated railroad grade
crossing control signal, or exceeds a speed limit in a school speed
zone as detected by a speed measuring device. During the 2011-2013 and
2013-2015 fiscal biennia, an automated traffic safety camera includes
a camera used to detect speed violations for the purposes of section
201(2), chapter 367, Laws of 2011 and section 201(4), chapter 306, Laws
of 2013.
(6) During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, this section
does not apply to automated traffic safety cameras for the purposes of
section 216(5), chapter 367, Laws of 2011 and section 216(6), chapter
306, Laws of 2013.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.63.180 and 2013 c 306 s 716 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) School districts may install and operate automated school bus
safety cameras on school buses to be used for the detection of
violations of RCW 46.61.370(1) if the use of the cameras is approved by
a vote of the school district board of directors. School districts are
not required to take school buses out of service if the buses are not
equipped with automated school bus safety cameras or functional
automated safety cameras. Further, school districts shall be held
harmless from and not liable for any criminal or civil liability
arising under the provisions of this section.
(a) Automated school bus safety cameras may only take pictures of
the vehicle and vehicle license plate and only while an infraction is
occurring. The picture must not reveal the face of the driver or of
passengers in the vehicle.
(b) A notice of infraction must be mailed to the registered owner
of the vehicle within fourteen days of the violation, or to the renter
of a vehicle within fourteen days of establishing the renter's name and
address under subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section. The law
enforcement officer issuing the notice of infraction shall include a
certificate or facsimile of the notice, based upon inspection of
photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images produced by an
automated school bus safety camera, stating the facts supporting the
notice of infraction. This certificate or facsimile is prima facie
evidence of the facts contained in it and is admissible in a proceeding
charging a violation under this chapter. The photographs,
microphotographs, or electronic images evidencing the violation must be
available for inspection and admission into evidence in a proceeding to
adjudicate the liability for the infraction. A person receiving a
notice of infraction based on evidence detected by an automated school
bus safety camera may respond to the notice by mail.
(c) The registered owner of a vehicle is responsible for an
infraction under RCW 46.63.030(1)(e) unless the registered owner
overcomes the presumption in RCW 46.63.075, or, in the case of a rental
car business, satisfies the conditions under subsection (2) of this
section. If appropriate under the circumstances, a renter identified
under subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section is responsible for an
infraction.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs,
microphotographs, or electronic images prepared under this section are
for the exclusive use of law enforcement in the discharge of duties
under this section and are not open to the public and may not be used
in a court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or
proceeding relates to a violation under this section. No photograph,
microphotograph, or electronic image may be used for any purpose other
than enforcement of violations under this section nor retained longer
than necessary to enforce this section.
(e) If a school district installs and operates an automated school
bus safety camera under this section, the compensation paid to the
manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based only upon
the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in support
of the system, and may not be based upon a portion of the fine or civil
penalty imposed or the revenue generated by the equipment. Further,
any repair, replacement, or administrative work costs related to
installing or repairing automated school bus safety cameras must be
solely paid for by the manufacturer or vendor of the cameras. Before
entering into a contract with the manufacturer or vendor of the
equipment used under this subsection (1)(e), the school district must
follow the competitive bid process as outlined in RCW 28A.335.190(1).
(f) Any revenue collected from infractions detected through the use
of automated school bus safety cameras, less the administration and
operating costs of the cameras, must be remitted to school districts
for school zone safety projects as determined by the school district
using the automated school bus safety cameras. The administration and
operating costs of the cameras includes infraction enforcement and
processing costs that are incurred by local law enforcement or local
courts. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the infraction revenue
may also be used for school bus safety projects by those school
districts eligible to apply for funding from the school zone safety
account appropriation in section 201, chapter 306, Laws of 2013.
(2)(a) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car
business, the law enforcement agency shall, before a notice of
infraction is issued under this section, provide a written notice to
the rental car business that a notice of infraction may be issued to
the rental car business if the rental car business does not, within
eighteen days of receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing
agency by return mail:
(i) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred;
(ii) A statement under oath that the business is unable to
determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the
infraction occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the
infraction. A statement provided under this subsection (2)(a)(ii) must
be accompanied by a copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle
theft; or
(iii) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the rental car
business may pay the applicable penalty.
(b) ((Timely mailing of a statement under this subsection to the
issuing law enforcement agency relieves a rental car business of any
liability under this chapter for the notice of infraction.)) (i) If an
infraction detected through the use of an automated school bus safety
camera has not been paid at the time of vehicle registration renewal,
the rental car business, pursuant to RCW 46.16A.120, must pay any
monetary penalty accompanying the infraction to complete the
registration renewal, unless the rental car business provides proof of
a timely appeal pending for the infraction.
(ii) A rental car business may seek reimbursement for any such
monetary penalty, including reasonable administrative fees, from the
individual renting the vehicle at the time the infraction was issued by
the following means:
(A) The rental car business may add the total amount to the charge
for a subsequent rental by the same individual; or
(B) The rental car business may charge the renter's credit card
directly for the total amount. Notice of such a charge for infractions
and monetary penalties accrued during a rental period must be posted at
each location of the rental car business and be included in any rental
agreement, including any electronic rental agreement.
(3) For purposes of this section, "automated school bus safety
camera" means a device that is affixed to a school bus that is
synchronized to automatically record one or more sequenced photographs,
microphotographs, or electronic images of the rear of a vehicle at the
time the vehicle is detected for an infraction identified in RCW
46.61.370(1).

--- END ---