BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The Washington state legislature is
purposefully designed to be a part-time legislature to provide people
from all areas of life the opportunity to participate. All businesses
and industries, in the private and public sector, benefit when the
legislature is made up of the broadest possible representation.
(2) It is a significant public policy to encourage citizens to
serve in the legislature. However, serving as a legislator is often
demanding and time consuming, and most legislators have other
employment to support themselves and their families.
(3) Other states have enacted legislation addressing the duties and
responsibilities of legislators and prospective legislators in relation
to their regular employment. It is the intent of this act to address
potential uncertainties that can occur between employers and employees
who are part-time legislators because of the time requirements of the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Employer" means: (a) Any person, association, partnership, or
private or public corporation that employs or exercises control over
wages, hours, or working conditions of ten or more employees; (b) the
state, state institutions, and state agencies; and (c) any unit of
local government including, but not limited to, a county, city, town,
municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or political
subdivision.
(2) "Prospective member" means a person who is certified or
appointed to serve in the legislature but who has not taken the oath of
office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) An employer must grant a temporary leave
of absence without loss of job status or seniority to an employee who
is a member or prospective member of the state legislature in order for
that employee to perform any official duty as a member of the
legislature during regular and special legislative sessions.
(2) The leave of absence under this chapter may be unpaid leave.
However, an employee may elect to substitute any accrued paid leave to
which the employee is entitled for any part of the leave provided under
this chapter.
(3) An employer may not discharge or threaten to discharge an
employee for taking a leave of absence under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) An employee who seeks leave under this
chapter must provide the employer with notice of the employee's
intention to take leave at least thirty days before a regular
legislative session.
(2) When a special legislative session is called, the employee must
provide notice to the employer as soon as the governor or legislature
proclaims the special legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) If an employer violates the provisions
of this chapter, the employee may bring a civil action, at his or her
own expense, in superior court for damages and for an order requiring
the reinstatement of the employee. If the employee prevails, the
employee is entitled to costs and reasonable attorneys' fees. Public
resources may not be used, directly or indirectly, to bring or maintain
a civil action under this section.
(2) The remedy provided in this section is in addition to any
common law remedy or other remedy that may be available to the
employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

--- END ---