BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the majority of
small and medium sized businesses are not offering retirement plans to
their employees. Reasons cited by small businesses for not offering
retirement plans are complexity and costs. Businesses offering
retirement plans have a better ability to recruit and retain employees.
The start retirement savings plan provides a simple and cost-effective
way for employers to offer an important employee benefit. The
legislature also finds that many employees do not have access to an
employment-based retirement plan. On their own, few people contribute
to an individual retirement account and those that do often make poor
investment choices. Barriers such as not knowing where to find a
quality product and selecting between the complex array of investment
choices contribute to inaction. The complexity of investment options
also leads many people to pick the safest, lowest-return products,
which means losing the traditional long-term gains of the market and is
particularly troublesome for younger and mid-career employees. One in
six seniors retire in poverty today and access to retirement savings
vehicles and pensions is on the decline. Employees who are unable to
build up pensions and savings risk living on low incomes in their old
age and are more likely to become dependent on state services. It is
in the financial best interest of the state to address this problem
quickly. The start retirement savings plan provides a simple and
inexpensive way for small business owners and their employees to save
for retirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this subchapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Enrollee" means any employer or employee in this state that is
enrolled in the start retirement savings plan.
(2) "Eligible employer" means a person engaged in a business, an
industry, a profession, a trade, or any other enterprise in the state,
whether for profit or not for profit, that satisfies the requirements
to establish or participate in the start retirement savings plan.
(3) "Participating employer" means any private or nonprofit
employer with employees enrolled in the start retirement savings plan.
(4) "Qualified default investment alternative" means types of
investments identified by the federal internal revenue service for
employees that do not make an investment choice or are automatically
enrolled in a retirement plan.
(5) "Qualified employee" means those workers that are defined by
the federal internal revenue service to be eligible to participate in
a specific retirement plan.
(6) "Start principal account" means the account created in section
7(6) of this act.
(7) "Start retirement savings plan" means the retirement savings
plan created in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1)(a) The start retirement savings plan is
created. The director is responsible for the design, implementation,
and operation of the start retirement savings plan, directly or by
contract. The director may employ a staff and hire consultants,
administrators, and other professionals as necessary to help implement,
maintain, and administer the start retirement savings plan.
(b) The start retirement savings plan must ultimately be self-sustaining, with funding derived from the fees paid by individual
account holders. State general fund dollars may be allocated to the
department for the start retirement savings plan operations until it
reaches self-sustainability. The start retirement savings plan may use
other sources for startup capital. At no time shall funds from the
department of retirement systems expense account be used to administer
the start retirement savings plan or to obtain funding. At no time may
the start retirement savings plan funds be commingled with public
sector employee retirement funds.
(2)(a) The start retirement savings plan shall consist of a two-tier system with one or more: Internal revenue service approved
employer plans open to all employers who choose to contribute to their
employees' accounts, and internal revenue service approved workplace-based individual retirement accounts open to all employees of
participating employers.
(b) Any employer sponsored plan shall be open only to employers
employing fewer than one hundred qualified employees at the time of
enrollment. Self-employed individuals, independent contractors, and
sole proprietorships without employees are also eligible to
participate.
(c) Prior to the enrollment of any private or nonprofit sector
employee or employer in the start retirement savings plan, the director
shall develop a plan for the structure and operation of the start
retirement savings plan. The director shall seek approval, if
necessary, from the federal internal revenue service to operate the
plans and to offer the plans and accounts to Washington employers and
employees on a tax-qualified basis.
(d) The department shall design the start retirement savings plan
to limit liability to the state and participating businesses. The
department shall determine if section 404(c) of the federal employee
retirement income security act of 1974 applies to the start retirement
savings plan and, if so, shall take advantage of safe harbor provisions
whenever possible. These provisions shall include the use of target
date or other similar funds, the asset allocations and maturities of
which are designed to coincide with the expected date of retirement as
the qualified default investment alternative, and as few additional
investment options as possible while still meeting the federal
requirements of providing a broad range of investment alternatives.
(e) Participation in the start retirement savings plan must be
voluntary for employers. Employers can choose to participate by
offering a plan that allows for their contribution to employee accounts
or may establish a plan that only allows for employee contributions.
Participation by employees is optional, though they may be
automatically enrolled in employer plans that allow it. Employees
automatically enrolled may choose not to participate by opting out.
The plans and accounts must include the option for enrollees to roll
pretax contributions into an individual retirement account or another
eligible retirement plan after ceasing participation in the start
retirement savings plan.
(3) The department shall determine reasonable administrative fee
levels for participant accounts.
(4) Enrollment in the start retirement savings plan is not an
entitlement and must not result in expenditures that exceed the amount
available in the start principal account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department may periodically review
participation levels and fund balances in order to make projections of
start retirement savings plan self-sustainability.
(2)(a) At any time after the fourth year after the start retirement
savings plan first began accepting participating employers, the
department determines based on projections that the start retirement
savings plan will not reach sustainable levels the start retirement
savings plan may be terminated.
(b) If at the end of the tenth year after the start retirement
savings plan first began accepting participating employers, the start
retirement savings plan has not reached the size necessary to be self-supporting with an appropriate level of administrative fees, the start
retirement savings plan terminates.
(c) In the event that the start retirement savings plan is
terminated, the director shall, to the extent permitted by federal law,
enable members to transfer accumulated funds into other tax-qualified
retirement accounts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Following the design and approval of the
start retirement savings plan under section 3 of this act, the director
shall adopt all rules necessary for the implementation and operation of
the start retirement savings plan. Rules shall be written to comply
with federal standards and may incorporate federal recommendations that
are in the best interests of enrollees and the operations of the plan.
As part of the rule development process, the director shall consult
with employers, employees, private and nonprofit sector retirement plan
administrators and providers, and any other individuals or entities
that the director determines relevant to the development of an
effective and efficient method for operating the start retirement
savings plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The director may enter into agreements with
and pay a fee to organizations and individuals that market and sell the
start retirement savings plan, including but not limited to financial
services companies, credit unions, and independent brokers and agents.
The fee may vary based on the size of the business enrolled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The start principal account is created
in the state treasury and shall be administered in compliance with
applicable federal law and as set forth in this section. The
department may make arrangements with financial institutions to serve
as trustees or custodians of the start retirement savings plan as may
be required or advisable to comply with applicable federal law and to
provide for the efficient implementation and administration of the
start retirement savings plan.
(2) The contributions elected by participating employees in
accordance with section 3 of this act shall be paid into the start
principal account and shall be sufficient to cover costs of
administration and staffing in addition to such other amounts as may be
determined by the director. The account shall be used to carry out the
purposes of this subchapter.
(3) All moneys in the start principal account and the start
administrative account, all property and rights purchased therewith,
and all income attributable thereto, shall be held in trust by the
state investment board, as set forth under RCW 43.33A.030, for the
exclusive benefit of the start retirement savings plan participants and
their beneficiaries, and, notwithstanding any other provision of this
or related acts, shall be held separate from other types of funds to
the extent required by federal law. Neither the participating
employee, nor the participant's beneficiary or beneficiaries, nor any
other designee, has any right to commute, sell, assign, transfer, or
otherwise convey the right to receive any payments under the start
retirement savings plan. These payments and rights are nonassignable
and nontransferable. Account balances are not subject to attachment,
garnishment, or execution and are not transferable by operation of law
in event of bankruptcy or insolvency, except to the extent otherwise
required by law.
(4) The state investment board has the full power to invest moneys
in the start principal account and the start administrative account in
accordance with RCW 43.84.150, 43.33A.140, and this subchapter, and
cumulative investment directions received under this subchapter. All
investment and operating costs of the state investment board associated
with the investment of the start retirement savings plan assets shall
be paid under RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the exception of
these expenses, one hundred percent of all earnings from these
investments shall accrue directly to the start principal account.
(5)(a) No state board, commission, or agency, or any officer,
employee, or member thereof is liable for any loss or deficiency
resulting from participant investments selected under this subchapter.
(b) The state investment board, or any officer, employee, or member
thereof is not liable for any loss or deficiency resulting from
reasonable efforts to implement investment directions under this
subchapter.
(6) The start administrative account is created in the state
treasury. Federal appropriations or philanthropic grants received
specifically for the start retirement savings plan shall be deposited
in the start administrative account. Expenses of the department
pertaining to the start retirement savings plan including staffing and
administrative expenses shall be paid out of the start administrative
account. Any excess balances credited to this account over
administrative expenses disbursed from this account shall be
transferred to the start principal account at such time and in such
amounts as may be determined by the director with the approval of the
director of financial management. Any deficiency in the start
administrative account caused by an excess of administrative expenses
disbursed from this account shall be transferred to this account from
the start principal account.
(7)(a)(i) The director shall keep or cause to be kept full and
adequate accounts and records of the assets of each individual
participant, and obligations, transactions, and affairs of the start
retirement savings plan. The department shall account for and report
on the investment of the start retirement savings plan assets or may
enter into an agreement with the state investment board for accounting
and reporting.
(ii) The director's duties related to individual participant
accounts include conducting the activities of trade instruction,
settlement activities, and direction of cash movement and related wire
transfers with the custodian bank and outside investment firms.
(iii) The director may establish contracts with recordkeepers to
fulfill the duties of sections 1 through 7 of this act. The director
has sole responsibility for contracting with any recordkeepers and
shall manage the performance of recordkeepers under those contracts.
In establishing contracts, the director shall give consideration to
contracts that assign primary liability for all tort and contract
actions to the contractor. In establishing such contracts, the
department shall assume secondary liability and joint and several
liability shall be preserved. When considering a contract that assigns
primary liability to the contractor, the director shall determine the
potential liability and the costs and benefits of adding this provision
to contract language.
(b) The director may contract with private sector financial
services firms to enroll eligible private and nonprofit sector
employers and employees in the start retirement savings plan. The
director may establish contracts with financial services firms for this
function.
(c)(i) The director's duties under (a)(ii) of this subsection do
not limit the authority of the state investment board to conduct its
responsibilities for asset management and balancing of the start
retirement savings plan funds.
(ii) The state investment board has sole responsibility for
contracting with outside investment firms to provide investment
management for the start retirement savings plan funds and shall manage
the performance of investment managers under those contracts. In
establishing contracts, the state investment board shall give
consideration to contracts that assign primary liability for all tort
and contract actions to the contractor. In establishing such
contracts, the state investment board shall assume secondary liability
and joint and several liability shall be preserved. When considering
a contract that assigns primary liability to the contractor, the state
investment board shall determine the potential liability and the costs
and benefits of adding this provision to contract language.
(d) The state treasurer shall designate and define the terms of
engagement for the custodial banks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Private and nonprofit employers may provide
employees with the opportunity to enroll in the start retirement
savings plan, including providing for payroll deductions for those
employees that enroll in the start retirement savings plan. Employers
with employees enrolled in the start retirement savings plan are
authorized to contract with the enrolled employees to defer or
contribute a portion of the enrolled employees' compensation, in
accordance with the start retirement savings plan rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The director shall report biennially to the
relevant committees of the legislature on the effectiveness and
efficiency of the start retirement savings plan, including the levels
of enrollment, the financial status of the start retirement savings
plan, and the retirement savings levels of participating enrollees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.33A.070 and 1981 c 3 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
No member of the state investment board is liable for the
negligence, default, or failure of any other person or other member of
the board to perform the duties of the member's office and no member of
the board shall be considered or held to be an insurer of the funds or
assets of any of the trust and retirement funds, including funds or
assets of the start retirement savings plan, nor is any nonvoting
member liable for actions performed with the exercise of reasonable
diligence within the scope of the member's authorized activities as a
member of the board.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.84.092 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 24 and 2013 2nd
sp.s. c 11 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement
project account, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the
budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account,
the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University
capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and
reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the
Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia
river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia
river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account,
the department of licensing services account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities
community trust account, the drinking water assistance account, the
drinking water assistance administrative account, the drinking water
assistance repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital
projects account, the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the energy freedom account, the energy
recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight mobility
investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the public health services account, the high
capacity transportation account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the
highway safety fund, the high occupancy toll lanes operations account,
the hospital safety net assessment fund, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine
resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation
account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal
justice assistance account, the natural resources deposit account, the
oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account,
the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public
facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004,
the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance
account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound
ferry operations account, the real estate appraiser commission account,
the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program
account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust
account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington
loan fund, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility
safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account,
the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the start
administrative account, the start principal account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol
highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account,
the state route number 520 corridor account, the state wildlife
account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll
bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account,
the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer
firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2
retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2
retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state economic
development commission account, the Washington state health insurance
pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving
administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the
Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima
integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan
implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan
implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, the state university permanent fund, and the state
reclamation revolving account shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.84.092 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 25 and 2013 2nd
sp.s. c 11 s 16 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement
project account, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the
budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account,
the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University
capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and
reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the
Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia
river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia
river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the Columbia river
crossing project account, the common school construction fund, the
county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice
assistance account, the deferred compensation administrative account,
the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
licensing services account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account, the
education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the
election account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act
account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State
College capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account,
the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight mobility investment
account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing
protective fund, the public health services account, the high capacity
transportation account, the state higher education construction
account, the higher education construction account, the highway bond
retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety
fund, the high occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital
safety net assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources
stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the mobile home
park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety
education account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse
roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land
account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational
vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the
resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the
rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund,
the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust
fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special
category C account, the special wildlife account, the start
administrative account, the start principal account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol
highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account,
the state route number 520 corridor account, the state wildlife
account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll
bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account,
the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer
firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2
retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2
retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state economic
development commission account, the Washington state health insurance
pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving
administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the
Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima
integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan
implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan
implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, the state university permanent fund, and the state
reclamation revolving account shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Section 12 of this act expires on the date
the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are
met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Section 13 of this act takes effect on the
date the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012
are met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1 through 10 of this act are each
added to chapter 41.50 RCW and codified with the subchapter heading of
"save toward a retirement today."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2014, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---