BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) By December 1, 2014, the department of
labor and industries shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature any recommendations for legislation or rule making
addressing workload and safety standards for employees of commercial
janitorial services.
(2) In developing recommendations, the department must consult with
representatives from the business and labor communities, including
commercial janitorial services businesses, labor unions, and other
interested organizations or entities the department determines are
appropriate. The recommendations may not supersede local collective
bargaining agreements.
(3) This section expires January 31, 2015.

--- END ---