BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.48.080 and 1987 c 109 s 126 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, it shall
be unlawful for any person to throw, drain, run, or otherwise discharge
into any of the waters of this state, or to cause, permit or suffer to
be thrown, run, drained, allowed to seep or otherwise discharged into
such waters any organic or inorganic matter that shall cause or tend to
cause pollution of such waters according to the determination of the
department, as provided for in this chapter.
(2) For lands on which livestock graze or seek feed in pastures,
fields, or rangeland, the department must first make a determination
that a water quality problem exists and that a violation under
subsection (1) of this section has occurred due to the presence of
livestock before any notice of violation or penalty may be assessed on
the property owner. When the department determines that a violation
has occurred or is about to occur, it shall first attempt to achieve
voluntary compliance by offering information and technical assistance
to the person in writing identifying one or more means to accomplish
the person's purposes within the framework of the law. If education
and technical assistance fail to remedy the problem, the department may
then issue a notice of violation under this chapter.

--- END ---