BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that while currently
not all communities have food and yard waste collection, in the future,
when communities update their solid waste management plans in
accordance with RCW 70.95.080, they may have these services. The
legislature, therefore, intends to establish new directives regarding
the provision of collection space for food and yard waste on-site at
qualifying residential buildings.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27.175 and 1991 c 297 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state building code council, in consultation with the
department of ecology and local governments, shall conduct a study of
the state building code, and adopt changes as necessary to encourage
greater use of recycled building materials from construction and
building demolition debris, mixed waste paper, waste paint, waste
plastics, and other waste materials.
(2) During the 2015 code adoption period, the state building code
council must adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, with an
effective date of July 1, 2016, requiring that space be provided for
the collection and periodic transfer to an off-site composting facility
of food and yard waste created on-site at the following new buildings
classified as residential group R-2 under the state building code:
(a) Apartment houses;
(b) Assisted living facilities;
(c) Boarding houses;
(d) Congregate living facilities;
(e) Dormitories; and
(f) Fraternities and sororities.
(3) The collection areas must be designed to meet the needs of the
occupancy and facilitate pick up and, as appropriate, must be available
to the occupants and haulers.

--- END ---