BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.68.030 and 2011 c 171 s 85 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall forward all fees for vehicle registrations
under chapters 46.16A and 46.17 RCW, unless otherwise specified by law,
to the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The
state treasurer shall credit these moneys to the motor vehicle fund
created in RCW 46.68.070.
(2) Proceeds from vehicle license fees and renewal vehicle license
fees must be deposited by the state treasurer ((as follows:
(a) $20.35 of each initial or renewal vehicle license fee must be
deposited)) in the state patrol highway account in the motor vehicle
fund, hereby created. Vehicle license fees, renewal vehicle license
fees, and all other funds in the state patrol highway account must be
for the sole use of the Washington state patrol for highway activities
of the Washington state patrol, subject to proper appropriations and
reappropriations.
(((b) $2.02 of each initial vehicle license fee and $0.93 of each
renewal vehicle license fee must be deposited each biennium in the
Puget Sound ferry operations account.
(c) Any remaining amounts of vehicle license fees and renewal
vehicle license fees that are not distributed otherwise under this
section must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.))

--- END ---