BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any
health care provider credentialing or granting practice privileges to
other health care providers to deliver health care in response to an
emergency is immune from civil liability arising out of such
credentialing or granting of practice privileges if: (a) The health
care provider so credentialed or granted practice privileges was
responding to an emergency; and (b) the procedures utilized for
credentialing and granting practice privileges were substantially
consistent with the standards for granting emergency practice
privileges adopted by the joint commission on the accreditation of
health care organizations.
(2) This section does not apply to any acts or omissions
constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Ambulatory surgical facility" has the same meaning as provided
in RCW 70.230.010.
(b) "Clinic" means a place for treatment of patients on an
outpatient basis by a health care provider.
(c) "Credentialing" means the collection, verification, and
assessment of whether a health care provider meets relevant licensing,
education, and training requirements.
(d) "Emergency" means an event or set of circumstances for which
the governor has proclaimed a state of emergency pursuant to RCW
43.06.010.
(e) "Health care provider" means:
(i) A member of a profession identified in RCW 7.70.020(1);
(ii) An employee or agent of a member of such a profession acting
in the course and scope of his or her employment;
(iii) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing, credentialing, or providing practice privileges
to one or more persons described in (e)(i) of this subsection
including, but not limited to, a hospital, ambulatory surgical
facility, clinic, health maintenance organization, or nursing home, or
an officer, director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course
and scope of his or her employment;
(iv) A pharmacist or pharmacy as defined in RCW 18.64.011; or
(v) In the event any person identified in (e)(i) through (iv) of
this subsection is deceased, his or her estate or personal
representative.
(f) "Health maintenance organization" has the same meaning as
provided in RCW 48.46.020.
(g) "Hospital" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 70.41.020.
(h) "Nursing home" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
18.51.010.

--- END ---