BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.81A RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The director must create and issue a motorcycle road guard
certificate to an applicant that satisfies the following requirements,
in addition to any other requirements established by the director by
rule in consultation with motorcycle skills education course
instructors:
(i) Is at least eighteen years of age;
(ii) Possesses a valid driver's license; and
(iii) Has successfully completed a motorcycle road guard
certification course developed and offered by the Washington motorcycle
safety program.
(b) The director, in consultation with motorcycle skills education
course instructors, must establish safety and equipment standards for
motorcycle road guard certificate holders, including mandatory
reflective safety vests.
(2) If the Washington state patrol or local law enforcement is
unavailable to control vehicle traffic for the purposes of a motorcycle
group ride, the holder of a motorcycle road guard certificate may
direct motorcycles within the group ride or other vehicle traffic
affected by the group ride to stop until it is safe to proceed or to
operate contrary to traffic control signals. A motorcycle within the
group ride or vehicle traffic affected by the group ride may proceed
only when directed by the motorcycle road guard certificate holder.
(3) The director must establish by rule a motorcycle road guard
certificate applicant fee to cover department costs.
(4) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.
(5) The director must adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---