BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that public confidence
in the criminal justice system is sometimes undermined by the current
application of the insanity defense and that additional discretion is
required by courts and juries to justly dispose of cases involving
defendants with a mental disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A person who at the time of the
commission of a criminal offense was not insane but was suffering from
a mental disability is not relieved of criminal responsibility for the
person's conduct and may be found guilty but with a mental disability.
(2) As used in this section, "mental disability" means a
substantial disorder of thought, mood, or behavior that afflicted a
person at the time of the commission of the offense and that impaired
that person's judgment, but not to the extent that the person did not
know what the person was doing or understand the consequences of the
act or did not know that the act was wrong or could not prevent oneself
from committing the act.
(3) A plea or finding of guilty but with a mental disability is not
an affirmative defense but an alternative plea or finding that may be
accepted or made pursuant to appropriate evidence when the affirmative
defense of insanity is raised or the plea of guilty but with a mental
disability is made.
(4) A plea of guilty but with a mental disability shall not be
accepted until the defendant has undergone examination by a clinical
psychologist or psychiatrist and the court has examined the
psychological or psychiatric reports, held a hearing on the issue of
the defendant's mental condition, and is satisfied that there is a
factual basis that the defendant had a mental disability at the time of
the offense to which the plea is entered.
(5) When a defendant has asserted a defense of insanity, the court
may find the defendant guilty but with a mental disability if after
hearing all of the evidence the court finds beyond a reasonable doubt
that the defendant:
(a) Is guilty of the offense charged;
(b) Had a mental disability at the time of the commission of the
offense; and
(c) Was not legally insane at the time of the commission of the
offense.
(6) When a defendant has asserted a defense of insanity, the court,
where warranted by the evidence, shall provide the jury with a special
verdict form of guilty but with a mental disability and shall
separately instruct the jury that a verdict of guilty but with a mental
disability may be returned instead of a verdict of guilty or not
guilty, and that such a verdict requires a finding by the jury beyond
a reasonable doubt that the defendant committed the offense charged and
that the defendant was not legally insane at the time of the commission
of the offense but that the defendant had a mental disability at that
time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Whenever a defendant is found guilty but
with a mental disability at the time of the offense or enters a plea to
that effect that is accepted by the court, the court shall sentence the
defendant as though the defendant had been found guilty of the offense.
(2) If such a defendant is committed to the department of
corrections, the defendant shall be further observed and diagnosed and
then treated in such a manner as may be indicated for the mental
disability. Any observation, diagnosis, or treatment shall be provided
in conformance with RCW 10.77.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 10 RCW.

--- END ---