BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state supreme
court has adopted new standards and caseload limits for public
defenders, which were originally scheduled to take effect in September
2013, but will not become effective until January 2015.
The legislature finds that while these standards of four hundred
misdemeanor cases per public defender per year, or weighted-system
standards of three hundred misdemeanor cases per public defender per
year, are intended to raise the quality of counsel provided to low-income and indigent populations, they also will have a very real fiscal
impact on the criminal justice and court operations of cities and
counties which already are struggling to address these costs.
The legislature therefore intends to provide local courts and
courts of limited jurisdiction with additional fee authority to assess
costs on offenders that can be used to offset growing expenditures
associated with indigent defense and public defender caseload limits.

Sec. 2 RCW 3.62.085 and 2005 c 457 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon conviction or a plea of guilty in any court organized under
this title or Title 35 RCW, a defendant in a criminal case is liable
for a fee of ((forty-three)) fifty-five dollars. This fee shall be
subject to division with the state under RCW ((3.46.120(2),))
3.50.100(2), 3.62.020(2), 3.62.040(2), and 35.20.220(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 3.62 RCW
to read as follows:
Funds deposited into the city or county general fund attributable
to the increase in fees imposed by section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of
2014 (this act) must be used to support local court operations and
criminal justice functions that have a clear connection to indigent
defense cases.

Sec. 4 RCW 10.01.160 and 2010 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court may require a defendant to pay costs. Costs may be
imposed only upon a convicted defendant, except for costs imposed upon
a defendant's entry into a deferred prosecution program, costs imposed
upon a defendant for pretrial supervision, or costs imposed upon a
defendant for preparing and serving a warrant for failure to appear.
(2) Costs shall be limited to expenses specially incurred by the
state in prosecuting the defendant or in administering the deferred
prosecution program under chapter 10.05 RCW or pretrial supervision.
They cannot include expenses inherent in providing a constitutionally
guaranteed jury trial or expenditures in connection with the
maintenance and operation of government agencies that must be made by
the public irrespective of specific violations of law. Expenses
incurred for serving of warrants for failure to appear and jury fees
under RCW 10.46.190 may be included in costs the court may require a
defendant to pay. Costs for administering a deferred prosecution may
not exceed two hundred fifty dollars. Costs for administering a
pretrial supervision may not exceed one hundred fifty dollars. Costs
for preparing and serving a warrant for failure to appear may not
exceed one hundred seventy-five dollars. Costs of incarceration
imposed on a defendant convicted of a misdemeanor or a gross
misdemeanor may not exceed the actual cost of incarceration. In no
case may the court require the offender to pay more than one hundred
dollars per day for the cost of incarceration. Payment of other court-ordered financial obligations, including all legal financial
obligations and costs of supervision take precedence over the payment
of the cost of incarceration ordered by the court. All funds received
from defendants for the cost of incarceration in the county or city
jail must be remitted for criminal justice purposes to the county or
city that is responsible for the defendant's jail costs. Costs imposed
constitute a judgment against a defendant and survive a dismissal of
the underlying action against the defendant. However, if the defendant
is acquitted on the underlying action, the costs for preparing and
serving a warrant for failure to appear do not survive the acquittal,
and the judgment that such costs would otherwise constitute shall be
vacated.
(3) The court shall not order a defendant to pay costs unless the
defendant is or will be able to pay them. In determining the amount
and method of payment of costs, the court shall take account of the
financial resources of the defendant and the nature of the burden that
payment of costs will impose.
(4) A defendant who has been ordered to pay costs and who is not in
contumacious default in the payment thereof may at any time petition
the sentencing court for remission of the payment of costs or of any
unpaid portion thereof. If it appears to the satisfaction of the court
that payment of the amount due will impose manifest hardship on the
defendant or the defendant's immediate family, the court may remit all
or part of the amount due in costs, or modify the method of payment
under RCW 10.01.170.
(5) Except for direct costs relating to evaluating and reporting to
the court, prosecutor, or defense counsel regarding a defendant's
competency to stand trial as provided in RCW 10.77.060, this section
shall not apply to costs related to medical or mental health treatment
or services a defendant receives while in custody of the secretary of
the department of social and health services or other governmental
units. This section shall not prevent the secretary of the department
of social and health services or other governmental units from imposing
liability and seeking reimbursement from a defendant committed to an
appropriate facility as provided in RCW 10.77.084 while criminal
proceedings are stayed. This section shall also not prevent
governmental units from imposing liability on defendants for costs
related to providing medical or mental health treatment while the
defendant is in the governmental unit's custody. Medical or mental
health treatment and services a defendant receives at a state hospital
or other facility are not a cost of prosecution and shall be
recoverable under RCW 10.77.250 and 70.48.130, chapter 43.20B RCW, and
any other applicable statute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 10.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Funds collected as a result of the increase in the amount of costs
that may be imposed by section 4, chapter . . ., Laws of 2014 (this
act) must be used to support local court operations and criminal
justice functions that have a clear connection to indigent defense
cases.

Sec. 6 RCW 10.64.120 and 2005 c 400 s 7 and 2005 c 282 s 22 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Every judge of a court of limited jurisdiction shall have the
authority to levy upon a person a monthly assessment not to exceed one
hundred fifty dollars for services provided whenever the person is
referred by the court to the misdemeanant probation department for
evaluation or supervision services. The assessment may also be made by
a judge in superior court when such misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
cases are heard in the superior court.
(2) For the purposes of this section the administrative office of
the courts shall define a probation department and adopt rules for the
qualifications of probation officers based on occupational and
educational requirements developed by an oversight committee. This
oversight committee shall include a representative from the district
and municipal court judges' association, the misdemeanant corrections
association, the administrative office of the courts, and associations
of cities and counties. The oversight committee shall consider
qualifications that provide the training and education necessary to (a)
conduct presentencing and postsentencing background investigations,
including sentencing recommendations to the court regarding jail terms,
alternatives to incarceration, and conditions of release; and (b)
provide ongoing supervision and assessment of offenders' needs and the
risk they pose to the community.
(3) It shall be the responsibility of the probation services office
to implement local procedures approved by the court of limited
jurisdiction to ensure collection and payment of such fees into the
general fund of the city or county treasury.
(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, revenues
raised under this section shall be used to fund programs for probation
services and shall be in addition to those funds provided in RCW
3.62.050.
(b) Revenues raised as a result of the increase in the amount of
the assessment that may be imposed by section 6, chapter . . ., Laws of
2014 (this act) must be used to support local court operations and
criminal justice functions that have a clear connection to indigent
defense cases.
(5) Assessments and fees levied upon a probationer under this
section must be suspended while the probationer is being supervised by
another state under RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for adult
offender supervision.

--- END ---