BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any county with a population of at least five hundred thousand
that abuts at least five other counties that is required or chooses to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall permit schools outside of urban growth
areas when the following criteria are met:
(a) The school is needed to meet student capacity needs in an
identified service area which serves students residing in whole or in
part outside of an urban growth area, as demonstrated by a capital
facilities plan adopted by a locally elected school board of directors;
(b) An inventory of developable land has been conducted and
findings have been made that vacant land suitable to site the school is
unavailable within the urban growth boundary and relevant service area,
taking into consideration school service area needs, locally adopted
educational program requirements, and, to the extent there is vacant
land available within the urban growth boundary, the current zoning and
the financial feasibility of using public dollars to secure such land;
(c) New infrastructure is provided for and impact fees, if
applicable, are established consistent with the requirements of RCW
82.02.050;
(d) Transit-oriented site planning and traffic demand management
programs are implemented;
(e) Buffers are provided between the school development and
adjacent nonurban uses;
(f) Environmental protection has been addressed and provided for;
(g) Development regulations are established to ensure urban growth
will not occur in adjacent nonurban areas;
(h) Provision is made to mitigate impacts on designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands if the
proposed site is located adjacent to such lands; and
(i) The plan for the new school is consistent with the development
regulations established for the protection of critical areas by the
county pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170.
(2) Any county subject to this section shall ensure that:
(a) The comprehensive plan specifically identifies policies,
consistent with this section, to guide the development of schools
located outside of the urban growth boundary;
(b) The comprehensive plan and development regulations include
restrictions that preclude new urban or suburban land uses in the
vicinity of the new school, except in areas otherwise designated for
urban growth under RCW 36.70A.110;
(c) The county ensures that the school development plan is
consistent with the development regulations established for critical
areas; and
(d) On-site and off-site infrastructure and service impacts are
fully considered and mitigated.

--- END ---