BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are too
many individuals illegally engaging in business in the construction
industry and that should be registered under chapter 18.27 RCW, should
have state industrial insurance accounts, should be paying state
industrial insurance premiums in accordance with Title 51 RCW to
protect their workers, should have state unemployment insurance
accounts in accordance with Title 50 RCW, should be paying state
unemployment insurance taxes in accordance with Title 50 RCW, and
should be paying state business taxes and remitting state sales taxes
in accordance with Title 82 RCW. These illegal businesses are
competing unfairly against legally registered contractors that are
paying their state industrial insurance premiums, paying their state
unemployment taxes, paying their state business taxes, and remitting
their sales taxes, and are taking work away from the employees of the
legally operating businesses. It is the intent of the legislature to
curtail the operations of illegal businesses in the construction
industry and hereby enact legislation to require businesses that apply
for a contractor registration under chapter 18.27 RCW to have a state
industrial insurance account in accordance with Title 51 RCW and have
a state unemployment insurance account in accordance with Title 50 RCW,
in addition to having a state business tax account in accordance with
Title 82 RCW. In addition, the legislature will encourage an owner,
officer, or partner of a contractor registration applicant issued in
accordance with chapter 18.27 RCW to complete a preregistration
contractor training class to better ensure that the applicant knows
his, her, or its responsibilities when doing business as a contractor
in Washington state by charging an additional contractor registration
fee for any applicant that has not completed the preregistration
training class. The legislature also directs the department of labor
and industries to provide preregistration training in each of its
service regions at least once each month.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.27.030 and 2008 c 120 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An applicant for registration as a contractor shall submit an
application under oath upon a form to be prescribed by the director and
which shall include the following information pertaining to the
applicant:
(a) Employer social security number.
(b) Unified business identifier number.
(c) Evidence of an established workers' compensation account for
the coverage for the applicant's employees working in Washington, as
follows:
(i) The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by
the department, regardless of whether the applicant has employees at
the time of registration;
(ii) The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department;
or
(iii) For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada
subject to an agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as
permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of coverage issued by
the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in the
applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant
has secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or
province's workers' compensation law.
(d) Employment security department unemployment insurance account
number, regardless of whether the applicant has employees at the time
of registration.
(e) ((Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be
substituted for the information required by (c) and (d) of this
subsection if the applicant will not employ employees in Washington.
(f))) Type of contracting activity, whether a general or a
specialty contractor and if the latter, the type of specialty.
(((g))) (f) The name and address of each partner if the applicant
is a firm or partnership, or the name and address of the owner if the
applicant is an individual proprietorship, or the name and address of
the corporate officers and statutory agent, if any, if the applicant is
a corporation or the name and address of all members of other business
entities. The information contained in such application is a matter of
public record and open to public inspection.
(2) First-time applicants must complete a contractor
preregistration training program or pay an additional registration fee
of two hundred dollars. The program must be provided by the department
or by private entities approved by the department under criteria
established by rule. A contractor preregistration training program may
not exceed six hours in duration. The training must be taken by an
owner, officer, or partner of the entity applying for registration
under this chapter. The contractor preregistration training program
must be available at a minimum of once a month in each of the
department's service delivery regions. The department may not charge
a fee for the contractor preregistration training program it provides
using department staff. The department or private entities approved by
the department may also offer the contractor preregistration training
program via the internet, so long as the department has proof that the
applicant participated in the entire preregistration training program.
All applicants must pass a test showing that the applicant reasonably
retained the information presented in the training. The department of
revenue and the employment security department shall assist the
department in presenting the contractor preregistration training
program.
(3) The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage
information provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(c) of this
section, including but not limited to information regarding the
coverage of an individual employee of the applicant. If coverage is
provided under the laws of another state, the department may notify the
other state that the applicant is employing employees in Washington.
(((3))) (4)(a) The department shall deny an application for
registration if: (i) The applicant has been previously performing work
subject to this chapter as a sole proprietor, partnership, corporation,
or other entity and the department has notice that the applicant has an
unsatisfied final judgment against him or her in an action based on
work performed subject to this chapter or the applicant owes the
department money for penalties assessed or fees due under this chapter
as a result of a final judgment; (ii) the applicant was an owner,
principal, or officer of a partnership, corporation, or other entity
that either has an unsatisfied final judgment against it in an action
that was incurred for work performed subject to this chapter or owes
the department money for penalties assessed or fees due under this
chapter as a result of a final judgment; (iii) the applicant does not
have a valid unified business identifier number; (iv) the department
determines that the applicant has falsified information on the
application, unless the error was inadvertent; or (v) the applicant
does not have an active and valid certificate of registration with the
department of revenue.
(b) The department shall suspend an active registration if (i) the
department has determined that the registrant has an unsatisfied final
judgment against it for work within the scope of this chapter; (ii) the
department has determined that the registrant is a sole proprietor or
an owner, principal, or officer of a registered contractor that has an
unsatisfied final judgment against it for work within the scope of this
chapter; (iii) the registrant does not maintain a valid unified
business identifier number; (iv) the department has determined that the
registrant falsified information on the application, unless the error
was inadvertent; or (v) the registrant does not have an active and
valid certificate of registration with the department of revenue.
(c) The department may suspend an active registration if the
department has determined that an owner, principal, partner, or officer
of the registrant was an owner, principal, or officer of a previous
partnership, corporation, or other entity that has an unsatisfied final
judgment against it.
(((4))) (5) The department shall not deny an application or suspend
a registration because of an unsatisfied final judgment if the
applicant's or registrant's unsatisfied final judgment was determined
by the director to be the result of the fraud or negligence of another
party.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.27.070 and 1997 c 314 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall charge fees for issuance, renewal, and
reinstatement of certificates of registration; and changes of name,
address, or business structure. Subject to RCW 18.27.030(4), the
department shall set the fees by rule.
The entire amount of the fees are to be used solely to cover the
full cost of issuing certificates, filing papers and notices, and
administering and enforcing this chapter. The costs shall include
reproduction, travel, per diem, and administrative and legal support
costs.

--- END ---