BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.090 and 1996 c 295 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the other requirements of this chapter, no
dealer may deliver a pistol to the purchaser thereof until:
(a) The purchaser produces (i) a valid concealed pistol license or
(ii) a valid commission card issued by a Washington state law
enforcement agency that shows the purchaser is a full-time,
commissioned law enforcement officer of the agency, and the dealer has
recorded the purchaser's name, the concealed pistol license number, or
the driver's license number of the commissioned law enforcement
officer, and ((issuing)) the agency that issued the concealed pistol
license or the commission card, such record to be made in triplicate
and processed as provided in subsection (5) of this section. For
purposes of this subsection (1)(a), a "valid concealed pistol license"
does not include a temporary emergency license, and does not include
any license issued before July 1, 1996, unless the issuing agency
conducted a records search for disqualifying crimes under RCW 9.41.070
at the time of issuance;
(b) The dealer is notified in writing by the chief of police or the
sheriff of the jurisdiction in which the purchaser resides that the
purchaser is eligible to possess a pistol under RCW 9.41.040 and that
the application to purchase is approved by the chief of police or
sheriff; or
(c) Five business days, meaning days on which state offices are
open, have elapsed from the time of receipt of the application for the
purchase thereof as provided herein by the chief of police or sheriff
designated in subsection (5) of this section, and, when delivered, the
pistol shall be securely wrapped and shall be unloaded. However, if
the purchaser does not have a valid permanent Washington driver's
license or state identification card or has not been a resident of the
state for the previous consecutive ninety days, the waiting period
under this subsection (1)(c) shall be up to sixty days.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, in determining
whether the purchaser who does not possess a valid concealed pistol
license or a valid commission card issued by a Washington state law
enforcement agency meets the requirements of RCW 9.41.040, the chief of
police or sheriff, or the designee of either, shall check with the
national crime information center, the Washington state patrol
electronic database, the department of social and health services
electronic database, and with other agencies or resources as
appropriate, to determine whether the applicant is ineligible under RCW
9.41.040 to possess a firearm.
(b) Once the system is established, a dealer shall use the state
system and national instant criminal background check system, provided
for by the Brady Handgun Violence Prevention Act (18 U.S.C. Sec. 921 et
seq.), to make criminal background checks of applicants to purchase
firearms. However, a chief of police or sheriff, or a designee of
either, shall continue to check the department of social and health
services' electronic database and with other agencies or resources as
appropriate, to determine whether applicants are ineligible under RCW
9.41.040 to possess a firearm.
(3) In any case under subsection (1)(c) of this section where the
applicant has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from any
court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor, the dealer
shall hold the delivery of the pistol until the warrant for arrest is
served and satisfied by appropriate court appearance. The local
jurisdiction for purposes of the sale shall confirm the existence of
outstanding warrants within seventy-two hours after notification of the
application to purchase a pistol is received. The local jurisdiction
shall also immediately confirm the satisfaction of the warrant on
request of the dealer so that the hold may be released if the warrant
was for an offense other than an offense making a person ineligible
under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a pistol.
(4) In any case where the chief or sheriff of the local
jurisdiction has reasonable grounds based on the following
circumstances: (a) Open criminal charges, (b) pending criminal
proceedings, (c) pending commitment proceedings, (d) an outstanding
warrant for an offense making a person ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to
possess a pistol, or (e) an arrest for an offense making a person
ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a pistol, if the records of
disposition have not yet been reported or entered sufficiently to
determine eligibility to purchase a pistol, the local jurisdiction may
hold the sale and delivery of the pistol beyond five days up to thirty
days in order to confirm existing records in this state or elsewhere.
After thirty days, the hold will be lifted unless an extension of the
thirty days is approved by a local district court or municipal court
for good cause shown. A dealer shall be notified of each hold placed
on the sale by local law enforcement and of any application to the
court for additional hold period to confirm records or confirm the
identity of the applicant.
(5) At the time of applying for the purchase of a pistol, the
purchaser shall sign in triplicate and deliver to the dealer an
application containing his or her full name, residential address, date
and place of birth, race, and gender; the date and hour of the
application; the applicant's driver's license number or state
identification card number; a description of the pistol including the
make, model, caliber and manufacturer's number if available at the time
of applying for the purchase of a pistol. If the manufacturer's number
is not available, the application may be processed, but delivery of the
pistol to the purchaser may not occur unless the manufacturer's number
is recorded on the application by the dealer and transmitted to the
chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county in
which the purchaser resides; and a statement that the purchaser is
eligible to possess a pistol under RCW 9.41.040.
The application shall contain a warning substantially as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal
law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you
are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you
may be prosecuted in federal court. State permission to
purchase a firearm is not a defense to a federal prosecution.

The purchaser shall be given a copy of the department of fish and
wildlife pamphlet on the legal limits of the use of firearms, firearms
safety, and the fact that local laws and ordinances on firearms are
preempted by state law and must be consistent with state law.
The dealer shall, by the end of the business day, sign and attach
his or her address and deliver a copy of the application and such other
documentation as required under subsection (1) of this section to the
chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county of
which the purchaser is a resident. The triplicate shall be retained by
the dealer for six years. The dealer shall deliver the pistol to the
purchaser following the period of time specified in this section unless
the dealer is notified of an investigative hold under subsection (4) of
this section in writing by the chief of police of the municipality or
the sheriff of the county, whichever is applicable, denying the
purchaser's application to purchase and the grounds thereof. The
application shall not be denied unless the purchaser is not eligible to
possess a pistol under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045, or federal law.
The chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the
county shall retain or destroy applications to purchase a pistol in
accordance with the requirements of 18 U.S.C. Sec. 922.
(6) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding
identity or eligibility requirements on the application to purchase a
pistol is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040.
(7) This section does not apply to sales to licensed dealers for
resale or to the sale of antique firearms.

--- END ---