BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.60.040 and 2013 c 278 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to operate a vessel in a reckless
manner.
(2) It is unlawful for a person to operate a vessel while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor, marijuana, or any drug. A person is
considered to be under the influence of intoxicating liquor, marijuana,
or any drug if, within two hours of operating a vessel:
(a) The person has an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or higher as
shown by analysis of the person's breath or blood made under RCW
46.61.506; or
(b) The person has a THC concentration of 5.00 or higher as shown
by analysis of the person's blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or
(c) The person is under the influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor, marijuana, or any drug; or
(d) The person is under the combined influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor, marijuana, and any drug.
(3) The fact that any person charged with a violation of this
section is or has been entitled to use such drug under the laws of this
state shall not constitute a defense against any charge of violating
this section.
(4)(a) Any person who operates a vessel within this state is deemed
to have given consent, subject to the provisions of RCW 46.61.506, to
a test or tests of the person's breath ((or blood)) for the purpose of
determining the alcohol concentration((, THC concentration, or presence
of any drug)) in the person's breath ((or blood)) if arrested for any
offense where, at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has
reasonable grounds to believe the person was operating a vessel while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor((, marijuana,)) or a
combination of intoxicating liquor and any other drug.
(b) When an arrest results from an accident in which there has been
serious bodily injury to another person or death or the arresting
officer has reasonable grounds to believe the person was operating a
vessel while under the influence of THC or any other drug, a blood test
may be administered with the consent of the arrested person and a valid
waiver of the warrant requirement or without the consent of the person
so arrested pursuant to a search warrant or when exigent circumstances
exist.
(c) Neither consent nor this section precludes a police officer
from obtaining a search warrant for a person's breath or blood.
(d) An arresting officer may administer field sobriety tests when
circumstances permit.
(5) The test or tests of breath must be administered pursuant to
RCW 46.20.308. ((Where the officer has reasonable grounds to believe
that the person is under the influence of a drug, or where the person
is incapable due to physical injury, physical incapacity, or other
physical limitation, of providing a breath sample, or where the person
is being treated in a hospital, clinic, doctor's office, emergency
medical vehicle, ambulance, or other similar facility, a blood test
must be administered by a qualified person as provided in RCW
46.61.506(5).)) The officer shall warn the person that if the person
refuses to take the test, the person will be issued a class 1 civil
infraction under RCW 7.80.120.
(6) A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a misdemeanor.
A violation of subsection (2) of this section is a gross misdemeanor.
In addition to the statutory penalties imposed, the court may order the
defendant to pay restitution for any damages or injuries resulting from
the offense.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.60.700 and 2013 c 278 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The refusal of a person to submit to a test of the alcohol
concentration, THC concentration, or presence of any drug in the
person's blood or breath is not admissible into evidence at a
subsequent criminal trial.
(2) A person's refusal to submit to a test or tests pursuant to RCW
79A.60.040(4)(a) constitutes a class 1 civil infraction under RCW
7.80.120.

--- END ---