BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes the need and
value of postsecondary educational support for children of both married
and divorced families. The legislature encourages all parents to
assist their children, both financially and emotionally, with their
postsecondary education. The legislature declares that the
determination of a child's best interest with regard to postsecondary
educational support shall be the sole and exclusive prerogative of that
child's parents and, further, that it is the inalienable right of
parents to structure the kind, amount, and timing of such support,
based upon the parents' singular and superior knowledge of their
child's individuality, in a way that maximizes the child's individual
potential. The legislature hereby expressly disapproves of the ruling
in Childers v. Childers, 89 Wn.2d 592 (1978), and cases that have
followed the ruling in Childers v. Childers, as contrary to sound
public policy with regard to postsecondary educational support.
(2) Therefore, the legislature finds that ordering divorced parents
to financially assist toward postsecondary education is unduly
burdensome and infringes on the right of the divorced parent to choose
the level of assistance they would otherwise provide if they remained
married.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 26.09 RCW
to read as follows:
A court may not order either or both parents to pay support for
postsecondary education of a child over eighteen years of age.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.09.170 and 2010 c 279 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 26.09.070(7), the
provisions of any decree respecting maintenance or support may be
modified: (a) Only as to installments accruing subsequent to the
petition for modification or motion for adjustment except motions to
compel court-ordered adjustments, which shall be effective as of the
first date specified in the decree for implementing the adjustment;
and, (b) except as otherwise provided in this section, only upon a
showing of a substantial change of circumstances. The provisions as to
property disposition may not be revoked or modified, unless the court
finds the existence of conditions that justify the reopening of a
judgment under the laws of this state.
(2) Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the
decree the obligation to pay future maintenance is terminated upon the
death of either party or the remarriage of the party receiving
maintenance or registration of a new domestic partnership of the party
receiving maintenance.
(3) Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the
decree, provisions for the support of a child are terminated by
emancipation of the child or by the death of the parent obligated to
support the child.
(4) Unless expressly provided by an order of the superior court or
a court of comparable jurisdiction, provisions for the support of a
child are terminated upon the marriage or registration of a domestic
partnership to each other of parties to a paternity order, or upon the
remarriage or registration of a domestic partnership to each other of
parties to a decree of dissolution. The remaining provisions of the
order, including provisions establishing paternity, remain in effect.
(5)(a) A party to an order of child support may petition for a
modification based upon a showing of substantially changed
circumstances at any time.
(b) An obligor's voluntary unemployment or voluntary
underemployment, by itself, is not a substantial change of
circumstances.
(6) An order of child support may be modified one year or more
after it has been entered without a showing of substantially changed
circumstances:
(a) If the order in practice works a severe economic hardship on
either party or the child;
(b) If a party requests an adjustment in an order for child support
which was based on guidelines which determined the amount of support
according to the child's age, and the child is no longer in the age
category on which the current support amount was based;
(c) If a child is still in high school, upon a finding that there
is a need to extend support beyond the eighteenth birthday to complete
high school; or
(d) To add an automatic adjustment of support provision consistent
with RCW 26.09.100.
(7)(a) If twenty-four months have passed from the date of the entry
of the order or the last adjustment or modification, whichever is
later, the order may be adjusted without a showing of substantially
changed circumstances based upon:
(i) Changes in the income of the parents; or
(ii) Changes in the economic table or standards in chapter 26.19
RCW.
(b) Either party may initiate the adjustment by filing a motion and
child support worksheets.
(c) If the court adjusts or modifies a child support obligation
pursuant to this subsection by more than thirty percent and the change
would cause significant hardship, the court may implement the change in
two equal increments, one at the time of the entry of the order and the
second six months from the entry of the order. Twenty-four months must
pass following the second change before a motion for another adjustment
under this subsection may be filed.
(8)(a) The department of social and health services may file an
action to modify or adjust an order of child support if public
assistance money is being paid to or for the benefit of the child and
the child support order is at least twenty-five percent above or below
the appropriate child support amount set forth in the standard
calculation as defined in RCW 26.19.011 and reasons for the deviation
are not set forth in the findings of fact or order.
(b) The department of social and health services may file an action
to modify or adjust an order of child support in a nonassistance case
if:
(i) The child support order is at least twenty-five percent above
or below the appropriate child support amount set forth in the standard
calculation as defined in RCW 26.19.011;
(ii) The department has determined the case meets the department's
review criteria; and
(iii) A party to the order or another state or jurisdiction has
requested a review.
(c) The determination of twenty-five percent or more shall be based
on the current income of the parties and the department shall not be
required to show a substantial change of circumstances if the reasons
for the deviations were not set forth in the findings of fact or order.
(9) The department of social and health services may file an action
to modify or adjust an order of child support under subsections (5)
through (7) of this section if:
(a) Public assistance money is being paid to or for the benefit of
the child;
(b) A party to the order in a nonassistance case has requested a
review; or
(c) Another state or jurisdiction has requested a modification of
the order.
(10) If testimony other than affidavit is required in any
proceeding under this section, a court of this state shall permit a
party or witness to be deposed or to testify under penalty of perjury
by telephone, audiovisual means, or other electronic means, unless good
cause is shown.
(11) After the effective date of this section, a party may petition
for modification of an existing order to pay postsecondary child
support ordered under RCW 26.19.090 without showing a substantial
change of circumstances.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.09.225 and 1991 sp.s. c 28 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each parent shall have full and equal access to the education
and health care records of the child absent a court order to the
contrary. Neither parent may veto the access requested by the other
parent.
(2) Educational records are limited to academic, attendance, and
disciplinary records of public and private schools in all grades
kindergarten through twelve and any form of alternative school for all
periods for which child support is paid or the child is the dependent
in fact of the parent requesting access to the records.
(3) Educational records of postsecondary educational institutions
are limited to enrollment and academic records necessary to determine,
establish, or continue support ordered pursuant to RCW 26.19.090 before
the effective date of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 26.19.035 and 2005 c 282 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application of the child support schedule. The child support
schedule shall be applied:
(a) In each county of the state;
(b) In judicial and administrative proceedings under this title or
Title 13 or 74 RCW;
(c) In all proceedings in which child support is determined or
modified;
(d) In setting temporary and permanent support;
(e) In automatic modification provisions or decrees entered
pursuant to RCW 26.09.100; and
(f)(i) In addition to proceedings in which child support is
determined for minors, to adult children who are dependent on their
parents and for whom support is ordered pursuant to RCW 26.09.100.
(ii) A court may not order either or both parents to pay support
for postsecondary education of a child over eighteen years of age.
(iii) The provisions of this chapter for determining child support
and reasons for deviation from the standard calculation shall be
applied in the same manner by the court, presiding officers, and
reviewing officers.
(iv) The child support schedule may not be utilized to order
postsecondary educational support of a child.
(2) Written findings of fact supported by the evidence. An order
for child support shall be supported by written findings of fact upon
which the support determination is based and shall include reasons for
any deviation from the standard calculation and reasons for denial of
a party's request for deviation from the standard calculation. The
court shall enter written findings of fact in all cases whether or not
the court: (a) Sets the support at the presumptive amount, for
combined monthly net incomes below five thousand dollars; (b) sets the
support at an advisory amount, for combined monthly net incomes between
five thousand and seven thousand dollars; or (c) deviates from the
presumptive or advisory amounts.
(3) Completion of worksheets. Worksheets in the form developed by
the administrative office of the courts shall be completed under
penalty of perjury and filed in every proceeding in which child support
is determined. The court shall not accept incomplete worksheets or
worksheets that vary from the worksheets developed by the
administrative office of the courts.
(4) Court review of the worksheets and order. The court shall
review the worksheets and the order setting support for the adequacy of
the reasons set forth for any deviation or denial of any request for
deviation and for the adequacy of the amount of support ordered. Each
order shall state the amount of child support calculated using the
standard calculation and the amount of child support actually ordered.
Worksheets shall be attached to the decree or order or if filed
separately shall be initialed or signed by the judge and filed with the
order.

Sec. 6 RCW 26.19.075 and 2009 c 84 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Reasons for deviation from the standard calculation include but
are not limited to the following:
(a) Sources of income and tax planning. The court may deviate from
the standard calculation after consideration of the following:
(i) Income of a new spouse or new domestic partner if the parent
who is married to the new spouse or in a partnership with a new
domestic partner is asking for a deviation based on any other reason.
Income of a new spouse or new domestic partner is not, by itself, a
sufficient reason for deviation;
(ii) Income of other adults in the household if the parent who is
living with the other adult is asking for a deviation based on any
other reason. Income of the other adults in the household is not, by
itself, a sufficient reason for deviation;
(iii) Child support actually received from other relationships;
(iv) Gifts;
(v) Prizes;
(vi) Possession of wealth, including but not limited to savings,
investments, real estate holdings and business interests, vehicles,
boats, pensions, bank accounts, insurance plans, or other assets;
(vii) Extraordinary income of a child;
(viii) Tax planning considerations. A deviation for tax planning
may be granted only if the child would not receive a lesser economic
benefit due to the tax planning; or
(ix) Income that has been excluded under RCW 26.19.071(4)(((h)))
(i) if the person earning that income asks for a deviation for any
other reason.
(b) Nonrecurring income. The court may deviate from the standard
calculation based on a finding that a particular source of income
included in the calculation of the basic support obligation is not a
recurring source of income. Depending on the circumstances,
nonrecurring income may include overtime, contract-related benefits,
bonuses, or income from second jobs. Deviations for nonrecurring
income shall be based on a review of the nonrecurring income received
in the previous two calendar years.
(c) Debt and high expenses. The court may deviate from the
standard calculation after consideration of the following expenses:
(i) Extraordinary debt not voluntarily incurred;
(ii) A significant disparity in the living costs of the parents due
to conditions beyond their control;
(iii) Special needs of disabled children;
(iv) Special medical, educational, or psychological needs of the
children. Special educational needs may not be construed to include
postsecondary education of a child; or
(v) Costs incurred or anticipated to be incurred by the parents in
compliance with court-ordered reunification efforts under chapter 13.34
RCW or under a voluntary placement agreement with an agency supervising
the child.
(d) Residential schedule. The court may deviate from the standard
calculation if the child spends a significant amount of time with the
parent who is obligated to make a support transfer payment. The court
may not deviate on that basis if the deviation will result in
insufficient funds in the household receiving the support to meet the
basic needs of the child or if the child is receiving temporary
assistance for needy families. When determining the amount of the
deviation, the court shall consider evidence concerning the increased
expenses to a parent making support transfer payments resulting from
the significant amount of time spent with that parent and shall
consider the decreased expenses, if any, to the party receiving the
support resulting from the significant amount of time the child spends
with the parent making the support transfer payment.
(e) Children from other relationships. The court may deviate from
the standard calculation when either or both of the parents before the
court have children from other relationships to whom the parent owes a
duty of support.
(i) The child support schedule shall be applied to the mother,
father, and children of the family before the court to determine the
presumptive amount of support.
(ii) Children from other relationships shall not be counted in the
number of children for purposes of determining the basic support
obligation and the standard calculation.
(iii) When considering a deviation from the standard calculation
for children from other relationships, the court may consider only
other children to whom the parent owes a duty of support. The court
may consider court-ordered payments of child support for children from
other relationships only to the extent that the support is actually
paid.
(iv) When the court has determined that either or both parents have
children from other relationships, deviations under this section shall
be based on consideration of the total circumstances of both
households. All child support obligations paid, received, and owed for
all children shall be disclosed and considered.
(2) All income and resources of the parties before the court, new
spouses or new domestic partners, and other adults in the households
shall be disclosed and considered as provided in this section. The
presumptive amount of support shall be determined according to the
child support schedule. Unless specific reasons for deviation are set
forth in the written findings of fact and are supported by the
evidence, the court shall order each parent to pay the amount of
support determined by using the standard calculation.
(3) The court shall enter findings that specify reasons for any
deviation or any denial of a party's request for any deviation from the
standard calculation made by the court. The court shall not consider
reasons for deviation until the court determines the standard
calculation for each parent.
(4) When reasons exist for deviation, the court shall exercise
discretion in considering the extent to which the factors would affect
the support obligation.
(5) Agreement of the parties is not by itself adequate reason for
any deviations from the standard calculation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RCW 26.19.090 (Standards for postsecondary
educational support awards) and 1991 sp.s. c 28 s 7 & 1990 1st ex.s. c
2 s 9 are each repealed.

--- END ---