BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08.580 and 2012 c 253 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An electronic benefit card issued to or on behalf of a person
receiving public assistance must contain a photo identification of the
person authorized to use the card. The department shall consider
utilizing the photographic databases of the department of licensing as
a cost-saving measure. The department shall work with the department
of licensing to access and cross-share facial recognition data and
resources for the purposes of identifying potential fraud. The
department shall report any case where there is reason to believe that
fraud has been committed to the attorney general, prosecutor's office,
or appropriate law enforcement entity.
(2) Any person receiving public assistance is prohibited from using
electronic benefit cards or cash obtained with electronic benefit
cards:
(a) For the purpose of participating in any of the activities
authorized under chapter 9.46 RCW;
(b) For the purpose of parimutuel wagering authorized under chapter
67.16 RCW;
(c) To purchase lottery tickets or shares authorized under chapter
67.70 RCW;
(d) For the purpose of participating in or purchasing any
activities located in a tattoo, body piercing, or body art shop
licensed under chapter 18.300 RCW;
(e) To purchase cigarettes as defined in RCW 82.24.010 or tobacco
products as defined in RCW 82.26.010;
(f) To purchase any items regulated under Title 66 RCW; or
(g) For the purpose of purchasing or participating in any
activities in any location listed in subsection (((2))) (3) of this
section.
(((2))) (3) On or before January 1, 2012, the businesses listed in
this subsection must disable the ability of ATM and point-of-sale
machines located on their business premises to accept the electronic
benefit card. The following businesses are required to comply with
this mandate:
(a) Taverns licensed under RCW 66.24.330;
(b) Beer/wine specialty stores licensed under RCW 66.24.371;
(c) Nightclubs licensed under RCW 66.24.600;
(d) Contract liquor stores defined under RCW 66.04.010;
(e) Bail bond agencies regulated under chapter 18.185 RCW;
(f) Gambling establishments licensed under chapter 9.46 RCW;
(g) Tattoo, body piercing, or body art shops regulated under
chapter 18.300 RCW;
(h) Adult entertainment venues with performances that contain
erotic material where minors under the age of eighteen are prohibited
under RCW 9.68A.150; and
(i) Any establishments where persons under the age of eighteen are
not permitted.
(((3))) (4) The department must notify the licensing authority of
any business listed in subsection (((2))) (3) of this section that such
business has continued to allow the use of the electronic benefit card
in violation of subsection (((2))) (3) of this section.
(((4))) (5) Only the recipient, an eligible member of the
household, or the recipient's authorized representative may use an
electronic benefit card or the benefit and such use shall only be for
the respective benefit program purposes. Unless a recipient's family
member is an eligible member of the household, the recipient's
authorized representative, an alternative cardholder, or has been
assigned as a protective payee, no family member may use the benefit
card. The recipient shall not sell, or attempt to sell, exchange, or
donate an electronic benefit card or any benefits to any other person
or entity.
(((5))) (6) The first violation of subsection (((1))) (2) of this
section by a recipient constitutes a class 4 civil infraction under RCW
7.80.120. Second and subsequent violations of subsection (((1))) (2)
of this section constitute a class 3 civil infraction under RCW
7.80.120.
(a) The department shall notify, in writing, all recipients of
electronic benefit cards that any violation of subsection (((1))) (2)
of this section could result in legal proceedings and forfeiture of all
cash public assistance.
(b) Whenever the department receives notice that a person has
violated subsection (((1))) (2) of this section, the department shall
notify the person in writing that the violation could result in legal
proceedings and forfeiture of all cash public assistance.
(c) The department shall assign a protective payee to the person
receiving public assistance who violates subsection (((1))) (2) of this
section two or more times.
(((6))) (7) In assigning a personal identification number to an
electronic benefit card, the department shall not routinely use any
sequence of numbers that appear on the card except in circumstances
resulting from in-state or national disasters. Personal identification
numbers assigned to electronic benefit cards issued to support the
distribution of benefits when there is a disaster may include a
sequence of numbers that appears on the card.

--- END ---