BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.502 and 2013 c 3 s 33 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of driving while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor, marijuana, or any drug if the person drives a
vehicle within this state:
(a) And the person has, within two hours after driving, an alcohol
concentration of 0.08 or higher as shown by analysis of the person's
breath or blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or
(b) The person has, within two hours after driving, a THC
concentration of 5.00 or higher as shown by analysis of the person's
blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or
(c) While the person is under the influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor, marijuana, or any drug; or
(d) While the person is under the combined influence of or affected
by intoxicating liquor, marijuana, and any drug.
(2) The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section
is or has been entitled to use a drug under the laws of this state
shall not constitute a defense against a charge of violating this
section.
(3)(a) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection
(1)(a) of this section, which the defendant must prove by a
preponderance of the evidence, that the defendant consumed a sufficient
quantity of alcohol after the time of driving and before the
administration of an analysis of the person's breath or blood to cause
the defendant's alcohol concentration to be 0.08 or more within two
hours after driving. The court shall not admit evidence of this
defense unless the defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the
omnibus or pretrial hearing in the case of the defendant's intent to
assert the affirmative defense.
(b) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection
(1)(b) of this section, which the defendant must prove by a
preponderance of the evidence, that the defendant consumed a sufficient
quantity of marijuana after the time of driving and before the
administration of an analysis of the person's blood to cause the
defendant's THC concentration to be 5.00 or more within two hours after
driving. The court shall not admit evidence of this defense unless the
defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial
hearing in the case of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative
defense.
(4)(a) Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two
hours after the alleged driving may be used as evidence that within two
hours of the alleged driving, a person had an alcohol concentration of
0.08 or more in violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, and in
any case in which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration above
0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was under the influence of
or affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug in violation of
subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section.
(b) Analyses of blood samples obtained more than two hours after
the alleged driving may be used as evidence that within two hours of
the alleged driving, a person had a THC concentration of 5.00 or more
in violation of subsection (1)(b) of this section, and in any case in
which the analysis shows a THC concentration above 0.00 may be used as
evidence that a person was under the influence of or affected by
marijuana in violation of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a
violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.
(6) It is a class ((C)) B felony punishable under chapter 9.94A
RCW, or chapter 13.40 RCW if the person is a juvenile, if:
(a) The person has four or more prior offenses within ten years as
defined in RCW 46.61.5055; or
(b) The person has ever previously been convicted of:
(i) Vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a);
(ii) Vehicular assault while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b);
(iii) An out-of-state offense comparable to the offense specified
in (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection; or
(iv) A violation of this subsection (6) or RCW 46.61.504(6).

--- END ---