BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the local
control over marijuana commerce act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Through its legalization of the production,
sale, and possession of marijuana, Initiative Measure No. 502 has
presented the state and local governments with a host of difficult and
troubling public policy questions and engendered concerns in many
communities that the ability of local governments to preserve public
health and safety has been compromised. Although the initiative was
passed by a majority of voters statewide, the simple truth is that the
initiative was unpopular in a great many cities, counties, and regions
of the state. Thus, while the passage of Initiative Measure No. 502
might be regarded as a desirable step by the voters in some areas, in
many communities the initiative is seen as a threat to the ability of
local governments to maintain public safety and protect the health of
their citizens.
Those opposed to increasing the presence of marijuana in their
communities pursuant to Initiative Measure No. 502 can find ample
support for their concerns in the available statistical evidence. Over
the last decade, there has been a notable upward trend in fatal
automobile accidents related to drug use. In 2007, more drivers tested
positive for drugs than for alcohol. Between 2009 and 2011, over forty
percent of young, male drivers involved in fatality automobile
accidents were found to be impaired by drug use. Sixteen and
seventeen-year old drivers are twice as likely to be impaired by drugs
than by alcohol, and the drug of choice is marijuana. And, in 2010,
the number of accidental deaths involving drugs exceeded those
involving alcohol.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to provide local
governments with a degree of self-determination regarding the
implementation of Initiative Measure No. 502 and thus grant them the
authority to prohibit the operation within their jurisdictional
boundaries of any business or facility involved in the production,
processing, or sale of marijuana.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW
to read as follows:
Through the enactment of an ordinance approved by the majority vote
of its governing body, a county, city, or town may prohibit, within its
jurisdictional boundaries, the siting or operation of any business or
facility engaged in the production, processing, and/or retail sale of
marijuana, products containing marijuana, or marijuana extracts.
Following the passage of such ordinance, the state liquor control board
shall not issue or renew any commercial marijuana license authorized
under RCW 69.50.325 with respect to businesses that are either located
or proposed to be located within the jurisdictional boundaries of a
county, city, or town that has enacted the prohibition authorized under
this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 69.50.325 and 2013 c 3 s 4 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a marijuana producer's license to produce
marijuana for sale at wholesale to marijuana processors and other
marijuana producers, regulated by the state liquor control board and
subject to annual renewal. The production, possession, delivery,
distribution, and sale of marijuana in accordance with the provisions
of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 and the rules adopted to implement and
enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana producer, shall not be a
criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana
producer's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall
specify the location at which the marijuana producer intends to
operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder
thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The
application fee for a marijuana producer's license shall be two hundred
fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana
producer's license shall be one thousand dollars. A separate license
shall be required for each location at which a marijuana producer
intends to produce marijuana.
(2) There shall be a marijuana processor's license to process,
package, and label useable marijuana and marijuana-infused products for
sale at wholesale to marijuana retailers, regulated by the state liquor
control board and subject to annual renewal. The processing,
packaging, possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana,
useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in accordance with
the provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 and the rules adopted to
implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana processor,
shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law.
Every marijuana processor's license shall be issued in the name of the
applicant, shall specify the location at which the licensee intends to
operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder
thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The
application fee for a marijuana processor's license shall be two
hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a
marijuana processor's license shall be one thousand dollars. A
separate license shall be required for each location at which a
marijuana processor intends to process marijuana.
(3) There shall be a marijuana retailer's license to sell useable
marijuana and marijuana-infused products at retail in retail outlets,
regulated by the state liquor control board and subject to annual
renewal. The possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of useable
marijuana and marijuana-infused products in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 and the rules adopted to
implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana retailer,
shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law.
Every marijuana retailer's license shall be issued in the name of the
applicant, shall specify the location of the retail outlet the licensee
intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and
the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license.
The application fee for a marijuana retailer's license shall be two
hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a
marijuana retailer's license shall be one thousand dollars. A separate
license shall be required for each location at which a marijuana
retailer intends to sell useable marijuana and marijuana-infused
products.
(4) The state liquor control board is prohibited from issuing or
renewing a commercial marijuana license, as authorized under this
section, for an applicant or existing licensee whose place of business
is located within the jurisdictional boundaries of any county, city, or
town that has enacted, pursuant to section 3 of this act, an ordinance
prohibiting the operation of any facility or business for the
production, processing, or retail sale of marijuana.

Sec. 5 RCW 69.50.331 and 2013 c 3 s 6 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of considering any application for a license to
produce, process, or sell marijuana, or for the renewal of a license to
produce, process, or sell marijuana, the state liquor control board may
cause an inspection of the premises to be made, and may inquire into
all matters in connection with the construction and operation of the
premises. For the purpose of reviewing any application for a license
and for considering the denial, suspension, revocation, or renewal or
denial thereof, of any license, the state liquor control board may
consider any prior criminal conduct of the applicant including an
administrative violation history record with the state liquor control
board and a criminal history record information check. The state
liquor control board may submit the criminal history record information
check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division
of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may
search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the
individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The state liquor
control board shall require fingerprinting of any applicant whose
criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal
bureau of investigation. The provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of chapter
9.96A RCW shall not apply to these cases. Subject to the provisions of
this section, the state liquor control board may, in its discretion,
grant or deny the renewal or license applied for. Denial may be based
on, without limitation, the existence of chronic illegal activity
documented in objections submitted pursuant to subsections (7)(c) and
(9) of this section. Authority to approve an uncontested or unopposed
license may be granted by the state liquor control board to any staff
member the board designates in writing. Conditions for granting this
authority shall be adopted by rule. No license of any kind may be
issued to:
(a) A person under the age of twenty-one years;
(b) A person doing business as a sole proprietor who has not
lawfully resided in the state for at least three months prior to
applying to receive a license;
(c) A partnership, employee cooperative, association, nonprofit
corporation, or corporation unless formed under the laws of this state,
and unless all of the members thereof are qualified to obtain a license
as provided in this section; ((or))
(d) A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager or
agent, unless the manager or agent possesses the same qualifications
required of the licensee; or
(e) A person whose existing or proposed place of business is in a
county, city, or town that has enacted an ordinance prohibiting the
operation or siting of any facility or business for the production,
processing, or retail sale of marijuana pursuant to section 3 of this
act.
(2)(a) The state liquor control board may, in its discretion,
subject to the provisions of RCW 69.50.334, suspend or cancel any
license; and all protections of the licensee from criminal or civil
sanctions under state law for producing, processing, or selling
marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products thereunder
shall be suspended or terminated, as the case may be.
(b) The state liquor control board shall immediately suspend the
license of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320
by the department of social and health services as a person who is not
in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to
meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension,
reissuance of the license shall be automatic upon the state liquor
control board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social
and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the
order.
(c) The state liquor control board may request the appointment of
administrative law judges under chapter 34.12 RCW who shall have power
to administer oaths, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses
and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and
testimony, examine witnesses, and to receive testimony in any inquiry,
investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, under
rules and regulations the state liquor control board may adopt.
(d) Witnesses shall be allowed fees and mileage each way to and
from any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding at the rate
authorized by RCW 34.05.446. Fees need not be paid in advance of
appearance of witnesses to testify or to produce books, records, or
other legal evidence.
(e) In case of disobedience of any person to comply with the order
of the state liquor control board or a subpoena issued by the state
liquor control board, or any of its members, or administrative law
judges, or on the refusal of a witness to testify to any matter
regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, the judge of
the superior court of the county in which the person resides, on
application of any member of the board or administrative law judge,
shall compel obedience by contempt proceedings, as in the case of
disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from said court
or a refusal to testify therein.
(3) Upon receipt of notice of the suspension or cancellation of a
license, the licensee shall forthwith deliver up the license to the
state liquor control board. Where the license has been suspended only,
the state liquor control board shall return the license to the licensee
at the expiration or termination of the period of suspension. The
state liquor control board shall notify all other licensees in the
county where the subject licensee has its premises of the suspension or
cancellation of the license; and no other licensee or employee of
another licensee may allow or cause any marijuana, useable marijuana,
or marijuana-infused products to be delivered to or for any person at
the premises of the subject licensee.
(4) Every license issued under chapter 3, Laws of 2013 shall be
subject to all conditions and restrictions imposed by chapter 3, Laws
of 2013 or by rules adopted by the state liquor control board to
implement and enforce chapter 3, Laws of 2013. All conditions and
restrictions imposed by the state liquor control board in the issuance
of an individual license shall be listed on the face of the individual
license along with the trade name, address, and expiration date.
(5) Every licensee shall post and keep posted its license, or
licenses, in a conspicuous place on the premises.
(6) No licensee shall employ any person under the age of twenty-one
years.
(7)(a) Before the state liquor control board issues a new or
renewed license to an applicant it shall give notice of the application
to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town, if the
application is for a license within an incorporated city or town, or to
the county legislative authority, if the application is for a license
outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns.
(b) The incorporated city or town through the official or employee
selected by it, or the county legislative authority or the official or
employee selected by it, shall have the right to file with the state
liquor control board within twenty days after the date of transmittal
of the notice for applications, or at least thirty days prior to the
expiration date for renewals, written objections against the applicant
or against the premises for which the new or renewed license is asked.
The state liquor control board may extend the time period for
submitting written objections.
(c) The written objections shall include a statement of all facts
upon which the objections are based, and in case written objections are
filed, the city or town or county legislative authority may request,
and the state liquor control board may in its discretion hold, a
hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If the
state liquor control board makes an initial decision to deny a license
or renewal based on the written objections of an incorporated city or
town or county legislative authority, the applicant may request a
hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If a
hearing is held at the request of the applicant, state liquor control
board representatives shall present and defend the state liquor control
board's initial decision to deny a license or renewal.
(d) Upon the granting of a license under this title the state
liquor control board shall send written notification to the chief
executive officer of the incorporated city or town in which the license
is granted, or to the county legislative authority if the license is
granted outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns.
(8) The state liquor control board shall not issue a license for
any premises within one thousand feet of the perimeter of the grounds
of any elementary or secondary school, playground, recreation center or
facility, child care center, public park, public transit center, or
library, or any game arcade admission to which is not restricted to
persons aged twenty-one years or older.
(9) In determining whether to grant or deny a license or renewal of
any license, the state liquor control board shall give substantial
weight to objections from an incorporated city or town or county
legislative authority based upon chronic illegal activity associated
with the applicant's operations of the premises proposed to be licensed
or the applicant's operation of any other licensed premises, or the
conduct of the applicant's patrons inside or outside the licensed
premises. "Chronic illegal activity" means (a) a pervasive pattern of
activity that threatens the public health, safety, and welfare of the
city, town, or county including, but not limited to, open container
violations, assaults, disturbances, disorderly conduct, or other
criminal law violations, or as documented in crime statistics, police
reports, emergency medical response data, calls for service, field
data, or similar records of a law enforcement agency for the city,
town, county, or any other municipal corporation or any state agency;
or (b) an unreasonably high number of citations for violations of RCW
46.61.502 associated with the applicant's or licensee's operation of
any licensed premises as indicated by the reported statements given to
law enforcement upon arrest.

Sec. 6 RCW 69.50.334 and 2013 c 3 s 7 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsection (5) of this section, the
action, order, or decision of the state liquor control board as to any
denial of an application for the reissuance of a license to produce,
process, or sell marijuana, or as to any revocation, suspension, or
modification of any license to produce, process, or sell marijuana,
shall be an adjudicative proceeding and subject to the applicable
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(((1))) (2) An opportunity for a hearing may be provided to an
applicant for the reissuance of a license prior to the disposition of
the application, and if no opportunity for a prior hearing is provided
then an opportunity for a hearing to reconsider the application must be
provided the applicant.
(((2))) (3) An opportunity for a hearing must be provided to a
licensee prior to a revocation or modification of any license and,
except as provided in subsection (((4))) (6) of this section, prior to
the suspension of any license.
(((3))) (4) No hearing shall be required until demanded by the
applicant or licensee.
(((4))) (5) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section
authorizing an adjudicative proceeding do not apply if the licensee's
business is located in a jurisdiction that has enacted an ordinance,
pursuant to section 3 of this act, prohibiting the siting or operation
of any business or facility for the production, processing, or retail
sale of marijuana.
(6) The state liquor control board may summarily suspend a license
for a period of up to one hundred eighty days without a prior hearing
if it finds that public health, safety, or welfare imperatively require
emergency action, and it incorporates a finding to that effect in its
order. Proceedings for revocation or other action must be promptly
instituted and determined. An administrative law judge may extend the
summary suspension period for up to one calendar year from the first
day of the initial summary suspension in the event the proceedings for
revocation or other action cannot be completed during the initial one
hundred eighty-day period due to actions by the licensee. The state
liquor control board's enforcement division shall complete a
preliminary staff investigation of the violation before requesting an
emergency suspension by the state liquor control board.

Sec. 7 RCW 69.50.354 and 2013 c 3 s 13 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
Subject to the restrictions set forth in section 3 of this act and
RCW 69.50.331, there may be licensed, in no greater number in each of
the counties of the state than as the state liquor control board shall
deem advisable, retail outlets established for the purpose of making
useable marijuana and marijuana-infused products available for sale to
adults aged twenty-one and over. Retail sale of useable marijuana and
marijuana-infused products in accordance with the provisions of chapter
3, Laws of 2013 and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by
a validly licensed marijuana retailer or retail outlet employee, shall
not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---