BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 69.51A RCW
to read as follows:
A qualifying patient or designated provider who grows or provides
cannabis or cannabis products for the medical use of marijuana in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter must obtain a permit
from the city, town, or county in order to grow or provide medical
marijuana in the city, town, or county. In order to obtain a permit,
the applicant must provide the city, town, or county with the name of
the applicant, the address where the medical marijuana is grown, the
number of marijuana plants grown at the address, and a copy of the
applicant's valid documentation or a copy of the qualifying patient's
valid documentation to whom the medical marijuana is provided. The
city, town, or county may impose a maximum fee of twenty-five dollars
for the permit. A qualifying patient or designated provider who has
obtained a permit must notify the city, town, or county within five
business days of any change in the required information provided for
the original permit.

--- END ---