BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.41.113 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 430 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The office of financial management shall direct and supervise
the personnel policy and application of the civil service laws, chapter
41.06 RCW.
(2) ((The human resources director is created in the office of
financial management. The human resources director shall be appointed
by the governor, and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The
director shall receive a salary in an amount fixed by the governor.
(3))) The ((human resources)) director of the office of financial
management or the director's designee has the authority and shall
perform the functions as prescribed in chapter 41.06 RCW, or as
otherwise prescribed by law.
(((4))) (3) The ((human resources)) director may delegate to any
agency the authority to perform administrative and technical personnel
activities if the agency requests such authority and the ((human
resources)) director is satisfied that the agency has the personnel
management capabilities to effectively perform the delegated
activities. The ((human resources)) director shall prescribe standards
and guidelines for the performance of delegated activities. If the
((human resources)) director determines that an agency is not
performing delegated activities within the prescribed standards and
guidelines, the director shall withdraw the authority from the agency
to perform such activities.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.04.340 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 432 and 2011 1st
sp.s. c 39 s 12 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) An attendance incentive program is established for all eligible
employees. As used in this section the term "eligible employee" means
any employee of the state, other than eligible employees of the
community and technical colleges and the state board for community and
technical colleges identified in RCW 28B.50.553, and teaching and
research faculty at the state and regional universities and The
Evergreen State College, entitled to accumulate sick leave and for whom
accurate sick leave records have been maintained. No employee may
receive compensation under this section for any portion of sick leave
accumulated at a rate in excess of one day per month. The state and
regional universities and The Evergreen State College shall maintain
complete and accurate sick leave records for all teaching and research
faculty.
(2) In January of the year following any year in which a minimum of
sixty days of sick leave is accrued, and each January thereafter, any
eligible employee may receive remuneration for unused sick leave
accumulated in the previous year at a rate equal to one day's monetary
compensation of the employee for each four full days of accrued sick
leave in excess of sixty days. Sick leave for which compensation has
been received shall be deducted from accrued sick leave at the rate of
four days for every one day's monetary compensation.
From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, the rate of monetary
compensation for the purposes of this subsection shall not be reduced
by any temporary salary reduction.
(3) At the time of separation from state service due to retirement
or death, an eligible employee or the employee's estate may elect to
receive remuneration at a rate equal to one day's current monetary
compensation of the employee for each four full days of accrued sick
leave. From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, the rate of monetary
compensation for the purposes of this subsection shall not be reduced
by any temporary salary reduction.
(4) Remuneration or benefits received under this section shall not
be included for the purpose of computing a retirement allowance under
any public retirement system in this state.
(5) Except as provided in subsections (7) through (9) of this
section for employees not covered by chapter 41.06 RCW, this section
shall be administered, and rules shall be adopted to carry out its
purposes, by the ((human resources)) director of the office of
financial management for persons subject to chapter 41.06 RCW((:
PROVIDED, That determination of classes of eligible employees shall be
subject to approval by the office of financial management)).
(6) Should the legislature revoke any remuneration or benefits
granted under this section, no affected employee shall be entitled
thereafter to receive such benefits as a matter of contractual right.
(7) In lieu of remuneration for unused sick leave at retirement as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, an agency head or designee
may with equivalent funds, provide eligible employees with a benefit
plan that provides for reimbursement for medical expenses. This plan
shall be implemented only after consultation with affected groups of
employees. For eligible employees covered by chapter 41.06 RCW,
procedures for the implementation of these plans shall be adopted by
the ((human resources)) director of the state health care authority.
For eligible employees exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, ((and classified
employees who have opted out of coverage of chapter 41.06 RCW as
provided in RCW 41.56.201,)) implementation procedures shall be adopted
by an agency head having jurisdiction over the employees.
(8) Implementing procedures adopted by the ((human resources))
director of the state health care authority or agency heads shall
require that each medical expense plan authorized by subsection (7) of
this section apply to all eligible employees in any one of the
following groups: (a) Employees in an agency; (b) employees in a major
organizational subdivision of an agency; (c) employees at a major
operating location of an agency; (d) exempt employees under the
jurisdiction of an elected or appointed Washington state executive; (e)
employees of the Washington state senate; (f) employees of the
Washington state house of representatives; (g) classified employees in
a bargaining unit established by the ((director of personnel)) public
employment relations commission; or (h) other group of employees
defined by an agency head that is not designed to provide an
individual-employee choice regarding participation in a medical expense
plan. However, medical expense plans for eligible employees in any of
the groups under (a) through (h) of this subsection who are covered by
a collective bargaining agreement shall be implemented only by written
agreement with the bargaining unit's exclusive representative and a
separate medical expense plan may be provided for unrepresented
employees.
(9) Medical expense plans authorized by subsection (7) of this
section must require as a condition of participation in the plan that
employees in the group affected by the plan sign an agreement with the
employer. The agreement must include a provision to hold the employer
harmless should the United States government find that the employer or
the employee is in debt to the United States as a result of the
employee not paying income taxes due on the equivalent funds placed
into the plan, or as a result of the employer not withholding or
deducting a tax, assessment, or other payment on the funds as required
by federal law. The agreement must also include a provision that
requires an eligible employee to forfeit remuneration under subsection
(3) of this section if the employee belongs to a group that has been
designated to participate in the medical expense plan permitted under
this section and the employee refuses to execute the required
agreement.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.345.060 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 467 are each
amended to read as follows:
The association shall contract with ((the human resources director
in)) the office of financial management to audit in odd-numbered years
the association's staff classifications and employees' salaries. The
association shall give copies of the audit reports to the office of
financial management and the committees of each house of the
legislature dealing with common schools.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.80.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 § 972 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the matters
subject to bargaining include wages, hours, and other terms and
conditions of employment, and the negotiation of any question arising
under a collective bargaining agreement.
(2) The employer is not required to bargain over matters pertaining
to:
(a) Health care benefits or other employee insurance benefits,
except as required in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Any retirement system or retirement benefit; or
(c) Rules of the ((human resources)) director of the office of
financial management, the director of enterprise services, or the
Washington personnel resources board adopted under RCW 41.06.157.
(3) Matters subject to bargaining include the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits. However,
except as provided otherwise in this subsection for institutions of
higher education, negotiations regarding the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits shall be
conducted between the employer and one coalition of all the exclusive
bargaining representatives subject to this chapter. The exclusive
bargaining representatives for employees that are subject to chapter
47.64 RCW shall bargain the dollar amount expended on behalf of each
employee for health care benefits with the employer as part of the
coalition under this subsection. Any such provision agreed to by the
employer and the coalition shall be included in all master collective
bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties. For institutions of
higher education, promotional preferences and the number of names to be
certified for vacancies shall be bargained under the provisions of RCW
41.80.010(4). For agreements covering the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium,
any agreement between the employer and the coalition regarding the
dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee for health care
benefits is a separate agreement and shall not be included in the
master collective bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties.
(4) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not agree to any proposal that would prevent the implementation of
approved affirmative action plans or that would be inconsistent with
the comparable worth agreement that provided the basis for the salary
changes implemented beginning with the 1983-1985 biennium to achieve
comparable worth.
(5) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not bargain over matters pertaining to management rights established in
RCW 41.80.040.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a conflict
exists between an executive order, administrative rule, or agency
policy relating to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment
and a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter,
the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A provision of a
collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the terms of a
statute is invalid and unenforceable.
(7) This section does not prohibit bargaining that affects
contracts authorized by RCW 41.06.142.

Sec. 5 RCW 49.74.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 463 are each
amended to read as follows:
If the commission reasonably believes that a state agency, an
institution of higher education, or the state patrol has failed to
comply with an affirmative action rule adopted under RCW 41.06.150 or
43.43.340, the commission shall notify the director of the state
agency, president of the institution of higher education, or chief of
the Washington state patrol of the noncompliance, as well as the
((human resources)) director of the office of financial management.
The commission shall give the director of the state agency, president
of the institution of higher education, or chief of the Washington
state patrol an opportunity to be heard on the failure to comply.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.37.060 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 460 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) When the commissioner determines that other market conduct
actions identified in RCW 48.37.040(4)(a) have not sufficiently
addressed issues raised concerning company activities in Washington
state, the commissioner has the discretion to conduct market conduct
examinations in accordance with the NAIC market conduct uniform
examination procedures and the NAIC market regulation handbook.
(2)(a) In lieu of an examination of an insurer licensed in this
state, the commissioner shall accept an examination report of another
state, unless the commissioner determines that the other state does not
have laws substantially similar to those of this state, or does not
have a market oversight system that is comparable to the market conduct
oversight system set forth in this law.
(b) The commissioner's determination under (a) of this subsection
is discretionary with the commissioner and is not subject to appeal.
(c) If the insurer to be examined is part of an insurance holding
company system, the commissioner may also seek to simultaneously
examine any affiliates of the insurer under common control and
management which are licensed to write the same lines of business in
this state.
(3) Before commencement of a market conduct examination, market
conduct oversight personnel shall prepare a work plan consisting of the
following:
(a) The name and address of the insurer being examined;
(b) The name and contact information of the examiner-in-charge;
(c) The name of all market conduct oversight personnel initially
assigned to the market conduct examination;
(d) The justification for the examination;
(e) The scope of the examination;
(f) The date the examination is scheduled to begin;
(g) Notice of any noninsurance department personnel who will assist
in the examination;
(h) A time estimate for the examination;
(i) A budget for the examination if the cost of the examination is
billed to the insurer; and
(j) An identification of factors that will be included in the
billing if the cost of the examination is billed to the insurer.
(4)(a) Within ten days of the receipt of the information contained
in subsection (3) of this section, insurers may request the
commissioner's discretionary review of any alleged conflict of
interest, pursuant to RCW 48.37.090(2), of market conduct oversight
personnel and noninsurance department personnel assigned to a market
conduct examination. The request for review shall specifically
describe the alleged conflict of interest in the proposed assignment of
any person to the examination.
(b) Within five business days of receiving a request for
discretionary review of any alleged conflict of interest in the
proposed assignment of any person to a market conduct examination, the
commissioner or designee shall notify the insurer of any action
regarding the assignment of personnel to a market conduct examination
based on the insurer's allegation of conflict of interest.
(5) Market conduct examinations shall, to the extent feasible, use
desk examinations and data requests before an on-site examination.
(6) Market conduct examinations shall be conducted in accordance
with the provisions set forth in the NAIC market regulation handbook
and the NAIC market conduct uniform examinations procedures, subject to
the precedence of the provisions of chapter 82, Laws of 2007.
(7) The commissioner shall use the NAIC standard data request.
(8) Announcement of the examination shall be sent to the insurer
and posted on the NAIC's examination tracking system as soon as
possible but in no case later than sixty days before the estimated
commencement of the examination, except where the examination is
conducted in response to extraordinary circumstances as described in
RCW 48.37.050(2)(a). The announcement sent to the insurer shall
contain the examination work plan and a request for the insurer to name
its examination coordinator.
(9) If an examination is expanded significantly beyond the original
reasons provided to the insurer in the notice of the examination
required by subsection (3) of this section, the commissioner shall
provide written notice to the insurer, explaining the expansion and
reasons for the expansion. The commissioner shall provide a revised
work plan if the expansion results in significant changes to the items
presented in the original work plan required by subsection (3) of this
section.
(10) The commissioner shall conduct a preexamination conference
with the insurer examination coordinator and key personnel to clarify
expectations at least thirty days before commencement of the
examination, unless otherwise agreed by the insurer and the
commissioner.
(11) Before the conclusion of the field work for market conduct
examination, the examiner-in-charge shall review examination findings
to date with insurer personnel and schedule an exit conference with the
insurer, in accordance with procedures in the NAIC market regulation
handbook.
(12)(a) No later than sixty days after completion of each market
conduct examination, the commissioner shall make a full written report
of each market conduct examination containing only facts ascertained
from the accounts, records, and documents examined and from the sworn
testimony of individuals, and such conclusions and recommendations as
may reasonably be warranted from such facts.
(b) The report shall be certified by the commissioner or by the
examiner-in-charge of the examination, and shall be filed in the
commissioner's office subject to (c) of this subsection.
(c) The commissioner shall furnish a copy of the market conduct
examination report to the person examined not less than ten days and,
unless the time is extended by the commissioner, not more than thirty
days prior to the filing of the report for public inspection in the
commissioner's office. If the person so requests in writing within
such period, the commissioner shall hold a hearing to consider
objections of such person to the report as proposed, and shall not so
file the report until after such hearing and until after any
modifications in the report deemed necessary by the commissioner have
been made.
(d) Within thirty days of the end of the period described in (c) of
this subsection, unless extended by order of the commissioner, the
commissioner shall consider the report, together with any written
submissions or rebuttals and any relevant portions of the examiner's
work papers and enter an order:
(i) Adopting the market conduct examination report as filed or with
modification or corrections. If the market conduct examination report
reveals that the company is operating in violation of any law, rule, or
order of the commissioner, the commissioner may order the company to
take any action the commissioner considers necessary and appropriate to
cure that violation;
(ii) Rejecting the market conduct examination report with
directions to the examiners to reopen the examination for purposes of
obtaining additional data, documentation, or information, and refiling
under this subsection; or
(iii) Calling for an investigatory hearing with no less than twenty
days' notice to the company for purposes of obtaining additional
documentation, data, information, and testimony.
(e) All orders entered under (d) of this subsection must be
accompanied by findings and conclusions resulting from the
commissioner's consideration and review of the market conduct
examination report, relevant examiner work papers, and any written
submissions or rebuttals. The order is considered a final
administrative decision and may be appealed under the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and must be served upon the company
by certified mail or certifiable electronic means, together with a copy
of the adopted examination report. A copy of the adopted examination
report must be sent by certified mail or certifiable electronic means
to each director at the director's residential address or to a personal
e-mail account.
(f)(i) Upon the adoption of the market conduct examination report
under (d) of this subsection, the commissioner shall continue to hold
the content of the examination report as private and confidential
information for a period of five days except that the order may be
disclosed to the person examined. Thereafter, the commissioner may
open the report for public inspection so long as no court of competent
jurisdiction has stayed its publication.
(ii) If the commissioner determines that regulatory action is
appropriate as a result of any market conduct examination, he or she
may initiate any proceedings or actions as provided by law.
(iii) Nothing contained in this subsection requires the
commissioner to disclose any information or records that would indicate
or show the existence or content of any investigation or activity of a
criminal justice agency.
(g) The insurer's response shall be included in the commissioner's
order adopting the final report as an exhibit to the order. The
insurer is not obligated to submit a response.
(13) The commissioner may withhold from public inspection any
examination or investigation report for so long as he or she deems it
advisable.
(14)(a) Market conduct examinations within this state of any
insurer domiciled or having its home offices in this state, other than
a title insurer, made by the commissioner or the commissioner's
examiners and employees shall, except as to fees, mileage, and expense
incurred as to witnesses, be at the expense of the state.
(b) Every other examination, whatsoever, or any part of the market
conduct examination of any person domiciled or having its home offices
in this state requiring travel and services outside this state, shall
be made by the commissioner or by examiners designated by the
commissioner and shall be at the expense of the person examined; but a
domestic insurer shall not be liable for the compensation of examiners
employed by the commissioner for such services outside this state.
(c) When making a market conduct examination under this chapter,
the commissioner may contract, in accordance with applicable state
contracting procedures, for qualified attorneys, appraisers,
independent certified public accountants, contract actuaries, and other
similar individuals who are independently practicing their professions,
even though those persons may from time to time be similarly employed
or retained by persons subject to examination under this chapter, as
examiners as the commissioner deems necessary for the efficient conduct
of a particular examination. The compensation and per diem allowances
paid to such contract persons shall be reasonable in the market and
time incurred, shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the
compensation and per diem allowances for examiners set forth in the
guidelines adopted by the national association of insurance
commissioners, unless the commissioner demonstrates that one hundred
twenty-five percent is inadequate under the circumstances of the
examination, and subject to the provisions of (a) of this subsection.
(d)(i) The person examined and liable shall reimburse the state
upon presentation of an itemized statement thereof, for the actual
travel expenses of the commissioner's examiners, their reasonable
living expenses allowance, and their per diem compensation, including
salary and the employer's cost of employee benefits, at a reasonable
rate approved by the commissioner, incurred on account of the
examination. Per diem, salary, and expenses for employees examining
insurers domiciled outside the state of Washington shall be established
by the commissioner on the basis of the national association of
insurance commissioner's recommended salary and expense schedule for
zone examiners, or the salary schedule ((established by the human
resources director)) and the expense schedule established by the office
of financial management, whichever is higher. A domestic title insurer
shall pay the examination expense and costs to the commissioner as
itemized and billed by the commissioner.
(ii) The commissioner or the commissioner's examiners shall not
receive or accept any additional emolument on account of any
examination.
(iii) Market conduct examination fees subject to being reimbursed
by an insurer shall be itemized and bills shall be provided to the
insurer on a monthly basis for review prior to submission for payment,
or as otherwise provided by state law.
(e) Nothing contained in this chapter limits the commissioner's
authority to terminate or suspend any examination in order to pursue
other legal or regulatory action under the insurance laws of this
state. Findings of fact and conclusions made pursuant to any
examination are prima facie evidence in any legal or regulatory action.
(f) The commissioner shall maintain active management and oversight
of market conduct examination costs, including costs associated with
the commissioner's own examiners, and with retaining qualified contract
examiners necessary to perform an examination. Any agreement with a
contract examiner shall:
(i) Clearly identify the types of functions to be subject to
outsourcing;
(ii) Provide specific timelines for completion of the outsourced
review;
(iii) Require disclosure to the insurer of contract examiners'
recommendations;
(iv) Establish and use a dispute resolution or arbitration
mechanism to resolve conflicts with insurers regarding examination
fees; and
(v) Require disclosure of the terms of the contracts with the
outside consultants that will be used, specifically the fees and/or
hourly rates that can be charged.
(g) The commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, shall review
and affirmatively endorse detailed billings from the qualified contract
examiner before the detailed billings are sent to the insurer.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.131.090 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 459 are each
amended to read as follows:
Unless the legislature specifies a shorter period of time, a
terminated entity shall continue in existence until June 30th of the
next succeeding year for the purpose of concluding its affairs:
PROVIDED, That the powers and authority of the entity shall not be
reduced or otherwise limited during this period. Unless otherwise
provided:
(1) All employees of terminated entities classified under chapter
41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, shall be transferred as
appropriate or as otherwise provided in the procedures adopted by the
((human resources)) director of the office of financial management
pursuant to RCW 41.06.150;
(2) All documents and papers, equipment, or other tangible property
in the possession of the terminated entity shall be delivered to the
custody of the entity assuming the responsibilities of the terminated
entity or if such responsibilities have been eliminated, documents and
papers shall be delivered to the state archivist and equipment or other
tangible property to the department of enterprise services;
(3) All funds held by, or other moneys due to, the terminated
entity shall revert to the fund from which they were appropriated, or
if that fund is abolished to the general fund;
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 34.05.020, all rules made
by a terminated entity shall be repealed, without further action by the
entity, at the end of the period provided in this section, unless
assumed and reaffirmed by the entity assuming the related legal
responsibilities of the terminated entity;
(5) All contractual rights and duties of an entity shall be
assigned or delegated to the entity assuming the responsibilities of
the terminated entity, or if there is none to such entity as the
governor shall direct.

Sec. 8 RCW 42.17A.705 and 2012 c 229 s 582 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17A.700, "executive state officer"
includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the director of the department of services for the blind,
the chief information officer of the office of chief information
officer, the director of the state system of community and technical
colleges, the director of commerce, the director of the consolidated
technology services agency, the secretary of corrections, the director
of early learning, the director of ecology, the commissioner of
employment security, the chair of the energy facility site evaluation
council, the director of enterprise services, the secretary of the
state finance committee, the director of financial management, the
director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest
practices appeals board, the director of the gambling commission, the
secretary of health, the administrator of the Washington state health
care authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission,
((the human resources director,)) the executive secretary of the human
rights commission, the executive secretary of the indeterminate
sentence review board, the executive director of the state investment
board, the director of labor and industries, the director of licensing,
the director of the lottery commission, the director of the office of
minority and women's business enterprises, the director of parks and
recreation, the executive director of the public disclosure commission,
the executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, the director of
the recreation and conservation office, the director of retirement
systems, the director of revenue, the secretary of social and health
services, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive
secretary of the board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation,
the secretary of the utilities and transportation commission, the
director of veterans affairs, the president of each of the regional and
state universities and the president of The Evergreen State College,
and each district and each campus president of each state community
college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, Eastern Washington
University board of trustees, Washington economic development finance
authority, Washington energy northwest executive board, The Evergreen
State College board of trustees, executive ethics board, fish and
wildlife commission, forest practices appeals board, forest practices
board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities
authority, student achievement council, higher education facilities
authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance commission,
human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review board, board of
industrial insurance appeals, state investment board, commission on
judicial conduct, legislative ethics board, life sciences discovery
fund authority board of trustees, liquor control board, lottery
commission, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council, parks and recreation commission, Washington personnel
resources board, board of pilotage commissioners, pollution control
hearings board, public disclosure commission, public employees'
benefits board, recreation and conservation funding board, salmon
recovery funding board, shorelines hearings board, board of tax
appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington board of
regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington State
University board of regents, and Western Washington University board of
trustees.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.06.167 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 413 are each
amended to read as follows:
The ((human resources)) director of the office of financial
management shall undertake comprehensive compensation surveys for
officers and entry-level officer candidates of the Washington state
patrol, with such surveys to be conducted in the year prior to the
convening of every other one hundred five day regular session of the
state legislature. Salary and fringe benefit survey information
collected from private employers which identifies a specific employer
with the salary and fringe benefit rates which that employer pays to
its employees shall not be subject to public disclosure under chapter
42.56 RCW.

Sec. 10 RCW 41.06.157 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 411 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) To promote the most effective use of the state's workforce and
improve the effectiveness and efficiency of the delivery of services to
the citizens of the state, the director shall adopt and maintain a
comprehensive classification plan for all positions in the classified
service. The classification plan must:
(a) Be simple and streamlined;
(b) Support state agencies in responding to changing technologies,
economic and social conditions, and the needs of its citizens;
(c) Value workplace diversity;
(d) Facilitate the reorganization and decentralization of
governmental services;
(e) Enhance mobility and career advancement opportunities; and
(f) Consider rates in other public employment and private
employment in the state.
(2) An appointing authority and an employee organization
representing classified employees of the appointing authority for
collective bargaining purposes may jointly request the ((human
resources)) director of the office of financial management to initiate
a classification study.
(3) For institutions of higher education and related boards, the
director may adopt special salary ranges to be competitive with
positions of a similar nature in the state or the locality in which the
institution of higher education or related board is located.
(4) The director may undertake salary surveys of positions in other
public and private employment to establish market rates. Any salary
survey information collected from private employers which identifies a
specific employer with salary rates which the employer pays to its
employees shall not be subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.56
RCW.

Sec. 11 RCW 41.06.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 401 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the words used in
this chapter have the meaning given in this section.
(1) "Affirmative action" means a procedure by which racial
minorities, women, persons in the protected age category, persons with
disabilities, Vietnam-era veterans, and disabled veterans are provided
with increased employment opportunities. It shall not mean any sort of
quota system.
(2) "Agency" means an office, department, board, commission, or
other separate unit or division, however designated, of the state
government and all personnel thereof; it includes any unit of state
government established by law, the executive officer or members of
which are either elected or appointed, upon which the statutes confer
powers and impose duties in connection with operations of either a
governmental or proprietary nature.
(3) "Board" means the Washington personnel resources board
established under the provisions of RCW 41.06.110, except that this
definition does not apply to the words "board" or "boards" when used in
RCW 41.06.070.
(4) "Career development" means the progressive development of
employee capabilities to facilitate productivity, job satisfaction, and
upward mobility through work assignments as well as education and
training that are both state-sponsored and are achieved by individual
employee efforts, all of which shall be consistent with the needs and
obligations of the state and its agencies.
(5) "Classified service" means all positions in the state service
subject to the provisions of this chapter.
(6) "Comparable worth" means the provision of similar salaries for
positions that require or impose similar responsibilities, judgments,
knowledge, skills, and working conditions.
(7) "Competitive service" means all positions in the classified
service for which a competitive examination is required as a condition
precedent to appointment.
(8) "Department" means an agency of government that has as its
governing officer a person, or combination of persons such as a
commission, board, or council, by law empowered to operate the agency
responsible either to (a) no other public officer or (b) the governor.
(9) "Director" means the ((human resources)) director ((within)) of
the office of financial management ((and appointed under RCW
43.41.113)) or the director's designee.
(10) "Institutions of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.
(11) "Noncompetitive service" means all positions in the classified
service for which a competitive examination is not required.
(12) "Related boards" means the state board for community and
technical colleges; and such other boards, councils, and commissions
related to higher education as may be established.
(13) "Training" means activities designed to develop job-related
knowledge and skills of employees.

Sec. 12 RCW 41.04.665 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 435 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) An agency head may permit an employee to receive leave under
this section if:
(a)(i) The employee suffers from, or has a relative or household
member suffering from, an illness, injury, impairment, or physical or
mental condition which is of an extraordinary or severe nature;
(ii) The employee has been called to service in the uniformed
services;
(iii) A state of emergency has been declared anywhere within the
United States by the federal or any state government and the employee
has needed skills to assist in responding to the emergency or its
aftermath and volunteers his or her services to either a governmental
agency or to a nonprofit organization engaged in humanitarian relief in
the devastated area, and the governmental agency or nonprofit
organization accepts the employee's offer of volunteer services; or
(iv) The employee is a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault,
or stalking; ((or
(v) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium only, the employee is
eligible to use leave in lieu of temporary layoff under section 3(5),
chapter 32, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.;))
(b) The illness, injury, impairment, condition, call to service,
emergency volunteer service, or consequence of domestic violence,
sexual assault, temporary layoff under section 3(5), chapter 32, Laws
of 2010 1st sp. sess., or stalking has caused, or is likely to cause,
the employee to:
(i) Go on leave without pay status; or
(ii) Terminate state employment;
(c) The employee's absence and the use of shared leave are
justified;
(d) The employee has depleted or will shortly deplete his or her:
(i) Annual leave and sick leave reserves if he or she qualifies
under (a)(i) of this subsection;
(ii) Annual leave and paid military leave allowed under RCW
38.40.060 if he or she qualifies under (a)(ii) of this subsection; or
(iii) Annual leave if he or she qualifies under (a)(iii)((,)) or
(iv)((, or (v))) of this subsection;
(e) The employee has abided by agency rules regarding:
(i) Sick leave use if he or she qualifies under (a)(i) or (iv) of
this subsection; or
(ii) Military leave if he or she qualifies under (a)(ii) of this
subsection; and
(f) The employee has diligently pursued and been found to be
ineligible for benefits under chapter 51.32 RCW if he or she qualifies
under (a)(i) of this subsection.
(2) The agency head shall determine the amount of leave, if any,
which an employee may receive under this section. However, an employee
shall not receive a total of more than five hundred twenty-two days of
leave, except that, a supervisor may authorize leave in excess of five
hundred twenty-two days in extraordinary circumstances for an employee
qualifying for the shared leave program because he or she is suffering
from an illness, injury, impairment, or physical or mental condition
which is of an extraordinary or severe nature. Shared leave received
under the uniformed service shared leave pool in RCW 41.04.685 is not
included in this total.
(3) An employee may transfer annual leave, sick leave, and his or
her personal holiday, as follows:
(a) An employee who has an accrued annual leave balance of more
than ten days may request that the head of the agency for which the
employee works transfer a specified amount of annual leave to another
employee authorized to receive leave under subsection (1) of this
section. In no event may the employee request a transfer of an amount
of leave that would result in his or her annual leave account going
below ten days. For purposes of this subsection (3)(a), annual leave
does not accrue if the employee receives compensation in lieu of
accumulating a balance of annual leave.
(b) An employee may transfer a specified amount of sick leave to an
employee requesting shared leave only when the donating employee
retains a minimum of one hundred seventy-six hours of sick leave after
the transfer.
(c) An employee may transfer, under the provisions of this section
relating to the transfer of leave, all or part of his or her personal
holiday, as that term is defined under RCW 1.16.050, or as such
holidays are provided to employees by agreement with a school
district's board of directors if the leave transferred under this
subsection does not exceed the amount of time provided for personal
holidays under RCW 1.16.050.
(4) An employee of an institution of higher education under RCW
28B.10.016, school district, or educational service district who does
not accrue annual leave but does accrue sick leave and who has an
accrued sick leave balance of more than twenty-two days may request
that the head of the agency for which the employee works transfer a
specified amount of sick leave to another employee authorized to
receive leave under subsection (1) of this section. In no event may
such an employee request a transfer that would result in his or her
sick leave account going below twenty-two days. Transfers of sick
leave under this subsection are limited to transfers from employees who
do not accrue annual leave. Under this subsection, "sick leave" also
includes leave accrued pursuant to RCW 28A.400.300(((2))) (1)(b) or
28A.310.240(1) with compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies.
(5) Transfers of leave made by an agency head under subsections (3)
and (4) of this section shall not exceed the requested amount.
(6) Leave transferred under this section may be transferred from
employees of one agency to an employee of the same agency or, with the
approval of the heads of both agencies, to an employee of another state
agency.
(7) While an employee is on leave transferred under this section,
he or she shall continue to be classified as a state employee and shall
receive the same treatment in respect to salary, wages, and employee
benefits as the employee would normally receive if using accrued annual
leave or sick leave.
(a) All salary and wage payments made to employees while on leave
transferred under this section shall be made by the agency employing
the person receiving the leave. The value of leave transferred shall
be based upon the leave value of the person receiving the leave.
(b) In the case of leave transferred by an employee of one agency
to an employee of another agency, the agencies involved shall arrange
for the transfer of funds and credit for the appropriate value of
leave.
(i) Pursuant to rules adopted by the office of financial
management, funds shall not be transferred under this section if the
transfer would violate any constitutional or statutory restrictions on
the funds being transferred.
(ii) The office of financial management may adjust the
appropriation authority of an agency receiving funds under this section
only if and to the extent that the agency's existing appropriation
authority would prevent it from expending the funds received.
(iii) Where any questions arise in the transfer of funds or the
adjustment of appropriation authority, the director of financial
management shall determine the appropriate transfer or adjustment.
(8) Leave transferred under this section shall not be used in any
calculation to determine an agency's allocation of full time equivalent
staff positions.
(9) The value of any leave transferred under this section which
remains unused shall be returned at its original value to the employee
or employees who transferred the leave when the agency head finds that
the leave is no longer needed or will not be needed at a future time in
connection with the illness or injury for which the leave was
transferred or for any other qualifying condition. Before the agency
head makes a determination to return unused leave in connection with an
illness or injury, or any other qualifying condition, he or she must
receive from the affected employee a statement from the employee's
doctor verifying that the illness or injury is resolved. To the extent
administratively feasible, the value of unused leave which was
transferred by more than one employee shall be returned on a pro rata
basis.
(10) An employee who uses leave that is transferred to him or her
under this section may not be required to repay the value of the leave
that he or she used.
(11) The ((human resources)) director of the office of financial
management may adopt rules as necessary to implement subsection (2) of
this section.

Sec. 13 RCW 34.12.100 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 469 are each
amended to read as follows:
The chief administrative law judge shall be paid a salary fixed by
the governor after recommendation of the ((human resources)) director
((in)) of the office of financial management. The salaries of
administrative law judges appointed under the terms of this chapter
shall be determined by the chief administrative law judge after
recommendation of the ((department of personnel)) director of the
office of financial management.

Sec. 14 RCW 34.05.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 431 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter shall not apply to:
(a) The state militia, or
(b) The board of clemency and pardons, or
(c) The department of corrections or the indeterminate sentencing
review board with respect to persons who are in their custody or are
subject to the jurisdiction of those agencies.
(2) The provisions of RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 shall not
apply:
(a) To adjudicative proceedings of the board of industrial
insurance appeals except as provided in RCW 7.68.110 and 51.48.131;
(b) Except for actions pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, to the
denial, suspension, or revocation of a driver's license by the
department of licensing;
(c) To the department of labor and industries where another statute
expressly provides for review of adjudicative proceedings of a
department action, order, decision, or award before the board of
industrial insurance appeals;
(d) To actions of the Washington personnel resources board, ((the
human resources director, or)) the office of financial management, and
the department of enterprise services when carrying out their duties
under chapter 41.06 RCW;
(e) To adjustments by the department of revenue of the amount of
the surcharge imposed under RCW 82.04.261; or
(f) To the extent they are inconsistent with any provisions of
chapter 43.43 RCW.
(3) Unless a party makes an election for a formal hearing pursuant
to RCW 82.03.140 or 82.03.190, RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 do not
apply to a review hearing conducted by the board of tax appeals.
(4) The rule-making provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) Reimbursement unit values, fee schedules, arithmetic conversion
factors, and similar arithmetic factors used to determine payment rates
that apply to goods and services purchased under contract for clients
eligible under chapter 74.09 RCW; and
(b) Adjustments by the department of revenue of the amount of the
surcharge imposed under RCW 82.04.261.
(5) All other agencies, whether or not formerly specifically
excluded from the provisions of all or any part of the administrative
procedure act, shall be subject to the entire act.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.03.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 39 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
Subject to RCW 41.04.820, the directors of the several departments
and members of the several boards and commissions, whose salaries are
fixed by the governor and the chief executive officers of the agencies
named in RCW 43.03.028(1) as now or hereafter amended shall each
severally receive such salaries, payable in monthly installments, as
shall be fixed by the governor or the appropriate salary fixing
authority, in an amount not to exceed the recommendations of the
((department of personnel)) office of financial management. From
February 18, 2009, through June 30, 2013, a salary or wage increase
shall not be granted to any position under this section, except that
increases may be granted for positions for which the employer has
demonstrated difficulty retaining qualified employees if the following
conditions are met:
(1) The salary increase can be paid within existing resources;
(2) The salary increase will not adversely impact the provision of
client services; and
(3) For any state agency of the executive branch, not including
institutions of higher education, the salary increase is approved by
the director of the office of financial management.
Any agency granting a salary increase from February 15, 2010,
through June 30, 2011, to a position under this section shall submit a
report to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than July
31, 2011, detailing the positions for which salary increases were
granted, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the
increases.
Any agency granting a salary increase from July 1, 2011, through
June 30, 2013, to a position under this section shall submit a report
to the fiscal committees of the legislature by July 31, 2012, and July
31, 2013, detailing the positions for which salary increases were
granted during the preceding fiscal year, the size of the increases,
and the reasons for giving the increases.

Sec. 16 RCW 43.06.013 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 454 are each
amended to read as follows:
When requested by the governor or the director of the department of
enterprise services, nonconviction criminal history fingerprint record
checks shall be conducted through the Washington state patrol
identification and criminal history section and the federal bureau of
investigation on applicants for agency head positions appointed by the
governor. Information received pursuant to this section shall be
confidential and made available only to the governor or director of the
((department of personnel)) office of financial management or their
employees directly involved in the selection, hiring, or background
investigation of the subject of the record check. When necessary,
applicants may be employed on a conditional basis pending completion of
the criminal history record check. "Agency head" as used in this
section has the same definition as provided in RCW 34.05.010.

Sec. 17 RCW 41.04.680 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 437 are each
amended to read as follows:
The office of financial management and other personnel authorities
shall adopt rules or policies governing the accumulation and use of
sick leave for state agency and department employees, expressly for the
establishment of a plan allowing participating employees to pool sick
leave and allowing any sick leave thus pooled to be used by any
participating employee who has used all of the sick leave, annual
leave, and compensatory leave that has been personally accrued by him
or her. Each department or agency of the state may allow employees to
participate in a sick leave pool established by the office of financial
management and other personnel authorities.
(1) For purposes of calculating maximum sick leave that may be
donated or received by any one employee, pooled sick leave:
(a) Is counted and converted in the same manner as sick leave under
the Washington state leave sharing program as provided in this chapter;
and
(b) Does not create a right to sick leave in addition to the amount
that may be donated or received under the Washington state leave
sharing program as provided in this chapter.
(2) The office of financial management and other personnel
authorities, except the personnel authorities for higher education
institutions, shall adopt rules which provide:
(a) That employees are eligible to participate in the sick leave
pool after one year of employment with the state or agency of the state
if the employee has accrued a minimum amount of unused sick leave, to
be established by rule;
(b) That participation in the sick leave pool shall, at all times,
be voluntary on the part of the employees;
(c) That any sick leave pooled shall be removed from the personally
accumulated sick leave balance of the employee contributing the leave;
(d) That any sick leave in the pool that is used by a participating
employee may be used only for the employee's personal illness,
accident, or injury;
(e) That a participating employee is not eligible to use sick leave
accumulated in the pool until all of his or her personally accrued
sick, annual, and compensatory leave has been used;
(f) A maximum number of days of sick leave in the pool that any one
employee may use;
(g) That a participating employee who uses sick leave from the pool
is not required to recontribute such sick leave to the pool, except as
otherwise provided in this section;
(h) That an employee who cancels his or her membership in the sick
leave pool is not eligible to withdraw the days of sick leave
contributed by that employee to the pool;
(i) That an employee who transfers from one position in state
government to another position in state government may transfer from
one pool to another if the eligibility criteria of the pools are
comparable and the administrators of the pools have agreed on a formula
for transfer of credits;
(j) That alleged abuse of the use of the sick leave pool shall be
investigated, and, on a finding of wrongdoing, the employee shall repay
all of the sick leave credits drawn from the sick leave pool and shall
be subject to such other disciplinary action as is determined by the
agency head;
(k) That sick leave credits may be drawn from the sick leave pool
by a part-time employee on a pro rata basis; and
(l) That each department or agency shall maintain accurate and
reliable records showing the amount of sick leave which has been
accumulated and is unused by employees, in accordance with guidelines
established by the ((department of personnel)) office of financial
management.
(3) Personnel authorities for higher education institutions shall
adopt policies consistent with the needs of the employees under their
respective jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 RCW 41.06.160 (Classification and salary
schedules to consider rates in other public and private employment--Wage and fringe benefits surveys -- Limited public disclosure exemption)
and 2005 c 274 s 278, 2002 c 354 s 211, 1993 c 281 s 29, 1985 c 94 s 2,
1980 c 11 s 1, 1979 c 151 s 58, 1977 ex.s. c 152 s 2, & 1961 c 1 s 16
are each repealed.

--- END ---