BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.36.070 and 2009 c 333 s 59 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may pay no more than one hundred twenty thousand
dollars per fiscal year from the state wildlife account created in RCW
77.12.170 for claims and assessment costs for damage to commercial
crops caused by wild deer or elk submitted under RCW 77.36.100.
(2) If any money authorized for expenditure under subsection (1) of
this section is unspent as of June 30th of a fiscal year, the state
treasurer shall transfer the unexpended money to the wildlife conflict
account created in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The wildlife conflict account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. Any transfers of money under RCW 77.36.070 must be
deposited in the account. The department may also deposit into the
account any grants, gifts, or donations to the state for the purposes
of providing compensation for property damage. Consistent with this
chapter, expenditures from the account may be used only for prevention,
mitigation, assessment, and payments for injury or loss of property
caused by deer, elk, bears, wolves, or cougars. Only the director or
the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(2)(a) The department must maintain a list of claims submitted
under RCW 77.36.100 that have been approved for payment but not yet
been fully paid by the department. The list of claims must be
organized chronologically by the date the injury or loss of property
caused by deer, elk, bears, wolves, or cougars occurred. As funding
becomes available to the department under this section, or from any
other source, the department must pay claims in the chronologic order
they appear on the list. The department must maintain, and is
authorized to pay, claims that appear on the list due to injury or loss
that occurred in a previous fiscal biennium.
(b) The payment of a claim included on the list maintained by the
department under this section is conditional on the availability of
specific funding for this purpose and is not a guarantee of
reimbursement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2014, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---