BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 27.12.210 and 2011 c 336 s 703 are each amended to
read as follows:
The trustees, immediately after their appointment or election,
shall meet and organize by the election of such officers as they deem
necessary. They shall:
(1) Adopt such bylaws, rules, and regulations for their own
guidance and for the government of the library as they deem expedient;
(2) Have the supervision, care, and custody of all property of the
library, including the rooms or buildings constructed, leased, or set
apart therefor;
(3) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, employ a
librarian, and upon his or her recommendation employ such other
assistants as may be necessary, all in accordance with the provisions
of RCW ((27.08.010)) 27.04.055, prescribe their duties, fix their
compensation, and remove them for cause;
(4) Submit annually to the legislative body a budget containing
estimates in detail of the amount of money necessary for the library
for the ensuing year; except that in a library district the board of
library trustees shall prepare its budget, certify the same and deliver
it to the board of county commissioners in ample time for it to make
the tax levies for the purpose of the district;
(5) Have exclusive control of the finances of the library;
(6) Accept such gifts of money or property for library purposes as
they deem expedient;
(7) Lease or purchase land for library buildings;
(8) Lease, purchase, or erect an appropriate building or buildings
for library purposes, and acquire such other property as may be needed
therefor;
(9) Purchase books, periodicals, maps, and supplies for the
library; and
(10) Do all other acts necessary for the orderly and efficient
management and control of the library.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 27.12 RCW
to read as follows:
In any county with an adopted home rule charter and one million or
more residents, the librarian of a rural county library district must
be nominated by the county executive and, upon the recommendation of a
majority of the trustees, confirmed by a majority of the county
council.

--- END ---