BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The intent of this act is to
protect the fairness of elections for the highest court in Washington
state - the supreme court. Doing so will foster the public's trust in
the integrity and independence of the court in the face of increasingly
large sums of money raised and spent by special interest groups. That
flood of money threatens the impartiality, independence, and
credibility of our judiciary. To maintain public confidence in the
judiciary, we must prevent not only corruption, but the appearance of
corruption, for the judiciary is the one branch of government that must
be uniquely impartial, independent, and unbiased in order to best serve
the residents of Washington. It is destructive for our democracy to
allow the court to become influenced by large amounts of money, and for
our citizens to think that judicial decisions are influenced by those
large amounts of money. This act is necessary to ensure that our
highest courts continue to be unbiased and insulated from special
interests.
Therefore, this act, the judicial election reform act, introduces
a voluntary pilot project to provide an alternative source of financing
candidates for the Washington supreme court who demonstrate public
support and voluntarily accept strict fundraising and spending limits.
The provisions of this act shall be broadly interpreted to carry
out the purpose and intent of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. In addition to the definitions
in RCW 42.17A.005, the definitions in this section apply throughout
sections 1 through 19 of this act unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Contested election" means an election in which there are two
or more candidates running for the same office whose names will appear
on the ballot.
(2) "Nonparticipating candidate" means a candidate for supreme
court justice who is on the ballot but has chosen not to apply for
public funds from the judicial election reform act fund or a candidate
who is on the ballot and has applied but has not been certified to
receive public funds from the judicial election reform act fund.
(3) "Publicly financed candidate" means a candidate who becomes
certified to receive public campaign funds under section 6 of this act.
(4) "Qualifying contribution" means a contribution in an amount of
at least ten dollars, but no more than twenty-five percent of the
maximum contribution limit allowed under RCW 42.17A.410, made by a
registered voter of the state, and is received during the qualifying
period.
(5) "Qualifying period" means the period beginning February 1st of
the election year and ending one week after the close of the regular
filing period for the office.
(6) "Uncontested election" means an election in which a candidate
running for a specified office has no opponent on the ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 JUDICIAL ELECTION REFORM ACT FUND. (1) The
judicial election reform act fund is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts under sections 4 through 19 of this act
required to be deposited into the fund must be deposited into the fund.
Expenditures from the fund may be used only for the purposes of the
judicial election reform act, sections 1 through 19 of this act. Only
the commission may authorize expenditures from the fund. The fund is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(2) When the funds in the account have been fully distributed, the
commission and treasurer shall cease making any public funds
disbursements under section 12 of this act. No candidate may receive
any disbursement of funds beyond those authorized under section 12 of
this act, nor may any candidate receive any further disbursements of
funds under section 12 of this act when the appropriation has been
exhausted. The commission may adopt rules to address distribution of
remaining funds in the account for pending requests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 VOLUNTARY LIMITATIONS ON CONTRIBUTIONS FOR
JUDICIAL CAMPAIGNS. A publicly financed candidate and a publicly
financed candidate's authorized committee shall:
(1) Only accept contributions from individuals, and only as
qualifying contributions under section 5 of this act;
(2) During the qualifying period for the purpose of raising
qualifying contributions, accept no more than two times the
contribution limit under RCW 42.17A.410 of the candidate's personal
funds;
(3) Collect at least five hundred qualifying contributions that, in
the aggregate total at least twenty-five times the filing fee for the
office of supreme court justice in accordance with section 5 of this
act;
(4) File the required reports regarding qualifying and expenditures
to the commission;
(5) Expend only funds received from the judicial election reform
act fund after being certified as a publicly funded candidate;
(6) Sign a joint statement with the treasurer of the publicly
financed candidate's authorized committee, under oath, promising to
comply with the provisions of this chapter; and
(7) Comply with the provisions of this chapter to the extent
required for publicly funded candidates as prescribed by the
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 APPLICATION FOR CERTIFICATION. A candidate
who wishes to receive public campaign funds must:
(1) File an application with the commission declaring his or her
intent to participate in the program as a candidate for the supreme
court. The application must be filed before or during the qualifying
period. In the application, the candidate shall affirm that only one
political committee, identified with its treasurer, shall handle all
contributions, expenditures, and obligations for the publicly financed
candidate and that the candidate will comply with the provisions in
sections 1 through 19 of this act and rules adopted by the commission;
and
(2) Obtain at least five hundred qualifying contributions that, in
the aggregate total at least twenty-five times the filing fee for the
office by the end of the qualifying period. No payment, gift, or
anything of value may be given in exchange for a qualifying
contribution. A qualifying contribution must be:
(a) Made by a registered voter of the state;
(b) Made by a person who is not given anything of value in exchange
for the qualifying contribution;
(c) In an amount of at least ten dollars but not more than twenty-five percent of the contribution limit allowed under RCW 42.17A.410;
(d) Received during the qualifying period by the candidate or on
behalf of the candidate; and
(e) Made by check, money order, or credit card.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 CERTIFICATION AS A PUBLICLY FINANCED
CANDIDATE. (1) Upon receipt of an application, the commission shall
determine whether or not the candidate has complied with the following
requirements:
(a) Signed and filed an application to participate;
(b) Submitted a report itemizing the qualifying contributions
received. The report must include the name, home address, telephone
number, and county of residence for each person who made a contribution
and the date the contribution was received, and any other information
required by the commission;
(c) Submitted a check or money order equal to the total qualifying
contributions, less money expended for the purpose of raising
qualifying contributions received by the candidate in accordance with
section 7 of this act, made out to the judicial election reform act
fund; and
(d) Submitted affidavits signed by persons collecting qualifying
contributions stating that, to the best of his or her knowledge, the
contribution was made by a registered voter of the state.
(2) Once the requirements in subsection (1) of this section are
met, the commission must verify that pursuant to section 5 of this act,
a sufficient number of qualifying contributions were made by registered
voters of the state at the time the contribution was made.
(3) The commission must determine if a candidate meets the
requirements for public financing within seven calendar days of the
filing of an application. If the requirements of subsection (2) of
this section are met, the commission must certify the candidate for
public financing. If the commission denies certification, it must
provide written reasons why certification is denied. Any candidate who
is denied certification may reapply one time by submitting the required
information or the number of qualifying contributions needed to
complete the certification within fourteen calendar days of the date of
the commission's decision.
(4) A candidate who is certified as a publicly financed candidate
may use that designation in campaign materials and will be so
designated in the state voters' pamphlet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 QUALIFYING CONTRIBUTIONS. A publicly
financed candidate may expend money received as qualifying
contributions, as well as the allowed amount of the candidate's
personal funds under section 4 of this act, to pay for expenses related
to raising qualifying contributions. The amount of qualifying
contributions used for this purpose may not exceed twenty-five percent
of the minimum dollar amount of qualifying contributions required under
section 5 of this act. Expenditures made for the purpose of this
section must be reported as required under RCW 42.17A.235 and
42.17A.240 or as determined by the commission by rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 CONTROLS ON A PUBLICLY FINANCED CANDIDATE'S
AUTHORIZED COMMITTEE. A publicly financed candidate and the publicly
financed candidate's authorized committee shall file the reports
required pursuant to this chapter as determined by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 USES OF PUBLIC FUNDS. (1) Money in the
account of a publicly financed candidate's authorized committee may
only be used for purposes directly related to the candidate's campaign.
(2) Money in the account of a publicly financed candidate's
authorized committee may not be used to pay fines or civil penalties,
for costs or legal fees related to representation before the
commission, or for defense of an enforcement action under this chapter.
Nothing in this chapter prevents a publicly financed candidate from
having a legal defense fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 RETURN OF FUNDS. (1) If a candidate
attempts to qualify for public funding but does not meet the threshold
for qualification, withdraws from the program before certification, is
denied certification under section 6 of this act, or revokes
participation under section 11 of this act, the candidate must pay to
the fund the total dollar amount of qualifying contributions received
during the qualifying period, less money expended for the purpose of
raising qualifying contributions in accordance with section 7 of this
act.
(2) Publicly financed candidates must return all unused funds to
the judicial election reform act fund within thirty calendar days of
the date they are no longer a candidate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 REVOCATION. (1) A publicly financed
candidate may revoke in writing to the commission a decision to
participate in the public financing program no later than June 30th in
the year of the election. After a timely revocation, that candidate
may accept and expend money outside the provisions of this act. Within
thirty days after revocation, a candidate must return to the commission
all money received from the judicial election reform act fund.
(2) A publicly financed candidate who revokes a decision to
participate in the public financing program after the time period
established in subsection (1) of this section must return all money
received from the judicial election reform act fund and pay a fine of
one thousand dollars per day for each day beyond the allowed revocation
period and the day the candidate revokes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 CAMPAIGN FUNDING. (1)(a) Within five
business days after a publicly financed candidate's name is approved to
appear on the primary ballot by the appropriate elections officer, the
commission shall authorize the state treasurer to distribute to the
account of the authorized committee of each certified publicly financed
candidate an amount set, by rule, based on the number of participating
candidates filing for office. No candidate may receive an amount
greater than one hundred times the filing fee as established in RCW
29A.24.091 for the primary.
(b) Within five business days after a publicly financed candidate's
name is approved to appear on the general election ballot, the
commission shall authorize the state treasurer to distribute funds to
the account of the authorized committee of each certified publicly
financed candidate in an amount equal to one hundred twenty-five times
the filing fee for the office as established in RCW 29A.24.091.
(c) Participating candidates in uncontested elections shall receive
four times the filing fee as established in RCW 29A.24.091, plus the
net amount of qualifying contributions previously remitted to the
commission pursuant to section 6(1)(c) of this act.
(2) A publicly financed candidate shall return within ten calendar
days to the judicial election reform act fund any amount distributed
for an election that is unspent and uncommitted as of the date the
candidate ceases to be a candidate or as of the date of the election,
whichever occurs first.
(3) The commission shall authorize and the state treasurer shall
distribute funds to publicly financed candidates in a manner that
ensures accountability and safeguards the integrity of the fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 DISQUALIFICATION FROM PROGRAM. If the
commission finds that a publicly financed candidate or the publicly
financed candidate's committee is accepting or expending money outside
the provisions of section 4 of this act, the candidate shall be
disqualified from the program, shall be subject to a civil penalty
under RCW 42.17A.750, and shall return all money received from the
judicial election reform act fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 IMPLEMENTATION AND ENFORCEMENT DUTIES. In
implementing the provisions of the judicial election reform act, the
commission shall:
(1) Prescribe forms for reports, statements, notices, and other
documents as required by sections 1 through 19 of this act;
(2) Prepare and publish instructions to facilitate compliance with
sections 1 through 19 of this act and explaining the duties of persons
and committees under sections 1 through 19 of this act;
(3) Adopt rules to carry out the policies of sections 1 through 19
of this act. These rules are not subject to the time restrictions of
RCW 42.17A.110(1); and
(4) Enforce the provisions of sections 1 through 19 of this act,
ensure that money transferred from the judicial election reform act
fund into the account of an authorized committee of a publicly financed
candidate is spent as specified, and monitor reports filed and
financial records of candidates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 EXPEDITED ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW. (1) The
commission shall develop an expedited administrative review process
that is not subject to the adjudicative proceedings of chapter 34.05
RCW. However, commission findings are subject to judicial review under
RCW 34.05.570(4).
(2) Candidates and potential candidates whom the commission finds
ineligible to participate in the program may seek expedited
administrative review of commission decisions.
(3) In an expedited administrative review process, the commission
shall issue a final decision no more than five calendar days after
review is requested.
(4) The commission may adopt rules to implement this section.
(5) Any petition for judicial review of a final decision in an
expedited administrative review must be filed within five calendar days
of the final decision. In any judicial review, the court shall not
grant a stay or temporary relief unless it finds the conditions
specified in RCW 34.05.550(3) (a), (b), and (c).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The commission shall not offer the program
in sections 1 through 19 of this act until one million dollars is in
the judicial election reform act fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The commission may solicit and accept
gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or personal
property, or both, in trust or otherwise, and sell, lease, exchange,
invest, or expend these donations or the proceeds, rents, profits, and
income from the donations except as limited by the donor's terms.
Moneys received under this section shall be deposited into the judicial
election reform act fund established in section 3 of this act and may
only be used for the purposes of sections 1 through 19 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Beginning with the fiscal year that ends
June 30, 2016, and annually thereafter, the legislature shall
appropriate from the general fund for expenditure into the judicial
election reform act fund an amount equal to the amount received the
previous February under RCW 2.48.130(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 The public disclosure commission shall
report to the governor and to the appropriate committees of the
legislature in January of even-numbered years on the effectiveness of
the judicial election reform act once the program is offered.

Sec. 20 RCW 42.17A.750 and 2013 c 166 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the penalties in subsection (((2))) (3) of this
section, and any other remedies provided by law, one or more of the
following civil remedies and sanctions may be imposed by court order in
addition to any other remedies provided by law:
(a) If the court finds that the violation of any provision of this
chapter by any candidate or political committee probably affected the
outcome of any election, the result of that election may be held void
and a special election held within sixty days of the finding. Any
action to void an election shall be commenced within one year of the
date of the election in question. It is intended that this remedy be
imposed freely in all appropriate cases to protect the right of the
electorate to an informed and knowledgeable vote.
(b) If any lobbyist or sponsor of any grass roots lobbying campaign
violates any of the provisions of this chapter, his or her registration
may be revoked or suspended and he or she may be enjoined from
receiving compensation or making expenditures for lobbying. The
imposition of a sanction shall not excuse the lobbyist from filing
statements and reports required by this chapter.
(c) A person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter may
be subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars for
each violation. However, a person or entity who violates RCW
42.17A.405 may be subject to a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars or
three times the amount of the contribution illegally made or accepted,
whichever is greater.
(d) A person who fails to file a properly completed statement or
report within the time required by this chapter may be subject to a
civil penalty of ten dollars per day for each day each delinquency
continues.
(e) Each state agency director who knowingly fails to file
statements required by RCW 42.17A.635 shall be subject to personal
liability in the form of a civil penalty in the amount of one hundred
dollars per statement. These penalties are in addition to any other
civil remedies or sanctions imposed on the agency.
(f) A person who fails to report a contribution or expenditure as
required by this chapter may be subject to a civil penalty equivalent
to the amount not reported as required.
(g) Any state agency official, officer, or employee who is
responsible for or knowingly directs or expends public funds in
violation of RCW 42.17A.635 (2) or (3) may be subject to personal
liability in the form of a civil penalty in an amount that is at least
equivalent to the amount of public funds expended in the violation.
(h) The court may enjoin any person to prevent the doing of any act
herein prohibited, or to compel the performance of any act required
herein.
(2)(a) The civil penalty for a violation of a contribution or
expenditure limit established under section 4 of this act by or on
behalf of a publicly financed candidate is ten times the amount by
which the expenditures or contributions exceed the applicable limit.
If the violation occurs within five days of an election, the civil
penalty is twenty times the amount by which the expenditures or
contributions exceed the applicable limit. A publicly financed
candidate found to have knowingly committed a violation of the
expenditure or contribution limits under section 4 of this act shall
pay the applicable fines, surrender all money in the candidate's
authorized committee account to the judicial election reform act fund,
and will cease to be a publicly financed candidate.
(b) In addition to any other penalties imposed by law, the civil
penalty for a violation by or on behalf of a publicly financed
candidate of a reporting requirement imposed by this chapter is one
hundred dollars per day. A civil penalty imposed under this subsection
(2)(b) may not exceed twice the amount of expenditures or contributions
not reported in a timely manner. The candidate and the candidate's
authorized committee are jointly and severally responsible for a civil
penalty imposed under this subsection.
(c) The civil penalty for a violation of the revocation requirement
imposed by section 11 of this act is one thousand dollars per day for
each day past the period allowed for a timely revocation.
(d) All civil penalties collected under this subsection must be
deposited into the judicial election reform act fund.
(3) The commission may refer the following violations for criminal
prosecution:
(a) A person who, with actual malice, violates a provision of this
chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor under chapter 9.92 RCW;
(b) A person who, within a five-year period, with actual malice,
violates three or more provisions of this chapter is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor under chapter 9.92 RCW; and
(c) A person who, with actual malice, procures or offers any false
or forged document to be filed, registered, or recorded with the
commission under this chapter is guilty of a class C felony under
chapter 9.94A RCW.

Sec. 21 RCW 2.48.130 and 1957 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The annual membership fees for active members shall be payable
on or before February 1st of each year. The board of governors may
establish the amount of such annual membership fee to be effective each
year: PROVIDED, That written notice of any proposed increase in
membership fee shall be sent to active members not less than sixty days
prior to the effective date of such increase: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
the board of governors may establish the fee at a reduced rate for
those who have been active members for less than five years in this
state or elsewhere.
(2) Effective January 1, 2015, an amount of ten dollars of each
active member's annual membership fees shall be remitted to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial election reform act fund created
in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Sections 1 through 19 of this act may be
known and cited as the judicial election reform act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 Sections 1 through 19 of this act are each
added to chapter 42.17A RCW and codified with the subchapter heading of
"public funding for supreme court campaigns."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---