BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.05.180 and 1999 c 391 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person rendering emergency care or transportation, commonly known
as a "Good Samaritan," as described in RCW 4.24.300 and 4.24.310, may
request and receive appropriate infectious disease testing free of
charge from the local health department of the county of her or his
residence, if((: (1))) while rendering emergency care she or he came
into contact with bodily fluids((; and (2) she or he does not have
health insurance that covers the testing)). If consented to by the
source patient, testing of the source patient may be performed in order
to guide postexposure prophylaxis treatment of the good samaritan.
Source patient testing may be requested and received free of charge
from the local health department of the county of his or her residence.
Nothing in this section requires a local health department to provide
health care services beyond testing. The department shall adopt rules
implementing this section.
The information obtained from infectious disease testing is subject
to statutory confidentiality provisions, including those of chapters
70.24 and 70.05 RCW.

--- END ---