BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.660.020 and 2010 c 235 s 503 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The professional educator standards board shall transition the
alternative route partnership grant program from a separate competitive
grant program to a preparation program model to be expanded among
approved preparation program providers. Alternative routes are
partnerships between professional educator standards board-approved
preparation programs, Washington school districts, and other partners
as appropriate. Program design of alternative route programs shall
continue to evolve over time to reflect innovations and improvements in
educator preparation.
(2) ((Each prospective teacher preparation program provider, in
cooperation with a Washington school district or consortia of school
districts applying to operate [an] alternative route certification
program shall include in its proposal to the Washington professional
educator standards board:
(a) The route or routes the partnership program intends to offer
and a detailed description of how the routes will be structured and
operated by the partnership;
(b) The estimated number of candidates that will be enrolled per
route;
(c) An identification, indication of commitment, and description of
the role of approved teacher preparation programs and partnering
district or consortia of districts;
(d) An assurance that the district or approved preparation program
provider will provide adequate training for mentor teachers specific to
the mentoring of alternative route candidates;
(e) An assurance that significant time will be provided for mentor
teachers to spend with the alternative route teacher candidates
throughout the internship. Partnerships must provide each candidate
with intensive classroom mentoring until such time as the candidate
demonstrates the competency necessary to manage the classroom with less
intensive supervision and guidance from a mentor;
(f) A description of the rigorous screening process for applicants
to alternative route programs, including entry requirements specific to
each route, as provided in RCW 28A.660.040;
(g) A summary of procedures that provide flexible completion
opportunities for candidates to achieve a residency certificate; and
(h) The design and use of a teacher development plan for each
candidate. The plan shall specify the alternative route coursework and
training required of each candidate and shall be developed by comparing
the candidate's prior experience and coursework with the state's new
performance-based standards for residency certification and adjusting
any requirements accordingly. The plan may include the following
components:
(i) A minimum of one-half of a school year, and an additional
significant amount of time if necessary, of intensive mentorship during
field experience, starting with full-time mentoring and progressing to
increasingly less intensive monitoring and assistance as the intern
demonstrates the skills necessary to take over the classroom with less
intensive support. Before the supervision is diminished, the mentor of
the teacher candidate at the school and the supervisor of the teacher
candidate from the teacher preparation program must both agree that the
teacher candidate is ready to manage the classroom with less intensive
supervision;
(ii) Identification of performance indicators based on the
knowledge and skills standards required for residency certification by
the Washington professional educator standards board;
(iii) Identification of benchmarks that will indicate when the
standard is met for all performance indicators;
(iv) A description of strategies for assessing candidate
performance on the benchmarks;
(v) Identification of one or more tools to be used to assess a
candidate's performance once the candidate has been in the classroom
for about one-half of a school year;
(vi) A description of the criteria that would result in residency
certification after about one-half of a school year but before the end
of the program; and
(vii) A description of how the district intends for the alternative
route program to support its workforce development plan and how the
presence of alternative route interns will advance its school
improvement plans.
(3))) As provided in RCW 28A.410.210, it is the duty of the
professional educator standards board to establish policies for the
approval of nontraditional preparation programs and to provide
oversight and accountability related to the quality of these programs.
In establishing and amending rules for alternative route programs, the
professional educator standards board shall:
(a) Uphold criteria for alternative route program design that is
innovative and reflects evidence-based practice;
(b) Continue to prioritize program designs tailored to the needs of
experienced paraeducators and candidates of high academic attainment in
the subject area they intend to teach, of which partnering districts
have demonstrated need;
(c) Expand access and opportunity for individuals to become
teachers statewide; and
(d) Give preference in admissions to applicants for alternative
route programs who are eligible veterans or national guard members and
who meet the entry requirements for the alternative route program.
(3) Beginning December 1, 2014, and each even-numbered year
thereafter, the professional educator standards board shall report to
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
the following outcomes as indicators that alternative route programs
are meeting legislative intent through the regulation and oversight of
the professional educator standards board. In considering
administrative rules for, and reporting outcomes of, alternative route
programs, the professional educator standards board shall examine the
historical record of the data, reporting on:
(a) The number and percentage of alternative route completers
hired;
(b) The percentage of alternative route completers from
underrepresented populations;
(c) Three-year and five-year retention rates of alternative route
completers;
(d) The average hiring dates of alternative route completers; and
(e) The percentage of alternative route completers hired in
districts where their alternative route program was completed.
(4) To the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose,
alternative route programs may apply for program funds to pay stipends
to trained mentor teachers of interns during the mentored internship.
The per intern amount of mentor stipend provided by state funds shall
not exceed five hundred dollars.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.660.035 and 2009 c 468 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
identify school districts that have the most significant achievement
gaps among subgroups of students and for large numbers of those
students, and districts that should receive priority for assistance in
advancing cultural competency skills in their workforce. The
professional educator standards board shall provide assistance to the
identified school districts to develop partnership grant programs
between the districts and teacher preparation programs to provide ((one
or more of the four)) alternative route programs under RCW
((28A.660.040)) 28A.660.020 and to recruit paraeducators and other
individuals in the local community to become certified as teachers.
((A)) An alternative route partnership ((grant)) program proposed by an
identified school district shall receive priority eligibility for
partnership grants under RCW 28A.660.020. To the maximum extent
possible, the board shall coordinate the recruiting Washington teachers
program under RCW 28A.415.370 with the alternative route programs under
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 28A.660.040 (Alternative route programs)
and 2010 c 235 s 504 are each repealed.

--- END ---