BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the amendments in
section 2 of this act are intended to be technical and nonsubstantive
and that no substantive changes are intended or implied.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.28.161 and 2013 c 23 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may engage in the electrical construction trade
without having a valid master journey level electrician certificate of
competency, journey level electrician certificate of competency, master
specialty electrician certificate of competency, or specialty
electrician certificate of competency issued by the department in
accordance with this chapter. Electrician certificate of competency
specialties include, but are not limited to: Residential, pump and
irrigation, limited energy system, signs, nonresidential maintenance,
restricted nonresidential maintenance, and appliance repair. Until
July 1, 2007, the department of labor and industries shall issue a
written warning to any specialty pump and irrigation or domestic pump
electrician not having a valid electrician certification. The warning
will state that the individual must apply for an electrical training
certificate or be qualified for and apply for electrician certification
under the requirements in RCW 19.28.191(1)(g) within thirty calendar
days of the warning. Only one warning will be issued to any
individual. If the individual fails to comply with this section, the
department shall issue a penalty as defined in RCW 19.28.271 to the
individual.
(2) A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the electrical construction trade
or who is learning the electrical construction trade may work in the
electrical construction trade if supervised by a certified master
journey level electrician, journey level electrician, master specialty
electrician in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician
in that electrician's specialty. All apprentices and individuals
learning the electrical construction trade shall obtain an electrical
training certificate from the department. The certificate shall
authorize the holder to learn the electrical construction trade while
under the direct supervision of a master journey level electrician,
journey level electrician, master specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty. The certificate may include a photograph of
the holder. The holder of the electrical training certificate shall
renew the certificate biennially. At the time of renewal, the holder
shall provide the department with an accurate list of the holder's
employers in the electrical construction industry for the previous
biennial period and the number of hours worked for each employer. The
holder shall also provide proof of sixteen hours of: Approved
classroom training covering this chapter((,)); the national electrical
code((, or)); electrical theory; or, for holders of a pump and
irrigation or domestic pump specialty trainee certificate, the
continuing education may comprise both electrical and plumbing
education; or equivalent classroom training taken as part of an
approved apprenticeship program under chapter 49.04 RCW or an approved
electrical training program under RCW 19.28.191(1)(h). The number of
hours of approved classroom training required for certificate renewal
shall increase as follows: (a) Beginning on July 1, 2011, the holder
of an electrical training certificate shall provide the department with
proof of thirty-two hours of approved classroom training; and (b)
beginning on July 1, 2013, the holder of an electrical training
certificate shall provide the department with proof of forty-eight
hours of approved classroom training. At the request of the chairs of
the house of representatives commerce and labor committee and the
senate labor, commerce and consumer protection committee, or their
successor committees, the department of labor and industries shall
provide information on the implementation of the new classroom training
requirements for electrical trainees to both committees by December 1,
2012. A biennial fee shall be charged for the issuance or renewal of
the certificate. The department shall set the fee by rule. The fee
shall cover but not exceed the cost of administering and enforcing the
trainee certification and supervision requirements of this chapter.
Apprentices and individuals learning the electrical construction trade
shall have their electrical training certificates in their possession
at all times that they are performing electrical work. They shall show
their certificates to an authorized representative of the department at
the representative's request.
(3) Any person who has been issued an electrical training
certificate under this chapter may work if that person is under
supervision. Supervision shall consist of a person being on the same
job site and under the control of either a certified master journey
level electrician, journey level electrician, master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty. Either a
certified master journey level electrician, journey level electrician,
master specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty,
or specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty shall
be on the same job site as the noncertified individual for a minimum of
seventy-five percent of each working day unless otherwise provided in
this chapter.
(4) The ratio of noncertified individuals to certified master
journey level electricians, journey level electricians, master
specialty electricians, or specialty electricians on any one job site
is as follows:
(a) When working as a specialty electrician, not more than two
noncertified individuals for every certified master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, master journey
level electrician, or journey level electrician, except that the ratio
requirements are one certified master specialty electrician working in
that electrician's specialty, specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, master journey level electrician, or journey
level electrician working as a specialty electrician to no more than
four students enrolled in and working as part of an electrical
construction program at public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally accredited trade or technical schools licensed by
the workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter
28C.10 RCW. In meeting the ratio requirements for students enrolled in
an electrical construction program at a trade school, a trade school
may receive input and advice from the electrical board; and
(b) When working as a journey level electrician, not more than one
noncertified individual for every certified master journey level
electrician or journey level electrician, except that the ratio
requirements shall be one certified master journey level electrician or
journey level electrician to no more than four students enrolled in and
working as part of an electrical construction program at public
community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally
accredited trade or technical schools licensed by the workforce
training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW. In
meeting the ratio requirements for students enrolled in an electrical
construction program at a trade school, a trade school may receive
input and advice from the electrical board.
An individual who has a current training certificate and who has
successfully completed or is currently enrolled in an approved
apprenticeship program or in an electrical construction program at
public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally
accredited technical or trade schools licensed by the workforce
training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, may
work without direct on-site supervision during the last six months of
meeting the practical experience requirements of this chapter.
(5) For the residential (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(a)),
pump and irrigation (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(b)), sign (as
specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(d)), limited energy (as specified in
WAC 296-46B-920(2)(e)), nonresidential maintenance (as specified in WAC
296-46B-920(2)(g)), restricted nonresidential maintenance as determined
by the department in rule, or other new nonresidential specialties, not
including appliance repair, as determined by the department in rule,
either a master journey level electrician, journey level electrician,
master specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty,
or specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty must
be on the same job site as the noncertified individual for a minimum of
seventy-five percent of each working day. Other specialties must meet
the requirements specified in RCW 19.28.191(1)(g)(ii). When the ratio
of certified electricians to noncertified individuals on a job site is
one certified electrician to three or four noncertified individuals,
the certified electrician must:
(a) Directly supervise and instruct the noncertified individuals
and the certified electrician may not directly make or engage in an
electrical installation; and
(b) Be on the same job site as the noncertified individual for a
minimum of one hundred percent of each working day.
(6) The electrical contractor shall accurately verify and attest to
the electrical trainee hours worked by electrical trainees on behalf of
the electrical contractor.

--- END ---