BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.170.130 and 1995 c 277 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Applications for licenses required under this chapter shall be
filed with the director on a form provided by the director. The
director may require any information and documentation that reasonably
relates to the need to determine whether the applicant meets the
criteria.
(2) After receipt of an application for a license, the director
shall conduct an investigation to determine whether the facts set forth
in the application are true and shall request that the Washington state
patrol compare the fingerprints submitted with the application to
fingerprint records available to the Washington state patrol. The
Washington state patrol shall forward the fingerprints of applicants
for ((an armed)) any private security guard license to the federal
bureau of investigation for a national criminal history records check.
The director may require that fingerprint cards of licensees be
periodically reprocessed to identify criminal convictions subsequent to
registration.
(3) The director shall solicit comments from the chief law
enforcement officer of the county and city or town in which the
applicant's employer is located on issuance of a permanent private
security guard license.
(4) A summary of the information acquired under this section, to
the extent that it is public information, shall be forwarded by the
department to the applicant's employer.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.70.041 and 2001 c 272 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every application for a vehicle dealer license shall contain
the following information to the extent it applies to the applicant:
(a) Proof as the department may require concerning the applicant's
identity, including but not limited to his or her fingerprints, the
honesty, truthfulness, and good reputation of the applicant for the
license, or of the officers of a corporation making the application;
(b) The applicant's form and place of organization including if the
applicant is a corporation, proof that the corporation is licensed to
do business in this state;
(c) The qualification and business history of the applicant and any
partner, officer, or director;
(d) The applicant's financial condition or history including a bank
reference and whether the applicant or any partner, officer, or
director has ever been adjudged bankrupt or has any unsatisfied
judgment in any federal or state court;
(e) Whether the applicant has been adjudged guilty of a crime which
directly relates to the business for which the license is sought and
the time elapsed since the conviction is less than ten years, or has
suffered any judgment within the preceding five years in any civil
action involving fraud, misrepresentation, or conversion and in the
case of a corporation or partnership, all directors, officers, or
partners;
(f) A business telephone with a listing in the local directory;
(g) The name or names of new vehicles the vehicle dealer wishes to
sell;
(h) The names and addresses of each manufacturer from whom the
applicant has received a franchise;
(i) A certificate by a representative of the department, that the
applicant's principal place of business and each subagency business
location in the state of Washington meets the location requirements as
required by this chapter. The certificate shall include proof of the
applicant's ownership or lease of the real property where the
applicant's principal place of business is established;
(j) A copy of a current service agreement with a manufacturer, or
distributor for a foreign manufacturer, requiring the applicant, upon
demand of any customer receiving a new vehicle warranty to perform or
arrange for, within a reasonable distance of his or her established
place of business, the service repair and replacement work required of
the manufacturer or distributor by such vehicle warranty. This
requirement applies only to applicants seeking to sell, to exchange, to
offer, to auction, to solicit, to advertise, or to broker new or
current-model vehicles with factory or distributor warranties;
(k) The class of vehicles the vehicle dealer will be buying,
selling, listing, exchanging, offering, brokering, leasing, auctioning,
soliciting, or advertising, and which classification or classifications
the dealer wishes to be designated as;
(l) Effective July 1, 2002, a certificate from the provider of each
education program or test showing that the applicant has completed the
education programs and passed the test required under RCW 46.70.079 if
the applicant is a dealer subject to the education and test
requirements;
(m) Any other information the department may reasonably require.
(2) If the applicant is a manufacturer the application shall
contain the following information to the extent it is applicable to the
applicant:
(a) The name and address of the principal place of business of the
applicant and, if different, the name and address of the Washington
state representative of the applicant;
(b) The name or names under which the applicant will do business in
the state of Washington;
(c) Evidence that the applicant is authorized to do business in the
state of Washington;
(d) The name or names of the vehicles that the licensee
manufactures;
(e) The name or names and address or addresses of each and every
distributor, factory branch, and factory representative;
(f) The name or names and address or addresses of resident
employees or agents to provide service or repairs to vehicles located
in the state of Washington only under the terms of any warranty
attached to new or unused vehicles manufactured, unless such
manufacturer requires warranty service to be performed by all of its
dealers pursuant to a current service agreement on file with the
department;
(g) Any other information the department may reasonably require.
(3) Effective January 1, 2015, (a)(i) applicants for an original
license under this chapter are required to have fingerprint-based
background checks through the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system and through the federal bureau of investigation;
(ii) the director may require all current licensees under this chapter
to have a fingerprint-based background check through the Washington
state patrol criminal identification system and through the federal
bureau of investigation at the time of the first application for a
renewal license after that date. The director may require all current
licensees to submit with their renewal application proof as the
department may require concerning the applicant's identity, including,
but not limited to, his or her fingerprints. The director may require
that licensees have their background rechecked periodically under this
subsection.
(b) The applicant is required to pay the current federal and state
fees for fingerprint-based criminal history background checks.

--- END ---