BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW
to read as follows:
If an agency operating under contract with the children's
administration chooses to hire an individual that would be precluded
from employment with the department based on a disqualifying crime or
negative action, the department and its officers and employees have no
liability arising from any injury or harm to a child or other
department client that is attributable to such individual.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.13.700 and 2013 c 162 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In determining the character, suitability, and competence of an
individual, the department may not:
(a) Deny or delay a license or approval of unsupervised access to
children to an individual solely because of a crime or civil infraction
involving the individual or entity revealed in the background check
process that ((is not on the secretary's list of crimes and negative
actions and is not related)) does not fall within the categories of
disqualifying crimes described in the adoption and safe families act of
1997 or does not relate directly to child safety, permanence, or well-being; or
(b) Delay the issuance of a license or approval of unsupervised
access to children by requiring the individual to obtain records
relating to a crime or civil infraction revealed in the background
check process that ((is not on the secretary's list of crimes and
negative actions and is not related)) does not fall within the
categories of disqualifying crimes described in the adoption and safe
families act of 1997 or does not relate directly to child safety,
permanence, or well-being ((and is not a permanent disqualifier
pursuant to department rule)).
(2) If the department determines that an individual does not
possess the character, suitability, or competence to provide care or
have unsupervised access to a child, it must provide the reasons for
its decision in writing with copies of the records or documents related
to its decision to the individual within ten days of making the
decision.
(3) For purposes of this section, "individual" means a relative as
defined in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a), an "other suitable person" under
chapter 13.34 RCW, a person pursuing licensing as a foster parent, or
a person employed or seeking employment by a business or organization
licensed by the department or with whom the department has a contract
to provide care, supervision, case management, or treatment of children
in the care of the department. "Individual" does not include long-term
care workers defined in RCW 74.39A.009(17)(a) whose background checks
are conducted as provided in RCW 74.39A.056.
(4) The department or its officers, agents, or employees may not be
held civilly liable based upon its decision to grant or deny
unsupervised access to children if the background information it relied
upon at the time the decision was made did not indicate that child
safety, permanence, or well-being would be a concern.

--- END ---