BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.235
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds clear evidence that school breakfast is
associated with improved outcomes for students, including fewer
discipline incidents, better attendance, and improved performance on
standardized tests. However, Washington ranks forty-first in the
nation for participation in the school breakfast program at the same
time that childhood poverty and food insecurity are at record highs in
the state. While many students eat breakfast at home, there are
significant numbers of children who come to school hungry. Therefore,
the legislature intends to expand the opportunity for students to get
a healthy breakfast by requiring schools with large populations of low-income students who are eligible for free and reduced price meals to
serve breakfast after the bell, a model that has increased breakfast
participation rates in various states across the nation.
(2) The legislature intends to establish a four-year, phased-in
process for providing breakfast after the bell in high needs schools
and provide technical assistance through dedicated staff within the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to successfully
implement the model, as well as assistance through local public-private
partnerships between the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and nonprofit organizations knowledgeable about hunger and
food security issues.
(3) The legislature intends that food served for breakfast must
meet federal standards, be nutritious, and not contribute to childhood
obesity. In addition, nothing in this act is intended to preempt the
responsibility of parents to care for their children, including feeding
them nutritious meals before arriving at school.
(4) Finally, the legislature encourages schools providing breakfast
after the bell to use a model that allows breakfast time to be part of
instructional time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.235
RCW to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 3 and 4
of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Breakfast after the bell" means a breakfast that is offered to
students after the beginning of the school day.
(2) "Eligible for free or reduced price meals" means a student who
is eligible under the national school lunch program or the school
breakfast program to receive lunch or breakfast at no cost to the
student or at a reduced cost to the student.
(3) "High needs school" means any public school that has an
enrollment of seventy percent or more students eligible for free or
reduced price meals in the prior school year.
(4) "Public school" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
28A.150.010.
(5) "School breakfast program" means a program meeting federal
requirements under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1773.
(6) "School lunch program" means a program meeting federal
requirements under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1751.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.235
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning in the 2014-15 school year and continuing into the
2015-16 school year, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall dedicate staff within the office to assist all high
needs schools that are interested in offering breakfast after the bell
to make the change from their current breakfast model. The staff shall
also encourage all interested high needs schools to explore options for
expanding breakfast after the bell to include all students.
(b) Beginning in the 2016-17 school year, except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, each elementary school that enrolls
students in any of grades kindergarten through five that has an
enrollment of eighty-five percent or more students eligible for free or
reduced price meals in the prior school year must offer breakfast after
the bell to each student in the school.
(c) Beginning in the 2017-18 school year, except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, each high needs school must offer
breakfast after the bell to each student in the school.
(d) All public schools are encouraged to offer breakfast after the
bell even if not required to do so under this section.
(2)(a) High needs schools with participation rates in school
breakfast of seventy percent or more of the students eligible for free
or reduced price meals are exempt from the provisions of subsection (1)
of this section. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction, in consultation with community food and nutrition experts,
shall issue guidelines for calculating school breakfast participation
rates.
(b) High needs schools that demonstrate that expected direct costs
will exceed expected revenues for the breakfast after the bell program
are exempt from the requirements of subsection (1) of this section for
the ensuing school year. Expected direct costs include but are not
limited to the costs of food and other commodities, supplies,
compensation for food service workers, and associated custodial
services. Expected revenues include federal and state reimbursements
for school breakfast, any additional state funds allocated for the
purposes of this section, and student copays. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall develop a worksheet for the
purposes of this subsection (2)(b) and must notify a qualifying high
needs school of its exemption in a timely manner before the start of
the school year. A high needs school may reapply annually for the
exemption.
(3)(a) Each high needs school may determine the breakfast after the
bell service model that best suits its students. Service models
include, but are not limited to, breakfast in the classroom, grab and
go breakfast, or a breakfast after first period.
(b) Breakfast after the bell may be served at a time to be
determined by the high needs school, so long as it occurs at breakfast
time after the beginning of the school day.
(c) If all students in a high needs school are provided the
opportunity to engage in educational activity planned by and under the
direction of school district staff concurrently with the serving and
consumption of breakfast, the period of time designated for student
participation in breakfast after the bell shall be considered
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.205.
(4) All breakfasts served in a breakfast after the bell program
must comply with federal meal patterns and nutrition standards for
school breakfast programs under the federal healthy, hunger-free kids
act of 2010, (P.L. 111-296) and any federal regulations interpreting
that act.
(5) The legislature does not intend to include the programs under
this section within the state's obligation for basic education funding
under Article IX of the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.235
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Before August 1, 2014, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall develop and distribute procedures and
guidelines for the implementation of section 3 of this act, which must
be in compliance with the school breakfast program and the school lunch
program.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
dedicate staff within the office to offer technical assistance to all
public schools and school districts related to offering breakfast after
the bell, including assistance with various available funding
mechanisms to support breakfast after the bell programs such as
universal breakfast, the community eligibility option under 42 U.S.C.
Sec. 1759a, programs under provision two of the national school lunch
act, and claims for reimbursement under the school breakfast program.
(3) In fulfilling its responsibilities under this section, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall collaborate
with nonprofit organizations knowledgeable on hunger and food security
issues and best practices for improving student access to school
breakfast. The office shall also seek partnerships with philanthropic
organizations interested in supporting breakfast after the bell in high
needs schools.
(4) Any federal or state moneys received by a public school or
school district as reimbursement for breakfasts served under this
section may only be used for the food and operations associated with
the food service program of the school or district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2014, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---