BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that residential
landlords frequently use tenant screening reports in evaluating and
selecting tenants for their rental properties. The costs of tenant
screening are passed on to applicants in the form of screening fees
that applicants pay with each application for housing, although
successive reports contain largely the same information. Applicants
may make multiple applications for housing to secure a place to live,
significantly increasing their financial burden. The high and repeated
cost of tenant screening reports are a barrier to housing for all
applicants, especially applicants with low or fixed incomes. The
legislature recognizes the importance of landlords receiving current
and thorough information on prospective tenants, including the
necessary information to determine if that applicant would make a
suitable renter. When an applicant can provide a prospective landlord
a comprehensive tenant screening report produced within the last thirty
days, this significantly reduces an applicant's cost while also
providing landlords with the information they need. Therefore, the
legislature finds and declares comprehensive tenant screening reports
are a necessary and fair solution for both applicants and landlords.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.18.030 and 2012 c 41 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Certificate of inspection" means an unsworn statement,
declaration, verification, or certificate made in accordance with the
requirements of RCW 9A.72.085 by a qualified inspector that states that
the landlord has not failed to fulfill any substantial obligation
imposed under RCW 59.18.060 that endangers or impairs the health or
safety of a tenant, including (a) structural members that are of
insufficient size or strength to carry imposed loads with safety, (b)
exposure of the occupants to the weather, (c) plumbing and sanitation
defects that directly expose the occupants to the risk of illness or
injury, (d) not providing facilities adequate to supply heat and water
and hot water as reasonably required by the tenant, (e) providing
heating or ventilation systems that are not functional or are
hazardous, (f) defective, hazardous, or missing electrical wiring or
electrical service, (g) defective or hazardous exits that increase the
risk of injury to occupants, and (h) conditions that increase the risk
of fire.
(2) "Distressed home" has the same meaning as in RCW 61.34.020.
(3) "Distressed home conveyance" has the same meaning as in RCW
61.34.020.
(4) "Distressed home purchaser" has the same meaning as in RCW
61.34.020.
(5) "Dwelling unit" is a structure or that part of a structure
which is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one person or
by two or more persons maintaining a common household, including but
not limited to single-family residences and units of multiplexes,
apartment buildings, and mobile homes.
(6) "Gang" means a group that: (a) Consists of three or more
persons; (b) has identifiable leadership or an identifiable name, sign,
or symbol; and (c) on an ongoing basis, regularly conspires and acts in
concert mainly for criminal purposes.
(7) "Gang-related activity" means any activity that occurs within
the gang or advances a gang purpose.
(8) "In danger of foreclosure" means any of the following:
(a) The homeowner has defaulted on the mortgage and, under the
terms of the mortgage, the mortgagee has the right to accelerate full
payment of the mortgage and repossess, sell, or cause to be sold the
property;
(b) The homeowner is at least thirty days delinquent on any loan
that is secured by the property; or
(c) The homeowner has a good faith belief that he or she is likely
to default on the mortgage within the upcoming four months due to a
lack of funds, and the homeowner has reported this belief to:
(i) The mortgagee;
(ii) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
19.134 RCW;
(iii) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
19.146 RCW;
(iv) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
18.85 RCW;
(v) An attorney-at-law;
(vi) A mortgage counselor or other credit counselor licensed or
certified by any federal, state, or local agency; or
(vii) Any other party to a distressed property conveyance.
(9) "Landlord" means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of the
dwelling unit or the property of which it is a part, and in addition
means any person designated as representative of the owner, lessor, or
sublessor including, but not limited to, an agent, a resident manager,
or a designated property manager.
(10) "Mortgage" is used in the general sense and includes all
instruments, including deeds of trust, that are used to secure an
obligation by an interest in real property.
(11) "Owner" means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in
whom is vested:
(a) All or any part of the legal title to property; or
(b) All or part of the beneficial ownership, and a right to present
use and enjoyment of the property.
(12) "Person" means an individual, group of individuals,
corporation, government, or governmental agency, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, or association, two or more persons having
a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(13) "Premises" means a dwelling unit, appurtenances thereto,
grounds, and facilities held out for the use of tenants generally and
any other area or facility which is held out for use by the tenant.
(14) "Property" or "rental property" means all dwelling units on a
contiguous quantity of land managed by the same landlord as a single,
rental complex.
(15) "Prospective landlord" means a landlord or a person who
advertises, solicits, offers, or otherwise holds a dwelling unit out as
available for rent.
(16) "Prospective tenant" means a tenant or a person who has
applied for residential housing that is governed under this chapter.
(17) "Qualified inspector" means a United States department of
housing and urban development certified inspector; a Washington state
licensed home inspector; an American society of home inspectors
certified inspector; a private inspector certified by the national
association of housing and redevelopment officials, the American
association of code enforcement, or other comparable professional
association as approved by the local municipality; a municipal code
enforcement officer; a Washington licensed structural engineer; or a
Washington licensed architect.
(18) "Reasonable attorneys' fees," where authorized in this
chapter, means an amount to be determined including the following
factors: The time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty of
the questions involved, the skill requisite to perform the legal
service properly, the fee customarily charged in the locality for
similar legal services, the amount involved and the results obtained,
and the experience, reputation and ability of the lawyer or lawyers
performing the services.
(19) "Rental agreement" means all agreements which establish or
modify the terms, conditions, rules, regulations, or any other
provisions concerning the use and occupancy of a dwelling unit.
(20) A "single-family residence" is a structure maintained and used
as a single dwelling unit. Notwithstanding that a dwelling unit shares
one or more walls with another dwelling unit, it shall be deemed a
single-family residence if it has direct access to a street and shares
neither heating facilities nor hot water equipment, nor any other
essential facility or service, with any other dwelling unit.
(21) A "tenant" is any person who is entitled to occupy a dwelling
unit primarily for living or dwelling purposes under a rental
agreement.
(22) "Tenant screening" means using a consumer report or other
information about a prospective tenant in deciding whether to make or
accept an offer for residential rental property to or from a
prospective tenant.
(23) "Tenant screening report" means a consumer report as defined
in RCW 19.182.010 and any other information collected by a tenant
screening service. A tenant screening report must include tenant
screening service contact information in or on the report.
(24) "Comprehensive screening report" means a tenant screening
report that contains all of the following: (a) A consumer report
concerning the prospective tenant prepared by a consumer reporting
agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide
basis, as defined in 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681A(p); (b) a consumer report
that includes consumer reporting agency contact information in or on
the report from which a prospective landlord may obtain, at no charge,
requested verifications of the prospective tenant's name and the most
recent screening date; (c) a report containing the prospective tenant's
criminal history, a sex offender search, and a search of the specially
designated nationals and blocked persons list maintained by the United
States office of foreign assets control; (d) a report containing the
prospective tenant's eviction history; (e) a report containing the
prospective tenant's employment verification; and (f) a report
containing the prospective tenant's previous address history, if not
included in the report from a consumer reporting agency that compiles
and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis as required in
(a) of this subsection.
(25) "Criminal history" means a report containing or summarizing
the contents of any records of the prospective tenant's arrest,
indictment, criminal conviction, or other adjudication of a crime,
including registration or duty to register as a sex offender with any
state, if any, obtained after a search for such records in every state
where the prospective tenant has reported living in the seven years
preceding the report date.
(26) "Eviction history" means a report containing or summarizing
the contents of any records of eviction suits, or judicial foreclosure
actions concerning the prospective tenant, obtained after a search for
such records in every state where the prospective tenant has reported
living in the seven years preceding the report date.

Sec. 3 RCW 59.18.257 and 2012 c 41 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Prior to obtaining any information about a prospective
tenant, the prospective landlord shall first notify the prospective
tenant in writing, or by posting, of the following:
(i) What types of information will be accessed to conduct the
tenant screening;
(ii) What criteria may result in denial of the application; and
(iii) If a consumer report is used, the name and address of the
consumer reporting agency and the prospective tenant's rights to obtain
a free copy of the consumer report in the event of a denial or other
adverse action, and to dispute the accuracy of information appearing in
the consumer report.
(b)(i) The landlord may charge a prospective tenant for costs
incurred in obtaining a tenant screening report only if the prospective
landlord provides the information as required in (a) of this
subsection, unless a comprehensive tenant screening report regarding
the prospective tenant, prepared within thirty days of the application
date, is made available to the prospective landlord by a consumer
reporting agency. If a consumer reporting agency provides access to a
comprehensive tenant screening report, a prospective landlord may still
obtain another tenant screening report but may not charge the
prospective tenant for the subsequent report.
(ii) If a prospective landlord conducts his or her own screening of
tenants, the prospective landlord may charge his or her actual costs in
obtaining the background information only if the prospective landlord
provides the information as required in (a) of this subsection. The
amount charged may not exceed the customary costs charged by a
screening service in the general area. The prospective landlord's
actual costs include costs incurred for long distance phone calls and
for time spent calling landlords, employers, and financial
institutions.
(c) If a prospective landlord takes an adverse action, the
prospective landlord shall provide a written notice of the adverse
action to the prospective tenant that states the reasons for the
adverse action. The adverse action notice must contain the following
information in a substantially similar format, including additional
information as may be required under chapter 19.182 RCW:

"ADVERSE ACTION NOTICE

Name
Address
City/State/Zip Code

This notice is to inform you that your application has been:
..... Rejected
..... Approved with conditions:
..... Residency requires an increased deposit
..... Residency requires a qualified guarantor
..... Residency requires last month's rent
..... Residency requires an increased monthly rent of $........
..... Other:

Adverse action on your application was based on the following:
..... Information contained in a consumer report (The prospective
landlord must include the name, address, and phone number of the
consumer reporting agency that furnished the consumer report that
contributed to the adverse action.)
..... The consumer credit report did not contain sufficient information
..... Information received from previous rental history or reference
..... Information received in a criminal record
..... Information received in a civil record
..... Information received from an employment verification

Dated this ..... day of ........, 20....

Agent/Owner Signature"

(2) Any landlord or prospective landlord who violates this section
may be liable to the prospective tenant for an amount not to exceed one
hundred dollars. The prevailing party may also recover court costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees.
(3) ((A stakeholder work group comprised of landlords, tenant
advocates, and representatives of consumer reporting and tenant
screening companies shall convene for the purposes of addressing the
issues of tenant screening including, but not limited to: A tenant's
cost of obtaining a tenant screening report; the portability of tenant
screening reports; criteria used to evaluate a prospective tenant's
background, including which court records may or may not be considered;
and the regulation of tenant screening services. Specific
recommendations on these issues are due to the legislature by December
1, 2012.
(4))) This section does not limit a prospective tenant's rights or
the duties of a screening service as otherwise provided in chapter
19.182 RCW.

--- END ---