BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.600.200 and 2012 c 155 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each school district board of directors is hereby granted and shall
exercise the authority to control, supervise and regulate the conduct
of interschool athletic activities and other interschool
extracurricular activities of an athletic, cultural, social or
recreational nature for students of the district. A board of directors
may delegate control, supervision and regulation of any such activity
to the Washington interscholastic activities association or any other
voluntary nonprofit entity and compensate such entity for services
provided, subject to the following conditions:
(1) The voluntary nonprofit entity shall not discriminate in
connection with employment or membership upon its governing board, or
otherwise in connection with any function it performs, on the basis of
race, creed, national origin, sex or marital status((;)).
(2)(a) Any rules and policies adopted and applied by the voluntary
nonprofit entity that governs student participation in any interschool
activity shall be written; and
(b) Such rules and policies shall provide for notice of the reasons
and a fair opportunity to contest such reasons prior to a final
determination to reject a student's request to participate in or to
continue in an interschool activity.
(3)(a) The association or other voluntary nonprofit entity is
authorized to impose penalties for rules violations upon coaches,
school district administrators, school administrators, and students, as
appropriate, to punish the offending party or parties;
(b) No penalty may be imposed on a student or students unless the
student or students knowingly violated the rules or unless a student
gained a significant competitive advantage or materially disadvantaged
another student through a rule violation;
(c) Any penalty that is imposed for rules violations must be
proportional to the offense;
(d) Any decision resulting in a penalty shall be considered a
decision of the school district conducting the activity in which the
student seeks to participate or was participating and may be appealed
pursuant to RCW 28A.600.205 and 28A.645.010 through 28A.645.030.
(4) The school districts, Washington interscholastic activities
association districts, and leagues that participate in the interschool
extracurricular activities shall not impose more severe penalties for
rule violations than can be imposed by the rules of the association or
the voluntary nonprofit entity.
(5) The association or other voluntary nonprofit entity that has
adopted a rule or policy that requires a transferring student to be
enrolled in a school for any period of time before becoming eligible to
participate in any extracurricular activity may not enforce that rule
on a student, if the student is:
(a) A member of a federally recognized tribe;
(b) Transferring between schools that are both located within the
exterior boundaries of a reservation of a federally recognized tribe;
and
(c) Transferring at the beginning of the school year.
(6) As used in this section and RCW 28A.600.205, "knowingly" means
having actual knowledge of or acting with deliberate ignorance or
reckless disregard for the prohibition involved.

--- END ---