BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that an increasing
number of career opportunities in high-demand fields will require solid
knowledge and skills in science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics, including opportunities at all levels of postsecondary
education from apprenticeship to industry certification to
postbaccalaureate degrees.
(2) The legislature further finds that career and technical courses
can be designed to offer rigorous academic content through applied
learning that is relevant and engaging for students. However, although
there is a requirement that school districts adopt policies regarding
granting academic credit for equivalent career and technical courses,
in practice these policies are not applied in a consistent fashion
across the state.
(3) Therefore, in order to offer high school students increased
flexibility and expanded opportunities to gain critical knowledge and
skills and meet high school graduation requirements in mathematics and
science, the legislature intends to require establishment of a
standardized set of career and technical course equivalents through a
process that assures the courses are both rigorous and relevant for
students. Further, the legislature intends to offer high school
students the opportunity to access career and technical education
course equivalencies for mathematics and science.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.700.070 and 2008 c 170 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
support school district efforts under RCW 28A.230.097 to adopt course
equivalencies for career and technical courses by:
(a) Recommending career and technical curriculum suitable for
course equivalencies;
(b) Publicizing best practices for high schools and school
districts in developing and adopting course equivalencies; and
(c) In consultation with the Washington association for career and
technical education, providing professional development, technical
assistance, and guidance for school districts seeking to expand their
lists of equivalent courses.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide professional development, technical assistance, and guidance
for school districts to develop career and technical course
equivalencies that also qualify as advanced placement courses.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with one or more technical working groups convened for
this purpose, shall develop curriculum frameworks for a selected list
of career and technical courses that may be offered by high schools or
skill centers whose content in science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics is considered equivalent in full or in part to science or
mathematics courses that meet high school graduation requirements. The
content of the courses must be aligned with state essential academic
learning requirements to reflect the common core state standards in
mathematics and the next generation science standards and industry
standards. The office shall submit the list of equivalent career and
technical courses and their curriculum frameworks to the state board of
education for review, an opportunity for public comment, and approval.
The first list of courses under this subsection must be developed and
approved before the 2015-16 school year. Thereafter, the office may
periodically update or revise the list of courses using the process in
this subsection.
(4) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate grant funds to
school districts to increase the integration and rigor of academic
instruction in career and technical courses. Grant recipients are
encouraged to use grant funds to support teams of academic and
technical teachers using a research-based professional development
model supported by the national research center for career and
technical education. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction may require that grant recipients provide matching
resources using federal Carl Perkins funds or other fund sources.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.230.097 and 2013 c 241 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each high school or school district board of directors shall
adopt course equivalencies for career and technical high school courses
offered to students in high schools and skill centers. A career and
technical course equivalency may be for whole or partial credit. Each
school district board of directors shall develop a course equivalency
approval procedure. Boards of directors must approve AP computer
science courses as equivalent to high school mathematics or science,
and must denote on a student's transcript that AP computer science
qualifies as a math-based quantitative course for students who take the
course in their senior year. In order for a board to approve AP
computer science as equivalent to high school mathematics, the student
must be concurrently enrolled in or have successfully completed algebra
II. Beginning no later than the 2015-16 school year, a school district
board of directors must, at a minimum, grant academic course
equivalency in mathematics or science for a high school career and
technical course from the list of courses approved by the state board
of education under RCW 28A.700.070, but is not limited to the courses
on the list. If the list of courses is revised after the 2015-16
school year, the school district board of directors must grant academic
course equivalency based on the revised list beginning with the school
year immediately following the revision.
(2) Career and technical courses determined to be equivalent to
academic core courses, in full or in part, by the high school or school
district shall be accepted as meeting core requirements, including
graduation requirements, if the courses are recorded on the student's
transcript using the equivalent academic high school department
designation and title. Full or partial credit shall be recorded as
appropriate. The high school or school district shall also issue and
keep record of course completion certificates that demonstrate that the
career and technical courses were successfully completed as needed for
industry certification, college credit, or preapprenticeship, as
applicable. The certificate shall be either part of the student's high
school and beyond plan or the student's culminating project, as
determined by the student. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop and make available electronic samples of
certificates of course completion.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.230.010 and 2003 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) School district boards of directors shall identify and offer
courses with content that meet or exceed: (((1))) (a) The basic
education skills identified in RCW 28A.150.210; (((2))) (b) the
graduation requirements under RCW 28A.230.090; (((3))) (c) the courses
required to meet the minimum college entrance requirements under RCW
28A.230.130; and (((4))) (d) the course options for career development
under RCW 28A.230.130. Such courses may be applied or theoretical,
academic, or vocational.
(2) School district boards of directors must provide high school
students with the opportunity to access at least one career and
technical education course that is considered equivalent to a
mathematics course or at least one career and technical education
course that is considered equivalent to a science course as determined
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the state
board of education in RCW 28A.700.070. Students may access such
courses at high schools, interdistrict cooperatives, skill centers or
branch or satellite skill centers, or through online learning or
applicable running start vocational courses.
(3) School district boards of directors of school districts with
fewer than two thousand students may apply to the state board of
education for a waiver from the provisions of subsection (2) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
The state board of education may grant a waiver from the provisions
of RCW 28A.230.010(2) based on an application from a board of directors
of a school district with fewer than two thousand students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 4 and 5 of this act take effect
September 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2014, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---