BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that unfairly harmful
consequences result from employers considering nonconviction
information in initial screening of employment applications, including
such practices as asking applicants if they have ever been arrested,
and then refusing to consider all applicants who check the box
responding "yes." This act is intended to reduce the harm of such
employment practices by banning the box; in other words, stopping
employers from asking about or otherwise using nonconviction
information in initial screening, before determining the applicant is
otherwise qualified for the position. Banning the box gives applicants
a fair chance to be considered on the merits of their qualifications,
merits that would otherwise be disregarded due to information that is
not a finding of guilt.
The legislature further finds that exclusion of applicants from
consideration for employment opportunities based solely on
nonconviction information causes harm in the form of economic
instability, a lifetime of reduced employment opportunities, and
reduced earning potential. Additionally, the legislature finds that by
removing the barrier to employment opportunities posed by nonconviction
information, the state promotes important public interests, including
the interest in increasing self-sufficiency, increasing tax revenue,
conserving scarce governmental resources by reducing reliance on public
benefits, reducing recidivism, keeping individuals and families out of
poverty, and reducing the effects of racial disparities in the criminal
justice system.
RCW 9.96A.010, enacted in 1973, articulates Washington's long-standing public policy of "encouraging and contributing to the
rehabilitation of felons and to assist them in the assumption of the
responsibilities of citizenship, and the opportunity to secure
employment or to pursue, practice or engage in a meaningful and
profitable trade, occupation, vocation, profession or business is an
essential ingredient to rehabilitation and the assumption of
responsibilities of citizenship." WAC 162-12-140 has long stated that
preemployment inquiries about arrests are an unfair practice. Nothing
in this act is inconsistent with the provisions of RCW 9.96A.010,
9.96A.020, 9.96A.030, 9.96A.050, or 9.96A.060, but enforcement powers
beyond those in RCW 9.96A.040 and in WAC 162-12-140, as provided in
this act, are necessary to address the harms described in this section.
The legislature recognizes that numerous jurisdictions in the
United States, including the states of California, Colorado,
Connecticut, Hawaii, Illinois, Maryland, Massachusetts, Minnesota, New
Mexico, and Rhode Island, as well as the city of Seattle and forty-nine
other cities in the United States, have adopted some form of ban the
box legislation. In addition, recognizing the numerous benefits of a
ban the box policy, one of the largest retailers in the United States,
the Target corporation, recently adopted a policy prohibiting asking
prospective employees about their criminal records in initial job
applications. America's largest retailer, Wal-Mart, removed the box
from its employment applications in 2010. This act provides more
modest ban the box protection than other jurisdictions, and is a
necessary step toward giving people a fair chance to work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) An employer may not include a question
on any application for employment, or inquire either orally or in
writing, or receive information through a criminal history background
check or otherwise, about nonconviction information, before having
determined the applicant is otherwise qualified for the position.
(2) An employer may not advertise employment openings in a way that
excludes people with nonconviction records from applying.
(3) An employer may not implement any policy or practice that
automatically or categorically excludes all individuals with a
nonconviction record from any employment position. Prohibited policies
and practices include rejecting an applicant for failure to disclose
nonconviction information.
(4) This section does not apply to:
(a) Any employer hiring a person who will care for children under
the age of eighteen, a vulnerable adult under chapter 74.34 RCW, or a
vulnerable person as defined in RCW 9.96A.060;
(b) Any employer who is expressly permitted or required under any
federal or state law to inquire into, consider, or rely on information
about an applicant's or employee's arrest record for employment
purposes; or
(c) Jobs that include law enforcement, policing, crime prevention,
security, criminal justice, or private investigation services.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Employer" includes public agencies, private individuals,
businesses and corporations, contractors, training and
apprenticeship programs, and placement agencies.
(b) "Nonconviction information" means information about a citation,
arrest, or criminal case that does not result in a finding of guilt, or
where a finding of guilt has subsequently been vacated or dismissed,
and includes:
(i) Nonconviction data as defined in chapter 10.97 RCW; and
(ii) Information contained in law enforcement records or records
collected by the courts relating to:
(A) Arrests, detentions, probable cause hearings, citations,
charges, and service of warrants relating to an incident that did not
lead to a conviction and for which proceedings are no longer actively
pending. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that proceedings are
no longer actively pending if more than one year has elapsed since
arrest, citation, charge, or service of warrant and no disposition has
been entered;
(B) Diversions;
(C) Charges resulting in a dismissal, excluding dismissals based on
incompetency or following completion of a deferred prosecution pursuant
to chapter 10.05 RCW;
(D) Charges resulting in acquittal other than insanity acquittals;
(E) Convictions after a pardon on that conviction has been granted;
(F) Charges dismissed under a stipulated order of continuance or
similar agreement;
(G) Charges dismissed pursuant to completion of a deferred sentence
under RCW 9.95.240, 35.20.255, or 3.50.320, chapter 3.66 RCW, or
pursuant to a deferred disposition under chapter 13.50 RCW;
(H) Charges dismissed following vacation of the conviction pursuant
to RCW 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or 9.96.060;
(I) Charges vacated under chapter 13.50 RCW; and
(J) Charges resolved by forfeiture of bail other than in traffic,
hunting, and fishing cases.
In cases where charges are reduced or dismissed pursuant to a plea
bargain, whether as part of a single or multiple cause numbers, the
parts of records that relate to charges that satisfy the definition of
nonconviction information shall be treated as nonconviction
information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) This act shall not be:
(a) Construed to interfere with, impede, or in any way diminish any
provision in a collective bargaining agreement or the right of
employees to bargain collectively with their employers through
representatives of their own choosing concerning wages or standards or
conditions of employment;
(b) Interpreted or applied to diminish or conflict with any
requirements of state or federal law, including Title VII of the civil
rights act of 1964, the federal fair credit reporting act, 15 U.S.C.
1681, as amended, the Washington state fair credit reporting act,
chapter 19.182 RCW, as amended, the Washington state criminal records
privacy act, chapter 10.97 RCW, as amended, or state laws regarding
criminal background checks, including those related to individuals with
access to children or vulnerable persons, RCW 43.43.830, et seq., as
amended; and
(c) Interpreted or applied as imposing an obligation on the part of
an employer to provide accommodations or job modifications in order to
facilitate the employment or continued employment of an applicant or
employee with a conviction record or who is facing pending criminal
charges.
(2) Nothing in this act shall be construed to discourage or
prohibit an employer from adopting employment policies that are more
generous to employees and job applicants than the requirements of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A right of action to enforce this act is
authorized. It shall be presumed that damages to the applicant are
equal to the cost of the application, if any, plus two hundred dollars.
Fees and costs may be recovered, but additional damages must be proven.
This right of action shall be in addition to and not in derogation of
any other rights and remedies an applicant may have under any other
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington jobs assistance act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 2 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 49.44 RCW.

--- END ---