BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 28B.04
RCW to read as follows:
DISPLACED HOMEMAKER ACT. This chapter expires July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 28B.06
RCW to read as follows:
PROJECT EVEN START. This chapter expires July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 1974 BOND ISSUE FOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS.
RCW 28B.13.010, 28B.13.020, 28B.13.030, 28B.13.040, 28B.13.050,
28B.13.060, and 28B.13.900 are each decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 1975 BOND ISSUE FOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS.
RCW 28B.14.010, 28B.14.020, 28B.14.030, 28B.14.040, 28B.14.050, and
28B.14.060 are each decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 1977 BOND ISSUE FOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS.
RCW 28B.14B.010, 28B.14B.020, 28B.14B.030, 28B.14B.040, 28B.14B.050,
and 28B.14B.060 are each decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 1977 BOND ACT FOR THE REFUNDING OF
OUTSTANDING LIMITED OBLIGATION REVENUE BONDS. RCW 28B.14C.010,
28B.14C.020, 28B.14C.030, 28B.14C.040, 28B.14C.050, 28B.14C.060,
28B.14C.070, 28B.14C.080, 28B.14C.090, 28B.14C.100, 28B.14C.110,
28B.14C.120, 28B.14C.130, 28B.14C.140, and 28B.14C.900 are each
decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 1979 BOND ISSUE FOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS.
RCW 28B.14D.010, 28B.14D.020, 28B.14D.030, 28B.14D.040, 28B.14D.050,
28B.14D.060, 28B.14D.070, 28B.14D.080, 28B.14D.090, 28B.14D.900, and
28B.14D.950 are each decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 1979 BOND ISSUE FOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS.
RCW 28B.14E.010, 28B.14E.020, 28B.14E.030, 28B.14E.040, 28B.14E.050,
28B.14E.060, and 28B.14E.950 are each decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 1981 BOND ISSUE FOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS.
RCW 28B.14G.010, 28B.14G.020, 28B.14G.030, 28B.14G.040, 28B.14G.050,
28B.14G.060, 28B.14G.070, 28B.14G.080, 28B.14G.900, and 28B.14G.950 are
each decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 1977 WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY BUILDINGS
AND FACILITIES FINANCING ACT. RCW 28B.31.010, 28B.31.020, 28B.31.030,
28B.31.050, 28B.31.060, 28B.31.070, 28B.31.080, 28B.31.090, and
28B.31.100 are each decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 1972 COMMUNITY COLLEGES FACILITIES AID--BOND ISSUE. RCW 28B.56.010, 28B.56.020, 28B.56.040, 28B.56.050,
28B.56.070, 28B.56.080, 28B.56.090, 28B.56.100, 28B.56.110, and
28B.56.120 are each decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 1975 COMMUNITY COLLEGE SPECIAL CAPITAL
PROJECTS BOND ACT. RCW 28B.57.010, 28B.57.020, 28B.57.030, 28B.57.040,
28B.57.060, 28B.57.070, 28B.57.080, 28B.57.090, and 28B.57.100 are each
decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 1975 COMMUNITY COLLEGE GENERAL CAPITAL
PROJECTS BOND ACT. RCW 28B.58.010, 28B.58.020, 28B.58.030, 28B.58.040,
28B.58.050, 28B.58.060, 28B.58.070, 28B.58.080, and 28B.58.090 are each
decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 1976 COMMUNITY COLLEGE CAPITAL PROJECTS
BOND ACT. RCW 28B.59.010, 28B.59.020, 28B.59.030, 28B.59.040,
28B.59.050, 28B.59.060, 28B.59.070, 28B.59.080, and 28B.59.090 are each
decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 1977 COMMUNITY COLLEGE CAPITAL PROJECTS
BOND ACT. RCW 28B.59B.010, 28B.59B.020, 28B.59B.030, 28B.59B.040,
28B.59B.050, 28B.59B.060, 28B.59B.070, 28B.59B.080, and 28B.59B.090 are
each decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 1979 COMMUNITY COLLEGE CAPITAL PROJECTS
BOND ACT. RCW 28B.59C.010, 28B.59C.020, 28B.59C.030, 28B.59C.040,
28B.59C.050, 28B.59C.060, 28B.59C.070, and 28B.59C.080 are each
decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 1981 COMMUNITY COLLEGE CAPITAL PROJECTS
BOND ACT. RCW 28B.59D.010, 28B.59D.020, 28B.59D.030, 28B.59D.040,
28B.59D.050, 28B.59D.060, and 28B.59D.070 are each decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 A new section is added to chapter 28B.133
RCW to read as follows:
GAINING INDEPENDENCE FOR STUDENTS WITH DEPENDENTS PROGRAM. This
chapter expires July 1, 2014.

Sec. 119 RCW 28B.10.776 and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) It is the policy of the state of Washington that the essential
requirements level budget calculation for institutions of higher
education include enrollment levels necessary to maintain, by
educational sector, the participation rate funded in the 1993 fiscal
year. The participation rate shall be based on the state's estimated
population ages seventeen and above by appropriate age groups.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2014.

Sec. 120 RCW 28B.50.1401 and 2011 c 118 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created a board of trustees for district
twenty-six and Lake Washington Vocational-Technical Institute,
hereafter known as Lake Washington Institute of Technology. The
members of the board shall be appointed pursuant to the provisions of
RCW 28B.50.100.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2014.

Sec. 121 RCW 28B.50.1402 and 1991 c 238 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created a board of trustees for district
twenty-seven and Renton Vocational-Technical Institute, hereafter known
as Renton Technical College. The members of the board shall be
appointed pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.50.100.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2014.

Sec. 122 RCW 28B.50.1403 and 1991 c 238 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created a board of trustees for district
twenty-five and Bellingham Vocational-Technical Institute, hereafter
known as Bellingham Technical College. The members of the board shall
be appointed pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.50.100.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2014.

Sec. 123 RCW 28B.50.1404 and 1991 c 238 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created a new board of trustees for district
twenty-eight and Bates Vocational-Technical Institute, hereafter known
as Bates Technical College. The members of the board shall be
appointed pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.50.100.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2014.

Sec. 124 RCW 28B.50.1405 and 1991 c 238 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created a new board of trustees for district
twenty-nine and Clover Park Vocational-Technical Institute, hereafter
known as Clover Park Technical College. The members of the board shall
be appointed pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.50.100.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2014.

Sec. 125 RCW 28B.50.1406 and 1994 c 217 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created a board of trustees for district thirty
and Cascadia Community College. The members of the board shall be
appointed pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.50.100.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2014.

Sec. 126 RCW 28B.50.256 and 1991 c 238 s 132 are each amended to
read as follows:
If, before September 1, 1991, the use of a single building facility
is being shared between an existing vocational-technical institute
program and a K-12 program, the respective boards shall continue to
share the use of the facility until such time as it is convenient to
remove one of the two programs to another facility. The determination
of convenience shall be based solely upon the best interests of the
students involved.
If a vocational-technical institute district board and a common
school district board are sharing the use of a single facility, the
program occupying the majority of the space of such facility, exclusive
of space utilized equally by both, shall determine which board will be
charged with the administration and control of such facility. The
determination of occupancy shall be based upon the space occupied as of
January 1, 1990.
The board charged with the administration and control of such
facility may share expenses with the other board for the use of the
facility.
In the event that the two boards are unable to agree upon which
board is to administer and control the facility or upon a fair share of
expenses for the use of the facility, the governor shall appoint an
arbitrator to settle the matter. The decisions of the arbitrator shall
be final and binding upon both boards. The expenses of the arbitration
shall be divided equally by each board.
This section expires July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 127 TITLE TO OR ALL INTEREST IN REAL ESTATE
AND ASSETS OBTAINED FOR VOCATIONAL-TECHNICAL INSTITUTE PURPOSES. RCW
28B.50.301 and 28B.50.302 are each decodified.

Sec. 128 RCW 28B.50.534 and 2007 c 355 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A pilot program is created for two community or technical
colleges to make available courses or a program of study, on the
college campus, designed to enable students under the age of twenty-one
who have completed all state and local high school graduation
requirements except the certificate of academic achievement or
certificate of individual achievement to complete their high school
education and obtain a high school diploma.
(a) The colleges participating in the pilot program in this section
may make courses or programs under this section available by entering
into contracts with local school districts to deliver the courses or
programs. Colleges participating in the pilot program that offer
courses or programs under contract shall be reimbursed for each
enrolled eligible student as provided in the contract, and the high
school diploma shall be issued by the local school district;
(b) Colleges participating in the pilot program may deliver courses
or programs under this section directly. Colleges that deliver courses
or programs directly shall be reimbursed for each enrolled eligible
student as provided in RCW 28A.600.405, and the high school diploma
shall be issued by the college;
(c) Colleges participating in the pilot program may make courses or
programs under this section available through a combination of
contracts with local school districts, collaboration with educational
service districts, and direct service delivery. Colleges participating
in the pilot program may also make courses or programs under this
section available for students at locations in addition to the college
campus; or
(d) Colleges participating in the pilot program may enter into
regional partnerships to carry out the provisions of this subsection
(1).
(2) Regardless of the service delivery method chosen, colleges
participating in the pilot program shall ensure that all eligible
students located in school districts within their college district as
defined in RCW 28B.50.040 have an opportunity to enroll in a course or
program under this section.
(3) Colleges participating in the pilot program shall not require
students enrolled under this section to pay tuition or services and
activities fees; however this waiver of tuition and services and
activities fees shall be in effect only for those courses that lead to
a high school diploma.
(4) Nothing in this section or RCW 28A.600.405 precludes a
community or technical college from offering courses or a program of
study for students other than eligible students as defined by RCW
28A.600.405 to obtain a high school diploma, nor is this section or RCW
28A.600.405 intended to restrict diploma completion programs offered by
school districts or educational service districts. Community and
technical colleges and school districts are encouraged to consult with
educational service districts in the development and delivery of
programs and courses required under this section.
(5) Community and technical colleges participating in the pilot
program shall not be required to administer the Washington assessment
of student learning.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 129 TRANSFERS OF POWERS. RCW 28B.50.914 and
28B.50.915 are each decodified.

Sec. 130 RCW 28B.10.679 and 2007 c 396 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) By September 1, 2008, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the council of presidents, the higher education
coordinating board, and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, under the leadership of the transition math project and in
collaboration with representatives of public two and four-year
institutions of higher education, shall jointly revise the Washington
mathematics placement test to serve as a common college readiness test
for all two and four-year institutions of higher education.
(2) The revised mathematics college readiness test shall be
implemented by all public two and four-year institutions of higher
education by September 1, 2009.)) All public two and four-year
institutions of higher education must use a common performance standard
on the mathematics placement test for purposes of determining college
readiness in mathematics. The performance standard must be publicized
to all high schools in the state.

Sec. 131 RCW 28B.15.543 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 152 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges shall waive tuition
and service and activities fees for students named by the office of
student financial assistance on or before June 30, 1994, as recipients
of the Washington scholars award under RCW 28A.600.100 through
28A.600.150. The waivers shall be used only for undergraduate studies.
To qualify for the waiver, recipients shall enter the college or
university within three years of high school graduation and maintain a
minimum grade point average at the college or university equivalent to
3.30. Students shall be eligible to receive a maximum of twelve
quarters or eight semesters of waivers and may transfer among state-supported institutions of higher education during that period and
continue to have the tuition and services and activities fees waived by
the state-supported institution of higher education that the student
attends. Should the student's cumulative grade point average fall
below 3.30 during the first three quarters or two semesters, that
student may petition the office of student financial assistance which
shall have the authority to establish a probationary period until such
time as the student's grade point average meets required standards.
(2))) Students named by the office of student financial assistance
after June 30, 1994, as recipients of the Washington scholars award
under RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150 shall be eligible to receive
a grant for undergraduate coursework as authorized under RCW
28B.76.660.

PART II
Sec. 201 RCW 28A.600.130 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 127 are each
amended to read as follows:
The office of student financial assistance shall establish a
planning committee to develop criteria for screening and selection of
the Washington scholars each year in accordance with RCW
28A.600.110(1). It is the intent that these criteria shall emphasize
scholastic achievement but not exclude such criteria as leadership
ability and community contribution in final selection procedures. The
Washington scholars planning committee shall have members from selected
state agencies and private organizations having an interest and
responsibility in education, including but not limited to, the office
of superintendent of public instruction, ((the council of presidents))
a representative of four-year institutions of higher education as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the state board for community and technical
colleges, and the Washington friends of higher education.

Sec. 202 RCW 28A.700.060 and 2012 c 229 s 803 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, the
workforce training and education coordinating board, the state board
for community and technical colleges, and ((the council of presidents))
a representative of four-year institutions of higher education as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016 shall work with local school districts,
workforce education programs in colleges, tech prep consortia, and
four-year institutions of higher education to develop model career and
technical education programs of study as described by this section.
(2) Career and technical education programs of study:
(a) Incorporate secondary and postsecondary education elements;
(b) Include coherent and rigorous academic content aligned with
state learning standards and relevant career and technical content in
a coordinated, nonduplicative progression of courses that are aligned
with postsecondary education in a related field;
(c) Include opportunities for students to earn dual high school and
college credit; and
(d) Lead to an industry-recognized credential or certificate at the
postsecondary level, or an associate or baccalaureate degree.
(3) During the 2008-09 school year, model career and technical
education programs of study shall be developed for the following
high-demand programs: Construction, health care, and information
technology. Each school year thereafter, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the state board for community and
technical colleges, and the workforce training and education
coordinating board shall select additional programs of study to
develop, with a priority on high-demand programs as identified under
RCW 28A.700.020.

Sec. 203 RCW 28B.10.0421 and 2001 c 103 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each institution of higher education shall use its own existing
budgetary funds to develop the system for personal identifiers. No new
state funds shall be allocated for this purpose.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2014.

Sec. 204 RCW 28B.10.786 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 138 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) It is the policy of the state of Washington that financial need
not be a barrier to participation in higher education. It is also the
policy of the state of Washington that the essential requirements level
budget calculation include funding for state student financial aid
programs. The calculation should, at a minimum, include a funding
level equal to the amount provided in the second year of the previous
biennium in the omnibus appropriations act, adjusted for the percentage
of needy resident students, by educational sector, likely to be
included in any enrollment increases necessary to maintain, by
educational sector, the participation rate funded in the 1993 fiscal
year. The calculation should also be adjusted to reflect, by
educational sector, any increases in cost of attendance. The cost of
attendance figures should be calculated by the office of financial
management and provided to the appropriate legislative committees by
June 30th of each even-numbered year.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2014.

Sec. 205 RCW 28B.30.515 and 2012 c 229 s 530 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that access to baccalaureate and graduate
degree programs continues to be limited for residents of north
Snohomish, Island, and Skagit counties. Studies conducted by the state
board for community and technical colleges, the higher education
coordinating board, and ((the council of presidents)) a representative
of four-year institutions of higher education confirm that enrollment
in higher education compared to demand in this geographic region lags
behind enrollment in other parts of the state, particularly for
upper-division courses leading to advanced degrees.
(2) The legislature also finds that access to high employer demand
programs of study is imperative for the state's global competitiveness
and economic prosperity, particularly those degrees in the science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) fields that align with
the workforce skill demands of the regional economy, that support the
aerospace industry, and provide skilled undergraduate and
graduate-degree engineers required by the largest employers in the
aerospace industry cluster.
(3) The legislature finds that meeting the long-range goal of
greatly expanded access for the population of the region to the widest
array of baccalaureate and graduate programs can best be accomplished
by assigning responsibility to a research university with multiple
experiences in similar settings.
(4) Management and leadership of the University Center of North
Puget Sound is assigned to Washington State University to meet the
needs of the Everett metropolitan area and the north Snohomish, Island,
and Skagit county region and the state of Washington for baccalaureate
and graduate degrees offered by a state university. The chief
executive officer of the University Center of North Puget Sound is the
director who reports to the president of Washington State University.
The director shall manage the activities and logistics of operating the
center, make policy and planning recommendations to the council in
subsection (5) of this section, and implement decisions of the council.
(5)(a) Washington State University and Everett Community College
must collaborate with community leaders, and other four-year
institutions of higher education that offer programs at the University
Center of North Puget Sound to serve the varied interests of students
in the region. To this end, a coordinating and planning council must
be established to be responsible for long-range and strategic planning,
interinstitutional collaboration, collaboration with the community
served, and dispute resolution for the center. The following
individuals shall comprise the coordinating and planning council:
(i) The president of Washington State University, or his or her
designee;
(ii) The provost of Washington State University, or his or her
designee;
(iii) The president of Everett Community College;
(iv) Two representatives of two other institutions of higher
education that offer baccalaureate or graduate degree programs at the
center;
(v) A student enrolled at the University Center of North Puget
Sound appointed by the coordinating and planning council;
(vi) The director of the council, as the nonvoting chair;
(vii) A community leader appointed by the president of Everett
Community College; and
(viii) A community leader appointed by the mayor of Everett.
(b) The coordinating and planning council may appoint other groups,
as appropriate, to advise on administration and operations, and may
alter its own composition by agreement of all the members.
(6)(a) Washington State University shall assume leadership of the
center upon completion and approval by the legislature as provided
under (d) of this subsection of a strategic plan for meeting the
academic needs of the region and successful establishment of an
engineering degree program. The strategic plan must build on the
strengths of the institutions, reflecting each institution's mission,
in order to provide the region with the highest standard of educational
programs, research, and service to the community. The strategic plan
must include a multibiennium budget that addresses both operating and
capital expenses required to effectively implement the plan. The
strategic plan shall be developed with the collaboration of the
University Center at Everett Community College and all the institutions
of higher education that provide baccalaureate degrees at the
University Center, and community leaders.
(b) Center partners must implement the strategic plan with careful
attention to the academic and professional standards established and
maintained by each institution and by the appropriate accrediting
bodies, and to the historic role of each institution's governing board
in setting policy.
(c) The strategic plan must address expansion of the range and
depth of educational opportunities in the region and include strategies
that:
(i) Build upon baccalaureate and graduate degree offerings at the
center;
(ii) Meet projected student enrollment demands for baccalaureate,
graduate, and certificate programs in the region;
(iii) Meet employers' needs for skilled workers by expanding high
employer demand programs of study as defined in RCW 28B.50.030, with an
initial and ongoing emphasis by Washington State University on
undergraduate and graduate science, technology, mathematics, and
engineering degree programs, including a variety of engineering
disciplines such as civil, mechanical, aeronautical, and aerospace
manufacturing;
(iv) Coordinate delivery of lower and upper division courses to
maximize student opportunities and resources; and
(v) Transfer budget support and resources for the center from
Everett Community College to Washington State University.
(d) The strategic plan must be completed by December 1, 2012, and
submitted to the legislature for review. The strategic plan shall be
considered approved if the legislature does not take further action on
the strategic plan during the 2013 legislative session. The transfer
of the responsibility for the management and operation of the
University Center of North Puget Sound to Washington State University
must occur by July 1, 2014.
(7)(a) Academic programming and delivery at the center must be
developed in accordance with the missions of Washington State
University, Everett Community College, and other institutions of higher
education that have a presence at the center.
(b) Each institution shall abide by the guidelines for university
centers adopted by the student achievement council.
(c) Each institution shall award all degrees and certificates
granted in the programs it delivers at the center.
(d) The coordinating council described in subsection (5) of this
section shall establish a process for prioritizing new programs and
revising existing programs that facilitates timeliness of new
offerings, recognizes the internal processes of the proposing
institutions, and addresses each proposal's fit with the needs of the
region.
(8)(a) Washington State University shall review center expansion
needs and consider capital facilities funding at least annually.
Washington State University and Everett Community College must
cooperate in preparing funding requests and bond financing for
submission to the legislature on behalf of development at the center,
in accordance with each institution's process and priorities for
advancing legislative requests.
(b) Washington State University shall design, construct, and manage
any facility developed at the center. Any facility developed at the
center with Everett Community College capital funding must be designed
by Everett Community College in consultation with Washington State
University. Building construction may be managed by Washington State
University via an interagency agreement which details responsibility
and associated costs. Building operations and management for all
facilities at the center must be governed by the infrastructure and
operating cost allocation method described in subsection (9) of this
section.
(9) Washington State University has responsibility for
infrastructure development and maintenance for the center. All
infrastructure operating and maintenance costs are to be shared in what
is deemed to be an equitable and fair manner based on space allocation,
special cost, and other relevant considerations. Washington State
University may make infrastructure development and maintenance
decisions in consultation with the council described in subsection (5)
of this section.
(10) In the event that conflict cannot be resolved through the
coordinating council described in subsection (5) of this section the
student achievement council dispute resolution must be employed.

Sec. 206 RCW 28B.50.205 and 1991 c 238 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board for community and technical colleges shall make
information available to all newly matriculated students on methods of
transmission of the human immunodeficiency virus and prevention of
acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. The curricula and materials shall
be reviewed for medical accuracy by the office on AIDS in coordination
with the appropriate regional AIDS service network.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2014.

Sec. 207 RCW 28B.50.285 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 24 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2010, and within existing resources, the college
board may create a single web site for the purpose of advertising the
availability of opportunity express funding to Washington citizens;
explaining that opportunity express helps people who want to pursue
college and apprenticeship for certain targeted industries; and
explaining that opportunity express includes the following tracks:
Worker retraining for unemployed adults; training programs approved by
the commissioner of the employment security department, training
programs administered by labor and management partnerships, and
training programs prioritized by industry, for unemployed adults and
incumbent workers; opportunity internships for high school students;
and opportunity grants for low-income adults. The web site may also
direct interested individuals to the appropriate local intake office.
The web site may also include a link to the Washington state department
of labor and industries apprenticeship program.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2014.

Sec. 208 RCW 28B.77.220 and 2013 c 23 s 61 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The council must convene work groups to develop transfer
associate degrees that will satisfy lower division requirements at
public four-year institutions of higher education for specific academic
majors. Work groups must include representatives from the state board
for community and technical colleges and ((the council of presidents))
a representative of four-year institutions of higher education, as well
as faculty from two and four-year institutions. Work groups may
include representatives from independent four-year institutions.
(2) Each transfer associate degree developed under this section
must enable a student to complete the lower-division courses or
competencies for general education requirements and preparation for the
major that a direct-entry student would typically complete in the
first-year student and sophomore years for that academic major.
(3) Completion of a transfer associate degree does not guarantee a
student admission into an institution of higher education or admission
into a major, minor, or professional program at an institution of
higher education that has competitive admission standards for the
program based on grade point average or other performance criteria.
(4) During the 2004-05 academic year, the work groups must develop
transfer degrees for elementary education, engineering, and nursing.
As necessary based on demand or identified need, the council must
convene additional groups to identify and develop additional transfer
degrees. The council must give priority to majors in high demand by
transfer students and majors that the general direct transfer agreement
associate degree does not adequately prepare students to enter
automatically upon transfer.
(5) The council, in collaboration with the intercollege relations
commission, must collect and maintain lists of courses offered by each
community and technical college and public four-year institution of
higher education that fall within each transfer associate degree.
(6) The council must monitor implementation of transfer associate
degrees by public four-year institutions to ensure compliance with
subsection (2) of this section.
(7) Beginning January 10, 2005, the council must submit a progress
report on the development of transfer associate degrees to the higher
education committees of the house of representatives and the senate.
The first progress report must include measurable benchmark indicators
to monitor the effectiveness of the initiatives in improving transfer
and baseline data for those indicators before the implementation of the
initiatives. Subsequent reports must be submitted by January 10th of
each odd-numbered year and must monitor progress on the indicators,
describe development of additional transfer associate degrees, and
provide other data on improvements in transfer efficiency.

Sec. 209 RCW 28B.77.230 and 2012 c 229 s 116 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The council, the state board for community and technical
colleges, ((the council of presidents)) a representative of four-year
institutions of higher education, the four-year institutions of higher
education, the private independent higher education institutions, and
the private career schools shall collaborate to carry out the following
goals:
(a) Increase the number of students who receive academic credit for
prior learning and the number of students who receive credit for prior
learning that counts towards their major or towards earning their
degree, certificate, or credential, while ensuring that credit is
awarded only for high quality, course-level competencies;
(b) Increase the number and type of academic credits accepted for
prior learning in institutions of higher education, while ensuring that
credit is awarded only for high quality, course-level competencies;
(c) Develop transparent policies and practices in awarding academic
credit for prior learning;
(d) Improve prior learning assessment practices across the
institutions of higher education;
(e) Create tools to develop faculty and staff knowledge and
expertise in awarding credit for prior learning and to share exemplary
policies and practices among institutions of higher education;
(f) Develop articulation agreements when patterns of credit for
prior learning are identified for particular programs and pathways; and
(g) Develop outcome measures to track progress on the goals
outlined in this section.
(2) The council shall convene the academic credit for prior
learning work group.
(a) The work group must include the following members:
(i) One representative from the council;
(ii) One representative from the state board for community and
technical colleges;
(iii) One representative ((from the council of presidents)) of the
four-year institutions of higher education;
(iv) Two representatives each from faculty from two and four-year
institutions of higher education;
(v) Two representatives from private career schools;
(vi) Two representatives from business; and
(vii) Two representatives from labor.
(b) The purpose of the work group is to coordinate and implement
the goals in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The council shall report progress on the goals and outcome
measures annually by December 31st.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "prior learning" means the
knowledge and skills gained through work and life experience; through
military training and experience; and through formal and informal
education and training from in-state and out-of-state institutions
including foreign institutions.

Sec. 210 RCW 28B.110.040 and 2012 c 229 s 567 are each amended to
read as follows:
The executive director of the student achievement council, in
consultation with ((the council of presidents)) a representative of
four-year institutions of higher education and the state board for
community and technical colleges, shall monitor the compliance by
institutions of higher education with this chapter.
(1) The council shall establish a timetable and guidelines for
compliance with this chapter.
(2) By November 30, 1990, each institution shall submit to the
council for approval a plan to comply with the requirements of RCW
28B.110.030. The plan shall contain measures to ensure institutional
compliance with the provisions of this chapter by September 30, 1994.
If participation in activities, such as intercollegiate athletics and
matriculation in academic programs is not proportionate to the
percentages of male and female enrollment, the plan should outline
efforts to identify barriers to equal participation and to encourage
gender equity in all aspects of college and university life.
(3) The council may delegate to the state board for community and
technical colleges any or all responsibility for community college
compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

--- END ---