BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.220 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In order for students to have the opportunity to develop the
basic education knowledge and skills under RCW 28A.150.210, school
districts must provide instruction of sufficient quantity and quality
and give students the opportunity to complete graduation requirements
that are intended to prepare them for postsecondary education, gainful
employment, and citizenship. The program established under this
section shall be the minimum instructional program of basic education
offered by school districts.
(2) Each school district shall make available to students the
following minimum instructional offering each school year:
(a) For students enrolled in grades one through twelve, at least a
district-wide annual average of one thousand hours, which shall be
increased to at least one thousand eighty instructional hours for
students enrolled in each of grades seven through twelve and at least
one thousand instructional hours for students in each of grades one
through six according to an implementation schedule adopted by the
legislature, but not before the ((2014-15)) 2015-16 school year; and
(b) For students enrolled in kindergarten, at least four hundred
fifty instructional hours, which shall be increased to at least one
thousand instructional hours according to the implementation schedule
under RCW 28A.150.315.
(3) The instructional program of basic education provided by each
school district shall include:
(a) Instruction in the essential academic learning requirements
under RCW 28A.655.070;
(b) Instruction that provides students the opportunity to complete
twenty-four credits for high school graduation, subject to a phased-in
implementation of the twenty-four credits as established by the
legislature. Course distribution requirements may be established by
the state board of education under RCW 28A.230.090;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages;
(d) Supplemental instruction and services for underachieving
students through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005
through 28A.165.065;
(e) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled
students and exited students whose primary language is other than
English through the transitional bilingual instruction program under
RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080;
(f) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense
as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with
disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020; and
(g) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010
through 28A.185.030.
(4) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require
individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours
per day or to take any particular courses.
(5)(a) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade
basic educational program shall be accessible to all students who are
five years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than
twenty-one years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred
eighty school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by
a school district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or
equivalent, in kindergarten, to be increased to a minimum of one
hundred eighty school days per school year according to the
implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315.
((However,)) (b) Schools administering the Washington kindergarten
inventory of developing skills may use up to three school days at the
beginning of the school year to meet with parents and families as
required in the parent involvement component of the inventory.
((In addition, effective May 1, 1979)) (c) In the case of students
who are graduating from high school, a school district may schedule the
last five school days of the one hundred ((and)) eighty day school year
for noninstructional purposes ((in the case of students who are
graduating from high school)), including, but not limited to, the
observance of graduation and early release from school upon the request
of a student((, and)). All such students may be claimed as a full-time
equivalent student to the extent they could otherwise have been so
claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260. Any hours
scheduled by a school district for noninstructional purposes during the
last five school days for such students shall count toward the
instructional hours requirement in subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes a school district from
enriching the instructional program of basic education, such as
offering additional instruction or providing additional services,
programs, or activities that the school district determines to be
appropriate for the education of the school district's students.
(7) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental
program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

--- END ---