BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.72 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person paid to gather signatures of electors on a state or
local initiative, referendum, or recall petition must register with the
secretary of state and complete either a training program that includes
information prescribed by the secretary or an online training program
made available by the secretary before collecting signatures. The
registration application must include the following:
(a) The full name and any assumed name of the applicant;
(b) The permanent address of the applicant, as well as a local
address if the applicant is from out-of-state;
(c) The applicant's e-mail address and phone number;
(d) A copy of the applicant's driver license, state identification
card, or other photo identification;
(e) A list of the initiative, referendum, and recall petitions on
which the applicant will gather signatures;
(f) Evidence that the applicant has completed the training program
required by this section;
(g) A recent digital photograph of the applicant showing the face
or the face, neck, and shoulders of the applicant;
(h) A statement signed by the prime sponsor or sponsors of the
initiative, referendum, or recall petition or the signature gathering
business certifying that a national background check has been completed
for the applicant and the applicant has not been convicted for a
criminal offense involving fraud, forgery, or identity theft in any
state in the past five years and has not been found in violation of
elections law under chapter 29A.84 RCW, or its equivalent in another
jurisdiction, in the past five years;
(i) A statement signed by the applicant acknowledging that the
applicant has read and understands Washington law applicable to the
gathering of signatures on initiative, referendum, and recall petitions
as the law is summarized in the training program established by the
secretary of state;
(j) A statement signed by the prime sponsor or sponsors of the
initiative, referendum, or recall petition or the signature gathering
business paying the signature gatherer acknowledging that the sponsors
or the business or entity is liable for violations of the law or rule
committed by the signature gatherer; and
(k) Any other information required by the secretary.
(2) The secretary of state must register each applicant who has
completed the registration process outlined in subsection (1) of this
section within five business days of completing the process.
(3) An individual is ineligible for registration under this section
if he or she:
(a) Has been convicted of a criminal offense involving fraud,
forgery, or identification theft in any jurisdiction within the past
five years;
(b) Has been convicted of a crime under chapter 29A.84 RCW, or its
equivalent in another jurisdiction, in the past five years;
(c) Has been found in violation of elections law under chapter
29A.84 RCW, or its equivalent in another jurisdiction, in the past five
years; or
(d) Has submitted an incomplete application.
(4) The secretary of state must assign each registered signature
gatherer a registration number.
(5) An individual registered under this section must carry on his
or her person evidence of registration including the paid signature
gatherer's photograph and registration number. If requested, the paid
signature gatherer must produce the evidence of registration.
(6) An individual registered under this section may not obtain
signatures on a petition or prospective petition for which the
individual is being paid and, at the same time, obtain signatures on a
petition or prospective petition for which the individual is not being
paid.
(7) A paid signature gatherer must reregister with the secretary of
state before the second Monday in January of each odd-numbered year.
Failure to do so terminates the registration.
(8) A fine of five hundred dollars shall be issued to the prime
sponsor or sponsors of the initiative, referendum, or recall petition
or the signature gathering business for each of its paid signature
gatherers who are not registered under this section, and for each
signature gatherer who violates subsection (6) of this section.
(9) The applicant's driver license, state identification card, or
other photo identification required under subsection (1)(d) of this
section is exempt from public inspection or copying.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29A.72 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A signature gathering business operating in this state engaged
in the activity of collecting signatures for state or local initiative,
referendum, or recall petitions and that are using paid signature
gatherers must register with the secretary of state. The registration
application must include:
(a) The name and physical address of the business;
(b) An e-mail address and phone number for the business;
(c) The name of the individual representing the organization or
entity to complete the training program prescribed by the secretary of
state;
(d) The business license number required by chapter 19.02 RCW;
(e) A list of individuals being paid to collect signatures for the
signature gathering business;
(f) A list of the initiative, referendum, and recall petitions for
which the signature gathering business is paying individuals to gather
signatures; and
(g) An affirmation signed by the sponsor or sponsors of the
signature gathering business that the organization or entity operates
in compliance with the law.
(2) The secretary of state must register each signature gathering
business that has completed the registration process outlined in
subsection (1) of this section within five business days of completing
the process.
(3) A signature gathering business engaged in the activity of
collecting signatures for state or local initiative, referendum, or
recall petitions in this state and that uses paid signature gatherers
must notify the secretary of state if that business is using paid
signature gatherers who were not listed on the original registration
for that election cycle and if the business becomes involved in
gathering signatures on a new petition within five business days of
hiring new signature gatherers or becoming involved in the new
petition.
(4) A signature gathering business must reregister with the
secretary of state before the second Monday in January of each odd-numbered year. Failure to do so terminates the registration.
(5) A signature gathering business that uses paid signature
gatherers not registered under section 1 of this act or who obtain
signatures in violation of section 1 of this act shall be issued a five
hundred dollar fine for each violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 29A.72 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply to sections 1 and 2 of this
act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Paid signature gatherer" means an individual who is
compensated through payments of money or other valuable consideration
to obtain signatures on a state or local initiative, referendum, or
recall petition.
(2) "Prime sponsor or sponsors" means the registered voter or
voters who complete the affidavit on proposed initiative or referendum
or files a recall petition under chapter 29A.56 RCW as well as any
persons who hold themselves out publicly as the sponsor of an
initiative, referendum, or recall petition.
(3) "Signature gathering business" means a business that
compensates individuals for gathering signatures for state or local
initiative, referendum, or recall petitions.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.56.160 and 2003 c 111 s 1412 are each amended to
read as follows:
Recall petitions must be printed on single sheets of paper of good
writing quality (including but not limited to newsprint) not less than
eleven inches in width and not less than fourteen inches in length. No
petition may be circulated or signed prior to the first day of the one
hundred eighty or two hundred seventy day period established by RCW
29A.56.150 for that recall petition. The petitions must be
substantially in the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:
Petition for the recall of (here insert the name of the office and
of the person whose recall is petitioned for) to the Honorable (here
insert the name and title of the officer with whom the charge is
filed).
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of (the state of
Washington or the political subdivision in which the recall is to be
held), respectfully direct that a special election be called to
determine whether or not (here insert the name of the person charged
and the office which he or she holds) be recalled and discharged from
his or her office, for and on account of (his or her having committed
the act or acts of malfeasance or misfeasance while in office, or
having violated his or her oath of office, as the case may be), in the
following particulars: (here insert the synopsis of the charge); and
each of us for himself or herself says: I have personally signed this
petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Washington in the precinct
and city (or town) and county written after my name, and my residence
address is correctly stated, and to my knowledge, have signed this
petition only once.
The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.
The following declaration must be printed on the reverse side of
the petition, and must be signed by the signature gatherer who
circulated the petition sheet after the sheet has been signed by
petitioners but before the petition is submitted to the secretary of
state or county auditor:

I, . . . . . . . . . . . ., swear or affirm under penalty of law
that I circulated this sheet of the foregoing petition, and that, to
the best of my knowledge, every person who signed this sheet of the
foregoing petition knowingly and without any compensation or promise of
compensation willingly signed his or her true name and that the
information provided therewith is true and correct. I further
acknowledge that under Chapter 29A.84 RCW, forgery of signatures on
this petition constitutes a class C felony, and that offering any
consideration or gratuity to any person to induce them to sign a
petition is a gross misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by
fine or imprisonment or both.

Signature . . . . . . . . . . . .

Date of Signature . . . . . . . . . . . .

Print Name . . . . . . . . . . . .

Print Street Address . . . . . . . . . . . .

Print City, State, Zip Code . . . . . . . . . . . .

Signing this declaration constitutes an oath subjecting the
signatory to the penalty of the law. The declaration must be
individually signed by the signature gatherer. Stamps or other
signature reproductions may not be used.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.72.110 and 2005 c 239 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Petitions for proposing measures for submission to the legislature
at its next regular session must be substantially in the following
form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

INITIATIVE PETITION FOR SUBMISSION TO THE LEGISLATURE

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully direct that this petition and the proposed
measure known as Initiative Measure No. . . . . and entitled (here set
forth the established ballot title of the measure), a full, true, and
correct copy of which is printed on the reverse side of this petition,
be transmitted to the legislature of the State of Washington at its
next ensuing regular session, and we respectfully petition the
legislature to enact said proposed measure into law; and each of us for
himself or herself says: I have personally signed this petition; I am
a legal voter of the State of Washington in the city (or town) and
county written after my name, my residence address is correctly stated,
and I have knowingly signed this petition only once.
The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.
The following declaration must be printed on the reverse side of
the petition, and must be signed by the signature gatherer who
circulated the petition sheet after the sheet has been signed by
petitioners but before the petition is submitted to the secretary of
state:

I, . . . . . . . . . . . ., swear or affirm under penalty of law
that I circulated this sheet of the foregoing petition, and that, to
the best of my knowledge, every person who signed this sheet of the
foregoing petition knowingly and without any compensation or promise of
compensation willingly signed his or her true name and that the
information provided therewith is true and correct. I further
acknowledge that under chapter 29A.84 RCW, forgery of signatures on
this petition constitutes a class C felony, and that offering any
consideration or gratuity to any person to induce them to sign a
petition is a gross misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by
fine or imprisonment or both.

Signature . . . . . . . . . . . .

Date of Signature . . . . . . . . . . . .

Print Name . . . . . . . . . . . .

Print Street Address . . . . . . . . . . . .

Print City, State, Zip Code . . . . . . . . . . . .

Signing this declaration constitutes an oath subjecting the
signatory to the penalty of the law. The declaration must be
individually signed by the signature gatherer. Stamps or other
signature reproductions may not be used.
RCW 9A.46.020 applies to any conduct constituting harassment
against a petition signature gatherer. This penalty does not preclude
the victim from seeking any other remedy otherwise available under law.

((The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.))

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.72.120 and 2005 c 239 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Petitions for proposing measures for submission to the people for
their approval or rejection at the next ensuing general election must
be substantially in the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

INITIATIVE PETITION FOR SUBMISSION TO THE PEOPLE

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully direct that the proposed measure known as
Initiative Measure No. . . . ., entitled (here insert the established
ballot title of the measure), a full, true and correct copy of which is
printed on the reverse side of this petition, be submitted to the legal
voters of the State of Washington for their approval or rejection at
the general election to be held on the . . . . . day of November,
(year); and each of us for himself or herself says: I have personally
signed this petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Washington, in
the city (or town) and county written after my name, my residence
address is correctly stated, and I have knowingly signed this petition
only once.
The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.
The following declaration must be printed on the reverse side of
the petition, and must be signed by the signature gatherer who
circulated the petition sheet after the sheet has been signed by
petitioners but before the petition is submitted to the secretary of
state:

I, . . . . . . . . . . . ., swear or affirm under penalty of law
that I circulated this sheet of the foregoing petition, and that, to
the best of my knowledge, every person who signed this sheet of the
foregoing petition knowingly and without any compensation or promise of
compensation willingly signed his or her true name and that the
information provided therewith is true and correct. I further
acknowledge that under chapter 29A.84 RCW, forgery of signatures on
this petition constitutes a class C felony, and that offering any
consideration or gratuity to any person to induce them to sign a
petition is a gross misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by
fine or imprisonment or both.

Signature . . . . . . . . . . . .

Date of Signature . . . . . . . . . . . .

Print Name . . . . . . . . . . . .

Print Street Address . . . . . . . . . . . .

Print City, State, Zip Code . . . . . . . . . . . .

Signing this declaration constitutes an oath subjecting the
signatory to the penalty of the law. The declaration must be
individually signed by the signature gatherer. Stamps or other
signature reproductions may not be used.
RCW 9A.46.020 applies to any conduct constituting harassment
against a petition signature gatherer. This penalty does not preclude
the victim from seeking any other remedy otherwise available under law.

((The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.))

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.72.130 and 2013 c 11 s 74 are each amended to read
as follows:
Petitions ordering that acts or parts of acts passed by the
legislature be referred to the people at the next ensuing general
election, or special election ordered by the legislature, must be
substantially in the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

PETITION FOR REFERENDUM

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully order and direct that Referendum Measure No.
. . . . ., filed to revoke a (or part or parts of a) bill that (concise
statement required by RCW 29A.72.050) and that was passed by the
. . . . . . legislature of the State of Washington at the last regular
(special) session of said legislature, shall be referred to the people
of the state for their approval or rejection at the regular (special)
election to be held on the . . . . day of November, (year); and each of
us for himself or herself says: I have personally signed this
petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Washington, in the city
(or town) and county written after my name, my residence address is
correctly stated, and I have knowingly signed this petition only once.
The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.
The following declaration must be printed on the reverse side of
the petition, and must be signed by the signature gatherer who
circulated the petition sheet after the sheet has been signed by
petitioners but before the petition is submitted to the secretary of
state:

I, . . . . . . . . . . . ., swear or affirm under penalty of law
that I circulated this sheet of the foregoing petition, and that, to
the best of my knowledge, every person who signed this sheet of the
foregoing petition knowingly and without any compensation or promise of
compensation willingly signed his or her true name and that the
information provided therewith is true and correct. I further
acknowledge that under chapter 29A.84 RCW, forgery of signatures on
this petition constitutes a class C felony, and that offering any
consideration or gratuity to any person to induce them to sign a
petition is a gross misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by
fine or imprisonment or both.

Signature . . . . . . . . . . . .

Date of Signature . . . . . . . . . . . .

Print Name . . . . . . . . . . . .

Print Street Address . . . . . . . . . . . .

Print City, State, Zip Code . . . . . . . . . . . .

Signing this declaration constitutes an oath subjecting the
signatory to the penalty of the law. The declaration must be
individually signed by the signature gatherer. Stamps or other
signature reproductions may not be used.
RCW 9A.46.020 applies to any conduct constituting harassment
against a petition signature gatherer. This penalty does not preclude
the victim from seeking any other remedy otherwise available under law.

((The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 29A.72 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary of state shall adopt rules necessary to implement
chapter . . ., Laws of 2014 (this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect January 3, 2015.

--- END ---