BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds research evidence of
a positive relationship between family engagement and improved academic
achievement. This is true across socioeconomic, racial, ethnic, and
educational backgrounds for students of all ages. The legislature
further finds that in order to be successful in school, students must
have their social, economic, and family needs as well as their academic
needs met. Schools cannot accomplish this in isolation, but instead
must establish partnerships with community organizations and agencies,
businesses, and other local groups. The importance of families and
communities particularly for low-achieving schools is recognized: One
of the seven turnaround principles under state and federal school
improvement is providing ongoing mechanisms for family and community
engagement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.657
RCW to read as follows:
Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award grants
on a competitive basis to persistently lowest-achieving schools
identified under this chapter to support implementation of successful
models of family and community engagement. To qualify for a grant, a
school must demonstrate that its academic performance audit and needs
assessment based on the turnaround principles indicate a need for
improved family and community engagement. In addition, the school must
develop its proposal for specific strategies or programs of family and
community engagement to be supported by the grant with input and
participation from families and community organizations associated with
the school. Grants awarded under this section may not exceed a
duration of three years.

--- END ---