BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In 2012 the legislature made a targeted
investment of funding and technical assistance in urban schools that
are dramatically affected by poverty and the educational opportunity
gap. The urban school turnaround initiative began in two selected
schools in the state's largest urban school district. Although the
initiative is only in its second year, preliminary results based on
student achievement on state assessments are promising. Therefore the
legislature intends to extend the initiative to additional urban school
districts in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Subject to funds appropriated
specifically for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall select up to four schools in two large urban
school districts in the state to participate in an urban school
turnaround initiative beginning in the 2014-15 school year. One of the
school districts shall be located in Eastern Washington and one shall
be located in Western Washington. The school districts may not have
previously received state funds for an urban school turnaround
initiative. The selected schools shall be low-performing schools; be
located within the same community in their respective districts and
form a continuum of education for the students in that community; have
significant educational opportunity gaps; and include a mix of
elementary, middle, or high schools.
(2) The office shall allocate funds appropriated for the urban
school turnaround initiative to the school districts to be used
exclusively in the selected schools. The districts may not charge an
overhead or indirect fee for the allocated funds or supplant other
state, federal, or local funds in the selected schools. Funding
allocated under this section is intended to be one time, but school
districts may expend the funds over a three-year period.
(3) The school districts shall use the funds for intensive
supplemental instruction, services, and materials in the selected
schools, including but not limited to professional development for
school staff; updated curriculum, materials, and technology; extended
learning opportunities for students; reduced class size; summer
enrichment activities; school-based health clinics; and other research-based initiatives to dramatically turn around the performance and close
the opportunity gap in the schools. Priorities for the expenditure of
the funds shall be determined by the leadership and staff of each
school.
(4) The office shall monitor the activities in the selected schools
and the expenditure of funds to ensure the intent of this section is
met, and submit a report to the legislature by December 1, 2017,
including outcomes resulting from the urban school turnaround
initiative. The report submitted to the legislature must include a
comparison of student learning achievement in the selected schools with
schools of comparable demographics that have not participated in the
initiative.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2018.

--- END ---