BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that judges in the
trial courts throughout the state effectively utilize what are known as
therapeutic courts to remove a defendant's or respondent's case, with
the consent of the defendant or respondent and the consent of a
government authority, from the criminal and civil court traditional
trial track and allow those defendants or respondents the opportunity
to obtain treatment services to address particular issues that may have
contributed to the conduct that led to their arrest or other issues
before the court. Trial courts have proved adept at creative
approaches in fashioning a wide variety of therapeutic courts
addressing the spectrum of social issues that can contribute to
criminal activity and engagement with the child welfare system.
(2) The legislature further finds that by focusing on the specific
individual's needs, providing treatment for the issues presented, and
ensuring rapid and appropriate accountability for program violations,
therapeutic courts may decrease recidivism, improve the safety of the
community, and improve the life of the program participant and the
lives of the participant's family members by decreasing the severity
and frequency of the specific behavior addressed by the therapeutic
court.
(3) The legislature recognizes the inherent authority of the
judiciary under Article IV, section 1 of the state Constitution to
establish therapeutic courts, and the outstanding contribution to the
state and local communities made by the establishment of therapeutic
courts and desires to provide a general provision in statute
acknowledging and encouraging the judiciary to provide for therapeutic
court programs to address the particular needs within a given judicial
jurisdiction.
(4) Therapeutic court programs may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Adult drug court;
(b) Juvenile drug court;
(c) Family dependency treatment court or family drug court;
(d) Mental health court, which may include participants with
developmental disabilities;
(e) DUI court;
(f) Veterans treatment court;
(g) Truancy court;
(h) Domestic violence court;
(i) Gambling court;
(j) Community court;
(k) Homeless court;
(l) Treatment, responsibility, and accountability on campus (Back
on TRAC) court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Emerging best practice" or "promising practice" means a
program or practice that, based on statistical analyses or a well-established theory of change, shows potential for meeting the evidence-
based or research-based criteria, which may include the use of a
program that is evidence-based for outcomes other than those listed in
this section.
(2) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that: (a) Has
been tested in heterogeneous or intended populations with multiple
randomized, or statistically controlled evaluations, or both; or one
large multiple site randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation,
or both, where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review
demonstrates sustained improvements in at least one outcome; or (b) may
be implemented with a set of procedures to allow successful replication
in Washington and, when possible, is determined to be cost-beneficial.
(3) "Government authority" means prosecutor or other representative
initiating action leading to a proceeding in therapeutic court.
(4) "Participant" means an accused person, offender, or respondent
in the judicial proceeding.
(5) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has been
tested with a single randomized, or statistically controlled
evaluation, or both, demonstrating sustained desirable outcomes; or
where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review supports
sustained outcomes as described in this subsection but does not meet
the full criteria for evidence-based.
(6) "Specialty court" and "therapeutic court" both mean a court
utilizing a program or programs structured to achieve both a reduction
in recidivism and an increase in the likelihood of rehabilitation, or
to reduce child abuse and neglect, out-of-home placements of children,
termination of parental rights, and substance abuse and mental health
symptoms among parents or guardians and their children through
continuous and intense judicially supervised treatment and the
appropriate use of services, sanctions, and incentives.
(7) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a therapeutic
court including, but not limited to: Court and clerk personnel with
therapeutic court duties, prosecuting attorneys, the attorney general
or his or her representatives, defense counsel, monitoring personnel,
and others acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties.
(8) "Trial court" means a superior court authorized under Title 2
RCW or a district or municipal court authorized under Title 3 or 35
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Every trial and juvenile court in the
state of Washington is authorized and encouraged to establish and
operate therapeutic courts. Therapeutic courts, in conjunction with
the government authority and subject matter experts specific to the
focus of the therapeutic court, develop and process cases in ways that
depart from traditional judicial processes to allow defendants or
respondents the opportunity to obtain treatment services to address
particular issues that may have contributed to the conduct that led to
their arrest or involvement in the child welfare system in exchange for
resolution of the case or charges. Defendants or respondents must
consent to participation in a therapeutic court and, in criminal cases,
the consent of the prosecutor is also required.
(2) While a therapeutic court judge retains the discretion to
decline to accept a case into the therapeutic court, and while a
therapeutic court retains discretion to establish processes and
determine eligibility for admission to the therapeutic court process
unique to their community and jurisdiction, the effectiveness and
credibility of any therapeutic court will be enhanced when the court
implements evidence-based practices, research-based practices, emerging
best practices, or promising practices that have been identified and
accepted at the state and national levels. Promising practices,
emerging best practices, and/or research-based programs are authorized
where determined by the court to be appropriate. As practices evolve,
the trial court shall regularly assess the effectiveness of its program
and the methods by which it implements and adopts new best practices.
(3) Except under special findings by the court, the following
individuals are not eligible for participation in therapeutic courts:
(a) Individuals who are currently charged or who have been
previously convicted of a serious violent offense or sex offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) Individuals who are currently charged with an offense alleging
intentional discharge, threat to discharge, or attempt to discharge a
firearm in furtherance of the offense;
(c) Individuals who are currently charged with or who have been
previously convicted of vehicular homicide or an equivalent out-of-state offense; or
(d) Individuals who are currently charged with or who have been
previously convicted of: An offense alleging substantial bodily harm
or great bodily harm as defined in RCW 9A.04.110, or death of another
person.
(4) Any jurisdiction establishing a therapeutic court shall
endeavor to incorporate the therapeutic court principles of best
practices as recognized by state and national therapeutic court
organizations in structuring a particular program, which may include:
(a) Determining the population;
(b) Performing a clinical assessment;
(c) Developing the treatment plan;
(d) Monitoring the participant, including any appropriate testing;
(e) Forging agency, organization, and community partnerships;
(f) Taking a judicial leadership role;
(g) Developing case management strategies;
(h) Addressing transportation, housing, and subsistence issues;
(i) Evaluating the program;
(j) Ensuring a sustainable program.
(5) Upon a showing of indigence under RCW 10.101.010, fees may be
reduced or waived.
(6) The department of social and health services shall furnish
services to therapeutic courts addressing dependency matters where
substance abuse or mental health are an issue unless the court
contracts with providers outside of the department.
(7) Any jurisdiction that has established more than one therapeutic
court under this chapter may combine the functions of these courts into
a single therapeutic court.
(8) Nothing in this section prohibits a district or municipal court
from ordering treatment or other conditions of sentence or probation
following a conviction, without the consent of either the prosecutor or
defendant.
(9) No therapeutic or specialty court may be established
specifically for the purpose of applying foreign law, including foreign
criminal, civil, or religious law, that is otherwise not required by
treaty.
(10) No therapeutic or specialty court established by court rule
shall enforce a foreign law, if doing so would violate a right
guaranteed by the Constitution of this state or of the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Jurisdictions seeking state funding for
therapeutic courts must exhaust all federal funding available to
support the operation of its therapeutic court and associated services
and match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state moneys allocated for
therapeutic courts with local cash or in-kind resources. Moneys
allocated by the state may be used to supplement, not supplant other
federal, state, and local funds for therapeutic courts. However, until
June 30, 2015, no match is required for state moneys expended for the
administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a
therapeutic court authorized under this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.14.460 and 2012 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A county legislative authority may authorize, fix, and
impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this
chapter.
(b) If a county with a population over eight hundred thousand has
not imposed the tax authorized under this subsection by January 1,
2011, any city with a population over thirty thousand located in that
county may authorize, fix, and impose the sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter. The county must provide a
credit against its tax for the full amount of tax imposed under this
subsection (1)(b) by any city located in that county if the county
imposes the tax after January 1, 2011.
(2) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other
taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county for a county's tax
and within a city for a city's tax. The rate of tax equals one-tenth
of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or
value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.
(3) Moneys collected under this section must be used solely for the
purpose of providing for the operation or delivery of chemical
dependency or mental health treatment programs and services and for the
operation or delivery of therapeutic court programs and services. For
the purposes of this section, "programs and services" includes, but is
not limited to, treatment services, case management, transportation,
and housing that are a component of a coordinated chemical dependency
or mental health treatment program or service. Every jurisdiction that
authorizes the tax provided in this section shall, and every other
jurisdiction may, establish and operate a therapeutic court component
for dependency proceedings designed to be effective for the court's
size, location, and resources.
(4) All moneys collected under this section must be used solely for
the purpose of providing new or expanded programs and services as
provided in this section, except as follows:
(a) For a county with a population larger than twenty-five thousand
or a city with a population over thirty thousand, which initially
imposed the tax authorized under this section prior to January 1, 2012,
a portion of moneys collected under this section may be used to
supplant existing funding for these purposes as follows: Up to fifty
percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar years
2011-2012; up to forty percent may be used to supplant existing funding
in calendar year 2013; up to thirty percent may be used to supplant
existing funding in calendar year 2014; up to twenty percent may be
used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2015; and up to ten
percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2016;
(b) For a county with a population larger than twenty-five thousand
or a city with a population over thirty thousand, which initially
imposes the tax authorized under this section after December 31, 2011,
a portion of moneys collected under this section may be used to
supplant existing funding for these purposes as follows: Up to fifty
percent may be used to supplant existing funding for up to the first
three calendar years following adoption; and up to twenty-five percent
may be used to supplant existing funding for the fourth and fifth years
after adoption;
(c) For a county with a population of less than twenty-five
thousand, a portion of moneys collected under this section may be used
to supplant existing funding for these purposes as follows: Up to
eighty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar
years 2011-2012; up to sixty percent may be used to supplant existing
funding in calendar year 2013; up to forty percent may be used to
supplant existing funding in calendar year 2014; up to twenty percent
may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2015; and up
to ten percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar
year 2016; and
(d) Notwithstanding (a) through (c) of this subsection, moneys
collected under this section may be used to support the cost of the
judicial officer and support staff of a therapeutic court.
(5) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to prohibit the use
of moneys collected under this section for the replacement of lapsed
federal funding previously provided for the operation or delivery of
services and programs as provided in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Individual trial courts are authorized and
encouraged to establish multijurisdictional partnerships and/or
interlocal agreements under RCW 39.34.180 to enhance and expand the
coverage area of the therapeutic court. Specifically, district and
municipal courts may work cooperatively with each other and with the
superior courts to identify and implement nontraditional case
processing methods which can eliminate traditional barriers that
decrease judicial efficiency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Any therapeutic court meeting the definition
of therapeutic court in section 2 of this act and existing on the
effective date of this section continues to be authorized.

Sec. 8 RCW 9.94A.517 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)

TABLE 3

DRUG OFFENSE SENTENCING GRID

Seriousness
Level Offender Score
0 to 2 Offender Score
3 to 5 Offender Score
6 to 9 or more

III 51 to 68 months 68+ to 100 months 100+ to 120 months

II 12+ to 20 months 20+ to 60 months 60+ to 120 months

I 0 to 6 months 6+ to 12 months 12+ to 24 months

References to months represent the standard sentence ranges. 12+equals
one year and one day.
(2) The court may utilize any other sanctions or alternatives as
authorized by law, including but not limited to the special drug
offender sentencing alternative under RCW 9.94A.660 or drug court under
((RCW 2.28.170)) chapter 2.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section
12 of this act).
(3) Nothing in this section creates an entitlement for a criminal
defendant to any specific sanction, alternative, sentence option, or
substance abuse treatment.

Sec. 9 RCW 9.94A.517 and 2002 c 290 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)

TABLE 3

DRUG OFFENSE SENTENCING GRID

Seriousness
Level Offender Score
0 to 2 Offender Score
3 to 5 Offender Score
6 to 9 or more

III 51 to 68 months 68+ to 100 months 100+ to 120 months

II 12+ to 20 months 20+ to 60 months 60+ to 120 months

I 0 to 6 months 6+ to 18 months 12+ to 24 months

References to months represent the standard sentence ranges. 12+
equals one year and one day.
(2) The court may utilize any other sanctions or alternatives as
authorized by law, including but not limited to the special drug
offender sentencing alternative under RCW 9.94A.660 or drug court under
((RCW 2.28.170)) chapter 2.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section
12 of this act).
(3) Nothing in this section creates an entitlement for a criminal
defendant to any specific sanction, alternative, sentence option, or
substance abuse treatment.

Sec. 10 RCW 70.96A.350 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 990 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The criminal justice treatment account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for: (a)
Substance abuse treatment and treatment support services for offenders
with an addiction or a substance abuse problem that, if not treated,
would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a
prosecuting attorney in Washington state; (b) the provision of drug and
alcohol treatment services and treatment support services for
nonviolent offenders within a drug court program; (c) the
administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a
drug court; and (d) during the 2011-2013 biennium, the legislature may
appropriate up to three million dollars from the account in order to
offset reductions in the state general fund for treatment services
provided by counties. This amount is not subject to the requirements
of subsections (5) through (9) of this section. During the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the criminal justice
treatment account to the state general fund amounts as reflect the
state savings associated with the implementation of the medicaid
expansion of the federal affordable care act. Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Treatment" means services that are critical to a participant's
successful completion of his or her substance abuse treatment program,
but does not include the following services: Housing other than that
provided as part of an inpatient substance abuse treatment program,
vocational training, and mental health counseling; and
(b) "Treatment support" means transportation to or from inpatient
or outpatient treatment services when no viable alternative exists, and
child care services that are necessary to ensure a participant's
ability to attend outpatient treatment sessions.
(3) Revenues to the criminal justice treatment account consist of:
(a) Funds transferred to the account pursuant to this section; and (b)
any other revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.
(4)(a) For the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2003, the state
treasurer shall transfer eight million nine hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the general fund into the criminal justice treatment
account, divided into eight equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2005, and each subsequent fiscal year, the state
treasurer shall transfer eight million two hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the general fund to the criminal justice treatment
account, divided into four equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2006, and each subsequent fiscal year, the
amount transferred shall be increased on an annual basis by the
implicit price deflator as published by the federal bureau of labor
statistics.
(b) In each odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate
the amount transferred to the criminal justice treatment account in (a)
of this subsection to the division of alcohol and substance abuse for
the purposes of subsection (5) of this section.
(5) Moneys appropriated to the division of alcohol and substance
abuse from the criminal justice treatment account shall be distributed
as specified in this subsection. The department shall serve as the
fiscal agent for purposes of distribution. Until July 1, 2004, the
department may not use moneys appropriated from the criminal justice
treatment account for administrative expenses and shall distribute all
amounts appropriated under subsection (4)(b) of this section in
accordance with this subsection. Beginning in July 1, 2004, the
department may retain up to three percent of the amount appropriated
under subsection (4)(b) of this section for its administrative costs.
(a) Seventy percent of amounts appropriated to the division from
the account shall be distributed to counties pursuant to the
distribution formula adopted under this section. The division of
alcohol and substance abuse, in consultation with the department of
corrections, the Washington state association of counties, the
Washington state association of drug court professionals, the superior
court judges' association, the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys, representatives of the criminal defense bar, representatives
of substance abuse treatment providers, and any other person deemed by
the division to be necessary, shall establish a fair and reasonable
methodology for distribution to counties of moneys in the criminal
justice treatment account. County or regional plans submitted for the
expenditure of formula funds must be approved by the panel established
in (b) of this subsection.
(b) Thirty percent of the amounts appropriated to the division from
the account shall be distributed as grants for purposes of treating
offenders against whom charges are filed by a county prosecuting
attorney. The division shall appoint a panel of representatives from
the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges'
association, the Washington state association of counties, the
Washington defender's association or the Washington association of
criminal defense lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington
state association of drug court professionals, substance abuse
treatment providers, and the division. The panel shall review county
or regional plans for funding under (a) of this subsection and grants
approved under this subsection. The panel shall attempt to ensure that
treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.
(6) The county alcohol and drug coordinator, county prosecutor,
county sheriff, county superior court, a substance abuse treatment
provider appointed by the county legislative authority, a member of the
criminal defense bar appointed by the county legislative authority,
and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of the drug court
shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative
authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (5)(b)
of this section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the
criminal justice treatment account within that county. The funds shall
be used solely to provide approved alcohol and substance abuse
treatment pursuant to RCW 70.96A.090, treatment support services, and
for the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation
of a drug court.
(a) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of
counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent on the
administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a
drug court.
(b) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of
counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent for
treatment support services.
(7) Counties are encouraged to consider regional agreements and
submit regional plans for the efficient delivery of treatment under
this section.
(8) Moneys allocated under this section shall be used to
supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds used
for substance abuse treatment.
(9) Counties must meet the criteria established in ((RCW
2.28.170(3)(b))) section 3(3) of this act.
(10) The authority under this section to use funds from the
criminal justice treatment account for the administrative and overhead
costs associated with the operation of a drug court expires June 30,
2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 2.28.170 (Drug courts) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 952, 2013
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 951, 2013 c 257 s 5, 2009 c 445 s 2, 2006 c 339 s 106,
2005 c 504 s 504, 2002 c 290 s 13, & 1999 c 197 s 9;
(2) RCW 2.28.175 (DUI courts) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 35 s 2, 2013 c
257 s 6, 2012 c 183 s 1, & 2011 c 293 s 10;
(3) RCW 2.28.180 (Mental health courts) and 2013 c 257 s 7, 2011 c
236 s 1, & 2005 c 504 s 501;
(4) RCW 2.28.190 (DUI court, drug court, and mental health court
may be combined) and 2013 c 257 s 8, 2011 c 293 s 11, & 2005 c 504 s
502;
(5) RCW 13.40.700 (Juvenile gang courts -- Minimum requirements -- Admission -- Individualized plan -- Completion) and 2012 c 146 s 2;
(6) RCW 13.40.710 (Juvenile gang courts -- Data -- Reports) and 2012 c
146 s 3;
(7) RCW 26.12.250 (Therapeutic courts) and 2005 c 504 s 503;
(8) RCW 2.28.165 (Specialty and therapeutic courts--Establishment--Principles of best practices--Limitations) and 2013 c 257 s 2; and
(9) RCW 2.28.166 (Definition of "specialty court" and "therapeutic
court") and 2013 c 257 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 4, 6, and 7 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 2 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Section 8 of this act expires July 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Section 9 of this act takes effect July 1,
2018.

--- END ---