BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.09.340 and 2009 c 28 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In making all discretionary decisions regarding release plans
for and supervision of sex offenders, the department shall set
priorities and make decisions based on an assessment of public safety
risks.
(2) The department shall, no later than September 1, 1996,
implement a policy governing the department's evaluation and approval
of release plans for sex offenders. The policy shall include, at a
minimum, a formal process by which victims, witnesses, and other
interested people may provide information and comments to the
department on potential safety risks to specific individuals or classes
of individuals posed by a specific sex offender. The department shall
make all reasonable efforts to publicize the availability of this
process through currently existing mechanisms and shall seek the
assistance of courts, prosecutors, law enforcement, and victims'
advocacy groups in doing so. Notice of an offender's proposed
residence shall be provided to all people registered to receive notice
of an offender's release under RCW 72.09.712(2), except that in no case
may this notification requirement be construed to require an extension
of an offender's release date.
(3)(a) For any offender convicted of a felony sex offense against
a minor victim after June 6, 1996, the department shall not approve a
residence location if the proposed residence: (i) Includes a minor
victim or child of similar age or circumstance as a previous victim who
the department determines may be put at substantial risk of harm by the
offender's residence in the household; ((or)) (ii) is within close
proximity of the current residence of a minor victim, unless the
whereabouts of the minor victim cannot be determined or unless such a
restriction would impede family reunification efforts ordered by the
court or directed by the department of social and health services((.
The department is further authorized to reject a residence location if
the proposed residence is within close proximity to)); or (iii) is
within one thousand feet of a school((s)), child care center((s)),
playground((s)), or other grounds or facilities where children ((of
similar age or circumstance as a previous victim)) are present ((who
the department determines may be put at substantial risk of harm by the
sex offender's residence at that location)).
(b) In addition, for any offender prohibited from living in a
community protection zone under RCW 9.94A.703(1)(c), the department may
not approve a residence location if the proposed residence is in a
community protection zone.
(4) When the department requires supervised visitation as a term or
condition of a sex offender's community placement under RCW
9.94B.050(6), the department shall, prior to approving a supervisor,
consider the following:
(a) The relationships between the proposed supervisor, the
offender, and the minor; (b) the proposed supervisor's acknowledgment
and understanding of the offender's prior criminal conduct, general
knowledge of the dynamics of child sexual abuse, and willingness and
ability to protect the minor from the potential risks posed by contact
with the offender; and (c) recommendations made by the department of
social and health services about the best interests of the child.

--- END ---