BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.26 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that several studies estimate there are
between twenty-five thousand and thirty-two thousand rape-related
pregnancies in the United States annually. The legislature also finds
that a substantial number of women who become pregnant as a result of
sexual assault choose to give birth and raise their children. The
legislature finds further that rape is one of the most under-reported
and under-prosecuted serious crimes. The legislature also finds that
rapists may use the threat of pursuing parental rights or custody to
coerce survivors into not reporting or not assisting in the prosecution
of the assault. The legislature finds that a rapist's pursuit of child
custody or parental rights forces the survivor into an ongoing
relationship with the rapist, effectively tethering the survivor to the
perpetrator and potentially increasing power and control over the
survivor. The legislature also finds that a survivor who is forced to
co-parent a child with the rapist will likely suffer traumatic
psychological stress, making recovery more difficult and potentially
affecting the ability to parent the child and promote the child's best
interests. The legislature intends, therefore, to establish a process
whereby a survivor who becomes pregnant as a result of a sexual assault
and who elects to raise the child can seek the court's assistance in
avoiding continued forced interactions with the rapist, and the
consequent inability to fully heal from the assault.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 26.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies in cases when a person is alleged to have
committed a sexual assault that results in a pregnancy.
(2) For the purposes of this section, sexual assault may be proved
by either:
(a) Evidence that a person was convicted of or pleaded guilty to
sexual assault; or
(b) Clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the person
committed sexual assault.
(3) An allegation that a pregnancy resulted from a sexual assault
may be raised under this chapter:
(a) In a petition to adjudicate parentage;
(b) In response to a petition to adjudicate parentage; or
(c) In a proceeding for rescission of an acknowledgement of
paternity.
(4)(a) If there is an allegation that a pregnancy resulted from
sexual assault, the court must conduct a fact-finding hearing on the
allegation. The court may not enter any temporary orders providing
residential time or decision making to the alleged perpetrator prior to
the fact-finding hearing on the allegation.
(b) Prior to the fact-finding hearing, the court may order genetic
testing to determine whether the alleged perpetrator is biologically
related to the child. If genetic testing reveals that the alleged
perpetrator is not biologically related to the child, the fact-finding
hearing must be stricken.
(c) During the fact-finding hearing, the prior sexual activity or
the reputation of the alleged victim is inadmissible except:
(i) As evidence concerning the past sexual conduct between the
alleged victim and the alleged perpetrator, and only when such evidence
is offered by the alleged perpetrator on the issue of whether the
alleged victim consented to the sexual conduct that resulted in the
pregnancy; or
(ii) When constitutionally required to be admitted.
(d) Evidence concerning the past sexual conduct between the alleged
victim and alleged perpetrator may be introduced only if the court has
ruled the evidence is admissible after an offer of proof has been made
during an in camera hearing to determine whether the alleged
perpetrator has evidence to impeach a witness when prior sexual conduct
between the alleged perpetrator and alleged victim is denied. An offer
of proof under this section includes reasonably specific information as
to the date, time, and place of the past sexual conduct between the
alleged victim and the alleged perpetrator.
(e) Unless the court finds during the in camera hearing that
reasonably specific information as to date, time, or place, or some
combination thereof, has been offered as to the prior sexual conduct
between the alleged perpetrator and alleged victim, the court shall
order counsel for the alleged perpetrator to refrain from inquiring
into prior sexual conduct between the alleged victim and the alleged
perpetrator.
(f) The court may not admit evidence under this subsection unless
it determines at the in camera hearing that:
(i) The evidence is relevant; and
(ii) The probative value of the evidence outweighs the danger of
unfair prejudice.
(g) Evidence determined admissible under this section is admissible
at trial to the extent the court enters an order specifying:
(i) The evidence that may be admitted; and
(ii) The areas with respect to which the alleged victim may be
examined or cross-examined.
(5) In determining whether a pregnancy resulted from a sexual
assault, a court may not draw any inferences or conclusions based on
evidence that:
(a) The alleged perpetrator was voluntarily intoxicated;
(b) The alleged victim was voluntarily intoxicated;
(c) The alleged victim engaged in limited consensual sexual
touching; or
(d) The alleged victim chose to give birth to and raise the child.
(6) If the court finds by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence
that a person has committed sexual assault that resulted in a
pregnancy, the court must:
(a) Enter an order holding that the person is not a parent of the
child, if such an order is requested by the child's legal parent or
guardian; or
(b) Enter an order consistent with the relief requested by the
child's legal parent or guardian, provided that the court determines
that the relief requested is in the best interests of the child.
(7) Absent the express written consent of the child's legal parent
or guardian, a person who is found to have committed a sexual assault
that resulted in pregnancy has:
(a) No right to an allocation of parental rights, including
residential time or decision-making responsibilities for the child;
(b) No right to inheritance from the child; and
(c) No right to notification of, or standing to object to, the
adoption of a child.
(8) If the court enters an order under subsection (6) of this
section that is inconsistent with the information on the child's birth
certificate, the court shall also order the birth certificate be
amended in a manner that is consistent with the child's best interests
and the wishes of the child's legal parent or guardian.
(9) If a person is found to have committed a sexual assault that
resulted in a pregnancy, the court must order the person to pay child
support or birth-related costs or both, unless such relief is not
sought by the child's legal parent or guardian.
(10) The court may order an award of attorneys' fees under this
section on the same basis as attorneys' fees are awarded under RCW
26.09.140.
(11) Unless the parties and the court agree otherwise, the
fact-finding hearing and any related proceedings under this section
must be closed. The general public must be excluded and only those
persons whom the court finds to have a direct interest in the case or
in the work of the court may be admitted. Persons so admitted may not
disclose any information obtained at the hearing which would identify
the parties involved or the child. The court may require the presence
of witnesses deemed necessary to the disposition of the case.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.26.011 and 2011 c 283 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Acknowledged father" means a man who has established a father-child relationship under RCW 26.26.300 through 26.26.375.
(2) "Adjudicated parent" means a person who has been adjudicated by
a court of competent jurisdiction to be the parent of a child.
(3) "Alleged parent" means a person who alleges himself or herself
to be, or is alleged to be, the genetic parent or a possible genetic
parent of a child, but whose parentage has not been determined. The
term does not include:
(a) A presumed parent;
(b) A person whose parental rights have been terminated or declared
not to exist; or
(c) A donor.
(4) "Assisted reproduction" means a method of causing pregnancy
other than sexual intercourse. The term includes:
(a) Artificial insemination;
(b) Donation of eggs;
(c) Donation of embryos;
(d) In vitro fertilization and transfer of embryos; and
(e) Intracytoplasmic sperm injection.
(5) "Child" means an individual of any age whose parentage may be
determined under this chapter.
(6) "Commence" means to file the petition seeking an adjudication
of parentage in a superior court of this state or to serve a summons
and the petition.
(7) "Determination of parentage" means the establishment of the
parent-child relationship by the signing of a valid acknowledgment of
paternity under RCW 26.26.300 through 26.26.375 or adjudication by the
court.
(8) "Domestic partner" means a state registered domestic partner as
defined in chapter 26.60 RCW.
(9) "Donor" means an individual who contributes a gamete or gametes
for assisted reproduction, whether or not for consideration. The term
does not include:
(a) A person who provides a gamete or gametes to be used for
assisted reproduction with his or her spouse or domestic partner; or
(b) A woman who gives birth to a child by means of assisted
reproduction, except as otherwise provided in RCW 26.26.210 through
26.26.260 or 26.26.735.
(10) "Ethnic or racial group" means, for purposes of genetic
testing, a recognized group that an individual identifies as all or
part of the individual's ancestry or that is so identified by other
information.
(11) "Fertility clinic" means a facility that provides assisted
reproduction services or gametes to be used in assisted reproduction.
(12) "Gamete" means either a sperm or an egg.
(13) "Genetic parent" means a person who is the source of the egg
or sperm that produced the child. The term does not include a donor.
(14) "Genetic testing" means an analysis of genetic markers to
exclude or identify a man as the father or a woman as the mother of a
child. The term includes an analysis of one or a combination of the
following:
(a) Deoxyribonucleic acid; and
(b) Blood-group antigens, red-cell antigens, human-leukocyte
antigens, serum enzymes, serum proteins, or red-cell enzymes.
(15) "Identifying information" includes, but is not limited to, the
following information of the gamete donor:
(a) The first and last name of the person; and
(b) The age of the person at the time of the donation.
(16) "Man" means a male individual of any age.
(17) "Parent" means an individual who has established a parent-child relationship under RCW 26.26.101.
(18) "Parent-child relationship" means the legal relationship
between a child and a parent of the child. The term includes the
mother-child relationship and the father-child relationship.
(19) "Parentage index" means the likelihood of parentage calculated
by computing the ratio between:
(a) The likelihood that the tested person is the parent, based on
the genetic markers of the tested person, genetic parent, and child,
conditioned on the hypothesis that the tested person is the parent of
the child; and
(b) The likelihood that the tested person is not the parent, based
on the genetic markers of the tested person, genetic parent, and child,
conditioned on the hypothesis that the tested person is not the parent
of the child and that the parent is of the same ethnic or racial group
as the tested person.
(20) "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine in a
state.
(21) "Presumed parent" means a person who, by operation of law
under RCW 26.26.116, is recognized as the parent of a child until that
status is rebutted or confirmed in a judicial proceeding.
(22) "Probability of parentage" means the measure, for the ethnic
or racial group to which the alleged parent belongs, of the probability
that the individual in question is the parent of the child, compared
with a random, unrelated person of the same ethnic or racial group,
expressed as a percentage incorporating the parentage index and a prior
probability.
(23) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible
medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is
retrievable in perceivable form.
(24) "Sexual assault" means any offense under chapter 9A.44 RCW
capable of causing pregnancy.
(25) "Signatory" means an individual who authenticates a record and
is bound by its terms.
(((25))) (26) "State" means a state of the United States, the
District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands,
any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States, or an Indian tribe or band, or Alaskan native village,
that is recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by state
law.
(((26))) (27) "Support enforcement agency" means a public official
or agency authorized to seek:
(a) Enforcement of support orders or laws relating to the duty of
support;
(b) Establishment or modification of child support;
(c) Determination of parentage; or
(d) Location of child support obligors and their income and assets.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.09.191 and 2011 c 89 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The permanent parenting plan shall not require mutual decision-making or designation of a dispute resolution process other than court
action if it is found that a parent has engaged in any of the following
conduct: (a) Willful abandonment that continues for an extended period
of time or substantial refusal to perform parenting functions; (b)
physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of a child; or (c) a
history of acts of domestic violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or
an assault or sexual assault ((which)) that causes grievous bodily harm
or the fear of such harm or that results in a pregnancy.
(2)(a) The parent's residential time with the child shall be
limited if it is found that the parent has engaged in any of the
following conduct: (i) Willful abandonment that continues for an
extended period of time or substantial refusal to perform parenting
functions; (ii) physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of a
child; (iii) a history of acts of domestic violence as defined in RCW
26.50.010(1) or an assault or sexual assault ((which)) that causes
grievous bodily harm or the fear of such harm or that results in a
pregnancy; or (iv) the parent has been convicted as an adult of a sex
offense under:
(A) RCW 9A.44.076 if, because of the difference in age between the
offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of
this subsection;
(B) RCW 9A.44.079 if, because of the difference in age between the
offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of
this subsection;
(C) RCW 9A.44.086 if, because of the difference in age between the
offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of
this subsection;
(D) RCW 9A.44.089;
(E) RCW 9A.44.093;
(F) RCW 9A.44.096;
(G) RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2) if, because of the difference in age
between the offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists
under (d) of this subsection;
(H) Chapter 9.68A RCW;
(I) Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses listed
in (a)(iv)(A) through (H) of this subsection;
(J) Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an
offense analogous to the offenses listed in (a)(iv)(A) through (H) of
this subsection.
This subsection (2)(a) shall not apply when (c) or (d) of this
subsection applies.
(b) The parent's residential time with the child shall be limited
if it is found that the parent resides with a person who has engaged in
any of the following conduct: (i) Physical, sexual, or a pattern of
emotional abuse of a child; (ii) a history of acts of domestic violence
as defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or an assault or sexual assault that
causes grievous bodily harm or the fear of such harm; or (iii) the
person has been convicted as an adult or as a juvenile has been
adjudicated of a sex offense under:
(A) RCW 9A.44.076 if, because of the difference in age between the
offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of
this subsection;
(B) RCW 9A.44.079 if, because of the difference in age between the
offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of
this subsection;
(C) RCW 9A.44.086 if, because of the difference in age between the
offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of
this subsection;
(D) RCW 9A.44.089;
(E) RCW 9A.44.093;
(F) RCW 9A.44.096;
(G) RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2) if, because of the difference in age
between the offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists
under (e) of this subsection;
(H) Chapter 9.68A RCW;
(I) Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses listed
in (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of this subsection;
(J) Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an
offense analogous to the offenses listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of
this subsection.
This subsection (2)(b) shall not apply when (c) or (e) of this
subsection applies.
(c) If a parent has been found to be a sexual predator under
chapter 71.09 RCW or under an analogous statute of any other
jurisdiction, the court shall restrain the parent from contact with a
child that would otherwise be allowed under this chapter. If a parent
resides with an adult or a juvenile who has been found to be a sexual
predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or under an analogous statute of any
other jurisdiction, the court shall restrain the parent from contact
with the parent's child except contact that occurs outside that
person's presence.
(d) There is a rebuttable presumption that a parent who has been
convicted as an adult of a sex offense listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of
this subsection poses a present danger to a child. Unless the parent
rebuts this presumption, the court shall restrain the parent from
contact with a child that would otherwise be allowed under this
chapter:
(i) RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2), provided that the person convicted
was at least five years older than the other person;
(ii) RCW 9A.44.073;
(iii) RCW 9A.44.076, provided that the person convicted was at
least eight years older than the victim;
(iv) RCW 9A.44.079, provided that the person convicted was at least
eight years older than the victim;
(v) RCW 9A.44.083;
(vi) RCW 9A.44.086, provided that the person convicted was at least
eight years older than the victim;
(vii) RCW 9A.44.100;
(viii) Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses
listed in (d)(i) through (vii) of this subsection;
(ix) Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an
offense analogous to the offenses listed in (d)(i) through (vii) of
this subsection.
(e) There is a rebuttable presumption that a parent who resides
with a person who, as an adult, has been convicted, or as a juvenile
has been adjudicated, of the sex offenses listed in (e)(i) through (ix)
of this subsection places a child at risk of abuse or harm when that
parent exercises residential time in the presence of the convicted or
adjudicated person. Unless the parent rebuts the presumption, the
court shall restrain the parent from contact with the parent's child
except for contact that occurs outside of the convicted or adjudicated
person's presence:
(i) RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2), provided that the person convicted
was at least five years older than the other person;
(ii) RCW 9A.44.073;
(iii) RCW 9A.44.076, provided that the person convicted was at
least eight years older than the victim;
(iv) RCW 9A.44.079, provided that the person convicted was at least
eight years older than the victim;
(v) RCW 9A.44.083;
(vi) RCW 9A.44.086, provided that the person convicted was at least
eight years older than the victim;
(vii) RCW 9A.44.100;
(viii) Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses
listed in (e)(i) through (vii) of this subsection;
(ix) Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an
offense analogous to the offenses listed in (e)(i) through (vii) of
this subsection.
(f) The presumption established in (d) of this subsection may be
rebutted only after a written finding that:
(i) If the child was not the victim of the sex offense committed by
the parent requesting residential time, (A) contact between the child
and the offending parent is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the
child, and (B) the offending parent has successfully engaged in
treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and making progress in
such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the treatment
provider believes such contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk to
the child; or
(ii) If the child was the victim of the sex offense committed by
the parent requesting residential time, (A) contact between the child
and the offending parent is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the
child, (B) if the child is in or has been in therapy for victims of
sexual abuse, the child's counselor believes such contact between the
child and the offending parent is in the child's best interest, and (C)
the offending parent has successfully engaged in treatment for sex
offenders or is engaged in and making progress in such treatment, if
any was ordered by a court, and the treatment provider believes such
contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child.
(g) The presumption established in (e) of this subsection may be
rebutted only after a written finding that:
(i) If the child was not the victim of the sex offense committed by
the person who is residing with the parent requesting residential time,
(A) contact between the child and the parent residing with the
convicted or adjudicated person is appropriate and that parent is able
to protect the child in the presence of the convicted or adjudicated
person, and (B) the convicted or adjudicated person has successfully
engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and making
progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the
treatment provider believes such contact is appropriate and poses
minimal risk to the child; or
(ii) If the child was the victim of the sex offense committed by
the person who is residing with the parent requesting residential time,
(A) contact between the child and the parent in the presence of the
convicted or adjudicated person is appropriate and poses minimal risk
to the child, (B) if the child is in or has been in therapy for victims
of sexual abuse, the child's counselor believes such contact between
the child and the parent residing with the convicted or adjudicated
person in the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is in the
child's best interest, and (C) the convicted or adjudicated person has
successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in
and making progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a court,
and the treatment provider believes contact between the parent and
child in the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is
appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child.
(h) If the court finds that the parent has met the burden of
rebutting the presumption under (f) of this subsection, the court may
allow a parent who has been convicted as an adult of a sex offense
listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of this subsection to have residential
time with the child supervised by a neutral and independent adult and
pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such residential time.
The court shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between the
child and the parent unless the court finds, based on the evidence,
that the supervisor is willing and capable of protecting the child from
harm. The court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon
finding, based on the evidence, that the supervisor has failed to
protect the child or is no longer willing or capable of protecting the
child.
(i) If the court finds that the parent has met the burden of
rebutting the presumption under (g) of this subsection, the court may
allow a parent residing with a person who has been adjudicated as a
juvenile of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through (ix) of this
subsection to have residential time with the child in the presence of
the person adjudicated as a juvenile, supervised by a neutral and
independent adult and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of
such residential time. The court shall not approve of a supervisor for
contact between the child and the parent unless the court finds, based
on the evidence, that the supervisor is willing and capable of
protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke court approval
of the supervisor upon finding, based on the evidence, that the
supervisor has failed to protect the child or is no longer willing or
capable of protecting the child.
(j) If the court finds that the parent has met the burden of
rebutting the presumption under (g) of this subsection, the court may
allow a parent residing with a person who, as an adult, has been
convicted of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through (ix) of this
subsection to have residential time with the child in the presence of
the convicted person supervised by a neutral and independent adult and
pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such residential time.
The court shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between the
child and the parent unless the court finds, based on the evidence,
that the supervisor is willing and capable of protecting the child from
harm. The court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon
finding, based on the evidence, that the supervisor has failed to
protect the child or is no longer willing or capable of protecting the
child.
(k) A court shall not order unsupervised contact between the
offending parent and a child of the offending parent who was sexually
abused by that parent. A court may order unsupervised contact between
the offending parent and a child who was not sexually abused by the
parent after the presumption under (d) of this subsection has been
rebutted and supervised residential time has occurred for at least two
years with no further arrests or convictions of sex offenses involving
children under chapter 9A.44 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or chapter 9.68A RCW
and (i) the sex offense of the offending parent was not committed
against a child of the offending parent, and (ii) the court finds that
unsupervised contact between the child and the offending parent is
appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, after consideration of
the testimony of a state-certified therapist, mental health counselor,
or social worker with expertise in treating child sexual abuse victims
who has supervised at least one period of residential time between the
parent and the child, and after consideration of evidence of the
offending parent's compliance with community supervision requirements,
if any. If the offending parent was not ordered by a court to
participate in treatment for sex offenders, then the parent shall
obtain a psychosexual evaluation conducted by a certified sex offender
treatment provider or a certified affiliate sex offender treatment
provider indicating that the offender has the lowest likelihood of risk
to reoffend before the court grants unsupervised contact between the
parent and a child.
(l) A court may order unsupervised contact between the parent and
a child which may occur in the presence of a juvenile adjudicated of a
sex offense listed in (e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection who
resides with the parent after the presumption under (e) of this
subsection has been rebutted and supervised residential time has
occurred for at least two years during which time the adjudicated
juvenile has had no further arrests, adjudications, or convictions of
sex offenses involving children under chapter 9A.44 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020,
or chapter 9.68A RCW, and (i) the court finds that unsupervised contact
between the child and the parent that may occur in the presence of the
adjudicated juvenile is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the
child, after consideration of the testimony of a state-certified
therapist, mental health counselor, or social worker with expertise in
treatment of child sexual abuse victims who has supervised at least one
period of residential time between the parent and the child in the
presence of the adjudicated juvenile, and after consideration of
evidence of the adjudicated juvenile's compliance with community
supervision or parole requirements, if any. If the adjudicated
juvenile was not ordered by a court to participate in treatment for sex
offenders, then the adjudicated juvenile shall obtain a psychosexual
evaluation conducted by a certified sex offender treatment provider or
a certified affiliate sex offender treatment provider indicating that
the adjudicated juvenile has the lowest likelihood of risk to reoffend
before the court grants unsupervised contact between the parent and a
child which may occur in the presence of the adjudicated juvenile who
is residing with the parent.
(m)(i) The limitations imposed by the court under (a) or (b) of
this subsection shall be reasonably calculated to protect the child
from the physical, sexual, or emotional abuse or harm that could result
if the child has contact with the parent requesting residential time.
The limitations shall also be reasonably calculated to provide for the
safety of the parent who may be at risk of physical, sexual, or
emotional abuse or harm that could result if the parent has contact
with the parent requesting residential time. The limitations the court
may impose include, but are not limited to: Supervised contact between
the child and the parent or completion of relevant counseling or
treatment. If the court expressly finds based on the evidence that
limitations on the residential time with the child will not adequately
protect the child from the harm or abuse that could result if the child
has contact with the parent requesting residential time, the court
shall restrain the parent requesting residential time from all contact
with the child.
(ii) The court shall not enter an order under (a) of this
subsection allowing a parent to have contact with a child if the parent
has been found by clear and convincing evidence in a civil action or by
a preponderance of the evidence in a dependency action to have sexually
abused the child, except upon recommendation by an evaluator or
therapist for the child that the child is ready for contact with the
parent and will not be harmed by the contact. The court shall not
enter an order allowing a parent to have contact with the child in the
offender's presence if the parent resides with a person who has been
found by clear and convincing evidence in a civil action or by a
preponderance of the evidence in a dependency action to have sexually
abused a child, unless the court finds that the parent accepts that the
person engaged in the harmful conduct and the parent is willing to and
capable of protecting the child from harm from the person.
(iii) If the court limits residential time under (a) or (b) of this
subsection to require supervised contact between the child and the
parent, the court shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between
a child and a parent who has engaged in physical, sexual, or a pattern
of emotional abuse of the child unless the court finds based upon the
evidence that the supervisor accepts that the harmful conduct occurred
and is willing to and capable of protecting the child from harm. The
court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon finding, based
on the evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the child or
is no longer willing to or capable of protecting the child.
(n) If the court expressly finds based on the evidence that
contact between the parent and the child will not cause physical,
sexual, or emotional abuse or harm to the child and that the
probability that the parent's or other person's harmful or abusive
conduct will recur is so remote that it would not be in the child's
best interests to apply the limitations of (a), (b), and (m)(i) and
(iii) of this subsection, or if the court expressly finds that the
parent's conduct did not have an impact on the child, then the court
need not apply the limitations of (a), (b), and (m)(i) and (iii) of
this subsection. The weight given to the existence of a protection
order issued under chapter 26.50 RCW as to domestic violence is within
the discretion of the court. This subsection shall not apply when (c),
(d), (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), (l), and (m)(ii) of this
subsection apply.
(3) A parent's involvement or conduct may have an adverse effect on
the child's best interests, and the court may preclude or limit any
provisions of the parenting plan, if any of the following factors
exist:
(a) A parent's neglect or substantial nonperformance of parenting
functions;
(b) A long-term emotional or physical impairment which interferes
with the parent's performance of parenting functions as defined in RCW
26.09.004;
(c) A long-term impairment resulting from drug, alcohol, or other
substance abuse that interferes with the performance of parenting
functions;
(d) The absence or substantial impairment of emotional ties between
the parent and the child;
(e) The abusive use of conflict by the parent which creates the
danger of serious damage to the child's psychological development;
(f) A parent has withheld from the other parent access to the child
for a protracted period without good cause; or
(g) Such other factors or conduct as the court expressly finds
adverse to the best interests of the child.
(4) In cases involving allegations of limiting factors under
subsection (2)(a)(ii) and (iii) of this section, both parties shall be
screened to determine the appropriateness of a comprehensive assessment
regarding the impact of the limiting factor on the child and the
parties.
(5) In entering a permanent parenting plan, the court shall not
draw any presumptions from the provisions of the temporary parenting
plan.
(6) In determining whether any of the conduct described in this
section has occurred, the court shall apply the civil rules of
evidence, proof, and procedure.
(7) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "A parent's child" means that parent's natural child, adopted
child, or stepchild; and
(b) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further
advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and
approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.

Sec. 5 RCW 26.33.170 and 1999 c 173 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An agency's, the department's, or a legal guardian's consent to
adoption may be dispensed with if the court determines by clear, cogent
and convincing evidence that the proposed adoption is in the best
interests of the adoptee.
(2) An alleged father's, birth parent's, or parent's consent to
adoption may be dispensed with if the court finds that the proposed
adoption is in the best interests of the adoptee and:
(a) The alleged father, birth parent, or parent has been found
guilty of rape under chapter 9A.44 RCW or incest under RCW 9A.64.020,
where the adoptee was the victim of the rape or incest; or
(b) The alleged father, birth parent, or parent has been found
guilty of rape under chapter 9A.44 RCW or incest under RCW 9A.64.020,
or has been found by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence to have
committed a sexual assault where the other parent of the adoptee was
the victim of the ((rape)) sexual assault or incest and the adoptee was
conceived as a result of the ((rape or incest)) sexual assault.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to eliminate the
notice provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---