BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.320.240 and 2006 c 263 s 914 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The purpose of this section is to identify quality criteria for
school library ((media)) information and technology programs that
support the student learning goals under RCW 28A.150.210, the essential
academic learning requirements under RCW 28A.655.070, and high school
graduation requirements adopted under RCW 28A.230.090.
(2) Every board of directors shall provide resources and materials
for the operation ((and stocking of such libraries)) of school library
and information technology programs as the board deems necessary for
the proper education of the district's students as provided in the
prototypical school model under RCW 28A.150.260 or as otherwise
required by law or rule of the superintendent of public instruction.
(3) "Teacher-librarian" means a ((certified)) certificated teacher
with a library media endorsement under rules adopted by the
professional educator standards board.
(4) "School((-))library ((media)) information and technology
program" means a school-based program that is staffed by a certificated
teacher-librarian and provides a variety of resources that support
student mastery of the essential academic learning requirements in all
subject areas and the implementation of the district's school
improvement plan. The school library information and technology
program provides a broad, flexible array of services, resources,
instruction, and supports within the context of all current educational
standards adopted by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(5) The teacher-librarian, through the school-library media
program, shall collaborate as an instructional partner to help all
students meet the content goals in all subject areas, and assist high
school students completing the culminating project and high school and
beyond plans required for graduation.
(6) The teacher-librarian shall collaborate with his or her schools
to:
(a) Integrate information and technology into curriculum and
instruction, including but not limited to instructing other
certificated staff about using and integrating information and
technology literacy into instruction through workshops, modeling
lessons, and individual peer coaching;
(b) Provide information management instruction to students and
staff about how to effectively use emerging learning technologies for
school and lifelong learning, as well as in the appropriate use of
computers and mobile devices in an educational setting;
(c) Help teachers and students efficiently and effectively access
the highest quality information available while using information
ethically;
(d) Instruct students in digital citizenship including how to be
critical consumers of information and provide guidance about thoughtful
and strategic use of online resources; and
(e) Create a culture of reading in the school community by
developing a diverse, student-focused collection of materials that
ensures all students can find something of quality to read and by
facilitating school-wide reading initiatives along with providing
individual support and guidance for students.

--- END ---