BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that receipt of valid
ballots after election day results in long wait times for election
results. The legislature recognizes that it is not unusual for a
county to receive upwards of fifty percent of the ballots after
election day. The legislature finds that drawn out and inefficient
election processes result in increased labor costs, and reduce the
ability to accurately determine an election winner on election day.
The legislature intends to bring Washington state into parity with
other states by requiring that ballots be received by the county
auditor on election day. Such a requirement will increase the
efficiency of the voter tabulation process and will save money for the
state and individual counties.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.40.091 and 2013 c 11 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county auditor shall send each voter a ballot, a security
envelope in which to conceal the ballot after voting, a larger envelope
in which to return the security envelope, a declaration that the voter
must sign, and instructions on how to obtain information about the
election, how to mark the ballot, and how to return the ballot to the
county auditor.
(2) The voter must swear under penalty of perjury that he or she
meets the qualifications to vote, and has not voted in any other
jurisdiction at this election. The declaration must clearly inform the
voter that it is illegal to vote if he or she is not a United States
citizen; it is illegal to vote if he or she has been convicted of a
felony and has not had his or her voting rights restored; and it is
illegal to cast a ballot or sign a ballot declaration on behalf of
another voter. The ballot materials must provide space for the voter
to sign the declaration, indicate the date on which the ballot was
voted, and include a telephone number.
(3) For overseas and service voters, the signed declaration
constitutes the equivalent of a voter registration. Return envelopes
for overseas and service voters must enable the ballot to be returned
postage free if mailed through the United States postal service, United
States armed forces postal service, or the postal service of a United
States foreign embassy under 39 U.S.C. 3406.
(4) The voter must be instructed to either return the ballot to the
county auditor no later than 8:00 p.m. the day of the election or
primary, or mail the ballot to the county auditor with a postmark ((no
later than the day of the election or primary)) in accordance with the
time requirements of RCW 29A.40.110. Service and overseas voters must
be provided with instructions and a privacy sheet for returning the
ballot and signed declaration by fax or e-mail. A voted ballot and
signed declaration returned by fax or e-mail must be received by 8:00
p.m. on the day of the election or primary.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.40.110 and 2011 c 349 s 18, 2011 c 348 s 4, and
2011 c 10 s 41 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The opening and subsequent processing of return envelopes for
any primary or election may begin upon receipt. The tabulation of
((absentee)) ballots ((must not)) may commence ((until after)) at 8:00
((p.m. on)) a.m. three business days before the day of the primary or
election. Tabulation results must be held in secrecy, as provided in
RCW 29A.84.730, until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or
election.
(2) All received return envelopes must be placed in secure
locations from the time of delivery to the county auditor until their
subsequent opening. After opening the return envelopes, the county
canvassing board shall place all of the ballots in secure storage until
((processing)) tabulation. Ballots may be taken from the inner
envelopes and all the normal procedural steps may be performed to
prepare these ballots for tabulation.
(3) The canvassing board, or its designated representatives, shall
examine the ((postmark on the return envelope)) oath and signature on
the declaration before processing the ballot. ((The ballot must either
be received no later than 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or
election, or must be postmarked no later than the day of the primary or
election.)) All personnel assigned to verify signatures must receive
training on statewide standards for signature verification. Personnel
shall verify that the voter's signature on the ballot declaration is
the same as the signature of that voter in the registration files of
the county. Verification may be conducted by an automated verification
system approved by the secretary of state. A variation between the
signature of the voter on the ballot declaration and the signature of
that voter in the registration files due to the substitution of
initials or the use of common nicknames is permitted so long as the
surname and handwriting are clearly the same.
(4) ((If the postmark is missing or illegible, the date on the
ballot declaration to which the voter has attested determines the
validity, as to the time of voting, for that ballot.)) (a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, ballots must be received by the
county auditor by 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or election in
order to be valid. The county auditor may designate locations for the
receipt of ballots.
(b) For overseas voters ((and)) or service voters returning ballots
by mail, the date on the declaration to which the voter has attested
((determines the validity, as to the time of voting, for that ballot))
must not be later than the day of the primary or election in order for
the ballot to be valid. Any overseas voter or service voter may return
the signed declaration and voted ballot by fax or e-mail by 8:00 p.m.
on the day of the primary or election, and the county auditor must use
established procedures to maintain the secrecy of the ballot.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.60.190 and 2011 c 349 s 21 and 2011 c 10 s 58 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Fourteen days after a primary or special election and twenty-one
days after a general election, the county canvassing board shall
complete the canvass and certify the results. Each ballot that was
returned ((before 8:00 p.m. on the day of the special election, general
election, or primary, and each ballot bearing a postmark on or before
the date of the special election, general election, or primary and
received no later than the day before certification,)) in accordance
with the time requirements of RCW 29A.40.110 must be included in the
canvass report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act may be known and cited as the mail
in ballot deadline act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---