BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.119A
RCW to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the preparedness of public water systems
in the event of natural or human-caused disasters will be vital to the
well-being of state residents. Many of the state's water systems have
already taken initial steps to assess their susceptibility to terrorist
attacks. However, the state's high risk of earthquakes and other
natural disasters makes it prudent to adopt a more comprehensive and
sustained approach to addressing water system vulnerabilities. The
recent impact of a major chemical spill on water supplies in West
Virginia serves as a stark reminder of the potential susceptibility of
many of our own water systems to one ill-fated event. Therefore, it is
the intent of the legislature to improve the planning of water systems
to ensure their preparedness to face adverse events. It is further the
intent of the legislature to allow the department to share pertinent
information about water systems' natural and human-caused disaster
preparedness with the capital budget committee and other appropriate
committees of the legislature, in order to allow the state to make wise
allocation and prioritization decisions about investments in water
system preparedness and infrastructure improvements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.119A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Every group A public water system with more than three thousand
three hundred service connections and, at the discretion of the
department, other water systems not planning under the small water
system management program shall develop and submit to the department a
hazard mitigation plan.
(a) The hazard mitigation plan must identify water system
operational and infrastructure vulnerabilities to natural disasters,
terrorist attacks, and other intentional acts that would threaten the
public water system's ability to safely and reliably provide water to
its customers.
(b) The hazard mitigation plan must include a prioritized schedule
of improvements that the public water system will undertake to mitigate
the threats identified in the hazard mitigation plan.
(c) To the extent practicable, the development and submission of
the hazard mitigation plan must be harmonized and coordinated with the
water system planning requirements established pursuant to RCW
43.20.050(2)(a)(iv). An initial hazard mitigation plan must be
submitted to the department by January 1, 2018, in conjunction with the
submission of water system plans.
(2) Water systems required to develop hazard mitigation plans under
subsection (1) of this section must periodically submit an update to
the department regarding the system's progress towards making the
improvements identified in the hazard mitigation plan. The update must
be submitted to the department no later than one year after the
development and each update of a water system plan under the rules
developed pursuant to RCW 43.20.050.
(3) The hazard mitigation plan, reports filed pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section, and other related records that identify
public water system vulnerabilities are exempt from public disclosure
under chapter 42.56 RCW.
(4) The department may adopt rules, in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW, necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.56.330 and 2012 c 68 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to public utilities, public
water systems, and transportation is exempt from disclosure under this
chapter:
(1) Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission
or attorney general under RCW 80.04.095 that a court has determined are
confidential under RCW 80.04.095;
(2) The residential addresses and residential telephone numbers of
the customers of a public utility contained in the records or lists
held by the public utility of which they are customers, except that
this information may be released to the division of child support or
the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another
state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, for the
establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order;
(3) The names, residential addresses, residential telephone
numbers, and other individually identifiable records held by an agency
in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or other ride-sharing program or
service; however, these records may be disclosed to other persons who
apply for ride-matching services and who need that information in order
to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share rides;
(4) The personally identifying information of current or former
participants or applicants in a paratransit or other transit service
operated for the benefit of persons with disabilities or elderly
persons;
(5) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transit passes or other fare payment media including, but not
limited to, stored value smart cards and magnetic strip cards, except
that an agency may disclose personally identifying information to a
person, employer, educational institution, or other entity that is
responsible, in whole or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring
or using a transit pass or other fare payment media for the purpose of
preventing fraud, or to the news media when reporting on public
transportation or public safety. As used in this subsection,
"personally identifying information" includes acquisition or use
information pertaining to a specific, individual transit pass or fare
payment media.
(a) Information regarding the acquisition or use of transit passes
or fare payment media may be disclosed in aggregate form if the data
does not contain any personally identifying information.
(b) Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies if the request is accompanied by a court order;
(6) Any information obtained by governmental agencies that is
collected by the use of a motor carrier intelligent transportation
system or any comparable information equipment attached to a truck,
tractor, or trailer; however, the information may be given to other
governmental agencies or the owners of the truck, tractor, or trailer
from which the information is obtained. As used in this subsection,
"motor carrier" has the same definition as provided in RCW 81.80.010;
(7) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transponders or other technology to facilitate payment of
tolls. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form as long as
the data does not contain any personally identifying information. For
these purposes aggregate data may include the census tract of the
account holder as long as any individual personally identifying
information is not released. Personally identifying information may be
released to law enforcement agencies only for toll enforcement
purposes. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies for other purposes only if the request is
accompanied by a court order; ((and))
(8) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use a driver's license or identicard that includes a radio
frequency identification chip or similar technology to facilitate
border crossing. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form
as long as the data does not contain any personally identifying
information. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies only for United States customs and border
protection enforcement purposes. Personally identifying information
may be released to law enforcement agencies for other purposes only if
the request is accompanied by a court order; and
(9) Hazard mitigation plans and related reports filed with the
department of health by a public water system.

--- END ---