BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a city transit system under RCW
35.58.2721 or chapter 35.95A RCW, a county transportation authority
under chapter 36.57 RCW, a metropolitan municipal corporation transit
system under chapter 36.56 RCW, a public transportation benefit area
under chapter 36.57A RCW, an unincorporated transportation benefit area
under RCW 36.57.100, a regional transit authority under chapter 81.112
RCW, or any special purpose district formed to operate a public
transportation system may impose by a majority vote of the legislative
body a local motor vehicle excise tax of up to one and one-half percent
annually on the value of every motor vehicle registered to a person
residing within the boundaries of the entity imposing the tax based on
any guidebook, report, or compendium of recognized standing in the
automotive industry, such as the Kelley Blue Book or the National
Automobile Dealers' Association Guide. A motor vehicle excise tax may
not be imposed on vehicles licensed under RCW 46.17.355, except for
motor vehicles with an unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less,
RCW 46.16A.425, 46.17.335, or 46.17.350(1)(c).
(2) An entity imposing a tax under this section must contract,
before the effective date of the resolution or ordinance imposing the
local motor vehicle excise tax, administration and collection to the
department of licensing, as appropriate, which must deduct an amount,
as provided by contract, for administration and collection expenses
incurred by the department.
(3) If the department of licensing determines a value for a vehicle
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, any person who pays a
locally imposed motor vehicle excise tax for that vehicle may appeal
the valuation to the department of licensing under chapter 34.05 RCW.
If the taxpayer is successful on appeal, the department must refund the
excess tax.
(4) The tax imposed under this section applies only when renewing
a vehicle registration, and is effective upon the registration renewal
date as provided by the department of licensing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Developer" means an individual, group of individuals,
partnership, corporation, association, municipal corporation, state
agency, or other person undertaking development, and its successors and
assigns.
(2) "Development" means the subdivision or short platting of land
or the construction or reconstruction of residential, commercial,
industrial, public, or any other building, building space, or land.
(3) "Direct result of the proposed development" means those
quantifiable transit impacts that are caused by vehicles or pedestrians
whose trip origin or destination is the proposed development.
(4) "Fair market value" means the price in terms of money that a
property will bring in a competitive and open market under all
conditions of a fair sale, the buyer and seller each prudently
knowledgeable, and assuming the price is not affected by undue
stimulus, measured at the time of the dedication to local government of
land or improved transportation facilities.
(5) "Local public transit providers" means a city transit system
under RCW 35.58.2721 or chapter 35.95A RCW, a county transportation
authority under chapter 36.57 RCW, a metropolitan municipal corporation
transit system under chapter 36.56 RCW, a public transportation benefit
area under chapter 36.57A RCW, an unincorporated transportation benefit
area under RCW 36.57.100, a regional transit authority under chapter
81.112 RCW, or any special purpose district formed to operate a public
transportation system in the state of Washington.
(6) "Off-site transit improvements" means those transit capital
improvements designated in the local plan adopted under this chapter
that are authorized to be undertaken by local public transit providers
and that serve the transit needs of more than one development.
(7) "Transit impact fee" means a monetary charge imposed on new
development for the purpose of mitigating off-site transit impacts that
are a direct result of the proposed development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Local public transit providers may develop
and adopt programs for the purpose of jointly funding, from public and
private sources, transit improvements necessitated in whole or in part
by economic development and growth within their respective
jurisdictions. Local public transit providers must adopt the programs
by ordinance after notice and public hearing. Each program must
contain the elements described in this section.
(1) The program must identify the geographic boundaries of the
entire area or areas generally benefited by the proposed off-site
transit improvements and within which transit impact fees will be
imposed under this chapter.
(2) The program must be based on an adopted comprehensive, long-term transit plan (a) identifying the proposed off-site transit
improvements reasonable and necessary to meet the future growth needs
of the designated plan area and intended to be covered by this joint
funding program, including acquisition of right-of-way, construction
and reconstruction of transit capital improvements, and (b) identifying
design standards, levels of service, capacities, and costs applicable
to the program. The program must also indicate how the transit plan is
coordinated with applicable plans for the region and for adjacent
jurisdictions. The program must also indicate how public
transportation and ride-sharing improvements and services will be used
to reduce off-site transit impacts from development.
(3) The program must include at least a six-year capital funding
program, updated annually, identifying the specific public sources and
amounts of revenue necessary to pay for that portion of the cost of all
off-site transit improvements contained in the transit plan that will
not foreseeably be funded by transit impact fees. The program must
include a proposed schedule for construction and expenditures of funds.
The funding program must consider the additional local tax revenue
estimated to be generated by new development within the plan area if
all or a portion of the additional revenue is proposed to be earmarked
as future appropriations for such off-site transit improvements.
(4) The program must authorize transit impact fees to be imposed on
new development within the plan area for the purpose of providing a
portion of the funding for reasonable and necessary off-site transit
improvements to solve the cumulative impacts of planned growth and
development in the plan area. Off-site transit impacts must be
measured as a pro rata share of the capacity of the off-site transit
improvements being funded under the program. The fees must not exceed
the amount that the local public transit provider can demonstrate is
reasonably necessary as a direct result of the proposed development.
(5) The program must provide that the funds collected as a result
of a particular new development must be used in substantial part to pay
for improvements mitigating the impacts of the development or be
refunded to the property owners of record. Fees paid toward more than
one transit improvement may be pooled and expended on any one of the
improvements mitigating the impact of the development. The funds must
be expended, in all cases, within six years of collection by the local
public transit provider or the unexpended funds must be refunded.
(6) The program must also describe the formula, timing, security,
credits, and other terms and conditions affecting the amount and method
of payment of the transit impact fees as further provided for in RCW
39.92.040. In calculating the amount of the fee, local public transit
providers must consider and give credit for the developer's
participation in public transportation and ride-sharing improvements
and services.
(7) The administrative element of the program must include: An
opportunity for administrative appeal by the developer and hearing
before an independent examiner of the amount of the transit impact fee
imposed; the establishment of a designated account for the public and
private funds appropriated or collected for the transit improvements
identified in the plan; methods to enforce collection of the public and
private funds identified in the program; the designation of the
administrative departments or other entities responsible for
administering the program, including determination of fee amounts,
transit planning, and construction; and provisions for future amendment
of the program, including the addition of other off-site transit
improvements. The program may not be amended in a manner to relieve
local public transit providers of any contractual obligations made to
prior developers.
(8) The program must provide that private transit impact fees must
not be collected for any off-site transit improvement that is incapable
of being reasonably carried out because of lack of public funds or
other foreseeable impediment.
(9) The program must provide that a transit impact fee may not be
imposed on a development by local public transit providers pursuant to
this program when mitigation of the same off-site transit impacts for
the development is being required by any government agency pursuant to
any other local, state, or federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The program must describe the formula or
method for calculating the amount of the transit impact fees to be
imposed on new development within the plan area. The program may
require developers to pay a transit impact fee for off-site transit
improvements not yet constructed and for those jointly funded
improvements constructed since the commencement of the program.
(2) The program must define the event in the development approval
process that triggers a determination of the amount of the transit
impact fees and the event that triggers the obligation to make actual
payment of the fees. However, the payment obligation may not commence
before the date the developer has obtained a building permit for the
new development or, in the case of residential subdivisions or short
plats, at the time of final plat approval, at the developer's option.
If the developer of a residential subdivision or short plat elects to
pay the fee at the date a building permit has been obtained, the option
to pay the transit impact fee by installments as authorized under this
section is deemed to have been waived by the developer. The developer
must be given the option to pay the transit impact fee in a lump sum,
without interest, or by installment with reasonable interest over a
period of five years or more as specified by the local government.
(3) The local public transit provider must require security for the
obligation to pay the transit impact fee, in the form of a recorded
agreement, deed of trust, letter of credit, or other instrument
determined satisfactory by the local government. The developer must
also be given credit against its obligations for the transit impact
fee, for the fair market value of off-site land or for the cost of
constructing off-site transit improvements dedicated to the local
public transit provider, or both. If the value of the dedication
exceeds the amount of transit impact fee obligation, the developer is
entitled to reimbursement from transit impact fees attributable to the
dedicated improvements and paid by subsequent developers within the
plan area.
(4) Payment of the transit impact fee entitles the developer and
its successors and assigns to credit against any other fee, local
improvement district assessment, or other monetary imposition made
specifically for the designated off-site transit improvements intended
to be covered by the transit impact fee imposed under this program.
The program must also define the criteria for establishing periodic fee
increases attributable to construction and related cost increases for
the improvements designated in the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
Any term used in this chapter has the same meaning as when used in a
comparable context in the internal revenue code unless provided
otherwise.
(1) "Capital assets" has the same meaning as provided in section
1221 of the internal revenue code.
(2) "Capital gains" means the excess of the gains from sales or
exchanges of capital assets over the losses from such sales or
exchanges received by a person.
(3) "Department" means the state department of revenue.
(4) "Internal revenue code" means the United States internal
revenue code of 1986 and amendments thereto, as existing and in effect
as of the effective date of this section.
(5) "Nonresident" means a person whose domicile is not in this
state and who does not reside in this state for more than one hundred
eighty-three days during the tax year.
(6) "Person" means a natural person.
(7)(a) "Resident" means a person whose domicile is in this state or
whose domicile is not in this state but who resides in this state for
more than one hundred eighty-three days during the tax year.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, once a person is a resident,
residency continues for three years, notwithstanding changes in
domicile.
(8) "Taxable year" means the taxpayer's taxable year as defined
under the internal revenue code.
(9) "Taxpayer" means a person receiving capital gains subject to
tax under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The legislative body of a city transit
system under RCW 35.58.2721 or chapter 35.95A RCW, a county
transportation authority under chapter 36.57 RCW, a metropolitan
municipal corporation transit system under chapter 36.56 RCW, a public
transportation benefit area under chapter 36.57A RCW, an unincorporated
transportation benefit area under RCW 36.57.100, a regional transit
authority under chapter 81.112 RCW, or any special purpose district
formed to operate a public transportation system may impose by a
majority vote of the legislative body a tax on every person residing
within the boundaries of the entity imposing the tax for the privilege
of selling or exchanging capital assets. The tax equals two percent
multiplied by a person's capital gains for each taxable year.
(2) For resident persons, all capital gains must be allocated to
this state.
(3) For nonresident persons, capital gains must be derived from
sources within this state and allocated to this state.
(4) The following threshold exemptions are allowed in determining
the tax under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Fifty thousand dollars; or
(b) One hundred thousand dollars for persons filing joint returns
under section 9 of this act.
(5) Capital gains must be reported in the taxable year they are
received. Losses from the sale or exchange of capital assets may only
be used to offset gains from other sales or exchanges of capital assets
in the same taxable year.
(6) Receipts from this tax must be deposited into the education
legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This chapter does not apply to gain from the
sale of a principal residence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This chapter does not apply to amounts
received by any person for the sale or exchange of property as
authorized under the condemnation proceedings as provided by law for
the exercise of the power of eminent domain under Title 8 RCW,
regardless of whether the parties have settled the matter prior to
filing an action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The intent of this section is to prevent
the multiple taxation of capital gains in both Washington and another
taxing jurisdiction.
(2) As used in this section, "taxing jurisdiction" means any of the
states, the District of Columbia, or any territory or possession of the
United States; any municipality, city, county, township, parish,
transportation district, or assessment jurisdiction; or other political
subdivision within the territorial limits of the United States with the
authority to impose a tax, charge, or fee.
(3) A resident person is allowed a credit against the tax imposed
in section 6 of this act equal to the amount of tax paid to another
taxing jurisdiction on capital gains derived from sources within the
other taxing jurisdiction.
(4) The amount of tax credits received by any resident person under
this section may not exceed the total amount of tax due under this
chapter, and there may be no carryback or carryforward of any unused
credits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Any person who knowingly attempts to
evade the tax imposed under this chapter or payment of the tax is
guilty of a class C felony as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2) Any person who knowingly fails to pay tax, make returns, keep
records, or supply information, as required under this chapter, is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) All taxpayers residing within the
boundaries of an entity imposing the tax under section 6 of this act
must file with the department, on forms prescribed by the department,
a capital gains tax return for each taxable year. A person owing no
tax for a taxable year is not required to file a return for that year.
Each person required to file a return under this chapter must, without
assessment, notice, or demand, pay any tax due thereon to the
department on or before the date fixed for the filing of the return.
(2) The department may by rule require that certain taxpayers file,
on forms prescribed by the department, informational returns for any
period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The due date of a return required to be
filed with the department must be the due date of the federal income
tax return or informational return for federal income tax purposes,
except as otherwise required by the department. The department may
grant extensions of times by which returns required to be filed by this
title may be submitted. The department may grant extensions of time to
pay tax with regard to taxes imposed by this chapter. Interest at the
rate as specified in RCW 82.32.050 must accrue during any extension
period and the interest and penalty provisions under chapter 82.32 RCW
apply to late payments and deficiencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) If the federal income tax liabilities
of both spouses are determined on a joint federal return for the
taxable year, they must file a joint return under this chapter.
(2) If neither spouse is required to file a federal income tax
return for the taxable year, a joint return is required to be filed
under this title under the same conditions under which a joint return
may be filed for purposes of the federal income tax.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, if the
federal income tax liability of either spouse is determined on a
separate federal return for the taxable year, they must file separate
returns under this chapter.
(4) In any case in which a joint return is filed under this
section, the liability of the husband and wife or partners is joint and
several, unless the spouse or partner is relieved of liability under 26
U.S.C. Sec. 6013 of the internal revenue code.
(5) Partners in a state registered domestic partnership or who have
a marriage licensed under chapter 26.04 RCW may file a joint return
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) Every person required to pay the tax
imposed under this chapter must keep records, render statements, make
returns, file reports, and perform other acts as the department
requires by rule. Each return must be made under penalty of perjury
and on forms prescribed by the department. The department may require
other statements and reports be made under penalty of perjury and on
forms prescribed by the department. The department may require any
taxpayer to furnish to the department a correct copy of any return or
document that the taxpayer has filed with the internal revenue service
or received from the internal revenue service.
(2) All books and records and other papers and documents required
to be kept under this chapter are subject to inspection by the
department at all times during business hours of the day.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) To the extent possible without being
inconsistent with this chapter, all of the provisions of the internal
revenue code relating to the time and manner of making returns,
extensions of time for filing returns, verification of returns, and the
time when a return is deemed filed apply to this chapter.
(2) The department by rule may provide modifications and exceptions
to the requirements specified under subsection (1) of this section if
reasonably necessary to facilitate the prompt, efficient, and equitable
collection of tax under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) The department must refund all taxes
improperly paid or collected.
(2) The following sections apply to the administration of taxes
imposed under this title: RCW 82.32.050, 82.32.055, 82.32.060,
82.32.070, 82.32.080, 82.32.085, 82.32.090, 82.32.100, 82.32.105,
82.32.110, 82.32.117, 82.32.120, 82.32.130, 82.32.135, 82.32.145,
82.32.150, 82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.32.180, 82.32.190, 82.32.200,
82.32.210, 82.32.212, 82.32.220, 82.32.230, 82.32.235, 82.32.237,
82.32.240, 82.32.245, 82.32.265, 82.32.300, 82.32.310, 82.32.320,
82.32.330, 82.32.340, 82.32.350, 82.32.360, 82.32.380, and 82.32.410.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The department may adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW for the administration and enforcement of this
chapter. The rules, to the extent possible without being inconsistent
with this chapter, must follow the internal revenue code and the
regulations and rulings of the United States treasury department with
respect to the federal income tax. The department may adopt as a part
of these rules any portions of the internal revenue code and treasury
department regulations and rulings, in whole or in part.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) An authorized agent providing closing
and settlement services in a conveyance is required to withhold from
consideration payable to a transferor an amount equal to the tax due
imposed under section 6 of this act.
(2) An authorized agent is not required to withhold amounts under
this section if:
(a) The conveyance is in lieu of foreclosure of a mortgage, trust
deed, or other security instrument or a land sale contract with no
additional monetary consideration;
(b) The transferor is a personal representative, executor,
conservator, bankruptcy trustee, or other person acting under judicial
review;
(c) The transferor delivers to the authorized agent a written
assurance that the sale or exchange qualifies for the exclusion of gain
under section 7 or 8 of this act.
(3)(a) An authorized agent must electronically report the tax
withheld on forms prescribed by the department and remit electronic
payment of the tax to the department under the methods provided in RCW
82.32.080. An authorized agent must electronically file and make
payment under this subsection within twenty-five days after the end of
the month in which the conveyance occurred.
(b) The amount of tax due is a specific lien upon each parcel of
real property located in this state that is sold by a transferor. The
lien attached from the time of sale until the tax is withheld and paid
as provided under this section. The lien may be enforced in the manner
prescribed for the foreclosure of mortgages.
(c) Amounts withheld under this section are held in trust. If an
authorized agent fails to remit an amount withheld by the agent under
this section by the time remittance is required, the department may
recover from the authorized agent the amount withheld, plus interest
and penalties as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW. The tax collection
provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply to the collection of amounts
withheld pursuant to this section but not remitted to the department as
required under this section.
(4) A transferor may claim the amount withheld by an authorized
agent on the transferor's tax return.
(5) An authorized agent may withhold funds under this section
without written instructions to withhold from the transferor.
(6) A written affidavit must be executed by the transferor or the
transferor's tax advisor under penalty of perjury and must contain the
transferor's taxpayer identification number. The authorized agent must
retain for six years from the date of the closing of the conveyance any
written affirmation obtained by the agent in connection with the
conveyance. The department must prescribe by rule the form and content
of the written affidavit.
(7) It is a defense to any claim by the department or by a
transferor against an agent that the agent has acted in reasonable
reliance upon representations made by the transferor or the
transferor's tax advisor.
(8) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Authorized agent" means an agent who is responsible for
closing and settlement services in a conveyance;
(b) "Closing and settlement services" means services that are
provided by:
(i) A licensed escrow agent in a real estate closing escrow; or
(ii) An attorney for the benefit of a transferor or a transferee in
a conveyance, if, simultaneously with the conveyance, the attorney
deposits the unpaid purchase price into the attorney's client trust
account for disbursal pursuant to the written instructions of, or the
agreement between, the transferor and transferee;
(c) "Consideration" includes the amount of cash paid for a
conveyance and the amount of any lien, mortgage, contract,
indebtedness, or other encumbrance existing against the property
conveyed to which the property remains subject or which the purchaser
agrees to pay or assume;
(d) "Conveyance" means a sale or exchange of any real estate
located in Washington;
(e) "Net proceeds" means the net amount to be disbursed to the
transferor, prior to reduction for withholding, as shown on the
transferor's settlement statement for the conveyance; and
(f) "Transferor" means a person, as defined in section 5 of this
act, on the closing date of the conveyance.

Sec. 19 RCW 82.45.090 and 2009 c 350 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for a sale of a beneficial interest in real property
((where)) when no instrument evidencing the sale is recorded in the
official real property records of the county in which the property is
located, the tax imposed ((by)) under this chapter ((shall)) and the
tax withheld under section 18 of this act must be paid to and collected
by the treasurer of the county within which is located the real
property which was sold.
(2) In collecting the tax under this section, the treasurer
((shall)) must act as agent for the state.
(a) The county treasurer ((shall)) must cause a verification of
payment evidencing satisfaction of the lien to be affixed to the
instrument of sale or conveyance prior to its recording or to the real
estate excise tax affidavit in the case of used mobile home sales and
used floating home sales.
(i) A receipt issued by the county treasurer for the payment of the
tax imposed under this chapter ((shall be)) is evidence of the
satisfaction of the lien imposed hereunder and may be recorded in the
manner prescribed for recording satisfactions of mortgages.
((No)) (ii) An instrument of sale or conveyance evidencing a sale
subject to the tax ((shall)) may not be accepted by the county auditor
for filing or recording until the tax ((shall have)) has been paid and
the verification of payment affixed thereto; in case the tax is not due
on the transfer, the instrument ((shall)) may not be so accepted until
suitable notation of such fact has been made on the instrument by the
treasurer.
(iii) Any time there is a sale of a used mobile home, used
manufactured home, used park model, or used floating home that has not
been title eliminated, property taxes must be current in order to
complete the processing of the real estate excise tax affidavit or
other documents transferring title.
(iv) Verification that the property taxes are current must be noted
on the mobile home real estate excise tax affidavit or on a form
approved by the county treasurer.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (2), "mobile home,"
"manufactured home," and "park model" have the same meaning as provided
in RCW 59.20.030.
(((2))) (3) For a sale of a beneficial interest in real property
((where)) when a tax is due under this chapter and ((where)) when no
instrument is recorded in the official real property records of the
county in which the property is located, the sale ((shall)) must be
reported to the department of revenue within five days from the date of
the sale on such returns or forms and according to such procedures as
the department may prescribe. Such forms or returns ((shall)) must be
signed by both the transferor and the transferee and shall be
accompanied by payment of the tax due.
(((3))) (4) Any person who intentionally makes a false statement
on any return or form required to be filed with the department under
this chapter is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

Sec. 20 RCW 82.45.150 and 1996 c 149 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All of chapter 82.32 RCW, except RCW 82.32.030, 82.32.050,
82.32.140, 82.32.270, and 82.32.090 (1) and (((8))) (10), applies to
the tax imposed ((by)) under this chapter, in addition to any other
provisions of law for the payment and enforcement of the tax imposed
((by)) under this chapter. The department of revenue ((shall)) must by
rule provide for the effective administration of this chapter. The
rules ((shall)) must prescribe and furnish a real estate excise tax
affidavit form verified by both the seller and the buyer, or agents of
each, to be used by each county, or the department, as the case may be,
in the collection of the tax imposed by this chapter, except that an
affidavit given in connection with grant of an easement or right-of-way
to a gas, electrical, or telecommunications company, as defined in RCW
80.04.010, or to a public utility district or cooperative that
distributes electricity, need be verified only on behalf of the
company, district, or cooperative. The department of revenue ((shall))
must annually conduct audits of transactions and affidavits filed under
this chapter.
(2) The department may combine the form required in section 11 of
this act with the real estate excise tax affidavit form required in
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county may submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters and, if approved, may fix and
impose a tax at up to the rate specified in the authorizing proposition
on the selling price on the retail sale of motor vehicle fuel and
special fuel within the applicable jurisdiction solely for the purpose
of providing funds for the operation, maintenance, or capital needs of
a public transportation agency or public transportation limited to
persons with special needs under RCW 36.57.130 and 36.57A.180 that is
located within the boundaries of the county.
(2) An election held under this section must be held not more than
twelve months before the date on which the proposed tax is to be
levied. The ballot setting forth the proposition must state the tax
rate that is proposed.
(3) The tax imposed under this section must be collected and paid
to the jurisdiction only once in respect to any motor vehicle fuel or
special fuel. This tax is in addition to any other tax authorized or
imposed by law.
(4) An entity imposing a tax under this section must contract,
before the effective date of the resolution or ordinance imposing the
local motor vehicle fuel and special fuel tax, administration and
collection of the tax to the department of licensing, as appropriate,
which must deduct an amount, as provided by contract, for the
administration and collection expenses incurred by the department.
(5) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Motor vehicle fuel" has the meaning as provided in RCW
82.36.010;
(b) "Special fuel" has the meaning as provided in RCW 82.38.020;
and
(c) "Motor vehicle" has the meaning as provided in RCW 82.36.010.

Sec. 22 RCW 82.80.--- and 2014 c ... (this act) s 21 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county may submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters and, if approved, may fix and
impose a tax at up to the rate specified in the authorizing proposition
on the selling price on the retail sale of ((motor vehicle fuel and
special)) fuel within the applicable jurisdiction solely for the
purpose of providing funds for the operation, maintenance, or capital
needs of a public transportation agency or public transportation
limited to persons with special needs under RCW 36.57.130 and
36.57A.180 that is located within the boundaries of the county.
(2) An election held under this section must be held not more than
twelve months before the date on which the proposed tax is to be
levied. The ballot setting forth the proposition must state the tax
rate that is proposed.
(3) The tax imposed under this section must be collected and paid
to the jurisdiction only once in respect to any ((motor vehicle fuel or
special)) fuel. This tax is in addition to any other tax authorized or
imposed by law.
(4) An entity imposing a tax under this section must contract,
before the effective date of the resolution or ordinance imposing the
local ((motor vehicle fuel and special)) fuel tax, administration and
collection of the tax to the department of licensing, as appropriate,
which must deduct an amount, as provided by contract, for the
administration and collection expenses incurred by the department.
(5) For purposes of this section:
(a) (("Motor vehicle fuel" has the meaning as provided in RCW
82.36.010;
(b) "Special)) Fuel" has the meaning as provided in RCW 82.38.020;
and
(((c))) (b) "Motor vehicle" has the meaning as provided in RCW
((82.36.010)) 82.38.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a city transit system under RCW
35.58.2721 or chapter 35.95A RCW, a county transportation authority
under chapter 36.57 RCW, a metropolitan municipal corporation transit
system under chapter 36.56 RCW, a public transportation benefit area
under chapter 36.57A RCW, an unincorporated transportation benefit area
under RCW 36.57.100, a regional transit authority under chapter 81.112
RCW, or any special purpose district formed to operate a public
transportation system may impose by a majority vote of the legislative
body an excise tax of up to:
(a) One-tenth of one percent of the total payroll of an employer
with forty-nine or fewer employees, measured by the number of full-time
equivalent employees;
(b) Two-tenths of one percent of the total payroll of an employer
with more than forty-nine employees but less than two hundred fifty-one
employees, measured by the number of full-time equivalent employees;
and
(c) Three-tenths of one percent of the total payroll of an employer
with two hundred fifty-one or more employees, measured by the number of
full-time equivalent employees.
(2) The entity imposing the tax authorized in this section may
provide for exemptions from the tax to such educational, cultural,
health, charitable, or religious organizations as it deems appropriate.

Sec. 24 RCW 82.14.0455 and 2010 c 105 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions in RCW 36.73.065, a transportation
benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW may fix and impose a sales and
use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax
authorized in this section is in addition to any other taxes authorized
by law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the
state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within the boundaries of the district. The rate of tax
shall not exceed two-tenths of one percent of the selling price in the
case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use
tax. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the tax may
not be imposed for a period exceeding ten years. This tax, if not
imposed under the conditions of subsection (2) of this section, may be
extended for a period not exceeding ten years with an affirmative vote
of the voters voting at the election.
(2) The voter-approved sales tax initially imposed under this
section after July 1, 2010, may be imposed for a period exceeding ten
years if the moneys received under this section are dedicated for the
repayment of indebtedness incurred in accordance with the requirements
of chapter 36.73 RCW.
(3) Money received from the tax imposed under this section must be
spent in accordance with the requirements of chapter 36.73 RCW.
(4) The tax authorized under this section may not be imposed by a
county that is imposing a tax or fee under section 1, 3, 6, or 21 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Sections 2 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 Sections 5 through 18 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 This act, being necessary for the welfare
of the state and its inhabitants, must be liberally construed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 Except for section 22 of this act, this act
takes effect July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 Section 22 of this act takes effect July 1,
2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 Section 21 of this act expires July 1,
2015.

--- END ---