BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 1.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Unless specifically provided otherwise by law, whenever the use of
a signature is authorized or required by this code in any written
communication with a state agency, an electronic signature may be used
with the same force and effect as the use of a signature affixed by
hand, as long as the electronic signature conforms to all of the
provisions of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter and sections 1 and 4 of this act unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or
process, attached to, or logically associated with, a contract or other
record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the
record.
(2) "Secure electronic signature" means an electronic signature
that:
(a) Is unique to the person making the signature;
(b) Uses a technology or process to make the signature that is
under the sole control of the person making the signature;
(c) Uses a technology or process that can identify the person using
the technology or process; and
(d) Can be linked with an electronic record in such a way that it
can be used to determine whether the electronic record has been changed
since the electronic signature was incorporated in, attached to, or
associated with the electronic record.
(3) "State agency" means any state office or activity of the
executive and judicial branches of state government, including state
departments, offices, divisions, boards, commissions, institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, and correctional and
other types of institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Unless specifically provided otherwise
by law, state agencies may use or accept secure electronic signatures
for any written communications that require a signature. Such
signatures are valid and enforceable.
(2) The use or acceptance of an electronic signature shall be at
the option of the state agency. This section shall not be construed to
require a state agency to use or to authorize the use of an electronic
signature, nor may it be construed to prevent a unit of state
government from electing to follow the procedures for digital signature
certification established under the Washington electronic
authentication act, chapter 19.34 RCW.
(3) Agency use or acceptance of electronic signatures must comply
with any rules, policies, or technical standards established by the
office of the chief information officer.
(4) A state agency seeking to authorize, under the authority of
this chapter, the use or acceptance of an electronic signature shall
file an official notice in the Washington State Register.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.41A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The chief information officer shall adopt rules and establish
standards and policies as necessary to facilitate the use,
authentication, and acceptance of electronic signatures, as defined in
section 2 of this act, by government agencies. However, the chief
information officer shall not adopt rules or establish standards or
policies that seek to apportion fault or impose or limit liability
relating to the use of electronic signatures.
(2) In developing rules, standards, and policies for electronic
signatures, the chief information officer shall seek the advice of the
attorney general, the secretary of state, and any other government or
private entities that the chief information officer deems appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 and 3 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 1 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 and 3 of this act take effect
January 1, 2015.

--- END ---