BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall conduct a pilot project for enrollees in the
uniform medical plan to test the mutual accountability model in which
financial incentives are offered to both health care providers and
their patients for declaring or demonstrating to one another adherence
to best clinical practices and healthy behaviors. At a minimum, the
mutual accountability model must:
(a) Incorporate evidence-based medicine treatment guidelines and
information therapy, defined as providing a patient the right
information at the right time to make an informed decision;
(b) Be voluntary for health care providers and patients on an
encounter-by-encounter basis;
(c) Compensate health care providers for declaring to their
patients their adherence or reasons for nonadherence to evidence-based
medicine treatment guidelines, and for providing relevant educational
material as information therapy to their patients;
(d) Offer a financial reward to the patient for responding to the
delivery of information therapy by demonstrating the patient's
understanding of his or her health condition and recommended care, by
declaring or demonstrating adherence or providing a reason for
nonadherence to recommended care, by agreeing to allow the patient's
health care provider to view the patient's responses and acknowledge
the patient's health accomplishments, and by rating the quality of care
provided to the patient against the treatment guidelines and
recommended care; and
(e) Allow the health care provider and the patient to earn
additional financial incentives by applying the mutual accountability
model to wellness, prevention, and care management regimens such as
health risk assessments and screenings, smoking cessation, weight loss
and fitness programs, and disease management.
(2) To conduct the pilot project, the board shall contract,
directly or through an insuring entity, with a vendor that offers a
web-based health care cost containment program that incorporates the
mutual accountability model. The contract must apply to plan years
2015, 2016, and 2017.
(3) The board shall determine the number of beneficiaries necessary
to participate in the pilot project to achieve a statistical
significance, but the number of beneficiaries may not be less than ten
percent of the enrollees in the uniform medical plan.
(4) The board shall contract with an independent entity to collect
and analyze the pilot project data. The independent entity shall
provide analyses of the progress of the pilot project at least
annually. The independent contractor shall submit a final report
regarding the financial sustainability of the pilot project, its
effectiveness at controlling health care costs, and other relevant
objectives identified by the board. The report must include
recommendations for improving the program and expanding its use. The
independent contractor shall submit the report to the board by
September 1, 2018. The board shall submit the report to the governor
and the legislature by October 1, 2018.
(5) The board shall use funds from the uniform medical plan
benefits administration account established under RCW 41.05.143 for the
cost of the pilot project and may not pass these costs to participating
state agencies, other entities participating in the public employees'
benefits board, or providers.

--- END ---