BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds:
(1) The federal patient protection and affordable care act became
law on March 23, 2010, enacting broad changes to every element of the
nation's health care system with the majority of changes effective
January 1, 2014;
(2) Individuals and businesses were told by many of our national
and state leaders that the patient protection and affordable care act
would not impact their ability to keep their current health plan and
doctors and that their premiums would be less expensive;
(3) The federal government has provided states with some
flexibility in the implementation of the patient protection and
affordable care act, but our state insurance commissioner has refused
to implement some of the changes allowed by the federal government;
(4) The requirement in the patient protection and affordable care
act that employers with fifty or more full-time equivalent employees
offer affordable health insurance or pay a penalty has been delayed to
take effect January 1, 2015, and the impacts of this requirement on
employers, employees, and jobs are likely to be significant since sixty
percent of Washingtonians receive health insurance through employers;
(5) Individuals and businesses will continue to experience many
changes to their health care and health insurance options over the
coming years and months if the patient protection and affordable care
act remains unchanged;
(6) Concerns of increasing health care costs remain;
(7) The federal government continues to adopt and revise numerous
regulations and guidelines to implement the patient protection and
affordable care act;
(8) State policymakers need to actively follow the changing federal
regulations and guidelines so that the state can develop the most
appropriate response to the changes in the health care system for the
people of the state of Washington;
(9) Several state and public entities, including the newly created
health benefit exchange, have different roles in implementing health
care policy in the state. These entities are not required to
coordinate their activities; and
(10) Better coordination between and oversight of the health care
authority, the health benefit exchange, the office of the insurance
commissioner, the department of health, and the department of social
and health services will lead to efficiencies in health care delivery
and ultimately cost savings to the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) A joint select committee on health
care implementation and oversight is established, with members as
provided in this subsection.
(i) The chairs of the health care committees of the senate and the
house of representatives must serve as cochairs of the committee;
(ii) The president of the senate shall appoint two members from
each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;
(iii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two
members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives; and
(iv) The governor shall appoint a nonvoting committee member.
(b) The cochairs shall convene the committee to meet no less than
quarterly.
(2) The committee shall:
(a) Provide oversight of health reform implementation by the health
care authority, the health benefit exchange, the office of the
insurance commissioner, the department of health, and the department of
social and health services to avoid duplication of efforts, to increase
the quality of services, and to reduce costs for consumers;
(b) Request briefings from the office of the insurance
commissioner, the Washington health benefit exchange, and the health
care authority;
(c) Request briefings from business organizations regarding the
impacts of the patient protection and affordable care act and its
implementation on Washington employers and employees; and
(d) Coordinate with the research and data analysis division of the
department of social and health services to monitor health care cost
trends.
(3) The committee may:
(a) Propose, as necessary, legislation and budget recommendations
to the appropriate committees of the legislature to assist in
coordination of activities and achieve better quality health care and
cost savings; and
(b) Recommend to the executive branch, the insurance commissioner,
and the health benefit exchange any changes to health reform
implementation that should be adopted due to new federal regulations or
guidelines or changes in the interpretation or implementation of the
federal patient protection and affordable care act.
(4) Staff support for the committee must be provided by senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(5) Legislative members of the committee must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The expenses of the committee must be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Committee expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.71 RCW
to read as follows:
At the time of enrollment, the exchange shall survey enrollees
regarding their insurance status and the source of their previous
health insurance coverage, if applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.02 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of the insurance commissioner, in consultation with the
health benefit exchange and the health care authority, shall provide a
quarterly report to the joint select committee on health care
implementation and oversight with the following data:
(1) The information collected under section 3 of this act;
(2) The cost of individual and small group health plans in the
exchange and individual, small group, and large group health plans
outside the exchange, and a comparison with costs reported in the
previous quarterly report;
(3) The number of individuals currently covered by individual and
small group health plans in the exchange, publicly subsidized health
care programs, and individual, small group, and large group health
plans outside the exchange, and a comparison with the numbers reported
in the previous quarter; and
(4) A current estimate of the insurance status of all state
residents categorized by source of coverage, including:
(a) Individual and small group market health plan coverage,
including, but not limited to, coverage outside the exchange,
subsidized coverage inside the exchange, and nonsubsidized coverage
inside the exchange;
(b) Large group market coverage;
(c) Coverage provided by self-insured employers or a Taft-Hartley
health care trust;
(d) Government programs, including, but not limited to, medicare
and medicaid;
(e) Coverage for active duty members of the military, military
retirees, and their dependents;
(f) Coverage provided for federal, state, and local government
employees and their dependents; and
(g) Uninsured.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The joint select committee on health care
oversight created under Engrossed Substitute Senate Concurrent
Resolution No. 8401 in 2013 is hereby abolished.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act expires December 31, 2017.

--- END ---