BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of licensing shall
conduct a review of the need for regulation of theatrical wrestling
events, including but not limited to lucha libre, using the public
criteria set forth in RCW 18.118.010 in order to develop
recommendations to the legislature regarding such regulation. In
developing its findings and recommendations, the department of
licensing shall:
(a) Consider the extent to which organizations that infrequently
sponsor or host a noncompetitive theatrical wrestling event require
regulation;
(b) Consider the extent to which wrestling events that do not
involve competition require regulation;
(c) Examine the regulation of theatrical wrestling in other states;
and
(d) Consult with professional wrestling or theatrical wrestling
participants, other licensees under chapter 67.08 RCW, other
stakeholders, and any entity or individual who may assist in
identifying areas of concern regarding the safety of professional or
theatrical wrestlers and spectators.
(2) By November 1, 2014, the department of licensing shall submit
a report detailing its findings and recommendations under this section
to the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding:
(a) The need for regulation of theatrical wrestling; and
(b) If some form of regulation is recommended, the minimum
qualifications and oversight required to meet the regulatory standard.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2015.

--- END ---