BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2013 c 204 s 2 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) The director of the department of fish and wildlife shall give
individuals who held a geoduck diver license in ((2011, 2012, 2013,
or)) 2014 and who also held a geoduck diver license in one more of the
years 2011, 2012, and 2013, and who were listed on a department of
natural resources' geoduck harvest agreement plan of operation during
((the)) those same periods, the right of first refusal to purchase a
geoduck diver license for the 2015 license year.
(2) Any license holder who qualifies for the right of first refusal
under this section must have his or her intent to purchase a geoduck
diver license in 2015 known to the director of the department of fish
and wildlife within six months of ((the effective date of this
section)) July 28, 2013.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2016.

--- END ---