BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.320.175 and 2007 c 401 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No later than the beginning of the 2008-09 school year and
thereafter, each school district shall collect and electronically
submit to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in a
format and according to a schedule prescribed by the office, the
following data for each class or course offered in each school:
(((1))) (a) The certification number or other unique identifier
associated with the teacher's certificate for each teacher assigned to
teach the class or course, including reassignments that may occur
during the school year; and
(((2))) (b) The statewide student identifier for each student
enrolled in or being provided services through the class or course.
(2) No later than the beginning of the 2014-15 school year, the
data under subsection (1) of this section must also include dates of
teacher assignments and reassignments.

--- END ---