BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Beginning July 1, 2014, the department
of labor and industries shall convene a work group to discuss
establishing definitions, policies, and procedures for mandatory
reporting of hazardous exposures suffered in the course of employment
by firefighters.
(2) The work group must include, at a minimum, stakeholders
representing firefighter unions, fire departments, fire chiefs, and
self-insured employers.
(3) By December 31, 2014, the department must report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature any recommendations for
legislation or rule making.
(4) This section expires January 31, 2015.

--- END ---