BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.10.470 and 2005 c 274 s 275 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
all proceedings, records, contracts, and other public records relating
to alternative public works transactions under this chapter shall be
open to the inspection of any interested person, firm, or corporation
in accordance with chapter 42.56 RCW.
(2) Trade secrets, as defined in RCW 19.108.010, or other
proprietary information submitted by a bidder, offeror, or contractor
in connection with an alternative public works transaction under this
chapter shall not be subject to chapter 42.56 RCW if the bidder,
offeror, or contractor specifically states in writing the reasons why
protection is necessary, and identifies the data or materials to be
protected.
(3) Proposals submitted in response to a competitive solicitation
and related evaluation documents are exempt from disclosure until the
public body announces the highest scoring finalist, in accordance with
RCW 39.10.330, or the selection process is terminated.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.131.408 and 2013 c 222 s 22 and 2013 c 186 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2022:
(1) RCW 39.10.200 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 2, 2007 c 494 s 1, &
1994 c 132 s 1;
(2) RCW 39.10.210 and 2013 c 222 s 1, 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6014,
2007 c 494 s 101, & 2005 c 469 s 3;
(3) RCW 39.10.220 and 2013 c 222 s 2, 2007 c 494 s 102, & 2005 c
377 s 1;
(4) RCW 39.10.230 and 2013 c 222 s 3, 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 3, 2009
c 75 s 1, 2007 c 494 s 103, & 2005 c 377 s 2;
(5) RCW 39.10.240 and 2013 c 222 s 4 & 2007 c 494 s 104;
(6) RCW 39.10.250 and 2013 c 222 s 5, 2009 c 75 s 2, & 2007 c 494
s 105;
(7) RCW 39.10.260 and 2013 c 222 s 6 & 2007 c 494 s 106;
(8) RCW 39.10.270 and 2013 c 222 s 7, 2009 c 75 s 3, & 2007 c 494
s 107;
(9) RCW 39.10.280 and 2013 c 222 s 8 & 2007 c 494 s 108;
(10) RCW 39.10.290 and 2007 c 494 s 109;
(11) RCW 39.10.300 and 2013 c 222 s 9, 2009 c 75 s 4, & 2007 c 494
s 201;
(12) RCW 39.10.320 and 2013 c 222 s 10, 2007 c 494 s 203, & 1994 c
132 s 7;
(13) RCW 39.10.330 and 2013 c 222 s 11, 2009 c 75 s 5, & 2007 c 494
s 204;
(14) RCW 39.10.340 and 2013 c 222 s 12 & 2007 c 494 s 301;
(15) RCW 39.10.350 and 2007 c 494 s 302;
(16) RCW 39.10.360 and 2013 c 222 s 13, 2009 c 75 s 6, & 2007 c 494
s 303;
(17) RCW 39.10.370 and 2007 c 494 s 304;
(18) RCW 39.10.380 and 2013 c 222 s 14 & 2007 c 494 s 305;
(19) RCW 39.10.385 and 2013 c 222 s 15 & 2010 c 163 s 1;
(20) RCW 39.10.390 and 2013 c 222 s 16 & 2007 c 494 s 306;
(21) RCW 39.10.400 and 2013 c 222 s 17 & 2007 c 494 s 307;
(22) RCW 39.10.410 and 2007 c 494 s 308;
(23) RCW 39.10.420 and 2013 c 222 s 18, 2013 c 186 s 1, 2012 c 102
s 1, 2009 c 75 s 7, 2007 c 494 s 401, & 2003 c 301 s 1;
(24) RCW 39.10.430 and 2007 c 494 s 402;
(25) RCW 39.10.440 and 2013 c 222 s 19 & 2007 c 494 s 403;
(26) RCW 39.10.450 and 2012 c 102 s 2 & 2007 c 494 s 404;
(27) RCW 39.10.460 and 2012 c 102 s 3 & 2007 c 494 s 405;
(28) RCW 39.10.470 and 2014 c . . . s 1 (section 1 of this act),
2005 c 274 s 275, & 1994 c 132 s 10;
(29) RCW 39.10.480 and 1994 c 132 s 9;
(30) RCW 39.10.490 and 2013 c 222 s 20, 2007 c 494 s 501, & 2001 c
328 s 5;
(31) RCW 39.10.900 and 1994 c 132 s 13;
(32) RCW 39.10.901 and 1994 c 132 s 14;
(33) RCW 39.10.903 and 2007 c 494 s 510;
(34) RCW 39.10.904 and 2007 c 494 s 512; and
(35) RCW 39.10.905 and 2007 c 494 s 513.

--- END ---