BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the important
role of the maritime industry and other manufacturing sectors in
creating and sustaining economic opportunities in Washington. The
maritime industry and other manufacturing sectors account for forty
percent of the gross domestic product in Washington. In looking to the
state's future, the legislature finds that supporting the maritime
industry and other manufacturing sectors is critical to building and
sustaining a diverse and resilient economy in Washington.
The maritime industry and other manufacturing sectors are
interconnected with the public infrastructure, including ports, roads,
railways, energy facilities, and water-sewer facilities. The
protection and expansion of public infrastructure, including through
urban planning and disaster recovery planning, is crucial to the
success of the maritime industry and other manufacturing sectors.
To that end, the legislature intends to engage in a collaborative
process with state agencies, local governments, and private sector
leaders to evaluate whether changes in state and local policies are
necessary to foster resilience and growth in the maritime industry and
other manufacturing sectors. Through the establishment of the joint
select legislative task force, the legislature intends to take action
to support and sustain the maritime industry and other manufacturing
sectors as the region continues to recover from the national financial
crisis and progresses toward a future of increased economic opportunity
for all citizens of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) A joint select legislative task force
on the economic resilience of maritime and manufacturing in Washington
is established, with members as provided in this subsection.
(i) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint three
members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(ii) The president of the senate shall appoint three members from
each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(iii) The governor shall appoint one member to represent the
department of commerce.
(b) The legislative members of the task force shall select cochairs
from among the membership, one from the house of representatives and
one from the senate.
(2)(a) The task force shall develop recommendations that achieve
the following objectives:
(i) Identify the maritime and manufacturing sectors of economic
significance to the state;
(ii) Identify and assess the critical public infrastructure that
supports and sustains the maritime and manufacturing sectors;
(iii) Identify the barriers to maintaining and expanding the
maritime and manufacturing sectors;
(iv) Identify and assess the educational resources and support
services available to local governments with respect to supporting and
sustaining the development of the maritime and manufacturing sectors;
(v) Promote regulatory consistency and certainty in the areas of
urban planning, land use permitting, and business development in a
manner that encourages the maritime and manufacturing industries in
urban areas;
(vi) Encourage cooperation between the public and private sectors
to foster economic growth;
(vii) Explore public-private sector collaborations that draw on
Washington State University research centers and institutes with
expertise on maritime interoperability and critical infrastructure
resilience;
(viii) Identify aspects of state policy that have an impact on
fostering resilience and growth in the maritime and manufacturing
sectors, such as storm water policy and other food fish-related issues;
and
(ix) Maximize the opportunities for employment in the maritime
industry and other manufacturing sectors in Washington.
(b) The recommendations of the task force must include a short and
long-term action plan for the legislature to support and sustain the
maritime industry and other manufacturing sectors in Washington. The
recommendations of the task force may also include specific legislative
approaches, such as changes to state law, and nonlegislative
approaches, such as action plans for state agencies and local
governments.
(3) The task force shall consult with local governments, state
agencies, and private sector interests as appropriate, which must
include, but are not limited to: The department of commerce, the
department of transportation, the office of regulatory assistance, the
workforce training and education coordinating board, associate
development organizations, local industrial councils, local labor
trades councils, and chambers of commerce.
(4) The task force shall submit to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature a work plan by December 1, 2014, and a
report with the task force's final findings and recommendations by
November 1, 2015.
(5) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(6) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(7) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(8) This section expires June 1, 2016.

--- END ---