BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that all
Washington residents benefit from the unique aesthetic, recreational,
and economic opportunities that are derived from the state's aquatic
resources, including its navigable waters and shoreline areas. The
legislature also recognizes that, as affirmed in chapter 212, Laws of
2011, existing floating homes are an important cultural amenity and an
element of the state's maritime history and economy. The 2011
legislation, which clarified the legal status of floating homes, was
intended to ensure the vitality and long-term survival of existing
floating single-family home communities.
(2) The legislature finds that further clarification of the status
of other residential uses on water that meet specific requirements and
share important cultural, historical, and economic commonalities with
floating homes, is necessary.
(3) The legislature, therefore, intends to: Preserve the existence
and vitality of on-water residential uses; establish greater clarity
and regulatory uniformity for these uses; and respect the well-established authority of local governments to determine compliance with
regulatory requirements applicable to their jurisdiction.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.58.270 and 2011 c 212 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing in this ((statute)) section shall constitute authority
for requiring or ordering the removal of any structures, improvements,
docks, fills, or developments placed in navigable waters prior to
December 4, 1969, and the consent and authorization of the state of
Washington to the impairment of public rights of navigation, and
corollary rights incidental thereto, caused by the retention and
maintenance of said structures, improvements, docks, fills or
developments are hereby granted: PROVIDED, That the consent herein
given shall not relate to any structures, improvements, docks, fills,
or developments placed on tidelands, shorelands, or beds underlying
said waters which are in trespass or in violation of state statutes.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as altering or
abridging any private right of action, other than a private right which
is based upon the impairment of public rights consented to in
subsection (1) ((hereof)) of this section.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed as altering or
abridging the authority of the state or local governments to suppress
or abate nuisances or to abate pollution.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section shall apply to any case pending
in the courts of this state on June 1, 1971 relating to the removal of
structures, improvements, docks, fills, or developments based on the
impairment of public navigational rights.
(5)(a) A floating home permitted or legally established prior to
January 1, 2011, must be classified as a conforming preferred use.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Conforming preferred use" means that applicable development
and shoreline master program regulations may only impose reasonable
conditions and mitigation that will not effectively preclude
maintenance, repair, replacement, and remodeling of existing floating
homes and floating home moorages by rendering these actions
impracticable.
(ii) "Floating home" means a single-family dwelling unit
constructed on a float, that is moored, anchored, or otherwise secured
in waters, and is not a vessel, even though it may be capable of being
towed.
(6)(a) A floating on-water residence legally established prior to
July 1, 2014, must be considered a conforming use and accommodated
through reasonable shoreline master program regulations, permit
conditions, or mitigation that will not effectively preclude
maintenance, repair, replacement, and remodeling of existing floating
on-water residences and their moorages by rendering these actions
impracticable.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection, "floating on-water
residence" means any floating structure other than a floating home, as
defined under subsection (5) of this section, that: (i) Is designed or
used primarily as a residence on the water and has detachable
utilities; and (ii) whose owner or primary occupant has held a lease or
sublease to use space in a marina as their primary residence since a
date prior to July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act does not affect the application of
any other applicable permits, authorizations, or authorities.

--- END ---