BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that citizens
demand integrity and transparency in elections. Therefore, the
legislature intends to provide better transparency in elections by
using technology to allow for monitoring of ballot processing during
elections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) County auditors are required to install a web camera
surveillance system in counting centers. The web camera surveillance
system must be streamed live to the county auditor's web page. The
system must have a date and time stamp feature and must be capable of
recording forty-eight hours or more. The cameras must be installed as
a fixed mount with no motion and in a way to provide the best view
possible without compromising ballot secrecy. At a minimum, cameras
must be placed in the following ballot processing locations in the
counting center: Sorting areas, duplication area, counting and
tabulation areas, and the areas where unvoted and voted ballots are
stored.
(2) Cameras must be active twenty-four hours a day beginning with
the process of insertion of ballots in preparation for mailing to
military/overseas voters before a primary, an election, or special
election and ending upon certification of the election or election
recounts.

--- END ---