BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds and declares the
following:
(a) Working Washingtonians should have affordable, comprehensive
health insurance coverage.
(b) Most working Washingtonians obtain their health insurance
coverage through their employment, but some working Washingtonians are
covered by medical assistance and, beginning this year, some will be
covered through the Washington health benefit exchange.
(c) In 2012, more than nine hundred thousand Washingtonians lacked
health insurance coverage at some time in the year. The federal
patient protection and affordable care act is expected to reduce the
number of Washingtonians without health insurance coverage by providing
coverage through changes to medical assistance and the creation of the
exchange.
(d) The patient protection and affordable care act was intended to
set a foundation of individual, employer, and government responsibility
for the provision of health insurance. The patient protection and
affordable care act sets a floor for what constitutes affordable,
employment-based coverage and imposes penalties on any large employer
whose full-time, nonseasonal employees receive coverage through the
exchange. Federal law imposes no penalty on large employers whose
employees receive coverage through taxpayer-funded medical assistance.
(e) Employers who fail to provide affordable coverage to low-wage
workers who are covered by medical assistance shift the cost of health
care coverage from the employer to the taxpayer. Employers can avoid
the employer responsibility penalty of the patient protection and
affordable care act by reducing wages, hours worked, or both, so that
workers are no longer full-time, full-year employees within the meaning
of the patient protection and affordable care act.
(f) Persons who are covered by health insurance have better health
outcomes than those who lack coverage. Persons without health
insurance coverage are more likely to be in poor health, more likely to
miss needed medications and treatment, and more likely to have chronic
conditions that are not properly managed.
(g) Persons without health insurance coverage are at risk of
financial ruin. Medical debt is the second most common cause of
personal bankruptcy in the United States.
(h) Washington provides health insurance coverage to low-income
workers through medical assistance. The taxpaying public pays the cost
of coverage for those working people who are not provided health care
coverage through employment.
(i) In 2006, the legislature, concerned about the trend of low-wage
employers shifting costs to the medicaid system, directed the
department of social and health services and the health care authority
to report annually on the employment status of medical assistance
clients. The report issued in November of 2013 states that ninety-three thousand seven hundred fifty medicaid clients are currently
employed, and the cost of providing coverage through medicaid for these
individuals totals six hundred sixty-one million dollars.
(j) Taxpayers, through state and local governments, fund county
hospitals and clinics, community clinics, and other safety net
providers that provide care to those working people whose employers
fail to provide affordable health care coverage to their employees as
well as to other uninsured persons.
(k) Controlling health care costs can be more readily achieved if
a greater share of working people and their families have health
benefits so that cost shifting is minimized.
(l) The social and economic burden created by the lack of health
care coverage for some workers creates a burden on other employers, the
state, affected workers, and the families of affected workers who
suffer ill health and risk financial ruin.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to do the
following:
(a) Ensure that large employers contribute to the cost of coverage
by paying a penalty for health coverage received by their employees
through medical assistance and base that penalty on the cost of
employee-only coverage provided by other large employers to their
employees.
(b) Encourage the provision of affordable employer-based coverage
to low-wage employees who would otherwise be covered by medical
assistance and discourage employers from reducing hours, wages, or both
to avoid the employer responsibility penalty of the patient protection
and affordable care act by extending an employer responsibility penalty
to employers with employees covered by medical assistance.
(c) Ensure that employees who receive coverage through medical
assistance are protected from any possible retaliation by their
employer for seeking or obtaining that coverage.
(d) Help pay the nonfederal share of costs for medical assistance,
improve reimbursement to the providers who care for medical assistance
clients, and support the safety net of county hospitals and community
clinics that provide care for the remaining uninsured adult workers,
with due consideration for the needs of rural areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This subchapter may be known and cited as
the employer responsibility for medical assistance costs of employees
act of 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this subchapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Average cost of coverage" means the average cost of employee-only health care coverage provided by covered employers to their
employees, including both the employer's and employee's share of the
premium.
(2) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(3) "Covered employee" means an individual who:
(a) Is an employee of a covered employer;
(b) Is enrolled in medical assistance on the basis of his or her
modified adjusted gross income in accordance with the patient
protection and affordable care act;
(c) Is not a person who is enrolled in medical assistance by reason
of disability or being over sixty-five years of age; and
(d) Works on average more than one hundred four hours per quarter
for the covered employer.
(4) "Covered employer" means an employing unit, as defined in RCW
50.04.090, that has in its employment, as defined in RCW 50.04.100,
five hundred or more individuals in this state. "Covered employer"
includes employers who are nonprofit entities for purposes of federal
corporate income taxes, for purposes of state or local property taxes,
or for any other tax purpose. "Covered employer" also includes all of
the members of a controlled group of corporations, as defined in 26
U.S.C. Sec. 1563. "Covered employer" does not include the state, state
agencies, or any unit of local government including, but not limited
to, a county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal
corporation, or other political subdivision.
(5) "Department" means the employment security department.
(6) "Employee" has the same meaning as in RCW 49.12.005.
(7) "Fund" means the employer responsibility for medical assistance
trust fund, established pursuant to section 8 of this act.
(8) "Patient protection and affordable care act" means the federal
patient protection and affordable care act (P.L. 111-148), as amended
by the federal health care and education reconciliation act of 2010
(P.L. 111-152).
(9) "Provider" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.44.010.
(10) "Rural community" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.45.010.
(11) "Wage" has the same meaning as in RCW 49.46.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Beginning January 1, 2016, a covered
employer shall pay an employer responsibility penalty for all covered
employees.
(2) The amount of the employer responsibility penalty is equal to
the covered employer's total annual wage payments to all covered
employees multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is described
in (a) of this subsection and the denominator of which is described in
(b) of this subsection.
(a) The numerator of the fraction is equal to the average cost of
coverage multiplied by the share of a forty-hour work week that the
average covered employee works per week.
(b) The denominator of the fraction is equal to the average annual
wage of covered employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department shall administer this
subchapter in coordination with the authority, the office of the
insurance commissioner, and the department of labor and industries.
(2) The authority shall calculate the amount of the employer
responsibility penalty for each employer on an annual basis and
transmit the amount of the penalty to the department for collection
beginning January 1, 2016.
(a) The office of the insurance commissioner shall provide the
authority with information on the average cost of coverage in the large
group market for the previous year.
(b) The department of social and health services shall provide the
authority and the department with the information reported by employers
under RCW 26.23.040.
(c) The authority may determine whether individuals enrolled in
medical assistance are covered employees by using the data generated
for the report required by RCW 74.09.053.
(3) The authority shall provide information about covered employees
to the department as necessary to permit the department to collect the
employer responsibility penalty. Any documents and records that result
from matching records with or providing information to the authority or
the department are exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.
(4) A covered employer shall pay to the department any penalties
imposed pursuant to this subchapter. The department shall deposit all
moneys collected pursuant to this subchapter in the employer
responsibility for medical assistance trust fund created in section 8
of this act. The penalty must be collected in the same manner and at
the same time as any contributions required under chapter 50.24 RCW.
(5) The department shall annually send a notice to each covered
employer subject to an employer responsibility penalty of the amount of
the penalty and the date on which payment is due. Each covered
employer subject to an employer responsibility penalty shall pay the
amount of the penalty to the department for deposit into the employer
responsibility for medical assistance trust fund.
(6) Interest must be assessed on any employer responsibility
penalty not paid on or before payment is due at ten percent per annum.
Interest begins to accrue the day after the date the payment is due and
must be deposited in the employer responsibility for medical assistance
trust fund.
(7) If an employer responsibility penalty payment is more than
sixty days overdue, a penalty equal to the interest charged as
described in subsection (6) of this section is assessed and due for
each month, or part thereof, that the employer responsibility penalty
payment is not received after sixty days. The department must deposit
penalties collected under this subsection in the employer
responsibility for medical assistance trust fund.
(8) Administration of this subchapter may not be performed by
contract with a private entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A covered employer shall provide information
to all newly hired and existing employees regarding the availability of
medical assistance for low-income employees, including the availability
of advanced premium tax credits as well as medical assistance for
persons whose income is less than the modified adjusted gross income
threshold established for the medicaid program pursuant to the federal
patient protection and affordable care act. The department, in
consultation with the authority, shall develop a simple, uniform notice
containing that information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A covered employer may not designate an
employee as an independent contractor or temporary employee, reduce an
employee's hours of work, or terminate an employee to avoid the
employer's obligations under this subchapter.
(2) A covered employer may not request or otherwise seek to obtain
information concerning income, family income, or other eligibility
requirements for public health benefit programs regarding an employee,
other than that information about the employee's employment status
otherwise known to the employer consistent with state and federal law
and regulation.
(3) A covered employer may not require as a condition of employment
that an employee not enroll in or disenroll from a public health
benefit program, including, but not limited to, medical assistance or
advanced premium tax credits through the Washington health benefit
exchange. A covered employer may not encourage or discourage
enrollment in a public health benefit program for which an employee is
otherwise eligible, but may provide information on the programs.
(4) A covered employer may not discharge or in any manner
discriminate or retaliate against an employee who enrolls in a public
health benefit program, including, but not limited to, medical
assistance or advanced premium tax credits through the Washington
health benefit exchange.
(5)(a) An employee who is discharged, threatened with discharge,
demoted, suspended, or in any other manner discriminated or retaliated
against in the terms and conditions of employment by his or her covered
employer in violation of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section,
or for exercising his or her rights set out in subsection (4) of this
section, may file a complaint with the department of labor and
industries.
(b) Upon receipt of a complaint by an employee, the department of
labor and industries shall investigate and determine whether the
covered employer violated this section. If the investigation indicates
that a violation may have occurred, the department of labor and
industries shall hold a hearing in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
The department of labor and industries must issue a written
determination including findings after the hearing. A judicial appeal
from the determination may be taken in accordance with chapter 34.05
RCW.
(c) If the department of labor and industries determines that a
covered employer violated this section, it may order the covered
employer to reinstate the employee and pay the employee all wages owed.
In addition, the department of labor and industries may order the
covered employer to pay a civil penalty of twice the amount of the
employer responsibility penalty imposed under sections 4 and 5 of this
act. The department of labor and industries shall deposit civil
penalties paid under this section in the employer responsibility for
medical assistance trust fund created pursuant to section 8 of this
act.
(6) A covered employer who willfully violates this section is
guilty of a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The employer responsibility for medical
assistance trust fund is created in the state treasury. All receipts
from moneys collected pursuant to this subchapter must be deposited in
the fund. Moneys in the fund may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the fund may be used only for:
(1) Providing payment for the nonfederal share of medical
assistance costs;
(2) Increasing reimbursement to health care providers, with due
consideration for the needs of rural areas and access to primary care;
(3) Providing reimbursement to county health systems, community
clinics, and other safety net providers that provide care without
expectation of compensation to those Washingtonians who do not have
minimum essential coverage as defined in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5000A, with due
consideration given to the needs of those in rural areas and access to
primary care; and
(4) Implementation and administration of this chapter.

Sec. 9 RCW 26.23.040 and 2012 c 109 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All employers doing business in the state of Washington shall
report to the Washington state support registry:
(a) The hiring of any person who resides or works in this state to
whom the employer anticipates paying earnings and who:
(i) Has not previously been employed by the employer; or
(ii) Was previously employed by the employer but has been separated
from such employment for at least sixty consecutive days; and
(b) The date on which the employee first performed services for pay
for the employer, or, in the case of an employee described in (a)(ii)
of this subsection, the date on which the employee returned to perform
services for pay after a layoff, furlough, separation, or leave without
pay.
The secretary of the department of social and health services may
adopt rules to establish additional exemptions if needed to reduce
unnecessary or burdensome reporting.
(2) Employers shall report to the extent practicable by W-4 form,
or, at the option of the employer, an equivalent form, and may mail the
form by first-class mail, or may transmit it electronically, or by
other means authorized by the registry which will result in timely
reporting.
(3) Employers shall submit reports within twenty days of the
hiring, rehiring, or return to work of the employee, except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section. The report shall contain:
(a) The employee's name, address, social security number, and date
of birth; and
(b) The employer's name, address, and identifying number assigned
under section 6109 of the internal revenue code of 1986.
(4) In the case of an employer transmitting reports magnetically or
electronically, the employer shall report those employees described in
subsection (1) of this section, in two monthly transmissions, if
necessary, not less than twelve days nor more than sixteen days apart.
(5) An employer who fails to report as required under this section
shall be subject to a civil penalty of:
(a) Twenty-five dollars per month per employee; or
(b) Five hundred dollars, if the failure to report is the result of
a conspiracy between the employer and the employee not to supply the
required report, or to supply a false report. All violations within a
single month shall be considered a single violation for purposes of
assessing the penalty. The penalty may be imposed and collected by the
division of child support under RCW 74.20A.350.
(6) The department shall provide information collected under this
section to the Washington state health care authority and the
employment security department for the purpose of determining the
employer responsibility penalty under sections 2 through 8 of this act.
(7) The registry shall retain the information for a particular
employee only if the registry is responsible for establishing,
enforcing, or collecting a support debt of the employee. The registry
may, however, retain information for a particular employee for as long
as may be necessary to:
(a) Transmit the information to the national directory of new hires
as required under federal law; or
(b) Provide the information to other state agencies for comparison
with records or information possessed by those agencies as required by
law.
Information that is not permitted to be retained shall be promptly
destroyed. Agencies that obtain information from the department of
social and health services under this section shall maintain the
confidentiality of the information received, except as necessary to
implement the agencies' responsibilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Any documents and records that result from matching records with or
sharing information among the Washington state health care authority,
the employment security department, or the department of social and
health services pursuant to section 5 of this act or RCW 26.23.040 are
exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 2 through 8 of this act are each
added to chapter 74.09 RCW to be codified under the subchapter heading
"employer responsibility for medical assistance costs of employees."

--- END ---