BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.138.021 and 2001 c 44 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Director" means the director of licensing or the director's
designee.
(3) "Sale of travel-related benefits" means the sale of travel
services if the travel services are not identified at the time of the
sale with respect to dates, price, or location and includes:
(a) Sales of travel club memberships;
(b) Sales of vacation certificates or other documents that purport
to grant the holder of the certificate or other document the ability to
obtain future travel services, with or without additional
consideration; or
(c) Sales of travel-industry member benefits including those
through either or both the issuance and sale or the consulting with or
advising for consideration of persons in connection with the obtaining
of international airlines travel agent network identification cards or
memberships.
(4) "Travel club" means a seller of travel that sells memberships
to consumers, where the initial membership or maintenance dues are at
least twice the amount of the annual membership or maintenance dues.
(5) (("Seller of travel-related benefits" means a person, firm, or
corporation that transacts business with Washington consumers for the
sale of travel-related benefits.
(6))) "Seller of travel" means a person, firm, or corporation both
inside and outside the state of Washington, who transacts business with
Washington consumers.
(a) "Seller of travel" includes a travel agent, sellers of travel
discount programs, seller of travel-related benefits, and any person
who is an independent contractor or outside agent for a travel agency
or other seller of travel whose principal duties include consulting
with and advising persons concerning travel arrangements or
accommodations in the conduct or administration of its business. If a
seller of travel is employed by a seller of travel who is registered
under this chapter, the employee need not also be registered.
(b) "Seller of travel" does not include:
(i) An air carrier;
(ii) An owner or operator of a vessel, including an ocean common
carrier as defined in 46 U.S.C. App. 1702(18), an owner or charterer of
a vessel that is required to establish its financial responsibility in
accordance with the requirements of the federal maritime commission, 46
U.S.C. App. 817 (e), and a steamboat company whether or not operating
over and upon the waters of this state;
(iii) A motor carrier;
(iv) A rail carrier;
(v) A charter party carrier of passengers as defined in RCW
81.70.020;
(vi) An auto transportation company as defined in RCW 81.68.010;
(vii) A hotel or other lodging accommodation;
(viii) An affiliate of any person or entity described in (i)
through (vii) of this subsection (((6))) (5)(b) that is primarily
engaged in the sale of travel services provided by the person or
entity. For purposes of this subsection (((6))) (5)(b)(viii), an
"affiliate" means a person or entity owning, owned by, or under common
ownership, with "owning," "owned," and "ownership" referring to equity
holdings of at least eighty percent;
(ix) Direct providers of transportation by air, sea, or ground, or
hotel or other lodging accommodations who do not book or arrange any
other travel services.
(((7))) (6) "Travel services" includes transportation by air, sea,
or ground, hotel or any lodging accommodations, package tours, or
vouchers or coupons to be redeemed for future travel or accommodations
for a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration.
(((8))) (7) "Advertisement" includes, but is not limited to, a
written or graphic representation in a card, brochure, newspaper,
magazine, directory listing, or display, and oral, written, or graphic
representations made by radio, television, or cable transmission that
relates to travel services.
(((9))) (8) "Transacts business with Washington consumers" means to
directly offer or sell travel services or travel-related benefits to
Washington consumers, including the placement of advertising in media
based in the state of Washington or that is primarily directed to
Washington residents. Advertising placed in national print or
electronic media alone does not constitute "transacting business with
Washington consumers." Those entities who only wholesale travel
services are not "transacting business with Washington consumers" for
the purposes of this chapter.
(9) "Seller of travel discount program" means a membership, benefit
program, or other arrangement that purports to entitle the purchaser of
the seller of travel discount program to future transportation or any
travel services at a discount or reduced price or preferential
treatment not made generally available to the public.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.138.040 and 1999 c 238 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
At or prior to the time of full or partial payment for any travel
services, the seller of travel shall furnish to the person making the
payment a written statement conspicuously setting forth the information
contained in subsections (1) through (6) of this section. However, if
payment is made other than in person, the seller of travel shall
transmit to the person making the payment the written statement
required by this section within three business days of receipt or
processing of the payment. The written statement shall contain the
following information:
(1) The name and business address and telephone number of the
seller of travel.
(2) The amount paid, the date of such payment, ((the purpose of the
payment made,)) and an itemized statement of the balance due, if any.
(3) The registration number of the seller of travel required by
this chapter.
(4) The name of the vendor with whom the seller of travel has
contracted to provide travel arrangements for a consumer and all
pertinent information relating to the travel as known by the seller of
travel at the time of booking. The seller of travel will make known
further details as soon as received from the vendor. All information
will be provided with final documentation.
(5) An advisory regarding the penalties that would be charged in
the event of a cancellation or change by the customer. This may
contain either: (a) The specific amount of cancellation and change
penalties; or (b) the following statement: "Cancellation and change
penalties apply to these arrangements. Details will be provided upon
request."
(6) ((A)) The following statements in a minimum of eight-point,
boldface type in substantially the following form:
"If transportation or other services are canceled by the seller of
travel, all sums paid to the seller of travel for services not
performed in accordance with the contract between the seller of travel
and the purchaser will be refunded within thirty days of receiving the
funds from the vendor with whom the services were arranged, or if the
funds were not sent to the vendor, the funds shall be returned within
fourteen days after cancellation by the seller of travel to the
purchaser unless the purchaser requests the seller of travel to apply
the money to another travel product and/or date. You also have the
option to purchase travel insurance."

Sec. 3 RCW 19.138.100 and 2001 c 44 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person, firm, or corporation may act or hold itself out as a
seller of travel unless, prior to engaging in the business of selling
or advertising to sell travel services or travel-related benefits, the
person, firm, or corporation registers with the director under this
chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.
(1) The registration number must be conspicuously posted in the
place of business and must be included in all advertisements and on all
business cards. ((Sellers of travel are not required to include
registration numbers on institutional advertising. For the purposes of
this subsection, "institutional advertising" is advertising that does
not include prices or dates for travel services.))
(2) The director shall issue duplicate registrations upon payment
of a duplicate registration fee to valid registration holders operating
more than one office. The duplicate registration fee for each office
shall be an amount equal to the original registration fee.
(3) No registration is assignable or transferable.
(4) If a registered seller of travel sells his or her business,
when the new owner becomes responsible for the business, the new owner
must comply with all provisions of this chapter, including
registration.
(5) If a seller of travel is employed by or under contract as an
independent contractor or an outside agent of a seller of travel who is
registered under this chapter, the employee, independent contractor, or
outside agent need not also be registered if:
(a) The employee, independent contractor, or outside agent is
conducting business as a seller of travel in the name of and under the
registration of the registered seller of travel; and
(b) All money received for travel services by the employee,
independent contractor, or outside agent is collected in the name of
the registered seller of travel and processed by the registered seller
of travel as required under this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.138.120 and 2002 c 86 s 277 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each seller of travel shall renew its registration ((on or
before July 1st of every year or as otherwise)) annually determined by
the director.
(2) Renewal of a registration is subject to the same provisions
covering disciplinary action as a registration originally issued.
(3) The director may refuse to renew a registration for any of the
grounds set out under RCW 19.138.130 and 18.235.130, and where the past
conduct of the applicant affords reasonable grounds for belief that the
applicant will not carry out the applicant's duties in accordance with
law and with integrity and honesty. The director shall promptly notify
the applicant in writing by certified mail of its intent to refuse to
renew the registration. The registrant may request a hearing on the
refusal as provided in RCW 18.235.050. The director may permit the
registrant to honor commitments already made to its customers, but no
new commitments may be incurred, unless the director is satisfied that
all new commitments are completely bonded or secured to ensure that the
general public is protected from loss of money paid to the registrant.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.138.140 and 2003 c 38 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A seller of travel shall deposit in a trust account maintained
in a federally insured financial institution located in Washington
state, or other account approved by the director, all sums ((held for
more than five business days)) that are received from a person or
entity, for retail travel services ((offered by the seller of travel)).
This subsection does not apply to travel services sold by a seller of
travel, when payments for the travel services are made through the
airlines reporting corporation.
(2) The trust account or other approved account required by this
section shall be established and maintained for the benefit of any
person or entity paying money to the seller of travel. The seller of
travel shall not in any manner encumber the amounts in trust and shall
not withdraw money from the account except the following amounts may be
withdrawn at any time:
(a) Partial or full payment for travel services to the entity
directly providing the travel service;
(b) Refunds as required by this chapter;
(c) The amount of the sales commission;
(d) Interest earned and credited to the trust account or other
approved account;
(e) Remaining funds of a purchaser once all travel services have
been provided or once tickets or other similar documentation binding
upon the ultimate provider of the travel services have been provided;
or
(f) Reimbursement to the seller of travel for agency operating
funds that are advanced for a customer's travel services.
(3) The seller of travel may deposit noncustomer funds into the
trust account as needed in an amount equal to a deficiency resulting
from dishonored customer payments made by check, draft, credit card,
debit card, or other negotiable instrument.
(4) At the time of registration, the seller of travel shall file
with the department the account number and the name of the financial
institution at which the trust account or other approved account is
held as set forth in RCW 19.138.110. The seller of travel shall notify
the department of any change in the account number or location within
one business day of the change.
(5) The director, by rule, may allow for the use of other types of
funds or accounts only if the protection for consumers is no less than
that provided by this section.
(6) The seller of travel need not comply with the requirements of
this section if all of the following apply, except as exempted in
subsection (1) of this section:
(a) The payment is made by credit card;
(b) The seller of travel does not deposit, negotiate, or factor the
credit card charge or otherwise seek to obtain payment of the credit
card charge to any account over which the seller of travel has any
control; and
(c) If the charge includes transportation, the carrier that is to
provide the transportation processes the credit card charge, or if the
charge is only for services, the provider of services processes the
credit card charges.
(7) The seller of travel need not maintain a trust account nor
comply with the trust account provisions of this section if the seller
of travel:
(a)(i) Files and maintains a surety bond approved by the director
in an amount of not less than ten thousand nor more than fifty thousand
dollars, as determined by rule by the director based on the gross
income of business conducted for Washington state residents by the
seller of travel during the prior year. The bond shall be executed by
the applicant as obligor by a surety company authorized to transact
business in this state naming the state of Washington as obligee for
the benefit of any person or persons who have suffered monetary loss by
reason of the seller of travel's violation of this chapter or a rule
adopted under this chapter. The bond shall be conditioned that the
seller of travel will conform to and abide by this chapter and all
rules adopted under this chapter, and shall reimburse any person or
persons who suffer monetary loss by reason of a violation of this
chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter.
(ii) The bond must be continuous and may be canceled by the surety
upon the surety giving written notice to the director of the surety's
intent to cancel the bond. The cancellation is effective thirty days
after the notice is received by the director.
(iii) The applicant may obtain the bond directly from the surety or
through other bonding arrangement as approved by the director.
(iv) In lieu of a surety bond, the applicant may, upon approval by
the director, file with the director a certificate of deposit, an
irrevocable letter of credit, or such other instrument as is approved
by the director by rule, drawn in favor of the director for an amount
equal to the required bond.
(v) Any person or persons who have suffered monetary loss by any
act which constitutes a violation of this chapter or a rule adopted
under this chapter may bring a civil action in court against the seller
of travel and the surety upon such bond or approved alternate security
of the seller of travel who committed the violation of this chapter or
a rule adopted under this chapter or who employed the seller of travel
who committed such violation. A civil action brought in court pursuant
to the provisions of this section must be filed no later than one year
following the later of the alleged violation of this chapter or a rule
adopted under this chapter or completion of the travel by the customer;
or
(b) Is a member in good standing in a professional association,
such as the United States tour operators association or national tour
association, that is approved by the director and that provides or
requires a member to provide a minimum of one million dollars in errors
and professional liability insurance and provides a surety bond or
equivalent protection in an amount of at least two hundred fifty
thousand dollars for its member companies.
(8) If the seller of travel maintains its principal place of
business in another state and maintains a trust account or other
approved account in that state consistent with the requirement of this
section, and if that seller of travel has transacted business within
the state of Washington in an amount exceeding five million dollars for
the preceding year, the out-of-state trust account or other approved
account may be substituted for the in-state account required under this
section.

--- END ---