BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to grant counties in
Washington clear authority to conduct public auctions via the internet,
potentially reducing sale costs and enabling more bidders to
participate.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.16.140 and 1991 c 363 s 50 and 1991 c 245 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Public auction sales of property conducted by or for the county
((shall)) must be held at such places as the county legislative
authority may direct. A county may conduct a public auction sale by
electronic media pursuant to section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county treasurer may conduct a public auction sale by
electronic media.
(2) In a public auction sale by electronic media, the county
treasurer may:
(a) Require persons to provide a deposit to participate;
(b) Accept bids for as long as the treasurer deems necessary; and
(c) Require electronic funds transfers to pay any deposits and a
winning bid.
(3) At least fourteen days prior to the beginning of a public
auction sale by electronic media, the county treasurer must:
(a) Publish notice of the sale once a week during two successive
weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county; and
(b) Post notice of the sale in a conspicuous place in the county
courthouse and on the county's internet web site.
(4) A deposit paid by a winning bidder in a public auction sale by
electronic media must be applied to the balance due. If a winning
bidder does not comply with the terms of the sale, the winning bidder's
deposit will be forfeited and credited to the county treasurer's
operations and maintenance fund. Deposits paid by nonwinning bidders
must be refunded within ten business days of the close of the sale.
(5) All property sold at a public auction sale by electronic media
is offered and sold as is.
(6) In a public auction sale by electronic media, a county
treasurer is not liable for:
(a) Known or unknown conditions of the property, including but not
limited to errors in the assessor's records; or
(b) Failure of an electronic device not owned, operated, or managed
by the county that prevents a person from participating in the sale.
(7) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Electronic funds transfer" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 82.32.085.
(b) "Internet" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 19.270.010.
(c) "Public auction sale by electronic media" means a transaction
conducted via the internet that includes invitations for bids to
purchase property submitted by an auctioneer and bids to purchase
property submitted by sale participants, culminating in an auctioneer's
acceptance of the highest or most favorable bid. Invitations and bids
are submitted through an electronic device, including but not limited
to a computer.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.34.060 and 1963 c 4 s 36.34.060 are each amended to
read as follows:
Sales of personal property must be for cash except when:
(1) ((When)) A public auction sale by electronic media is conducted
pursuant to section 3 of this act;
(2) Property is transferred to a governmental agency; or
(((2) When)) (3) The county property is to be traded in on the
purchase of a like article, in which case the proposed cash allowance
for the trade-in must be part of the proposition to be submitted by the
seller in the transaction.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.34.080 and 1993 c 8 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) All sales of county property ordered after a public hearing
upon the proposal to dispose ((thereof)) of the property must be
supervised by the county treasurer and may be sold:
(a) At a county or other government agency's public auction,
including a public auction sale by electronic media conducted pursuant
to section 3 of this act;
(b) At a privately operated consignment auction that is open to the
public((,)); or
(c) By sealed bid to the highest and best bidder ((meeting or
exceeding)).
(2) All sales of county property must meet or exceed the minimum
sale price as directed by the county legislative authority.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.34.090 and 1997 c 393 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever county property is to be sold at public auction,
consignment auction, or sealed bid, the county treasurer or the county
treasurer's designee ((shall)) must:
(a) Publish notice ((thereof)) of the sale once during each of two
successive calendar weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county((. Notice thereof must also be posted in a conspicuous place in
the courthouse.));
(b) Post notice of the sale in a conspicuous place in the county
courthouse; and
(c) If a public auction sale by electronic media will be conducted
pursuant to section 3 of this act, post notice of the sale on the
county's internet web site.
(2) The posting and date of first publication must be at least ten
days before the day fixed for the sale.

Sec. 7 RCW 36.35.120 and 2001 c 299 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Real property acquired by any county of this state by
foreclosure of delinquent taxes may be sold by order of the county
legislative authority ((of the county)) when in the judgment of the
county legislative authority it is deemed in the county's best
interests ((of the county)) to sell the real property.
(2) When the county legislative authority desires to sell any such
property it may, if deemed advantageous to the county, combine any or
all of the several lots and tracts of ((such)) the property in one or
more units, and ((may)) reserve from sale coal, oil, gas, gravel,
minerals, ores, fossils, timber, or other resources on or in the lands,
and the right to mine for and remove the same((, and it shall)). It
must then enter an order on its records fixing the unit or units in
which the property ((shall)) will be sold ((and)), the minimum price
for each of ((such)) the units, and whether the sale will be for cash
or whether a contract will be offered, and reserving from sale ((such
of)) the resources as it may determine and from which units ((such))
the reservations ((shall)) will apply, and directing the county
treasurer to sell ((such)) the property in the unit or units and at not
less than the price or prices and subject to ((such)) the reservations
so fixed by the county legislative authority. The order ((shall be))
is subject to the approval of the county treasurer if several lots or
tracts of land are combined in one unit.
(3) Except in cases where the sale is to be by direct negotiation
as provided in RCW 36.35.150, ((it shall be the duty of)) the county
treasurer must, upon receipt of ((such)) the order ((to)), publish once
a week for three consecutive weeks a notice of the sale of ((such)) the
property in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the
land is situated. The notice ((shall)) must describe the property to
be sold, the unit or units, the reservations, and the minimum price
fixed in the order, together with the time and place and terms of sale,
in the same manner as foreclosure sales as provided by RCW 84.64.080.
If a public auction sale by electronic media is conducted pursuant to
section 3 of this act, notice must conform to requirements for a public
auction sale by electronic media.
(4) The person making the bid ((shall)) must state whether he or
she will pay cash for the amount of his or her bid or accept a real
estate contract of purchase in accordance with the provisions
hereinafter contained. If a public auction sale by electronic media is
conducted pursuant to section 3 of this act, the county may require
payment by electronic funds transfer.
(5) The person making the highest bid ((shall)) will become the
purchaser of the property. If the highest bidder is a contract bidder
the purchaser ((shall be required to)) must pay thirty percent of the
total purchase price at the time of the sale and ((shall)) enter into
a contract with the county as vendor and the purchaser as vendee
((which shall)). The contract must obligate and require the purchaser
to pay the balance of the purchase price in ten equal annual
installments commencing November 1st and each year following the date
of the sale, and ((shall)) require the purchaser to pay twelve percent
interest on all deferred payments, interest to be paid at the time the
annual installment is due((; and)). The contract may contain a
provision authorizing the purchaser to make payment in full at any time
of any balance due on the total purchase price plus accrued interest on
((such)) the balance. The contract ((shall)) must contain a provision
requiring the purchaser to pay before delinquency all subsequent taxes
and assessments that may be levied or assessed against the property
subsequent to the date of the contract((, and shall)). The contract
must contain a provision that time is of the essence of the contract,
and that in the event of a failure of the vendee to make payments at
the time and in the manner required and to keep and perform the
covenants and conditions therein required of him or her ((that)), the
contract may be forfeited and terminated at the election of the vendor,
and that in event of the election all sums theretofore paid by the
vendee ((shall)) will be forfeited as liquidated damages for failure to
comply with the provisions of the contract((; and shall)). The
contract must also require the vendor to execute and deliver to the
vendee a deed of conveyance covering the property upon the payment in
full of the purchase price, plus accrued interest.
(6) The county legislative authority may, by order entered in its
records, direct that the coal, oil, gas, gravel, minerals, ores,
timber, or other resources be sold apart from the land, such sale to be
conducted in the manner hereinabove prescribed for the sale of the
land. Any such reserved minerals or resources not exceeding two
hundred dollars in value may be sold, when the county legislative
authority deems it advisable, either with or without such publication
of the notice of sale, and in such manner as the county legislative
authority may determine will be most beneficial to the county.

Sec. 8 RCW 84.56.070 and 2013 c 239 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county treasurer must proceed to collect all personal
property taxes after first completing the tax roll for the current
year's collection.
(2) The treasurer must give notice by mail to all persons charged
with personal property taxes, and if ((such)) the taxes are not paid
before they become delinquent, the treasurer must commence delinquent
collection efforts. A delinquent collection charge for costs incurred
by the treasurer may be added to the account.
(3) In the event that the treasurer is unable to collect the taxes
when due under this section, the treasurer must prepare papers in
distraint((, which)). The papers must contain a description of the
personal property, the amount of taxes, the amount of the accrued
interest at the rate provided by law from the date of delinquency, and
the name of the owner or reputed owner.
(a) The treasurer must without demand or notice distrain sufficient
goods and chattels belonging to the person charged with ((such)) the
taxes to pay the same, with interest at the rate provided by law from
the date of delinquency, together with all accruing costs((, and)).
The treasurer must proceed to advertise the ((same)) distraint by
posting written notices in three public places in the county in which
((such)) the property has been distrained, ((one of which places must
be at)) including the county courthouse((, such)). The notice ((to))
must state the time when and place where ((such)) the property will be
sold.
(b) The county treasurer, or the treasurer's deputy, must tax the
same fees for making the distraint and sale of goods and chattels for
the payment of taxes as are allowed by law to sheriffs for making levy
and sale of property on execution((;)). Traveling fees ((to)) must be
computed from the county seat of the county to the place of making
distraint.
(c) If the taxes for which ((such)) the property is distrained, and
the interest and costs accruing thereon, are not paid before the date
appointed for ((such)) the sale, which may not be less than ten days
after the taking of ((such)) the property, ((such)) the treasurer or
treasurer's designee must proceed to sell ((such)) the property at
public auction, or so much thereof as is sufficient to pay ((such)) the
taxes, with interest and costs((, and)). If there ((be)) is any excess
of money arising from the sale of any personal property, the treasurer
must pay ((such)) the excess less any cost of the auction to the owner
of the property so sold or to his or her legal representative.
(d) If necessary to distrain any standing timber owned separately
from the ownership of the land upon which the same may stand, or any
fish trap, pound net, reef net, set net, or drag seine fishing
location, or any other personal property as the treasurer determines to
be incapable or reasonably impracticable of manual delivery, it is
deemed to have been distrained and taken into possession when the
treasurer has, at least thirty days before the date fixed for the sale
thereof, filed with the auditor of the county wherein ((such)) the
property is located a notice in writing reciting that the treasurer has
distrained ((such)) the property((, describing it, giving)). The
notice must describe the property, give the name of the owner or
reputed owner, the amount of the tax due, with interest, and the time
and place of sale. A copy of the notice must also be sent to the owner
or reputed owner at his or her last known address, by registered letter
at least thirty days prior to the date of sale.
(e) If the county treasurer has reasonable grounds to believe that
any personal property, including mobile homes, manufactured homes, or
park model trailers, upon which taxes have been levied, but not paid,
is about to be removed from the county where the ((same)) property has
been assessed, or is about to be destroyed, sold, or disposed of, the
county treasurer may demand ((such)) the taxes, without the notice
provided for in this section, and if necessary ((may)) distrain
sufficient goods and chattels to pay the same.
(4) As an alternative to the sale procedure specified in this
section, the county treasurer may conduct a public auction sale by
electronic media pursuant to section 3 of this act.

Sec. 9 RCW 84.56.090 and 2013 c 23 s 369 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever in the judgment of the assessor or the county
treasurer personal property is being removed or is about to be removed
((without the limits of)) from the state, or is being dissipated or
about to be dissipated, or is being or about to be sold, disposed of,
or removed from the county so as to jeopardize collection of taxes, the
treasurer ((shall)) must immediately prepare papers in distraint((,
which shall)). The papers must contain a description of the personal
property, including mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park model
trailers, being or about to be removed, dissipated, sold, disposed of,
or removed from the county so as to jeopardize collection of taxes, the
amount of the tax, the amount of accrued interest at the rate provided
by law from the date of delinquency, and the name of the owner or
reputed owner((, and he or she shall)). The treasurer must, without
demand or notice, distrain sufficient goods and chattels belonging to
the person charged with ((such)) the taxes to pay the ((same)) taxes
with interest at the rate provided by law from the date of delinquency,
together with all accruing costs((, and shall)). The treasurer must
advertise and sell ((said)) the property as provided in RCW 84.56.070
or subsection (4) of this section.
(2) If ((said)) the personal property is being removed or is about
to be removed from the ((limits of the)) state, is being dissipated or
about to be dissipated, or is being or about to be sold, disposed of,
or removed from the county so as to jeopardize collection of taxes, at
any time subsequent to the first day of January in any year, and prior
to the levy of taxes thereon, the taxes upon ((such)) the property so
distrained ((shall)) must be computed upon the rate of levy for state,
county, and local purposes for the preceding year((; and)). All taxes
collected in advance of levy under this section and RCW 84.56.120,
together with the name of the owner and a brief description of the
property assessed ((shall)), must be entered forthwith by the county
treasurer upon the personal property tax rolls of such preceding year,
and all collections thereon ((shall)) must be considered and treated in
all respects, and without recourse by either the owner or any taxing
unit, as collections for such preceding year. Property on which taxes
are thus collected ((shall thereupon become)) are discharged from the
lien of any taxes that may thereafter be levied in the year in which
payment or collection is made.
(3) Whenever property has been removed from the county wherein it
has been assessed, on which the taxes have not been paid, then the
county treasurer, or ((his or her)) the treasurer's deputy, ((shall
have)) has the same power to distrain and sell ((said)) the property
for the satisfaction of ((said)) the taxes as he or she would have if
((said)) the property were situated in the county in which the property
was taxed((, and)). In addition ((thereto said)), the treasurer, or
((his or her)) the treasurer's deputy, in the distraint and sale of
property for the payment of taxes, ((shall have)) has the same powers
((as are now by law given to)) as the sheriff in making levy and sale
of property on execution.
(4) As an alternative to the sale procedure specified in RCW
84.56.070, the county treasurer may conduct a public auction sale by
electronic media pursuant to section 3 of this act.

Sec. 10 RCW 84.64.005 and 2013 c 221 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, for purposes of
this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Date of delinquency" means the date when taxes first became
delinquent.
(2) "Electronic funds transfer" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 82.32.085.
(3) "Interest" means interest and penalties((; and)).
(((2))) (4) "Taxes;" "taxes, interest, and costs;" and "taxes,
interest, or costs" include any assessments and amounts deferred under
chapters 84.37 and 84.38 RCW, where ((such)) the assessments and
deferred amounts are included in a certificate of delinquency by the
county treasurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 84.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In lieu of the sale procedure specified in RCW 84.56.070 or
84.64.080, the county treasurer may conduct a public auction sale by
electronic media as provided in section 3 of this act.
(2) Notice of a public auction sale by electronic media must be
substantially in the following form:

TAX JUDGMENT SALE BY ELECTRONIC MEDIA

Public notice is hereby given that pursuant to a tax judgment of
the superior court of the county of . . . . . . in the state of
Washington, and an order of sale duly issued by the court, entered the
. . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . ., in proceedings for foreclosure of
tax liens, I shall on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . .,
commencing at . . . . o'clock . . ., at . . [specify web site
address] . . . . ., sell the property to the highest and best bidder to
satisfy the full amount of taxes, interest, and costs adjudged to be
due. Prospective bidders must deposit . . . . to participate in
bidding. A deposit paid by a winning bidder will be applied to the
balance due. However, a winning bidder who does not comply with the
terms of sale will forfeit the deposit. Deposits paid by nonwinning
bidders will be refunded within ten business days of the close of the
sale. Payment of deposits and a winning bid must be made by electronic
funds transfer.
In witness whereof, I have affixed my hand and seal this . . . .
day of . . . . . ., . . . . .
Treasurer of . . . . .
county.

Sec. 12 RCW 84.64.080 and 2004 c 79 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court ((shall)) must examine each application for judgment
foreclosing a tax lien, and if a defense (specifying in writing the
particular cause of objection) ((be)) is offered by any person
interested in any of the lands or lots to the entry of judgment
((against the same)), the court ((shall)) must hear and determine the
matter in a summary manner, without other pleadings, and ((shall))
pronounce judgment ((as the right of the case may be; or)). However,
the court may, in its discretion, continue ((such individual cases,
wherein defense is offered, to such time as may be necessary, in order
to secure substantial justice to the contestants therein; but in all
other cases the court shall proceed to determine the matter in a
summary manner as above specified)) a case in which a defense is
offered, to secure substantial justice to the contestants.
(2) In all judicial proceedings ((of any kind)) for the collection
of taxes, and interest and costs thereon, all amendments which by law
can be made in any personal action ((pending in such)) in the court
((shall)) must be allowed((, and)). No assessments of property or
charge for any of the taxes ((shall be considered)) is illegal on
account of any irregularity in the tax list or assessment rolls, or on
account of the assessment rolls or tax list not having been made,
completed, or returned within the time required by law, or on account
of the property having been charged or listed in the assessment or tax
lists without name, or in any other name than that of the owner, and no
error or informality in the proceedings of any of the officers
connected with the assessment, levying or collection of the taxes,
((shall)) vitiates or in any manner affects the tax or the assessment
((thereof, and)) of the tax. Any irregularities or informality in the
assessment rolls or tax lists or in any of the proceedings connected
with the assessment or levy of ((such)) the taxes, or any omission or
defective act of any officer ((or officers)) connected with the
assessment or levying of ((such)) the taxes, may be, in the discretion
of the court, corrected, supplied, and made to conform to the law by
the court.
(3) The court ((shall)) must give judgment for ((such)) the taxes,
interest, and costs ((as shall)) that appear to be due upon the several
lots or tracts described in the notice of application for judgment ((or
complaint, and such)). The judgment ((shall)) must be a several
judgment against each tract or lot or part of a tract or lot for each
kind of tax included therein, including all interest and costs((,
and)). The court ((shall)) must order and direct the clerk to make and
enter an order for the sale of ((such)) the real property against which
judgment is made, or vacate and set aside the certificate of
delinquency, or make such other order or judgment as in ((the)) law or
equity may be just. The order ((shall)) must be signed by the judge of
the superior court((, shall be)) and delivered to the county
treasurer((, and shall be)). The order is full and sufficient
authority for ((him or her)) the treasurer to proceed to sell the
property for the sum ((as)) set forth in the order and to take ((such))
further steps ((in the matter as are)) provided by law.
(4) The county treasurer ((shall)) must immediately after receiving
the order and judgment ((of the court)) proceed to sell the property as
provided in this chapter to the highest and best bidder ((for cash)).
The acceptable minimum bid ((shall)) must be the total amount of taxes,
interest, and costs.
(5) All sales ((shall)) must be made at a location in the county on
a date and time (except Saturdays, Sundays, or legal holidays) as the
county treasurer may direct, and ((shall)) continue from day to day
(Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays excepted) during the same hours
until all lots or tracts are sold((, after)). The county treasurer
must first ((giving)) give notice of the time((,)) and place where
((such)) the sale is to take place for ten days successively by posting
notice thereof in three public places in the county, one of which
((shall)) must be in the office of the treasurer. ((The notice shall))
(6) Unless a sale is conducted pursuant to section 11 of this act,
notice of a sale must be substantially in the following form:

TAX JUDGMENT SALE

Public notice is hereby given that pursuant to real property tax
judgment of the superior court of the county of . . . . . . in the
state of Washington, and an order of sale duly issued by the court,
entered the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . ., in proceedings for
foreclosure of tax liens upon real property, as per provisions of law,
I shall on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . ., at . . . . o'clock
a.m., at . . . . . . in the city of . . . . . ., and county of
. . . . . ., state of Washington, sell the real property to the highest
and best bidder for cash, to satisfy the full amount of taxes, interest
and costs adjudged to be due.
In witness whereof, I have hereunto affixed my hand and seal this
. . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . .
Treasurer of . . . . . . . . . . . .
county.

(7) As an alternative to the sale procedure specified in
subsections (5) and (6) of this section, the county treasurer may
conduct a public auction sale by electronic media pursuant to section
11 of this act.
(8) No county officer or employee ((shall)) may directly or
indirectly be a purchaser of ((such)) the property at ((such)) the
sale.
(9) If any buildings or improvements are upon an area encompassing
more than one tract or lot, the same must be advertised and sold as a
single unit.
(10) If the highest amount bid for any ((such)) separate unit tract
or lot ((is in excess of)) exceeds the minimum bid due upon the whole
property included in the certificate of delinquency, the excess
((shall)) must be refunded, following payment of all recorded water-sewer district liens, on application therefor, to the record owner of
the property. The record owner of the property is the person who held
title on the date of issuance of the certificate of delinquency.
Assignments of interests, deeds, or other documents executed or
recorded after filing the certificate of delinquency ((shall)) do not
affect the payment of excess funds to the record owner. In the event
that no claim for the excess is received by the county treasurer within
three years after the date of the sale ((he or she shall)), the
treasurer must at expiration of the three year period deposit ((such))
the excess in the current expense fund of the county, which ((shall))
extinguishes all claims by any owner to the excess funds.
(11) The county treasurer ((shall)) must execute to the purchaser
of any piece or parcel of land a tax deed. The tax deed so made by the
county treasurer, under the official seal of ((his or her)) the
treasurer's office, ((shall)) must be recorded in the same manner as
other conveyances of real property, and ((shall)) vests in the grantee,
his or her heirs and assigns the title to the property therein
described, without further acknowledgment or evidence of ((such)) the
conveyance((, and shall)).
(12) Tax deeds must be substantially in the following form:

State of Washington |
|
>
|
|

ss.

County of . . . . . . . . . . . .

This indenture, made this . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . . . .,
between . . . . . ., as treasurer of . . . . . . county, state of
Washington, party of the first part, and . . . . . ., party of the
second part:
Witnesseth, that, whereas, at a public sale of real property held
on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . ., pursuant to a real property
tax judgment entered in the superior court in the county of . . . . . .
on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . ., in proceedings to foreclose
tax liens upon real property and an order of sale duly issued by the
court, . . . . . . duly purchased in compliance with the laws of the
state of Washington, the following described real property, to wit:
(Here place description of real property conveyed) and that the
. . . . . . has complied with the laws of the state of Washington
necessary to entitle (him, or her or them) to a deed for the real
property.
Now, therefore, know ye, that, I . . . . . ., county treasurer of
the county of . . . . . ., state of Washington, in consideration of the
premises and by virtue of the statutes of the state of Washington, in
such cases provided, do hereby grant and convey unto . . . . . ., his
or her heirs and assigns, forever, the real property hereinbefore
described.
Given under my hand and seal of office this . . . . day of
. . . . . ., A.D. . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . .
County Treasurer.

Sec. 13 RCW 84.64.200 and 2007 c 295 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
((All lots, tracts and parcels of land upon which taxes levied
prior to January 9, 1926 remain due and unpaid at the date when such
taxes would have become delinquent as provided in the act under which
they were levied shall be deemed to be delinquent under the provisions
of this title, and the same proceedings may be had to enforce the
payment of such unpaid taxes, with interest and costs, and payment
enforced and liens foreclosed under and by virtue of the provisions of
this chapter. For the purposes of foreclosure under this chapter, the
date of delinquency shall be construed to mean the date when the taxes
first became delinquent.))
(1) At all sales of property for which certificates of delinquency
are held by the county, if no other bids are received, the county
((shall)) must be considered a bidder for the full area of each tract
or lot to the amount of all taxes, interest, and costs due thereon, and
where no bidder appears, acquire title in trust for the taxing
districts as absolutely as if purchased by an individual under the
provisions of this chapter((;)).
(2) All bidders except the county at sales of property for which
certificates of delinquency are held by the county ((shall)) must pay
the full amount of taxes, interest, and costs for which judgment is
rendered, together with all taxes, interest, and costs which are
delinquent at the time of sale, regardless of whether the taxes,
interest, or costs are included in the judgment.

--- END ---