BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The federal patient protection and
affordable care act, section 1331 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, provides
states the option to establish a federal basic health program for
individuals with incomes up to two hundred percent of the federal
poverty level who are not eligible for coverage under medicaid. States
electing to operate a basic health program may receive federal funding
equal to ninety-five percent of the amount of the premium tax credits
and cost-sharing reductions that would have been available had the
eligible individual obtained coverage through the exchange.
(2) The United States department of health and human services has
proposed regulations for the development of the basic health program,
including the development of a basic health blueprint for certification
by the centers for medicare and medicaid services that will grant
states operational authority for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW
to read as follows:
The health care authority must begin the necessary econometric
modeling to analyze the program enrollment, and the costs and impacts
to the state, the enrollees, health care provider and facility
reimbursement, and the insurance marketplace. By December 31, 2014,
the authority shall publish a report on the findings of the econometric
modeling. The report shall include impacts on:
(1) Reimbursement levels affecting provider participation and its
relationship to network adequacy in the program;
(2) The financial stability of the Washington health benefit
exchange, including enrollment, risk profile, and fees for operational
sustainability; and
(3) Continuity of care, access, and affordability of coverage for
potential enrollees in the federal basic health program compared to the
insurance marketplace.

--- END ---