BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.155.065 and 2007 c 115 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2009, each school district shall provide or
contract for early intervention services to all eligible children with
disabilities from birth to three years of age. Eligibility shall be
determined according to Part C of the federal individuals with
disabilities education ((improvement)) act or other applicable federal
and state laws, and as specified in the Washington Administrative Code
adopted by the state lead agency, which is the department of early
learning. School districts shall provide or contract, or both, for
early intervention services in partnership with local birth-to-three
lead agencies and birth-to-three providers. Services provided under
this section shall not supplant services or funding currently provided
in the state for early intervention services to eligible children with
disabilities from birth to three years of age. The state-designated
birth-to-three lead agency shall be payor of last resort for birth-to-three early intervention services provided under this section.
(2) The services in this section are not part of the state's
program of basic education pursuant to Article IX of the state
Constitution.

--- END ---