BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Automobile insurers engaged in the business of insurance in
Washington state may not unreasonably fail to pay first and third party
property damage claims for damage to motor vehicles, including
motor-driven cycles and bicycles, by committing any of the unfair acts
set forth in this subsection when liability for a collision is
reasonably clear:
(a) Unreasonably refusing to pay a claimant's estimate for repairs
or to pay for a total loss;
(b) Unreasonably refusing to pay supplemental repairs necessary to
restore a vehicle to its preloss condition;
(c) Failing to advise a claimant in writing that the claimant may
submit a claim to the insurer for the diminished value of the vehicle
to which repairs were made, and unreasonably failing to pay for the
diminished value;
(d) Unreasonably electing to repair a vehicle, a motor-driven
cycle, or a bicycle when it should be declared a total loss;
(e) Failing to inform claimants of the insurer's guidelines for
electing to repair or replace a vehicle, motorcycle, or bicycle damaged
in a collision; and
(f) Otherwise violating any of the provisions of WAC 284-30-390,
284-30-391, 284-30-393, and 284-30-394.
(2) Violations of this section violate RCW 19.86.020 and are
subject to the remedial provisions of RCW 19.86.090.

--- END ---