BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 3.50 RCW
to read as follows:
A municipal court term may only be terminated at the end of the
judicial term of the judge or judges of that court. Provided, that for
courts with elected municipal court judges, the judicial term includes
the time period between the date the office is designated for election
pursuant to RCW 29A.24.010 to the end of the four-year term that is the
subject of the upcoming election. Provided further, that in the case
of a judge appointed in a part-time court pursuant to RCW 3.50.040, the
term of office includes the time period between the date the
appointment is confirmed by the local legislative body to the end of
the judge's four-year term of office as provided for in RCW 3.50.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.20 RCW
to read as follows:
A municipal court term may only be terminated at the end of the
judicial term of the judge or judges of that court. The judicial term
includes the time period between the date the office is designated for
election pursuant to RCW 29A.24.010 to the end of the four-year term
that is the subject of the upcoming election.

--- END ---