BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.01.050 and 2005 c 282 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All actions against any county may be commenced in the superior
court of such county, or in the superior court of either of the two
nearest judicial districts. All actions by any county shall be
commenced in the superior court of the county in which the defendant
resides, or in either of the two judicial districts nearest to the
county bringing the action. However, where the defendant resides in
the county that is bringing the action, the defendant shall be
permitted to move the action to either of the two nearest judicial
districts by making the request in accordance with court rules for
civil proceedings.
(2) The determination of the nearest judicial districts is measured
by the travel time between county seats using major surface routes, as
determined by the administrative office of the courts.
(3) Any provision in any contract with any county that requires
actions arising under the contract to be commenced in the superior
court of the county is against public policy and the provision is void
and unenforceable. This subsection shall not be construed to void any
contract provision requiring a dispute arising under the contract to be
submitted to arbitration.

--- END ---