BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Farm laborers have limited transit options
available to them and often face financial constraints preventing
travel to work by personal vehicle. It is the intent of the
legislature that transit agencies and nonprofit transportation
providers are able to support vanpool programs for agricultural workers
in the same manner as other vanpool programs, while maintaining the
existing protections provided in current law for agricultural workers.
It is also the intent of the legislature to make vanpool programs for
local agricultural workers possible, but not to fund transportation for
workers brought in under the federal H-2A or H-2B visa programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.30.010 and 1985 c 280 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Person" includes any individual, firm, partnership,
association, corporation, or unit or agency of state or local
government.
(2) "Farm labor contractor" means any person, or his or her agent
or subcontractor, who, for a fee, performs any farm labor contracting
activity.
(3) "Farm labor contracting activity" means recruiting, soliciting,
employing, supplying, transporting, or hiring agricultural employees.
(4) "Agricultural employer" means any person engaged in
agricultural activity, including the growing, producing, or harvesting
of farm or nursery products, or engaged in the forestation or
reforestation of lands, which includes but is not limited to the
planting, transplanting, tubing, precommercial thinning, and thinning
of trees and seedlings, the clearing, piling, and disposal of brush and
slash, the harvest of Christmas trees, and other related activities.
(5) "Agricultural employee" means any person who renders personal
services to, or under the direction of, an agricultural employer in
connection with the employer's agricultural activity.
(6) ((This chapter shall not apply to employees of the employment
security department acting in their official capacity or their agents,
nor to any common carrier or full time regular employees thereof while
transporting agricultural employees, nor to any person who performs any
of the services enumerated in subsection (3) of this section only
within the scope of his or her regular employment for one agricultural
employer on whose behalf he or she is so acting, unless he or she is
receiving a commission or fee, which commission or fee is determined by
the number of workers recruited, or to a nonprofit corporation or
organization which performs the same functions for its members. Such
nonprofit corporation or organization shall be one in which:
(a) None of its directors, officers, or employees are deriving any
profit beyond a reasonable salary for services performed in its behalf.
(b) Membership dues and fees are used solely for the maintenance of
the association or corporation.
(7)))(a) "Fee" means:
(((a))) (i) Any money or other valuable consideration paid or
promised to be paid for services rendered or to be rendered by a farm
labor contractor.
(((b))) (ii) Any valuable consideration received or to be received
by a farm labor contractor for or in connection with any of the
services described in subsection (3) of this section, and shall include
the difference between any amount received or to be received by him or
her, and the amount paid out by him or her for or in connection with
the rendering of such services.
(((8))) (b) "Fee" does not include the cost savings resulting from
a vanpool driver, as designated by a transit agency or nonprofit
transportation provider, being exempt from contributing to vanpool
costs.
(7) "Director" as used in this chapter means the director of the
department of labor and industries of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.30 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to:
(1) Employees of the employment security department acting in their
official capacity or their agents;
(2) Any common carrier or its full-time regular employees, while
transporting agricultural employees;
(3) Any nonprofit corporation or organization organized under
chapter 24.03 RCW, its full-time or part-time regular employees, or its
contractors, while transporting agricultural employees;
(4) Any transit provider authorized under chapter 36.56, 36.57,
36.57A, or 81.112 RCW or RCW 35.58.2721, its full-time or part-time
regular employees, or its contractors, while transporting agricultural
employees;
(5) Any person who performs any of the services enumerated in RCW
19.30.010(3) only within the scope of his or her regular employment for
one agricultural employer on whose behalf he or she is so acting,
unless he or she is receiving a commission or fee, which commission or
fee is determined by the number of workers recruited, or to a nonprofit
corporation or organization which performs the same functions for its
members. Such nonprofit corporation or organization must be one in
which:
(a) None of its directors, officers, or employees are deriving any
profit beyond a reasonable salary for services performed in its behalf;
and
(b) Membership dues and fees are used solely for the maintenance of
the association or corporation.

--- END ---