BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.77 RCW
to read as follows:
The state of Washington promotes improving medical services to
adult individuals with developmental disabilities. Medical students at
the University of Washington, nursing students at schools of nursing
within the state of Washington and Pacific Northwest University -College of Osteopathic Medicine, and special and technical care
students at technical schools within the state of Washington would
benefit from specialized training and exposure to the unique care needs
for adults that are developmentally disabled. Subject to the
availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the
council shall develop a centralized program for grants for institutions
for programs designed to develop training projects focused upon
improvement of services to adult individuals with developmental
disabilities. The council may administer the grant program in
consultation with the department of health. The council shall report
to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2015.
The report must include information regarding grants awarded under this
section, as well as any other efforts or progress in expanding or
improving training for students in treating adult individuals with
developmental disabilities.

--- END ---