BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.145.010 and 2013 c 39 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the ((higher education coordinating board or its
successor)) opportunity scholarship board.
(2) "Council" means the student achievement council.
(3) "Eligible education programs" means high employer demand and
other programs of study as determined by the ((opportunity
scholarship)) board.
(((3))) (4) "Eligible expenses" means reasonable expenses
associated with the costs of acquiring an education such as tuition,
books, equipment, fees, room and board, and other expenses as
determined by the program administrator in consultation with the
((board)) council and the state board for community and technical
colleges.
(((4))) (5) "Eligible student" means a resident student who
received his or her high school diploma or high school equivalency
certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536 in Washington and who:
(a)(i) Has been accepted at a four-year institution of higher
education into an eligible education program leading to a baccalaureate
degree; or
(ii) Will attend a two-year institution of higher education and
intends to transfer to an eligible education program at a four-year
institution of higher education;
(b) Declares an intention to obtain a baccalaureate degree; and
(c) Has a family income at or below one hundred twenty-five percent
of the state median family income at the time the student applies for
an opportunity scholarship.
(((5))) (6) "High employer demand program of study" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 28B.50.030.
(((6))) (7) "Participant" means an eligible student who has
received a scholarship under the opportunity scholarship program.
(((7))) (8) "Program administrator" means a college scholarship
organization that is a private nonprofit corporation registered under
Title 24 RCW and qualified as a tax-exempt entity under section
501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code, with expertise in
managing scholarships and college advising.
(((8))) (9) "Resident student" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 28B.15.012.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.145.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The program administrator, under contract with the board, shall
staff the ((opportunity scholarship)) board and shall have the duties
and responsibilities provided in this chapter, including but not
limited to publicizing the program, selecting participants for the
opportunity scholarship award, distributing opportunity scholarship
awards, and achieving the maximum possible rate of return on investment
of the accounts in subsection (2) of this section, while ensuring
transparency in the investment decisions and processes. Duties,
exercised jointly with the ((opportunity scholarship)) board, include
soliciting funds and setting annual fund-raising goals. The program
administrator shall be paid an administrative fee as determined by the
((opportunity scholarship)) board.
(2) With respect to the opportunity scholarship program, the
program administrator shall:
(a) Establish and manage two separate accounts into which to
receive grants and contributions from private sources as well as state
matching funds, and from which to disburse scholarship funds to
participants;
(b) Solicit and accept grants and contributions from private
sources, via direct payment, pledge agreement, or escrow account, of
private sources for deposit into one or both of the two accounts
created in this subsection (2)(b) in accordance with this subsection
(2)(b):
(i) The "scholarship account," whose principal may be invaded, and
from which scholarships must be disbursed beginning no later than
December 1, 2011, if, by that date, state matching funds in the amount
of five million dollars or more have been received. Thereafter,
scholarships shall be disbursed on an annual basis beginning no later
than May 1, 2012, and every ((May)) October 1st thereafter;
(ii) The "endowment account," from which scholarship moneys may be
disbursed from earnings only in years when:
(A) The state match has been made into both the scholarship and the
endowment account;
(B) The state appropriations for the state need grant under RCW
28B.92.010 meet or exceed state appropriations for the state need grant
made in the 2011-2013 biennium, adjusted for inflation, and eligibility
for state need grant recipients is at least seventy percent of state
median family income; and
(C) The state has demonstrated progress toward the goal of total
per-student funding levels, from state appropriations plus tuition and
fees, of at least the sixtieth percentile of total per-student funding
at similar public institutions of higher education in the global
challenge states, as defined, measured, and reported in RCW 28B.15.068.
In any year in which the office of financial management reports that
the state has not made progress toward this goal, no new scholarships
may be awarded. In any year in which the office of financial
management reports that the percentile of total per-student funding is
less than the sixtieth percentile and at least five percent less than
the prior year, pledges of future grants and contributions may, at the
request of the donor, be released and grants and contributions already
received refunded to the extent that opportunity scholarship awards
already made can be fulfilled from the funds remaining in the endowment
account; ((and))
(iii) An amount equal to at least fifty percent of all grants and
contributions must be deposited into the scholarship account until such
time as twenty million dollars have been deposited into the account,
after which time the private donors may designate whether their
contributions must be deposited to the scholarship or the endowment
account. The ((opportunity scholarship)) board and the program
administrator must work to maximize private sector contributions to
both the scholarship account and the endowment account, to maintain a
robust scholarship program while simultaneously building the endowment,
and to determine the division between the two accounts in the case of
undesignated grants and contributions, taking into account the need for
a long-term funding mechanism and the short-term needs of families and
students in Washington. The first five million dollars in state match,
as provided in RCW 28B.145.040, shall be deposited into the scholarship
account and thereafter the state match shall be deposited into the two
accounts in equal proportion to the private funds deposited in each
account; and
(iv) Once moneys in the opportunity scholarship match transfer
account are subject to an agreement under RCW 28B.145.050(5) and are
deposited in the scholarship account or endowment account under this
section, the state acts in a fiduciary rather than ownership capacity
with regard to those assets. Assets in the scholarship account and
endowment account are not considered state money, common cash, or
revenue to the state;
(c) Provide proof of receipt of grants and contributions from
private sources to the ((board)) council, identifying the amounts
received by name of private source and date, and whether the amounts
received were deposited into the scholarship or the endowment account;
(d) In consultation with the ((higher education coordinating
board)) council and the state board for community and technical
colleges, make an assessment of the reasonable annual eligible expenses
associated with eligible education programs identified by the
((opportunity scholarship)) board;
(e) Determine the dollar difference between tuition fees charged by
institutions of higher education in the 2008-09 academic year and the
academic year for which an opportunity scholarship is being
distributed;
(f) Develop and implement an application, selection, and
notification process for awarding opportunity scholarships;
(g) Determine the annual amount of the opportunity scholarship for
each selected participant. The annual amount shall be at least one
thousand dollars or the amount determined under (e) of this subsection,
but may be increased on an income-based, sliding scale basis up to the
amount necessary to cover all reasonable annual eligible expenses as
assessed pursuant to (d) of this subsection, or to encourage
participation in baccalaureate degree programs identified by the
((opportunity scholarship)) board;
(h) Distribute scholarship funds to selected participants. Once
awarded, and to the extent funds are available for distribution, an
opportunity scholarship shall be automatically renewed until the
participant withdraws from or is no longer attending the program,
completes the program, or has taken the credit or clock hour equivalent
of one hundred twenty-five percent of the published length of time of
the participant's program, whichever occurs first, and as long as the
participant annually submits documentation of filing both a free
application for federal student aid and for available federal education
tax credits, including but not limited to the American opportunity tax
credit; and
(i) Notify institutions of scholarship recipients who will attend
their institutions and inform them of the terms of the students'
eligibility.
(3) With respect to the opportunity expansion program, the program
administrator shall:
(a) Assist the ((opportunity scholarship)) board in developing and
implementing an application, selection, and notification process for
making opportunity expansion awards; and
(b) Solicit and accept grants and contributions from private
sources for opportunity expansion awards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.145
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The board may elect to have the state investment board invest
the funds in the scholarship account and endowment account described
under RCW 28B.145.030(2)(b). If the board so elects, the state
investment board has the full power to invest, reinvest, manage,
contract, sell, or exchange investment money in the two accounts. All
investment and operating costs associated with the investment of money
shall be paid under RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the exception
of these expenses, the earnings from the investment of the money shall
be retained by the accounts.
(2) All investments made by the state investment board shall be
made with the exercise of that degree of judgment and care under RCW
43.33A.140 and the investment policy established by the state
investment board.
(3) As deemed appropriate by the state investment board, money in
the scholarship and endowment accounts may be commingled for investment
with other funds subject to investment by the state investment board.
(4) Members of the state investment board shall not be considered
an insurer of the funds or assets and are not liable for any action or
inaction.
(5) Members of the state investment board are not liable to the
state, to the fund, or to any other person as a result of their
activities as members, whether ministerial or discretionary, except for
willful dishonesty or intentional violations of law. The state
investment board in its discretion may purchase liability insurance for
members.
(6) The authority to establish all policies relating to the
scholarship account and the endowment account, other than the
investment policies as provided in subsections (1) through (3) of this
section, resides with the board and program administrator acting in
accordance with the principles set forth in this chapter. With the
exception of expenses of the state investment board in subsection (1)
of this section, disbursements from the scholarship account and
endowment account shall be made only on the authorization of the
opportunity scholarship board or its designee, and moneys in the
accounts may be spent only for the purposes specified in this chapter.
(7) The state investment board shall routinely consult and
communicate with the board on the investment policy, earnings of the
accounts, and related needs of the program.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.145.050 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 13 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The opportunity scholarship match transfer account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer as a nonappropriated account to
be used solely and exclusively for the opportunity scholarship program
created in RCW 28B.145.040. The purpose of the account is to provide
matching funds for the opportunity scholarship program.
(2) Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations by the
legislature into the account and any gifts, grants, or donations
received by the executive director of the ((board)) council for this
purpose.
(3) No expenditures from the account may be made except upon
receipt of proof, by the executive director of the ((board)) council
from the program administrator, of private contributions to the
opportunity scholarship program. Expenditures, in the form of matching
funds, may not exceed the total amount of private contributions.
(4) Only the executive director of the ((board)) council or the
executive director's designee may authorize expenditures from the
opportunity scholarship match transfer account. Such authorization
must be made as soon as practicable following receipt of proof as
required under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The council shall enter into an appropriate agreement with the
program administrator to demonstrate exchange of consideration for the
matching funds.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.145.060 and 2013 c 39 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The opportunity expansion program is established.
(2) The ((opportunity scholarship)) board shall select institutions
of higher education to receive opportunity expansion awards. In so
doing, the ((opportunity scholarship)) board must:
(a) Solicit, receive, and evaluate proposals from institutions of
higher education that are designed to directly increase the number of
baccalaureate degrees produced in high employer demand and other
programs of study, and that include annual numerical targets for the
number of such degrees, with a strong emphasis on serving students who
received their high school diploma or high school equivalency
certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536 in Washington or are adult
Washington residents who are returning to school to gain a
baccalaureate degree;
(b) Develop criteria for evaluating proposals and awarding funds to
the proposals deemed most likely to increase the number of
baccalaureate degrees and degrees produced in high employer demand and
other programs of study;
(c) Give priority to proposals that include a partnership between
public and private partnership entities that leverage additional
private funds;
(d) Give priority to proposals that are innovative, efficient, and
cost-effective, given the nature and cost of the particular program of
study;
(e) Consult and operate in consultation with existing higher
education stakeholders, including but not limited to: Faculty, labor,
student organizations, and relevant higher education agencies; and
(f) Determine which proposals to improve and accelerate the
production of baccalaureate degrees in high employer demand and other
programs of study will receive opportunity expansion awards for the
following state fiscal year, notify the state treasurer, and announce
the awards.
(3) The state treasurer, at the direction of the ((opportunity
scholarship)) board, must distribute the funds that have been awarded
to the institutions of higher education from the opportunity expansion
account.
(4) Institutions of higher education receiving awards under this
section may not supplant existing general fund state revenues with
opportunity expansion awards.
(5) Annually, the office of financial management shall report to
the ((opportunity scholarship)) board, the governor, and the relevant
committees of the legislature regarding the percentage of Washington
households with incomes in the middle-income bracket or higher. For
purposes of this section, "middle-income bracket" means household
incomes between two hundred and five hundred percent of the 2010
federal poverty level, as determined by the United States department of
health and human services for a family of four, adjusted annually for
inflation.
(6) Annually, the ((student achievement)) council must report to
the ((opportunity scholarship)) board, the governor, and the relevant
committees of the legislature regarding the increase in the number of
degrees in high employer demand and other programs of study awarded by
institutions of higher education over the average of the preceding ten
academic years.
(7) In its comprehensive plan, the workforce training and education
coordinating board shall include specific strategies to reach the goal
of increasing the percentage of Washington households living in the
middle-income bracket or higher, as calculated by the office of
financial management and developed by the agency or education
institution that will lead the strategy.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.145.070 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 13 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((By December 1, 2012, and)) Annually each December 1st
((thereafter)), the ((opportunity scholarship)) board, together with
the program administrator, shall report to the ((board)) council, the
governor, and the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding
the opportunity scholarship and opportunity expansion programs,
including but not limited to:
(a) Which education programs the ((opportunity scholarship)) board
determined were eligible for purposes of the opportunity scholarship;
(b) The number of applicants for the opportunity scholarship,
disaggregated, to the extent possible, by race, ethnicity, gender,
county of origin, age, and median family income;
(c) The number of participants in the opportunity scholarship
program, disaggregated, to the extent possible, by race, ethnicity,
gender, county of origin, age, and median family income;
(d) The number and amount of the scholarships actually awarded, and
whether the scholarships were paid from the scholarship account or the
endowment account;
(e) The institutions and eligible education programs in which
opportunity scholarship participants enrolled, together with data
regarding participants' completion and graduation;
(f) The total amount of private contributions and state match
moneys received for the opportunity scholarship program, how the funds
were distributed between the scholarship and endowment accounts, the
interest or other earnings on the accounts, and the amount of any
administrative fee paid to the program administrator; and
(g) Identification of the programs the ((opportunity scholarship))
board selected to receive opportunity expansion awards and the amount
of such awards.
(2) In the next succeeding legislative session following receipt of
a report required under subsection (1) of this section, the appropriate
committees of the legislature shall review the report and consider
whether any legislative action is necessary with respect to either the
opportunity scholarship program or the opportunity expansion program,
including but not limited to consideration of whether any legislative
action is necessary with respect to the nature and level of focus on
high employer demand fields and the number and amount of scholarships.

--- END ---