BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall establish procedures for the issuance of
special training certificates to employers authorizing employers to pay
training wages to new employees. The training wage shall be seventy-five percent of the minimum wage required under RCW 49.46.020 or the
minimum wage rate required under federal law, whichever is greater.
The training period may last for a maximum of six hundred eighty hours.
Employers may only use the special training certificate under this
section once per employee.
(2) If an employer discharges an employee working under the special
training certificate prior to the completion of six hundred eighty
hours, the employer must notify the director and provide an explanation
for the discharge.
(3) Nothing in this section precludes an employer from also
applying for a special certificate under RCW 49.12.110 or 49.46.060 for
a particular employee.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.12.110 and 1994 c 164 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
For any occupation in which a minimum wage has been established,
the director may issue to an employer, a special certificate or permit
for an employee who is physically or mentally handicapped to such a
degree that he or she is unable to obtain employment in the competitive
labor market, or to a trainee or learner not otherwise subject to the
jurisdiction of the apprenticeship council, a special certificate or
permit authorizing the employment of such employee for a wage less than
the legal minimum wage; and the director shall fix the minimum wage for
said person, such special certificate or permit to be issued only in
such cases as the director may decide the same is applied for in good
faith and that such certificate or permit shall be in force for such
length of time as the director shall decide and determine is proper.
Nothing in this section precludes an employer from also applying for a
special certificate under section 1 of this act for a particular
employee.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.46.060 and 1959 c 294 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director, to the extent necessary in order to prevent
curtailment of opportunities for employment, shall by regulations
provide for (1) the employment of learners, of apprentices, and of
messengers employed primarily in delivering letters and messages, under
special certificates issued pursuant to regulations of the director, at
such wages lower than the minimum wage applicable under RCW 49.46.020
and subject to such limitations as to time, number, proportion, and
length of service as the director shall prescribe, and (2) the
employment of individuals whose earning capacity is impaired by age or
physical or mental deficiency or injury, under special certificates
issued by the director, at such wages lower than the minimum wage
applicable under RCW 49.46.020 and for such period as shall be fixed in
such certificates. Nothing in this section precludes an employer from
also applying for a special certificate under section 1 of this act for
a particular employee.

--- END ---