BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to assure that for
parents with intellectual or developmental disabilities, the department
of social and health services takes into consideration the parent's
disability when offering services to correct parental deficiencies. To
do so, the legislature finds that the department must contact the
developmental disabilities administration. The legislature further
intends to allow the court to apply an active efforts standard to the
department at dependency review hearings involving parents with
intellectual or developmental disabilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.136 and 2013 c 316 s 2, 2013 c 254 s 2, and 2013
c 173 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Whenever a child is ordered removed from the home, a permanency
plan shall be developed no later than sixty days from the time the
supervising agency assumes responsibility for providing services,
including placing the child, or at the time of a hearing under RCW
13.34.130, whichever occurs first. The permanency planning process
continues until a permanency planning goal is achieved or dependency is
dismissed. The planning process shall include reasonable efforts to
return the child to the parent's home.
(2) The agency supervising the dependency shall submit a written
permanency plan to all parties and the court not less than fourteen
days prior to the scheduled hearing. Responsive reports of parties not
in agreement with the department's or supervising agency's proposed
permanency plan must be provided to the department or supervising
agency, all other parties, and the court at least seven days prior to
the hearing.
The permanency plan shall include:
(a) A permanency plan of care that shall identify one of the
following outcomes as a primary goal and may identify additional
outcomes as alternative goals: Return of the child to the home of the
child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian; adoption, including a
tribal customary adoption as defined in RCW 13.38.040; guardianship;
permanent legal custody; long-term relative or foster care, until the
child is age eighteen, with a written agreement between the parties and
the care provider; successful completion of a responsible living skills
program; or independent living, if appropriate and if the child is age
sixteen or older. The department or supervising agency shall not
discharge a child to an independent living situation before the child
is eighteen years of age unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant
to chapter 13.64 RCW;
(b) Unless the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(8),
that a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the
child will be placed, what steps will be taken to return the child
home, what steps the supervising agency or the department will take to
promote existing appropriate sibling relationships and/or facilitate
placement together or contact in accordance with the best interests of
each child, and what actions the department or supervising agency will
take to maintain parent-child ties. All aspects of the plan shall
include the goal of achieving permanence for the child.
(i) The department's or supervising agency's plan shall specify
what services the parents will be offered to enable them to resume
custody, what requirements the parents must meet to resume custody, and
a time limit for each service plan and parental requirement.
(A) If the parent is incarcerated, the plan must address how the
parent will participate in the case conference and permanency planning
meetings and, where possible, must include treatment that reflects the
resources available at the facility where the parent is confined. The
plan must provide for visitation opportunities, unless visitation is
not in the best interests of the child.
(B) If a parent has a developmental disability according to the
definition provided in RCW 71A.10.020, and that individual is eligible
for services provided by the developmental disabilities administration,
the department shall make reasonable efforts to consult with the
developmental disabilities administration to create an appropriate plan
for services. For individuals who meet the definition of developmental
disability provided in RCW 71A.10.020 and who are eligible for services
through the developmental disabilities administration, the plan for
services must be tailored to correct the parental deficiency taking
into consideration the parent's disability and the department shall
also determine an appropriate method to offer those services based on
the parent's disability.
(ii)(A) Visitation is the right of the family, including the child
and the parent, in cases in which visitation is in the best interest of
the child. Early, consistent, and frequent visitation is crucial for
maintaining parent-child relationships and making it possible for
parents and children to safely reunify. The supervising agency or
department shall encourage the maximum parent and child and sibling
contact possible, when it is in the best interest of the child,
including regular visitation and participation by the parents in the
care of the child while the child is in placement.
(B) Visitation shall not be limited as a sanction for a parent's
failure to comply with court orders or services where the health,
safety, or welfare of the child is not at risk as a result of the
visitation.
(C) Visitation may be limited or denied only if the court
determines that such limitation or denial is necessary to protect the
child's health, safety, or welfare. When a parent or sibling has been
identified as a suspect in an active criminal investigation for a
violent crime that, if the allegations are true, would impact the
safety of the child, the department shall make a concerted effort to
consult with the assigned law enforcement officer in the criminal case
before recommending any changes in parent/child or child/sibling
contact. In the event that the law enforcement officer has information
pertaining to the criminal case that may have serious implications for
child safety or well-being, the law enforcement officer shall provide
this information to the department during the consultation. The
department may only use the information provided by law enforcement
during the consultation to inform family visitation plans and may not
share or otherwise distribute the information to any person or entity.
Any information provided to the department by law enforcement during
the consultation is considered investigative information and is exempt
from public inspection pursuant to RCW 42.56.240. The results of the
consultation shall be communicated to the court.
(D) The court and the department or supervising agency should rely
upon community resources, relatives, foster parents, and other
appropriate persons to provide transportation and supervision for
visitation to the extent that such resources are available, and
appropriate, and the child's safety would not be compromised.
(iii)(A) The department, court, or caregiver in the out-of-home
placement may not limit visitation or contact between a child and
sibling as a sanction for a child's behavior or as an incentive to the
child to change his or her behavior.
(B) Any exceptions, limitation, or denial of contacts or visitation
must be approved by the supervisor of the department caseworker and
documented. The child, parent, department, guardian ad litem, or
court-appointed special advocate may challenge the denial of visits in
court.
(iv) A child shall be placed as close to the child's home as
possible, preferably in the child's own neighborhood, unless the court
finds that placement at a greater distance is necessary to promote the
child's or parents' well-being.
(v) The plan shall state whether both in-state and, where
appropriate, out-of-state placement options have been considered by the
department or supervising agency.
(vi) Unless it is not in the best interests of the child, whenever
practical, the plan should ensure the child remains enrolled in the
school the child was attending at the time the child entered foster
care.
(vii) The supervising agency or department shall provide all
reasonable services that are available within the department or
supervising agency, or within the community, or those services which
the department has existing contracts to purchase. It shall report to
the court if it is unable to provide such services; and
(c) If the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(8), that a
termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the child
will be placed, what steps will be taken to achieve permanency for the
child, services to be offered or provided to the child, and, if
visitation would be in the best interests of the child, a
recommendation to the court regarding visitation between parent and
child pending a fact-finding hearing on the termination petition. The
department or supervising agency shall not be required to develop a
plan of services for the parents or provide services to the parents if
the court orders a termination petition be filed. However, reasonable
efforts to ensure visitation and contact between siblings shall be made
unless there is reasonable cause to believe the best interests of the
child or siblings would be jeopardized.
(3) Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the earliest
possible date. If the child has been in out-of-home care for fifteen
of the most recent twenty-two months, and the court has not made a good
cause exception, the court shall require the department or supervising
agency to file a petition seeking termination of parental rights in
accordance with RCW 13.34.145(((3)))(4)(b)(vi). In cases where
parental rights have been terminated, the child is legally free for
adoption, and adoption has been identified as the primary permanency
planning goal, it shall be a goal to complete the adoption within six
months following entry of the termination order.
(4) If the court determines that the continuation of reasonable
efforts to prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from his
or her home or to safely return the child home should not be part of
the permanency plan of care for the child, reasonable efforts shall be
made to place the child in a timely manner and to complete whatever
steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.
(5) The identified outcomes and goals of the permanency plan may
change over time based upon the circumstances of the particular case.
(6) The court shall consider the child's relationships with the
child's siblings in accordance with RCW 13.34.130(6). Whenever the
permanency plan for a child is adoption, the court shall encourage the
prospective adoptive parents, birth parents, foster parents, kinship
caregivers, and the department or other supervising agency to seriously
consider the long-term benefits to the child adoptee and his or her
siblings of providing for and facilitating continuing postadoption
contact between the siblings. To the extent that it is feasible, and
when it is in the best interests of the child adoptee and his or her
siblings, contact between the siblings should be frequent and of a
similar nature as that which existed prior to the adoption. If the
child adoptee or his or her siblings are represented by an attorney or
guardian ad litem in a proceeding under this chapter or in any other
child custody proceeding, the court shall inquire of each attorney and
guardian ad litem regarding the potential benefits of continuing
contact between the siblings and the potential detriments of severing
contact. This section does not require the department of social and
health services or other supervising agency to agree to any specific
provisions in an open adoption agreement and does not create a new
obligation for the department to provide supervision or transportation
for visits between siblings separated by adoption from foster care.
(7) For purposes related to permanency planning:
(a) "Guardianship" means a dependency guardianship or a legal
guardianship pursuant to chapter 11.88 RCW or equivalent laws of
another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.
(b) "Permanent custody order" means a custody order entered
pursuant to chapter 26.10 RCW.
(c) "Permanent legal custody" means legal custody pursuant to
chapter 26.10 RCW or equivalent laws of another state or a federally
recognized Indian tribe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2014, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---