BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35A.40.210 and 2009 c 229 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Procedures for any public work or improvement for code cities
shall be governed by RCW 35.23.352.
((Purchases for code cities with twenty thousand population or more
shall be governed by RCW 35.22.620.)) (2) Purchases for code cities
with ((under)) a population of fewer than twenty thousand
((population)) shall be governed by RCW 35.23.352.
(3)(a) Subject to the limitations established in (b) of this
subsection (3), code cities with populations of twenty thousand or more
may have public works performed by city employees in any annual or
biennial budget period at an amount equal to or less than ten percent
of the public works construction budget, including any amounts in a
supplemental public works construction budget for the same budget
period.
(b) Code cities may not have city employees perform public works
projects in excess of: (i) One hundred twenty-five thousand dollars if
more than one trade or craft is involved in the project; or (ii) sixty
thousand dollars if only a single craft or trade is involved in the
project or if the project is street signalization or street lighting.

--- END ---