BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that tuition at
Washington public research universities has almost doubled over the
past five years. While the state has a robust financial aid program,
the state need grant, the program was still unable to serve over
thirty-two thousand four hundred twenty-three eligible students during
the 2012-13 academic year.
(2) This act is intended to expand access to need based aid by
creating a program for a larger number of qualified students to attend
the state's institutions of higher education without paying for tuition
up front and without relying on the increasingly expensive federal
student loans.
(3) To accomplish these purposes, the legislature intends to create
a system so all students who qualify for the state need grant and
college bound programs may attend college without paying for tuition
and fees. The legislature intends to establish an actuarially sound
system under which only those students who can afford it will make
contributions to the program fund based on a very low percentage of
their income. This is intended to enable future students to
participate in the program and attend an institution of higher
education without having to pay tuition.
(4) Through the state need pay it forward program, the legislature
recognizes that a larger group of students could receive financial
assistance without increasing reliance on federal student loans, while
significantly reducing the debt and financial repayment burdens on
students.
(5) The legislature recognizes that because some students who meet
the income threshold would have to make contributions to the program
based on the amount of aid they received, the amount of money available
to future students will grow. For those students who do not meet the
income threshold after graduation or exit, the program redesign would
have no requirement to make contributions to the program.
(6) The legislature intends that this program redesign will allow
financial aid programs to grow, while maintaining a level of equity
based on the income level of state need pay it forward grant contract
recipients.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.102 and 2013 c 23 s 53 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year, any four-year
institution of higher education that increases tuition beyond levels
assumed in the omnibus appropriations act is subject to the financial
aid requirements included in this section and shall remain subject to
these requirements through the 2018-19 academic year.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2011, each four-year institution of higher
education that raises tuition beyond levels assumed in the omnibus
appropriations act shall, in a manner consistent with the goal of
enhancing the quality of and access to their institutions, provide
financial aid to offset full-time tuition fees for resident
undergraduate students as follows:
(a) Subtract from the full-time tuition fees an amount that is
equal to the maximum amount ((of a)) provided through the state need
((grant award)) pay it forward program that would be given to an
eligible student with a family income at or below fifty percent of the
state's median family income as determined by the student achievement
council; and
(b) Offset the remainder as follows:
(i) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes are at or
below fifty percent of the state's median family income shall receive
financial aid equal to one hundred percent of the remainder if an
institution's full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate
students is five percent or greater of the state's median family income
for a family of four as provided by the student achievement council;
(ii) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes are
greater than fifty percent and no more than seventy percent of the
state's median family income shall receive financial aid equal to
seventy-five percent of the remainder if an institution's full-time
tuition fees for resident undergraduate students is ten percent or
greater of the state's median family income for a family of four as
provided by the student achievement council;
(iii) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes exceed
seventy percent and are less than one hundred percent of the state's
median family income shall receive financial aid equal to fifty percent
of the remainder if an institution's full-time tuition fees for
resident undergraduate students is fifteen percent or greater of the
state's median family income for a family of four as provided by the
student achievement council; and
(iv) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes are at or
exceed one hundred percent and are no more than one hundred twenty-five
percent of the state's median family income shall receive financial aid
equal to twenty-five percent of the remainder if an institution's
full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students is twenty
percent or greater of the state's median family income for a family of
four as provided by the student achievement council.
(3) The financial aid required in subsection (2) of this section
shall:
(a) Be reduced by the amount of other financial aid awards, not
including the state need ((grant)) pay it forward program;
(b) Be prorated based on credit load; and
(c) Only be provided to students up to demonstrated need.
(4) Financial aid sources and methods may be:
(a) Tuition revenue or locally held funds;
(b) Tuition waivers created by a four-year institution of higher
education for the specific purpose of serving low and middle-income
students; or
(c) Local financial aid programs.
(5) Use of tuition waivers as specified in subsection (4)(b) of
this section shall not be included in determining total state tuition
waiver authority as defined in RCW 28B.15.910.
(6) By August 15, 2012, and August 15th every year thereafter,
four-year institutions of higher education shall report to the governor
and relevant committees of the legislature on the effectiveness of the
various sources and methods of financial aid in mitigating tuition
increases. A key purpose of these reports is to provide information
regarding the results of the decision to grant tuition-setting
authority to the four-year institutions of higher education and whether
tuition setting authority should continue to be granted to the
institutions or revert back to the legislature after consideration of
the impacts on students, including educational access, affordability,
and quality. These reports shall include:
(a) The amount of additional financial aid provided to middle-income and low-income students with demonstrated need in the aggregate
and per student;
(b) An itemization of the sources and methods of financial aid
provided by the four-year institution of higher education in the
aggregate and per student;
(c) An analysis of the combined impact of federal tuition tax
credits and financial aid provided by the institution of higher
education on the net cost to students and their families resulting from
tuition increases;
(d) In cases where tuition increases are greater than those assumed
in the omnibus appropriations act at any four-year institution of
higher education, the institution must include an explanation in its
report of why this increase was necessary and how the institution will
mitigate the effects of the increase. The institution must include in
this section of its report a plan and specific timelines; and
(e) An analysis of changes in resident student enrollment patterns,
participation rates, graduation rates, and debt load, by race and
ethnicity, gender, state and county of origin, age, and socioeconomic
status, and a plan to mitigate effects of reduced diversity due to
tuition increases. This analysis shall include disaggregated data for
resident students in the following income brackets:
(i) Up to seventy percent of the median family income;
(ii) Between seventy-one percent and one hundred twenty-five
percent of the median family income; and
(iii) Above one hundred twenty-five percent of the median family
income.
(7) Beginning in the 2012-13 academic year, the University of
Washington shall enroll during each academic year at least the same
number of resident first-year undergraduate students at the Seattle
campus, as defined in RCW 28B.15.012, as enrolled during the 2009-10
academic year. This requirement shall not apply to nonresident
undergraduate and graduate and professional students.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.76.502 and 2013 c 23 s 59 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office must provide a financial aid counseling curriculum
to institutions of higher education with state need pay it forward
grant contract recipients. The curriculum must be available via a web
site. The curriculum must include, but not be limited to:
(a) An explanation of the state need ((grant)) pay it forward
program rules, including maintaining satisfactory progress, repayment
rules, and usage limits;
(b) Information on campus and private scholarships and work-study
opportunities, including the application processes;
(c) An overview of student loan or grant contract options with an
emphasis on the repayment obligations or grant contract contributions
a student ((borrower)) assumes regardless of program completion,
including the likely consequences of default and sample monthly
repayment amounts based on a range of student levels of indebtedness;
(d) An overview of financial literacy, including basic money
management skills such as living within a budget and handling credit
and debt;
(e) Average salaries for a wide range of jobs;
(f) Perspectives from a diverse group of students who are or were
recipients of financial aid, including student loans; and
(g) Contact information for local financial aid resources and the
federal student aid ombuds's office.
(2) By the 2013-14 academic year, the institution of higher
education must take reasonable steps to ensure that each state need pay
it forward grant contract recipient receives information outlined in
subsection (1)(a) through (g) of this section by directly referencing
or linking to the web site on the conditions of award statement
provided to each recipient.
(3) By July 1, 2013, the office must disseminate the curriculum to
all institutions of higher education participating in the state need
((grant)) pay it forward program. The institutions of higher education
may require nonstate need grant recipients to participate in all or
portions of the financial aid counseling.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.76.525 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 110 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The state financial aid account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. The primary purpose of the account is to ensure
that all appropriations designated for financial aid through statewide
student financial aid programs are made available to eligible students.
The account shall be a nontreasury account.
(2) The office shall deposit in the account all money received for
the state need ((grant)) pay it forward program established under RCW
28B.92.010, the state work-study program established under chapter
28B.12 RCW, the Washington scholars program established under RCW
28A.600.110, the Washington award for vocational excellence program
established under RCW 28C.04.525, and the educational opportunity grant
program established under chapter 28B.101 RCW. The account shall
consist of funds appropriated by the legislature for the programs
listed in this subsection and private contributions to the programs.
Moneys deposited in the account do not lapse at the close of the fiscal
period for which they were appropriated. Both during and after the
fiscal period in which moneys were deposited in the account, the office
may expend moneys in the account only for the purposes for which they
were appropriated, and the expenditures are subject to any other
conditions or limitations placed on the appropriations.
(3) Expenditures from the account shall be used for scholarships
and grant contracts to students eligible for the programs according to
program rules and policies.
(4) Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations
and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.
(5) Only the director of the office or the director's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.76.526 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 27 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
The Washington opportunity pathways account is created in the state
treasury. Expenditures from the account may be used only for programs
in chapter 28B.12 RCW (state work-study), chapter 28B.50 RCW
(opportunity grant), RCW 28B.76.660 (Washington scholars award), RCW
28B.76.670 (Washington award for vocational excellence), chapter 28B.92
RCW (state need ((grant)) pay it forward program), chapter 28B.101 RCW
(educational opportunity grant), chapter 28B.105 RCW (GET ready for
math and science scholarship), chapter 28B.117 RCW (passport to college
promise), chapter 28B.118 RCW (college bound scholarship), chapter
28B.119 RCW (Washington promise scholarship), chapter 43.215 RCW (early
childhood education and assistance program), and RCW 43.330.280
(recruitment of entrepreneurial researchers, innovation partnership
zones and research teams).

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.76.540 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 111 are each
amended to read as follows:
In addition to administrative responsibilities assigned in this
chapter, the office shall administer the programs set forth in the
following statutes: RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150 (Washington
scholars); chapter 28B.85 RCW (degree-granting institutions); chapter
28B.92 RCW (state need ((grant)) pay it forward program); chapter
28B.12 RCW (work-study); RCW 28B.15.543 (tuition waivers for Washington
scholars); RCW 28B.15.760 through 28B.15.766 (math and science loans);
RCW 28B.15.100 (reciprocity agreement); RCW 28B.15.730 through
28B.15.734 (Oregon reciprocity); RCW 28B.15.750 and 28B.15.752 (Idaho
reciprocity); RCW 28B.15.756 (British Columbia reciprocity); chapter
28B.101 RCW (educational opportunity grant); chapter 28B.102 RCW
(future teachers conditional scholarship); chapter 28B.108 RCW
(American Indian endowed scholarship); chapter 28B.109 RCW (Washington
international exchange scholarship); chapter 28B.115 RCW (health
professional conditional scholarship); chapter 28B.119 RCW (Washington
promise scholarship); and chapter 28B.133 RCW (gaining independence for
students with dependents).

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.77.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Aligned with the state's biennial budget and policy cycles, the
council shall propose educational attainment goals and priorities to
meet the state's evolving needs. The council shall identify strategies
for meeting the goals and priorities by means of a short-term strategic
action plan and a ten-year plan that serves as a roadmap.
(a) The goals must address the needs of Washington residents to
reach higher levels of educational attainment and Washington's
workforce needs for certificates and degrees in particular fields of
study.
(b) The council shall identify the resources it deems appropriate
to meet statewide goals and also recognize current state economic
conditions and state resources.
(c) In proposing goals, the council shall collaborate with the
superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator
standards board, the state board of education, the state board for
community and technical colleges, the four-year institutions of higher
education, independent colleges and degree-granting institutions,
certificate-granting institutions, and the workforce training and
education coordinating board.
(2) The council shall update the strategic action plan every two
years with the first strategic action plan to be submitted to the
governor and the legislature by December 1, 2012. The ten-year roadmap
must be updated every two years with the first roadmap to be submitted
to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2013. The council
must provide regular updates to the joint higher education committee
created in RCW 44.04.360 as needed.
(3) In order to develop the ten-year roadmap, the council shall
conduct strategic planning in collaboration with agencies and
stakeholders and include input from the legislature. The council must
also consult with the STEM education innovation alliance established
under RCW 28A.188.030 in order to align strategies under the roadmap
with the STEM framework for education and accountability developed by
the alliance. The roadmap must encompass all sectors of higher
education, including secondary to postsecondary transitions. The
roadmap must outline strategies that address:
(a) Strategic planning, which includes setting benchmarks and goals
for long-term degree production generally and in particular fields of
study;
(b) Expanding access, affordability, quality, efficiency, and
accountability among the various institutions of higher education;
(c) Higher education finance planning and strategic investments
including budget recommendations necessary to meet statewide goals;
(d) System design and coordination;
(e) Improving student transitions;
(f) Higher education data and analysis, in collaboration with the
education data center, which includes outcomes for recruitment,
retention, and success of students;
(g) College and career access preparedness, in collaboration with
the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the state
board of education;
(h) Expanding participation and success for racial and ethnic
minorities in higher education;
(i) Development and expansion of innovations in higher education
including innovations to increase attainment of postsecondary
certificates, and associate, baccalaureate, graduate, and professional
degrees; and innovations to improve precollege education in terms of
cost-effectiveness and transitions to college-level education;
(j) Strengthening the education pipeline and degree production in
science, technology, engineering, and mathematics fields, and aligning
strategies under the roadmap with the STEM framework for action and
accountability developed under RCW 28A.188.030; and
(k) Relevant policy research.
(4) As needed, the council must conduct system reviews consistent
with RCW 28B.77.080.
(5) The council shall facilitate the development and expansion of
innovative practices within, between, and among the sectors to increase
educational attainment and assess the effectiveness of the innovations.
(6) The council shall use the data and analysis produced by, and in
consultation with, the education data center created in RCW 43.41.400
in developing policy recommendations and proposing goals. In
conducting research and analysis the council at a minimum must:
(a) Identify barriers to increasing educational attainment,
evaluate effectiveness of various educational models, identify best
practices, and recommend methods to overcome barriers;
(b) Analyze data from multiple sources including data from academic
research and from areas and agencies outside of education including but
not limited to data from the department of health, the department of
corrections, and the department of social and health services to
determine best practices to remove barriers and to improve educational
attainment;
(c) Assess educational achievement disaggregated by income level,
age, gender, race and ethnicity, country of origin, and other relevant
demographic groups working with data from the education data center;
(d) Track progress toward meeting the state's goals;
(e) Communicate results and provide access to data analysis to
policymakers, the superintendent of public instruction, institutions of
higher education, students, and the public; and
(f) Use data from the education data center wherever appropriate to
conduct duties in (a) through (e) of this subsection.
(7) The council shall collaborate with the appropriate state
agencies and stakeholders, including the state board of education, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board for
community and technical colleges, the workforce training and education
coordinating board, and the four-year institutions of higher education
to improve student transitions and success including but not limited
to:
(a) Setting minimum college admission standards for four-year
institutions of higher education, including a requirement that
coursework in American sign language or an American Indian language
satisfies any requirement for instruction in a language other than
English that the council or the institutions may establish as a general
undergraduate admissions requirement;
(b) Proposing comprehensive policies and programs to encourage
students to prepare for, understand how to access, and pursue
postsecondary college and career programs, including specific policies
and programs for students with disabilities;
(c) Recommending policies that require coordination between or
among sectors such as dual high school-college programs, awarding
college credit for advanced high school work, and transfer between two
and four-year institutions of higher education or between different
four-year institutions of higher education; and
(d) Identifying transitions issues and solutions for students, from
high school to postsecondary education including community and
technical colleges, four-year institutions of higher education,
apprenticeships, training, or workplace education; between two-year and
four-year institutions of higher education; and from postsecondary
education to career. In addressing these issues the council must
recognize that these transitions may occur multiple times as students
continue their education.
(8) The council directs the work of the office, which includes
administration of student financial aid programs under RCW 28B.76.090,
including ((the state need grant and other)) scholarships, the state
need pay it forward program, the Washington advanced college tuition
payment program, and work-study programs.
(9) The council may administer state and federal grants and
programs including but not limited to those programs that provide
incentives for improvements related to increased access and success in
postsecondary education.
(10) The council shall protect higher education consumers
including:
(a) Approving degree-granting postsecondary institutions consistent
with existing statutory criteria;
(b) Establishing minimum criteria to assess whether students who
attend proprietary institutions of higher education shall be eligible
for the state need ((grant)) pay it forward program and other forms of
state financial aid.
(i) The criteria shall include retention rates, completion rates,
((loan)) contribution default rates, and annual tuition increases,
among other criteria for students who receive state need pay it forward
grant contracts as in chapter 28B.92 RCW and any other state financial
aid.
(ii) The council may remove proprietary institutions of higher
education from eligibility for the state need ((grant)) pay it forward
program or other form of state financial aid if it finds that the
institution or college does not meet minimum criteria.
(iii) The council shall report by December 1, 2014, to the joint
higher education committee in RCW 44.04.360 on the outcomes of students
receiving state need pay it forward grant((s)) contracts, impacts on
meeting the state's higher education goals for educational attainment,
and options for prioritization of the state need ((grant)) pay it
forward program and possible consequences of implementing each option.
When examining options for prioritizing the state need pay it forward
grant contracts the council shall consider ((awarding grants))
providing pay it forward grant contracts based on need rather than date
of application and making awards based on other criteria selected by
the council.
(11) The council shall adopt residency requirements by rule.
(12) The council shall arbitrate disputes between and among four-year institutions of higher education and the state board for community
and technical colleges at the request of one or more of the
institutions involved, or at the request of the governor, or from a
resolution adopted by the legislature. The decision of the council
shall be binding on the participants in the dispute.
(13) The council may solicit, accept, receive, and administer
federal funds or private funds, in trust, or otherwise, and contract
with foundations or with for-profit or nonprofit organizations to
support the purposes and functions of the council.
(14) The council shall represent the broad public interest above
the interests of the individual institutions of higher education.

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.92.010 and 2004 c 275 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purposes of this chapter are to establish the principles upon
which the state financial aid programs will be based and to establish
the state of Washington state need ((grant)) pay it forward program,
thus assisting financially needy or disadvantaged students domiciled in
Washington to obtain the opportunity of attending an accredited
institution of higher education. State need pay it forward grants
under this chapter are available only to students who are resident
students as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a) through (d).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 28B.92 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The office of student financial assistance shall design the
Washington state need pay it forward program based on the parameters in
this section.
(2)(a) State need pay it forward program grants shall be applied to
all or a portion of tuition and fees for an eligible student's higher
education program as long as the recipient agrees to make contributions
to the program as provided in this section.
(b) Student eligibility for state need pay it forward grant
contracts is provided in RCW 28B.92.060 and 28B.92.080.
(c) Program participants shall enter into a state need pay it
forward grant contract developed by the office that defines the terms
of the contract.
(3) Students who elect to participate in the state need pay it
forward program must make contributions to the state need pay it
forward program based on the amount that was applied toward their
tuition and fees as provided in (a) through (f) of this subsection.
(a) Individuals must begin contributing to the state need pay it
forward program one year after completion or discontinuation of their
higher education program.
(b) The contribution amounts must be based on the number of years
that a student participated in the state need pay it forward program.
For each year of participation in the program, the individual must
contribute one percentage point of income as provided in (c) of this
subsection.
(c) Contributions shall be made depending on annual taxable income
as follows:
(i) Program participants who file federal income taxes individually
are not required to make contributions when their annual taxable income
is thirty thousand dollars or less. Program participants, who are
married and file federal income taxes jointly, are not required to make
contributions when their annual taxable income is forty thousand
dollars or less.
(ii) For program participants who individually file their federal
income taxes, contributions are based only on the portion of their
annual taxable income above thirty thousand dollars.
(iii) For program participants who are married and file their
federal income taxes jointly, contributions are based only on the
portion of their annual taxable income above forty thousand dollars.
(d) No interest may be collected by the office on state need pay it
forward grant contracts.
(e) A state need pay it forward grant contract recipient who has an
annual income greater than those provided in (c) of this subsection
must continue to contribute the outstanding state need pay it forward
grant contract amounts until either:
(i) The recipient contributes the amount that was applied to his or
her tuition through the state need pay it forward program; or
(ii) Twenty-one years pass from the time a student completes or
discontinues his or her higher education.
(f) Individuals who elect to contribute their entire state need pay
it forward grant contract amount in a lump sum payment will receive a
ten percent discount as long as the remaining balance is at least two
thousand dollars.
(4) The office shall develop measures to recover contributions from
and impose penalties on individuals who do not make contributions to
the state need pay it forward program in a timely manner.
(5) The office shall allow program participants one year without
making contributions two times during the contribution period. In
cases where these delays are granted, the repayment period is extended
up to twenty-three years beyond the date in subsection (3)(e)(ii) of
this section.
(6) The office shall annually report on the program along with its
annual financial aid report. The report must provide information on
the program fund growth from contributions and make recommendations
regarding increasing the income thresholds for participants in the
program.
(7) By December 1, 2016, the office, in consultation with the
office of the state actuary, shall estimate contributions to the
program over the next twenty years.

Sec. 10 RCW 28B.92.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 158 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((The legislature finds that the higher education community,
has completed a review of the state need grant program.)) It is the
intent of the legislature to endorse ((the proposed changes to))
certain components of the state need ((grant)) pay it forward program,
including:
(a) ((Reaffirmation)) Affirmation that the primary purpose of the
state need ((grant)) pay it forward program is to assist low-income,
needy, and disadvantaged Washington residents attending institutions of
higher education;
(b) A goal that the base state need pay it forward grant contract
amount over time be increased to be equivalent to the rate of tuition
charged to resident undergraduate students attending Washington state
public colleges and universities and to enable participation by more
students with higher income thresholds;
(c) State need pay it forward grant contract recipients be required
to contribute a portion of the total cost of their education through
self-help at the time they are attending institutions of higher
education;
(d) State need pay it forward grant contract recipients be required
to document their need for dependent care assistance after taking into
account other public funds provided for like purposes; and
(e) Institutional aid administrators be allowed to determine
whether a student eligible for ((a)) the state need pay it forward
grant contract in a given academic year may remain eligible for the
ensuing year if the student's family income increases by no more than
a marginal amount except for funds provided through the educational
assistance grant program for students with dependents.
(2) The legislature further finds that the changes in subsection
(1) of this section((,)) should do so in a timely manner.
(3) The legislature also finds that:
(a) In most circumstances, state need pay it forward grant contract
eligibility should not extend beyond five years or one hundred twenty-five percent of the published length of the program in which the
student is enrolled or the credit or clock-hour equivalent; and
(b) State financial aid programs should continue to adhere to the
principle that funding follows resident students to their choice of
institution of higher education.

Sec. 11 RCW 28B.92.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 160 are each
amended to read as follows:
The office shall be cognizant of the following guidelines in the
performance of its duties:
(1) The office shall be research oriented, not only at its
inception but continually through its existence.
(2) The office shall coordinate all existing programs of financial
aid except those specifically dedicated to a particular institution by
the donor.
(3) The office shall take the initiative and responsibility for
coordinating all federal student financial aid programs to ensure that
the state recognizes the maximum potential effect of these programs,
and shall design state programs that complement existing federal,
state, and institutional programs. The office shall ensure that state
programs continue to follow the principle that state financial aid
funding follows the student to the student's choice of institution of
higher education.
(4) Counseling is a paramount function of the state need ((grant))
pay it forward program and other state student financial aid programs,
and in most cases could only be properly implemented at the
institutional levels; therefore, state student financial aid programs
shall be concerned with the attainment of those goals which, in the
judgment of the office, are the reasons for the existence of a student
financial aid program, and not solely with administration of the
program on an individual basis.
(5) The "package" approach of combining loans, grants and
employment for student financial aid shall be the conceptual element of
the state's involvement.
(6) The office shall ensure that allocations of state
appropriations for financial aid are made to individuals and
institutions in a timely manner and shall closely monitor expenditures
to avoid under or overexpenditure of appropriated funds.

Sec. 12 RCW 28B.92.060 and 2012 c 229 s 558 are each amended to
read as follows:
In ((awarding need grants)) administering the state need pay it
forward program, the office shall proceed substantially as follows:
PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein shall be construed to prevent
the office, in the exercise of its sound discretion, from following
another procedure when the best interest of the program so dictates:
(1) The office shall annually select the ((financial aid award))
state need pay it forward grant contract recipients from among
Washington residents applying for student financial aid who have been
ranked according to:
(a) Financial need as determined by the amount of the family
contribution; and
(b) Other considerations, such as whether the student is a former
foster youth, or is a placebound student who has completed an associate
of arts or associate of science degree or its equivalent.
(2) The financial need of the highest ranked students shall be met
by ((grants)) state need pay it forward grant contracts depending upon
the evaluation of financial need until the total allocation has been
disbursed. Funds from ((grants)) state need pay it forward grant
contracts which are declined, forfeited, or otherwise unused shall be
((reawarded)) reallocated until disbursed, except that eligible former
foster youth shall be assured receipt of a grant contract. The office,
in consultation with four-year institutions of higher education, the
council, and the state board for community and technical colleges,
shall develop ((award)) state need pay it forward grant contract
disbursement criteria and methods of disbursement based on level of
need, and not solely rely on a first-come, first-served basis.
(3) A student shall be eligible to receive a state need grant or a
state need pay it forward grant contract for up to a combined total of
five years, or the credit or clock hour equivalent of a combined total
five years, or up to one hundred twenty-five percent of the published
length of time of the student's program. A student may not start a new
associate degree program as a state need grant or a state need pay it
forward grant contract recipient until at least five years have elapsed
since earning an associate degree as a need grant or state need pay it
forward grant contract recipient, except that a student may earn two
associate degrees concurrently. Qualifications for renewal will
include maintaining satisfactory academic progress toward completion of
an eligible program as determined by the office. Should the recipient
terminate his or her enrollment for any reason during the academic
year, the unused portion of the grant or grant contract shall be
returned to the state educational grant fund by the institution
according to the institution's own policy for issuing refunds, except
as provided in RCW 28B.92.070.
(4) In computing financial need, the office shall determine a
maximum student expense budget allowance, not to exceed an amount equal
to the total maximum student expense budget at the public institutions
plus the current average state appropriation per student for operating
expense in the public institutions. Any child support payments
received by students who are parents attending less than half-time
shall not be used in computing financial need.
(5)(a) A student who is enrolled in three to six credit-bearing
quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits, may receive a
grant or grant contract for up to one academic year before beginning a
program that leads to a degree or certificate.
(b) An eligible student enrolled on a less-than-full-time basis
shall receive a prorated portion of his or her state need grant or
state need pay it forward grant contract for any academic period in
which he or she is enrolled on a less-than-full-time basis, as long as
funds are available.
(c) An institution of higher education may ((award)) provide a
state need ((grant)) pay it forward grant contract to an eligible
student enrolled in three to six credit-bearing quarter credits, or the
semester equivalent, on a provisional basis if:
(i) The student has not previously received a state need grant or
state need pay it forward grant contract from that institution;
(ii) The student completes the required free application for
federal student aid;
(iii) The institution has reviewed the student's financial
condition, and the financial condition of the student's family if the
student is a dependent student, and has determined that the student is
likely eligible for a state need ((grant)) pay it forward grant
contract; and
(iv) The student has signed a document attesting to the fact that
the financial information provided on the free application for federal
student aid and any additional financial information provided directly
to the institution is accurate and complete, and that the student
agrees to repay the institution for the grant contract amount if the
student submitted false or incomplete information.
(6) As used in this section, "former foster youth" means a person
who is at least eighteen years of age, but not more than twenty-four
years of age, who was a dependent of the department of social and
health services at the time he or she attained the age of eighteen.

Sec. 13 RCW 28B.92.080 and 2012 c 229 s 605 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except for opportunity internship graduates whose eligibility is
provided under RCW 28B.92.084 and college bound pay it forward program
participants whose eligibility is provided in section 17 of this act,
for a student to be eligible for ((a)) the state need ((grant)) pay it
forward program a student must:
(1) Be a "needy student" or "disadvantaged student" as determined
by the office in accordance with RCW 28B.92.030 (((1))) (2) and (((4)))
(5);
(2) Have been domiciled within the state of Washington for at least
one year;
(3) Be enrolled or accepted for enrollment on at least a half-time
basis at an institution of higher education in Washington as defined in
RCW 28B.92.030(((3))) (4);
(4) Until June 30, 2011, to the extent funds are specifically
appropriated for this purpose, and subject to any terms and conditions
specified in the omnibus appropriations act, be enrolled or accepted
for enrollment for at least three quarter credits or the equivalent
semester credits at an institution of higher education in Washington as
defined in RCW 28B.92.030(((3))) (4); and
(5) Have complied with all the rules adopted by the council for the
administration of this chapter.

Sec. 14 RCW 28B.92.082 and 2012 c 229 s 560 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose and
within overall appropriations for the state need ((grant)) pay it
forward program, enhanced state need ((grants)) pay it forward grant
contract amounts are provided for persons who meet all of the following
criteria:
(a) Are needy students as defined in RCW 28B.92.030;
(b) Are placebound students as defined in RCW 28B.92.030; and
(c) Have completed the associate of arts or the associate of
science degree, or its equivalent.
(2) The enhanced state need ((grants)) pay it forward grant
contract established in this section are provided to this specific
group of students in addition to the base state need pay it forward
grant contract amount, as defined by rule of the council.

Sec. 15 RCW 28B.117.020 and 2012 c 163 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cost of attendance" means the cost associated with attending
a particular institution of higher education as determined by the
office, including but not limited to tuition, fees, room, board, books,
personal expenses, and transportation, plus the cost of reasonable
additional expenses incurred by an eligible student and approved by a
financial aid administrator at the student's school of attendance.
(2) "Financial need" means the difference between a student's cost
of attendance and the student's total family contribution as determined
by the method prescribed by the United States department of education.
(3) "Independent college or university" means a private, nonprofit
institution of higher education, open to residents of the state,
providing programs of education beyond the high school level leading to
at least the baccalaureate degree, and accredited by the Northwest
association of schools and colleges, and other institutions as may be
developed that are approved by the board as meeting equivalent
standards as those institutions accredited under this section.
(4) "Institution of higher education" means any institution
eligible to and participating in the state need ((grant)) pay it
forward program.
(5) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.
(6) "Program" means the passport to college promise program created
in this chapter.

Sec. 16 RCW 28B.118.010 and 2012 c 229 s 402 and 2012 c 163 s 8
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The office of student financial assistance shall design the
Washington college bound scholarship program in accordance with this
section and in alignment with the state need grant or state need pay it
forward program in chapter 28B.92 RCW unless otherwise provided in this
section.
(1) "Eligible students" are those students who:
(a) Qualify for free or reduced-price lunches. If a student
qualifies in the seventh grade, the student remains eligible even if
the student does not receive free or reduced-price lunches thereafter;
or
(b) Are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW and:
(i) In grade seven through twelve; or
(ii) Are between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one and have not
graduated from high school.
(2) Eligible students shall be notified of their eligibility for
the Washington college bound scholarship program beginning in their
seventh grade year. Students shall also be notified of the
requirements for award of the scholarship.
(3)(a) To be eligible for a Washington college bound scholarship,
a student eligible under subsection (1)(a) of this section must sign a
pledge during seventh or eighth grade that includes a commitment to
graduate from high school with at least a C average and with no felony
convictions. The pledge must be witnessed by a parent or guardian and
forwarded to the office of student financial assistance by mail or
electronically, as indicated on the pledge form.
(b) A student eligible under subsection (1)(b) of this section
shall be automatically enrolled, with no action necessary by the
student or the student's family, and the enrollment form must be
forwarded by the department of social and health services to the
((higher education coordinating board or its successor)) office of
student financial assistance by mail or electronically, as indicated on
the form.
(4)(a) Scholarships shall be awarded to eligible students
graduating from public high schools, approved private high schools
under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or who received home-based instruction under
chapter 28A.200 RCW.
(b) To receive the Washington college bound scholarship, a student
must graduate with at least a "C" average from a public high school or
an approved private high school under chapter 28A.195 RCW in Washington
or have received home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, must
have no felony convictions, and must be a resident student as defined
in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a) through (d).
(5) A student's family income will be assessed upon graduation
before awarding the scholarship.
(6) If at graduation from high school the student's family income
does not exceed sixty-five percent of the state median family income,
scholarship award amounts shall be as provided in this section.
(a) For students attending two or four-year institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the value of the award shall be
(i) the difference between the student's tuition and required fees,
less the value of any state-funded grant, scholarship, or waiver
assistance the student receives; (ii) plus five hundred dollars for
books and materials.
(b) For students attending private four-year institutions of higher
education in Washington, the award amount shall be the representative
average of awards granted to students in public research universities
in Washington.
(c) For students attending private vocational schools in
Washington, the award amount shall be the representative average of
awards granted to students in public community and technical colleges
in Washington.
(7) Recipients may receive no more than four full-time years' worth
of scholarship awards.
(8) Institutions of higher education shall award the student all
need-based and merit-based financial aid for which the student would
otherwise qualify. The Washington college bound scholarship is
intended to replace unmet need, loans, and, at the student's option,
work-study award before any other grants or scholarships are reduced.
(9) The first scholarships shall be awarded to students graduating
in 2012.
(10) The state of Washington retains legal ownership of tuition
units awarded as scholarships under this chapter until the tuition
units are redeemed. These tuition units shall remain separately held
from any tuition units owned under chapter 28B.95 RCW by a Washington
college bound scholarship recipient.
(11) The scholarship award must be used within five years of
receipt. Any unused scholarship tuition units revert to the Washington
college bound scholarship account.
(12) Should the recipient terminate his or her enrollment for any
reason during the academic year, the unused portion of the scholarship
tuition units shall revert to the Washington college bound scholarship
account.
(13) Students who enroll in the college bound scholarship program
by June 30, 2014, are eligible for college bound scholarships, and
students who enroll after June 30, 2014, are eligible only for the
college bound pay it forward program in section 17 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The office of student financial assistance
shall design the Washington college bound pay it forward program in
accordance with this section and in alignment with the state need grant
pay it forward program in chapter 28B.92 RCW unless otherwise provided
in this section.
(1) "Eligible students" are those students who:
(a) Qualify for the free and reduced-price lunch program. If a
student qualifies in the seventh grade, the student remains eligible
even if the student does not receive free and reduced-price lunches
thereafter; or
(b) Are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW and:
(i) Are in grades seven through twelve; or
(ii) Are between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one and have not
graduated from high school.
(2) Eligible students shall be notified of their eligibility for
the Washington college bound pay it forward program beginning in their
seventh grade school year. Students shall also be notified of the
requirements for award of the grant contract.
(3)(a) To be eligible for the Washington college bound pay it
forward program, a student eligible under subsection (1)(a) of this
section must sign a pledge during seventh or eighth grade that includes
a commitment to graduate from high school with at least a "C" average
and with no felony convictions. The pledge must be witnessed by a
parent or guardian and forwarded to the office of student financial
assistance by mail or electronically, as indicated on the pledge form.
(b) A student eligible under subsection (1)(b) of this section is
automatically enrolled, with no action necessary by the student or the
student's family, and the enrollment form must be forwarded by the
department of social and health services to the student achievement
council by mail or electronically, as indicated on the form.
(4)(a) Grant contracts shall be awarded to eligible students
graduating from public high schools or approved private high schools
under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or who received home-based instruction under
chapter 28A.200 RCW.
(b) To receive the Washington college bound pay it forward grant
contract, a student must graduate with at least a "C" average from a
public high school or an approved private high school under chapter
28A.195 RCW in Washington or have received home-based instruction under
chapter 28A.200 RCW, must have no felony convictions, and must be a
resident student as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a) through (d).
(5) A student's family income will be assessed upon graduation
before awarding the grant contract.
(6) At graduation from high school grant contract amounts and
contributions shall be as provided in this section.
(a) For students attending two or four-year institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the value of the grant contract
amount shall be (i) the difference between the student's tuition and
required fees, less the value of any state-funded grant, scholarship,
or waiver assistance the student receives; (ii) plus five hundred
dollars for books and materials.
(b) For students attending private four-year institutions of higher
education in Washington, the grant contract amount shall be the
representative average of awards granted to students in public research
universities in Washington.
(c) For students attending private vocational schools in
Washington, the grant contract amount shall be the representative
average of awards granted to students in public community and technical
colleges in Washington.
(7) Recipients may receive no more than four full-time years' worth
of grant contracts.
(8) Institutions of higher education must award the student all
need-based and merit-based financial aid for which the student would
otherwise qualify.
(9) Contributions shall be aligned with terms developed for the
state need pay it forward program in section 9 of this act.
(10) The office shall annually report on the program along with its
annual financial aid report.
(11) By December 1, 2016, the office, in consultation with the
office of the state actuary, shall estimate payments back to the
program over the next twenty years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall:
(1) Notify elementary, middle, and junior high schools about the
Washington college bound pay it forward program using methods in place
for communicating with schools and school districts; and
(2) Work with the office of student financial assistance to develop
application collection and student tracking procedures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Each school district shall notify students,
parents, teachers, counselors, and principals about the Washington
college bound pay it forward program through existing channels.
Notification methods may include, but are not limited to, regular
school district and building communications, online scholarship
bulletins and announcements, notices posted on school walls and
bulletin boards, information available in each counselor's office, and
school or district scholarship information sessions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 The office of student financial assistance
shall:
(1) With the assistance of the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, implement and administer the Washington college
bound pay it forward program;
(2) Develop and distribute, to all schools with students enrolled
in grade seven or eight, a pledge form that can be completed and
returned electronically or by mail by the student or the school to the
office of student financial assistance;
(3) Develop and implement a student application, selection, and
notification process for grant contracts;
(4) Track grant contract recipients to ensure continued eligibility
and determine student compliance for awarding of grant contracts;
(5) Subject to appropriation, deposit funds into the state
educational trust fund;
(6) Purchase tuition units under the advanced college tuition
payment program in chapter 28B.95 RCW to be owned and held in trust by
the student achievement council, for the purpose of grant contracts as
provided for in this section; and
(7) Distribute scholarship funds, in the form of tuition units
purchased under the advanced college tuition payment program in chapter
28B.95 RCW or through direct payments from the state educational trust
fund, to institutions of higher education on behalf of grant contract
recipients identified by the office, as long as recipients maintain
satisfactory academic progress.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 The caseload forecast council shall
estimate the anticipated caseload of the Washington college bound pay
it forward program and shall submit this forecast as specified in RCW
43.88C.020.

Sec. 22 RCW 28B.119.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 233 are each
amended to read as follows:
The Washington promise scholarship program shall not be funded at
the expense of the state need ((grant)) pay it forward program as
defined in chapter 28B.92 RCW. In administering the state need
((grant)) pay it forward and promise scholarship programs, the office
of student financial assistance shall first ensure that eligibility for
state need pay it forward grant contract recipients is at least fifty-five percent of state median family income.

Sec. 23 RCW 28B.133.010 and 2013 c 248 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The educational assistance grant program for students with
dependents is hereby created, subject to the availability of receipts
of gifts, grants, or endowments from private sources. The program is
created to serve financially needy students with dependents eighteen
years of age or younger, by assisting them directly through a grant
program to pursue a degree or certificate at public or private
institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.92.030(4) (a)
and (b) (i) and (ii), that participate in the state need ((grant)) pay
it forward program.

Sec. 24 RCW 28B.133.020 and 2004 c 275 s 73 are each amended to
read as follows:
To be eligible for the educational assistance grant program for
students with dependents, applicants shall: (1) Be residents of the
state of Washington; (2) be needy students as defined in RCW
28B.92.030(((3))) (5); (3) be eligible to participate in the state need
((grant)) pay it forward program as set forth under RCW 28B.92.080; and
(4) have dependents eighteen years of age or younger who are under
their care.

Sec. 25 RCW 28B.145.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The program administrator, under contract with the ((board))
student achievement council, shall staff the opportunity scholarship
board and shall have the duties and responsibilities provided in this
chapter, including but not limited to publicizing the program,
selecting participants for the opportunity scholarship award,
distributing opportunity scholarship awards, and achieving the maximum
possible rate of return on investment of the accounts in subsection (2)
of this section, while ensuring transparency in the investment
decisions and processes. Duties, exercised jointly with the
opportunity scholarship board, include soliciting funds and setting
annual fund-raising goals. The program administrator shall be paid an
administrative fee as determined by the opportunity scholarship board.
(2) With respect to the opportunity scholarship program, the
program administrator shall:
(a) Establish and manage two separate accounts into which to
receive grants and contributions from private sources as well as state
matching funds, and from which to disburse scholarship funds to
participants;
(b) Solicit and accept grants and contributions from private
sources, via direct payment, pledge agreement, or escrow account, of
private sources for deposit into one or both of the two accounts
created in this subsection (2)(b) in accordance with this subsection
(2)(b):
(i) The "scholarship account," whose principal may be invaded, and
from which scholarships must be disbursed beginning no later than
December 1, 2011, if, by that date, state matching funds in the amount
of five million dollars or more have been received. Thereafter,
scholarships shall be disbursed on an annual basis beginning no later
than May 1, 2012, and every May 1st thereafter;
(ii) The "endowment account," from which scholarship moneys may be
disbursed from earnings only in years when:
(A) The state match has been made into both the scholarship and the
endowment account;
(B) The state appropriations for the state need ((grant)) pay it
forward program under RCW 28B.92.010 meet or exceed state
appropriations for the state need grant made in the 2011-2013 biennium,
adjusted for inflation, and eligibility for state need pay it forward
grant contract recipients is at least seventy percent of state median
family income; and
(C) The state has demonstrated progress toward the goal of total
per-student funding levels, from state appropriations plus tuition and
fees, of at least the sixtieth percentile of total per-student funding
at similar public institutions of higher education in the global
challenge states, as defined, measured, and reported in RCW 28B.15.068.
In any year in which the office of financial management reports that
the state has not made progress toward this goal, no new scholarships
may be awarded. In any year in which the office of financial
management reports that the percentile of total per-student funding is
less than the sixtieth percentile and at least five percent less than
the prior year, pledges of future grants and contributions may, at the
request of the donor, be released and grants and contributions already
received refunded to the extent that opportunity scholarship awards
already made can be fulfilled from the funds remaining in the endowment
account; and
(iii) An amount equal to at least fifty percent of all grants and
contributions must be deposited into the scholarship account until such
time as twenty million dollars have been deposited into the account,
after which time the private donors may designate whether their
contributions must be deposited to the scholarship or the endowment
account. The opportunity scholarship board and the program
administrator must work to maximize private sector contributions to
both the scholarship account and the endowment account, to maintain a
robust scholarship program while simultaneously building the endowment,
and to determine the division between the two accounts in the case of
undesignated grants and contributions, taking into account the need for
a long-term funding mechanism and the short-term needs of families and
students in Washington. The first five million dollars in state match,
as provided in RCW 28B.145.040, shall be deposited into the scholarship
account and thereafter the state match shall be deposited into the two
accounts in equal proportion to the private funds deposited in each
account;
(c) Provide proof of receipt of grants and contributions from
private sources to the ((board)) student achievement council,
identifying the amounts received by name of private source and date,
and whether the amounts received were deposited into the scholarship or
the endowment account;
(d) In consultation with the ((higher education coordinating
board)) student achievement council and the state board for community
and technical colleges, make an assessment of the reasonable annual
eligible expenses associated with eligible education programs
identified by the opportunity scholarship board;
(e) Determine the dollar difference between tuition fees charged by
institutions of higher education in the 2008-09 academic year and the
academic year for which an opportunity scholarship is being
distributed;
(f) Develop and implement an application, selection, and
notification process for awarding opportunity scholarships;
(g) Determine the annual amount of the opportunity scholarship for
each selected participant. The annual amount shall be at least one
thousand dollars or the amount determined under (e) of this subsection,
but may be increased on an income-based, sliding scale basis up to the
amount necessary to cover all reasonable annual eligible expenses as
assessed pursuant to (d) of this subsection, or to encourage
participation in baccalaureate degree programs identified by the
opportunity scholarship board;
(h) Distribute scholarship funds to selected participants. Once
awarded, and to the extent funds are available for distribution, an
opportunity scholarship shall be automatically renewed until the
participant withdraws from or is no longer attending the program,
completes the program, or has taken the credit or clock hour equivalent
of one hundred twenty-five percent of the published length of time of
the participant's program, whichever occurs first, and as long as the
participant annually submits documentation of filing both a free
application for federal student aid and for available federal education
tax credits, including but not limited to the American opportunity tax
credit; and
(i) Notify institutions of scholarship recipients who will attend
their institutions and inform them of the terms of the students'
eligibility.
(3) With respect to the opportunity expansion program, the program
administrator shall:
(a) Assist the opportunity scholarship board in developing and
implementing an application, selection, and notification process for
making opportunity expansion awards; and
(b) Solicit and accept grants and contributions from private
sources for opportunity expansion awards.

Sec. 26 RCW 28C.18.166 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 242 are each
amended to read as follows:
On an annual basis, each opportunity internship consortium shall
provide the board with a list of the opportunity internship graduates
from the consortium. The board shall compile the lists from all
consortia and shall notify the office of student financial assistance
of the eligibility of each graduate on the lists to receive a state
need pay it forward grant contract under chapter 28B.92 RCW if the
graduate enrolls in a postsecondary program of study within one year of
high school graduation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 The following acts or parts of acts, as now
existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective July 1,
2025:
(1) RCW 28B.118.005 (Intent -- Finding) and 2007 c 405 s 1;
(2) RCW 28B.118.010 (Program design) and 2014 c ... s 16 (section
16 of this act), 2012 c 229 s 402, 2012 c 163 s 8, 2011 1st sp.s. c 11
s 226, 2008 c 321 s 9, & 2007 c 405 s 2;
(3) RCW 28B.118.020 (Duties of the office of the superintendent of
public instruction) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 227 & 2007 c 405 s 3;
(4) RCW 28B.118.030 (Duty of school districts -- Notification) and
2007 c 405 s 4;
(5) RCW 28B.118.040 (Duties of the office of student financial
assistance) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 228 & 2007 c 405 s 5; and
(6) RCW 28B.118.075 (Caseload estimate) and 2011 c 304 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 Sections 17 through 21 of this act are each
added to chapter 28B.118 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 Section 16 of this act takes effect July 1,
2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 Sections 1 through 15 and 17 through 26 of
this act take effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---