BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.119A.100 and 1991 c 304 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) The responsibility for ensuring that the citizens of this state
have a safe and reliable drinking water supply is shared between local
government and state government, and is the obligation of every public
water system;
(2) A rapid increase in the number of public water systems
supplying drinking water to the citizens of this state has
significantly increased the burden on both local and state government
to monitor and enforce compliance by these systems with state laws that
govern planning, design, construction, operation, maintenance,
financing, management, and emergency response;
(3) The federal safe drinking water act imposes on state and local
governments and the public water systems of this state significant new
responsibilities for monitoring, testing, and treating drinking water
supplies; and
(4) Existing drinking water programs at both the state and local
government level need additional authorities to enable them to more
comprehensively and systematically address the needs of the public
water systems of this state and assure that the public health and
safety of its citizens are protected.
Therefore, annual operating permit requirements shall be
established in accordance with this chapter. The operating permit
requirements shall be administered by the department and shall be used
as a means to assure that public water systems provide safe and
reliable drinking water to the public. The department and local
government shall conduct comprehensive and systematic evaluations to
assess the adequacy and financial viability of public water systems.
The department may impose permit conditions, requirements for system
improvements, and compliance schedules in order to carry out the
purpose of chapter 304, Laws of 1991. Wherever possible, the
department shall seek to enhance the potable water supply by
encouraging treatment of raw groundwater sources where they exceed
maximum contaminant levels.

--- END ---