BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.600.290 and 2012 c 229 s 801 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, the state board for
community and technical colleges, and the public baccalaureate
institutions shall jointly develop and each adopt rules governing the
college in the high school program. The association of Washington
school principals shall be consulted during the rules development. The
rules shall be written to encourage the maximum use of the program and
may not narrow or limit the enrollment options.
(2) College in the high school programs shall each be governed by
a local contract between the district and the institution of higher
education, in compliance with the guidelines adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction, the state board for community and
technical colleges, and the public baccalaureate institutions.
(3) The college in the high school program must include the
provisions in this subsection.
(a) The high school and institution of higher education together
shall define the criteria for student eligibility. The institution of
higher education may charge tuition fees to participating students.
(b) School districts shall report no student for more than one
full-time equivalent including college in the high school courses.
(c) The funds received by the institution of higher education may
not be deemed tuition or operating fees and may be retained by the
institution of higher education.
(d) Enrollment information on persons registered under this section
must be maintained by the institution of higher education separately
from other enrollment information and may not be included in official
enrollment reports, nor may such persons be considered in any
enrollment statistics that would affect higher education budgetary
determinations.
(e) A school district must grant high school credit to a student
enrolled in a program course if the student successfully completes the
course. If no comparable course is offered by the school district, the
school district superintendent shall determine how many credits to
award for the course. The determination shall be made in writing
before the student enrolls in the course. The credits shall be applied
toward graduation requirements and subject area requirements. Evidence
of successful completion of each program course shall be included in
the student's secondary school records and transcript.
(f) An institution of higher education must grant college credit to
a student enrolled in a program course if the student successfully
completes the course. The college credit shall be applied toward
general education requirements or major requirements. If no comparable
course is offered by the college, the institution of higher education
at which the teacher of the program course is employed shall determine
how many credits to award for the course and whether the course
fulfills general education or major requirements. Evidence of
successful completion of each program course must be included in the
student's college transcript.
(g) Tenth, eleventh, and twelfth grade students or students who
have not yet received a high school diploma or its equivalent and are
eligible to be in the tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grades may
participate in the college in the high school program.
(h) Participating school districts must provide general information
about the college in the high school program to all students in grades
((ten, eleven, and)) nine through twelve and to the parents and
guardians of those students.
(i) Full-time and part-time faculty at institutions of higher
education, including adjunct faculty, are eligible to teach program
courses.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning in RCW
28B.10.016 and also includes a public tribal college located in
Washington and accredited by the Northwest commission on colleges and
universities or another accrediting association recognized by the
United States department of education.
(b) "Program course" means a college course offered in a high
school under the college in the high school program.

--- END ---