BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The central Washington state fair is designated as the official
state fair of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act does not create any
rights or add to any existing right, nor does it operate to infringe
upon any existing name of any fair in the state. Section 1 of this act
may not be relied upon to compel the establishment or expansion of any
program, funding, or special entitlement.

--- END ---