BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Principles of accountability and transparency should guide all
agencies that are authorized by law to license businesses, grant or
withhold benefits, impose sanctions, investigate, audit, or otherwise
implement and enforce the statutes of the state of Washington.
(2) An agency should inform citizens, businesses, and project
proponents of their rights, responsibilities, and obligations with
respect to agency action.
(3) Citizens, businesses, and project proponents should be assured
the following rights:
(a) A right to expect state agencies to provide a prompt, accurate,
and courteous response to a request for information and to work
together to ensure ready access to the information needed to assist
businesses in their relationships with state government;
(b) A right to a clear, stable, and predictable regulatory and
recordkeeping environment with easily accessible information and
administrative rules in as clear and concise language as possible;
(c) A right to be treated equally and fairly, with reasonable
access to state services;
(d) A right to a timely response to an application for a permit,
license, registration, or approval necessary to operate a business;
(e) A right to renewal of permits, licenses, registrations, or
approvals, absent a specific reason for nonrenewal; and
(f) A right to a clear statement of reasons from the agency, if the
agency is denying an application for a license or permit.
(4) A citizen, business, or project proponent may file a complaint
with the office if the citizen, business owner, or project proponent
has reason to believe that one of the rights established in subsection
(3) of this section has been violated.
(5)(a) The office shall provide notice of the complaint to the
agency within ten days and take efforts to achieve a prompt and
courteous resolution of the complaint.
(b) If the complaint is not resolved within thirty days, the office
shall make written findings and provide them to the agency and to the
person who filed the complaint.
(c) In the event that an adjudicative proceeding under chapter
34.05 RCW is initiated, the agency shall include the written findings
prepared under (b) of this subsection as part of the agency record, as
required by RCW 34.05.476.
(6) If a person has standing under RCW 34.05.530 and has filed a
petition to obtain judicial review of agency action, documentation that
an agency has violated a right established in this section shall be
considered evidence that exhaustion of administrative remedies would be
futile, providing authority under RCW 34.05.534(3)(b) for the court to
relieve the petitioner of the requirement to exhaust administrative
remedies.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.42.040 and 2007 c 94 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office shall assist citizens, businesses, and project
proponents by maintaining and furnishing information, including, but
not limited to:
(a) To the extent possible, compiling and periodically updating one
or more handbooks containing lists and explanations of permit laws,
including all relevant local, state, federal, and tribal laws. In
providing this information, the office shall seek the cooperation of
relevant local, state, and federal agencies and tribal governments;
(b) Establishing and providing notice of a point of contact for
obtaining information;
(c) Working closely and cooperatively with business license centers
to provide efficient and nonduplicative service; and
(d) Developing a service center and a web site.
(2) The office shall coordinate among state agencies to develop an
office web site that is linked through the office of the governor's web
site and that contains information regarding permitting and regulatory
requirements for businesses and citizens in Washington state. At a
minimum, the web site shall provide information or links to information
on:
(a) Federal, state, and local rule-making processes and permitting
and regulatory requirements applicable to Washington businesses and
citizens;
(b) Federal, state, and local licenses, permits, and approvals
necessary to start and operate a business or develop real property in
Washington;
(c) State and local building codes;
(d) The process by which a citizen, business owner, or operator may
initiate a complaint that an agency has violated a right provided under
section 1 of this act;
(e) Federal, state, and local economic development programs that
may be available to businesses in Washington; and
(((e))) (f) State and local agencies regulating or providing
assistance to citizens and businesses operating a business or
developing real property in Washington.
(3) This section does not create an independent cause of action,
affect any existing cause of action, or create any new cause of action
regarding the application of regulatory or permit requirements.

Sec. 3 RCW 34.05.476 and 1988 c 288 s 423 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An agency shall maintain an official record of each
adjudicative proceeding under this chapter.
(2) The agency record shall include:
(a) Notices of all proceedings;
(b) Any prehearing order;
(c) Any motions, pleadings, briefs, petitions, requests, and
intermediate rulings;
(d) Evidence received or considered;
(e) A statement of matters officially noticed;
(f) Proffers of proof and objections and rulings thereon;
(g) Proposed findings, requested orders, and exceptions;
(h) The recording prepared for the presiding officer at the
hearing, together with any transcript of all or part of the hearing
considered before final disposition of the proceeding;
(i) Any final order, initial order, or order on reconsideration;
(j) Staff memoranda or data submitted to the presiding officer,
unless prepared and submitted by personal assistants and not
inconsistent with RCW 34.05.455; ((and))
(k) Any written findings prepared by the office of regulatory
assistance in response to a complaint filed under section 1 of this
act; and
(l) Matters placed on the record after an ex parte communication.
(3) Except to the extent that this chapter or another statute
provides otherwise, the agency record constitutes the exclusive basis
for agency action in adjudicative proceedings under this chapter and
for judicial review of adjudicative proceedings.

--- END ---