BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The director of the department of
agriculture must develop a proposed policy option or options for
achieving the goal of electronically reporting intrastate transfers of
ownership of livestock by producers as a means to increase
participation in the animal disease traceability program.
(2) The director of the department of agriculture must fulfill the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section in coordination with the
full range of stakeholders subject to brand inspections. At a minimum,
this must include soliciting participation from equine, bovine, and
other industry associations.
(3) The director of the department of agriculture, together with
invited stakeholders, must propose a system of animal disease
traceability that contains the following elements:
(a) Electronic transfer of data that individually identifies
animals;
(b) An outreach program to encourage participation in reporting;
(c) Random and report-driven inspections to ensure compliance; and
(d) Penalties for failure to report transfer of ownership.
(4) The electronic reporting system proposal developed under this
section must be a voluntary alternative to the use of traditional brand
inspections and may not preclude the use of the traditional brand
inspection as it currently exists.
(5) By November 1, 2014, the director of the department of
agriculture must issue a report to the legislature consistent with RCW
43.01.036 that contains implementation plans, recommendations, and any
necessary legislation related to the proposal required to be developed
under this section.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2015.

--- END ---