BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that increasing
educational attainment is vital to the well-being of Washingtonians and
critical to the health of the state's economy. Education opens doors
to gainful employment, higher wages, increased job benefits, improved
physical health, and increased civic engagement. Educated workers who
are capable of competing for high-demand jobs in today's global economy
sustain existing employers and attract new businesses. These
individuals with competitive higher education credentials directly
contribute to the state's economic growth and vitality.
(2) The legislature finds that workforce and labor market
projections estimate that by 2020 the vast majority of jobs in
Washington will require at least a high school diploma or equivalent
and seventy percent of those jobs will also require some postsecondary
education.
(3) The legislature finds that current levels of educational
attainment are inadequate to address the educational needs of the
state. In 2013, eighty-nine percent of Washington adults ages twenty-five to forty-four had a high school diploma or equivalent, and less
than fifty percent of Washington adults ages twenty-five to forty-four
have a postsecondary credential. Noting the prolonged impact of a
major economic recession, the legislature recognizes that the state's
higher education system must now prepare to expand degree and
certificate programs to meet the state's needs as reflected in the new
goals adopted in this act. Accordingly, the legislature finds that a
new strategy for achieving system growth, high quality, and increased
efficiency is needed to meet the goals recommended by the student
achievement council.
(4) The legislature finds seventy-four percent of families in
Washington have incomes below the level considered able to afford the
cost of attending a community college, and seventy-eight to eighty-two
percent of families have incomes below the level considered able to
afford one student attending a regional university or research
university, respectively. As the state reduced its support for
institutions of higher education, the cost of tuition has risen to be
over twenty percent of median household income for the state at its
research institutions, which is an obstacle to access. Therefore, the
legislature finds that it is vital for the student achievement council
to adopt a goal of what constitutes affordable tuition, recognizing
that tuition is often only half the cost of attending an institution of
higher education.
(5) The legislature notes that the primary mission of the student
achievement council is to propose to the governor and the legislature
goals for increasing educational attainment in Washington, including
recommending the resources necessary to achieve the goals and
monitoring progress toward meeting the goals.
(6) A fundamental principle of the state is that the cost of
tuition, where an individual resides in the state, and economic,
racial, or other status of an individual, should not be a barrier for
any resident to obtain a postsecondary certificate or degree from an
institution of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Following recommendations in the higher
education ten-year roadmap in RCW 28B.77.003 and 28B.77.020, the
legislature declares that the statewide educational attainment goals
required to meet the societal and economic needs of the future are as
follows:
(1) All adults in Washington ages twenty-five to forty-four will
have a high school diploma or equivalent by 2023;
(2) At least seventy percent of Washington adults ages twenty-five
to forty-four will have a postsecondary credential by 2023; and
(3) The cost of tuition, where an individual resides in the state,
economic status, race or ethnicity, or other status of an individual,
shall not be a barrier for any resident to obtain a postsecondary
certificate or degree from an institution of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 By December 1, 2014, the student achievement
council shall develop and adopt strategies that will enable the state
to achieve each of the goals in section 2 of this act and report back
to the governor and the legislature with specific recommendations for
those strategies that require legislation or specific appropriations,
including timelines and benchmarks towards achieving each goal. This
information shall be included in the strategic action plan required in
RCW 28B.77.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires July 1, 2016.

--- END ---