BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Master real estate plan" or "plan" means a plan of a public
agency for the timely use or disposal of vacant or otherwise
undeveloped properties that were obtained through transfers,
intergovernmental exchanges, gifts, foreclosures, or other nonpayment
methods.
(2) "Public agency" means:
(a) Any state board, commission, committee, department, educational
institution, or other state agency created by or pursuant to statute,
other than courts and the legislature; and
(b) Any county, city, school district, special purpose district, or
other municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By December 31, 2014, each public agency
that owns vacant or otherwise undeveloped property that was obtained
through transfers, intergovernmental exchanges, gifts, foreclosures, or
other nonpayment methods must develop a list of these properties, by
parcel number.
(2)(a) By July 1, 2015, the public agencies subject to subsection
(1) of this section must develop, adopt, and implement a master real
estate plan to use or dispose of the properties on the list. For each
property, the plan must:
(i) Identify the actual or estimated date of the property
acquisition. If the date of acquisition cannot be determined but is
evidenced to have occurred before January 1, 2003, the plan must note
that the property was acquired on an unknown date before January 1,
2003;
(ii) Describe the use or application of the property as of the date
of the list;
(iii) Include the dollar amount and year of the property tax
assessments for the three most recent years in which the land was
privately owned, if known; and
(iv) Include a detailed description of what the property is to be
used for and, if it is to be retained by the public agency, when it is
to be used.
(b) Except as provided otherwise by this subsection (2)(b), the
plan may not allow for a property owned by the public agency to be
vacant or otherwise undeveloped for five years beyond the adoption of
the plan for the specified property, or five years beyond the date the
property becomes property of the agency, whichever is later.
Properties used for environmental mitigation may, at the public
agency's discretion, be exempted from the five-year limits established
by this subsection (2)(b) and associated payment in lieu of tax
requirements established in section 4 of this act. A public agency
using the exemption authorized by this subsection (2)(b) must submit a
declaration of the exemption for the property, identifying the parcel
or parcels subject to the exemption and signed by the executive
director of the agency, to the applicable county assessor.
(3) The plan required by this section must be reviewed and, if
necessary, revised every two years. Public agencies that obtain vacant
or otherwise undeveloped properties through transfers,
intergovernmental exchanges, gifts, foreclosures, or other nonpayment
methods after the initial adoption of the agency's plan must, for each
property, comply with subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The master real estate plan required by
section 2 of this act must provide a specific use for each property
that is consistent with the authority and objectives of the public
agency. Except as provided otherwise by subsections (2) and (3) of
this section, if the property remains vacant or otherwise undeveloped
five years after the adoption of the plan, or five years after the date
the property becomes property of the public agency, whichever is later,
the public agency is responsible for payments on the property under
section 4 of this act.
(2) Properties used for environmental mitigation may, at the public
agency's discretion and in accordance with section 2 of this act, be
exempted from the five-year limits established by this section and
associated payment in lieu of tax requirements established in section
4 of this act.
(3)(a) A property subject to the requirements of this section and
section 2 of this act that was offered for public auction or sale by a
public agency during the prior year but that did not sell due to unique
characteristics of the property that make the sale and economic use of
the land infeasible, may be exempted from the five-year limits
established in this section and associated payment in lieu of tax
requirements established in section 4 of this act. An exemption under
this subsection (3)(a) may occur only if: The public agency petitions
the department for a waiver from the requirements of section 4 of this
act; and the department grants the waiver. A waiver must be granted by
the department under this section for a five-year term if the
department determines that the waiver request is consistent with the
provisions of this subsection (3)(a).
(b) For purposes of this subsection (3), "department" means the
department of revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By April 30th of the first year in which a payment is required
in accordance with section 3 of this act, and April 30th of each year
thereafter, a public agency must submit a payment in lieu of tax as
provided in this section. The payment applies to property included on
a master real estate plan if: (a) The property has been owned by the
public agency for at least five years as of January 1st of the current
year; and (b) the property has remained vacant or otherwise undeveloped
for at least five years while owned by the public agency. No payment
is due under this section for properties that have been exempted from
time limitations in accordance with section 3 (2) or (3) of this act.
(2) The amount of the payment is equal to the assessed value of the
property multiplied by the total state and local property tax rate that
would otherwise apply to the property if not for the exemption under
RCW 84.36.010.
(3) The payment under subsection (1) of this section must be
submitted to the county treasurer in which the property is located.
The treasurer must distribute the money to local jurisdictions within
which the property is located based on population, excluding the public
agency owning the property.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "master real estate plan" and
"public agency" have the same meanings as provided in section 1 of this
act.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.40.045 and 2013 c 235 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The assessor must give notice of any change in the true and
fair value of real property for the tract or lot of land and any
improvements thereon no later than thirty days after appraisal.
However, no such notice may be mailed during the period from January
15th to February 15th of each year. Furthermore, no notice need be
sent with respect to changes in valuation of publicly owned property
exempt from taxation under provisions of RCW 84.36.010 or of forest
land made pursuant to chapter 84.33 RCW.
(2) The notice must contain a statement of both the prior and the
new true and fair value, stating separately land and improvement
values, and a brief statement of the procedure for appeal to the board
of equalization and the time, date, and place of the meetings of the
board.
(3) The notice must be mailed by the assessor to the taxpayer.
(4) If any taxpayer, as shown by the tax rolls, holds solely a
security interest in the real property which is the subject of the
notice, pursuant to a mortgage, contract of sale, or deed of trust,
such taxpayer must, upon written request of the assessor, supply,
within thirty days of receipt of such request, to the assessor the name
and address of the person making payments pursuant to the mortgage,
contract of sale, or deed of trust, and thereafter such person must
also receive a copy of the notice provided for in this section.
Willful failure to comply with such request within the time limitation
provided for in this section makes such taxpayer subject to a maximum
civil penalty of five thousand dollars. The penalties provided for in
this section are recoverable in an action by the county prosecutor, and
when recovered must be deposited in the county current expense fund.
The assessor must make the request provided for by this section during
the month of January.
(5) A public agency subject to the payment under section 4 of this
act must notify the assessor. Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this
section, the assessor must provide notice to a public agency subject to
the payment under section 4 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.40.175 and 2013 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
At the time of making the assessment of real property, the assessor
must enter each description of property exempt under the provisions of
chapter 84.36 RCW, and value and list the same in the manner and
subject to the same rule as the assessor is required to assess all
other property, designating in each case to whom such property belongs.
The valuation requirements of this section do not apply to property
exempt from taxation under provisions of RCW 84.36.010, except for
property subject to the payment required under section 4 of this act.
However, when the exempt status of such property no longer applies as
a result of a sale or change in use, the assessor must value and list
such property as of the January 1st assessment date for the year of the
status change. The owner or person responsible for payment of taxes
may thereafter petition the county board of equalization for a change
in the assessed value in accordance with the timing and procedures set
forth in RCW 84.40.038.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 42 RCW.

--- END ---