BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.04.934 and 2013 c 290 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful to knowingly sell or offer for sale at wholesale
or retail any fresh, frozen, or processed salmon without identifying:
(a) Private sector cultured aquatic salmon or salmon products as
farm-raised salmon((, or identifying));
(b) Commercially caught salmon or salmon products as commercially
caught salmon; or
(c) Transgenic salmon or salmon products as transgenic.
(2) Identification of the products under subsection (1) of this
section must be made to the buyer at the point of sale such that the
buyer can make an informed purchasing decision for his or her
protection, health, and safety.
(3) A violation of this section constitutes misbranding under RCW
69.04.938 and is punishable as a misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor, or
felony depending on the fair market value of the fish or shellfish
involved in the violation.
(4) This section does not apply to salmon that is minced,
pulverized, coated with batter, or breaded.
(5) This section does not apply to a commercial fisher properly
licensed under chapter 77.65 RCW and lawfully engaged in the sale of
fish to a fish buyer.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes using additional descriptive
language or trade names to describe food fish or shellfish as long as
the labeling requirements of this section are met.

--- END ---