BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that
certified residential service and support providers delivering services
to individuals who live in their own homes have a distinct role that
differs in some respects from the role of providers delivering services
in facilities.
(2) The legislature intends for the department of social and health
services to undertake enforcement actions in a manner consistent with
the individual rights and choices of residential service and support
clients, and consistent with the principles identified in the
residential care standards. These standards, codified in regulation,
include the following core principles:
(a) Health and safety;
(b) Personal power and choice;
(c) Personal value and positive recognition by self and others;
(d) A range of experiences which help people participate in the
physical and social life of their communities;
(e) Good relationships with friends and relatives; and
(f) Competence to manage daily activities and pursue personal
goals.

Sec. 2 RCW 71A.12.270 and 2006 c 303 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The enforcement standards in this section apply to all
residential services and support providers.
(2) The department is authorized to take one or more of the
enforcement actions listed in subsection (((2))) (3) of this section
when the department finds that a provider of residential services and
support with whom the department entered into an agreement under this
chapter has:
(a) Failed or refused to comply with the health and safety-related
requirements of this chapter or chapter 74.34 RCW or the rules adopted
under ((it)) these chapters;
(b) Failed or refused to cooperate with the certification process;
(c) Prevented or interfered with a certification, inspection, or
investigation by the department;
(d) Failed to comply with any applicable requirements regarding
vulnerable adults under chapter 74.34 RCW; or
(e) Knowingly, or with reason to know, made a false statement of
material fact related to certification or contracting with the
department, or in any matter under investigation by the department.
(((2))) (3) The department may:
(a) Refuse to certify the provider;
(b) Decertify or refuse to renew the certification of a provider;
(((b))) (c) Impose conditions on a provider's certification status
such as a plan of correction within a specified time, training, and
limits on the type of client the provider may serve;
(((c))) (d) Suspend department referrals to the provider; ((or
(d))) (e) Suspend the provider from accepting clients with
specified needs by imposing a limited stop placement; or
(f) Require a provider to implement a plan of correction developed
by the department and to cooperate with subsequent monitoring of the
provider's progress. In the event a provider fails to implement the
plan of correction or fails to cooperate with subsequent monitoring or
a matter of serious concern, the department may impose civil penalties
of ((not more than)) up to one hundred ((fifty)) dollars per day per
violation((. Each day during which the same or similar action or
inaction occurs constitutes a separate violation)) from the date of the
citation and up to a maximum of three thousand dollars per violation.
(((3))) (4) When determining the appropriate enforcement action or
actions under subsection (((2))) (3) of this section, the department
must select actions commensurate with the seriousness of the harm or
threat of harm to the persons being served by the provider. Further,
the department may take enforcement actions that are more severe for
violations that are uncorrected, repeated, pervasive, or which present
a serious threat of harm to the health, safety, or welfare of persons
served by the provider. The department shall by rule develop criteria
for the selection and implementation of enforcement actions authorized
in subsection (((2))) (3) of this section. Rules adopted under this
section shall include a process for an informal review upon request by
a provider.
(((4))) (5) When the department orders stop placement or a limited
stop placement, the provider shall not accept any new clients until the
stop placement or limited stop placement order is terminated. A
limited stop placement may apply to clients with specific needs or a
specific site or sites where supported living services are administered
by the provider. The department shall terminate the stop placement or
limited stop placement when: (a) The violations necessitating the stop
placement or limited stop placement have been corrected; and (b) the
provider exhibits the capacity to maintain correction of the violations
previously found. However, if, upon revisiting the provider, the
department finds new violations that the department reasonably believes
will result in a new stop placement or new limited stop placement, the
previous stop placement or limited stop placement shall remain in
effect until the new stop placement or new limited stop placement is
imposed.
(6) After a department finding of a violation for which a stop
placement or limited stop placement has been imposed, the department
shall make an on-site revisit of the provider within fifteen working
days from the date the provider notifies the department of the
correction, to ensure correction of the violation. For violations that
are serious or recurring or uncorrected following a previous citation
and create actual or threatened harm to one or more clients' well-being, including violations of clients' rights, the department shall
make an on-site revisit as soon as appropriate to ensure correction of
the violation. Verification of correction of all other violations may
be made by either a department on-site revisit or by written or
photographic documentation found by the department to be credible.
This subsection does not prevent the department from enforcing
certification suspensions or revocations. Nothing in this subsection
interferes with or diminishes the department's authority and duty to
ensure that a provider adequately cares for clients, including making
departmental on-site revisits as needed to ensure that the provider
protects clients, and to enforce compliance with this chapter.
(7) The provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW apply to enforcement
actions under this section. The certified provider or its designee has
the right to an informal dispute resolution process to dispute any
violation found or enforcement remedy imposed by the department during
a certification inspection or complaint investigation. The purpose of
the informal dispute resolution process is to provide an opportunity
for an exchange of information that may lead to the modification,
deletion, or removal of a violation, or parts of a violation, or
enforcement remedy imposed by the department. Except for the
imposition of civil penalties, the effective date of enforcement
actions shall not be delayed or suspended pending any hearing or
informal review.
(((5))) (8) The enforcement actions and penalties authorized in
this section are not exclusive or exhaustive and nothing in this
section prohibits the department from taking any other action
authorized in statute or rule or under the terms of a contract with the
provider.
(9) A separate residential services and support account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from civil
penalties imposed under this section must be deposited into the
account. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures. The department shall use the special
account only for promoting the quality of life and care of clients
receiving care and services from the certified providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 71A.12.270 is recodified as a section in
chapter 71A.12 RCW, to be codified after RCW 71A.12.290.

--- END ---