BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that
this act foster the settlement or other resolution of tax disputes to
the extent possible and, in cases in which litigation is necessary, to
provide the people of this state with a fair, independent, prepayment
procedure to determine a dispute with tax administration agencies.
This act must be interpreted and construed to further this intent.

MEMBERSHIP OF THE BOARD
Sec. 2 RCW 82.03.020 and 1967 ex.s. c 26 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of tax appeals, hereinafter in chapter 26, Laws of
1967 ex. sess. referred to as the board, ((shall)) must consist of
three members ((qualified by experience and training in the field of
state and local taxation,)) appointed by the governor with the advice
and consent of the senate((, and no more than two of whom at the time
of appointment or during their terms shall be members of the same
political party)).
(2) No person may be appointed as a member of the board unless at
the time of appointment the individual has substantial knowledge of the
tax law and substantial experience making the record in a tax case
suitable for judicial review.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.03.030 and 1967 ex.s. c 26 s 32 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Members of the board ((shall)) must be appointed for a term of
six years and until their successors are appointed and have qualified.
In case of a vacancy, it ((shall)) must be filled by appointment by the
governor for the unexpired portion of the term in which said vacancy
occurs((: PROVIDED, That the terms of the first three members of the
board shall be staggered so that one member shall be appointed to serve
until March 1, 1969, one member until March 1, 1971, and one member
until March 1, 1973)).
(2) Whenever a member of the board is absent, disqualified, or for
any other reason unable to perform his or her duties, and it appears to
the governor that it is advisable that the services of an additional
member be provided, the governor may appoint a member, pro tempore of
the board. Any person appointed member pro tempore of the board must
have the qualifications set forth in RCW 82.03.020(2) and may not serve
for a term longer than one year. This appointment may be renewed once.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.03.050 and 2013 c 23 s 311 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board ((shall)) must operate on ((either a part-time or)) a
full-time basis((, as determined by the governor. If it is determined
that the board shall operate on a full-time basis, each member of the
board shall receive an annual salary to be determined by the governor.
If it is determined that the board shall operate on a part-time basis,
each member of the board shall receive compensation on the basis of
seventy-five dollars for each day spent in performance of his or her
duties, but such compensation shall not exceed ten thousand dollars in
a fiscal year)). Each member of the board must receive an annual
salary no less than that provided for superior court judges under RCW
2.08.092, which salary may not be diminished during the member's term
of appointment except to the extent such reduction applies to all
superior court judges. Each board member ((shall)) must receive
reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in the discharge of his or
her duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now
existing or hereafter amended.

LOCATION OF THE BOARD
Sec. 5 RCW 82.03.090 and 1967 ex.s. c 26 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The principal office of the board ((shall)) must be at the
state capital, but it may sit or hold hearings at any other place in
the state. The board must maintain at least one hearing office where
it regularly conducts hearings in both King and Spokane counties.
(2) A majority of the board ((shall)) constitutes a quorum for
making orders or decisions, promulgating rules and regulations
necessary for the conduct of its powers and duties, or transacting
other official business, and may act though one position on the board
be vacant. One or more members may hold hearings and take testimony to
be reported for action by the board when authorized by rule or order of
the board. The board ((shall)) must perform all the powers and duties
specified in this chapter or as otherwise provided by law.

FILING FEES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A party electing a formal hearing pursuant to RCW 82.03.140 or
82.03.190, must pay to the clerk of the board a fee in the amount of
two hundred fifty dollars within thirty days of filing a notice of
appeal or a notice of intent that the hearing be held pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) A party electing an informal hearing pursuant to RCW 82.03.140
or 82.03.190, must pay to the clerk of the board a fee in the amount of
fifty dollars within thirty days of filing a notice of appeal.
(3) The board may waive the fees provided for in subsections (1)
and (2) of this section upon affidavit by a party that the party is
unable to pay the fee due to financial hardship.
(4) If a party does not pay the fees provided for in subsections
(1) and (2) of this section or file an affidavit of financial hardship
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section within forty-five days of
filing a notice of appeal, the board must dismiss the case.
(a) The board must notify the party at least ten days in advance of
the deadline that it will dismiss the case unless the party pays the
fee or files an affidavit of financial hardship.
(b) If the board fails to notify the party in writing at least ten
days in advance of the forty-fifth day, the party will have ten days
from the date on which the board notifies the party in writing to pay
the fee or file an affidavit of financial hardship.
(5) If a party does not pay the fee provided for in subsection (1)
of this section or file an affidavit of financial hardship pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section within forty-five days of filing a
notice of intent that the hearing be held pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW, the notice must be considered untimely.
(a) The board must notify the party at least ten days in advance of
the deadline that it will not hear the case pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW unless the party pays the fee or files an affidavit of financial
hardship.
(b) If the board fails to notify the party in writing at least ten
days in advance of the forty-fifth day, the party will have ten days
from the date on which the board notifies the party in writing to pay
the fee or file an affidavit of financial hardship.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.08.130 and 1998 c 54 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any taxpayer or taxing unit feeling aggrieved by the action of
any county board of equalization may appeal to the board of tax appeals
by filing with the board of tax appeals in accordance with RCW 1.12.070
a notice of appeal within thirty days after the mailing of the decision
of such board of equalization, which notice ((shall)) must specify the
actions complained of; and in like manner any county assessor may
appeal to the board of tax appeals from any action of any county board
of equalization. ((There shall be no fee charged for the filing of an
appeal.)) The board ((shall)) must transmit a copy of the notice of
appeal to all named parties within thirty days of its receipt by the
board. Appeals ((which)) that are not filed as provided in this
section ((shall)) must be dismissed. The board of tax appeals
((shall)) must require the board appealed from to file a true and
correct copy of its decision in such action and all evidence taken in
connection therewith, and may receive further evidence, and ((shall))
must make such order as in its judgment is just and proper.
(2) The board of tax appeals may enter an order, pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section, that has effect up to the end of the
assessment cycle used by the assessor, if there has been no intervening
change in the value during that time.

STAY OF COLLECTION OF ASSESSMENTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board may stay collection of any assessment or additional
assessment of the department, or any part thereof, on petition of the
taxpayer.
(2) The board must establish rules governing the circumstances and
conditions under which collection will be stayed. The board may impose
interest on the amount of any assessment for which collection is
stayed.
(3) Interest imposed under this section is in addition to the
interest imposed under other provisions of law. The interest rate may
be adjusted on the first day of January of each year.
(4) The board must adopt the rules required by subsection (2) of
this section no later than December 1, 2014.

AWARD OF FEES AND COSTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In a formal hearing, the board must award fees and other
expenses to the prevailing party, including reasonable attorneys' fees,
unless the board finds that (a) both parties prevailed on significant
issues, or (b) the circumstances of the appeal make an award unjust.
A party seeking review must be considered a prevailing party if the
party obtained relief on a significant issue that achieves some benefit
that the party sought. A party opposing review must be considered the
prevailing party if the board affirms the determination, order, or
decision under review on a significant issue.
(2) The amount awarded to a prevailing party under subsection (1)
of this section may not exceed fifty thousand dollars. If two or more
prevailing parties join in an action, the award in total may not exceed
fifty thousand dollars.
(3) The amount awarded to a prevailing party under subsection (1)
of this section may not exceed five hundred dollars if:
(a) The opposing party is a qualified party under RCW 4.84.340(5);
or
(b) The prevailing party elected to convert an informal hearing to
a formal hearing pursuant to RCW 82.03.140 or 82.03.190.
(4) The board, in its discretion, may reduce the amount to be
awarded pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, or deny any award,
to the extent that a prevailing party during the course of the
proceedings engaged in conduct that unduly or unreasonably protracted
the final resolution of the matter in controversy.
(5) For purposes of this section, "fees and other expenses"
includes the reasonable expenses of expert witnesses, the reasonable
cost of a study, analysis, appraisal report, test, or project that is
found by the board to be necessary for the preparation of the party's
case, and reasonable attorneys' fees. Reasonable attorneys' fees must
be based on the prevailing market rates for the kind and quality of
services furnished, except that:
(a) No expert witness may be compensated at a rate in excess of the
highest rates of compensation for expert witnesses paid by the state of
Washington; and
(b) Attorneys' fees may not be awarded in excess of two hundred
fifty dollars per hour unless the board determines that an increase in
the cost of living or a special factor, such as the limited
availability of qualified attorneys for the proceedings involved,
justifies a higher fee.

MEDIATION CONFERENCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 82.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board must establish practices and procedures for
conducting mediation conferences between parties. The board must adopt
rules establishing the practices and procedures for conducting
mediation conferences by December 1, 2014.
(2) A party may request a mediation conference at any time up to
thirty days before the hearing.
(3) The board may not make mediation conferences mandatory.
(4) The mediation conference must be conducted by a tax referee who
will not participate in the hearing.
(5) The board must establish a fee schedule for conducting
mediations under subsection (1) of this section by December 1, 2014.
The fee schedule must be updated at least every two years to recoup at
least sixty percent of the anticipated cost of conducting mediations
under subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 82.03 RCW
to read as follows:
Any taxpayer having filed a petition for correction of assessment
under RCW 82.32.160 or a refund petition under RCW 82.32.170, may
request a mediation conference to be held by a tax referee under
section 10 of this act.

DIRECT REVIEW BY COURT OF APPEALS
Sec. 12 RCW 34.05.518 and 2010 c 211 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The final decision of an administrative agency in an
adjudicative proceeding under this chapter may((, except as otherwise
provided in chapter 43.21L RCW,)) be directly reviewed by the court of
appeals ((either)):
(a) Upon certification by the superior court pursuant to this
section ((or));
(b) If the final decision is from an environmental board as defined
in subsection (((3))) (4) of this section, upon acceptance by the court
of appeals after a certificate of appealability has been filed by the
environmental board that rendered the final decision; or
(c) If the final decision is from the board of tax appeals, upon
acceptance by the court of appeals after a certificate of appealability
has been filed by the board of tax appeals.
(2) For direct review upon certification by the superior court, an
application for direct review must be filed with the superior court
within thirty days of the filing of the petition for review in superior
court. The superior court may certify a case for direct review only if
the judicial review is limited to the record of the agency proceeding
and the court finds that:
(a) Fundamental and urgent issues affecting the future
administrative process or the public interest are involved which
require a prompt determination;
(b) Delay in obtaining a final and prompt determination of such
issues would be detrimental to any party or the public interest;
(c) An appeal to the court of appeals would be likely regardless of
the determination in superior court; and
(d) The appellate court's determination in the proceeding would
have significant precedential value.
(3) Procedures for certification ((shall)) under this section must
be established by court rule.
(((3))) (4)(a) For the purposes of direct review of final decisions
of environmental boards, environmental boards include those boards
identified in RCW 43.21B.005 and the growth management hearings board
as identified in RCW 36.70A.250.
(b) An environmental board may issue a certificate of appealability
if it finds that delay in obtaining a final and prompt determination of
the issues would be detrimental to any party or the public interest and
either:
(i) Fundamental and urgent statewide or regional issues are raised;
or
(ii) The proceeding is likely to have significant precedential
value.
(((4))) (5) The environmental board ((shall)) must state in the
certificate of appealability which criteria it applied, explain how
that criteria was met, and file with the certificate a copy of the
final decision.
(((5))) (6) For purposes of direct review of final decisions of the
board of tax appeals, the board of tax appeals must issue a certificate
of appealability, unless it finds that:
(a) The proceeding is unlikely to have significant precedential
value; or
(b) Direct review by the court of appeals would be detrimental to
any party or the public interest.
(7) If the board of tax appeals denies a request for a certificate
of appealability, it must state in its denial which criteria it applied
and explain how that criteria supported its decision to deny the
request.
(8) For an appellate court to accept direct review of a final
decision of an environmental board, it ((shall)) must consider the same
criteria outlined in subsection (((3))) (4) of this section((, except
as otherwise provided in chapter 43.21L RCW)).
(((6))) (9) For an appellate court to accept direct review of a
final decision of the board of tax appeals, it must consider the same
criteria outlined in subsection (5) of this section.
(10) The procedures for direct review of final decisions of
environmental boards or the board of tax appeals include:
(a) Within thirty days after filing the petition for review with
the superior court, a party may file an application for direct review
with the superior court and serve the board of tax appeals or the
appropriate environmental board and all parties of record. The
application ((shall)) must request that the board of tax appeals or the
environmental board ((to)) file a certificate of appealability.
(b) If an issue on review is the jurisdiction of the environmental
board or the board of tax appeals, the board with jurisdiction may file
an application for direct review on that issue.
(c) The environmental board ((shall have)) or the board of tax
appeals has thirty days to grant or deny the request for a certificate
of appealability and its decision ((shall)) must be filed with the
superior court and served on all parties of record.
(d) If a certificate of appealability is issued, the parties
((shall)) must have fifteen days from the date of service to file a
notice of discretionary review in the superior court, and the notice
((shall)) must include a copy of the certificate of appealability and
a copy of the final decision.
(e) If the appellate court accepts review, the certificate of
appealability ((shall)) must be transmitted to the court of appeals as
part of the certified record.
(f) If a certificate of appealability is denied, review ((shall))
must be by the superior court. The superior court's decision may be
appealed to the court of appeals.

--- END ---