BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.50.608 and 1989 c 271 s 601 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state of Washington fully occupies and preempts the entire
field of the regulation of controlled substances under this chapter and
setting penalties for violations of the controlled substances act.
This preemption also includes, but is not limited to, statutory
provisions pertaining to licensing, marketing, taxation, production,
processing, and retail sale of marijuana.
(2) Cities, towns, and counties or other municipalities may enact
only those laws and ordinances relating to controlled substances that
are consistent with this chapter. Such local ordinances shall have the
same penalties, rules, and requirements as provided for by state law.
Local laws and ordinances that are inconsistent with the requirements
of state law, or that in any way have the effect of interfering with
the development, implementation, or maintenance of a state regulated
market regarding the production, processing, possession, or use of
legal marijuana, shall not be enacted and are preempted and
((repealed)) unenforceable, regardless of the nature of the code,
charter, or home rule status of the city, town, county, or
municipality.

--- END ---