BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to create a
WorkFirst reform program to allow investment in strategies that move
families to self-sufficiency. The legislature finds that the WorkFirst
temporary assistance for needy families program has been redesigned in
response to legislative direction enacted in chapter 273, Laws of 2010
(Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 3141) and chapter 42, Laws
of 2011 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5921). A state program
is needed to invest in these efforts to fully realize these reforms
without interference from the federal government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall operate a
WorkFirst reform program.
(2) The WorkFirst reform program may provide assistance to
individuals who meet the eligibility requirements of the temporary
assistance for needy families program. Assistance provided through the
WorkFirst reform program must reinforce a recipient's individual
responsibility plan as provided in RCW 74.08A.260(2). This program
must operate in addition to the WorkFirst temporary assistance for
needy families program with the purpose of allowing the state to move
families toward self-sufficiency.
(3) The department of social and health services shall operate the
program within amounts appropriated by the legislature and consistent
with the redesign of the WorkFirst program, including the following
goals:
(a) Stable and successful employment;
(b) Supporting activities that matter, not those that count;
(c) Meaningful engagement of families;
(d) Family centered case planning and engagement;
(e) Parental responsibility in child development; and
(f) Assisting families in transition on the pathway to self-sufficiency.
(4) The department of social and health services shall partner with
the department of commerce, the department of early learning, the
employment security department, the office of financial management, and
the state board for community and technical colleges to carry out the
program.
(5) The WorkFirst reform program may not provide assistance to
individuals in a manner that favors federal participation over support
for individual responsibility plans.
(6) The department of social and health services must provide an
annual report to the legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight task
force established in RCW 74.08A.260(8) by December 1st, which must
include:
(a) A description of the number of recipients who have achieved
self-sufficiency through assistance from the WorkFirst reform program;
(b) A description of how assistance provided through the WorkFirst
reform program has allowed recipients to meet the goals of their
individual responsibility plans as provided in RCW 74.08A.260(2); and
(c) A description of how assistance provided through the WorkFirst
reform program has allowed recipients to meet the goals established in
subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.08A.260 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 42 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Each recipient shall be assessed after determination of program
eligibility and before referral to job search. Assessments shall be
based upon factors that are critical to obtaining employment, including
but not limited to education, availability of child care, history of
family violence, history of substance abuse, and other factors that
affect the ability to obtain employment. Assessments may be performed
by the department or by a contracted entity. The assessment shall be
based on a uniform, consistent, transferable format that will be
accepted by all agencies and organizations serving the recipient.
(2) Based on the assessment, an individual responsibility plan
shall be prepared that: (a) Sets forth an employment goal and a plan
for maximizing the recipient's success at meeting the employment goal;
(b) considers WorkFirst educational and training programs from which
the recipient could benefit; (c) contains the obligation of the
recipient to participate in the program by complying with the plan; (d)
moves the recipient into full-time WorkFirst activities as quickly as
possible; and (e) describes the services available to the recipient
either during or after WorkFirst to enable the recipient to obtain and
keep employment and to advance in the workplace and increase the
recipient's wage earning potential over time.
(3) Recipients who are not engaged in work and work activities, and
do not qualify for a good cause exemption under RCW 74.08A.270, shall
engage in self-directed service as provided in RCW 74.08A.330.
(4) If a recipient refuses to engage in work and work activities
required by the department, the family's grant shall be reduced by the
recipient's share, and may, if the department determines it
appropriate, be terminated.
(5) The department may waive the penalties required under
subsection (4) of this section, subject to a finding that the recipient
refused to engage in work for good cause provided in RCW 74.08A.270.
(6) In consultation with the recipient, the department or
contractor shall place the recipient into a work activity that is
available in the local area where the recipient resides.
(7) Assessments conducted under this section shall include a
consideration of the potential benefit to the recipient of engaging in
financial literacy activities. The department shall consider the
options for financial literacy activities available in the community,
including information and resources available through the financial
education public-private partnership created under RCW 28A.300.450.
The department may authorize up to ten hours of financial literacy
activities as a core activity or an optional activity under WorkFirst.
(8)(a) From July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2012, subsections (2)
through (6) of this section are suspended for a recipient who is a
parent or other relative personally providing care for one child under
the age of two years, or two or more children under the age of six
years. This suspension applies to both one and two parent families.
However, both parents in a two-parent family cannot use the suspension
during the same month. Beginning July 1, 2012, the department shall
phase in the work activity requirements that were suspended, beginning
with those recipients closest to reaching the sixty-month limit of
receiving temporary assistance for needy families under RCW
74.08A.010(1). The phase in shall be accomplished so that a fairly
equal number of recipients required to participate in work activities
are returned to those activities each month until the total number
required to participate is participating by June 30, 2013. Nothing in
this subsection shall prevent a recipient from participating in the
WorkFirst program on a voluntary basis. Recipients who participate in
the WorkFirst program on a voluntary basis shall be provided an option
to participate in the program on a part-time basis, consisting of
sixteen or fewer hours of activities per week. Recipients also may
participate voluntarily on a full-time basis.
(b)(i) The period of suspension of work activities under this
subsection provides an opportunity for the legislative and executive
branches to oversee redesign of the WorkFirst program. To realize this
opportunity, both during the period of suspension and following
reinstatement of work activity requirements as redesign is being
implemented, a legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight task force is
established, with members as provided in this subsection (8)(b).
(ii) The president of the senate shall appoint two members from
each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(iii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two
members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(iv) The governor shall appoint members representing the department
of social and health services, the department of early learning, the
department of commerce, the employment security department, the office
of financial management, and the state board for community and
technical colleges.
(v) The task force shall choose cochairs, one from among the
legislative members and one from among the executive branch members.
The legislative members shall convene the initial meeting of the task
force.
(c) The task force shall:
(i) Oversee the partner agencies' implementation of the redesign of
the WorkFirst program and operation of the temporary assistance for
needy families program to ensure that the programs are achieving
desired outcomes for their clients;
(ii) Determine evidence-based outcome measures for the WorkFirst
program, including measures related to equitably serving the needs of
historically underrepresented populations, such as English language
learners, immigrants, refugees, and other diverse communities;
(iii) Develop accountability measures for WorkFirst recipients and
the state agencies responsible for their progress toward self-sufficiency;
(iv) Oversee implementation of the WorkFirst reform as provided in
section 2 of this act to ensure that the program is achieving its
goals;
(v) Make recommendations to the governor and the legislature
regarding:
(A) Policies to improve the effectiveness of the WorkFirst program
over time;
(B) Early identification of those recipients most likely to
experience long stays on the program and strategies to improve their
ability to achieve progress toward self-sufficiency; and
(C) Necessary changes to the program, including taking into account
federal changes to the temporary assistance for needy families program.
(d) The partner agencies must provide the task force with regular
reports on:
(i) The partner agencies' progress toward meeting the outcome and
performance measures established under (c) of this subsection;
(ii) Caseload trends and program expenditures, and the impact of
those trends and expenditures on client services, including services to
historically underrepresented populations; and
(iii) The characteristics of families who have been unsuccessful on
the program and have lost their benefits either through sanction or the
sixty-month time limit.
(e) Staff support for the task force must be provided by senate
committee services, the house of representatives office of program
research, and the state agency members of the task force.
(f) The task force shall meet on a quarterly basis beginning
September 2011, or as determined necessary by the task force cochairs.
(g) During its tenure, the state agency members of the task force
shall respond in a timely manner to data requests from the cochairs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of twelve million dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2015, from the general fund to the WorkFirst reform
program for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---