BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.70.350 and 1994 c 83 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall collect from each charter party carrier
and excursion service carrier holding a certificate issued pursuant to
this chapter and from each interstate or foreign carrier subject to
this chapter an annual regulatory fee, to be established by the
commission but which in total shall not exceed the cost of supervising
and regulating such carriers, for each bus used by such carrier.
(2) ((All)) The fee((s)) prescribed by this section shall be due
and payable on or before ((December 31)) May 1st of each year, to cover
operations during the ((ensuing)) calendar year ((beginning February
1)) in which the fee is paid.
(3) Any payment of the fee imposed by this section made after its
due date shall include a late fee of two percent of the amount due.
Delinquent fees shall accrue interest at the rate of one percent per
month.

--- END ---