BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) For the first time in our country's history, children and youth
across the country are predicted to have shorter lives than their
parents. In order to ensure the next generation is the healthiest ever
we need to ensure children and youth have a healthy weight, enjoy
active lives, eat well, live in safe and stable homes, and have less
contact with environmental toxins. Every child deserves to grow up
healthy and enjoy the beauty and benefits of Washington state. The
most effective and efficient way to ensure a healthy Washingtonian is
to start as early in life as possible. Healthy children are more
likely to become healthy adults.
(2) Helping children become healthier is a multistate agency and
multisector issue. Much work is underway among state agencies, in
health care, early learning, schools, and among many other sectors and
organizations across the state, but more needs to be done and the work
is not as coordinated as it should be. The legislature therefore
intends to establish a governor's council to coordinate immediate steps
and consider future strategy to help children be more active and
healthy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The governor's council for the
healthiest next generation is established to:
(a) Identify policy-related action plans and funding
recommendations based on data, best practices, and expert opinion that
protect children's health and support community-level changes;
(b) Measure and complete a comprehensive coordinated project with
private and public organizations that have work underway;
(c) Guide and inform activities; and
(d) Consider innovative incentives that have been demonstrated to
work to help children be more active and healthy.
(2) The council must include the following members:
(a) The governor, or designee, shall serve as chair of the council;
(b) The chairs of the legislative health and education committees;
(c) Agency heads of the department of health, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the department of early learning,
the health care authority, the department of agriculture, the
department of transportation, and the department of social and health
services; and
(d) Local and state community and business leaders appointed by the
governor.
(3)(a) The council may create advisory committees on an ad hoc
basis for the purpose of:
(i) Obtaining input and supporting working relationships with
nutrition and physical activity experts and practitioners, parent and
student associations, school and child care administrators and faculty,
business, and established stakeholder organizations; and
(ii) Informing the council's research, policy, and funding
recommendations.
(b) The council shall maintain a contact list of ad hoc advisory
committees to provide stakeholders with a statement of desired outcomes
and with notices regarding the purposes of ad hoc advisory committees,
timelines for planned work, and means for participation.
(4) The governor's council shall oversee the work of the strategic
work group that includes the existing efforts from and representation
by the department of health, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, and the department of early learning. Members must also
include representation from local public health and others with
expertise in nutrition and physical activity. The strategic work group
shall provide expertise and collaborate across the following high-impact focus areas to prevent childhood obesity:
(a) Breastfeeding-friendly environments;
(b) Healthy early learning environments; and
(c) Healthy school environments.
(5) The strategic work group shall take the following immediate
actions to improve children's health:
(a) Support comprehensive breastfeeding policies;
(b) Use existing toolkits for early learning professionals,
including child care providers and early childhood education and
assistance contractors, that provide recommended strategies to ensure
all children are active, are eating healthy food, and have access to
drinking water. The toolkits must be made available on department of
early learning's web site;
(c) Create a mentoring program to support child care providers in
early learning facilities and school staff in implementing the toolkits
and recommended strategies in this chapter;
(d) Use research and best practices to enhance the performance
standards for the early childhood education and assistance program
described in chapter 43.215 RCW to include best practice standards on:
(i) Healthy eating and physical activity;
(ii) Nutrition education activities in written curriculum plans;
and
(iii) The incorporation of healthy eating, physical activity, and
screen time education into parent education suggested topics;
(e) Revise statewide guidelines for quality health and fitness
education in schools;
(f) Consider childhood obesity prevention research and best
practices for state agencies to consider when revising rules concerning
children's health outcomes; and
(g) Identify and support other cross-collaboration opportunities
between state agencies and other private and public organizations.
(6) The governor shall discontinue the council upon a determination
of reduced need or resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The strategic work group established in
section 2 of this act shall submit its recommendations to ensure better
children's health in a report to the governor, the governor's council,
and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2014.
The report must include the following:
(1) A summary of the impacts of childhood obesity on short and
long-term health outcomes, health care and other costs, and academic
achievement in early learning, and school settings;
(2) Opportunities for partnerships and multisector collaboration;
(3) An identification, description, and gap analysis of state and
local government and community-based programs to prevent childhood
obesity. The identification, description, and gap analysis must use
expertise from the governor's council and include cross-agency efforts
and analysis such as:
(a) Environmental factors;
(b) Safe streets;
(c) Access to drinking water; and
(d) Consideration of family and population differences;
(4) An assessment of the feasibility, benefits, and challenges of
the strategies in each of the high impact focus areas identified in
section 2 of this act;
(5) An identification of additional policy and funding
recommendations that include a range of actionable items for
consideration by the legislature, including innovative programs to
increase physical fitness in schools, healthy food choices, and tobacco
and substance use cessation and prevention;
(6) Additional action steps and outcomes to reduce childhood
obesity, including a focus on reducing health disparities in specific
population groups; and
(7) Costs and resources required to implement the strategies
identified by the strategic work group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The council and the strategic work group
established in section 2 of this act shall collaborate to identify
shared goals and benchmarks such as:
(1) Increase the percentage of infants who continue to breastfeed
for at least six months;
(2) Increase percentage of children ages two through four with a
healthy weight; and
(3) Increase the percentage of tenth graders with a healthy weight.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---