BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.80.040 and 2003 c 351 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each regional transportation planning organization shall create a
transportation policy board. Transportation policy boards shall
provide policy advice to the regional transportation planning
organization and shall allow representatives of major employers within
the region, the department of transportation, transit districts, port
districts, and member cities, towns, and counties within the region to
participate in policy making. Any members of the house of
representatives or the state senate whose districts are wholly or
partly within the boundaries of the regional transportation planning
organization are considered ((ex officio, nonvoting)) voting policy
board members of the regional transportation planning organization.
((This does not preclude legislators from becoming full-time, voting
board members.))

--- END ---