BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that the
burden of higher education costs at public institutions of higher
education has shifted significantly from the state to students since
2008, due to the decline in the proportion of costs supported by state
funding compared to tuition.
(2) The legislature further recognizes that students and the public
would benefit from access to information on higher education revenues
and expenditures and that this information would provide greater
transparency in the higher education system.
(3) The legislature intends to establish a means for providing
easily accessible information on revenues and expenditures of the
state's public institutions of higher education to students and the
public through a web site maintained by a state agency and with links
to this web site prominently displayed on the web site of each public
institution of higher education.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.41.400 and 2012 c 229 s 585 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An education data center shall be established in the office of
financial management. The education data center shall jointly, with
the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
conduct collaborative analyses of early learning, K-12, and higher
education programs and education issues across the P-20 system, which
includes the department of early learning, the superintendent of public
instruction, the professional educator standards board, the state board
of education, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
workforce training and education coordinating board, the student
achievement council, public and private nonprofit four-year
institutions of higher education, and the employment security
department. The education data center shall conduct collaborative
analyses under this section with the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee and provide data electronically to the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, to the
extent permitted by state and federal confidentiality requirements.
The education data center shall be considered an authorized
representative of the state educational agencies in this section under
applicable federal and state statutes for purposes of accessing and
compiling student record data for research purposes.
(2) The education data center shall:
(a) In consultation with the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee and the agencies and organizations
participating in the education data center, identify the critical
research and policy questions that are intended to be addressed by the
education data center and the data needed to address the questions;
(b) Coordinate with other state education agencies to compile and
analyze education data, including data on student demographics that is
disaggregated by distinct ethnic categories within racial subgroups,
and complete P-20 research projects;
(c) Collaborate with the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee and the education and fiscal committees of the
legislature in identifying the data to be compiled and analyzed to
ensure that legislative interests are served;
(d) Annually provide to the K-12 data governance group a list of
data elements and data quality improvements that are necessary to
answer the research and policy questions identified by the education
data center and have been identified by the legislative committees in
(c) of this subsection. Within three months of receiving the list, the
K-12 data governance group shall develop and transmit to the education
data center a feasibility analysis of obtaining or improving the data,
including the steps required, estimated time frame, and the financial
and other resources that would be required. Based on the analysis, the
education data center shall submit, if necessary, a recommendation to
the legislature regarding any statutory changes or resources that would
be needed to collect or improve the data;
(e) Monitor and evaluate the education data collection systems of
the organizations and agencies represented in the education data center
ensuring that data systems are flexible, able to adapt to evolving
needs for information, and to the extent feasible and necessary,
include data that are needed to conduct the analyses and provide
answers to the research and policy questions identified in (a) of this
subsection;
(f) Track enrollment and outcomes through the public centralized
higher education enrollment system;
(g) Assist other state educational agencies' collaborative efforts
to develop a long-range enrollment plan for higher education including
estimates to meet demographic and workforce needs;
(h) Provide research that focuses on student transitions within and
among the early learning, K-12, and higher education sectors in the P-20 system; and
(i) Make recommendations to the legislature as necessary to help
ensure the goals and objectives of this section and RCW 28A.655.210 and
28A.300.507 are met.
(3) The department of early learning, superintendent of public
instruction, professional educator standards board, state board of
education, state board for community and technical colleges, workforce
training and education coordinating board, student achievement council,
public four-year institutions of higher education, and employment
security department shall work with the education data center to
develop data-sharing and research agreements, consistent with
applicable security and confidentiality requirements, to facilitate the
work of the center. Private, nonprofit institutions of higher
education that provide programs of education beyond the high school
level leading at least to the baccalaureate degree and are accredited
by the Northwest association of schools and colleges or their peer
accreditation bodies may also develop data-sharing and research
agreements with the education data center, consistent with applicable
security and confidentiality requirements. The education data center
shall make data from collaborative analyses available to the education
agencies and institutions that contribute data to the education data
center to the extent allowed by federal and state security and
confidentiality requirements applicable to the data of each
contributing agency or institution.
(4)(a) By January 1, 2015, the education data center shall include
easily accessible information on revenues and expenditures for each
institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 on the
higher education dashboard established in RCW 28B.77.090.
(b) In maintaining revenue and expenditure information, the
education data center shall:
(i) Ensure the web site is easily accessed by students and the
public;
(ii) Ensure data is collected and displayed in accordance with laws
relating to confidentiality and public records in chapter 42.56 RCW;
(iii) Wherever possible, use data from existing data sources
including the higher education revenue and expenditure data of the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee for the
purposes of RCW 44.48.150, data submitted to the office of financial
management for budget and accounting purposes, and data collected by
the state board for community and technical colleges and the
institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016;
(iv) Include historical data to allow year-to-year comparisons;
(v) Analyze and display the data in order to communicate the
relative size of revenues and expenditures for each institution of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 in an easily accessible
and understandable format;
(vi) Provide basic enrollment information for each institution of
higher education for context; and
(vii) Update the web site each year.
(c) Each institution of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.10.016 and the state board for community and technical colleges, to
the extent possible and subject to laws relating to confidentiality,
using existing data sources and system applications, shall prominently
display on their institutional web sites a link to the education data
center's data dashboard.

--- END ---