BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.27.100 and 2011 c 336 s 475 and 2011 c 171 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 18.27.065 for partnerships and joint
ventures, no person who has registered under one name as provided in
this chapter shall engage in the business, or act in the capacity, of
a contractor under any other name unless such name also is registered
under this chapter.
(2) All advertising and all contracts, correspondence, cards,
signs, posters, papers, and documents which show a contractor's name or
address shall show the contractor's name or address as registered under
this chapter.
(3)(a) All advertising that shows the contractor's name or address
shall show the contractor's current registration number. The
registration number may be omitted in an alphabetized listing of
registered contractors stating only the name, address, and telephone
number((: PROVIDED, That signs on motor vehicles subject to RCW
46.16A.030 and)). On-premise signs shall not constitute advertising as
provided in this section. All materials used to directly solicit
business from retail customers who are not businesses shall show the
contractor's current registration number. A contractor shall not use
a false or expired registration number in purchasing or offering to
purchase an advertisement for which a contractor registration number is
required. Advertising by airwave transmission shall not be subject to
this subsection (3)(a).
(b) The director may issue a subpoena to any person or entity
selling any advertising subject to this section for the name, address,
and telephone number provided to the seller of the advertising by the
purchaser of the advertising. The subpoena must have enclosed a
stamped, self-addressed envelope and blank form to be filled out by the
seller of the advertising. If the seller of the advertising has the
information on file, the seller shall, within a reasonable time, return
the completed form to the department. The subpoena must be issued no
more than two days after the expiration of the issue or publication
containing the advertising or after the broadcast of the advertising.
The good-faith compliance by a seller of advertising with a written
request of the department for information concerning the purchaser of
advertising shall constitute a complete defense to any civil or
criminal action brought against the seller of advertising arising from
such compliance. Advertising by airwave or electronic transmission is
subject to this subsection (3)(b).
(4) No contractor shall advertise that he or she is bonded and
insured because of the bond required to be filed and sufficiency of
insurance as provided in this chapter.
(5) A contractor shall not falsify a registration number and use
it, or use an expired registration number, in connection with any
solicitation or identification as a contractor. All individual
contractors and all partners, associates, agents, salespersons,
solicitors, officers, and employees of contractors shall use their true
names and addresses at all times while engaged in the business or
capacity of a contractor or activities related thereto.
(6) Any advertising by a person, firm, or corporation soliciting
work as a contractor when that person, firm, or corporation is not
registered pursuant to this chapter is a violation of this chapter.
(7) An applicant or registrant who falsifies information on an
application for registration commits a violation under this section.
(8)(a) The finding of a violation of this section by the director
at a hearing held in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act,
chapter 34.05 RCW, shall subject the person committing the violation to
a penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars as determined by the
director.
(b) Penalties under this section shall not apply to a violation
determined to be an inadvertent error.

--- END ---