BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds the following:
(a) Climatic conditions affect the property, economy, natural
resources, environment, and the lives of the citizens of the state of
Washington, including agriculture, wine making, tourism, skiing,
recreational and commercial fishing, forestry, hydropower generation,
public health and safety, and the durability and performance of
infrastructure and the built environment, and are therefore of
importance to the state's workers, consumers, businesses, industries,
and residents.
(b) Washington has experienced ongoing variations in climate and
extreme weather events that cause droughts and floods, and affect
natural hazards, resource availability, public safety, and diverse
economic sectors. These variations and associated impacts are expected
to continue in the future.
(c) In addition to ongoing climate variability, climate change,
regardless of its genesis, is expected to have significant impacts in
the Pacific Northwest region in the near and long-term future
including, among other things: Increased temperatures, declining
snowpack, more frequent heavy rainfall and flooding, receding glaciers,
changes in the timing of streamflows and water supply and demand,
extreme or unusual weather events, rising sea levels, increased risks
to public health, declining salmon populations, increased drought, risk
of forest fires and forest insect outbreaks, altered reliability of
transportation interconnections and durability and performance of
infrastructure and the built environment.
(d) There is a need to continue to gather and analyze information
related to climate risk reduction that will help guide prudent steps
for avoiding, reducing, and responding to climate impacts, protecting
our communities, and assisting in maximizing public and private
infrastructure investments.
(e) The University of Washington climate impacts group has
contributed to much of the knowledge base and provides much of the
state's existing capacity to identify and assess potential climate
risks and, since 1995, has provided Washington and the region with
impartial and actionable research, data, tools, and technical advice to
support assessment and prioritization of climate risks and to identify
and fill knowledge gaps.
(f) By combining detailed knowledge of regional information needs
with the unique scientific and computing capacity in the state's
university systems, the University of Washington climate impacts group
has had many noteworthy accomplishments, such as:
(i) Developing the first comprehensive assessment of climate
impacts on the state of Washington and identifying climate change
consequences of practical concern;
(ii) Developing and publicly providing a comprehensive suite of
data showing past and potential future climate and hydrologic
conditions for locations across the state to support climate risk
assessment and long-range planning that has been used in long-range
planning efforts by entities such as the United States bureau of
reclamation, the United States army corps of engineers, Bonneville
power administration, and Seattle city light;
(iii) Providing data, tools, and technical guidance to support
climate risk assessment and adaptation activities by state agencies,
including the departments of ecology, natural resources, fish and
wildlife, transportation, and health, along with the office of the
attorney general and numerous local, tribal, and federal entities
within the region; and
(iv) Evaluating climate-related issues using methods and approaches
that transcend the expertise and mission of the individual departments,
colleges, centers, and institutes of the University of Washington by
providing the structure and continuity for the integrated,
interdisciplinary approach needed to address these complex issues.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature for the climate impacts
group to continue to provide the structure and continuity needed for
effective climate risk reduction in Washington state by continuing to
draw contributions from the associated departments and colleges of the
University of Washington into a more consolidated, collaborative,
interdisciplinary, and integrated process that is responsive to the
critical climate risks and opportunities facing sectors of importance
to the state of Washington and to continue to work with the various
interests concerned with these and other climate sensitive sectors of
the state, including the legislature, state and federal governments,
environmental organizations, local communities, business and industry,
and tribes, to improve these entities' ability to thrive in the context
of ongoing climate variability and change. It is not the intent of the
legislature to change or affect in any way the ongoing work and mission
of the climate impacts group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The climate impacts group may be
administratively housed by the University of Washington, consistent
with this chapter, and is subject to the authority of the board of
regents of the university. Nothing in this section requires the
University of Washington to maintain the climate impacts group or
provide direct financial support to the climate impacts group.
(2) The climate impacts group must be administered by the director
of the group as appointed by the dean of the college of the environment
at the University of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The climate impacts group should strive
to serve as a centralized, interdisciplinary resource for the state of
Washington to study and assist in the understanding of the effects and
impacts of natural climate variability and global and regional climate
change by focusing on the intersection of climate science and public
policy and resource management.
(2) Examples of the role of the climate impacts group may include,
but are not limited to:
(a) Pursuing coordinated research and education related to climate
risks and opportunities for various sectors in Washington;
(b) Developing, delivering, and supporting the use of relevant
scientific and technical information about climate impacts on
Washington's ecology, economy, and society, and the scientific
implications of alternative response options;
(c) Serving as a credible and expert source of climate information
for state and local decision makers and agencies working on drought,
flooding, forest fires, hazard mitigation, and other climate-related
issues;
(d) Collaborating with and leveraging efforts of other existing
climate-related resources at the federal, state, and local level;
(e) Conducting and reporting on studies of climate-related events
of significant socioeconomic importance to the state;
(f) Supporting state agencies and local governments in developing
strategies to prepare for, and to respond to, the effects of climate
variability and change on natural and human systems; and
(g) Tracking and evaluating ongoing climate adaptation efforts such
as:
(i) Economic, environmental, health, and social assessments of
climate impacts relevant to Washington and the Pacific Northwest; and
(ii) Local and regional efforts to prepare for the effects of a
changing climate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The climate impacts group may maintain
areas of focus related to the purposes of this chapter.
(2) Examples of appropriate areas of focus may include, but are not
limited to:
(a) Water resources, natural and managed water supply, water
demand, water shortages, and extreme water-related events such as
droughts and floods;
(b) The potential impacts of sea level rise and the implications of
alternative approaches for addressing these impacts on the state's
shoreline areas, including potential increases in storm surge and
coastal flooding, increased erosion, and loss of habitat and ecosystem
function; and
(c) Evaluation of the economic, ecological, and societal dimensions
of climate risks, opportunities, and response strategies in both the
rural and urban environments, and for sectors including:
(i) Water and energy demand and supplies;
(ii) Infrastructure, transportation, health, ecology, natural
resources, and agricultural systems; and
(iii) Natural and managed ecosystems, including forest ecosystems
and wildfire risk, and terrestrial, aquatic, and marine ecosystems and
species.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The climate impacts group must, when
appropriate to achieving the purposes of this chapter, cooperate and
coordinate with other entities to fulfill its objectives.
(2) Examples of entities that the climate impacts group should
cooperate and coordinate with may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Other universities;
(b) Local, state, and federal governments;
(c) Public advocacy organizations;
(d) Tribal agencies, organizations, and governments; and
(e) Domestic or foreign business institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 State agencies and local governments are
encouraged to contract with the climate impacts group to fulfill agency
needs regarding the collection, storage, integration, analysis,
dissemination, interpretation, application, and monitoring of climate
change information, research, and training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The results of any research funded by
the state that is undertaken by the climate impacts group must be
available to all industries and citizens of the state of Washington and
the climate impacts group is authorized to disseminate this information
along with information relating to any individuals housed outside of
the climate impacts group who contributed to the development of the
research. Information related to any contributors must include the
identification of the contributor's employing organization and the
credentials, area of expertise, and professional background of each
contributor.
(2) Information disseminated under this section must identify any
sources of information reviewed and relied upon by the climate impacts
group in the course of preparing the information. Peer-reviewed
literature, if applicable, must be identified, as well as any
scientific literature or other sources of information used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The climate impacts group may solicit
gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devices, including both real
or personal property, in trust or otherwise, to be directed to the
climate impacts group for carrying out the objectives of the climate
impacts group as provided in this chapter.
(2) In addition to section 6 of this act, the climate impacts group
may solicit contracts for work, financial and in-kind contributions,
and support from private industries, interest groups, federal, state,
and tribal sources, and other sources deemed appropriate by the
director of the climate impacts group.
(3) The climate impacts group may utilize separately appropriated
funds of the University of Washington for the climate impacts group
operations and activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The director of the climate impacts
group may, at the discretion of the director, appoint and maintain a
stakeholder advisory committee to advise the director on areas of focus
for the climate impacts group that are consistent with the purposes of
this chapter.
(2) If activated, the membership of the stakeholder advisory
committee must represent, to the extent possible, the various interests
concerned with the climate impacts group, including state and federal
agencies, tribal governments, conservation and environmental
organizations, urban entities, rural communities, industry, and
business.
(3) Members of the stakeholder advisory committee may not receive
any salary or other compensation for service on the advisory committee.
However, each member may be compensated, at the discretion of the
director of the climate impacts group, for each day in actual
attendance at or traveling to and from meetings of the advisory
committee in accordance with RCW 43.03.220, together with travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---