BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
Except as otherwise specified, any violation of this chapter or
rules adopted under this chapter is a class 1 civil infraction. The
department has the authority to issue and enforce civil infractions
according to chapter 7.80 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 7.80.120 and 2013 c 278 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a civil infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty.
(a) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 1 civil
infraction shall be two hundred fifty dollars, not including statutory
assessments, except for an infraction of state law involving (i)
potentially dangerous litter as specified in RCW 70.93.060(4) ((or)),
violent video or computer games under RCW 9.91.180, or violations under
section 1 of this act, in which case the maximum penalty and default
amount is five hundred dollars; or (ii) a person's refusal to submit to
a test or tests pursuant to RCW 79A.60.040 and 79A.60.700, in which
case the maximum penalty and default amount is one thousand dollars;
(b) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 2 civil
infraction shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars, not including
statutory assessments;
(c) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 3 civil
infraction shall be fifty dollars, not including statutory assessments;
and
(d) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 4 civil
infraction shall be twenty-five dollars, not including statutory
assessments.
(2) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule the conditions under
which local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines for civil
infractions.
(3) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this
chapter it is immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at
that time the court may grant an extension of the period in which the
penalty may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on or before the time
established for payment, the court may proceed to collect the penalty
in the same manner as other civil judgments and may notify the
prosecuting authority of the failure to pay.
(4) The court may also order a person found to have committed a
civil infraction to make restitution.

--- END ---