BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 61.24.130 and 2008 c 153 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prejudice the right of
the borrower, grantor, any guarantor, or any person who has an interest
in, lien, or claim of lien against the property or some part thereof,
to restrain, on any proper legal or equitable ground, a trustee's sale.
The court ((shall)) may require as a condition of granting the
restraining order or injunction that the applicant pay to the clerk of
the court the sums that would be due on the obligation secured by the
deed of trust if the deed of trust was not being foreclosed:
(a) In the case of default in making the periodic payment of
principal, interest, and reserves, such sums ((shall)) may be the
periodic payment of principal, interest, and reserves paid to the clerk
of the court every thirty days.
(b) In the case of default in making payment of an obligation then
fully payable by its terms, such sums ((shall)) may be the amount of
interest accruing monthly on said obligation at the nondefault rate,
paid to the clerk of the court every thirty days.
In the case of default in performance of any nonmonetary obligation
secured by the deed of trust, the court ((shall)) may impose such
conditions as it deems just.
In addition, the court may condition granting the restraining order
or injunction upon the giving of security by the applicant, in such
form and amount as the court deems proper, for the payment of such
costs and damages, including attorneys' fees, as may be later found by
the court to have been incurred or suffered by any party by reason of
the restraining order or injunction. The court may consider, upon
proper showing, the grantor's equity in the property in determining the
amount of said security.
(2) No court may grant a restraining order or injunction to
restrain a trustee's sale unless the person seeking the restraint gives
five days notice to the trustee of the time when, place where, and the
judge before whom the application for the restraining order or
injunction is to be made. This notice shall include copies of all
pleadings and related documents to be given to the judge. No judge may
act upon such application unless it is accompanied by proof, evidenced
by return of a sheriff, the sheriff's deputy, or by any person eighteen
years of age or over who is competent to be a witness, that the notice
has been served on the trustee.
(3) If the restraining order or injunction is dissolved after the
date of the trustee's sale set forth in the notice as provided in RCW
61.24.040(1)(f), the court granting such restraining order or
injunction, or before whom the order or injunction is returnable,
shall, at the request of the trustee, set a new sale date which shall
be not less than forty-five days from the date of the order dissolving
the restraining order. The trustee shall:
(a) Comply with the requirements of RCW 61.24.040(1) (a) through
(f) at least thirty days before the new sale date; and
(b) Cause a copy of the notice of trustee's sale as provided in RCW
61.24.040(1)(f) to be published in a legal newspaper in each county in
which the property or any part thereof is situated once between the
thirty-fifth and twenty-eighth day before the sale and once between the
fourteenth and seventh day before the sale.
(4) If a trustee's sale has been stayed as a result of the filing
of a petition in federal bankruptcy court and an order is entered in
federal bankruptcy court granting relief from the stay or closing or
dismissing the case, or discharging the debtor with the effect of
removing the stay, the trustee may set a new sale date which shall not
be less than forty-five days after the date of the bankruptcy court's
order. The trustee shall:
(a) Comply with the requirements of RCW 61.24.040(1) (a) through
(f) at least thirty days before the new sale date; and
(b) Cause a copy of the notice of trustee's sale as provided in RCW
61.24.040(1)(f) to be published in a legal newspaper in each county in
which the property or any part thereof is situated, once between the
thirty-fifth and twenty-eighth day before the sale and once between the
fourteenth and seventh day before the sale.
(5) Subsections (3) and (4) of this section are permissive only and
do not prohibit the trustee from proceeding with a trustee's sale
following termination of any injunction or stay on any date to which
such sale has been properly continued in accordance with RCW
61.24.040(6).
(6) The issuance of a restraining order or injunction shall not
prohibit the trustee from continuing the sale as provided in RCW
61.24.040(6).

--- END ---