BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that teaching is
the most important state-funded variable in student achievement and
that identifying and replicating excellent teaching practices will
greatly improve student achievement.
(2) The legislature finds that research on effective teaching
practices is limited. An institute dedicated to researching effective
teaching practices would assist policymakers to make evidence-based
decisions that improve the effectiveness of teachers and student
success.
(3) The legislature intends to create an institute for the purpose
of researching effective teaching practices and considers the
appropriate home to be Washington State University, as the institution
of higher education with the largest college of education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington research institute for teaching excellence is
created, and shall be hosted by Washington State University.
(2) The mission of the institute is to conduct research on teaching
to inform policy decisions related to teaching and to improve the
practice of teaching in K-12 and higher education, including teacher
preparation. The institute must:
(a) Conduct research on teacher effectiveness including a focus on
individualized instruction, the diverse cultural, social, and economic
background of learners, and variations in regional needs;
(b) Identify and disseminate best practices in teaching for
replication or adaption; and
(c) Provide information to policymakers on strategies to improve
teaching practices.
(3) The institute must report to the education and higher education
committees of the legislature biannually on research conducted and the
status of research partnerships with other state agencies.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "best practices in teaching"
means methods of education practice that show direct evidence of
improved student performance. A best practice may be identified in the
following areas:
(a) Instructional pedagogy;
(b) Class size;
(c) Teacher supports;
(d) Team teaching;
(e) A system of organizational strategies such as lab schools,
charter schools, and online and other distance learning or alternative
approaches to delivering instruction; and
(f) Other novel approaches to improve student performance.
(5)(a) The institute must seek grants from federal and private
sources to conduct research related to teaching effectiveness, best
practices in teaching, excellence in teacher preparation, and
continuing education, with the aim of becoming primarily supported
through nonstate funds.
(b) The institute must place a priority on seeking grants that
would fund fellowships lasting three to twelve months in length for
researchers in the doctoral program at the college of education at
Washington State University and provide credit towards the doctoral
programs.
(6) Procedures developed for obtaining student records for the
purposes of the institute's research must be in compliance with the
family educational and privacy rights act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. Sec.
1232g.
(7) The following state agencies are required to assist the
institute in achieving its mission by providing staff expertise, data,
and research: The education data center in the office of financial
management, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the
professional educator standards board, the state board of education,
the state board for community and technical colleges, the student
achievement council, and the workforce training and education
coordinating board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington research institute for teaching excellence shall
be administered by a director appointed by the dean of the college of
education at Washington State University and approved by the governing
board established under subsection (2) of this section. The director
shall oversee the operations of the institute and employ staff, as
necessary, to perform the duties and functions of the institute.
(2) The institute's director and staff shall be guided by a
governing board composed of representatives of an organization that
represents the colleges of education in the state.
(3) The student achievement council in chapter 28B.77 RCW shall
conduct research in partnership with the institute to assist in
fulfilling the institute's mission and shall provide staff expertise,
data, and research for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.77 RCW
to read as follows:
The student achievement council shall provide staff expertise,
data, and research to the Washington research institute for teaching
excellence created in section 2 of this act in partnership with staff
of Washington State University to support the mission, duties, and
functions of the institute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If specific funding for the purposes of
sections 3 and 4 of this act, referencing sections 3 and 4 of this act
by bill or chapter number and section numbers, is not provided by June
30, 2014, in the omnibus appropriations act, sections 3 and 4 of this
act are null and void.

--- END ---