BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 APPLICABILITY. This chapter does not apply
to registered tow truck operators regulated under chapter 46.55 RCW.
Licensing under this chapter does not relieve the tow truck operator
from the licensing requirements for other activities including, but not
limited to, motor vehicle transporters under chapter 46.76 RCW, hulk
haulers under chapter 46.79 RCW, and vehicle wreckers under chapter
46.80 RCW, as applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Tow truck" means any vehicle used in towing by a tow truck
operator. "Tow truck" includes any truck or automobile when using
equipment such as a trailer, dolly, tow bar, rope, chain, or cable to
tow another vehicle.
(2) "Tow truck operator" or "operator" means a business that tows
vehicles for monetary compensation.
(3) "Towing" or "to tow" means the moving of a vehicle owned by
another person from one place to another by any means including, but
not limited to, the use of a tow truck, flatbed truck, trailer, dolly,
tow bar, lifts, rope, chain, or cable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 LICENSING. (1) A person shall not engage in
or offer to engage in the activities of a tow truck operator without a
current license from the department authorizing him or her to engage in
such activities.
(2) Any person engaging in or offering to engage in the activities
of a tow truck operator without the license required under this chapter
is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and is also subject to traffic
infractions and civil penalties that may be imposed by the department
or the state patrol under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 APPLICATION--CONTENTS, BOND, INSURANCE, FEE,
CERTIFICATE. (1) Application for licensing as a tow truck operator
must be made on forms furnished by the department, be accompanied by an
inspection certification from the Washington state patrol, be signed by
the applicant or an agent, and include the following information:
(a) The name and address of the person, firm, partnership,
association, or corporation under whose name the business is to be
conducted;
(b) The names and addresses of all persons having an interest in
the business, or if the owner is a corporation, the names and addresses
of the officers of the corporation;
(c) The names and addresses of all employees who serve as tow truck
drivers;
(d) Proof of minimum insurance required under subsection (3) of
this section;
(e) The vehicle registration and vehicle identification numbers of
all tow trucks of which the applicant is the registered owner;
(f) Any other information the department may require; and
(g) A certificate of approval from the Washington state patrol
certifying that the applicant has an established place of business and
that mail is received at the address shown on the application.
(2) Before issuing a license to an applicant, the department must
require the applicant to file with the department a surety bond in the
amount of five thousand dollars running to the state and executed by a
surety company authorized to do business in this state. The bond must
be approved as to form by the attorney general and conditioned that the
operator conduct his or her business in conformity with this chapter,
and to compensate any person, company, or the state for failure to
comply with this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter, or
for fraud, negligence, or misrepresentation in the handling of these
vehicles. Any person injured by the tow truck operator's failure to
fully perform duties imposed under this chapter and the rules adopted
under this chapter is entitled to recover actual damages, including
reasonable attorneys' fees, against the surety and the tow truck
operator. Successive recoveries against the bond are permitted, but
the aggregate liability of the surety to all persons must not exceed
the amount of the bond. As a condition of authority to do business,
the operator must keep the bond in full force and effect. Failure to
maintain the penalty value of the bond or cancellation of the bond by
the surety automatically cancels the operator's license.
(3)(a) Before the department may issue a license to an applicant,
the applicant must provide proof of minimum insurance requirements of:
(i) One hundred thousand dollars for liability for bodily injury or
property damage per occurrence; and
(ii) Fifty thousand dollars of legal liability per occurrence, to
protect against vehicle damage, including, but not limited to, fire and
theft, from the time a vehicle comes into the custody of an operator
until it is delivered to the owner or to another person at the owner's
direction.
(b) Cancellation of or failure to maintain the insurance required
under (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection automatically cancels the
operator's license.
(4) The fee for each original license and annual renewal is one
hundred dollars per company, plus fifty dollars per truck. The
department must forward the license fee to the state treasurer for
deposit in the motor vehicle fund.
(5) The applicant must submit an inspection certificate from the
state patrol before the department may issue or renew an operator's
license.
(6) Upon approval of the application, the department must issue a
license certificate to the tow truck operator to be displayed
prominently at the operator's place of business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 PERMIT REQUIRED--INSPECTIONS OF EQUIPMENT.
(1) A tow truck operator must apply for and keep current a tow truck
permit for each tow truck of which the operator is the registered
owner. Application for a tow truck permit must be accompanied by a
report from the Washington state patrol covering a physical inspection
of each tow truck capable of being used by the applicant.
(2) Upon receipt of the fee provided in section 4(4) of this act
and a satisfactory inspection report from the state patrol, the
department must issue each tow truck an annual tow truck permit or
decal. The class of the tow truck, determined according to section 6
of this act, must be stamped on the permit or decal. The permit or
decal must be displayed on the passenger side of the truck's front
windshield.
(3) A tow truck number from the department must be affixed in a
permanent manner to each tow truck.
(4) The Washington state patrol must conduct an annual inspection
of each tow truck operator's equipment and facilities during the
operator's normal business hours. Unscheduled inspections may be
conducted without notice at the operator's place of business by an
inspector to determine the fitness of a tow truck or equipment.
(5) If at the time of the annual or subsequent inspections the
equipment does not meet the requirements of this chapter, and the
deficiency is a safety-related deficiency, or the equipment is
necessary to the truck's performance, the inspector must cause the
registered tow truck operator to remove that equipment from service as
a tow truck until the equipment has been satisfactorily repaired. A
red tag must be placed on the windshield of a tow truck taken out of
service, and the tow truck must not provide tow truck service until the
Washington state patrol recertifies the truck and removes the tag.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 CLASSIFICATION OF TRUCKS--MARKING
REQUIREMENTS--TIME AND PLACE OF INSPECTION--PENALTY. (1) Tow trucks
must be classified by towing capabilities and must meet or exceed all
equipment standards set by the state patrol for the type of tow trucks
to be used by an operator. A tow truck using equipment such as a
dolly, trailer, or other means of transportation that is not in
compliance with the equipment standards set by the state patrol is in
violation of this chapter.
(2) All tow trucks must display the firm's name, city of address,
and telephone number. This information must be painted on or
permanently affixed to both sides of the vehicle in accordance with
rules adopted by the department.
(3) Before a tow truck is put into tow truck service, or when the
reinspection of a tow truck is necessary, the district commander of the
state patrol must designate a location and time for the inspection to
be conducted. When practicable, the inspection or reinspection must be
made within three business days following the request by the operator.
(4) Failure to comply with any requirement of this section or rules
adopted under this section is a traffic infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 BUSINESS LOCATION--REQUIREMENTS. (1) The
address that the tow truck operator lists on his or her application
must be the business location of the firm where its files are kept.
Each separate business location requires a separate license under this
chapter.
(2) Each business location must have a sign displaying the firm's
name that is readable from the roadway.
(3) At the business locations listed, the licensed operator must
post in a conspicuous and accessible location:
(a) All pertinent licenses and permits to operate as a tow truck
operator; and
(b) Information supplied by the department as to where complaints
regarding either equipment or service are to be directed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 FEES--SCHEDULES. (1) An operator must file
a fee schedule with the department. All filed fees must be adequate to
cover the costs of service provided. Fees may not exceed those filed
with the department. At least ten days before the effective date of
any change in an operator's fee schedule, the licensed tow truck
operator must file the revised fee schedule with the department.
(2) A fee that is charged for tow truck service must be calculated
on an hourly basis, and after the first hour must be charged to the
nearest quarter hour.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 AVAILABILITY OF RECORDS, EQUIPMENT, AND
FACILITIES FOR AUDIT AND INSPECTION. Records, equipment, and
facilities of a licensed tow truck operator must be made available
during normal business hours for audit or inspection by the department,
the Washington state patrol, or any law enforcement agency having
jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 COMPLAINTS, WHERE FORWARDED. (1) All law
enforcement agencies or local licensing agencies that receive
complaints involving licensed tow truck operators must forward the
complaints, along with any supporting documents including all results
from local investigations, to the department.
(2) Complaints involving deficiencies of equipment must be
forwarded by the department to the state patrol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 PRESIDING OFFICER AT LICENSING HEARING.
The director or the chief of the Washington state patrol may use a
hearing officer or administrative law judge for presiding over a
hearing regarding licensing provisions under this chapter or rules
adopted under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 RULES. The director, in cooperation with
the chief of the Washington state patrol, must adopt rules that carry
out the provisions and intent of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 PENALTIES FOR CERTAIN ACTS OR OMISSIONS.
A tow truck operator's license may be denied, suspended, or revoked,
the licensee may be ordered to pay a monetary penalty of a civil nature
not to exceed one thousand dollars per violation, or the licensee may
be subjected to any combination of license and monetary penalty,
whenever the director has reason to believe the licensee has committed,
or is at the time committing, a violation of this chapter or rules
adopted under this chapter or any other statute or rule. All orders by
the director made under this chapter are subject to chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 CEASE AND DESIST ORDER. Whenever it
appears to the director that any licensed tow truck operator or a
person offering towing services has engaged in or is about to engage in
any act or practice constituting a violation of this chapter or any
rule adopted under this chapter, the director may issue an order
directing the operator or person to cease and desist from continuing
the act or practice. Reasonable notice of and opportunity for a
hearing must be given. The director may issue a temporary order
pending a hearing. The temporary order must remain in effect until ten
days after the hearing is held and becomes final if the person to whom
notice is addressed does not request a hearing within fifteen days
after the receipt of notice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 REFUSAL TO ISSUE LICENSE, GROUNDS FOR. If
an application for a license to conduct business as a tow truck
operator is filed by any person whose license has previously been
canceled for cause by the department, or if the department is of the
opinion that the application is not filed in good faith or that the
application is filed by some person as a subterfuge for the real person
in interest whose license has previously been canceled for cause, the
department, after a hearing, of which the applicant has been given
twenty days' notice in writing and at which the applicant may appear in
person or by counsel and present testimony, may refuse to issue the
person a license to conduct business as a tow truck operator.

Sec. 16 RCW 46.63.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 21 are each
amended to read as follows:
Failure to perform any act required or the performance of any act
prohibited by this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating to traffic
including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is
designated as a traffic infraction and may not be classified as a
criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the following
provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative
regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:
(1) RCW 46.09.457(1)(b)(i) relating to a false statement regarding
the inspection of and installation of equipment on wheeled all-terrain
vehicles;
(2) RCW 46.09.470(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance;
(3) RCW 46.09.480 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;
(4) RCW 46.10.490(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit-forming drugs or in a manner endangering the person of another;
(5) RCW 46.10.495 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;
(6) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of title,
registration certificates, and markings indicating that a vehicle has
been destroyed or declared a total loss;
(7) RCW 46.16A.030 and 46.16A.050(3) relating to the nonpayment of
taxes and fees by failure to register a vehicle and falsifying
residency when registering a motor vehicle;
(8) RCW 46.16A.520 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to
drive;
(9) RCW 46.16A.320 relating to vehicle trip permits;
(10) RCW 46.19.050 relating to knowingly providing false
information in conjunction with an application for a special placard or
license plate for disabled persons' parking;
(11) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's
license;
(12) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a
driver's license or instruction permit;
(13) RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession and use of
a driver's license;
(14) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked
license or status;
(15) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle
with a suspended or revoked license;
(16) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an
occupational driver's license, temporary restricted driver's license,
or ignition interlock driver's license;
(17) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without
an ignition interlock device in violation of a license notation that
the device is required;
(18) RCW 46.20.750 relating to circumventing an ignition interlock
device;
(19) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;
(20) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;
(21) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of
financial responsibility;
(22) RCW 46.35.030 relating to recording device information;
(23) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of
sunscreening material;
(24) RCW 46.37.650 relating to the sale, resale, distribution, or
installation of a previously deployed air bag;
(25) RCW 46.37.671 through 46.37.675 relating to signal preemption
devices;
(26) RCW 46.37.685 relating to switching or flipping license
plates, utilizing technology to flip or change the appearance of a
license plate, selling a license plate flipping device or technology
used to change the appearance of a license plate, or falsifying a
vehicle registration;
(27) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot
vehicles;
(28) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous
articles;
(29) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(30) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(31) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairers, storage
persons, and appraisers;
(32) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving
record to be furnished to an insurance company, an employer, and an
alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;
(33) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a
registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;
(34) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck
operators;
(35) RCW 46.55.300 relating to vehicle immobilization;
(36) Section 3(2) of this act relating to engaging in tow truck
operator activities without a license;
(37) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers,
flaggers, or firefighters;
(((37))) (38) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information
to or cooperate with an officer;
(((38))) (39) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give
identification to an officer;
(((39))) (40) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude
pursuing police vehicles;
(((40))) (41) RCW 46.61.212(4) relating to reckless endangerment of
emergency zone workers;
(((41))) (42) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;
(((42))) (43) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(((43))) (44) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;
(((44))) (45) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor
vehicle;
(((45))) (46) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;
(((46))) (47) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent
driving;
(((47))) (48) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of
roadway workers;
(((48))) (49) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on
highways;
(((49))) (50) RCW 46.61.655(7) (a) and (b) relating to failure to
secure a load;
(((50))) (51) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an
unattended vehicle with the motor running;
(((51))) (52) RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle
fuel;
(((52))) (53) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or
attempt to cancel a traffic citation;
(((53))) (54) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding,
abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(((54))) (55) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic
offenders;
(((55))) (56) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to
obtain a refund;
(((56))) (57) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle
business practices, except where that chapter provides for the
assessment of monetary penalties of a civil nature;
(((57))) (58) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of
passengers in for hire vehicles;
(((58))) (59) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier
insurance;
(((59))) (60) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine
without a vehicle certificate;
(((60))) (61) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a
limousine carrier;
(((61))) (62) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;
(((62))) (63) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training
schools;
(((63))) (64) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a
cab card, letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued
under chapter 46.87 RCW;
(((64))) (65) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an
unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 1 through 15 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 46 RCW.

--- END ---