BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.16.110 and 1995 c 44 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person in the state shall be placed in legal jeopardy of any
kind whatsoever for protecting by any reasonable means necessary,
himself or herself, his or her family, or his or her real or personal
property, or for coming to the aid of another who is in imminent danger
of or the victim of assault, robbery, kidnapping, arson, burglary,
rape, murder, or any other violent crime as defined in RCW 9.94A.030,
or who is in imminent danger of or the victim of an attack by an
aggressive, violent animal.
(2) When a person charged with a crime listed in subsection (1) of
this section is found not guilty by reason of self-defense, the state
of Washington shall reimburse the defendant for all reasonable costs,
including loss of time, legal fees incurred, and other expenses
involved in his or her defense. This reimbursement is not an
independent cause of action. To award these reasonable costs the trier
of fact must find that the defendant's claim of self-defense was
sustained by a preponderance of the evidence. If the trier of fact
makes a determination of self-defense, the judge shall determine the
amount of the award.
(3) Notwithstanding a finding that a defendant's actions were
justified by self-defense, if the trier of fact also determines that
the defendant was engaged in criminal conduct substantially related to
the events giving rise to the charges filed against the defendant the
judge may deny or reduce the amount of the award. In determining the
amount of the award, the judge shall also consider the seriousness of
the initial criminal conduct.
Nothing in this section precludes the legislature from using the
sundry claims process to grant an award where none was granted under
this section or to grant a higher award than one granted under this
section.
(4) Whenever the issue of self-defense under this section is
decided by a judge, the judge shall consider the same questions as must
be answered in the special verdict under subsection (((4) [(5)])) (5)
of this section.
(5) Whenever the issue of self-defense under this section has been
submitted to a jury, and the jury has found the defendant not guilty,
the court shall instruct the jury to return a special verdict in
substantially the following form:

--- END ---