BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.06.020 and 2007 c 516 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The specific role of the department in transportation planning
must be, consistent with the policy goals described under RCW
47.04.280: (((1))) (a) Ongoing coordination and development of
statewide transportation policies that guide all Washington
transportation providers; (((2))) (b) ongoing development of a
statewide multimodal transportation plan that includes both state-owned
and state-interest facilities and services; (((3))) (c) coordinating
the state high capacity transportation planning and regional
transportation planning programs; (((4))) (d) conducting special
transportation planning studies that impact state transportation
facilities or relate to transportation facilities and services of
statewide significance; and (((5))) (e) assisting the transportation
commission in the development of the statewide transportation plan
required under RCW 47.01.071(4). Specific requirements for each of
these state transportation planning components are described in this
chapter.
(2) In carrying out its transportation planning responsibilities
and conducting special studies, the department may use least cost
planning as a method of analyzing transportation system performance and
identifying an optimal mix of strategies for managing and improving a
transportation system that supports communities, the economy, and the
environment. Least cost planning considers the direct and indirect
costs of both demand and supply options to identify practical
investment and policy strategies that best meet the goals and
objectives established through a collaborative planning process.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.06.130 and 2002 c 5 s 404 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may carry out special transportation planning
studies to resolve specific issues with the development of the state
transportation system or other statewide transportation issues.
(2) ((The department shall conduct multimodal corridor analyses on
major congested corridors where needed improvements are likely to cost
in excess of one hundred million dollars. Analysis will include the
cost-effectiveness of all feasible strategies in addressing congestion
or improving mobility within the corridor, and must recommend the most
effective strategy or mix of strategies to address identified
deficiencies. A long-term view of corridors must be employed to
determine whether an existing corridor should be expanded, a city or
county road should become a state route, and whether a new corridor is
needed to alleviate congestion and enhance mobility based on travel
demand. To the extent practicable, full costs of all strategies must
be reflected in the analysis. At a minimum, this analysis must
include:
(a) The current and projected future demand for total person trips
on that corridor;
(b) The impact of making no improvements to that corridor;
(c) The daily cost per added person served for each mode or
improvement proposed to meet demand;
(d) The cost per hour of travel time saved per day for each mode or
improvement proposed to meet demand; and
(e) How much of the current and anticipated future demand will be
met and left unmet for each mode or improvement proposed to meet
demand.
The end result of this analysis will be to provide a cost-benefit
analysis by which policymakers can determine the most cost-effective
improvement or mode, or mix of improvements and modes, for increasing
mobility and reducing congestion.)) To implement least cost planning,
the department shall:
(a) Define a least cost planning framework in consultation with
regional transportation planning organizations and other affected
stakeholders and the public;
(b) Identify specific indicators for use in the least cost planning
framework;
(c) Conduct test analyses to demonstrate the use of least cost
planning in system and corridor planning, including the development of
state modal plans. For projects with an estimated cost above twenty
million dollars, the test analyses must include a life-cycle cost
analysis of materials that includes the application of an efficient
frontier model or algorithm to determine the material with the highest
level rate of return over time. An "efficient frontier model" means a
model or algorithm that compares components of a project against their
ability to achieve specific project goals including, but not limited
to, improved safety, life of the asset, minimal environmental impact,
and utilization of technology;
(d) Prepare guidelines for implementing least cost planning by
transportation planning agencies in Washington state; and
(e) Provide data, methodology, inputs, and results of the test
analyses and life-cycle cost analysis of the project under (c) of this
subsection to the public through either a public meeting or an online
or written public comment period, or both.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.80.023 and 2009 c 515 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each regional transportation planning organization shall have the
following duties:
(1) Prepare and periodically update a transportation strategy for
the region. The strategy shall address alternative transportation
modes and transportation demand management measures in regional
corridors and shall recommend preferred transportation policies to
implement adopted growth strategies. The strategy shall serve as a
guide in preparation of the regional transportation plan.
(2) Prepare a regional transportation plan as set forth in RCW
47.80.030 that is consistent with countywide planning policies if such
have been adopted pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, with county, city,
and town comprehensive plans, and state transportation plans.
(3) Certify by December 31, 1996, that the transportation elements
of comprehensive plans adopted by counties, cities, and towns within
the region reflect the guidelines and principles developed pursuant to
RCW 47.80.026, are consistent with the adopted regional transportation
plan, and, where appropriate, conform with the requirements of RCW
36.70A.070.
(4) Where appropriate, certify that countywide planning policies
adopted under RCW 36.70A.210 and the adopted regional transportation
plan are consistent.
(5) Develop, in cooperation with the department of transportation,
operators of public transportation services and local governments
within the region, a six-year regional transportation improvement
program which proposes regionally significant transportation projects
and programs and transportation demand management measures. The
regional transportation improvement program shall be based on the
programs, projects, and transportation demand management measures of
regional significance as identified by transit agencies, cities, and
counties pursuant to RCW 35.58.2795, 35.77.010, and 36.81.121,
respectively, and any recommended programs or projects identified by
the agency council on coordinated transportation, as provided in
chapter 47.06B RCW, that advance special needs coordinated
transportation as defined in RCW 47.06B.012. The program shall include
a priority list of projects and programs, project segments and
programs, transportation demand management measures, and a specific
financial plan that demonstrates how the transportation improvement
program can be funded. The program shall be updated at least every two
years for the ensuing six-year period.
(6) Include specific opportunities and projects to advance special
needs coordinated transportation, as defined in RCW 47.06B.012, in the
coordinated transit-human services transportation plan, after providing
opportunity for public comment.
(7) Designate a lead planning agency to coordinate preparation of
the regional transportation plan and carry out the other
responsibilities of the organization. The lead planning agency may be
a regional organization, a component county, city, or town agency, or
the appropriate Washington state department of transportation district
office.
(8) Review level of service methodologies used by cities and
counties planning under chapter 36.70A RCW to promote a consistent
regional evaluation of transportation facilities and corridors.
(9) Work with cities, counties, transit agencies, the department of
transportation, and others to develop level of service standards or
alternative transportation performance measures.
(10) Submit to the agency council on coordinated transportation, as
provided in chapter 47.06B RCW, beginning on July 1, 2007, and every
four years thereafter, an updated plan that includes the elements
identified by the council. Each regional transportation planning
organization must submit to the council every two years a prioritized
regional human service and transportation project list.
(11) Collaborate with the department in the development of a least
cost planning and programming framework that (a) supports the state
transportation system policy goals in RCW 47.04.280 and, in particular,
uses analytical methods to examine transportation system performance
and (b) identifies an optimal mix of practical investment and policy
strategies for managing and improving a transportation system that
supports communities, the economy, and the environment.

--- END ---