BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 38.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All enlisted members of grade E1 through E5 of the Washington
national guard who enlist after August 1, 2014, for a minimum period of
three years, are eligible for additional compensation from the state of
Washington in the form of a payment of the monthly premium for the
eligible member for a premium-based health plan and premium-based
dental plan provided by the federal military health system for military
service members, national guard, and reserve members who are not in
active duty. The state must select the premium-based plans that apply
pursuant to this section.
(2) The compensation described in subsection (1) of this section
must be paid by the state for the period of the member's enlistment,
unless:
(a) The member no longer qualifies for coverage under the terms of
the plan, including periods when the member is under active duty orders
for a period over thirty consecutive days;
(b) The member is enrolled or is eligible under a federal employee
health or dental plan; or
(c) The federal military health system no longer offers health or
dental plans for service members, national guard, and reserve members
who are not in active duty.

--- END ---