BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds there is a critical
need to provide law enforcement officers and agencies with the latest
scientific technology available for accurately and expeditiously
identifying and prosecuting criminal offenders. Although every state
maintains a DNA database for felony convictions, there is a growing
trend toward expanding DNA databases to include DNA from felony and
other criminal arrestees. Studies indicate that collection of DNA from
arrestees contributes to the solution of cold cases, saves lives by
identifying recidivist offenders, reduces rates of criminality, and
increases the rate of successful prosecutions. The legislature further
finds that collecting DNA from all criminal arrestees is cost-effective. Early identification of offenders reduces costs by focusing
investigations and eliminating suspects, prevents costs associated with
recidivist offenders, and prevents property loss. The legislature
therefore finds that collecting DNA from adults who are arrested is
necessary to solve cold cases, prevent recidivist acts, and lower the
cost of criminal investigations. The legislature further finds that
DNA samples can be collected, analyzed, and stored in a way that only
minimally impacts privacy concerns. The sample, typically collected
via oral swab, is analyzed only with regard to forensic loci, a small
percentage of the arrestee's genetic code, which allows identification
but does not reveal other genetic information, other than gender.
Arrestee samples will not be analyzed unless a probable cause
determination has been made. Once analyzed, the profile is stored
without any personally identifying information, only a sample number
and agency identifiers. The DNA profile and sample is accessible only
to qualified laboratory personnel. If a hit is made between a stored
sample and the forensic profile developed from a crime scene, the
laboratory will notify the submitting law enforcement agency who must
follow certain procedures to confirm the hit. Innocent individuals are
further protected through expungement procedures, which allow removal
of their samples and profiles if convictions are not made or are
overturned.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.43.753 and 2008 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that recent developments in molecular biology
and genetics have important applications for forensic science. It has
been scientifically established that there is a unique pattern to the
chemical structure of the deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) contained in each
cell of the human body. The process for identifying this pattern is
called "DNA identification."
The legislature further finds that DNA databases are important
tools in criminal investigations, in the exclusion of individuals who
are the subject of investigations or prosecutions, and in detecting
recidivist acts. It is the policy of this state to assist federal,
state, and local criminal justice and law enforcement agencies in both
the identification and detection of individuals in criminal
investigations and the identification and location of missing and
unidentified persons. Therefore, it is in the best interest of the
state to establish a DNA database ((and DNA data bank)) containing DNA
samples submitted by persons convicted of felony offenses and other
crimes, as well as by adults arrested for or charged with any criminal
offense, as specified in RCW 43.43.754. DNA samples necessary for the
identification of missing persons and unidentified human remains shall
also be included in the DNA database.
The legislature further finds that the DNA identification system
used by the federal bureau of investigation and the Washington state
patrol has no ability to predict genetic disease or predisposal to
illness. Nonetheless, the legislature intends that biological samples
collected under RCW 43.43.735 and 43.43.754, and DNA identification
data obtained from the samples, be used only for purposes related to
criminal investigation, identification of human remains or missing
persons, or improving the operation of the system authorized under RCW
43.43.735, 43.43.752 through ((43.43.758)) 43.43.759, and section 6 of
this act.
The legislature further finds that the DNA collection, testing, and
storage process is minimally invasive to privacy based on the following
features:
(1) Biological samples for DNA testing are routinely collected by
an oral swab as part of the legitimate police identification procedure;
(2) A DNA profile is stored in a database accessible only to
qualified laboratory personnel and does not appear in an individual's
criminal history record;
(3) Entries in the DNA database contain only DNA markers necessary
to human identification, which are a small part of a person's total
genetic information; and
(4) Personally identifying information does not appear in the DNA
database.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.43.735 and 2009 c 549 s 5130 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of the sheriff or director of public
safety of every county, and the chief of police of every city or town,
and of every chief officer of other law enforcement agencies duly
operating within this state, to cause the photographing and
fingerprinting of all adults and juveniles lawfully arrested for the
commission of any criminal offense constituting a felony or gross
misdemeanor. (a) When such juveniles are brought directly to a
juvenile detention facility, the juvenile court administrator is also
authorized, but not required, to cause the photographing,
fingerprinting, and record transmittal to the appropriate law
enforcement agency; and (b) a further exception may be made when the
arrest is for a violation punishable as a gross misdemeanor and the
arrested person is not taken into custody.
(2) It shall be the right, but not the duty, of the sheriff or
director of public safety of every county, and the chief of police of
every city or town, and every chief officer of other law enforcement
agencies operating within this state to photograph and record the
fingerprints of all adults lawfully arrested.
(3) Such sheriffs, directors of public safety, chiefs of police,
and other chief law enforcement officers, may record, in addition to
photographs and fingerprints, the palmprints, soleprints, toeprints, or
any other identification data of all persons whose photograph and
fingerprints are required or allowed to be taken under this section
when in the discretion of such law enforcement officers it is necessary
for proper identification of the arrested person or the investigation
of the crime with which he or she is charged.
(4)(a) Beginning July 1, 2015, it is the duty of the sheriff or
director of public safety of every county, the chief of police of every
city or town, and every chief officer of other law enforcement agencies
duly operating within this state to cause the collection of biological
samples for DNA identification analysis from all adults lawfully
arrested for the commission of any criminal offense.
(b) Until June 30, 2015, it is the right, but not the duty, of the
sheriff or director of public safety of every county, the chief of
police of every city or town, and every chief officer of other law
enforcement agencies operating within this state to cause the
collection of biological samples for DNA identification analysis from
all adults lawfully arrested for the commission of any criminal
offense.
(c) The sheriff or director of public safety of every county, the
chief of police of every city or town, and every chief officer of other
law enforcement agencies operating within this state must cause to be
determined, prior to collection of a biological sample under this
subsection, whether the adult lawfully arrested has been convicted of
a felony subsequent to July 25, 1999. If so, no sample may be
collected.
(d) Biological samples collected under this subsection must be:
(i) Collected using the same technique as biological samples
collected under RCW 43.43.754;
(ii) Forwarded to the forensic laboratory services bureau of the
Washington state patrol; and
(iii) Used solely for the purposes of inclusion in the DNA
identification system established under RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.759
and section 6 of this act.
(e) The forensic laboratory services bureau must provide kits and
instructions necessary for the collection of biological samples
required by this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.43.740 and 2006 c 294 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of the sheriff or director of public
safety of every county, and the chief of police of every city or town,
and of every chief officer of other law enforcement agencies duly
operating within this state to furnish within seventy-two hours from
the time of arrest to the section the required sets of fingerprints
together with other identifying data as may be prescribed by the chief,
of any person lawfully arrested, fingerprinted, and photographed
pursuant to RCW 43.43.735.
(2) Law enforcement agencies may retain and file copies of the
fingerprints, photographs, and other identifying data and information
obtained pursuant to RCW 43.43.735, except biological samples. Said
records shall remain in the possession of the law enforcement agency as
part of the identification record and are not returnable to the
subjects thereof.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.43.754 and 2008 c 97 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A biological sample must be collected for purposes of DNA
identification analysis from:
(a) Every adult or juvenile individual convicted of a felony, or
any of the following crimes (or equivalent juvenile offenses):
Assault in the fourth degree with sexual motivation (RCW 9A.36.041,
9.94A.835)
Communication with a minor for immoral purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)
Custodial sexual misconduct in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.170)
Failure to register (RCW ((9A.44.130)) 9A.44.132)
Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)
Patronizing a prostitute (RCW 9A.88.110)
Sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.096)
Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)
Violation of a sexual assault protection order granted under
chapter 7.90 RCW; ((and))
(b) Every adult or juvenile individual who is required to register
under RCW 9A.44.130; and
(c) Every adult lawfully arrested for or charged with a criminal
offense.
(2) If the Washington state patrol crime laboratory already has a
DNA sample from an individual for a qualifying offense, a subsequent
submission is not required to be submitted.
(3) Biological samples shall be collected in the following manner:
(a) For persons convicted of any offense listed in subsection
(1)(a) of this section or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile
offense who do not serve a term of confinement in a department of
corrections facility, and do serve a term of confinement in a city or
county jail facility, the city or county shall be responsible for
obtaining the biological samples at the time of transfer to the
facility.
(b) The local police department or sheriff's office shall be
responsible for obtaining the biological samples for:
(i) Persons convicted of any offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of
this section or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense
who do not serve a term of confinement in a department of corrections
facility, and do not serve a term of confinement in a city or county
jail facility; and
(ii) Persons who are required to register under RCW ((9A.44.030))
9A.44.130.
(c) For persons convicted of any offense listed in subsection
(1)(a) of this section or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile
offense, who are serving or who are to serve a term of confinement in
a department of corrections facility or a department of social and
health services facility, the facility holding the person shall be
responsible for obtaining the biological samples at the time of
transfer to the facility. For those persons incarcerated before June
12, 2008, who have not yet had a biological sample collected, priority
shall be given to those persons who will be released the soonest.
(d)(i) For adults lawfully arrested for a criminal offense, the
city or county jail must obtain a biological sample prior to the
person's release. The jail must provide the person with a notice of
the rights to expungement and destruction as required by section 7 of
this act.
(ii) The city or county jail must submit the biological sample to
the forensic laboratory services bureau by the end of the business day
of the collection. The biological sample must be submitted in a sealed
container with no identifiers indicating the source of the sample,
except for a case or docket number allowing a technician to search the
superior court management information system to determine if a probable
cause determination has been made.
(iii) The sealed container may not be opened, or the sample
removed, until an employee of the forensic laboratory services bureau
determines that a probable cause determination has been made by a
court. If a court finds probable cause for the arrest, the sample may
be removed from the sealed container for analysis. If a court does not
find probable cause for an arrest, the sealed container and sample must
be destroyed.
(e) For adults charged with a criminal offense whose first
appearance in court is caused by a summons, the court must require the
person to submit to the collection of a biological sample if the court
makes a determination of probable cause and a sample has not already
been collected. The court must direct the sheriff or director of
public safety of the county, the chief of police of the city or town,
or the chief officer of another law enforcement agency duly operating
within the state to collect the biological sample. If the person is
released on personal recognizance or on conditions, the court must make
the collection of a biological sample a condition of release. If the
person is detained, a biological sample may be collected at any time
during the person's detention.
(4) Any biological sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.735,
43.43.752 through ((43.43.758)) 43.43.759, and section 6 of this act
may be retained by the forensic laboratory services bureau, and must be
analyzed by the forensic laboratory services bureau unless a complete
DNA profile for the person has previously been entered in the DNA
database.
(5) Any biological sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.735,
43.43.752 through 43.43.759, and section 6 of this act shall be used
solely for the purpose of providing DNA or other tests for
identification analysis and prosecution of a criminal offense or for
the identification of human remains or missing persons. Nothing in
this section prohibits the submission of results derived from the
biological samples to the federal bureau of investigation combined DNA
index system.
(((5))) (6) The forensic laboratory services bureau of the
Washington state patrol is responsible for testing performed on all
biological samples that are collected under subsection (1) of this
section, to the extent allowed by funding available for this purpose((.
The director shall give priority to testing on samples collected from
those adults or juveniles convicted of a felony or adjudicated guilty
of an equivalent juvenile offense that is defined as a sex offense or
a violent offense in RCW 9.94A.030)), except as described in subsection
(3)(d)(iii) of this section. Known duplicate samples may be excluded
from testing unless testing is deemed necessary or advisable by the
director.
(((6))) (7) This section applies to:
(a) All adults and juveniles to whom this section applied prior to
June 12, 2008;
(b) All adults and juveniles to whom this section did not apply
prior to June 12, 2008, who:
(i) Are convicted on or after June 12, 2008, of an offense listed
in subsection (1)(a) of this section; or
(ii) Were convicted prior to June 12, 2008, of an offense listed in
subsection (1)(a) of this section and are still incarcerated on or
after June 12, 2008; ((and))
(c) All adults and juveniles who are required to register under RCW
9A.44.130 on or after June 12, 2008, whether convicted before, on, or
after June 12, 2008; and
(d) All adults lawfully arrested for or charged with a criminal
offense on or after the effective date of this section.
(((7))) (8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, this
section creates no rights in a third person. No cause of action may be
brought based upon the noncollection or nonanalysis or the delayed
collection or analysis of a biological sample authorized to be taken
under RCW 43.43.735 or 43.43.752 through ((43.43.758)) 43.43.759 and
section 6 of this act.
(b) If the forensic laboratory services bureau willfully or
negligently fails to destroy a biological sample as required by
subsection (3)(d)(iii) of this section, the person from whom the jail
facility obtained the sample may bring an action against the state for
actual damages.
(c) The director of the Washington state patrol's forensic
laboratory services shall perform an annual audit to ensure that
biological samples are destroyed as required by subsection (3)(d)(iii)
of this section. The director shall issue an annual report to be
posted on the Washington state patrol's web site listing the number of
DNA samples collected, the number of times a forensic match was made,
and the number of times a forensic laboratory services bureau failed to
destroy a biological sample as required by subsection (3)(d)(iii) of
this section.
(((8))) (9) The detention, arrest, or conviction of a person based
upon a database match or database information is not invalidated if it
is determined that the sample was obtained or placed in the database by
mistake, if the sample is subject to expungement pursuant to this
chapter, or if the conviction or juvenile adjudication that resulted in
the collection of the biological sample was subsequently vacated or
otherwise altered in any future proceeding including but not limited to
posttrial or postfact-finding motions, appeals, or collateral attacks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may request expungement of the person's sample and DNA
records from the DNA identification system if:
(a) The person is not charged with an offense requiring the
collection of a biological sample under RCW 43.43.735 within one year
of arrest;
(b) The person has been found not guilty or has been acquitted of
an offense requiring the collection of a biological sample under RCW
43.43.735; or
(c) The underlying conviction or adjudication requiring the
collection of a biological sample under RCW 43.43.754 has been reversed
and the case dismissed.
(2) To request expungement, the person must submit the following
documents to the forensic laboratory services bureau:
(a) A written request for expungement;
(b) Proof that the person has provided written notice of the
request for expungement to the prosecuting attorney of the county in
which he or she was arrested, convicted, or adjudicated; and
(c)(i) A sworn affidavit that no charges for an offense requiring
the collection of a biological sample under RCW 43.43.735 have been
filed within one year of arrest;
(ii) A certified copy of a final court order establishing that a
charge for an offense requiring the collection of a biological sample
under RCW 43.43.735 has been dismissed or has resulted in an acquittal;
or
(iii) A certified copy of a final court order reversing the
conviction that required the collection of a biological sample under
RCW 43.43.754.
(3)(a) Upon receipt of a written request for expungement, if the
forensic laboratory services bureau has not previously analyzed the
person's sample, the Washington state patrol must give priority to
analyzing the person's sample and searching the DNA identification
system for a match.
(b) Once the forensic laboratory services bureau has analyzed the
person's sample, searched the DNA identification system for a match,
and received the documents required by subsection (2) of this section,
the forensic laboratory services bureau must expunge the person's
sample and DNA records from the DNA identification system.
(c) The forensic laboratory services bureau may not expunge a
person's sample and DNA records from the DNA identification system if
the person has a prior conviction or a pending charge for which the
collection of a sample is authorized under RCW 43.43.735 or 43.43.754.
(4) The forensic laboratory services bureau must provide
information regarding the rights to expungement and destruction on the
Washington state patrol's official web site. The information must
include the procedures for requesting expungement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 70.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The jail administrator or his or her designee or chief law
enforcement executive or his or her designee must provide notice of the
requirements of RCW 43.43.735, 43.43.740, 43.43.754, and section 6 of
this act to jail staff who perform booking procedures and other staff
as appropriate.
(2) Jail staff must provide a notice of the rights to expungement
and destruction to all adults arrested for a criminal offense at the
time the biological sample for DNA testing is taken. The notice must
be in substantially the following form:
"Washington law requires the collection of a biological sample for
DNA testing from all adults arrested for a criminal offense. The
sample will be sent to the forensic laboratory services bureau and, if
a court has made a determination of probable cause, the sample will be
analyzed for inclusion in the DNA database. If a court finds there is
no probable cause, the laboratory must destroy the biological sample.
THE LABORATORY MUST EXPUNGE YOUR DNA SAMPLE AND RECORDS IF: (1)
YOU ARE NOT CHARGED WITHIN ONE YEAR OF ARREST; (2) YOU ARE FOUND NOT
GUILTY; OR (3) YOUR CONVICTION IS REVERSED AND THE CASE DISMISSED. YOU
ALSO HAVE A RIGHT TO BRING SUIT AGAINST THE STATE IF THE LABORATORY
FAILS TO DESTROY YOUR BIOLOGICAL SAMPLE.
For more information regarding your rights to expungement and
destruction, see RCW 43.43.754 and section 6 of this act."

Sec. 8 RCW 46.63.110 and 2012 c 82 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and
fifty dollars for each offense unless authorized by this chapter or
title.
(2) The monetary penalty for a violation of (a) RCW 46.55.105(2) is
two hundred fifty dollars for each offense; (b) RCW 46.61.210(1) is
five hundred dollars for each offense. No penalty assessed under this
subsection (2) may be reduced.
(3) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of
monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions. This rule shall
also specify the conditions under which local courts may exercise
discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic infractions.
The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust this
schedule every two years for inflation.
(4) There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction
relates to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty imposed pursuant to
this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary penalty not
to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of
traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law,
ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty
set by the local legislative body.
(5) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are
civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed for violations of
chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles
are not subject to the limitation on the amount of monetary penalties
which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.
(6) Whenever a monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other
monetary obligation is imposed by a court under this chapter, it is
immediately payable and is enforceable as a civil judgment under Title
6 RCW. If the court determines, in its discretion, that a person is
not able to pay a monetary obligation in full, and not more than one
year has passed since the later of July 1, 2005, or the date the
monetary obligation initially became due and payable, the court shall
enter into a payment plan with the person, unless the person has
previously been granted a payment plan with respect to the same
monetary obligation, or unless the person is in noncompliance of any
existing or prior payment plan, in which case the court may, at its
discretion, implement a payment plan. If the court has notified the
department that the person has failed to pay or comply and the person
has subsequently entered into a payment plan and made an initial
payment, the court shall notify the department that the infraction has
been adjudicated, and the department shall rescind any suspension of
the person's driver's license or driver's privilege based on failure to
respond to that infraction. "Payment plan," as used in this section,
means a plan that requires reasonable payments based on the financial
ability of the person to pay. The person may voluntarily pay an amount
at any time in addition to the payments required under the payment
plan.
(a) If a payment required to be made under the payment plan is
delinquent or the person fails to complete a community restitution
program on or before the time established under the payment plan,
unless the court determines good cause therefor and adjusts the payment
plan or the community restitution plan accordingly, the court may refer
the unpaid monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other monetary
obligation for civil enforcement until all monetary obligations,
including those imposed under subsections (3) and (4) of this section,
have been paid, and court authorized community restitution has been
completed, or until the court has entered into a new time payment or
community restitution agreement with the person. For those infractions
subject to suspension under RCW 46.20.289, the court shall notify the
department of the person's failure to meet the conditions of the plan,
and the department shall suspend the person's driver's license or
driving privileges.
(b) If a person has not entered into a payment plan with the court
and has not paid the monetary obligation in full on or before the time
established for payment, the court may refer the unpaid monetary
penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other monetary obligation to a
collections agency until all monetary obligations have been paid,
including those imposed under subsections (3) and (4) of this section,
or until the person has entered into a payment plan under this section.
For those infractions subject to suspension under RCW 46.20.289, the
court shall notify the department of the person's delinquency, and the
department shall suspend the person's driver's license or driving
privileges.
(c) If the payment plan is to be administered by the court, the
court may assess the person a reasonable administrative fee to be
wholly retained by the city or county with jurisdiction. The
administrative fee shall not exceed ten dollars per infraction or
twenty-five dollars per payment plan, whichever is less.
(d) Nothing in this section precludes a court from contracting with
outside entities to administer its payment plan system. When outside
entities are used for the administration of a payment plan, the court
may assess the person a reasonable fee for such administrative
services, which fee may be calculated on a periodic, percentage, or
other basis.
(e) If a court authorized community restitution program for
offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court may allow
conversion of all or part of the monetary obligations due under this
section to court authorized community restitution in lieu of time
payments if the person is unable to make reasonable time payments.
(7) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section
and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a
person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed:
(a) A fee of five dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances
shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical
services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040;
(b) A fee of ten dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances
shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the Washington auto
theft prevention authority account; ((and))
(c) A fee of two dollars per infraction. Revenue from this fee
shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the traumatic
brain injury account established in RCW 74.31.060; and
(d) A fee of fifty cents per infraction. Revenues from this fee
must be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the state DNA
database account established in RCW 43.43.7532.
(8)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this
section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this
section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction other
than of RCW 46.61.527 or 46.61.212 shall be assessed an additional
penalty of twenty dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend
the additional penalty unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent. If a court authorized community restitution program for
offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court shall allow
offenders to offset all or a part of the penalty due under this
subsection (8) by participation in the court authorized community
restitution program.
(b) Eight dollars and fifty cents of the additional penalty under
(a) of this subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer. The
remaining revenue from the additional penalty must be remitted under
chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited in the
state general fund. The balance of the revenue received by the county
or city treasurer under this subsection must be deposited into the
county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the city or
county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any
liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.
(9) If a legal proceeding, such as garnishment, has commenced to
collect any delinquent amount owed by the person for any penalty
imposed by the court under this section, the court may, at its
discretion, enter into a payment plan.
(10) The monetary penalty for violating RCW 46.37.395 is: (a) Two
hundred fifty dollars for the first violation; (b) five hundred dollars
for the second violation; and (c) seven hundred fifty dollars for each
violation thereafter.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.43.690 and 1992 c 129 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a person has been adjudged guilty of violating any
criminal statute of this state and a crime laboratory analysis was
performed by a state crime laboratory, in addition to any other
disposition, penalty, or fine imposed, the court shall levy a crime
laboratory analysis fee of one hundred dollars for each offense for
which the person was convicted. ((Upon a verified petition by the
person assessed the fee, the court may suspend payment of all or part
of the fee if it finds that the person does not have the ability to
pay)) The court may not suspend, reduce, or defer payment of the fee.
(2) When a minor has been adjudicated a juvenile offender for an
offense which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a violation
of any criminal statute of this state and a crime laboratory analysis
was performed, in addition to any other disposition imposed, the court
shall assess a crime laboratory analysis fee of one hundred dollars for
each adjudication. Upon a verified petition by a minor assessed the
fee, the court may suspend payment of all or part of the fee (([if]))
if it finds that the minor does not have the ability to pay the fee.
(3) All crime laboratory analysis fees assessed under this section
shall be collected by the clerk of the court and forwarded to the state
general fund, to be used only for crime laboratories. The clerk may
retain five dollars to defray the costs of collecting the fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---