BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter may be known and cited as the
debt settlement services act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Affiliate" means:
(a) A person that controls, is controlled by, or is under common
control with the provider;
(b) An executive officer of or individual performing similar
functions with respect to the provider;
(c) A director of or individual performing similar functions with
respect to the provider; and
(d) An executive officer or director of or an individual performing
similar functions with respect to a person described in (a) of this
subsection.
(2) "Agreement" means a contract between a provider and an
individual for the performance of debt settlement services.
(3) "Business address" means the physical location of a business,
including the name and number of a street.
(4) "Business day" means Monday through Saturday excluding
federally recognized bank holidays.
(5) "Concessions" means assent to repayment of a debt on terms more
favorable to an individual than the terms of the contract between the
individual and a creditor.
(6) "Consumer" means an individual who has unsecured debt, which
arises out of personal, family, or household obligations, and who has
executed an agreement with a provider.
(7) "Control" means the right to control ten percent or more of the
voting power of another person.
(8) "Creditor" means a person that has extended credit to an
individual.
(9) "Debt settlement services" means services as an intermediary
between an individual and one or more unsecured creditors of the
individual for the purpose of obtaining concessions involving a
reduction in principal or interest of the individual's unsecured debt.
(10) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(11) "Director" means the director of the department.
(12) "Financial institution" means any person doing business under
the laws of any state or the United States relating to commercial
banks, bank holding companies, savings banks, savings and loan
associations, trust companies, or credit unions.
(13) "Good faith" means honesty in fact and the observance of
reasonable standards of fair dealing.
(14) "Individual" means a natural person.
(15) "Licensee" means a provider that possesses a valid license
issued pursuant to section 3 of this act. For purposes of an
enforcement action under sections 23, 24, and 27 of this act,
"licensee" also means a provider, whether located within or outside
this state, who fails to obtain the license required by this chapter.
(16) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, or any other legal or commercial entity. "Person" does
not include a public corporation, government or governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.
(17) "Principal amount of the debt" means the amount of a debt at
the time of the execution of an agreement for debt settlement services.
(18) "Program" means a plan or strategy in which a provider
furnishes debt settlement services.
(19) "Provider" means a person required to be licensed pursuant to
this chapter and that provides, offers to provide, or agrees to provide
debt settlement services for compensation.
(20) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible
medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is
retrievable in perceivable form.
(21) "Statement of accounting" means a written or electronic
document that a provider prepares for a consumer in accordance with
section 16 of this act.
(22) "Third-party payment processor" means an entity that holds, or
has access to, or can effectuate procession of, by any means, the
moneys of a licensee's debtors, or distributes, or is in the chain of
distribution of such moneys, to the creditors of such debtors, pursuant
to an agreement or contract with the licensee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A person may not engage in or advertise
for debt settlement services in this state unless such person has first
obtained a debt settlement services license from the director.
(2) A provider shall obtain a license for its primary business
address and shall identify each branch location.
(3) A license is not transferable or assignable.
(4) A licensee shall file a bond in an amount and form provided in
section 6 of this act before it may conduct business in this state.
(5) A licensee may not conduct business in this state under a
business name other than the business name that is listed on its
license. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a licensee may do business
under a trade name, provided that the licensee has registered such
trade name with the department and that the department does not object
to the use of the trade name on the basis that it is similar to a
currently existing licensee name or trade name.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following persons are exempt from this
chapter:
(1) A provider's employees who perform debt settlement services on
the provider's behalf in the regular course of their employment;
(2) Judicial officers, individuals acting under the direction of a
court, or assignees for creditors' benefit;
(3) A financial institution;
(4) Attorneys licensed to practice law in this state who provide
debt settlement services to consumers with whom the attorney also
provides legal services within an attorney-client relationship to, and
who do not, directly or indirectly, solicit debt settlement services
business;
(5) A money transmitter licensed under chapter 19.230 RCW if such
persons do not perform debt settlement services;
(6) Creditors or the creditors' employees who negotiate debt
settlement with individuals or providers;
(7) Officers or employees of the United States or a state of the
United States who perform debt settlement services for individuals on
behalf of the federal government, any state, a municipality or a state
agency, and receive compensation solely from such governmental
entities;
(8) Certified public accountants licensed in this state who provide
debt settlement services to consumers with whom the certified public
accountant also provides accounting services within an accountant-client relationship to, and who do not, directly or indirectly, solicit
debt settlement services business;
(9) Financial planners licensed in this state who provide financial
planning services provided in a financial planner-client relationship
to, and who do not, directly or indirectly, solicit debt settlement
services business;
(10) A title insurer, escrow agent licensed under chapter 18.44
RCW, or other person that provides bill-paying services if the
provision of debt settlement is incidental to the bill-paying services;
(11) A third-party payment processor which does not provide debt
settlement services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The application for the license and the
application for the license renewal must be in a form prescribed by the
director, signed under oath and containing information as the director
determines. Applicants shall pay an application fee set by rule. The
director shall evaluate the applicant's financial responsibility,
character, reputation, integrity, and general fitness to determine
whether the applicant will act lawfully, honestly, fairly, soundly, and
efficiently in the public interest. The license is effective for a
period of one year or less, depending on the date that it is issued,
and expires on the last day of December each calendar year in which it
is issued. The director shall determine the license renewal fee and
the information required for an application by rule.
(2) The director may participate in a multistate licensing system
for the sharing of regulatory information and for the licensing and
application, by electronic or other means, of entities engaged in the
business of debt settlement services. The director may establish
requirements for participation by an applicant in a multistate
licensing system which may vary from the provisions set out in this
section and section 8 of this act. The applicant shall pay directly to
such multistate licensing system any additional fee relating to
participation in such multistate licensing system.
(3) As part of or in connection with an application for a license
under this section, or periodically upon license renewal, each officer,
director, and owner applicant shall furnish information concerning his
or her identity, including fingerprints for submission to the
Washington state patrol, the federal bureau of investigation, or any
governmental agency or entity authorized to receive this information
for a state and national criminal history background check, personal
history, experience, business record, purposes, and other pertinent
facts, as the director may reasonably require. The applicant must pay
the cost of collecting fingerprints and the cost of processing the
fingerprints by the department. As part of or in connection with an
application for a license under this chapter, or periodically upon
license renewal, the director is authorized to receive criminal history
record information that includes nonconviction data as defined in RCW
10.97.030. The director may only disseminate nonconviction data
obtained under this section to criminal justice agencies. This section
does not apply to financial institutions regulated under chapters 31.12
and 31.13 RCW and Titles 30, 32, and 33 RCW.
(4) The director may waive one or more requirements of this section
or permit an applicant to submit other information in lieu of the
required information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) At the time of filing an application for
a license, or any renewal or reinstatement of a debt settlement
services license, the applicant shall provide satisfactory evidence to
the director of having obtained the following as evidence of financial
responsibility:
(a) At the time of application, the applicant must inform the
director as to whether the applicant will receive or hold customer
funds. If so, the department shall require the applicant to obtain a
fidelity bond, and surety bond if necessary, as follows:
(i) A fidelity bond providing coverage in the aggregate amount of
one hundred fifty thousand dollars with a deductible no greater than
ten thousand dollars covering each officer, partner, and employee of
the applicant engaged in providing debt settlement services;
(ii) A surety bond in the amount of ten thousand dollars executed
by the applicant as obligor and by a surety company authorized to do a
surety business in this state as surety, unless the fidelity bond
obtained by the licensee to satisfy the requirement in (a) of this
subsection does not have a deductible. The bond must run to the state
of Washington as obligee, and must run to the benefit of the state and
any person or persons who suffer loss by reason of the applicant's or
its employee's violation of this chapter.
(b) If at the time of application the applicant informs the
director that it will not hold or receive consumer funds, the licensee
is only required to obtain a surety bond in the aggregate amount of
fifty thousand dollars executed by the applicant as obligor and by a
surety company authorized to do a surety business in this state as
surety. The bond must run to the state of Washington as obligee, and
must run to the benefit of the state and any person or persons who
suffer loss by reason of the applicant's or its employee's violation of
this chapter. A licensee that holds only a surety bond may not accept
or hold consumer funds prior to notifying the department and obtaining
a fidelity bond in compliance with (a) of this subsection.
(c) The surety bonds described in (a) and (b) of this subsection
must be conditioned that the obligor as licensee will faithfully
conform to and abide by this chapter and all rules adopted under this
chapter, and must reimburse all persons who suffer loss by reason of a
violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. The
bond must be continuous and may be canceled by the surety only upon the
surety giving written notice to the director of its intent to cancel
the bond. The cancellation is effective thirty days after the notice
is received by the director. Whether or not the bond is renewed,
continued, reinstated, reissued, or otherwise extended, replaced, or
modified, including increases or decreases in the penal sum, it must
be considered one continuous obligation, and the surety upon the bond
is not liable in an aggregate amount exceeding the penal sum set forth
on the face of the bond. In no event may the penal sum, or any portion
thereof, at two or more points in time be added together in determining
the surety's liability. The bond is not liable for any penalties
imposed on the licensee including, but not limited to, any increased
damages or attorneys' fees, or both, awarded under RCW 19.86.090.
(d) For purposes of (a) through (c) of this subsection, "employee"
means any individual whose status in the company is that of a W-2
employee for purposes of federal income tax reporting, independent
contractor, sole proprietor, partner, officer, member, or manager.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a "fidelity bond" means a
primary commercial blanket bond or its equivalent satisfactory to the
director and written by an insurer authorized to transact this line of
business in the state of Washington. The bond must provide fidelity
coverage for any fraudulent or dishonest acts committed by any one or
more of the officers, partners, sole practitioners, and employees of
the applicant engaged in debt settlement services transactions acting
alone or in collusion with others. This bond must be for the sole
benefit of the licensee and under no circumstances whatsoever may the
bonding company be liable under the bond to any other party unless the
officer, partner, or sole practitioner commits a fraudulent or
dishonest act, in which case, the bond must be for the benefit of the
harmed consumer. The bond must name the licensee as obligee and must
protect the obligee against the loss of money or other real or personal
property belonging to the obligee, or in which the obligee has a
pecuniary interest, or for which the obligee is legally liable or held
by the obligee in any capacity, whether the obligee is legally liable
therefor or not. A licensee's bond must be maintained until all
accounts have been reconciled and any trust account balance is zero.
The bond may be canceled by the insurer upon delivery of thirty days'
written notice to the director and to the licensee. In the event that
the fidelity bond required under this subsection is not reasonably
available, the director may adopt rules to implement a surety bond
requirement.
(3) Except as provided in section 7 of this act, the fidelity bond
and surety bond required by this section must be kept in full force and
effect as a condition precedent to the licensee's authority to transact
debt settlement services business in this state, and the licensee shall
supply the director with satisfactory evidence thereof upon request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The director shall, within thirty days after
a written request, hold a public hearing to determine whether either
the fidelity bond or surety bond, or both, specified in section 6 of
this act is reasonably available to a substantial number of licensees.
If the director determines and the insurance commissioner concurs that
the bond or bonds are not reasonably available, the director shall
waive the requirements for such bond or bonds for a fixed period of
time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) A provider shall obtain a renewal of its
debt settlement services license annually.
(2) An application for renewal of a license as a provider must be
in a form prescribed by the department, signed under penalty of
perjury, and:
(a) Be accompanied by the fee established by the department;
(b) Disclose any changes in the information contained in the
applicant's application for license or its immediately previous
application for renewal, as applicable; and
(c) Provide any other information that the department may
reasonably require to perform the department's duties under this
section and section 5 of this act to ensure that the minimum standards
for licensing continue to be satisfied.
(3) If a provider files a timely and complete application for
renewal of license, the license remains effective until the department,
in a record, notifies the applicant of a denial and states the reasons
for the denial.
(4) If the department denies an application for renewal of a
license as a provider, the applicant may appeal and request a hearing
under chapter 34.05 RCW. While the appeal is pending, the applicant
shall continue to provide debt settlement services to individuals with
whom it has agreements. If the denial is affirmed, the applicant shall
continue to provide debt settlement services to individuals with whom
it has agreements until, with the approval of the department, it
transfers the agreements to another licensed provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 An applicant or licensee shall notify the
department no later than ten days after a material change in the
information provided in an application for licensure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) A licensee shall pay an annual
assessment as established in rule by the director no later than the
annual assessment due date or, if the annual assessment due date is not
a business day, on the next business day. In setting an annual
assessment amount, the director may base the assessment on volume of
debt settlement services business conducted in this state, debt
settlement fees received from residents of this state, or such other
method that fairly apportions the assessment obligation among
licensees. The director may set a minimum yearly assessment amount.
(2) A licensee shall submit an accurate annual report with the
annual assessment, in a form and in a medium prescribed by the director
in rule. As part of the annual report, the director may require a copy
of the licensee's most recent audited annual financial statement or any
such other information that the director deems necessary in connection
with reviewing the assessment amount that is due. In addition, the
report must contain any additional information required by the director
related to the conduct of a licensee's business.
(3) If a licensee does not file an annual report or pay its annual
assessment by the annual assessment due date, the director or the
director's designee shall send the licensee a notice of suspension and
assess the licensee a late fee not to exceed twenty-five percent of the
annual assessment as established in rule by the director. The
licensee's annual report and payment of both the annual assessment and
the late fee must arrive in the department's offices by 5:00 p.m. on
the thirtieth day after the assessment due date or any extension of
time granted by the director, unless that date is not a business day,
in which case the licensee's annual report and payment of both the
annual assessment and the late fee must arrive in the department's
offices by 5:00 p.m. on the next occurring business day. If the
licensee's annual report and payment of both the annual assessment and
late fee do not arrive by that date, the expiration of the licensee's
license is effective at 5:00 p.m. on the thirtieth day after the
assessment due date, unless that date is not a business day, in which
case the expiration of the licensee's license is effective at 5:00 p.m.
on the next occurring business day. The director, or the director's
designee, may reinstate the license if, within twenty days after its
effective date, the licensee files the annual report and pays both the
annual assessment and the late fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The director may deny a license if:
(1) The applicant does not satisfy the criteria set forth in
section 5 of this act;
(2) The application contains information that is materially
erroneous or incomplete;
(3) The applicant fails to provide information that the director
may request, in a timely manner or within the time specified by the
director;
(4) An officer, director, member, or principal of the applicant's
business has (a) been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to a
felony, or (b) committed an act involving fraud, deceit, or dishonesty;
(5) An officer, director, member, or principal of the applicant has
had a professional license revoked, suspended, or subjected to
administrative action in any jurisdiction;
(6) The applicant or any of its officers, directors, members, or
principals has defaulted in the payment of money collected for others;
(7) The applicant's license has been revoked or suspended in
another jurisdiction; or
(8) The applicant has engaged in unlicensed debt settlement
services in this state or otherwise committed violations of this
chapter after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The director may suspend, revoke, or
deny renewal of a license if:
(a) A licensee has violated this chapter or any rule adopted
hereunder or any other law applicable to the conduct of its business;
(b) A fact or condition exists that, if it had existed when the
licensee applied for a license, would have warranted the director
refusing to issue the initial license;
(c) The licensee does not satisfy the criteria required under
section 5 of this act;
(d) The licensee has refused to permit the director to examine the
licensee's books and records under this chapter, failed to comply with
section 20 of this act, or made a material misrepresentation or
omission in complying with section 20 of this act; or
(e) The licensee has failed to comply with any written directive or
order of the director.
(2) If the director suspends, revokes, or denies renewal of a
license, the director may seek a court order to seize the licensee's
books, records, accounts, property, or money in a trust account
maintained by the provider.
(3) A licensee must receive notice and a hearing under chapter
34.05 RCW before the director revokes or suspends a license.
(4) A licensee may deliver a written notice to the director to
surrender its license. However, if a licensee surrenders its license,
its civil or criminal liability for acts committed before the surrender
is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) Before an individual consents to pay
for goods or services offered, a provider shall disclose truthfully, in
a clear and conspicuous manner, the following material information:
(a) A good faith estimate of the amount of time necessary to
achieve the represented results;
(b) To the extent the debt settlement services may include a
settlement offer to any of the individual's creditors or debt
collectors:
(i) A good faith estimate of the time by which the provider will
start to make bona fide settlement offers to the individual's
creditors;
(ii) A good faith estimate of the amount of money or the percentage
of each outstanding debt that the individual will need to accumulate
before the provider will make a bona fide settlement offer to one or
more of such creditors;
(iii) The cost to the individual for providing debt settlement
services;
(c) To the extent that any aspect of the debt settlement services
relies upon or results in the individual's failure to make timely
payments to creditors or debt collectors, that the use of the debt
settlement services may adversely affect the individual's
creditworthiness, may result in the individual being subject to
collection actions or sued by creditors or debt collectors, and may
increase the amount of money the individual owes due to the accrual of
fees and interest; and
(d) To the extent that the provider requests or requires the
individual to place funds in an account at a financial institution,
that the individual owns the funds held in the account and that the
individual may withdraw from the debt settlement services agreement at
any time without penalty.
(2) A provider may not misrepresent, directly or by implication,
any material aspect of any debt settlement services including, but not
limited to: The amount of money or the percentage of the debt amount
that an individual may save by using the service; the effect of the
service on the individual's creditworthiness; the effect of the service
on collection efforts of the individual's creditors or debt collectors;
the percentage or number of individuals who attain the represented
results; and whether debt settlement services are offered or provided
by a nonprofit entity.
(3) A provider may not directly or indirectly employ any scheme,
device, or artifice to defraud or mislead consumers or to defraud any
person.
(4) A provider may not engage in any unfair or deceptive practice
toward any person.
(5) A provider may not receive payment of any fee or consideration
for any debt settlement services until and unless:
(a) The provider has renegotiated, settled, reduced, or otherwise
altered the terms of at least one debt under a debt settlement program;
(b) The individual has made at least one payment to a creditor in
furtherance of a settlement with that creditor; and
(c) The fee or consideration for settling each individual debt
enrolled in a debt settlement plan either:
(i) Bears the same proportional relationship to the total fee for
settling the entire debt balance as the individual debt amount bears to
the entire debt amount. The individual debt amount and the entire debt
amount are amounts owed at the time the debt was enrolled on the debt
relief service; or
(ii) Is a percentage of the amount saved as a result of the
settlement. The percentage charged may not change from one individual
debt to another. The amount saved is the difference between the amount
owed at the time the debt was enrolled in the debt relief service and
the amount actually paid to satisfy the debt.
(6) Unless authorized by another chapter, a provider may not
provide services for compensation as an intermediary between an
individual and one or more secured creditors of the individual for
purposes of obtaining concessions involving a reduction in principal or
interest of the individual's secured debt.
(7) Nothing in this section prohibits requesting or requiring the
individual to place funds in an account to be used for payment of the
provider's fees and for payments to creditors or debt collectors in
connection with the renegotiation settlement, reduction, or other
alteration of the terms of payment or other terms of debt if:
(a) The funds are held in a specifically designated account at a
financial institution;
(b) The individual, not the provider, owns and controls the funds
held in the account and is paid accrued interest on the account, if
any;
(c) If the provider does not administer the account, the entity
administering the account is not owned or controlled by the provider
and is not an affiliate of the provider;
(d) The entity administering the account does not give or accept
any money or other compensation in exchange for referrals of business
by the provider; and
(e) The individual may withdraw from the debt settlement services
agreement at any time without penalty, and receives all funds in the
account, other than funds earned by the provider in compliance with
this section, as specified in the account agreement between the
individual and the financial institution.
(8) If a provider is not licensed as required by this chapter when
an individual assents to an agreement, the agreement is voidable by the
individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) A licensee shall maintain a separate
trust account at a federally insured bank to hold funds that it
receives, directly or indirectly, from consumers, other than fees
received pursuant to section 13 of this act. Trust accounts shall
comply with rules that the director adopts pursuant to this chapter.
(2) A licensee may not commingle money collected for a creditor
with the licensee's own funds or use any part of a consumer's money in
the conduct of the licensee's business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A licensee may not impose charges or
receive payment for debt settlement services until the licensee and the
individual have signed an agreement that complies with section 13 of
this act and the rules adopted under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) A statement of accounting must contain
the following information:
(a) The amount of money that the consumer has paid to the provider
since the provider prepared the last statement;
(b) The amounts, dates, and creditors that the provider paid on the
consumer's behalf since the provider prepared the last statement;
(c) The amounts of money that the provider collected as
compensation from the consumer's payments;
(d) The amount of money that the provider holds in trust for the
consumer; and
(e) If, since the last statement date, the consumer's creditor
accepted a payment from the provider in full or partial satisfaction of
the consumer's debt with that creditor: (i) The total amount of money
that the provider paid the creditor to settle a consumer's debt; (ii)
the amount of the debt at the time the provider and a consumer entered
their agreement; (iii) the amount of a debt at the time a consumer's
creditor agreed to settle a debt with a provider; and (iv) the amount
of compensation that the provider receives to settle a debt.
(2) A licensee shall distribute a statement of accounting to a
consumer:
(a) While an agreement is in effect: (i) At least once per month;
and (ii) on or before the fifth business day after a consumer demands
a statement of accounting from a licensee; provided, however, a
licensee may refuse to comply with more than one request for a
statement of accounting per month; and
(b) On the day on which a consumer or a licensee rescinds or
terminates an agreement.
(3) Notwithstanding the requirement set forth in subsection (2)(a)
and (b) of this section, a provider that enables, or arranges to
enable, twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week, electronic access
by a consumer to all of the consumer's deposit account transaction
information including, but not limited to, all deposit and withdrawal
activity, and electronic access by a consumer to debt settlement
account activity including, but not limited to, such settlement
information as account status, settlement dates, settlement amounts,
and fees paid, must be deemed to have satisfied the statement of
account distribution requirements in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) A person may not advertise, announce,
broadcast, display, distribute, print, publish, televise, or permit any
other person to advertise, announce, broadcast, display, distribute,
print, publish, or televise on its behalf a statement or representation
that is deceptive, false, or misleading.
(2) Advertisements that a licensee authorizes must clearly state
its licensed business name and its license number. The director may
establish rules that waive or modify this requirement for some types of
advertising where such a disclosure is not practicable and where the
consumer has a way to easily obtain the information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A provider shall act in good faith in all
matters under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If a licensee delegates a duty or
obligation that this chapter mandates to another person, including an
independent contractor, the licensee is liable for the other person's
conduct that violates an agreement, this chapter, or any rule of the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1) The director or the director's designee
may at any time examine and investigate the business and examine the
books, accounts, records, and files, or other information, wherever
located, of any licensee or person who the director has reason to
believe is engaging in the business governed by this chapter. For
these purposes, the director or the director's designee may require the
attendance of and examine under oath all persons whose testimony may be
required about the business or the subject matter of the investigation.
The director or the director's designee may require the production of
original books, accounts, records, files, or other information, or may
make copies of such original books, accounts, records, files, or other
information. The director or the director's designee may issue a
subpoena or subpoena duces tecum requiring attendance and testimony, or
the production of the books, accounts, records, files, or other
information. The director shall collect from the licensee the actual
cost of the examination or investigation.
(2) The director may recover the costs in connection with both
investigations and examinations. In connection with the examination,
the director may require a licensee to pay expenses on or before the
thirtieth day after the licensee receives an invoice, which the
department incurs in conducting an examination, including expenses for
examination staff time and travel within or outside the state.
(3) The director may distribute any information, report,
examination, or statement relating to a licensee to any regulatory or
law enforcement agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 (1) The director or authorized assistants
may apply for and obtain a superior court order approving and
authorizing a subpoena in advance of its issuance. The application may
be made in the county where the subpoenaed person resides or is found,
or the county where the subpoenaed documents, records, or evidence are
located, or in Thurston county. The application must:
(a) State that an order is sought under this section;
(b) Adequately specify the documents, records, evidence, or
testimony; and
(c) Include a declaration made under oath that an investigation is
being conducted for a lawfully authorized purpose related to an
investigation within the department's authority and that the subpoenaed
documents, records, evidence, or testimony are reasonably related to an
investigation within the department's authority.
(2) When an application under this section is made to the
satisfaction of the court, the court must issue an order approving the
subpoena. An order under this subsection constitutes authority of law
for the agency to subpoena the documents, records, evidence, or
testimony.
(3) The director or authorized assistants may seek approval and a
court may issue an order under this section without prior notice to any
person, including the person to whom the subpoena is directed and the
person who is the subject of an investigation. An application for
court approval is subject to the fee and process set forth in RCW
36.18.012(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 The licensee shall keep and use in the
business such books, accounts, records, papers, documents, files, and
other information as will enable the director to determine whether the
licensee is complying with this chapter and with the rules adopted by
the director under this chapter. The director shall have free access
to such books, accounts, records, papers, documents, files, and other
information wherever located. Every licensee shall preserve the books,
accounts, records, papers, documents, files, and other information
relevant to providing debt settlement services for at least three years
after providing such services. A licensee or person subject to
examination or investigation under this chapter may not withhold,
abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, or secrete any books, accounts,
records, papers, documents, files, or other information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 (1) The director may issue and serve upon
a licensee or applicant, or any director, officer, sole proprietor,
partner, or controlling person of a licensee or applicant, a statement
of charges if, in the opinion of the director, any licensee or
applicant, or any director, officer, sole proprietor, partner, or
controlling person of a licensee or applicant:
(a) Is engaging or has engaged in an unsafe or unsound financial
practice in conducting a business governed by this chapter;
(b) Is violating or has violated this chapter, including violations
of:
(i) Any rules, orders, or subpoenas issued by the director under
any act;
(ii) Any condition imposed in writing by the director in connection
with the granting of any application or other request by the licensee;
or
(iii) Any written agreement made with the director;
(c) Is about to do the acts prohibited in (a) or (b) of this
subsection when the opinion that the threat exists is based upon
reasonable cause;
(d) Obtains a license by means of fraud, misrepresentation,
concealment, or through mistake or inadvertence of the director;
(e) Provides false statements or omits material information on an
application;
(f) Knowingly or negligently omits material information during or
in response to an examination or in connection with an investigation by
the director;
(g) Fails to pay a fee required by the director or any multistate
licensing system prescribed by the director, or fails to maintain the
required bond;
(h) Commits a crime against the laws of any jurisdiction involving
moral turpitude, financial misconduct, or dishonest dealings. For the
purposes of this section, a certified copy of the final holding of any
court, tribunal, agency, or administrative body of competent
jurisdiction is conclusive evidence in any hearing under this chapter;
(i) Knowingly commits or is a party to any material fraud,
misrepresentation, concealment, conspiracy, collusion, trick, scheme,
or device whereby any other person relying upon the word,
representation, or conduct acts to his or her injury or damage;
(j) Converts any money or its equivalent to his or her own use or
to the use of his or her principal or of any other person;
(k) Fails to disclose any information within his or her knowledge
or fails to produce any document, book, or record in his or her
possession for inspection by the director upon demand;
(l) Commits any act of fraudulent or dishonest dealing. For the
purposes of this section, a certified copy of the final holding of any
court, tribunal, agency, or administrative body of competent
jurisdiction is conclusive evidence in any hearing under this chapter;
(m) Commits an act or engages in conduct that demonstrates
incompetence or untrustworthiness, or is a source of injury and loss to
the public;
(n) Violates any applicable state or federal law relating to the
activities governed by this chapter.
(2) The statement of charges must be issued under chapter 34.05
RCW. The director or the director's designee may impose the following
sanctions against any licensee or applicant, or any directors,
officers, sole proprietors, partners, controlling persons, or employees
of a licensee or applicant:
(a) Deny, revoke, suspend, or condition a license;
(b) Order the licensee or person to cease and desist from practices
that violate this chapter or constitute unsafe and unsound financial
practices;
(c) Impose a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars per day per
violation for each day's violation of this chapter;
(d) Order restitution or refunds or both to consumers or other
parties for violations of this chapter or take other affirmative action
as necessary to comply with this chapter; and
(e) Remove from office or ban from participation in the affairs of
any licensee any director, officer, sole proprietor, partner,
controlling person, or employee of a licensee.
(3) The proceedings to impose the sanctions described in subsection
(2) of this section, including any hearing or appeal of the statement
of charges, are governed by chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) Unless the licensee or person personally appears at the hearing
or is represented by a duly authorized representative, the licensee is
deemed to have consented to the statement of charges and the sanctions
imposed in the statement of charges.
(5) Except to the extent prohibited by another statute, the
director may engage in informal settlement of complaints or enforcement
actions including, but not limited to, payment to the department for
purposes of financial literacy and education programs authorized under
RCW 43.320.150.
(6) The director may enter into a consent order at any time with a
person to resolve a matter arising under this chapter or a rule adopted
or order issued under this chapter. A consent order must be signed by
the person to whom it is issued or by the person's authorized
representative, and must indicate agreement with the terms contained in
the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Whenever the director determines that the
acts specified in section 23 of this act or their continuation is
likely to cause insolvency or substantial injury to the public, the
director may also issue a temporary cease and desist order requiring
the licensee to cease and desist from the violation or practice. The
order becomes effective upon service upon the licensee and remains
effective unless set aside, limited, or suspended by a court under
section 25 of this act pending the completion of the administrative
proceedings under the notice and until such time as the director
dismisses the charges specified in the notice or until the effective
date of the cease and desist order issued against the licensee under
section 23 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Within ten days after a licensee has been
served with a temporary cease and desist order, the licensee may apply
to the superior court in the county of its principal place of business
or Thurston county for an injunction setting aside, limiting, or
suspending the order pending the completion of the administrative
proceedings pursuant to the notice served under section 24 of this act.
The superior court has jurisdiction to issue the injunction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 In the case of a violation or threatened
violation of a temporary cease and desist order issued under section 24
of this act, the director may apply to the superior court of the county
of the principal place of business of the licensee or Thurston county
for an injunction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 Upon application by the director or any
other interested party and upon a showing that the interest of
creditors or consumers so requires, the superior court may appoint a
receiver to take over, operate, or liquidate any licensee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 (1) The requirements under any federal law
or laws of another state regarding the privacy or confidentiality of
any information or material provided to the department, and any
privilege arising under federal or state law, including the rules of
any federal or state court, with respect to that information or
material, continues to apply to the information or material after the
information or material has been disclosed to the department. If
consistent with applicable law, the information and material may be
shared with all state and federal regulatory officials without the loss
of privilege or the loss of confidentiality protections provided by
federal or state law.
(2) When the department is a party to a memoranda of understanding
or enforcement order issued by the consumer financial protection
bureau, the privacy, confidentiality, or privilege accorded to the
document by federal law continues to apply even after the memoranda or
order has been signed by the director or a designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 A person licensed as a provider under this
chapter is exempt from chapter 18.28 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 The director shall adopt rules for the
administration and enforcement of this chapter and shall establish
reasonable fees by rule sufficient to cover the costs of administering
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 The legislature finds that the practices
governed by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. Any violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act or practice and an unfair method of competition
in the conduct of trade or commerce in violation of RCW 19.86.020.
Remedies provided by chapter 19.86 RCW are cumulative and not
exclusive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 This chapter modifies, limits, and
supersedes the electronic signatures in global and national commerce
act (P.L. 106-229, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq.), but does not modify,
limit, or supersede section 101(c) of the electronic signatures in
global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c), or authorize
electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b)
of the electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15
U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

Sec. 33 RCW 18.28.010 and 2012 c 56 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the
following words and phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter shall
have the following meanings:
(1) "Debt adjuster," which includes any person known as a debt
pooler, debt manager, debt consolidator, debt prorater, or credit
counselor, is any person engaging in or holding himself or herself out
as engaging in the business of debt adjusting for compensation. The
term shall not include:
(a) Attorneys-at-law, escrow agents, accountants, broker-dealers in
securities, or investment advisors in securities, while performing
services solely incidental to the practice of their professions;
(b) Any person, partnership, association, or corporation doing
business under and as permitted by any law of this state or of the
United States relating to banks, consumer finance businesses, consumer
loan companies, trust companies, mutual savings banks, savings and loan
associations, building and loan associations, credit unions, crop
credit associations, development credit corporations, industrial
development corporations, title insurance companies, insurance
companies, or third-party account administrators;
(c) Persons who, as employees on a regular salary or wage of an
employer not engaged in the business of debt adjusting, perform credit
services for their employer;
(d) Public officers while acting in their official capacities and
persons acting under court order;
(e) Any person while performing services incidental to the
dissolution, winding up or liquidation of a partnership, corporation,
or other business enterprise;
(f) Nonprofit organizations dealing exclusively with debts owing
from commercial enterprises to business creditors;
(g) Nonprofit organizations engaged in debt adjusting and which do
not assess against the debtor a service charge in excess of fifteen
dollars per month;
(h) Persons licensed as providers of debt settlement services under
chapter 18.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 36 of this act).
(2) "Debt adjusting" means the managing, counseling, settling,
adjusting, prorating, or liquidating of the indebtedness of a debtor,
((or)) and receiving funds for the purpose of distributing said funds
among creditors in payment or partial payment of obligations of a
debtor.
(3) "Debt adjusting agency" is any partnership, corporation, or
association engaging in or holding itself out as engaging in the
business of debt adjusting.
(4) "Financial institution" means any person doing business under
the laws of any state or the United States relating to commercial
banks, bank holding companies, savings banks, savings and loan
associations, trust companies, or credit unions.
(5) "Third-party account administrator" means an independent entity
that holds or administers a dedicated bank account for fees and
payments to creditors, debt collectors, debt adjusters, or debt
adjusting agencies in connection with the renegotiation, settlement,
reduction, or other alteration of the terms of payment or other terms
of a debt.

Sec. 34 RCW 42.56.230 and 2013 c 220 s 1 and 2013 c 336 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following personal information is exempt from public inspection
and copying under this chapter:
(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients;
(2)(a) Personal information:
(i) For a child enrolled in licensed child care in any files
maintained by the department of early learning; or
(ii) For a child enrolled in a public or nonprofit program serving
or pertaining to children, adolescents, or students, including but not
limited to early learning or child care services, parks and recreation
programs, youth development programs, and after-school programs.
(b) Emergency contact information under this subsection (2) may be
provided to appropriate authorities and medical personnel for the
purpose of treating the individual during an emergency situation;
(3) Personal information in the files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;
(4) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would: (a) Be prohibited to such persons
by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, 84.40.340, or any ordinance
authorized under RCW 35.102.145; or (b) violate the taxpayer's right to
privacy or result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer;
(5) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by
other law;
(6) Personal and financial information related to a small loan or
any system ((of)) authorizing a small loan in RCW 31.45.093; and
(7)(a) Any record used to prove identity, age, residential address,
social security number, or other personal information required to apply
for a driver's license or identicard.
(b) Information provided under RCW 46.20.111 that indicates that an
applicant declined to register with the selective service system.
(c) Any record pertaining to a vehicle license plate, driver's
license, or identicard issued under RCW 46.08.066 that, alone or in
combination with any other records, may reveal the identity of an
individual, or reveal that an individual is or was, performing an
undercover or covert law enforcement, confidential public health work,
public assistance fraud, or child support investigative activity. This
exemption does not prevent the release of the total number of vehicle
license plates, drivers' licenses, or identicards that, under RCW
46.08.066, an agency or department has applied for, been issued,
denied, returned, destroyed, lost, and reported for misuse.
(d) Any record pertaining to a vessel registration issued under RCW
88.02.330 that, alone or in combination with any other records, may
reveal the identity of an individual, or reveal that an individual is
or was, performing an undercover or covert law enforcement activity.
This exemption does not prevent the release of the total number of
vessel registrations that, under RCW 88.02.330, an agency or department
has applied for, been issued, denied, returned, destroyed, lost, and
reported for misuse. (((e))) Upon request by the legislature, the
department of licensing shall provide a report to the legislature
containing all of the information in (c) ((and (d))) of this subsection
and this subsection (7)(d) that is subject to public disclosure.
(8) Information obtained by the department of financial
institutions that identifies individuals who have agreements with a
provider of debt settlement services, as provided in section 20 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 This act does not invalidate or make
unlawful contracts executed prior to the effective date of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 Sections 1 through 32 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---