BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.46.020 and 1999 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) ((Until January 1, 1999, every employer shall pay to each of
his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at
a rate of not less than four dollars and ninety cents per hour.
(2) Beginning January 1, 1999, and until January 1, 2000, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than five dollars and
seventy cents per hour.
(3)))(a) Beginning January 1, ((2000)) 2015, and until January 1,
((2001)) 2016, every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees
who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less
than ((six)) ten dollars ((and fifty cents)) per hour.
(((4))) (b) Beginning January 1, 2016, and until January 1, 2017,
every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has
reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than
eleven dollars per hour.
(c) Beginning January 1, 2017, and until January 1, 2018, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than twelve dollars
per hour.
(2)(a) Beginning ((on)) January 1, ((2001)) 2018, and each
following January 1st as set forth under (b) of this subsection, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than the amount
established under (b) of this subsection.
(b) On September 30, ((2000)) 2017, and on each following September
30th, the department of labor and industries shall calculate an
adjusted minimum wage rate to maintain employee purchasing power by
increasing the current year's minimum wage rate by the rate of
inflation. The adjusted minimum wage rate shall be calculated to the
nearest cent using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and
clerical workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve months
prior to each September 1st as calculated by the United States
department of labor. Each adjusted minimum wage rate calculated under
this subsection (((4)))(2)(b) takes effect on the following January
1st.
(((5))) (3) The director shall by regulation establish the minimum
wage for employees under the age of eighteen years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2015.

--- END ---