BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.0237 and 2005 c 351 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Gambling," as used in this chapter, means staking or risking
something of value upon the outcome of a contest of chance or a future
contingent event not under the person's control or influence, upon an
agreement or understanding that the person or someone else will receive
something of value in the event of a certain outcome. Gambling does
not include the use or operation of electronic or electromechanical
amusement machines under RCW 9.46.0241(2), fishing derbies as defined
by this chapter, parimutuel betting and handicapping contests as
authorized by chapter 67.16 RCW, bona fide business transactions valid
under the law of contracts, including, but not limited to, contracts
for the purchase or sale at a future date of securities or commodities,
and agreements to compensate for loss caused by the happening of
chance, including, but not limited to, contracts of indemnity or
guarantee and life, health, or accident insurance. In addition, a
contest of chance which is specifically excluded from the definition of
lottery under this chapter shall not constitute gambling.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.46.0241 and 1994 c 218 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, "gambling
device," as used in this chapter, means: (((1)))
(a) Any device or mechanism the operation of which a right to
money, credits, deposits, or other things of value may be created, in
return for a consideration, as the result of the operation of an
element of chance((,)) including, but not limited to slot machines,
video pull-tabs, video poker, and other electronic games of chance;
(((2)))
(b) Any device or mechanism which, when operated for a
consideration, does not return the same value or thing of value for the
same consideration upon each operation thereof; (((3)))
(c) Any device, mechanism, furniture, fixture, construction, or
installation designed primarily for use in connection with professional
gambling; and (((4)))
(d) Any subassembly or essential part designed or intended for use
in connection with any such device, mechanism, furniture, fixture,
construction, or installation. ((In the application of this
definition,))
(2) For the purposes of this chapter, "gambling device" does not
include:
(a) A pinball machine or similar mechanical amusement device which
confers only an immediate and unrecorded right of replay on players
thereof, which does not contain any mechanism which varies the chance
of winning free games or the number of free games which may be won or
a mechanism or a chute for dispensing coins or a facsimile thereof, and
which prohibits multiple winnings depending upon the number of coins
inserted and requires the playing of five balls individually upon the
insertion of a nickel or dime, as the case may be, to complete any one
operation thereof((, shall not be deemed a gambling device)):
PROVIDED, That owning, possessing, buying, selling, renting, leasing,
financing, holding a security interest in, storing, repairing, and
transporting such pinball machines or similar mechanical amusement
devices shall not be deemed engaging in professional gambling for the
purposes of this chapter and shall not be a violation of this chapter:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That any fee for the purchase or rental of any such
pinball machines or similar amusement devices shall have no relation to
the use to which such machines are put but be based only upon the
market value of any such machine, regardless of the location of or type
of premises where used, and any fee for the storing, repairing, and
transporting thereof shall have no relation to the use to which such
machines are put, but be commensurate with the cost of labor and other
expenses incurred in any such storing, repairing, and transporting;
(b) An electronic or electromechanical amusement machine that meets
the following criteria:
(i) Allows the player to participate in a contest or game that
includes elements of both skill and chance;
(ii) The contest or game is activated by the player through the
insertion of coins or tokens into the machine; and
(iii) Awards prizes, but the prizes are limited to merchandise or
coupons, tickets or tokens redeemable for merchandise, but not monetary
prizes.

--- END ---