BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.12.555 and 2011 c 326 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The application for a quick title of a vehicle must be
submitted by the owner or the owner's representative to the department,
participating county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by
the director on a form furnished or approved by the department and must
contain:
(a) A description of the vehicle, including make, model, vehicle
identification number, type of body, and the odometer reading at the
time of delivery of the vehicle, when required;
(b) The name and address of the person who is to be the registered
owner of the vehicle and, if the vehicle is subject to a security
interest, the name and address of the secured party; and
(c) Other information as may be required by the department.
(2) The application for a quick title must be signed by the person
applying to be the registered owner and be sworn to by that person in
the manner described under RCW 9A.72.085. The department must keep a
copy of the application.
(3) The application for a quick title must be accompanied by:
(a) All fees and taxes due for an application for a certificate of
title, including a quick title service fee under RCW 46.17.160; and
(b) The most recent certificate of title or other satisfactory
evidence of ownership.
(4) All applications for quick title must meet the requirements
established by the department.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "quick title" means a
certificate of title printed at the time of application.
(6) The quick title process authorized under this section may not
be used to obtain the first title issued to a vehicle previously
designated as a salvage vehicle as defined in RCW 46.04.514.
(7) A subagent may process a quick title under this section ((only
after (a) the department has instituted a process in which blank
certificates of title can be inventoried; (b) the county auditor of the
county in which the subagent is located has processed quick titles for
a minimum of six months; and (c) the county auditor approves a request
from a subagent in its county to process quick titles)) in accordance
with rules adopted by the department.

--- END ---