BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.52.180 and 2011 c 336 s 791 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There shall be no liability on the part of anyone including any
person, partnership, corporation, the state of Washington or any
political subdivision thereof who owns or maintains any building or
premises which have been designated by a local organization for
emergency management as a shelter from destructive operations or
attacks by enemies of the United States for any injuries sustained by
any person while in or upon said building or premises, as a result of
the condition of said building or premises or as a result of any act or
omission, or in any way arising from the designation of such premises
as a shelter, when such person has entered or gone upon or into said
building or premises for the purpose of seeking refuge therein during
destructive operations or attacks by enemies of the United States or
during tests ordered by lawful authority, except for an act of willful
negligence by such owner or occupant or his or her servants, agents, or
employees.
(2) All legal liability for damage to property or injury or death
to persons (except an emergency worker, regularly enrolled and acting
as such), caused by acts done or attempted during or while traveling to
or from an emergency or disaster, search and rescue, or training or
exercise authorized by the department in preparation for an emergency
or disaster or search and rescue, under the color of this chapter in a
bona fide attempt to comply therewith, except as provided in
subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section regarding covered
volunteer emergency workers, shall be the obligation of the state of
Washington. Suits may be instituted and maintained against the state
for the enforcement of such liability, or for the indemnification of
persons appointed and regularly enrolled as emergency workers while
actually engaged in emergency management duties, or as members of any
agency of the state or political subdivision thereof engaged in
emergency management activity, or their dependents, for damage done to
their private property, or for any judgment against them for acts done
in good faith in compliance with this chapter: PROVIDED, That the
foregoing shall not be construed to result in indemnification in any
case of willful misconduct, gross negligence, or bad faith on the part
of any agent of emergency management: PROVIDED, That should the United
States or any agency thereof, in accordance with any federal statute,
rule, or regulation, provide for the payment of damages to property
and/or for death or injury as provided for in this section, then and in
that event there shall be no liability or obligation whatsoever upon
the part of the state of Washington for any such damage, death, or
injury for which the United States government assumes liability.
(3) No act or omission by a covered volunteer emergency worker
while engaged in a covered activity shall impose any liability for
civil damages resulting from such an act or omission upon:
(a) The covered volunteer emergency worker;
(b) The supervisor or supervisors of the covered volunteer
emergency worker;
(c) Any facility or their officers or employees;
(d) The employer or sponsoring organization of the covered
volunteer emergency worker;
(e) The owner of the property or vehicle where the act or omission
may have occurred during the covered activity;
(f) Any local organization that registered the covered volunteer
emergency worker; and
(g) The state or any state or local governmental entity.
(4) The immunity in subsection (3) of this section applies only
when the covered volunteer emergency worker was engaged in a covered
activity:
(a) Within the scope of his or her assigned duties;
(b) Under the direction of a local emergency management
organization or the department, or a local law enforcement agency for
search and rescue; and
(c) The act or omission does not constitute gross negligence or
willful or wanton misconduct.
(5) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Covered volunteer emergency worker" means an emergency worker
as defined in RCW 38.52.010 who (i) is not receiving or expecting
compensation as an emergency worker from the state or local government,
or (ii) is not a state or local government employee unless on leave
without pay status.
(b) "Covered activity" means:
(i) Providing assistance or transportation authorized by the
department during an emergency or disaster or search and rescue as
defined in RCW 38.52.010, whether such assistance or transportation is
provided at the scene of the emergency or disaster or search and
rescue, at an alternative care site, at a hospital, or while in route
to or from such sites or between sites; or
(ii) Participating in training or exercise authorized by the
department in preparation for an emergency or disaster or search and
rescue.
(6) Any requirement for a license to practice any professional,
mechanical, or other skill shall not apply to any authorized emergency
worker who shall, in the course of performing his or her duties as
such, practice such professional, mechanical, or other skill during an
emergency described in this chapter.
(7) The provisions of this section shall not affect the right of
any person to receive benefits to which he or she would otherwise be
entitled under this chapter, or under the workers' compensation law, or
under any pension or retirement law, nor the right of any such person
to receive any benefits or compensation under any act of congress.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.09.320 and 2011 c 171 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The department shall issue a certificate of title to the owner of
an off-road vehicle. The owner shall pay the fee established under RCW
46.17.100. Issuance of the certificate of title does not qualify the
vehicle for registration under chapter 46.16A RCW.)) (1) The
application for a certificate of title of an off-road vehicle must be
made by the owner or owner's representative to the department, county
auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director on a form
furnished or approved by the department and must contain:
(a) A description of the off-road vehicle, including make, model,
vehicle identification number or engine serial number if no vehicle
identification number exists, type of body, and model year of the
vehicle;
(b) The name and address of the person who is the registered owner
of the off-road vehicle and, if the off-road vehicle is subject to a
security interest, the name and address of the secured party; and
(c) Other information the department may require.
(2) The application for a certificate of title must be signed by
the person applying to be the registered owner and be sworn to by that
person in the manner described under RCW 9A.72.085.
(3) The owner must pay the fee established under RCW 46.17.100.
(4) Issuance of the certificate of title does not qualify the off-road vehicle for registration under chapter 46.16A RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.09.442 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Any wheeled all-terrain vehicle operated within this state must
display a metal tag to be affixed to the rear of the wheeled all-terrain vehicle. The initial metal tag must be issued with an original
off-road vehicle registration and upon payment of the initial vehicle
license fee under RCW 46.17.350(1)(s). The metal tag must be replaced
every seven years at a cost of two dollars. Revenue from replacement
metal tags must be deposited into the nonhighway and off-road vehicle
activities program account. The department must design the metal tag,
which must:
(a) Be the same size as a motorcycle license plate;
(b) Have the words "RESTRICTED VEHICLE" listed at the top of the
tag;
(c) Contain designated identification through a combination of
letters and numbers;
(d) Leave space at the bottom left corner of the tag for an off-road tab issued under subsection (2) of this section; and
(e) Leave space at the bottom right corner of the tag for an on-road tab, when required, issued under subsection (3) of this section.
(2) A person who operates a wheeled all-terrain vehicle must have
a current and proper off-road vehicle registration, with the
appropriate off-road tab, and pay the annual vehicle license fee as
provided in RCW 46.17.350(1)(s), which must be deposited into the
nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account. The off-road tab must be issued annually by the department upon payment of
initial and renewal vehicle license fees under RCW 46.17.350(1)(s).
(3) A person who operates a wheeled all-terrain vehicle upon a
public roadway must have a current and proper on-road vehicle
registration, with the appropriate on-road tab, which must be of a
bright color that can be seen from a reasonable distance, and pay the
annual vehicle license fee as provided in RCW 46.17.350(1)(r). The on-road tab must be issued annually by the department upon payment of
initial and renewal vehicle license fees under RCW 46.17.350(1)(r).
(4) A wheeled all-terrain vehicle may not be registered for
commercial use.
(5) Wheeled all-terrain vehicle registrations and metal tags are
not required under this chapter for a wheeled all-terrain vehicle owned
by a resident of another state that has a vehicle registration issued
in accordance with the laws of the other state. This exemption applies
only to the extent that a similar exemption or privilege is granted
under the laws of that state.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.09.457 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A person may operate a wheeled all-terrain vehicle upon any
public roadway of this state, not including nonhighway roads and
trails, subject to the following equipment and declaration
requirements:
(a) A person who operates a wheeled all-terrain vehicle must comply
with the following equipment requirements:
(i) Headlights meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.030 and
46.37.040 and used at all times when the vehicle is in motion upon a
highway;
(ii) One tail lamp meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.525 and
used at all times when the vehicle is in motion upon a highway;
however, a utility-type vehicle, as described under RCW 46.09.310, must
have two tail lamps meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.070(1) and to
be used at all times when the vehicle is in motion upon a highway;
(iii) A stop lamp meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.200;
(iv) Reflectors meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.060;
(v) During hours of darkness, as defined in RCW 46.04.200, turn
signals meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.200. Outside of hours of
darkness, the operator must comply with RCW 46.37.200 or 46.61.310;
(vi) A mirror attached to either the right or left handlebar, which
must be located to give the operator a complete view of the highway for
a distance of at least two hundred feet to the rear of the vehicle;
however, a utility-type vehicle, as described under RCW 46.09.310(19),
must have two mirrors meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.400;
(vii) A windshield meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.430,
unless the operator wears glasses, goggles, or a face shield while
operating the vehicle, of a type conforming to rules adopted by the
Washington state patrol;
(viii) A horn or warning device meeting the requirements of RCW
46.37.380;
(ix) Brakes in working order;
(x) A spark arrester and muffling device meeting the requirements
of RCW 46.09.470; and
(xi) For utility-type vehicles, as described under RCW
46.09.310(19), seatbelts meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.510.
(b) A person who operates a wheeled all-terrain vehicle upon a
public roadway must provide a declaration that includes the following:
(i) Documentation of a safety inspection to be completed by a
licensed wheeled all-terrain vehicle dealer or motor vehicle repair
shop in the state of Washington that must outline the vehicle
information and certify under oath that all wheeled all-terrain vehicle
equipment as required under this section meets the requirements
outlined in state and federal law. A person who makes a false
statement regarding the inspection of equipment required under this
section is guilty of false swearing, a gross misdemeanor, under RCW
9A.72.040;
(ii) Documentation that the licensed wheeled all-terrain vehicle
dealer or motor vehicle repair shop did not charge more than fifty
dollars per safety inspection and that the entire safety inspection fee
is paid directly and only to the licensed wheeled all-terrain vehicle
dealer or motor vehicle repair shop;
(iii) A statement that the licensed wheeled all-terrain vehicle
dealer or motor vehicle repair shop is entitled to the full amount
charged for the safety inspection;
(iv) A vehicle identification number verification that must be
completed by a licensed wheeled all-terrain vehicle dealer or motor
vehicle repair shop in the state of Washington; and
(v) A release signed by the owner of the wheeled all-terrain
vehicle and verified by the department, county auditor or other agent,
or subagent appointed by the director that releases the state from any
liability and outlines that the owner understands that the original
wheeled all-terrain vehicle was not manufactured for on-road use and
that it has been modified for use on public roadways.
(2) This section does not apply to emergency services vehicles,
vehicles used for emergency management purposes, or vehicles used in
the production of agricultural and timber products on and across lands
owned, leased, or managed by the owner or operator of the wheeled all-terrain vehicle or the operator's employer.

--- END ---