BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature makes the following
findings:
(1) The state has long relied on incumbent local exchange carriers
as carriers of last resort to provide a public telephone network that
reaches as many consumers as possible, even in areas that are expensive
to serve.
(2) Consumers in all areas of the state should continue to have
access to communications services at reasonable rates.
(3) The rapidly declining revenue of incumbent local exchange
carriers is threatening the ability of these businesses with
obligations to serve as a carrier of last resort from continuing to
provide landline telephone and other communications service in much of
rural Washington.
(4) This declining revenue is attributable to a number of factors,
including but not limited to a loss of federal universal service funds
to subsidize service in high-cost areas, changes in intercarrier
compensation, and the technological transformation in which many for
whom such service is available are switching to relying more heavily on
broadband for communications.
(5) Although the federal government has decided to transition
federal subsidies from the connect America fund and reduce intercarrier
compensation revenues available to incumbent local exchange carriers,
Washington state needs time to develop a strategy before transitioning
away from the decades-long policy of ensuring universal service.
(6) Access to reliable, quality telephone and internet service is
not a luxury but rather a basic staple essential to modern life, and it
is necessary to the health and welfare of all and to the success of the
economy in all our communities, urban and rural, to ensure that such
service is available throughout the state.
(7) Customers in many parts of the state are at grave risk of rate
instability and service interruptions or cessations without a limited
and temporary influx of funds to support additional investments that
rural incumbent local exchange carriers would otherwise have little
hope of recouping in the marketplace.
(8) Changes in the communications marketplace have resulted in a
revenue shortfall of greater than five million dollars for rural
incumbent local exchange carriers in the state.
(9) The effective expenditure limit for the state universal
communications services program, as established by current law
governing the authority of the utilities and transportation commission
to make distributions to an eligible communications provider, is too
low to effectuate the legislature's intent of providing funding that is
adequate to ensure that quality, affordable local communications
services are not interrupted.
(10) As a result of the foregoing, and to enable all consumers in
Washington to access and benefit from a public network that leaves no
community behind, the legislature intends to modify the temporary
universal communications services program to ensure that five million
dollars is expended in each fiscal year over the five years of the
program.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.36.650 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 203 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A state universal communications services program is
established. The program is established to protect public safety and
welfare under the authority of the state to regulate telecommunications
under Article XII, section 19 of the state Constitution. The purpose
of the program is to support continued provision of basic
telecommunications services under rates, terms, and conditions
established by the commission during the time over which incumbent
communications providers in the state are adapting to changes in
federal universal service fund and intercarrier compensation support.
(2) Under the program, eligible communications providers may
receive distributions from the universal communications services
account created in RCW 80.36.690 in exchange for the affirmative
agreement to provide continued services under the rates, terms, and
conditions established by the commission under this chapter for the
period covered by the distribution. The commission must implement and
administer the program under terms and conditions established in RCW
80.36.630 through 80.36.690. Expenditures for the program ((may not
exceed)) must be five million dollars per fiscal year less
administrative costs appropriated to the commission to administer the
program established in subsection (1) of this section in the omnibus
operating appropriations act. In order to ensure that the entire five
million dollars is expended, the commission shall make distributions
for the fiscal year by October 1st of the fiscal year.
(3) A communications provider is eligible to receive distributions
from the account if:
(a) The communications provider is: (i) An incumbent local
exchange carrier serving fewer than forty thousand access lines in the
state; or (ii) a radio communications service company providing
wireless two-way voice communications service to less than the
equivalent of forty thousand access lines in the state. For purposes
of determining the access line threshold in this subsection, the access
lines or equivalents of all affiliates must be counted as a single
threshold, if the lines or equivalents are located in Washington;
(b) The customers of the communications provider are at risk of
rate instability or service interruptions or cessations absent a
distribution to the provider that will allow the provider to maintain
rates reasonably close to the benchmark; and
(c) The communications provider meets any other requirements
established by the commission pertaining to the provision of
communications services, including basic telecommunications services.
(4)(a) Distributions to eligible communications providers are based
on a benchmark established by the commission. The benchmark is the
rate the commission determines to be a reasonable amount customers
should pay for basic residential service provided over the incumbent
public network. However, if an incumbent local exchange carrier is
charging rates above the benchmark for the basic residential service,
that provider may not seek distributions from the fund for the purpose
of reducing those rates to the benchmark.
(b) To receive a distribution under the program, an eligible
communications provider must affirmatively consent to continue
providing communications services to its customers under rates, terms,
and conditions established by the commission pursuant to this chapter
for the period covered by the distribution.
(5) The program is funded from amounts deposited by the legislature
in the universal communications services account established in RCW
80.36.690. The commission must operate the program within amounts
appropriated for this purpose and deposited in the account. If
expenditures for distributions together with administrative costs
amount to less than five million dollars in expenditures in a fiscal
year, the remainder must be expended as provided in subsection (7)(b)
of this section.
(6) The commission must periodically review the accounts and
records of any communications provider that receives distributions
under the program to ensure compliance with the program and monitor the
providers' use of the funds.
(7)(a) The commission must establish an advisory board, consisting
of a reasonable balance of representatives from different types of
communications providers and consumers, to advise the commission on
any rules and policies governing the operation of the program.
(b) In the event that the amounts expended by the commission in
distributions, pursuant to the distribution methodology established by
rule under this section, together with the administrative costs of the
commission, do not amount to five million dollars, the commission shall
expend the remaining funds before the end of the fiscal year,
consistent with the intent of the legislature as provided in section 1
of this act and pursuant to a recommendation from the advisory board.
The advisory board shall make a recommendation to the commission for
how to expend the remaining amounts through additional funding to
incumbent local exchange carriers serving fewer than forty thousand
access lines in the state, prioritizing expenditures that help carriers
fulfill carrier of last resort obligations to serve and expand
communications services to underserved populations.
(8) The program terminates on June 30, 2019, and no distributions
may be made after that date.
(9) This section expires July 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---