BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08.025 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 42 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Public assistance may be awarded to any applicant:
(a) Who is in need and otherwise meets the eligibility requirements
of department assistance programs; and
(b) Who has not made a voluntary assignment of property or cash for
the purpose of qualifying for an assistance grant; and
(c) Who is not an inmate of a public institution except as a
patient in a medical institution or except as an inmate in a public
institution who could qualify for federal aid assistance: PROVIDED,
That the assistance paid by the department to recipients in nursing
homes, or receiving nursing home care, may cover the cost of clothing
and incidentals and general maintenance exclusive of medical care and
health services. The department may pay a grant to cover the cost of
clothing and personal incidentals in public or private medical
institutions and institutions for tuberculosis. The department shall
allow recipients in nursing homes to retain, in addition to the grant
to cover the cost of clothing and incidentals, wages received for work
as a part of a training or rehabilitative program designed to prepare
the recipient for less restrictive placement to the extent permitted
under Title XIX of the federal social security act; and
(d) Who is not fleeing to avoid prosecution, custody, or
confinement for a crime or an attempt to commit a crime, that is a
felony or misdemeanor under the law of the place from which the
individual is fleeing; and
(e) Who is not violating a condition of probation or parole as
determined by an administrative body or court that has the authority to
make the decision.
(2) Any person otherwise qualified for temporary assistance for
needy families under this title who has resided in the state of
Washington for fewer than twelve consecutive months immediately
preceding application for assistance is limited to the benefit level in
the state in which the person resided immediately before Washington,
using the eligibility rules and other definitions established under
this chapter, that was obtainable on the date of application in
Washington state, if the benefit level of the prior state is lower than
the level provided to similarly situated applicants in Washington
state. The benefit level under this subsection shall be in effect for
the first twelve months a recipient is on temporary assistance for
needy families in Washington state.
(3) Any person otherwise qualified for temporary assistance for
needy families who is assessed through the state alcohol and substance
abuse program as drug or alcohol-dependent and requiring treatment to
become employable shall be required by the department to participate in
a drug or alcohol treatment program as a condition of benefit receipt.
(4) The department may implement a permanent disqualification for
adults who have been terminated due to WorkFirst noncompliance sanction
three or more times since March 1, 2007. A household that includes an
adult who has been permanently disqualified from receiving temporary
assistance for needy families shall be ineligible for further temporary
assistance for needy families assistance.
(5) Pursuant to 21 U.S.C. 862a(d)(1), the department shall exempt
individuals from the eligibility restrictions of 21 U.S.C. 862a(a)(1)
and (2) to ensure eligibility for temporary assistance for needy
families benefits and federal food assistance.

--- END ---