BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.28.030 and 2011 c 367 s 710 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) A state highway shall be constructed, altered, repaired, or
improved, and improvements located on property acquired for
right-of-way purposes may be repaired or renovated pending the use of
such right-of-way for highway purposes, by contract or state forces.
The work or portions thereof may be done by state forces when the
estimated costs thereof are less than fifty thousand dollars and
effective July 1, 2005, sixty thousand dollars.
(b) When delay of performance of such work would jeopardize a state
highway or constitute a danger to the traveling public, the work may be
done by state forces when the estimated cost thereof is less than
eighty thousand dollars and effective July 1, 2005, one hundred
thousand dollars.
(c) When the department of transportation determines to do the work
by state forces, it shall enter a statement upon its records to that
effect, stating the reasons therefor.
(d) To enable a larger number of small businesses and veteran,
minority, and women contractors to effectively compete for department
of transportation contracts, the department may adopt rules providing
for bids and award of contracts for the performance of work, or
furnishing equipment, materials, supplies, or operating services
whenever any work is to be performed and the engineer's estimate
indicates the cost of the work would not exceed eighty thousand dollars
and effective July 1, 2005, one hundred thousand dollars.
(2) The rules adopted under this section:
(a) Shall provide for competitive bids to the extent that
competitive sources are available except when delay of performance
would jeopardize life or property or inconvenience the traveling
public; and
(b) Need not require the furnishing of a bid deposit nor a
performance bond, but if a performance bond is not required then
progress payments to the contractor may be required to be made based on
submittal of paid invoices to substantiate proof that disbursements
have been made to laborers, material suppliers, mechanics, and
subcontractors from the previous partial payment; and
(c) May establish prequalification standards and procedures as an
alternative to those set forth in RCW 47.28.070, but the
prequalification standards and procedures under RCW 47.28.070 shall
always be sufficient.
(3) The department of transportation shall comply with such goals
and rules as may be adopted by the office of minority and women's
business enterprises to implement chapter 39.19 RCW with respect to
contracts entered into under this chapter. The department may adopt
such rules as may be necessary to comply with the rules adopted by the
office of minority and women's business enterprises under chapter 39.19
RCW.
(4)(a) ((For the period of March 15, 2010, through June 30, 2013,))
Work for less than one hundred twenty thousand dollars may be performed
on ferry vessels and terminals by state forces.
(b) The department shall hire a disinterested, third party to
conduct an independent analysis to identify methods of reducing out-of-service times for vessel maintenance, preservation, and improvement
projects. The analysis must include options that consider
consolidating work while vessels are at shipyards by having state
forces perform services traditionally performed at Eagle Harbor at the
shipyard and decreasing the allowable time at shipyards. The analysis
must also compare the out-of-service vessel times of performing
services by state forces versus contracting out those services which in
turn must be used to form a recommendation as to what the threshold of
work performed on ferry vessels and terminals by state forces should
be. This analysis must be presented to the transportation committees
of the senate and house of representatives by December 1, 2010.
(c) The department shall develop a proposed ferry vessel
maintenance, preservation, and improvement program and present it to
the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2010. The proposed program must:
(i) Improve the basis for budgeting vessel maintenance,
preservation, and improvement costs and for projecting those costs into
a sixteen-year financial plan;
(ii) Limit the amount of planned out-of-service time to the
greatest extent possible, including options associated with department
staff as well as commercial shipyards; and
(iii) Be based on the service plan in the capital plan, recognizing
that vessel preservation and improvement needs may vary by route.
(d) In developing the proposed ferry vessel maintenance,
preservation, and improvement program, the department shall consider
the following, related to reducing vessel out-of-service time:
(i) The costs compared to benefits of Eagle Harbor repair and
maintenance facility operations options to include staffing costs and
benefits in terms of reduced out-of-service time;
(ii) The maintenance requirements for on-vessel staff, including
the benefits of a systemwide standard;
(iii) The costs compared to benefits of staff performing
preservation or maintenance work, or both, while the vessel is
underway, tied up between sailings, or not deployed;
(iv) A review of the department's vessel maintenance, preservation,
and improvement program contracting process and contractual
requirements;
(v) The costs compared to benefits of allowing for increased costs
associated with expedited delivery;
(vi) A method for comparing the anticipated out-of-service time of
proposed projects and other projects planned during the same
construction period;
(vii) Coordination with required United States coast guard dry
dockings;
(viii) A method for comparing how proposed projects relate to the
service requirements of the route on which the vessel normally
operates; and
(ix) A method for evaluating the ongoing maintenance and
preservation costs associated with proposed improvement projects.

--- END ---