BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.524 and 2006 c 329 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "A major employer" means a private or public employer,
including state agencies, that employs one hundred or more full-time
employees at a single worksite who begin their regular workday between
6:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m. on weekdays for at least twelve continuous
months during the year.
(2) "Major worksite" means a building or group of buildings that
are on physically contiguous parcels of land or on parcels separated
solely by private or public roadways or rights-of-way, and at which
there are one hundred or more full-time employees, who begin their
regular workday between 6:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m. on weekdays, for at
least twelve continuous months.
(3) "Major employment installation" means a military base or
federal reservation, excluding tribal reservations, at which there are
one hundred or more full-time employees, who begin their regular
workday between 6:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m. on weekdays, for at least
twelve continuous months during the year.
(4) (("Person hours of delay" means the daily person hours of delay
per mile in the peak period of 6:00 a.m. to 9:00 a.m., as calculated
using the best available methodology by the department of
transportation.
(5))) "Commute trip" means trips made from a worker's home to a
worksite during the peak period of 6:00 a.m. to 9:00 a.m. on weekdays.
(((6))) (5) "Proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute trips"
means the number of commute trips made by single-occupant automobiles
divided by the number of full-time employees.
(((7))) (6) "Commute trip vehicle miles traveled per employee"
means the sum of the individual vehicle commute trip lengths in miles
over a set period divided by the number of full-time employees during
that period.
(((8))) (7) "Base year" means the twelve-month period commencing
when a major employer is determined to be participating by the local
jurisdiction, on which commute trip reduction goals ((shall)) must be
based.
(((9))) (8) "Growth and transportation efficiency center" means a
defined, compact, mixed-use urban area that contains jobs or housing
and supports multiple modes of transportation. For the purpose of
funding, a growth and transportation efficiency center must meet
minimum criteria established by the commute trip reduction board under
RCW 70.94.537, and must be certified by a regional transportation
planning organization as established in RCW 47.80.020.
(((10))) (9)(a) "Affected urban growth area" means:
(i) An urban growth area, designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110,
((whose boundaries contain a state highway segment exceeding the one
hundred person hours of delay threshold calculated by the department of
transportation, and any contiguous urban growth areas)) which meets or
exceeds the threshold for affected areas, as defined in department of
transportation rules; and
(ii) An urban growth area, designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110,
which meets or exceeds the threshold for affected areas, as defined in
department of transportation rules, containing a jurisdiction with a
population over seventy thousand that adopted a commute trip reduction
ordinance before the year 2000, and any contiguous urban growth areas.
(b) Affected urban growth areas ((will)) must be listed by the
department of transportation in the rules for chapter 329, Laws of 2006
using the criteria identified in (a) of this subsection.
(((11))) (10) "Certification" means a determination by a regional
transportation planning organization that a locally designated growth
and transportation efficiency center program meets the minimum criteria
developed in a collaborative regional process and the rules established
by the department of transportation.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.94.527 and 2006 c 329 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Each county containing an urban growth area, designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110, and each city within an urban growth area
with a state highway segment exceeding the one hundred person hours of
delay threshold calculated by the department of transportation, as well
as those counties and cities located in any contiguous urban growth
areas, shall adopt a commute trip reduction plan and ordinance for
major employers in the affected urban growth area by a date specified
by the commute trip reduction board. Jurisdictions located within an
urban growth area with a population greater than seventy thousand that
adopted a commute trip reduction ordinance before the year 2000, as
well as any jurisdiction within contiguous urban growth areas, shall
also adopt a commute trip reduction plan and ordinance for major
employers in the affected urban growth area by a date specified by the
commute trip reduction board.)) Cities and counties with urban growth
areas that meet or exceed the threshold for affected areas, as defined
in department of transportation rules, must adopt a commute trip
reduction plan and ordinance. Jurisdictions containing a major
employment installation in a county with an affected growth area,
designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110, ((shall)) must adopt a commute
trip reduction plan and ordinance for major employers in the major
employment installation by a date specified by the commute trip
reduction board. The ordinance ((shall)) must establish the
requirements for major employers and provide an appeals process by
which major employers, who as a result of special characteristics of
their business or its locations would be unable to meet the
requirements of the ordinance, may obtain waiver or modification of
those requirements. The plan ((shall)) must be designed to achieve
reductions in the proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute trips
and be consistent with the rules established by the department of
transportation. The county, city, or town ((shall)) must submit its
adopted plan to the regional transportation planning organization. The
county, city, or town plan ((shall)) must be included in the regional
commute trip reduction plan for regional transportation planning
purposes, consistent with the rules established by the department of
transportation in RCW 70.94.537.
(2) All other counties, cities, and towns may adopt and implement
a commute trip reduction plan consistent with department of
transportation rules established under RCW 70.94.537. Tribal
governments are encouraged to adopt a commute trip reduction plan for
their lands. State investment in voluntary commute trip reduction
plans ((shall be)) is limited to those areas that meet criteria
developed by the commute trip reduction board.
(3) The department of ecology may, after consultation with the
department of transportation, as part of the state implementation plan
for areas that do not attain the national ambient air quality standards
for carbon monoxide or ozone, require municipalities other than those
identified in subsection (1) of this section to adopt and implement
commute trip reduction plans if the department determines that such
plans are necessary for attainment of said standards.
(4) A commute trip reduction plan ((shall)) must be consistent with
the rules established under RCW 70.94.537 and ((shall)) must include
but is not limited to: (a) Goals for reductions in the proportion of
single-occupant vehicle commute trips consistent with the state goals
established by the commute trip reduction board under RCW 70.94.537 and
the regional commute trip reduction plan goals established in the
regional commute trip reduction plan; (b) a description of the
requirements for major public and private sector employers to implement
commute trip reduction programs; (c) a commute trip reduction program
for employees of the county, city, or town; and (d) means, consistent
with rules established by the department of transportation, for
determining base year values and progress toward meeting commute trip
reduction plan goals. The plan ((shall)) must be developed in
consultation with local transit agencies, the applicable regional
transportation planning organization, major employers, and other
interested parties.
(5) The commute trip reduction plans adopted by counties, cities,
and towns under this chapter ((shall)) must be consistent with and may
be incorporated in applicable state or regional transportation plans
and local comprehensive plans and ((shall)) must be coordinated, and
consistent with, the commute trip reduction plans of counties, cities,
or towns with which the county, city, or town has, in part, common
borders or related regional issues. Such regional issues ((shall))
must include assuring consistency in the treatment of employers who
have worksites subject to the requirements of this chapter in more than
one jurisdiction. Counties, cities, and towns adopting commute trip
reduction plans may enter into agreements through the interlocal
cooperation act or by resolution or ordinance as appropriate with other
jurisdictions, local transit agencies, transportation management
associations or other private or nonprofit providers of transportation
services, or regional transportation planning organizations to
coordinate the development and implementation of such plans. Transit
agencies ((shall)) must work with counties, cities, and towns as a part
of their six-year transit development plan established in RCW
35.58.2795 to take into account the location of major employer
worksites when planning and prioritizing transit service changes or the
expansion of public transportation services, including rideshare
services. Counties, cities, or towns adopting a commute trip reduction
plan ((shall)) must review it annually and revise it as necessary to be
consistent with applicable plans developed under RCW 36.70A.070.
Regional transportation planning organizations ((shall)) must review
the local commute trip reduction plans during the development and
update of the regional commute trip reduction plan.
(6)(a) Each affected regional transportation planning organization
((shall)) must adopt a commute trip reduction plan for its region
consistent with the rules and deadline established by the department of
transportation under RCW 70.94.537. The plan ((shall)) must include,
but is not limited to: (((a))) (i) Regional program goals for commute
trip reduction in urban growth areas and all designated growth and
transportation efficiency centers; (((b))) (ii) a description of
strategies for achieving the goals; (((c))) (iii) a sustainable
financial plan describing projected revenues and expenditures to meet
the goals; (((d))) (iv) a description of the way in which progress
toward meeting the goals will be measured; and (((e))) (v) minimum
criteria for growth and transportation efficiency centers.
(((i))) (b) Regional transportation planning organizations
((shall)) must review proposals from local jurisdictions to designate
growth and transportation efficiency centers and ((shall)) must
determine whether the proposed growth and transportation efficiency
center is consistent with the criteria defined in the regional commute
trip reduction plan.
(((ii))) (c) Growth and transportation efficiency centers certified
as consistent with the minimum requirements by the regional
transportation planning organization ((shall)) must be identified in
subsequent updates of the regional commute trip reduction plan. These
plans ((shall)) must be developed in collaboration with all affected
local jurisdictions, transit agencies, and other interested parties
within the region. The plan ((will)) must be reviewed and approved by
(([the])) the commute trip reduction board as established under RCW
70.94.537. Regions without an approved regional commute trip reduction
plan ((shall not be)) are not eligible for state commute trip reduction
program funds.
(d) The regional commute trip reduction plan ((shall)) must be
consistent with and incorporated into transportation demand management
components in the regional transportation plan as required by RCW
47.80.030.
(7) Each regional transportation planning organization implementing
a regional commute trip reduction program ((shall)) must, consistent
with the rules and deadline established by the department of
transportation, submit its plan as well as any related local commute
trip reduction plans and certified growth and transportation efficiency
center programs, to the commute trip reduction board established under
RCW 70.94.537. The commute trip reduction board ((shall)) must review
the regional commute trip reduction plan and the local commute trip
reduction plans. The regional transportation planning organization
((shall)) must collaborate with the commute trip reduction board to
evaluate the consistency of local commute trip reduction plans with the
regional commute trip reduction plan. Local and regional plans must be
approved by the commute trip reduction board in order to be eligible
for state funding provided for the purposes of this chapter.
(8) Each regional transportation planning organization implementing
a regional commute trip reduction program ((shall)) must submit an
annual progress report to the commute trip reduction board established
under RCW 70.94.537. The report ((shall be)) is due at the end of each
state fiscal year for which the program has been implemented. The
report ((shall)) must describe progress in attaining the applicable
commute trip reduction goals and ((shall)) must highlight any problems
being encountered in achieving the goals. The information ((shall))
must be reported in a form established by the commute trip reduction
board.
(9) Any waivers or modifications of the requirements of a commute
trip reduction plan granted by a jurisdiction ((shall)) must be
submitted for review to the commute trip reduction board established
under RCW 70.94.537. The commute trip reduction board may not deny the
granting of a waiver or modification of the requirements of a commute
trip reduction plan by a jurisdiction but they may notify the
jurisdiction of any comments or objections.
(10) Plans implemented under this section ((shall)) do not apply to
commute trips for seasonal agricultural employees.
(11) Plans implemented under this section ((shall)) do not apply to
construction worksites when the expected duration of the construction
project is less than two years.
(((12) If an affected urban growth area has not previously
implemented a commute trip reduction program and the state has funded
solutions to state highway deficiencies to address the area's exceeding
the person hours of delay threshold, the affected urban growth area
shall be exempt from the duties of this section for a period not
exceeding two years.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city or county may establish a transportation demand
management program to substantially reduce vehicle miles traveled and
drive alone trips, and to improve the mobility of people and goods
through the use of locally determined strategies to reduce work commute
or other driving trips.
(2) The plan may modify or waive employer administrative
requirements defined in this chapter for commute trip reduction plans,
while maintaining the requirement and ordinance that major employers
provide a commute trip reduction program for their employees.
(3) The community trip reduction plan must be developed in
consultation with local transit agencies, the applicable regional
transportation planning organization, and other interested parties.
The plan must be consistent with and incorporated into the same plans
and processes expected of commute trip reduction plans in RCW
70.94.527.
(4) In order to be eligible to apply for state funds provided for
purposes of this section, the plan must be approved by the commute trip
reduction board as consistent with department of transportation rules
and the program purposes to reduce automobile-related air pollution,
energy consumption, and traffic congestion. Once board approved, a
community trip reduction plan may be implemented as a substitute for a
commute trip reduction plan. The request for funds to implement their
board-approved plan must take the form of an application.
(5) A city or county that has established a community trip
reduction plan must support trip reduction activities in its
jurisdiction. As appropriate, the implementing jurisdiction must adopt
policies, ordinances, and funding strategies that will lead to
attainment of program goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---