BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.17.323 and 2012 c 74 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before accepting an application for an annual vehicle
registration renewal for an electric vehicle that uses propulsion units
powered solely by electricity, except for electric motorcycles, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director must require the applicant to pay a one hundred dollar fee in
addition to any other fees and taxes required by law. The one hundred
dollar fee is due only at the time of annual registration renewal.
(2) Before accepting an application for an annual vehicle
registration renewal for an electric motorcycle that uses propulsion
units powered solely by electricity, the department, county auditor or
other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must require the
applicant to pay a thirty dollar fee in addition to any other fees and
taxes required by law. The thirty dollar fee is due only at the time
of annual registration renewal.
(3) This section only applies to:
(a) A vehicle that is designed to have the capability to drive at
a speed of more than thirty-five miles per hour; and
(b) An annual vehicle registration renewal that is due on or after
February 1, 2013.
(((3))) (4)(a) The fee under this section is imposed to provide
funds to mitigate the impact of vehicles on state roads and highways
and for the purpose of evaluating the feasibility of transitioning from
a revenue collection system based on fuel taxes to a road user
assessment system, and is separate and distinct from other vehicle
license fees. Proceeds from the fee must be used for highway purposes,
and must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW
46.68.070, subject to (b) of this subsection.
(b) If in any year the amount of proceeds from the fee collected
under this section exceeds one million dollars, the excess amount over
one million dollars must be deposited as follows:
(i) Seventy percent to the motor vehicle fund created in RCW
46.68.070;
(ii) Fifteen percent to the transportation improvement account
created in RCW 47.26.084; and
(iii) Fifteen percent to the rural arterial trust account created
in RCW 36.79.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act expires on the
effective date of legislation enacted by the legislature that imposes
a vehicle miles traveled fee or tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of licensing must provide
written notice of the expiration date of section 1 of this act to
affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the
secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as
deemed appropriate by the department.

--- END ---