BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that as of November
2013, the unemployment rate in Washington is 6.8 percent and there are
over two hundred thousand unemployed people in the state. The
legislature further finds that the performance of community service
helps unemployed individuals maintain a connection to the labor market,
which in turn increases the ability of an unemployed individual to find
permanent employment. The legislature therefore intends to encourage
unemployed people to maintain a connection to the labor market by
establishing community service standards for individuals receiving
unemployment benefits.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.20.010 and 2006 c 13 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An unemployed individual shall be eligible to receive waiting
period credits or benefits with respect to any week in his or her
eligibility period only if the commissioner finds that:
(a) He or she has registered for work at, and thereafter has
continued to report at, an employment office in accordance with such
regulation as the commissioner may prescribe, except that the
commissioner may by regulation waive or alter either or both of the
requirements of this subdivision as to individuals attached to regular
jobs and as to such other types of cases or situations with respect to
which the commissioner finds that the compliance with such requirements
would be oppressive, or would be inconsistent with the purposes of this
title;
(b) He or she has filed an application for an initial determination
and made a claim for waiting period credit or for benefits in
accordance with the provisions of this title;
(c) He or she is able to work, and is available for work in any
trade, occupation, profession, or business for which he or she is
reasonably fitted.
(i) With respect to claims that have an effective date before
January 4, 2004, to be available for work an individual must be ready,
able, and willing, immediately to accept any suitable work which may be
offered to him or her and must be actively seeking work pursuant to
customary trade practices and through other methods when so directed by
the commissioner or the commissioner's agents.
(ii) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 4, 2004, to be available for work an individual must be ready,
able, and willing, immediately to accept any suitable work which may be
offered to him or her and must be actively seeking work pursuant to
customary trade practices and through other methods when so directed by
the commissioner or the commissioner's agents. If a labor agreement or
dispatch rules apply, customary trade practices must be in accordance
with the applicable agreement or rules;
(d) He or she has been unemployed for a waiting period of one week;
(e) He or she participates in reemployment services if the
individual has been referred to reemployment services pursuant to the
profiling system established by the commissioner under RCW 50.20.011,
unless the commissioner determines that:
(i) The individual has completed such services; or
(ii) There is justifiable cause for the claimant's failure to
participate in such services; ((and))
(f) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
July 20, 2014, he or she performs at least eight hours of community
service for every four weeks of unemployment benefits received unless
the commissioner determines that:
(i) The individual is younger than eighteen years of age or older
than sixty-five years of age; or
(ii) There is justifiable cause for the failure to perform
community service; and
(g) As to weeks beginning after March 31, 1981, which fall within
an extended benefit period as defined in RCW 50.22.010, the individual
meets the terms and conditions of RCW 50.22.020 with respect to
benefits claimed in excess of twenty-six times the individual's weekly
benefit amount.
(2) An individual's eligibility period for regular benefits shall
be coincident to his or her established benefit year. An individual's
eligibility period for additional or extended benefits shall be the
periods prescribed elsewhere in this title for such benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 50.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement RCW
50.20.010(1)(f), including the establishment of standards for
documenting and reporting community service hours worked.

--- END ---