BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the public policy of the state of Washington to promote
ready access to legal assistance and counsel for all citizens of the
state and to encourage programs and plans that promote arrangements
between members of the public as consumers of legal services and
lawyers and other trained professionals who provide legal assistance
and counsel to the general public for any type of legal needs.
(2) Legal service contractors are not insurers under RCW 48.01.050
and legal service plans are not insurance under RCW 48.01.040.
(3) This section does not in any way affect the practice of law in
this state.
(4) This section does not apply to any of the following
arrangements:
(a) Retainer, fee, engagement, or representation agreements made by
an attorney or firm of attorneys with any person or group other than a
legal service contractor;
(b) Referral of individual clients to an attorney by a nonprofit
lawyer referral service or public corporation or entity such as a state
or local bar association provided there is no fee or charge for such
referral;
(c) Employee welfare benefit plans to the extent that state law or
regulation is preempted by federal law or regulation;
(d) The provision of legal assistance to low or moderate income
persons by nonprofit legal aid organizations or legal aid programs
affiliated with the Washington state bar association, a local bar
association, a law school accredited by the American bar association,
or a program operated in conjunction with a paralegal education program
approved by the American bar association; or
(e) Policies of insurance, or coverage incidental to such insurance
which may include legal defense, issued by an insurer holding a valid
certificate of authority in this state and issued under applicable laws
in this title pertaining to such insurance.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Legal service contractor" means any person, entity, or group
of persons, including associations, who is not engaged in the practice
of law or the business of insurance and who, for consideration,
provides enrolled participants with legal services through agreements
with providing attorneys.
(b) "Legal service plan" or "plan" means an arrangement between a
legal service contractor and an individual or person or group of
individuals or persons, whereby specified legal services are to be
provided to enrolled participants in consideration of a specified
payment for a specified period of time.
(c) "Enrolled participant" means an individual, person, or group of
individuals or persons eligible to receive legal services under a legal
service plan.
(d) "Providing attorney" means an attorney licensed, in good
standing, and eligible to practice law in this state who provides legal
services under a providing attorney agreement in accordance with the
terms of the legal service plan.
(e) "Providing attorney agreement" means a written contract or
agreement between a legal service contractor and a providing attorney
under which the providing attorney renders and provides legal services
to an enrolled participant of a legal service plan.

--- END ---