BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that each year a
large number of high-achieving students from low-income families do not
apply to four-year colleges or universities, even though they would
have a good chance of acceptance and success. At the same time, high-achieving students from high-income families are very likely to apply
to four-year colleges and universities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.77 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The council shall design and implement a program that provides
information to high-achieving, low-income high school students through
the mail and, if the council determines appropriate, electronically,
customized for each student, with the purpose of increasing the number
of applications from this group of students to four-year institutions
of higher education and independent, nonprofit baccalaureate degree-granting institutions in the state.
(2) For the purposes of designing, developing, and implementing the
program, the council shall:
(a) Partner with a national entity that offers aptitude tests;
(b) Consult with four-year institutions of higher education and
independent, nonprofit baccalaureate degree-granting institutions with
physical locations in the state; and
(c) Seek opportunities for shared costs and resources with the
entities in (a) and (b) of this subsection and develop agreements with
these entities.
(3) The council shall identify high-achieving students from low-income families using methods the council determines to be appropriate,
including but not limited to national aptitude test scores, scores on
AP tests, and running start and other dual credit programs.
(4) The council shall identify low-income students using methods
the council deems appropriate including eligibility for free or
reduced-price lunches or self-reported information or participation in
federal and state programs for low-income students.
(5) The main component of the program is to mail a customized
information packet to high-achieving, low-income students. The packet
must include at a minimum:
(a) Materials that help students to choose colleges;
(b) An application guidance booklet;
(c) Application fee waivers, if available, for four-year
institutions of higher education and independent nonprofit
baccalaureate degree-granting institutions in the state that enable
students receiving a packet to apply without paying application fees;
(d) Information on college affordability and financial aid that
includes information on the net cost of attendance for each four-year
institution of higher education and each nonprofit baccalaureate
degree-granting institution, and information on merit and need-based
aid from federal, state, and institutional sources; and
(e) A personally addressed cover letter signed by the governor and
the president of each four-year institution of higher education and
nonprofit baccalaureate degree-granting institution in the state.
(6) The council shall implement the program no later than fall
2015, giving consideration to spring mailings in order to capture early
action decisions offered by institutions of higher education and
nonprofit baccalaureate degree-granting institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2014, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---