BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature understands the majority of
child fatalities occurring in licensed child care settings are the
result of sudden unexpected infant death. The legislature recognizes
that maintaining safe sleep practices has the potential to reduce the
risk of child fatalities linked to sudden unexpected infant death. The
legislature finds that an essential responsibility of a child care
provider is to protect the health and safety of children in the
provider's care. The legislature finds that clear policies on safe
sleep practices can prevent child fatalities. The legislature,
therefore, intends to clarify the expectations of child care providers
by establishing concrete consequences for not following safe sleep
practice rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall provide information on safe sleep
practices as outlined by the American academy of pediatrics to
applicants for child care licensure. When disseminating safe sleep
practice information, the department shall take into account the
linguistic needs of licensees.
(2) A department licensor shall assess for safe sleep practices
during all monitoring visits.
(3) The first time a provider is found in violation of safe sleep
practices a department licensor must complete a compliance agreement
with the child care provider. The department licensor must advise the
child care provider that failure to comply with safe sleep practices
will lead to license revocation.
(4) The second time a child care provider is found in violation of
safe sleep practices the department shall revoke the child care
provider's license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the
Graham Hazzard act.

--- END ---