BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.36.470 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 118 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Adult recipients of department-administered programs for the
financially needy which provide continuing financial ((or medical))
assistance, food ((stamps)) assistance, or ((supportive services to
persons in their own homes)) home and community-based services through
the aging and long-term support administration or developmental
disabilities administration are eligible for participation in the
telephone assistance program. The department must notify the
participants of their eligibility.
(2) Participants in community service voice mail programs are
eligible for participation in services available under RCW 80.36.420
(1), (2), and (3) after completing use of community service voice mail
services. Eligibility must be for a period including the remainder of
the current service year and the following service year. Community
agencies must notify the department of participants eligible under this
subsection.
(3) Enrollment in the Washington telephone assistance program may
not result in expenditures that exceed the total amount of funds made
available by the legislature for the Washington telephone assistance
program. When the department finds that there is a danger of an
overexpenditure of appropriated funds, the department must close the
Washington telephone assistance program enrollment until the department
finds the danger no longer exists.

--- END ---