BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that assigning greater
value to grades earned in more challenging courses provides an
incentive for students to challenge themselves academically. In
addition, weighted grades deservedly reward students who take tougher
courses, recognize higher levels of academic accomplishment, and
provide a more fair and balanced system of grading in schools.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.125 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 130 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the four-year institutions as defined in RCW 28B.76.020, the state
board for community and technical colleges, and the workforce training
and education coordinating board, shall develop for use by all public
school districts a standardized high school transcript. The
superintendent shall establish clear definitions for the terms
"credits" and "hours" so that school programs operating on the quarter,
semester, or trimester system can be compared.
(2) The standardized high school transcript shall include a
notation of whether the student has earned a certificate of individual
achievement or a certificate of academic achievement.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the entities listed under subsection (1) of this section, shall develop
a common methodology to assign additional weight to advanced placement
(AP) courses and higher level international baccalaureate (IB) courses
for purposes of calculating a high school student's grade point
average. Beginning in the 2014-15 school year, school districts shall
use the common methodology for calculating the grade point average of
all high school students for the standardized high school transcript.

--- END ---