BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "caregiver" means a person
with whom a child is placed in out-of-home care, or a designated
official for a group care facility licensed by the department.
(2) This section applies to all caregivers providing for children
in out-of-home care.
(3) Caregivers have the authority to provide or withhold permission
without prior approval of the caseworker, department, or court to allow
a child in their care to participate in normal childhood activities
based on a reasonable and prudent parent standard.
(a) Normal childhood activities include, but are not limited to,
extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities, and may include
overnight activities outside the direct supervision of the caregiver
for periods of over twenty-four hours and up to seventy-two hours.
(b) The reasonable and prudent parent standard means the standard
of care used by a caregiver in determining whether to allow a child in
his or her care to participate in extracurricular, enrichment, and
social activities. This standard is characterized by careful and
thoughtful parental decision making that is intended to maintain a
child's health, safety, and best interest while encouraging the child's
emotional and developmental growth.
(4) Any authorization provided under this section must comply with
provisions included in an existing safety plan established by the
department or court order.
(5) Caseworkers shall discuss the child's interest in and pursuit
of normal childhood activities in their monthly health and safety
visits and describe the child's participation in normal childhood
activities in the individual service and safety plan. Caseworkers
shall also discuss a child's interest in and pursuit of normal
childhood activities during monthly meetings with parents.
(6) Neither the caregiver nor the department may be held liable for
injuries to the child that occur as a result of authority granted in
this section unless the action or inaction of the caregiver or the
department resulting in injury constitutes willful or wanton
misconduct.
(7) This section does not remove or limit any existing liability
protection afforded by law.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.15.030 and 2007 c 387 s 5 and 2007 c 17 s 14 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The secretary shall have the power and it shall be the secretary's
duty:
(1) In consultation with the children's services advisory
committee, and with the advice and assistance of persons representative
of the various type agencies to be licensed, to designate categories of
facilities for which separate or different requirements shall be
developed as may be appropriate whether because of variations in the
ages, sex and other characteristics of persons served, variations in
the purposes and services offered or size or structure of the agencies
to be licensed hereunder, or because of any other factor relevant
thereto;
(2) In consultation with the children's services advisory
committee, and with the advice and assistance of persons representative
of the various type agencies to be licensed, to adopt and publish
minimum requirements for licensing applicable to each of the various
categories of agencies to be licensed.
The minimum requirements shall be limited to:
(a) The size and suitability of a facility and the plan of
operation for carrying out the purpose for which an applicant seeks a
license;
(b) Obtaining background information and any out-of-state
equivalent, to determine whether the applicant or service provider is
disqualified and to determine the character, competence, and
suitability of an agency, the agency's employees, volunteers, and other
persons associated with an agency;
(c) Conducting background checks for those who will or may have
unsupervised access to children, expectant mothers, or individuals with
a developmental disability, however, a background check is not required
if a caregiver approves an activity pursuant to the prudent parent
standard contained in section 1 of this act;
(d) Obtaining child protective services information or records
maintained in the department case management information system. No
unfounded allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW
26.44.020 may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption
agency, or any other provider licensed under this chapter;
(e) Submitting a fingerprint-based background check through the
Washington state patrol under chapter 10.97 RCW and through the federal
bureau of investigation for:
(i) Agencies and their staff, volunteers, students, and interns
when the agency is seeking license or relicense;
(ii) Foster care and adoption placements; and
(iii) Any adult living in a home where a child may be placed;
(f) If any adult living in the home has not resided in the state of
Washington for the preceding five years, the department shall review
any child abuse and neglect registries maintained by any state where
the adult has resided over the preceding five years;
(g) The cost of fingerprint background check fees will be paid as
required in RCW 43.43.837;
(h) National and state background information must be used solely
for the purpose of determining eligibility for a license and for
determining the character, suitability, and competence of those persons
or agencies, excluding parents, not required to be licensed who are
authorized to care for children or expectant mothers;
(i) The number of qualified persons required to render the type of
care and treatment for which an agency seeks a license;
(j) The safety, cleanliness, and general adequacy of the premises
to provide for the comfort, care and well-being of children, expectant
mothers or developmentally disabled persons;
(k) The provision of necessary care, including food, clothing,
supervision and discipline; physical, mental and social well-being; and
educational, recreational and spiritual opportunities for those served;
(l) The financial ability of an agency to comply with minimum
requirements established pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW
74.13.031; and
(m) The maintenance of records pertaining to the admission,
progress, health and discharge of persons served;
(3) To investigate any person, including relatives by blood or
marriage except for parents, for character, suitability, and competence
in the care and treatment of children, expectant mothers, and
developmentally disabled persons prior to authorizing that person to
care for children, expectant mothers, and developmentally disabled
persons. However, if a child is placed with a relative under RCW
13.34.065 or 13.34.130, and if such relative appears otherwise suitable
and competent to provide care and treatment the criminal history
background check required by this section need not be completed before
placement, but shall be completed as soon as possible after placement;
(4) On reports of alleged child abuse and neglect, to investigate
agencies in accordance with chapter 26.44 RCW, including child day-care
centers and family day-care homes, to determine whether the alleged
abuse or neglect has occurred, and whether child protective services or
referral to a law enforcement agency is appropriate;
(5) To issue, revoke, or deny licenses to agencies pursuant to
chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031. Licenses shall specify the
category of care which an agency is authorized to render and the ages,
sex and number of persons to be served;
(6) To prescribe the procedures and the form and contents of
reports necessary for the administration of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW
74.13.031 and to require regular reports from each licensee;
(7) To inspect agencies periodically to determine whether or not
there is compliance with chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 and the
requirements adopted hereunder;
(8) To review requirements adopted hereunder at least every two
years and to adopt appropriate changes after consultation with affected
groups for child day-care requirements and with the children's services
advisory committee for requirements for other agencies; and
(9) To consult with public and private agencies in order to help
them improve their methods and facilities for the care of children,
expectant mothers and developmentally disabled persons.

--- END ---