BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The criminal justice training commission, if funded, shall
develop criteria for the data collection and evaluation of the number
of reserve peace officers who are specially commissioned Washington
peace officers, as defined in RCW 10.93.020, employed, volunteering, or
otherwise representing local law enforcement agencies each year. Such
information, at a minimum, must include a complete list: (a) Of all
reserve peace officers employed, volunteering, or otherwise
representing the agency as of June 30, 2014; (b) showing whether each
officer is or has ever been certified pursuant to RCW 43.101.095 as a
peace officer; (c) of new reserve officers hired, volunteering, or
otherwise representing the agency within the previous six months; and
(d) of officers who have left, resigned, or transferred to another law
enforcement agency within the previous six months.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2014, each law enforcement agency of the
state of Washington, or any political subdivision thereof, must
immediately notify the commission on an approved form, provided by the
commission, of each instance where a reserve peace officer begins
employment, volunteering, or otherwise representing the law enforcement
agency.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2014, upon termination of a reserve peace
officer, including resignation, the law enforcement agency shall,
within fifteen days of termination, notify the commission on a
personnel action form provided by the commission.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2014, as a condition of continuing
employment, volunteering, or otherwise representing a law enforcement
agency, all reserve peace officers must be reported to the commission.
A reserve peace officer who is not on record as maintained by the
commission by July 1, 2014, is prohibited from working, volunteering,
or otherwise representing a law enforcement agency.
(5) Beginning December 31, 2014, and annually thereafter, the
criminal justice training commission, if funded, shall collect and
report to the legislature regarding the number of reserve peace
officers who are employed at each local law enforcement agency of the
state of Washington, or any political subdivision therof.

--- END ---