BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.62.020 and 2012 c 262 s 1, 2012 c 136 s 4, and 2012
c 134 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all
costs, fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected in
whole or in part by district courts, except costs, fines, forfeitures
and penalties assessed and collected, in whole or in part, because of
the violation of city ordinances, shall be remitted by the clerk of the
district court to the county treasurer at least monthly, together with
a financial statement as required by the state auditor, noting the
information necessary for crediting of such funds as required by law.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 9A.88.120, 10.99.080,
((7.84.100(4),)) and this section, the county treasurer shall remit
thirty-two percent of the noninterest money received under subsection
(1) of this section except certain costs to the state treasurer.
"Certain costs" as used in this subsection, means those costs awarded
to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040,
or those costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions
under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes
if such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court and are
awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state
or county in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense
counsel. With the exception of funds to be transferred to the judicial
stabilization trust account under RCW 3.62.060(2), money remitted under
this subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the state
general fund.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received by the county
treasurer under subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited in
the county current expense fund. Funds deposited under this subsection
that are attributable to the county's portion of a surcharge imposed
under RCW 3.62.060(2) must be used to support local trial court and
court-related functions.
(4) Except as provided in RCW 7.84.100(4), all money collected for
county parking infractions shall be remitted by the clerk of the
district court at least monthly, with the information required under
subsection (1) of this section, to the county treasurer for deposit in
the county current expense fund.
(5) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(6) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund, twenty-five
percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information
system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the
county current expense fund, and twenty-five percent to the county
current expense fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 2 RCW 7.84.100 and 2012 c 262 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed an infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed five hundred
dollars for each offense unless specifically authorized by statute.
(2) The supreme court may prescribe by rule a schedule of monetary
penalties for designated infractions. The legislature requests the
supreme court to adjust this schedule every two years for inflation.
The maximum penalty imposed by the schedule shall be five hundred
dollars per infraction and the minimum penalty imposed by the schedule
shall be ten dollars per infraction. This schedule may be periodically
reviewed by the legislature and is subject to its revision.
(3) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this
chapter, it is immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at
that time, the court may, in its discretion, grant an extension of the
period in which the penalty may be paid.
(4) The county treasurer shall remit the money received under RCW
79A.80.080(5) ((to the state treasurer)) as provided in RCW 3.62.020(2)
and (3). Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer
must be deposited in the recreation access pass account established
under RCW 79A.80.090.

--- END ---