BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.29A.090 and 2012 c 112 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning January 1, 2002, each electric utility must provide
to its retail electricity customers a voluntary option to purchase
qualified alternative energy resources in accordance with this section.
(2) Each electric utility must include with its retail electric
customer's regular billing statements, at least quarterly, a voluntary
option to purchase qualified alternative energy resources. The option
may allow customers to purchase qualified alternative energy resources
at fixed or variable rates and for fixed or variable periods of time,
including but not limited to monthly, quarterly, or annual purchase
agreements. A utility may provide qualified alternative energy
resource options through either: (a) Resources it owns or contracts
for; or (b) the purchase of credits issued by a clearinghouse or other
system by which the utility may secure, for trade or other
consideration, verifiable evidence that a second party has a qualified
alternative energy resource and that the second party agrees to
transfer such evidence exclusively to the benefit of the utility.
(3) For the purposes of this section, a "qualified alternative
energy resource" means the electricity or thermal energy produced from
generation facilities that are fueled by: (a) Wind; (b) solar energy;
(c) geothermal energy; (d) landfill gas; (e) wave or tidal action; (f)
gas produced during the treatment of wastewater; (g) qualified
hydropower; or (h) biomass energy based on animal waste or solid or
liquid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field residues, or dedicated
energy crops that do not include wood pieces that have been treated
with chemical preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or
copper-chrome-arsenic.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "qualified hydropower" means
the energy produced either: (a) As a result of modernizations or
upgrades made after June 1, 1998, to hydropower facilities operating on
May 8, 2001, that have been demonstrated to reduce the mortality of
anadromous fish; or (b) by run of the river or run of the canal
hydropower facilities that are not responsible for obstructing the
passage of anadromous fish.
(5) The rates, terms, conditions, and customer notification of each
utility's option or options offered in accordance with this section
must be approved by the governing body of the consumer-owned utility or
by the commission for investor-owned utilities. All costs and benefits
associated with any option offered by an electric utility under this
section must be allocated to the customers who voluntarily choose that
option and may not be shifted to any customers who have not chosen such
option. Utilities may pursue known, lawful aggregated purchasing of
qualified alternative energy resources with other utilities to the
extent aggregated purchasing can reduce the unit cost of qualified
alternative energy resources, and are encouraged to investigate
opportunities to aggregate the purchase of alternative energy resources
by their customers. Aggregated purchases by investor-owned utilities
must comply with any applicable rules or policies adopted by the
commission related to least-cost planning or the acquisition of
renewable resources.
(6) Each consumer-owned utility must maintain and make available
upon request of the department and each investor-owned utility must
maintain and make available upon request of the commission information
describing the option or options it is offering its customers under the
requirements of this section, the rate of customer participation, the
amount of qualified alternative energy resources purchased by
customers, the amount of utility investments in qualified alternative
energy resources, and the results of pursuing aggregated purchasing
opportunities. The department and the commission shall report the
information to the appropriate committees of the legislature upon
request.

--- END ---