BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70B.070 and 1995 c 347 s 408 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Within twenty-eight days after receiving a project permit
application, a local government planning pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040
shall mail ((or provide in person)) or e-mail a written determination
to the applicant, any persons requesting such notification, the
department of archaeology and historic preservation, and any affected
tribes that request ongoing notice, stating either:
(a) That the application is complete; or
(b) That the application is incomplete and what is necessary to
make the application complete.
To the extent known by the local government, the local government
shall identify other agencies of local, state, or federal governments
that may have jurisdiction over some aspect of the application.
(2) A project permit application is complete for purposes of this
section when it meets the procedural submission requirements of the
local government and is sufficient for continued processing even though
additional information may be required or project modifications may be
undertaken subsequently. The determination of completeness shall not
preclude the local government from requesting additional information or
studies either at the time of the notice of completeness or
subsequently if new information is required or substantial changes in
the proposed action occur.
(3) The determination of completeness may include the following as
optional information:
(a) A preliminary determination of those development regulations
that will be used for project mitigation;
(b) A preliminary determination of consistency, as provided under
RCW 36.70B.040; or
(c) Other information the local government chooses to include.
(4)(a) An application shall be deemed complete under this section
if the local government does not provide a written determination to the
applicant that the application is incomplete as provided in subsection
(1)(b) of this section.
(b) Within fourteen days after an applicant has submitted to a
local government additional information identified by the local
government as being necessary for a complete application, the local
government shall notify the applicant whether the application is
complete or what additional information is necessary.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70B.140 and 1995 c 347 s 418 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A local government by ordinance or resolution may exclude the
following project permits from the provisions of RCW 36.70B.060
((through 36.70B.090)), 36.70B.080, and 36.70B.110 through 36.70B.130:
Landmark designations, street vacations, or other approvals relating to
the use of public areas or facilities, or other project permits,
whether administrative or quasi-judicial, that the local government by
ordinance or resolution has determined present special circumstances
that warrant a review process different from that provided in RCW
36.70B.060 ((through 36.70B.090)), 36.70B.080, and 36.70B.110 through
36.70B.130.
(2) A local government by ordinance or resolution also may exclude
the following project permits from the provisions of RCW 36.70B.060 and
36.70B.110 through 36.70B.130: Lot line or boundary adjustments and
building and other construction permits, or similar administrative
approvals, categorically exempt from environmental review under chapter
43.21C RCW, or for which environmental review has been completed in
connection with other project permits.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70B.150 and 1995 c 347 s 419 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A local government not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may
incorporate some or all of the provisions of RCW 36.70B.060 ((through
36.70B.090 and)), 36.70B.080, 36.70B.110 ((through 36.70B.130)), and
36.70B.120 into its procedures for review of project permits or other
project actions.
(2) A local government not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall
incorporate the provisions of RCW 36.70B.070 and 36.70B.130 into its
procedures for review of project permits or other project actions.

--- END ---