BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that retaliation
against employees who act in furtherance of federal, state, and local
laws and regulations is a matter of state concern, and such retaliation
threatens the public interest and the rights and proper privileges of
employees. Common law in this area has become inadequate to protect
public policy and employees who act in furtherance of it. Washington
is now one of the only states in the United States that lacks
sufficient protection from retaliation. It is the intent of the
legislature to protect employees who act in furtherance of public
policy and to reject the recent common law developments in the
Washington state supreme court case Cudney v. ALSCO which have eroded
those protections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for an employer to take materially adverse
action against an employee where retaliation is a substantial factor in
the employer's decision to take adverse action. An adverse action is
not material if it has only a trivial effect. In order to maintain a
civil action for the violation of public policy, an employee must show
all of the following:
(a) That a clear public policy exists. Whether a clear public
policy exists is a question of law for the court to decide. Clear
public policy may be reflected in federal, state, or local laws,
including constitutions, statutes, regulations, ordinances, and codes.
Prior judicial decisions may also be a source of public policy;
(b) That discouraging the conduct the employee engaged in would
jeopardize the public policy. To establish jeopardy, an employee must
show that the conduct in which he or she engaged directly relates to
public policy, and that the threat of adverse action will discourage
others from engaging in such conduct; and
(c) That the public policy-related conduct caused the adverse
action. To satisfy causation, the employee must establish that the
protected activity was a substantial factor in the employer's decision
to take adverse action.
(2) Where an employer asserts that there is an overriding
justification for his or her or its decision to take adverse action,
the employer bears the burden of asserting and proving the affirmative
defense. Whether there is an overriding justification for the
employer's decision is a question of law for the court to decide. In
order to assert this affirmative defense, the employer must admit that
he or she or it took adverse action because of the employee's public
policy-related conduct and must prove that the balance of public
policies relied upon by employer outweighs the public policies relied
upon by the employee.
(3) An employee who is retaliated against has a civil cause of
action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin further
violations and to recover actual damages sustained by the employee and
the cost of the lawsuit, including reasonable attorneys' fees and any
other appropriate remedy authorized by RCW 49.60.030(2).
(4) A civil cause of action is available for a violation of this
section notwithstanding the existence of any other means of protecting
public policy and is independent of any civil cause of action or remedy
that may exist at common law.
(5) A three-year statute of limitations applies to violations of
this section.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "retaliate" means to commit
a materially adverse action against an employee for conduct that the
employee reasonably believes promotes a clear mandate of public policy.
Protected conduct includes, but is not limited to, the refusal to
commit an illegal act, performing a legal duty or obligation,
exercising a legal right or privilege, or reporting employer misconduct
or whistleblowing.

--- END ---