BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The transportation sector is the biggest contributor to
Washington's greenhouse gas emissions and accounts for over forty
percent of such emissions;
(b) The development and success of zero emission vehicles will
protect the environment, stimulate economic growth, and improve the
quality of life in the state;
(c) The development of infrastructure for open and accessible
public charging stations is necessary to support the use of electric
vehicles;
(d) To promote the growth of electric vehicles, consumers need
confidence that they can access a robust network of publicly available
charging stations, regardless of system provider; and
(e) Electric vehicle drivers need to be able to find charging
stations and know how much they cost.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to (a) promote a positive
driving experience by assisting in the widespread deployment of
electric vehicles, (b) allow an owner or operator of publicly available
charging spaces to restrict use of or access to those charging spaces
to its customers, and (c) facilitate expanded driver access to electric
vehicle charging stations in public places.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.08 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of this section and section 3 of this act, the
following definitions apply:
(1) "Battery" means an electrochemical energy storage system
powered directly by electrical current.
(2) "Electric vehicle" means a vehicle that uses a plug-in battery
to provide all or part of the motive power of the vehicle, including a
battery electric, plug-in hybrid electric, or plug-in fuel cell
vehicle.
(3) "Electric vehicle service equipment" means an electric
component assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed
specifically to charge batteries within electric vehicles by permitting
the transfer of electric energy to a battery or other storage device in
the electric vehicle.
(4) "Interoperability billing standards" means the ability for a
member of one electric vehicle charging billing network to use another
billing network.
(5) "Network roaming" means the act of a member of one electric
vehicle charging network using his or her billing account information
to gain access to a public charging station that is outside of the
member's billing network.
(6) "Public charging station" means one or more publicly available
charging spaces served by electric vehicle service equipment.
(7) "Publicly available charging space" means a charging space that
has been designated by the owner or operator of the space to be
available to, and accessible by, the public and may include on-street
charging stations and charging stations in surface lots or parking
garages. "Publicly available charging space" does not include a
charging space that is part of, or associated with, a private
residence, a charging space that is reserved for the exclusive use of
an individual driver or vehicle or for a group of drivers or vehicles,
such as employees, tenants, visitors, residents of a common interest
development, or residents of an adjacent building, or a charging space
provided by a producer of electric vehicles as a service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The owner or operator of a public charging station may offer
electric vehicle charging to subscribers or members of an electric
vehicle charging network. Users of the station who are not subscribers
or members of the network must be able to access a public charging
station as provided in (b) of this subsection.
(b) The owner or operator of a public charging station that
requires users to pay a fee may not require users to pay a subscription
fee to use the station, and may not require users to obtain membership
in any club, association, or organization as a condition of using the
station. The total actual charges for the use of a public charging
station may include additional network roaming charges for nonmembers
or nonsubscribers and must be disclosed to the public at the point of
sale prior to a commitment to pay the charges. A public charging
station that requires the payment of a fee must allow a person desiring
to use the station to pay via a credit card or mobile technology, or
both. Owners and operators of public charging stations should consider
allowing users to pay with cash.
(2) The owner or operator of a public charging station is strongly
encouraged to disclose to the national renewable energy laboratory the
public charging station's geographic location, a schedule of fees,
accepted methods of payment, and the amount of network roaming charges
for nonmembers, if any.
(3) A public charging station (a) must display the method for
contacting the charging station's operator to obtain immediate access
to charging, and (b) where commercially reasonable and feasible, may be
clearly marked with appropriate directional signage in the parking area
or facility where the public charging station is located.
(4)(a) If interoperability standards have not been adopted by a
national standards organization within two years of the effective date
of this section, the department of transportation may adopt
interoperability billing standards or other rules that allow for
network roaming payment methods for public charging stations.
(b) If the department of transportation adopts standards or rules
under (a) of this subsection, it must consider other governmental or
industry-developed interoperability billing standards and may adopt
interoperability billing standards promulgated by an outside
authoritative body. Any public charging station that requires payment
must meet any standards adopted by the department within one year.
(5) This section does not apply to an owner or operator of a
publicly available charging space whose primary business is other than
electric vehicle charging.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act does not apply to charging stations
installed before the effective date of this section.

--- END ---