BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the advisory
board on missing and exploited children that was established under RCW
13.60.120 in 1999 has been an unmitigated success. The advisory board
has provided critical advice to the Washington state patrol on the
objectives, conduct, management, and coordination of the various
activities of the task force on missing and exploited children in order
to improve interagency communication and coordination since the task
force unit was first formed up through 2010 since the advisory board
last convened. The legislature further finds that the task force on
missing and exploited children currently functions under the oversight
of the Washington state patrol, has achieved a seamless communication
and coordinated effort among and between Washington state agencies
investigating child exploitation cases, and that the purposes and goals
of the advisory board have been fully satisfied. The legislature
therefore intends to ensure the multiagency task force on missing and
exploited children continues to operate under the oversight of the
Washington state patrol and maintain its high standards of work
identifying, arresting, and convicting those individuals who exploit
children.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.60.110 and 2009 c 518 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A task force on missing and exploited children is established
in the Washington state patrol. The task force shall be under the
direction of the chief of the state patrol.
(2) The task force is authorized to assist law enforcement
agencies, upon request, in cases involving missing or exploited
children by:
(a) Direct assistance and case management;
(b) Technical assistance;
(c) Personnel training;
(d) Referral for assistance from local, state, national, and
international agencies; and
(e) Coordination and information sharing among local, state,
interstate, and federal law enforcement and social service agencies.
(3) To maximize the efficiency and effectiveness of state resources
and to improve interagency cooperation, the task force shall, where
feasible, use existing facilities, systems, and staff made available by
the state patrol and other local, state, interstate, and federal law
enforcement and social service agencies. The chief of the state patrol
may employ such additional personnel as are necessary for the work of
the task force and may share personnel costs with other agencies.
(4) The chief of the state patrol shall seek public and private
grants and gifts to support the work of the task force.
(5) For the purposes of ((RCW 13.60.100 through 13.60.120)) this
chapter, "exploited children" means children under the age of eighteen
who are employed, used, persuaded, induced, enticed, or coerced to
engage in, or assist another person to engage in, sexually explicit
conduct. "Exploited children" also means the rape, molestation, or use
for prostitution of children under the age of eighteen.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 13.60.120 (Task force on missing and
exploited children -- Advisory board) and 1999 c 168 s 3 are each
repealed.

--- END ---