BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.29.090 and 1980 c 117 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No policy or bond is effective under RCW 46.29.080 unless
issued by an insurance company or surety company authorized to do
business in this state, except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, nor unless such policy or bond is subject, if the accident has
resulted in bodily injury or death, to a limit, exclusive of interest
and costs, of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars because of
bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident and,
subject to said limit for one person, to a limit of not less than fifty
thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of two or more
persons in any one accident, and if the accident has resulted in injury
to, or destruction of, property to a limit of not less than ((ten))
fifteen thousand dollars because of injury to or destruction of
property of others in any one accident.
(2) No policy or bond is effective under RCW 46.29.080 with respect
to any vehicle which was not registered in this state or was a vehicle
which was registered elsewhere than in this state at the effective date
of the policy or bond or the most recent renewal thereof, unless the
insurance company or surety company issuing such policy or bond is
authorized to do business in this state, or if said company is not
authorized to do business in this state, unless it executes a power of
attorney authorizing the director of licensing to accept service on its
behalf of notice or process in any action upon such policy or bond
arising out of such accident.
(3) The department may rely upon the accuracy of the information in
a required report of an accident as to the existence of insurance or a
bond unless and until the department has reason to believe that the
information is erroneous.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.29.260 and 1980 c 117 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The term "proof of financial responsibility for the future" as used
in this chapter means: Proof of ability to respond in damages for
liability, on account of accidents occurring subsequent to the
effective date of said proof, arising out of the ownership,
maintenance, or use of a vehicle of a type subject to registration
under the laws of this state, in the amount of twenty-five thousand
dollars because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one
accident, and, subject to said limit for one person, in the amount of
fifty thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of two or
more persons in any one accident, and in the amount of ((ten)) fifteen
thousand dollars because of injury to or destruction of property of
others in any one accident. Wherever used in this chapter the terms
"proof of financial responsibility" or "proof" shall be synonymous with
the term "proof of financial responsibility for the future."

Sec. 3 RCW 46.29.390 and 1980 c 117 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Judgments herein referred to are, for the purpose of this
chapter only, deemed satisfied:
(a) When twenty-five thousand dollars has been credited upon any
judgment or judgments rendered in excess of that amount because of
bodily injury to or death of one person as the result of any one
accident; or
(b) When, subject to such limit of twenty-five thousand dollars
because of bodily injury to or death of one person, the sum of fifty
thousand dollars has been credited upon any judgment or judgments
rendered in excess of that amount because of bodily injury to or death
of two or more persons as the result of any one accident; or
(c) When ((ten)) fifteen thousand dollars has been credited upon
any judgment or judgments rendered in excess of that amount because of
injury to or destruction of property of others as a result of any one
accident.
(2) Payments made in settlements of any claims because of bodily
injury, death, or property damage arising from such accident shall be
credited in reduction of the amounts provided for in this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.29.490 and 2010 c 8 s 9043 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Certification. A "motor vehicle liability policy" as said term
is used in this chapter means an "owner's policy" or an "operator's
policy" of liability insurance, certified as provided in RCW 46.29.460
or 46.29.470 as proof of financial responsibility for the future, and
issued, except as otherwise provided in RCW 46.29.470, by an insurance
carrier duly authorized to transact business in this state, to or for
the benefit of the person named in the policy as insured.
(2) Owner's policy. Such owner's policy of liability insurance:
(a) Shall designate by explicit description or by appropriate
reference all vehicles with respect to which coverage is to be granted
by the policy; and
(b) Shall insure the person named therein and any other person, as
insured, using any such vehicle or vehicles with the express or implied
permission of such named insured, against loss from the liability
imposed by law for damages arising out of the ownership, maintenance,
or use of such vehicle or vehicles within the United States of America
or the Dominion of Canada, subject to limits exclusive of interest and
costs, with respect to each such vehicle as follows: Twenty-five
thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of one person in
any one accident and, subject to said limit for one person, fifty
thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of two or more
persons in any one accident, and ((ten)) fifteen thousand dollars
because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one
accident.
(3) Operator's policy. Such operator's policy of liability
insurance shall insure the person named as insured therein against loss
from the liability imposed upon him or her by law for damages arising
out of the use by him or her of any motor vehicle not owned by him or
her, within the same territorial limits and subject to the same limits
of liability as are set forth above with respect to an owner's policy
of liability insurance.
(4) Required statements in policies. Such motor vehicle liability
policy shall state the name and address of the named insured, the
coverage afforded by the policy, the premium charged therefor, the
policy period, and the limits of liability, and shall contain an
agreement or be endorsed that insurance is provided under the policy in
accordance with the coverage defined in this chapter as respects bodily
injury and death or property damage, or both, and is subject to all the
provisions of this chapter.
(5) Policy need not insure workers' compensation, etc. Such motor
vehicle liability policy need not insure any liability under any
workers' compensation law nor any liability on account of bodily injury
or death of an employee of the insured while engaged in the employment,
other than domestic, of the insured, or while engaged in the operation,
maintenance, or repair of any such vehicle nor any liability for damage
to property owned by, rented to, in charge of, or transported by the
insured.
(6) Provisions incorporated in policy. Every motor vehicle
liability policy is subject to the following provisions which need not
be contained therein:
(a) The liability of the insurance carrier with respect to the
insurance required by this chapter becomes absolute whenever injury or
damage covered by said motor vehicle liability policy occurs; said
policy may not be canceled or annulled as to such liability by any
agreement between the insurance carrier and the insured after the
occurrence of the injury or damage; no statement made by the insured or
on his or her behalf and no violation of said policy defeats or voids
said policy.
(b) The satisfaction by the insured of a judgment for such injury
or damage shall not be a condition precedent to the right or duty of
the insurance carrier to make payment on account of such injury or
damage.
(c) The insurance carrier may settle any claim covered by the
policy, and if such settlement is made in good faith, the amount
thereof is deductible from the limits of liability specified in
subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(d) The policy, the written application therefor, if any, and any
rider or endorsement which does not conflict with the provisions of
this chapter constitutes the entire contract between the parties.
(7) Excess or additional coverage. Any policy which grants the
coverage required for a motor vehicle liability policy may also grant
any lawful coverage in excess of or in addition to the coverage
specified for a motor vehicle liability policy, and such excess or
additional coverage is not subject to the provisions of this chapter.
With respect to a policy which grants such excess or additional
coverage the term "motor vehicle liability policy" applies only to that
part of the coverage which is required by this section.
(8) Reimbursement provision permitted. Any motor vehicle liability
policy may provide that the insured shall reimburse the insurance
carrier for any payment the insurance carrier would not have been
obligated to make under the terms of the policy except for the
provisions of this chapter.
(9) Proration of insurance permitted. Any motor vehicle liability
policy may provide for the prorating of the insurance thereunder with
other valid and collectible insurance.
(10) Multiple policies. The requirements for a motor vehicle
liability policy may be fulfilled by the policies of one or more
insurance carrier which policies together meet such requirements.
(11) Binders. Any binder issued pending the issuance of a motor
vehicle liability policy is deemed to fulfill the requirements for such
a policy.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.29.550 and 2010 c 8 s 9046 are each amended to read
as follows:
Proof of financial responsibility may be evidenced by the
certificate of the state treasurer that the person named therein has
deposited with him or her sixty-five thousand dollars in cash, or
securities such as may legally be purchased by savings banks or for
trust funds of a market value of sixty-five thousand dollars. The
state treasurer shall not accept any such deposit and issue a
certificate therefor and the department shall not accept such
certificate unless accompanied by evidence that there are no
unsatisfied judgments of any character against the depositor in the
county where the depositor resides.

--- END ---