BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.68.170 and 1949 c 100 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director is authorized and shall make and enforce such
regulations as may be necessary to effectuate the provisions of this
chapter. Such regulations shall be consistent with the provisions of
this chapter.
(2) The rules adopted under this section should provide, if
practicable, for alternative disposal options for ovine blood, separate
from the carcass or associated processing wastes, other than delivery
to a rendering plant if alternative disposal options can deliver a
value-added property to the blood.

--- END ---