BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95.330 and 2009 c 178 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An anaerobic digester that complies with the conditions
specified in this section is exempt from the permitting requirements of
this chapter. To qualify for the exemption, an anaerobic digester must
meet the following conditions:
(a) The owner or operator must provide the department or the
jurisdictional health department with at least thirty days' notice of
intent to operate under the conditions specified in this section and
comply with any guidelines issued under subsection (2) of this section;
(b) The anaerobic digester must process at least fifty percent
livestock manure by volume;
(c) The anaerobic digester may process no more than thirty percent
imported organic waste-derived material by volume, and must comply with
subsection (3) of this section;
(d) The anaerobic digester must comply with design and operating
standards in the natural resources conservation service's conservation
practice standard code 366 in effect as of July 26, 2009;
(e) Digestate must:
(i) Be managed in accordance with a dairy nutrient management plan
under chapter 90.64 RCW that includes elements addressing management
and use of digestate;
(ii) Meet compost quality standards concerning pathogens,
stability, nutrient testing, and metals before it is distributed for
off-site use, or be sent to an off-site permitted compost facility for
further treatment to meet compost quality standards; or
(iii) Be processed or managed in an alternate manner approved by
the department;
(f) The owner or operator must allow inspection by the department
or jurisdictional health department at reasonable times to verify
compliance with the conditions specified in this section; and
(g) The owner or operator must submit an annual report to the
department or the jurisdictional health department concerning use of
nonmanure material in the anaerobic digester and any required
compliance testing.
(2) By August 1, 2009, the department and the department of
agriculture, in consultation with the department of health, shall make
available to anaerobic digester owners and operators clearly written
guidelines for the anaerobic codigestion of livestock manure and
organic waste-derived material. The guidelines must explain the steps
necessary for an owner or operator to meet the conditions specified in
this section for an exemption from the permitting requirements of this
chapter.
(3) Any imported organic waste-derived material must:
(a) Be preconsumer in nature;
(b) Be fed into the anaerobic digester within thirty-six hours of
receipt at the anaerobic digester;
(c) If it is likely to contain animal by-products, be previously
source-separated at a facility licensed to process food by the United
States department of agriculture, the United States food and drug
administration, the Washington state department of agriculture, or
other applicable regulatory agency;
(d) If it contains bovine processing waste, be derived from animals
approved by the United States department of agriculture food safety and
inspection service and not contain any specified risk material;
(e) If it contains sheep carcasses or sheep processing waste other
than sheep blood, not be fed into the anaerobic digester;
(f) Be stored and handled in a manner that protects surface water
and groundwater and complies with best management practices;
(g) Be received or stored in structures that:
(i) Comply with the natural resources conservation service's
conservation practice standard code 313 in effect as of July 26, 2009;
(ii) Are certified to be effective by a representative of the
natural resources conservation service; or
(iii) Meet applicable construction industry standards adopted by
the American concrete institute or the American institute of steel
construction and in effect as of July 26, 2009; and
(h) Be managed to prevent migration of nuisance odors beyond
property boundaries and minimize attraction of flies, rodents, and
other vectors.
(4) Digestate that is managed in accordance with a dairy nutrient
management plan under chapter 90.64 RCW that includes elements
addressing management and use of digestate shall no longer be
considered a solid waste. Use of digestate from an anaerobic digester
that complies with the conditions specified in this section is exempt
from the permitting requirements of this chapter.
(5) An anaerobic digester that does not comply with the conditions
specified in this section may be subject to the permitting requirements
of this chapter. In addition, violations of the conditions specified
in this section are subject to provisions in RCW 70.95.315.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Anaerobic digester" means a vessel that processes organic
material into biogas and digestate using microorganisms in a
decomposition process within a closed, oxygen-free container.
(b) "Best management practices" means managerial practices that
prevent or reduce water pollution.
(c) "Digestate" means both solid and liquid substances that remain
following anaerobic digestion of organic material in an anaerobic
digester.
(d) "Imported" means originating off of the farm or other site
where the anaerobic digester is being operated.
(e) "Organic waste-derived material" has the same meaning as
defined in RCW 15.54.270 and any other organic wastes approved by the
department, except for organic waste-derived material collected through
municipal commercial and residential solid waste collection programs.

--- END ---