BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.40.010 and 2003 c 53 s 386 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((No law or order of any regulatory agency of this state shall
prevent a common carrier by railroad from staffing its passenger trains
in accordance with collective bargaining agreements or any national or
other applicable settlement of train crew size. In the absence of a
collective bargaining agreement or any national or other applicable
settlement of train crew size, any common carrier railroad operating a
passenger train with a crew of less than two members shall be subject
to a safety review by the Washington utilities and transportation
commission, which, as to staffing, may issue an order requiring as many
as two crew members.)) Any person, corporation, company, or officer of
court operating any railroad or railway, or part of any railroad or
railway, in the state of Washington, and engaged, as a common carrier,
in the transportation of freight or passengers must operate all trains
over its road with crews consisting of not less than two qualified crew
members.
(2) Each train or engine run in violation of this section is a
separate offense((: PROVIDED, That nothing in)). This section ((shall
be construed as applying)) does not apply in the case of disability of
one or more members of any train crew while out on the road between
division terminals((,)) or wrecking trains((, or to any line, or part
of line, where not more than two trains are run in each twenty-four
hours)).
(3) Any person, corporation, company, or officer of court operating
any railroad or railway, or part of any railroad or railway, in the
state of Washington, and engaged, as a common carrier, in the
transportation of freight or passengers((,)) who violates this section
is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction ((thereof shall)) must
be fined not less than ((one hundred)) five thousand dollars ((nor))
and not more than ((five hundred)) one hundred thousand dollars for
each offense.
(4) It is the duty of the commission to enforce this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 81.40.035 (Freight train crews) and 1967
c 2 s 2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---