BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The facilities review council is hereby created as an advisory
group to the legislature to review facilities leasing proposals and
policy recommendations that will contribute to the overall fiscal
stability of the operating and capital budgets.
(2) The council shall consist of one individual appointed by the
governor, and four legislative members, each of whom are appointed by
the chairperson of the two largest political caucuses in the senate and
house of representatives. The chair of the council shall be selected
from among the four caucus appointees. The council may select such
other officers as the members deem necessary. The office of financial
management shall provide the staff and resources necessary for
implementing this section. The council shall meet at least every
ninety days. The members of the council shall be reimbursed as
provided in RCW 43.03.220 and 44.04.120.
(3) The council shall review six-year plans recommended by the
office of financial management annually. The review shall include:
(a) Major lease renewals or new major lease proposals over fifty
thousand square feet; (b) vacancy rates in state-owned and leased
facilities; and (c) leasing rates for state-owned facilities and
privately owned facilities.
(4) Each review of a major lease proposal or new major lease
proposal shall include at a minimum a seventy-five year life-cycle cost
analysis, the LEED designation, any high performance building measures,
location proximity to public transit and local amenities, colocation
and collaborative efforts, square feet per person, and ratio of offices
to cubicles.
(5) The council shall make recommendations to the legislature
including: (a) Priorities for present and future office leasing or
building needs; (b) appropriations for leasing or building needed
space; (c) any statutory changes necessary to ensure effective space
planning; and (d) new design criteria, standards, and procedures in the
planning and construction of new or remodeled leased buildings.
(6) This section does not apply to the acquisition of real estate
by: (a) The state college and universities for research or
experimental purposes; (b) the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, the department of transportation, and
the state parks and recreation commission for purposes other than the
leasing of offices, warehouses, and real estate for similar purposes;
and (c) the department of commerce for community college health career
training programs, offices for the department of commerce or other
appropriate state agencies, and other nonprofit community uses,
including community meeting and training facilities, where the real
estate is acquired during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.

--- END ---