BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Council" means the student achievement council.
(2) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The pay it forward program is created
for the purpose of providing greater access to higher education. The
program shall be developed and implemented by the council.
(2) Eligible students who choose to participate in the pay it
forward program and who are enrolled in an undergraduate postsecondary
degree or certificate program at an institution of higher education
shall receive funds for their higher education program's tuition and
fees, less any awards the student may receive through state financial
aid.
(3) Students choosing to participate in the pay it forward program
shall sign a binding contract obligating them to make contributions to
the pay it forward program to be deposited by the office in the pay it
forward trust fund account created in section 4 of this act. Program
participants shall start making contributions one year following
graduation or discontinuation of their postsecondary program. The
amount students are required to contribute and the length of time
students are required to contribute shall be determined by the council
within the parameters in this subsection.
(a) Participants who attended a state university shall not be
required to contribute more than five percent of their income.
(b) Participants who attended a regional university or state
college or who enrolled in an applied baccalaureate program at a
community or technical college shall not be required to contribute more
than three and one-half percent of their income.
(c) Participants who attended a community or technical college and
enrolled in an associate degree, workforce degree, or certificate
program shall not be required to contribute more than two percent of
their income.
(d) Participants who transfer from a community or technical college
to a baccalaureate program shall contribute based on the proportion of
credit hours earned in the respective sectors.
(e) Participants who receive other state financial aid shall have
their contribution obligations calculated according to the proportion
of their tuition and required fees that are financed through the pay it
forward program.
(f) Participants shall be required to make contributions in
proportion to the number of credits for which the participant was
registered while participating in the pay it forward program.
(g) A student is eligible to receive pay it forward tuition
assistance for up to five years, or the credit or clock hour equivalent
of five years, or up to one hundred twenty-five percent of the
published length of time of the student's program.
(h) Participants shall not be required to make contributions to the
pay it forward program for a period longer than twenty-five years.
(4) Students eligible to participate on a voluntary basis are:
(a) All students graduating after January 1, 2015, from up to five
high schools selected by the council in subsection (5) of this section;
and
(b) Within eight years of their graduation, students who have
graduated from a high school selected in subsection (5) of this
section, including students who have previously enrolled in a
postsecondary program at an institution of higher education who did not
participate in the pay it forward program.
(5) The council shall select up to five high schools for
participation in the program giving consideration to the following:
(a) At least two high schools must be located east of the crest of
the Cascade mountains, one of which shall be located in central
Washington;
(b) Participating schools must vary in size and geographic
location;
(c) Participating schools must serve high proportions of low-income
students and students who are traditionally underrepresented in
postsecondary education, including students whose parents have never
attended college; and
(d) Participating schools must have communities and leaders that
demonstrate support for their students to pursue postsecondary
education.
(6) The rate at which the pay it forward program shall be expanded
from the initial five high schools to eventually incorporate all public
high schools in the state must be determined by the legislature in the
omnibus appropriations act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Each high school selected to participate in
the pay it forward program in section 2 of this act shall be allocated
one additional full-time equivalent counselor in order to increase
participation in postsecondary education access programs such as the
pay it forward program and the college bound scholarship.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The pay it forward trust fund account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. The primary purpose of
the account is to ensure that all disbursements from the account are
made available to students eligible for the pay it forward program
created in section 2 of this act.
(2) The office shall deposit in the account all money received for
the program established under section 2 of this act. The account shall
consist of funds appropriated by the legislature for the program,
contributions to the pay it forward program by pay it forward program
participants, and private contributions, including principal and
interest. Moneys deposited in the account do not lapse at the close of
the fiscal period for which they were appropriated. Both during and
after the fiscal period in which moneys were deposited in the account,
the office may expend moneys in the account only for the purposes of
the pay it forward program.
(3) Expenditures from the account shall be used for the pay it
forward program according to program rules and policies.
(4) Only the executive director of the office or the executive
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
(5) Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations
and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---