BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Hundreds of tax exemptions and special
tax preferences have been granted to special interests by the
legislature without requiring assessment of whether those exemptions
and preferences would create jobs or result in increased economic
activity which increases state revenues. These exemptions and
preferences result in the entire tax system being less fair for people
who do not have special exemptions and preferences, and increase the
taxes on all other taxpayers in order to fund education and other state
services.
(2) Tax expenditures reduce revenues collected from the tax base
and provide preferential treatment to some at the expense of those not
getting a tax expenditure. Almost as much money as is collected in tax
revenues is not collected and is given out as tax expenditures. While
every expenditure of revenue must be authorized and appropriated in the
state budget approved by the legislature, the massive amounts of
funding for these tax preferences and exemptions continue without any
readoption by the legislature in each budget. These exemptions and
preferences are, therefore, tax expenditures, most of which continue
without any legislative action year after year while the state seeks
other funding to meet constitutional duties to fund education and other
services and obligations.
(3) Off-budget spending in the form of tax expenditures has
resulted in out of control state spending that is depleting the state
of needed revenue to fund essential state services like education and
health care. Tax expenditures as off-budget spending lack the
accountability of other state spending programs because they have not
been included in the state biennial budget process and are not subject
to the same biennial scrutiny.
(4) This measure would create a tax expenditure budget as part of
the biennial budget adopted by the legislature. This measure reforms
the tax expenditure process by including tax expenditures in a tax
expenditure budget in the biennial state budget process and requires
they be readopted every two years as part of the budget process or they
expire. This brings tax expenditures into the state budget process to
protect the public's interest, make them more transparent and
accountable, and help ensure they are producing results to meet the
priorities of government as other state spending is required to do
under the governor's proposed budget.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The omnibus operating appropriations act enacted by the
legislature must include:
(a) A tax expenditure budget detailing all discretionary state tax
expenditures together with an estimate of the state revenue impact
associated with each discretionary state tax expenditure, the stated
purpose of the tax expenditure, and the effectiveness of the tax
expenditure in meeting that purpose;
(b) A section stating the total estimated revenue impact from all
discretionary state tax expenditures, total appropriations, and total
state expenditures representing the sum of discretionary state tax
expenditures and appropriations;
(c) A section stating the total state revenue impact from all
nondiscretionary tax expenditures; and
(d) The purpose of the exemption or preference and criteria by
which its continuation is evaluated based on whether it increases
fairness, increases family wage jobs or other jobs, increases other
state revenues greater than the amount foregone, or is necessary to
prevent the loss of jobs via relocation to another jurisdiction.
(2) The sections described in subsection (1) of this section must
be stated in part I of the omnibus operating appropriations act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "discretionary state tax
expenditure" means a tax preference, as defined in RCW 43.136.021,
which impacts revenues appropriated in the omnibus operating
appropriations act and that is not required by the state Constitution,
United States Constitution, or federal law.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.06.400 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 20 s 201 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((Beginning in January 1984, and in January of every fourth
year thereafter, the department of revenue must submit to the
legislature prior to the regular session a listing of the amount of
reduction for the current and next biennium in the revenues of the
state or the revenues of local government collected by the state as a
result of tax exemptions. The listing must include an estimate of the
revenue lost from the tax exemption, the purpose of the tax exemption,
the persons, organizations, or parts of the population which benefit
from the tax exemption, and whether or not the tax exemption conflicts
with another state program. The listing must)) Biennially, the
department of revenue must prepare a tax expenditure budget detailing
the amount of reduction for the current and next biennium in the
revenues of the state or the revenues of local government collected by
the state as a result of tax expenditures. The tax expenditure budget
must be updated as part of any supplemental budget process. The tax
expenditure budget must include: An estimate of the revenue lost from
each tax expenditure; the purpose of the tax expenditure; the persons,
organizations, and parts of the population that benefit from the tax
expenditure; whether or not the tax expenditure conflicts with another
state program; a ranking of each tax expenditure as high, medium, or
low in meeting the state's priorities of government; and the expiration
date of the tax expenditure; and the purpose of the tax expenditure
with criteria for its evaluation along with results of any review by
the joint legislative audit and review committee and the citizen
commission for performance measurement of tax expenditures pursuant to
RCW 43.136.065 per section 2(1)(d) of this act. The tax expenditure
budget must also include but not be limited to the following revenue
sources:
(a) Real and personal property tax exemptions under Title 84 RCW;
(b) Business and occupation tax exemptions, deductions, and credits
under chapter 82.04 RCW;
(c) Retail sales and use tax exemptions under chapters 82.08,
82.12, and 82.14 RCW;
(d) Public utility tax exemptions and deductions under chapter
82.16 RCW;
(e) Food fish and shellfish tax exemptions under chapter 82.27 RCW;
(f) Leasehold excise tax exemptions under chapter 82.29A RCW;
(g) Motor vehicle and special fuel tax exemptions and refunds under
chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW;
(h) Aircraft fuel tax exemptions under chapter 82.42 RCW;
(i) Motor vehicle excise tax exclusions under chapter 82.44 RCW;
and
(j) Insurance premiums tax exemptions under chapter 48.14 RCW.
(2) The department of revenue must prepare the ((listing)) tax
expenditure budget required by this section with the assistance of any
other agencies or departments as may be required.
(3) ((The department of revenue must present the listing to the
ways and means committees of each house in public hearings.
(4) Beginning in January 1984, and every four years thereafter the
governor is requested to review the report from the department of
revenue and may submit recommendations to the legislature with respect
to the repeal or modification of any tax exemption. The ways and means
committees of each house and the appropriate standing committee of each
house must hold public hearings and take appropriate action on the
recommendations submitted by the governor.
(5))) As used in this section, "tax ((exemption)) expenditure"
means an exemption, exclusion, or deduction from the base of a tax; a
credit against a tax; a deferral of a tax; or a preferential tax rate.
(((6) For purposes of the listing due in January 2012, the
department of revenue does not have to prepare or update the listing
with respect to any tax exemption that would not be likely to increase
state revenue if the exemption was repealed or otherwise eliminated.))
(4) The department of revenue must submit the tax expenditure
budget to the governor at the time biennial budget requests are due
under RCW 43.88.030. The governor is requested to review the tax
expenditure budget from the department of revenue and submit it as part
of the biennial budget documents under RCW 43.88.030. The tax
expenditure budget must categorize each tax expenditure according to
the program and functions each expenditure supports in the biennial
budget.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.06.400 and 2013 c 225 s 605 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Beginning in January 1984, and in January of every fourth
year thereafter, the department of revenue must submit to the
legislature prior to the regular session a listing of the amount of
reduction for the current and next biennium in the revenues of the
state or the revenues of local government collected by the state as a
result of tax exemptions. The listing must include an estimate of the
revenue lost from the tax exemption, the purpose of the tax exemption,
the persons, organizations, or parts of the population which benefit
from the tax exemption, and whether or not the tax exemption conflicts
with another state program. The listing must)) Biennially, the
department of revenue must prepare a tax expenditure budget detailing
the amount of reduction for the current and next biennium in the
revenues of the state or the revenues of local government collected by
the state as a result of tax expenditures. The tax expenditure budget
must be updated as part of any supplemental budget process. The tax
expenditure budget must include: An estimate of the revenue lost from
each tax expenditure; the purpose of the tax expenditure; the persons,
organizations, and parts of the population that benefit from the tax
expenditure; whether or not the tax expenditure conflicts with another
state program; a ranking of each tax expenditure as high, medium, or
low in meeting the state's priorities of government; and the expiration
date of the tax expenditure; and the purpose of the tax expenditure
with criteria for its evaluation along with results of any review by
the joint legislative audit and review committee and the citizen
commission for performance measurement of tax expenditures pursuant to
RCW 43.136.065 per section 2(1)(d) of this act. The tax expenditure
budget must also include but not be limited to the following revenue
sources:
(a) Real and personal property tax exemptions under Title 84 RCW;
(b) Business and occupation tax exemptions, deductions, and credits
under chapter 82.04 RCW;
(c) Retail sales and use tax exemptions under chapters 82.08,
82.12, and 82.14 RCW;
(d) Public utility tax exemptions and deductions under chapter
82.16 RCW;
(e) Food fish and shellfish tax exemptions under chapter 82.27 RCW;
(f) Leasehold excise tax exemptions under chapter 82.29A RCW;
(g) Motor vehicle and special fuel tax exemptions and refunds under
chapter 82.38 RCW;
(h) Aircraft fuel tax exemptions under chapter 82.42 RCW;
(i) Motor vehicle excise tax exclusions under chapter 82.44 RCW;
and
(j) Insurance premiums tax exemptions under chapter 48.14 RCW.
(2) The department of revenue must prepare the ((listing)) tax
expenditure budget required by this section with the assistance of any
other agencies or departments as may be required.
(3) ((The department of revenue must present the listing to the
ways and means committees of each house in public hearings.
(4) Beginning in January 1984, and every four years thereafter the
governor is requested to review the report from the department of
revenue and may submit recommendations to the legislature with respect
to the repeal or modification of any tax exemption. The ways and means
committees of each house and the appropriate standing committee of each
house must hold public hearings and take appropriate action on the
recommendations submitted by the governor.
(5))) As used in this section, "tax ((exemption)) expenditure"
means an exemption, exclusion, or deduction from the base of a tax; a
credit against a tax; a deferral of a tax; or a preferential tax rate.
(((6) For purposes of the listing due in January 2012, the
department of revenue does not have to prepare or update the listing
with respect to any tax exemption that would not be likely to increase
state revenue if the exemption was repealed or otherwise eliminated.))
(4) The department of revenue must submit the tax expenditure
budget to the governor at the time biennial budget requests are due
under RCW 43.88.030. The governor is requested to review the tax
expenditure budget from the department of revenue and submit it as part
of the biennial budget documents under RCW 43.88.030. The tax
expenditure budget must categorize each tax expenditure according to
the program and functions each expenditure supports in the biennial
budget.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax expenditure budget prepared by the department of
revenue must include a detailed analysis of each expenditure and its
ranking of high, medium, or low in meeting the priorities of government
and whether each expenditure is meeting its stated goals as stated in
RCW 43.136.055. The tax expenditure budget is not required to address
tax expenditures required under the state Constitution, United States
Constitution, or federal law.
(2) The governor must coordinate the department of revenue's tax
expenditure budget and the governor's review with the audit review
process by the joint legislative audit and review committee and the
citizen commission for performance measurement of tax expenditures and
must identify each expenditure that will expire during the next
biennium and make a recommendation as to whether the expenditure should
be allowed to expire, continue, or continue with modification. The
governor also may submit other recommendations to the legislature with
respect to the repeal or modification of any tax expenditure. The
fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the senate and
the appropriate standing committee of the house of representatives and
the senate must hold public hearings and must adopt a tax expenditure
budget as part of the omnibus appropriations act. Any tax expenditure
not included in the tax expenditure budget in the adopted omnibus
appropriations act expires at the end of the calendar year in which the
budget is adopted.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "tax expenditure" means an
exemption, exclusion, or deduction from the base of a tax; a credit
against a tax; a deferral of a tax; or a preferential tax rate.
(4) Each biennium the tax expenditure budget must be included in
the omnibus operating appropriations act enacted by the legislature.
(a) Tax expenditures in the tax expenditure budget must be treated
as any other state expenditure and must be reauthorized with each
biennial budget. Tax expenditures that have an expiration provision
must be included in the tax expenditure budget with the expiration date
stated. Tax expenditures can be expired by the legislature prior to
the stated expiration date in the same manner as the legislature can
terminate any expenditure for other state funding.
(b) No new or existing tax expenditure may be approved or
reauthorized by the legislature for more than ten years.
(c) Any new tax expenditures must be added to the tax expenditure
budget and are subject to the same audit and review procedures and for
meeting the state's priorities of government as existing tax
expenditures are required to meet. New tax expenditures enacted as
part of the tax expenditure budget in the omnibus appropriations act
but which were not reviewed under all provisions of RCW 43.136.045 or
43.136.055 prior to enactment must be prioritized for review.
(d) The legislature may expire a tax expenditure earlier than its
authorized term by either:
(i) A majority vote as provided under Article II, section 22 of the
state Constitution; or
(ii) As part of the budget process in the same manner as any other
expenditure is approved or denied in the omnibus appropriations act by
a majority vote of the members of the house of representatives and the
senate.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.88.030 and 2006 c 334 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) (a) The director of financial management ((shall)) must provide
all agencies with a complete set of instructions for submitting
biennial budget requests to the director at least three months before
agency budget documents are due into the office of financial
management.
(b) The budget document or documents ((shall)) must consist of the
governor's budget message which ((shall)) must be explanatory of the
budget and ((shall)) must contain an outline of the proposed financial
policies of the state for the ensuing fiscal period, as well as an
outline of the proposed six-year financial policies where applicable,
and ((shall)) must describe in connection therewith the important
features of the budget.
(i) The biennial budget document or documents ((shall)) must also
describe performance indicators that demonstrate measurable progress
towards priority results.
(ii) The message ((shall)) must set forth the reasons for salient
changes from the previous fiscal period in expenditure and revenue
items and ((shall)) must explain any major changes in financial policy.
Attached to the budget message ((shall)) must be such supporting
schedules, exhibits and other explanatory material in respect to both
current operations and capital improvements as the governor ((shall))
deems to be useful to the legislature.
(iii) The budget document or documents ((shall)) must set forth a
proposal for expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period, or six-year
period where applicable, based upon the estimated revenues and
caseloads as approved by the economic and revenue forecast council and
caseload forecast council or upon the estimated revenues and caseloads
of the office of financial management for those funds, accounts,
sources, and programs for which the forecast councils do not prepare an
official forecast. Revenues ((shall)) must be estimated for such
fiscal period from the source and at the rates existing by law at the
time of submission of the budget document, including the supplemental
budgets submitted in the even-numbered years of a biennium. However,
the estimated revenues and caseloads for use in the governor's budget
document may be adjusted to reflect budgetary revenue transfers and
revenue and caseload estimates dependent upon budgetary assumptions of
enrollments, workloads, and caseloads. All adjustments to the approved
estimated revenues and caseloads must be set forth in the budget
document.
(c) The governor may additionally submit, as an appendix to each
supplemental, biennial, or six-year agency budget or to the budget
document or documents, a proposal for expenditures in the ensuing
fiscal period from revenue sources derived from proposed changes in
existing statutes.
(d) The budget document or documents ((shall)) must also contain:
(((a))) (i) Revenues classified by fund and source for the
immediately past fiscal period, those received or anticipated for the
current fiscal period, and those anticipated for the ensuing biennium;
(((b))) (ii) The tax expenditure budget prepared under RCW
43.06.400;
(iii) The undesignated fund balance or deficit, by fund;
(((c))) (iv) Such additional information dealing with expenditures,
revenues, workload, performance, and personnel as the legislature may
direct by law or concurrent resolution;
(((d))) (v) Such additional information dealing with revenues and
expenditures as the governor ((shall)) deems pertinent and useful to
the legislature;
(((e))) (vi) Tabulations showing expenditures classified by fund,
function, and agency;
(((f))) (vii) The expenditures that include nonbudgeted,
nonappropriated accounts outside the state treasury;
(((g))) (viii) Identification of all proposed direct expenditures
to implement the Puget Sound water quality plan under chapter 90.71
RCW, shown by agency and in total; and
(((h))) (ix) Tabulations showing each postretirement adjustment by
retirement system established after fiscal year 1991, to include, but
not be limited to, estimated total payments made to the end of the
previous biennial period, estimated payments for the present biennium,
and estimated payments for the ensuing biennium.
(((2))) (e) The budget document or documents ((shall)) must include
detailed estimates of all anticipated revenues applicable to proposed
operating ((or)), capital, and tax expenditures and ((shall)) must also
include all proposed operating ((or)), capital, and tax expenditures.
The total of beginning undesignated fund balance and estimated revenues
less working capital and other reserves ((shall)) must equal or exceed
the total of proposed applicable expenditures.
(f) The budget document or documents ((shall)) must further
include:
(((a))) (i) Interest, amortization and redemption charges on the
state debt;
(((b))) (ii) Payments of all reliefs, judgments, and claims;
(((c))) (iii) Other statutory expenditures;
(((d))) (iv) Expenditures incident to the operation for each
agency;
(((e))) (v) Revenues derived from agency operations;
(((f))) (vi) Expenditures and revenues ((shall)) must be given in
comparative form showing those incurred or received for the immediately
past fiscal period and those anticipated for the current biennium and
next ensuing biennium;
(((g))) (vii) A showing and explanation of amounts of general fund
and other funds obligations for debt service and any transfers of
moneys that otherwise would have been available for appropriation;
(((h))) (viii) Common school expenditures on a fiscal-year basis;
(((i))) (ix) A showing, by agency, of the value and purpose of
financing contracts for the lease/purchase or acquisition of personal
or real property for the current and ensuing fiscal periods; and
(((j))) (x) A showing and explanation of anticipated amounts of
general fund and other funds required to amortize the unfunded
actuarial accrued liability of the retirement system specified under
chapter 41.45 RCW, and the contributions to meet such amortization,
stated in total dollars and as a level percentage of total
compensation.
(((3))) (2) The governor's operating budget document or documents
((shall)), including the tax expenditure budget, must reflect the
statewide priorities as required by RCW 43.88.090.
(((4))) (3) The governor's operating budget document or documents
((shall)), including the tax expenditure budget, must identify
activities that are not addressing the statewide priorities.
(((5))) (4)(a) A separate capital budget document or schedule
((shall)) must be submitted that will contain the following:
(((a))) (i) A statement setting forth a long-range facilities plan
for the state that identifies and includes the highest priority needs
within affordable spending levels;
(((b))) (ii) A capital program consisting of proposed capital
projects for the next biennium and the two biennia succeeding the next
biennium consistent with the long-range facilities plan. Insomuch as
is practical, and recognizing emergent needs, the capital program
((shall)) must reflect the priorities, projects, and spending levels
proposed in previously submitted capital budget documents in order to
provide a reliable long-range planning tool for the legislature and
state agencies;
(((c))) (iii) A capital plan consisting of proposed capital
spending for at least four biennia succeeding the next biennium;
(((d))) (iv) A strategic plan for reducing backlogs of maintenance
and repair projects. The plan ((shall)) must include a prioritized
list of specific facility deficiencies and capital projects to address
the deficiencies for each agency, cost estimates for each project, a
schedule for completing projects over a reasonable period of time, and
identification of normal maintenance activities to reduce future
backlogs;
(((e))) (v) A statement of the reason or purpose for a project;
(((f))) (vi) Verification that a project is consistent with the
provisions set forth in chapter 36.70A RCW;
(((g))) (vii) A statement about the proposed site, size, and
estimated life of the project, if applicable;
(((h))) (viii) Estimated total project cost;
(((i))) (ix) For major projects valued over five million dollars,
estimated costs for the following project components: Acquisition,
consultant services, construction, equipment, project management, and
other costs included as part of the project. Project component costs
((shall)) must be displayed in a standard format defined by the office
of financial management to allow comparisons between projects;
(((j))) (x) Estimated total project cost for each phase of the
project as defined by the office of financial management;
(((k))) (xi) Estimated ensuing biennium costs;
(((l))) (xii) Estimated costs beyond the ensuing biennium;
(((m))) (xiii) Estimated construction start and completion dates;
(((n))) (xiv) Source and type of funds proposed;
(((o))) (xv) Estimated ongoing operating budget costs or savings
resulting from the project, including staffing and maintenance costs;
(((p))) (xvi) For any capital appropriation requested for a state
agency for the acquisition of land or the capital improvement of land
in which the primary purpose of the acquisition or improvement is
recreation or wildlife habitat conservation, the capital budget
document, or an omnibus list of recreation and habitat acquisitions
provided with the governor's budget document, ((shall)) must identify
the projected costs of operation and maintenance for at least the two
biennia succeeding the next biennium. Omnibus lists of habitat and
recreation land acquisitions ((shall)) must include individual project
cost estimates for operation and maintenance as well as a total for all
state projects included in the list. The document ((shall)) must
identify the source of funds from which the operation and maintenance
costs are proposed to be funded;
(((q))) (xvii) Such other information bearing upon capital projects
as the governor deems to be useful;
(((r))) (xviii) Standard terms, including a standard and uniform
definition of normal maintenance, for all capital projects;
(((s))) (xix) Such other information as the legislature may direct
by law or concurrent resolution.
(b) For purposes of this subsection (((5))) (4), the term "capital
project" ((shall)) must be defined subsequent to the analysis,
findings, and recommendations of a joint committee comprised of
representatives from the house capital appropriations committee, senate
ways and means committee, legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee, and office of financial management.
(((6))) (5) No change affecting the comparability of agency or
program information relating to expenditures, revenues, workload,
performance, and personnel ((shall)) may be made in the format of any
budget document or report presented to the legislature under this
section or RCW 43.88.160(1) relative to the format of the budget
document or report ((which)) that was presented to the previous regular
session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year without prior
legislative concurrence. Prior legislative concurrence ((shall)) must
consist of:
(a) A favorable majority vote on the proposal by the standing
committees on ways and means of both houses if the legislature is in
session; or
(b) A favorable majority vote on the proposal by members of the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee if the
legislature is not in session.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.136.035 and 2006 c 197 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The citizen commission for performance measurement of tax
((preferences)) expenditures is created.
(2) The commission has seven members as follows:
(a) One member is the state auditor, who is a nonvoting member;
(b) One member is the chair of the joint legislative audit and
review committee, who is a nonvoting member;
(c) The chair of each of the two largest caucuses of the senate and
the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives shall each
appoint a member. None of these appointees may be members of the
legislature; and
(d) The governor shall select the seventh member.
(3) Persons appointed by the caucus chairs should be individuals
who represent a balance of perspectives and constituencies, and have a
basic understanding of state tax policy, government operations, and
public services. These appointees should have knowledge and expertise
in performance management, fiscal analysis, strategic planning,
economic development, performance assessments, or closely related
fields.
(4) The commission shall elect a chair from among its voting or
nonvoting members. Decisions of the commission must be made using the
sufficient consensus model. For the purposes of this subsection,
"sufficient consensus" means the point at which the vast majority of
the commission favors taking a particular action. If the commission
determines that sufficient consensus cannot be reached, a vote must be
taken. The commission must allow a minority report to be included with
a decision of the commission, if requested by a member of the
commission.
(5) Members serve for terms of four years, with the terms expiring
on June 30th on the fourth year of the term. However, in the case of
the initial terms, the members appointed by the chairs of senate
caucuses shall serve four-year terms, the members appointed by the
chairs of house of representatives caucuses shall serve three-year
terms, and the member appointed by the governor shall serve a two-year
term, with each of the terms expiring on June 30th of the applicable
year. Appointees may be reappointed to serve more than one term.
(6) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall provide
clerical, technical, and management personnel to the commission to
serve as the commission's staff. The department of revenue shall
provide necessary support and information to the joint legislative
audit and review committee.
(7) The commission shall meet at least once a quarter and may hold
additional meetings at the call of the chair or by a majority vote of
the members of the commission. The members of the commission shall be
compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.220 and reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.136.045 and 2011 c 335 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The citizen commission for performance measurement of tax
((preferences)) expenditures must develop a schedule to accomplish an
orderly review of tax ((preferences)) expenditures at least once every
ten years. In determining the schedule, the commission must consider
the order the tax ((preferences)) expenditures were enacted into law,
in addition to other factors including but not limited to grouping
((preferences)) expenditures for review by type of industry, economic
sector, or policy area. The commission ((may elect to include,
anywhere in the schedule, a tax preference that has a statutory
expiration date. The commission must omit from the schedule tax
preferences that are required by constitutional law, sales and use tax
exemptions for machinery and equipment for manufacturing, research and
development, or testing, the small business credit for the business and
occupation tax, sales and use tax exemptions for food and prescription
drugs, property tax relief for retired persons, and property tax
valuations based on current use, and may omit any tax preference that
the commission determines is a critical part of the structure of the
tax system. As an alternative to the process under RCW 43.136.055, the
commission may recommend to the joint legislative audit and review
committee an expedited review process for any tax preference)) must
include, in a timely manner, in the schedule, a tax expenditure that
has a statutory expiration date. The commission must omit from the
schedule tax expenditures that are required by constitutional law. As
an alternative to the process under RCW 43.136.055, the commission, as
well as the governor or the state legislature, may recommend to the
joint legislative audit and review committee an expedited review
process for any tax expenditure or group of expenditures.
(2) The commission must revise the schedule as needed each year,
taking into account newly enacted or terminated tax ((preferences))
expenditures. The commission must deliver the schedule to the joint
legislative audit and review committee by September 1st of each year.
(3) The commission must provide a process for effective citizen
input during its deliberations and must allow comments to be submitted
and posted online.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.136.055 and 2011 c 335 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee must review
tax ((preferences)) expenditures according to the schedule developed
under RCW 43.136.045. The committee must consider, but not be limited
to, the following factors in the review as relevant to each particular
tax ((preference)) expenditure:
(a) The classes ((of individuals, types of organizations, or types
of industries whose state tax liabilities are directly affected by the
tax preference;
(b) Public policy objectives that might provide a justification for
the tax preference, including but not limited to the legislative
history, any legislative intent, or the extent to which the tax
preference encourages business growth or relocation into this state,
promotes growth or retention of high wage jobs, or helps stabilize
communities;
(c) Evidence that the existence of the tax preference has
contributed to the achievement of any of the public policy objectives;
(d) The extent to which continuation of the tax preference might
contribute to any of the public policy objectives;
(e) The extent to which the tax preference may provide unintended
benefits to an individual, organization, or industry other than those
the legislature intended;
(f) The extent to which terminating the tax preference may have
negative effects on the category of taxpayers that currently benefit
from the tax preference, and the extent to which resulting higher taxes
may have negative effects on employment and the economy;
(g) The feasibility of modifying the tax preference to provide for
adjustment or recapture of the tax benefits of the tax preference if
the objectives are not fulfilled;
(h) Fiscal impacts of the tax preference, including past impacts
and expected future impacts if it is continued. For the purposes of
this subsection, "fiscal impact" includes an analysis of the general
effects of the tax preference on the overall state economy, including,
but not limited to, the effects of the tax preference on the
consumption and expenditures of persons and businesses within the
state;
(i) The extent to which termination of the tax preference would
affect the distribution of liability for payment of state taxes;
(j) The economic impact of the tax preference compared to the
economic impact of government activities funded by the tax for which
the tax preference is taken at the same level of expenditure as the tax
preference. For purposes of this subsection the economic impact shall
be determined using the Washington input-output model as published by
the office of financial management;
(k) Consideration of similar tax preferences adopted in other
states, and potential public policy benefits that might be gained by
incorporating corresponding provisions in Washington.
(2) For each tax preference, the committee must provide a
recommendation as to whether the tax preference should be continued
without modification, modified, scheduled for sunset review at a future
date, or terminated immediately. The committee may recommend
accountability standards for the future review of a tax preference))
and number of individuals, organizations, and industries whose state
tax liabilities are directly affected by the tax expenditure;
(b) Public policy objectives that provide the justification for the
tax expenditure budget, including but not limited to the legislative
history, legislative intent, priorities of government, and the extent
to which the tax expenditure encourages business growth, relocation
into this state, promotes growth or retention of high wage jobs, and
helps stabilize communities and local economies;
(c) Evidence that the existence of the tax expenditure has
contributed to the achievement of any of the public policy objectives
of the state and its priorities of government;
(d) The extent to which continuation of the tax expenditure would
contribute to any of the public policy objectives and priorities of
government;
(e) The extent to which the tax expenditure may provide unintended
benefits to an individual, organization, or industry other than those
the legislature intended;
(f) The extent to which terminating the tax expenditure may have
negative effects on the category of taxpayers that currently benefit
from the tax expenditure, the extent to which there may be negative or
positive effects on employment, the economy, the state budget, and
other taxpayers;
(g) The feasibility of modifying or terminating the tax expenditure
to provide for adjustment or recapture of the tax benefits of the tax
expenditure if the economic benefits, jobs, or other objectives are not
fulfilled;
(h) Fiscal impacts of the tax expenditure, including past impacts
and expected future impacts if it is continued. For the purposes of
this subsection, "fiscal impact" includes an analysis of the general
effects of the tax expenditure on the overall state economy, jobs, the
state budget, and other taxpayers including, but not limited to, the
effects of the tax expenditure on the consumption and expenditures of
persons and businesses within the state;
(i) The extent to which termination of the tax expenditure would
affect the distribution of liability for payment of state taxes;
(j) The economic impact of the tax expenditure compared to the
economic impact of government activities that could be funded by the
tax for which the tax expenditure is taken, comparing the projected
results at the same level of expenditure as the tax expenditure. For
purposes of this subsection, the economic impact must be determined
using the Washington input-output model as published by the office of
financial management and/or other economic models accepted by the
office of financial management that may provide more accurate
information;
(k) The extent to which the tax expenditure promotes a sustainable
nonpolluting economy and contributes to protecting the environment and
our quality of life;
(l) A ranking of high, medium, or low priority as to the tax
expenditure meeting the most recent "priorities of government" as
developed by the office of financial management;
(m) The extent to which the tax expenditure contributes to tax
fairness and a reduction in the regressive impacts of the current tax
system in Washington state;
(n) Opportunities and feasibility to use direct budget expenditures
instead of tax expenditures to accomplish economic goals more
efficiently, effectively, and within a set time frame;
(o) Whether the tax expenditure is necessary to accomplish its
stated goal or if finances, funds, other resources, or other
opportunities are available to the recipient to accomplish the same
result.
(2) For each tax expenditure, the committee must provide a
recommendation as to whether the tax expenditure should be continued
without modification, modified, scheduled for sunset review at a future
date, or terminated immediately. The committee must recommend
accountability standards for the future review of a tax expenditure.
(3)(a) Review of tax expenditures by the committee must include,
but is not limited to, whether the expenditure has a purpose identified
pursuant to RCW 43.06.400 in the tax expenditure budget.
(i) If the purpose is to generate additional state and/or local
revenue pursuant to the tax expenditure budget by generating additional
gross sales subject to business and occupation tax, retail sales tax,
or other taxes exceeding the amount of estimated revenue lost from
enactment of the tax expenditure, the review must include how much
additional revenue has been generated in comparison to the reduction in
revenue from the tax expenditure.
(ii) If the purpose is to create or preserve jobs pursuant to the
tax expenditure budget the committee must include the following in the
tax expenditure review:
(A) A comparison of the projected total earnings per job, for each
job created or preserved, to the estimated amount of lost revenue from
the tax expenditure;
(B) Whether the jobs are family wage jobs, defined as jobs which
provide health and other benefits, and earnings of at least fifty
percent of the median wage for the local economic region of the state
where the jobs were created or preserved; and
(C) Whether the industry sector or business would likely move such
jobs to another state or country, taking into consideration factors
including, but not limited to, comparative tax structures of other
jurisdictions and access to an educated and trained workforce.
(b) If the review of a tax expenditure pursuant to (a)(ii) of this
subsection does not demonstrate that the net earnings of the jobs
created or preserved in Washington, attributed to the availability of
the tax expenditure, or exceed the amount of lost revenue from the tax
expenditure, the committee must recommend that the tax expenditure be
terminated.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.136.065 and 2006 c 197 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee ((shall report
its findings and recommendations for scheduled tax preferences to the
citizen commission for performance measurement of tax preferences by
August 30th of each year. The commission may review and comment on the
report of the committee. The committee may revise its report based on
the comments of the commission. The committee shall prepare a final
report that includes the comments of the commission and submit the
final report to the finance committee of the house of representatives
and the ways and means committee of the senate by December 30th.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall submit
a special report reviewing all tax preferences that have statutory
expiration dates between June 30, 2005, and January 1, 2007. For the
special report, the committee shall complete a review under RCW
43.136.055, and obtain comments of the citizen commission for
performance measurement of tax preferences under subsection (1) of this
section, to the extent possible. The committee shall submit the
special report to the finance committee of the house of representatives
and the ways and means committee of the senate by January 12, 2006.
(3))) must report its findings and recommendations for scheduled
tax expenditures to the citizen commission for performance measurement
of tax expenditures by June 30th of each year. The commission must
review and comment on the report of the committee. The committee may
revise its report based on the comments of the commission. The
committee must prepare a final report that includes the comments of the
commission and submit the final report to the finance committee of the
house of representatives and the ways and means committee of the
senate, the department of revenue, and the governor's office by
September 30th. The governor and the department of revenue must
consider and incorporate the findings of the final report in their
preparation of their tax expenditure budget required under section 2 of
this act.
(2) Following receipt of a report under this section, the finance
committee of the house of representatives and the ways and means
committee of the senate ((shall)) must jointly hold a public hearing to
consider the final report and any related data.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act may be known and cited as the tax
exemption transparency and accountability act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1,
2015.

--- END ---