BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.300 and 2006 c 86 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Records, maps, or other information identifying the location of
archaeological sites in order to avoid the looting or depredation of
such sites are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.
(2) Records, maps, and other information, acquired during watershed
analysis pursuant to the forests and fish report under RCW 76.09.370,
that identify the location of archaeological sites, historic sites,
artifacts, or the sites of traditional religious, ceremonial, or social
uses and activities of affected Indian tribes, are exempt from
disclosure under this chapter in order to prevent the looting or
depredation of such sites.
(3) Any site form, report, specific fields and tables relating to
site form data within a database, or geographic information systems
spatial layer obtained by any state agency or local government, or
shared between any state agency, local government, or tribal
government, is exempt from disclosure under this chapter, if the
material is related to:
(a) An archeological site as defined in RCW 27.53.030;
(b) Historical archaeological resources as defined in RCW
27.53.030; or
(c) Traditional cultural places.

--- END ---