BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a higher
education is critical to providing Washington's workforce with the
skills and knowledge necessary to compete in a global economy. The
legislature recognizes that some talented students have difficulty
paying for college and wants to ensure that excellence stays in our
state. Barriers to achieving a higher education must be removed in
order for Washington to cultivate and grow future leaders. These
barriers include making all resident students eligible for state
financial aid and removing the waiting period for members of the
military, their spouses, and children to be eligible for resident
tuition. The extension of financial aid to these aspiring young
Americans and members of the military, their spouses, and children is
also necessary to position everyone for economic success and strengthen
Washington state's competitive edge in the world economy. Therefore it
is in the best interest of the state to provide and promote as many
opportunities as possible for students to pursue a higher education.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.012 and 2012 c 229 s 521 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever used in this chapter:
(1) The term "institution" shall mean a public university, college,
or community college within the state of Washington.
(2) The term "resident student" shall mean:
(a) A financially independent student who has had a domicile in the
state of Washington for the period of one year immediately prior to the
time of commencement of the first day of the semester or quarter for
which the student has registered at any institution and has in fact
established a bona fide domicile in this state primarily for purposes
other than educational;
(b) A dependent student, if one or both of the student's parents or
legal guardians have maintained a bona fide domicile in the state of
Washington for at least one year immediately prior to commencement of
the semester or quarter for which the student has registered at any
institution;
(c) A student classified as a resident based upon domicile by an
institution on or before May 31, 1982, who was enrolled at a state
institution during any term of the 1982-1983 academic year, so long as
such student's enrollment (excepting summer sessions) at an institution
in this state is continuous;
(d) Any student who has spent at least seventy-five percent of both
his or her junior and senior years in high schools in this state, whose
parents or legal guardians have been domiciled in the state for a
period of at least one year within the five-year period before the
student graduates from high school, and who enrolls in a public
institution of higher education within six months of leaving high
school, for as long as the student remains continuously enrolled for
three quarters or two semesters in any calendar year;
(e) Any person who has completed the full senior year of high
school and obtained a high school diploma, both at a Washington public
high school or private high school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW,
or a person who has received the equivalent of a diploma; who has lived
in Washington for at least three years immediately prior to receiving
the diploma or its equivalent; who has continuously lived in the state
of Washington after receiving the diploma or its equivalent and until
such time as the individual is admitted to an institution of higher
education under subsection (1) of this section; and who provides to the
institution an affidavit indicating that the individual will file an
application to become a permanent resident at the earliest opportunity
the individual is eligible to do so and a willingness to engage in any
other activities necessary to acquire citizenship, including but not
limited to citizenship or civics review courses;
(f) Any person who has lived in Washington, primarily for purposes
other than educational, for at least one year immediately before the
date on which the person has enrolled in an institution, and who holds
lawful nonimmigrant status pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Sec. (a)(15) (E)(iii),
(H)(i), or (L), or who holds lawful nonimmigrant status as the spouse
or child of a person having nonimmigrant status under one of those
subsections, or who, holding or having previously held such lawful
nonimmigrant status as a principal or derivative, has filed an
application for adjustment of status pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1255(a);
(g) A student who is on active military duty stationed in the state
or who is a member of the Washington national guard;
(h) A student who is on active military duty or a member of the
national guard who entered service as a Washington resident and who has
maintained Washington as his or her domicile but is not stationed in
the state;
(i) A student who is the spouse or a dependent of a person who is
on active military duty or a member of the national guard who entered
service as a Washington resident and who has maintained Washington as
his or her domicile but is not stationed in the state. If the person
on active military duty is reassigned out-of-state, the student
maintains the status as a resident student so long as the student is
continuously enrolled in a degree program;
(((i))) (j) A student who resides in the state of Washington and is
the spouse or a dependent of a person who is a member of the Washington
national guard;
(((j))) (k) A student who has separated from the military under
honorable conditions after at least two years of service, and who
enters an institution of higher education in Washington within one year
of the date of separation who at the time of separation designated
Washington as his or her intended domicile and:
(i) Has Washington as his or her official home of record; or
(ii) Moves to Washington and establishes a domicile as determined
in RCW 28B.15.013 within the academic year;
(l) A student who is the spouse or a dependent of an individual who
has separated from the military under honorable conditions after at
least two years of service and who enters an institution of higher
education in Washington within one year of the date of separation who
at the time of separation designated Washington as his or her intended
domicile and:
(i) Has Washington as his or her official home of record; or
(ii) Moves to Washington and establishes a domicile as determined
in RCW 28B.15.013;
(m) A student of an out-of-state institution of higher education
who is attending a Washington state institution of higher education
pursuant to a home tuition agreement as described in RCW 28B.15.725;
(((k))) (n) A student who meets the requirements of RCW
28B.15.0131: PROVIDED, That a nonresident student enrolled for more
than six hours per semester or quarter shall be considered as attending
for primarily educational purposes, and for tuition and fee paying
purposes only such period of enrollment shall not be counted toward the
establishment of a bona fide domicile of one year in this state unless
such student proves that the student has in fact established a bona
fide domicile in this state primarily for purposes other than
educational((;
(l) A student who resides in Washington and is on active military
duty stationed in the Oregon counties of Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River,
Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union,
Wallowa, Wasco, or Washington; or
(m) A student who resides in Washington and is the spouse or a
dependent of a person who resides in Washington and is on active
military duty stationed in the Oregon counties of Columbia, Gilliam,
Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla,
Union, Wallowa, Wasco, or Washington. If the person on active military
duty moves from Washington or is reassigned out of the Oregon counties
of Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas,
Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco, or Washington, the
student maintains the status as a resident student so long as the
student resides in Washington and is continuously enrolled in a degree
program)).
(3) The term "nonresident student" shall mean any student who does
not qualify as a "resident student" under the provisions of this
section and RCW 28B.15.013. Except for students qualifying under
subsection (2)(e) or (((j))) (m) of this section, a nonresident student
shall include:
(a) A student attending an institution with the aid of financial
assistance provided by another state or governmental unit or agency
thereof, such nonresidency continuing for one year after the completion
of such semester or quarter.
(b) A person who is not a citizen of the United States of America
who does not have permanent or temporary resident status or does not
hold "Refugee-Parolee" or "Conditional Entrant" status with the United
States citizenship immigration services or is not otherwise permanently
residing in the United States under color of law and who does not also
meet and comply with all the applicable requirements in this section
and RCW 28B.15.013.
(4) The term "domicile" shall denote a person's true, fixed and
permanent home and place of habitation. It is the place where the
student intends to remain, and to which the student expects to return
when the student leaves without intending to establish a new domicile
elsewhere. The burden of proof that a student, parent or guardian has
established a domicile in the state of Washington primarily for
purposes other than educational lies with the student.
(5) The term "dependent" shall mean a person who is not financially
independent. Factors to be considered in determining whether a person
is financially independent shall be set forth in rules adopted by the
student achievement council and shall include, but not be limited to,
the state and federal income tax returns of the person and/or the
student's parents or legal guardian filed for the calendar year prior
to the year in which application is made and such other evidence as the
council may require.
(6) The term "active military duty" means the person is serving on
active duty in:
(a) The armed forces of the United States government; or
(b) The Washington national guard; or
(c) The coast guard, merchant mariners, or other nonmilitary
organization when such service is recognized by the United States
government as equivalent to service in the armed forces.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.92.010 and 2004 c 275 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purposes of this chapter are to establish the principles upon
which the state financial aid programs will be based and to establish
the state of Washington state need grant program, thus assisting
financially needy or disadvantaged students domiciled in Washington to
obtain the opportunity of attending an accredited institution of higher
education. State need grants under this chapter are available only to
students who are resident students as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a)
through (((d))) (n).

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.92.060 and 2012 c 229 s 558 are each amended to
read as follows:
In awarding need grants, the office shall proceed substantially as
follows: PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein shall be construed to
prevent the office, in the exercise of its sound discretion, from
following another procedure when the best interest of the program so
dictates:
(1) The office shall annually select the financial aid award
recipients from among Washington residents applying for student
financial aid who have been ranked according to:
(a) Financial need as determined by the amount of the family
contribution; and
(b) Other considerations, such as whether the student is a former
foster youth, or is a placebound student who has completed an associate
of arts or associate of science degree or its equivalent.
(2) The office shall not create priority status for receipt of
financial aid awards for any category of resident students as defined
in RCW 28B.15.012.
(3) The financial need of the highest ranked students shall be met
by grants depending upon the evaluation of financial need until the
total allocation has been disbursed. Funds from grants which are
declined, forfeited or otherwise unused shall be reawarded until
disbursed, except that eligible former foster youth shall be assured
receipt of a grant. The office, in consultation with four-year
institutions of higher education, the council, and the state board for
community and technical colleges, shall develop award criteria and
methods of disbursement based on level of need, and not solely rely on
a first-come, first-served basis.
(((3))) (4) A student shall be eligible to receive a state need
grant for up to five years, or the credit or clock hour equivalent of
five years, or up to one hundred twenty-five percent of the published
length of time of the student's program. A student may not start a new
associate degree program as a state need grant recipient until at least
five years have elapsed since earning an associate degree as a need
grant recipient, except that a student may earn two associate degrees
concurrently. Qualifications for renewal will include maintaining
satisfactory academic progress toward completion of an eligible program
as determined by the office. Should the recipient terminate his or her
enrollment for any reason during the academic year, the unused portion
of the grant shall be returned to the state educational grant fund by
the institution according to the institution's own policy for issuing
refunds, except as provided in RCW 28B.92.070.
(((4))) (5) In computing financial need, the office shall determine
a maximum student expense budget allowance, not to exceed an amount
equal to the total maximum student expense budget at the public
institutions plus the current average state appropriation per student
for operating expense in the public institutions. Any child support
payments received by students who are parents attending less than half-time shall not be used in computing financial need.
(((5))) (6)(a) A student who is enrolled in three to six credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits, may
receive a grant for up to one academic year before beginning a program
that leads to a degree or certificate.
(b) An eligible student enrolled on a less-than-full-time basis
shall receive a prorated portion of his or her state need grant for any
academic period in which he or she is enrolled on a less-than-full-time
basis, as long as funds are available.
(c) An institution of higher education may award a state need grant
to an eligible student enrolled in three to six credit-bearing quarter
credits, or the semester equivalent, on a provisional basis if:
(i) The student has not previously received a state need grant from
that institution;
(ii) The student completes the required free application for
federal student aid;
(iii) The institution has reviewed the student's financial
condition, and the financial condition of the student's family if the
student is a dependent student, and has determined that the student is
likely eligible for a state need grant; and
(iv) The student has signed a document attesting to the fact that
the financial information provided on the free application for federal
student aid and any additional financial information provided directly
to the institution is accurate and complete, and that the student
agrees to repay the institution for the grant amount if the student
submitted false or incomplete information.
(((6))) (7) As used in this section, "former foster youth" means a
person who is at least eighteen years of age, but not more than twenty-four years of age, who was a dependent of the department of social and
health services at the time he or she attained the age of eighteen.

--- END ---