BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.16.040 and 1996 c 111 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) do not apply to persons
engaging in one or more businesses taxable under this chapter whose
total gross income is less than ((two)) three thousand dollars for a
monthly period or portion thereof. Any person claiming exemption under
this section may be required to file returns even though no tax may be
due. If the total gross income for a taxable monthly period is ((two))
three thousand dollars, or more, no exemption or deductions from the
gross operating revenue is allowed by this provision.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.32.045 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1103 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, payments of the
taxes imposed under chapters 82.04, 82.08, 82.12, 82.14, and 82.16 RCW,
along with reports and returns on forms prescribed by the department,
are due monthly within twenty-five days after the end of the month in
which the taxable activities occur.
(2) The department ((of revenue)) may relieve any taxpayer or class
of taxpayers from the obligation of remitting monthly and may require
the return to cover other longer reporting periods, but in no event may
returns be filed for a period greater than one year. For these
taxpayers, tax payments are due on or before the last day of the month
next succeeding the end of the period covered by the return.
(3) The department ((of revenue)) may also require verified annual
returns from any taxpayer, setting forth such additional information as
it may deem necessary to correctly determine tax liability.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the
department may relieve any person of the requirement to file returns if
the following conditions are met:
(a) The person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or
gross income of the business, from all business activities taxable
under chapter 82.04 RCW, is less than:
(i) Twenty-eight thousand dollars per year; or
(ii) Forty-six thousand six hundred sixty-seven dollars per year
for persons generating at least fifty percent of their taxable amount
from activities taxable under RCW 82.04.255, 82.04.290(2)(a), and
82.04.285;
(b) The person's gross income of the business from all activities
taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW is less than ((twenty-four)) thirty-six
thousand dollars per year; and
(c) The person is not required to collect or pay to the department
((of revenue)) any other tax or fee which the department is authorized
to collect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---