BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.129 RCW
to read as follows:
A long-term care facility shall disclose to potential residents and
their legal representatives that, in the event of the death of the
resident, an autopsy or postmortem may be authorized by a family
member, guardian, or other person or agency according to the order of
priority established in RCW 68.50.101.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.51.009 and 1994 c 214 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
RCW 70.129.007, 70.129.105, ((and)) 70.129.150 through 70.129.170,
and section 1 of this act apply to this chapter and persons regulated
under this chapter.

--- END ---