BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department's authority to audit any employer for the
purposes of determining premiums due, appropriate classifications of
employees, or any other purpose provided under RCW 51.48.040, is
subject to the following restrictions:
(a) The department may not conduct a visual inspection of the
employer's worksite unless explicitly authorized in writing by the
employer in advance;
(b) At least sixty days before an audit, the department must notify
the employer in writing that the department intends to conduct an audit
and explain the scope of the audit. The notification must include a
statement of the employer's rights and obligations and notify the
employer that before the department may conduct a visual inspection of
the worksite the employer must provide written consent; and
(c) Upon completion of the audit, the department must notify the
employer in writing of any corrective action the employer may take to
come into compliance with any recordkeeping or retention requirements.
The department must provide a reasonable time for the employer to
implement any corrective action. The department may not impose any
fine or penalty on the employer until the time period has expired and
the employer has not implemented the corrective action.
(2) This section does not restrict the department's inspection
authority under RCW 49.17.070.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.16.070 and 2008 c 120 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Every employer shall keep at his or her place of business a
record of his or her employment from which the information needed by
the department may be obtained and such record shall at all times be
open to the inspection of the director, supervisor of industrial
insurance, or the traveling auditors, agents, or assistants of the
department, as provided in RCW 51.48.040 and section 1 of this act.
(b) An employer who contracts with another person or entity for
work subject to chapter 18.27 or 19.28 RCW shall obtain and preserve a
record of the unified business identifier account number for and the
compensation paid to the person or entity performing the work. Failure
to obtain or maintain the record is subject to RCW 39.06.010 and to a
penalty under RCW 51.48.030.
(2) Information obtained from employing unit records under the
provisions of this title shall be deemed confidential and shall not be
open to public inspection (other than to public employees in the
performance of their official duties), but any interested party shall
be supplied with information from such records to the extent necessary
for the proper presentation of the case in question: PROVIDED, That
any employing unit may authorize inspection of its records by written
consent.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.48.040 and 2003 c 53 s 282 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to section 1 of this act, the books, records and
payrolls of the employer pertinent to the administration of this title
shall always be open to inspection by the department or its traveling
auditor, agent or assistant, for the purpose of ascertaining the
correctness of the payroll, the persons employed, and such other
information as may be necessary for the department and its management
under this title.
(2) Subject to section 1 of this act, refusal on the part of the
employer to submit his or her books, records and payrolls for such
inspection to the department, or any assistant presenting written
authority from the director, shall subject the offending employer to a
penalty determined by the director but not to exceed two hundred fifty
dollars for each offense and the individual who personally gives such
refusal is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(3) Any employer who fails to allow adequate inspection in
accordance with the requirements ((of)) under this section and section
1 of this act is subject to having its certificate of coverage revoked
by order of the department and is forever barred from questioning in
any proceeding in front of the board of industrial insurance appeals or
any court, the correctness of any assessment by the department based on
any period for which such records have not been produced for
inspection.

--- END ---