BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.50.540 and 2013 c 3 s 28 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
All marijuana excise taxes collected from sales of marijuana,
useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products under RCW 69.50.535,
and the license fees, penalties, and forfeitures derived under chapter
3, Laws of 2013 from marijuana producer, marijuana processor, and
marijuana retailer licenses shall every three months be disbursed by
the state liquor control board as follows:
(1) One hundred twenty-five thousand dollars to the department of
social and health services to design and administer the Washington
state healthy youth survey, analyze the collected data, and produce
reports, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, department of health, department of commerce,
family policy council, and state liquor control board. The survey
shall be conducted at least every two years and include questions
regarding, but not necessarily limited to, academic achievement, age at
time of substance use initiation, antisocial behavior of friends,
attitudes toward antisocial behavior, attitudes toward substance use,
laws and community norms regarding antisocial behavior, family
conflict, family management, parental attitudes toward substance use,
peer rewarding of antisocial behavior, perceived risk of substance use,
and rebelliousness. Funds disbursed under this subsection may be used
to expand administration of the healthy youth survey to student
populations attending institutions of higher education in Washington;
(2) Fifty thousand dollars to the department of social and health
services for the purpose of contracting with the Washington state
institute for public policy to conduct the cost-benefit evaluation and
produce the reports described in RCW 69.50.550. This appropriation
shall end after production of the final report required by RCW
69.50.550;
(3) Five thousand dollars to the University of Washington alcohol
and drug abuse institute for the creation, maintenance, and timely
updating of web-based public education materials providing medically
and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety
risks posed by marijuana use;
(4) An amount not exceeding one million two hundred fifty thousand
dollars to the state liquor control board as is necessary for
administration of chapter 3, Laws of 2013;
(5) Twenty million dollars to cities and towns and five million
dollars to counties to be used for additional law enforcement officers
whose duties focus primarily upon the monitoring and interdiction of
criminal street gang activity. The share coming to each city or town
and the share coming to each county must be determined ratably on the
basis of population as last determined by the office of financial
management.
(6) Of the funds remaining after the disbursements identified in
subsections (1) through (((4))) (5) of this section:
(a) Fifteen percent to the department of social and health services
division of behavioral health and recovery for implementation and
maintenance of programs and practices aimed at the prevention or
reduction of maladaptive substance use, substance-use disorder,
substance abuse or substance dependence, as these terms are defined in
the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, among middle
school and high school age students, whether as an explicit goal of a
given program or practice or as a consistently corresponding effect of
its implementation; PROVIDED, That:
(i) Of the funds disbursed under (a) of this subsection, at least
eighty-five percent must be directed to evidence-based and cost-beneficial programs and practices that produce objectively measurable
results; and
(ii) Up to fifteen percent of the funds disbursed under (a) of this
subsection may be directed to research-based and emerging best
practices or promising practices.
In deciding which programs and practices to fund, the secretary of
the department of social and health services shall consult, at least
annually, with the University of Washington's social development
research group and the University of Washington's alcohol and drug
abuse institute;
(b) Ten percent to the department of health for the creation,
implementation, operation, and management of a marijuana education and
public health program that contains the following:
(i) A marijuana use public health hotline that provides referrals
to substance abuse treatment providers, utilizes evidence-based or
research-based public health approaches to minimizing the harms
associated with marijuana use, and does not solely advocate an
abstinence-only approach;
(ii) A grants program for local health departments or other local
community agencies that supports development and implementation of
coordinated intervention strategies for the prevention and reduction of
marijuana use by youth; and
(iii) Media-based education campaigns across television, internet,
radio, print, and out-of-home advertising, separately targeting youth
and adults, that provide medically and scientifically accurate
information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use;
(c) Six-tenths of one percent to the University of Washington and
four-tenths of one percent to Washington State University for research
on the short and long-term effects of marijuana use, to include but not
be limited to formal and informal methods for estimating and measuring
intoxication and impairment, and for the dissemination of such
research;
(d) Fifty percent to the state basic health plan trust account to
be administered by the Washington basic health plan administrator and
used as provided under chapter 70.47 RCW;
(e) Five percent to the Washington state health care authority to
be expended exclusively through contracts with community health centers
to provide primary health and dental care services, migrant health
services, and maternity health care services as provided under RCW
41.05.220;
(f) Three-tenths of one percent to the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to fund grants to building bridges programs under
chapter 28A.175 RCW; and
(g) The remainder to the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---