BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that fetal alcohol
exposure can cause serious mental and physical disorders and
disabilities in children. These disorders are preventable if a mother
does not drink during pregnancy. With the advent of private alcohol
retailers, there is now increased access to alcohol. The legislature
intends to require signage warning women about the dangers of fetal
alcohol exposure in all stores selling alcohol.
(2) The legislature further finds that by collecting evidence-based
practices around the identification, prevention, and interventions for
fetal alcohol spectrum disorders, the number of affected individuals
can decrease and those who are affected can improve their lives.
Finally, by convening a work group of stakeholders, the legislature can
become better informed about steps that can be taken to appropriately
address fetal alcohol exposure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) At a minimum, premises that serve alcohol for on-premises
consumption, grocery store licensees, beer and wine specialty shop
licensees, breweries, wineries, and taverns shall post in a conspicuous
place easily seen by patrons a printed sign at least eighteen inches by
twenty-four inches in size, with letters at least two inches high,
warning that consumption of alcohol during pregnancy can cause birth
defects.
(2) This section does not apply to self-service minibars in hotel
guest rooms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall have the authority to adopt rules to carry out
section 2 of this act in a manner that will increase the visibility of
signage. The contents of section 2 of this act provide the minimum
requirements regarding warning that consumption of alcohol during
pregnancy can cause birth defects, but the board may adopt additional
rules beyond those minimum requirements to ensure that customers
observe these warnings.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.96A.510 and 1995 c 54 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services, the department
of health, the department of corrections, and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall execute an interagency
agreement to ensure the coordination of identification, prevention, and
intervention programs for ((children)) individuals who have fetal
alcohol exposure, and for women who are at high risk of having children
with fetal alcohol exposure.
The interagency agreement shall provide a process for community
advocacy groups to participate in the review and development of
identification, prevention, and intervention programs administered or
contracted for by the agencies executing this agreement.
(2) The interagency agreement shall provide for a work group
cochaired by the department of social and health services, the
University of Washington fetal alcohol syndrome diagnostic and
prevention network, and the University of Washington fetal alcohol and
drug unit to address fetal alcohol exposure issues related to
identification, prevention, and intervention. This work group shall
include the department of health, the department of corrections, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, and other
interested organizations identified by the department of social and
health services, the University of Washington fetal alcohol syndrome
diagnostic and prevention network, and the University of Washington
fetal alcohol and drug unit.
(3) By December 1, 2014, the work group shall develop
recommendations and provide a report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature relating to:
(a) Identification of evidence-based practices for early screening
and diagnosis of fetal alcohol spectrum disorders;
(b) Identification of evidence-based practices for prevention of
fetal alcohol spectrum disorders;
(c) Identification of evidence-based practices for interventions
that can be used with individuals experiencing fetal alcohol spectrum
disorders; and
(d) Recommendations of policy changes that would improve the
identification, prevention, or interventions related to fetal alcohol
spectrum disorders.

--- END ---