BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.14.005 and 2007 c 430 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds:
(1) That in many of Washington's urban centers and urban growth
areas there is insufficient availability of desirable and convenient
residential units, including affordable housing units, to meet the
needs of a growing number of the public who would live in these urban
centers and urban growth areas if these desirable, convenient,
attractive, affordable, and livable places to live were available;
(2) That the development of additional and desirable residential
units, including affordable housing units, in these urban centers and
urban growth areas that will attract and maintain a significant
increase in the number of permanent residents in these areas will help
to alleviate the detrimental conditions and social liability that tend
to exist in the absence of a viable mixed income residential population
and will help to achieve the planning goals mandated by the growth
management act under RCW 36.70A.020; and
(3) That planning solutions to solve the problems of urban sprawl
often lack incentive and implementation techniques needed to encourage
residential redevelopment in those urban centers or urban growth areas
lacking a sufficient variety of residential opportunities, and it is in
the public interest and will benefit, provide, and promote the public
health, safety, and welfare to stimulate new or enhanced residential
opportunities, including affordable housing opportunities, within urban
centers or urban growth areas through a tax incentive as provided by
this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.14.007 and 2012 c 194 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the purpose of this chapter to encourage increased
residential opportunities, including affordable housing opportunities,
in cities and counties that are required to plan or choose to plan
under the growth management act within urban centers and urban growth
areas where the governing authority of the affected city or county has
found there is insufficient housing opportunities, including affordable
housing opportunities. It is further the purpose of this chapter to
stimulate the construction of new multifamily housing and the
rehabilitation of existing vacant and underutilized buildings for
multifamily housing in urban centers and urban growth areas having
insufficient housing opportunities that will increase and improve
residential opportunities, including affordable housing opportunities,
within these urban centers and urban growth areas. To achieve these
purposes, this chapter provides for special valuations in residentially
deficient urban centers and urban growth areas for eligible
improvements associated with multiunit housing, which includes
affordable housing. It is an additional purpose of this chapter to
allow certain counties to stimulate housing opportunities near college
campuses to promote dense, transit-oriented, walkable college
communities.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.14.010 and 2012 c 194 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Affordable housing" means residential housing that is rented
by a person or household whose monthly housing costs, including
utilities other than telephone, do not exceed thirty percent of the
household's monthly income. For the purposes of housing intended for
owner occupancy, "affordable housing" means residential housing that is
within the means of low or moderate-income households.
(2) "Campus facilities master plan" means the area that is defined
by the University of Washington as necessary for the future growth and
development of its campus facilities for branch campuses authorized
under RCW 28B.45.020.
(3) "City" means either (a) a city or town with a population of at
least fifteen thousand, (b) the largest city or town, if there is no
city or town with a population of at least fifteen thousand, located in
a county planning under the growth management act, or (c) a city or
town with a population of at least five thousand located in a county
subject to the provisions of RCW 36.70A.215.
(4) "County" means a county with an unincorporated population of at
least three hundred fifty thousand or a rural county as defined in RCW
82.14.370.
(5) "Governing authority" means the local legislative authority of
a city or a county having jurisdiction over the property for which an
exemption may be applied for under this chapter.
(6) "Growth management act" means chapter 36.70A RCW.
(7) "High cost area" means a county where the third quarter median
house price for the previous year as reported by the Washington center
for real estate research at ((Washington State University)) the
University of Washington is equal to or greater than one hundred thirty
percent of the statewide median house price published during the same
time period.
(8) "Household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons
living together.
(9) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below
eighty percent of the median family income adjusted for family size,
for the county where the project is located, as reported by the United
States department of housing and urban development. For cities located
in high-cost areas, "low-income household" means a household that has
an income at or below one hundred percent of the median family income
adjusted for family size, for the county where the project is located.
(10) "Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is more than
eighty percent but is at or below one hundred fifteen percent of the
median family income adjusted for family size, for the county where the
project is located, as reported by the United States department of
housing and urban development. For cities located in high-cost areas,
"moderate-income household" means a household that has an income that
is more than one hundred percent, but at or below one hundred fifty
percent, of the median family income adjusted for family size, for the
county where the project is located.
(11) "Multiple-unit housing" means a building having four or more
dwelling units not designed or used as transient accommodations and not
including hotels and motels. Multifamily units may result from new
construction or rehabilitated or conversion of vacant, underutilized,
or substandard buildings to multifamily housing.
(12) "Owner" means the property owner of record.
(13) "Permanent residential occupancy" means multiunit housing that
provides either rental or owner occupancy on a nontransient basis.
This includes owner-occupied or rental accommodation that is leased for
a period of at least one month. This excludes hotels and motels that
predominately offer rental accommodation on a daily or weekly basis.
(14) "Rehabilitation improvements" means modifications to existing
structures, that are vacant for twelve months or longer, that are made
to achieve a condition of substantial compliance with existing building
codes or modification to existing occupied structures which increase
the number of multifamily housing units.
(15) "Residential targeted area" means an area within an urban
center or urban growth area that has been designated by the governing
authority as a residential targeted area in accordance with this
chapter. With respect to designations after July 1, 2007, "residential
targeted area" may not include a campus facilities master plan.
(16) "Substantial compliance" means compliance with local building
or housing code requirements that are typically required for
rehabilitation as opposed to new construction.
(17) "Urban center" means a compact identifiable district where
urban residents may obtain a variety of products and services. An
urban center must contain:
(a) Several existing or previous, or both, business establishments
that may include but are not limited to shops, offices, banks,
restaurants, governmental agencies;
(b) Adequate public facilities including streets, sidewalks,
lighting, transit, domestic water, and sanitary sewer systems; and
(c) A mixture of uses and activities that may include housing,
recreation, and cultural activities in association with either
commercial or office, or both, use.
(18) "Urban growth area" has the same meaning as in RCW 36.70A.030.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.14.040 and 2012 c 194 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following criteria must be met before an area may be
designated as a residential targeted area:
(a) The area must be within an urban center, as determined by the
governing authority, or within an urban growth area for purposes of (d)
of this subsection;
(b) The area must lack, as determined by the governing authority,
sufficient available, desirable, and convenient residential housing,
including affordable housing, to meet the needs of the public who would
be likely to live in the urban center or urban growth area, if the
affordable, desirable, attractive, and livable places to live were
available;
(c) The providing of additional housing opportunity, including
affordable housing, in the area, as determined by the governing
authority, will assist in achieving one or more of the stated purposes
of this chapter; and
(d) If the residential targeted area is designated by ((a county)):
(i) A county with an unincorporated population of at least three
hundred fifty thousand, the area must be located in an unincorporated
area of the county that is within an urban growth area under RCW
36.70A.110 and the area must include a campus of an institution of
higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.92.030, where at least one
thousand two hundred students live on campus during the academic year;
or
(ii) A rural county as defined in RCW 82.14.370, the area must be
located in an unincorporated area of the county that is within an urban
growth area under RCW 36.70A.110.
(2) For the purpose of designating a residential targeted area or
areas, the governing authority may adopt a resolution of intention to
so designate an area as generally described in the resolution. The
resolution must state the time and place of a hearing to be held by the
governing authority to consider the designation of the area and may
include such other information pertaining to the designation of the
area as the governing authority determines to be appropriate to apprise
the public of the action intended.
(3) The governing authority must give notice of a hearing held
under this chapter by publication of the notice once each week for two
consecutive weeks, not less than seven days, nor more than thirty days
before the date of the hearing in a paper having a general circulation
in the city or county where the proposed residential targeted area is
located. The notice must state the time, date, place, and purpose of
the hearing and generally identify the area proposed to be designated
as a residential targeted area.
(4) Following the hearing, or a continuance of the hearing, the
governing authority may designate all or a portion of the area
described in the resolution of intent as a residential targeted area if
it finds, in its sole discretion, that the criteria in subsections (1)
through (3) of this section have been met.
(5) After designation of a residential targeted area, the governing
authority must adopt and implement standards and guidelines to be
utilized in considering applications and making the determinations
required under RCW 84.14.060. The standards and guidelines must
establish basic requirements for both new construction and
rehabilitation, which must include:
(a) Application process and procedures;
(b) Requirements that address demolition of existing structures and
site utilization; and
(c) Building requirements that may include elements addressing
parking, height, density, environmental impact, and compatibility with
the existing surrounding property and such other amenities as will
attract and keep permanent residents and that will properly enhance the
livability of the residential targeted area in which they are to be
located.
(6) The governing authority may adopt and implement, either as
conditions to eight-year exemptions or as conditions to an extended
exemption period under RCW 84.14.020(1)(a)(ii)(B), or both, more
stringent income eligibility, rent, or sale price limits, including
limits that apply to a higher percentage of units, than the minimum
conditions for an extended exemption period under RCW
84.14.020(1)(a)(ii)(B). For any multiunit housing located in an
unincorporated area of a county, a property owner seeking tax
incentives under this chapter must commit to renting or selling at
least twenty percent of the multifamily housing units as affordable
housing units to low and moderate-income households. In the case of
multiunit housing intended exclusively for owner occupancy, the minimum
requirement of this subsection (6) may be satisfied solely through
housing affordable to moderate-income households.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.14.060 and 2012 c 194 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The duly authorized administrative official or committee of the
city or county may approve the application if it finds that:
(a) A minimum of four new units are being constructed or in the
case of occupied rehabilitation or conversion a minimum of four
additional multifamily units are being developed;
(b) If applicable, the proposed multiunit housing project meets the
affordable housing requirements as described in RCW 84.14.020;
(c) The proposed project is or will be, at the time of completion,
in conformance with all local plans and regulations that apply at the
time the application is approved;
(d) The owner has complied with all standards and guidelines
adopted by the city or county under this chapter; and
(e) The site is located in a residential targeted area of an urban
center or urban growth area that has been designated by the governing
authority in accordance with procedures and guidelines indicated in RCW
84.14.040.
(2) An application may not be approved after July 1, 2007, if any
part of the proposed project site is within a campus facilities master
plan, except as provided in RCW 84.14.040(1)(d).

--- END ---