BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The education data center shall contract
with the area health education center of eastern Washington through
Washington State University extension, to conduct a geographic analysis
using existing data to identify areas where the cumulative effect of
family factors, such as employment, health status, safety, and
stability correlate with academic and behavioral indicators of student
success. The education data center shall submit this analysis in the
form of a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 31, 2015. This report must include maps that illustrate
community variation in family factors as they relate to K-12 and
postsecondary education outcomes and keeping all children on track for
success.
(2) At a minimum, the report must include:
(a) The prevalence of family and community health, safety, and
stability factors relevant to student success;
(b) Resilience factors that are statistically correlated with
improved population outcomes even in populations with family, health,
safety, and stability challenges;
(c) Correlation of the factors in (b) of this subsection with
community variation in academic, behavior, and graduation outcomes; and
(d) Implications for policy targeted at improving K-12 or
postsecondary outcomes.
(3) This section expires August 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2014, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---