BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.44.0941 and 2010 c 161 s 1117 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following fees, in addition to the regular license and tonnage
fees, shall be paid for all movements under special permit made upon
state highways. All funds collected, except the amount retained by
authorized agents of the department as provided in RCW 46.44.096, shall
be forwarded to the state treasury and shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund. Each fiscal biennium, five hundred thousand dollars of
the fees collected under this section and deposited in the motor
vehicle fund must be utilized by the department of transportation to
implement and maintain an automated system that maintains a database of
the state's bridge inventory and the associated structural designs,
specifications, and weight limits. When issuing a special permit for
an overwidth, overweight, overheight, or overlegal load, the route must
be checked by the automated system to ensure that the load will not
cause damage or risk to the state's bridges. Any remaining fees
collected and deposited into the motor vehicle fund under this section
must be used for highway preservation:

All overlegal loads, except overweight, single
trip . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 10.00)) $15.00
Continuous operation of overlegal loads
having either overwidth or overheight
features only, for a period not to exceed
thirty days . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 20.00)) $55.00
Continuous operations of overlegal loads
having overlength features only, for a
period not to exceed thirty days . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 10.00)) $28.00
Continuous operation of a combination of
vehicles having one trailing unit that
exceeds fifty-three feet and is not
more than fifty-six feet in length, for
a period of one year . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 100.00)) $174.00
Continuous operation of a combination of
vehicles having two trailing units
which together exceed sixty-one feet and
are not more than sixty-eight feet in
length, for a period of one year . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 100.00)) $174.00
Continuous operation of a three-axle fixed
load vehicle having less than 65,000
pounds gross weight, for a period not
to exceed thirty days . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 70.00)) $104.00
Continuous operation of a four-axle fixed load
vehicle meeting the requirements of
RCW 46.44.091(1) and weighing less than
86,000 pounds gross weight, not to exceed
thirty days . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 90.00)) $126.00
Continuous movement of a mobile home or manufactured
home having nonreducible features not to
exceed eighty-five feet in total length and
fourteen feet in width, for a period of
one year . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 150.00)) $346.00
Continuous operation of a class C tow truck or a
class E tow truck with a class C rating while
performing emergency and nonemergency tows of
oversize or overweight, or both, vehicles and
vehicle combinations, under rules adopted by the
transportation commission, for a period of
one year . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 150.00)) $179.00
Continuous operation of a class B tow truck or a
class E tow truck with a class B rating while
performing emergency and nonemergency tows of
oversize or overweight, or both, vehicles and
vehicle combinations, under rules adopted by the
transportation commission, for a period of
one year . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 75.00)) $90.00
Continuous operation of a two or three-axle
collection truck, actually engaged in the
collection of solid waste or recyclables,
or both, under chapter 81.77 or 35.21 RCW
or by contract under RCW 36.58.090, for
one year with an additional six thousand
pounds more than the weight authorized in
RCW 46.16A.455 on the rear axle of a two-axle
truck or eight thousand pounds for the tandem
axles of a three-axle truck. RCW 46.44.041
and 46.44.091 notwithstanding, the tire limits
specified in RCW 46.44.042 apply, but none of
the excess weight is valid or may be permitted
on any part of the federal interstate highway
system . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 42.00)) $59.00
per thousand pounds

The department may issue any of the above-listed permits that
involve height, length, or width for an expanded period of consecutive
months, not to exceed one year.
Continuous operation of farm implements under a permit issued as
authorized by RCW 46.44.140 by:

(1) Farmers in the course of farming activities,
for any three-month period . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10.00)) $25.00
(2) Farmers in the course of farming activities,
for a period not to exceed one year . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25.00)) $62.00
(3) Persons engaged in the business of the
sale, repair, or maintenance of such
farm implements, for any three-month period . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25.00)) $62.00
(4) Persons engaged in the business of the
sale, repair, or maintenance of such
farm implements, for a period not to
exceed one year . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100.00)) $250.00

Overweight Fee Schedule

Excess weight over legal capacity,
as provided in RCW 46.44.041.
Cost per mile.

0- 9,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ .07))
$ .10

10,000-14,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ .14))
$ .21

15,000-19,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ .21))
$ .31

20,000-24,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ .28))
$ .38

25,000-29,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ .35))
$ .48

30,000-34,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ .49))
$ .67

35,000-39,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ .63))
$ .86

40,000-44,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ .79))
$1.07

45,000-49,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ .93))
$1.26

50,000-54,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 1.14))
$1.55

55,000-59,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 1.35))
$1.83

60,000-64,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 1.56))
$2.12

65,000-69,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 1.77))
$2.40

70,000-74,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 2.12))
$2.88

75,000-79,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 2.47))
$3.36

80,000-84,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 2.82))
$3.83

85,000-89,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 3.17))
$4.31

90,000-94,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 3.52))
$4.78

95,000-99,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 3.87))
$5.26

100,000 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . (($ 4.25))
$5.77

The fee for weights in excess of 100,000 pounds is (($4.25)) $5.77 plus
fifty cents for each 5,000 pound increment or portion thereof exceeding
100,000 pounds.

PROVIDED: (a) The minimum fee for any overweight permit shall be
(($14.00)) $25.00, (b) the fee for issuance of a duplicate permit shall
be (($14.00)) $25.00, (c) when computing overweight fees prescribed in
this section or in RCW 46.44.095 that result in an amount less than
even dollars the fee shall be carried to the next full dollar if fifty
cents or over and shall be reduced to the next full dollar if forty-nine cents or under.
The fees levied in this section and RCW 46.44.095 do not apply to
vehicles owned and operated by the state of Washington, a county within
the state, a city or town or metropolitan municipal corporation within
the state, or the federal government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---