BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds:
(a) A health care profession's scope of practice must be carefully
regulated to prevent a practitioner from performing procedures, tasks,
or other acts that exceed his or her level of training and education;
(b) The legislature establishes a health care profession's scope of
practice to ensure practitioners perform only those procedures, tasks,
or other acts within the level of training and education appropriate
for that profession;
(c) When questions arise regarding the competency and authority of
a health care profession to perform a particular act, the disciplining
authority is authorized to adopt a rule interpreting the scope of
practice, but may not expand a scope of practice; and
(d) Interpreting a scope of practice without a rule-making process
deprives practitioners and other interested parties of notice and an
opportunity for comment.
(2) Therefore, to protect the public health, safety, and welfare,
the legislature intends to require disciplining authorities to engage
in a rule-making process when interpreting the scope of practice of a
health care profession.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A disciplining authority may not expand the scope of practice
for a profession under its authority.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 18.79.110, a disciplining authority
may not interpret the scope of practice of a profession under its
authority except by a rule adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. Any
interpretation of a scope of practice by a disciplining authority,
other than by rule, is void.
(3) A license holder is not subject to disciplinary action or civil
liability for performing an act, task, or procedure before the
effective date of this section if:
(a) The disciplining authority interpreted the scope of practice to
include the relevant act, task, or procedure;
(b) The license holder reasonably relied on the disciplining
authority's interpretation of the scope of practice; and
(c) The license holder performed the act, task, or procedure within
the applicable standard of care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---