BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.60A.190 and 2008 c 187 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) ((Develop and)) Maintain a current list of certified veteran-owned businesses; and
(b) Make the list of certified veteran-owned businesses available
on the department's public web site.
(2) To qualify as a certified veteran-owned business, the business
must:
(a) Be at least fifty-one percent owned and controlled by:
(((a))) (i) A veteran as defined as every person who at the time he
or she seeks certification has received a discharge with an honorable
characterization or received a discharge for medical reasons with an
honorable record, where applicable, and who has served in at least one
of the capacities listed in RCW 41.04.007; or
(((b))) (ii) An active or reserve member in any branch of the armed
forces of the United States, including the national guard, coast guard,
and armed forces reserves; and
(b) Be either an enterprise which is incorporated in the state of
Washington as a Washington domestic corporation, or an enterprise whose
principal place of business is located within the state of Washington
for enterprises which are not incorporated.
(3) To participate in the linked deposit program under chapter
43.86A RCW, a veteran-owned business qualified under this section must
be certified by the department as a business:
(a) In which the veteran owner possesses and exercises sufficient
expertise specifically in the business's field of operation to make
decisions governing the long-term direction and the day-to-day
operations of the business;
(b) That is organized for profit and performing a commercially
useful function; and
(c) That meets the criteria for a small business concern as
established under chapter 39.19 RCW.
(4) The department shall create a logo for the purpose of
identifying veteran-owned businesses to the public. The department
shall put the logo on an adhesive sticker or decal suitable for display
in a business window and distribute the stickers or decals to veteran-owned businesses listed with the department.
(5)(a) Businesses may submit an application on a form prescribed by
the department ((for inclusion on the list or)) to apply for
certification under this section.
(b) The department must notify the state treasurer of veteran-owned
businesses ((that)) who have participated in the linked deposit program
and are no longer certified under this section. The written
notification to the state treasurer must contain information regarding
the reasons for the decertification and information on financing
provided to the veteran-owned business under RCW 43.86A.060.
(6) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section.

--- END ---