BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the July 31,
2013, state auditor's report on developmental disabilities in
Washington indicates that fifteen thousand individuals with
developmental disabilities who meet the financial and physical
eligibility requirements do not currently receive any services from the
state. For that reason, the legislature finds that it is necessary to
take action that will increase the number of eligible individuals who
may access personal care services.
(2) The legislature finds that by 2030, nearly twenty percent or
one out of five people in our state will be age sixty-five or older and
our state is not prepared for the growing demand for long-term services
and supports. Washington must plan for the future long-term services
and supports needs of its residents by utilizing alternative long-term
care financing options.
(3) The legislature further finds that personal care services allow
individuals with significant care needs to live in their own homes and
communities. By utilizing the community first choice option, an
enhanced federal matching percentage would increase the funding
available for these services. Further, the community first choice
option may increase the self-sufficiency of clients by emphasizing the
acquisition, maintenance, and enhancement of skills to complete health-related tasks. For these reasons, the legislature finds that the
department of social and health services must refinance personal care
services through the community first choice option.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of social and health
services shall refinance medicaid personal care services under the
community first choice option. Beginning July 1, 2014, the department
shall seek stakeholder input on program and system design prior to the
submission of a proposal to the center for medicaid and medicare
services. The community first choice option shall be designed in such
a way to meet the federal minimum maintenance of effort requirements
and all service requirements as specified in federal rule. Optional
services may also be included in the benefit package. In the first
full year of implementation, the increase in per capita cost of
services directly resulting from meeting the federal requirements of
the community first choice option, as well as the cost of new optional
services, shall not exceed a three percent increase over the per capita
costs of personal care services in the fiscal year prior to full
implementation of the community first choice option. The three percent
limit on new expenditures shall not apply to cost increases that are
not the result of implementing the community first choice option,
including case load growth, case mix changes, inflation, vendor rate
changes, expenditures necessary to meet state and federal law
requirements, and any adjustments made pursuant to collective
bargaining. The community first choice option must be fully
implemented during the 2015-2017 biennium, as soon as July 1, 2015, and
no later than June 30, 2016.
(2) The department shall use general fund--state savings from the
refinance in this section to offset additional caseload, per capita
cost increases, and staff resources necessary to implement the
community first choice option. Any remaining general fund--state
savings from the refinance shall be reserved for potential investments
in home and community based services for individuals with developmental
disabilities or individuals with long-term care needs, including
investments recommended by the joint legislative executive committee on
aging and disability and the development and implementation council
that the department must convene prior to submitting the proposed
community first choice option to the centers for medicare and medicaid
services. At a minimum, the final report to the legislature from the
joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability must
explore the cost and benefit of rate enhancements for providers of
long-term services and supports, restoration of hours for in-home
clients, additional investment in the family caregiver support program,
and additional investment in the individual and family services program
or other medicaid services to support individuals with developmental
disabilities.

--- END ---