BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that section
309(4), chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. directed the department
of agriculture to convene and facilitate a work group with appropriate
stakeholders to review fees supporting programs within the department
that are also supported with the state general fund.
(2) The legislature further finds that with the help of a
consulting firm, the department of agriculture identified fees in the
food safety and animal health programs that met the budget proviso
criteria. The department then formed a work group with representatives
from dairy, food processing, and other relevant professional
associations.
(3) The legislature further finds that the work group's final
report recommends fee increases for fees that do not completely cover
the costs of services provided and that will make programs within the
department of agriculture less reliant on the state general fund.
Therefore, the legislature intends to implement the recommendations of
the work group's report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature finds that there are
department of agriculture fees in addition to those included in this
act that would be worthwhile for the work group to review and
encourages the department of agriculture to continue to convene the
work group as often as it is practical to do so. At a minimum, the
department shall convene and facilitate a sub-work group with
appropriate stakeholders to review fee categories under the food safety
program in order to determine which entities may require additional
resources for compliance under the federal food safety modernization
act. The sub-work group shall review those currently regulated by the
state and those that may require department oversight in the future.
The sub-work group shall, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, report back to
the legislature by December 1st each year until 2018.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2019.

Sec. 3 RCW 15.36.051 and 2005 c 414 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A milk processing plant must obtain an annual milk processing
plant license from the department, which shall expire on June 30th of
each year. A milk processing plant may choose to process (((1))): (a)
Grade A milk and milk products((,)); or (((2))) (b) other milk products
that are not classified grade A.
(2) Only one license may be required to process milk; however, milk
processing plants must obtain the necessary endorsements from the
department in order to process products as defined for each type of
milk or milk product processing. Application for a license shall be on
a form prescribed by the director and accompanied by ((a fifty-five
dollar)) an annual license fee. The amount of the annual license fee
under this section is one hundred fifty dollars until June 30, 2016,
and two hundred fifty dollars beginning July 1, 2016. The applicant
shall include on the application the full name of the applicant for the
license and the location of the milk processing plant he or she intends
to operate and any other necessary information. Upon the approval of
the application by the director and compliance with the provisions of
this chapter, including the applicable rules adopted under this chapter
by the department, the applicant shall be issued a license or a renewal
of a license.
(3) Licenses shall be issued to cover only those products,
processes, and operations specified in the license application and
approved for licensing. If a license holder wishes to engage in
processing a type of milk product that is different than the type
specified on the application supporting the licensee's existing license
and processing that type of food product would require a major addition
to or modification of the licensee's processing facilities, the
licensee shall submit an amendment to the current license application.
In such a case, the licensee may engage in processing the new type of
milk product only after the amendment has been approved by the
department.
(4) A licensee under this section shall not be required to obtain
a food processing plant license under chapter 69.07 RCW to process milk
or milk products.
(5) The director shall waive the fee for a food processing license
under chapter 69.07 RCW for persons who are also licensed as a milk
processing plant.

Sec. 4 RCW 15.36.081 and 1999 c 291 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A dairy technician must obtain a dairy technician's license to
conduct operations under this chapter. Such license shall be limited
to those functions which the licensee has been found qualified to
perform. Before issuing the license the director shall assess the
applicant's qualifications and may test the applicant for the functions
for which application has been made.
(2) Application for a license as a dairy technician shall be made
upon forms provided by the director, and shall be filed with the
department. The director may issue a temporary license to the
applicant for such period as may be prescribed and stated in the
license, not to exceed sixty days, but the license may not be renewed
to extend the period beyond sixty days.
(3) The initial application and renewal for a dairy technician's
license must be accompanied by a license fee of ((ten dollars. The fee
for renewal of the license is five)) twenty-five dollars. All dairy
technicians' licenses shall expire on December 31st of ((odd-numbered
years)) each year.
(4) The initial application for any endorsement beyond a dairy
technician's license must be accompanied by an endorsement fee of
twenty-five dollars.

Sec. 5 RCW 15.36.491 and 2005 c 414 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
All moneys received for licenses under this chapter shall be
deposited ((in the general fund, except that all moneys received for
annual milk processing plant licenses under RCW 15.36.051 shall be
deposited)) in the agricultural local fund established under RCW
43.23.230.

Sec. 6 RCW 15.36.525 and 1999 c 291 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department may issue sanitary certificates to milk processing
plants under this chapter subject to such requirements as it may
establish by rule. The fee for issuance is ((fifty)) seventy-five
dollars per certificate. Fees collected under this section shall be
deposited in the agricultural local fund.

Sec. 7 RCW 15.36.551 and 2010 c 17 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied on all milk processed in this state an
assessment not to exceed fifty-four one-hundredths of one cent per
hundredweight. The director shall determine, by rule, an assessment,
that with contribution from the general fund, will support an
inspection program to maintain compliance with the provisions of the
pasteurized milk ordinance of the national conference on interstate
milk shipment.
(2) All assessments under this section shall be levied on the
operator of the first milk processing plant receiving the milk for
processing. This ((shall)) includes milk processing plants that
produce their own milk for processing and milk processing plants that
receive milk from other sources.
((Milk processing plants whose monthly assessment for receipt of
milk totals less than twenty dollars in any given month are exempted
from paying this assessment for that month.))
(3) All moneys collected under this section shall be paid to the
director ((by the twentieth day of the succeeding month for the
previous month's assessments)) according to the following schedule:
(a) If the monthly amount of the assessment under this section is
twenty dollars or more, all moneys collected under this section shall
be paid to the director by the twentieth day of the succeeding month
for the previous month's assessment.
(b) If the monthly amount of the assessment under this section is
less than twenty dollars but the quarterly amount is more than twenty
dollars, all moneys collected under this section may, at the discretion
of the milk processing plant, be paid to the director by the twentieth
day of the first month of the succeeding quarter for the previous
quarter's assessments. If the assessment required under this section
is not paid by quarter consistent with this subsection (3)(b), it shall
be paid to the director by the twentieth day of the succeeding month
for the previous month's assessment.
(c) If the quarterly amount of the assessment under this section is
less than twenty dollars, all money collected under this section may be
paid to the director by the twentieth of January of the succeeding year
for the previous year's assessment. If the assessment required under
this section is not paid by year consistent with this subsection
(3)(c), it shall be paid to the director by the twentieth day of the
succeeding month for the previous month's assessment.
(4) The director shall deposit the funds into the dairy inspection
account hereby created within the agricultural local fund established
in RCW 43.23.230. ((The funds shall)) All funds collected under this
section may only be used ((only)) to provide inspection services to the
dairy industry.
(5) If the operator of a milk processing plant fails to remit any
assessments, that sum shall be a lien on any property owned by ((him or
her)) the operator, and ((shall)) must be reported by the director and
collected in the manner and with the same priority over other creditors
as prescribed for the collection of delinquent taxes under chapters
84.60 and 84.64 RCW.
(6) This section expires June 30, ((2015)) 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 15.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may, upon inspection, assess an inspection fee on
any manufacturing facility that is required to be inspected under the
PMO and does not satisfy the definition of "milk processing plant" as
defined in this chapter, "food processing plant" as defined in RCW
69.07.010, or "food storage warehouse" as defined in RCW 69.10.005.
The inspection fee is determined by computing the gross annual
sales for the accounting year immediately preceding the inspection
year. If the inspection is for a new operator, the inspection fee must
be based on an estimated gross annual sales for the initial inspection
period.

If gross annual sales are: The license fee is:
$0 to $50,000 $92.00
$50,001 to $500,000 $147.00
$500,001 to $1,000,000 $262.00
$1,000,001 to $5,000,000 $427.00
$5,000,001 to $10,000,000 $585.00
Greater than $10,000,000 $862.00

Sec. 9 RCW 69.07.040 and 1995 c 374 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It ((shall be)) is unlawful for any person to operate a food
processing plant or process foods in the state without first having
obtained an annual license from the department, which shall expire on
a date set by rule by the director. License fees shall be prorated
where necessary to accommodate staggering of expiration dates.
Application for a license shall be on a form prescribed by the director
and accompanied by the license fee. The license fee is determined by
computing the gross annual sales for the accounting year immediately
preceding the license year. If the license is for a new operator, the
license fee shall be based on an estimated gross annual sales for the
initial license period.

If gross annual sales are: The license fee is:
$0 to $50,000 $((55.00)) 92.00
$50,001 to $500,000 $((110.00)) 147.00
$500,001 to $1,000,000 $((220.00)) 262.00
$1,000,001 to $5,000,000 $((385.00)) 427.00
$5,000,001 to $10,000,000 $((550.00)) 585.00
Greater than $10,000,000 $((825.00)) 862.00

((Such application shall)) (2) Applications under this section must
include:
(a) The full name of the applicant for the license and the location
of the food processing plant he or she intends to operate((. If
such)), and if the applicant is an individual, receiver, trustee, firm,
partnership, association, or corporation, the full name of each member
of the firm or partnership, or names of the officers of the association
or corporation ((shall be given on the application. Such application
shall further state));
(b) The principal business address of the applicant in the state
and elsewhere and the name of a person domiciled in this state
authorized to receive and accept service of summons of legal notices of
all kinds for the applicant((. The application shall also specify));
and
(c) The type of food to be processed and the method or nature of
processing operation or preservation of that food and any other
necessary information.
(3) Upon the approval of the application by the director and
compliance with the provisions of this chapter, including the
applicable regulations adopted ((hereunder)) by the department, the
applicant shall be issued a license or renewal ((thereof)).
(4) Licenses shall be issued to cover only those products,
processes, and operations specified in the license application and
approved for licensing. Wherever a license holder wishes to engage in
processing a type of food product that is different than the type
specified on the application supporting the licensee's existing license
and processing that type of food product would require a major addition
to or modification of the licensee's processing facilities or has a
high potential for harm, the licensee ((shall)) must submit an
amendment to the current license application. In such a case, the
licensee may engage in processing the new type of food product only
after the amendment has been approved by the department.
(5) If upon investigation by the director, it is determined that a
person is processing food for retail sale and is not under permit,
license, or inspection by a local health authority, then that person
may be considered a food processor and subject to the provisions of
this chapter.
(6) The director may waive the licensure requirements of this
chapter for a person's operations at a facility if the person has
obtained a milk processing plant license under chapter 15.36 RCW to
conduct the same or a similar operation at the facility.

--- END ---