BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.24.311 and 2013 c 11 s 91 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who desires to be a write-in candidate and have such
votes counted at a primary or election may file a declaration of
candidacy with the officer designated in RCW 29A.24.070 not later than
the day ballots must be mailed according to RCW 29A.40.070.
Declarations of candidacy for write-in candidates must be accompanied
by a filing fee in the same manner as required of other candidates
filing for the office as provided in RCW 29A.24.091.
(2) Votes cast for write-in candidates who have filed such
declarations of candidacy need only specify the name of the candidate
in the appropriate location on the ballot in order to be counted.
Write-in votes cast for any other candidate, in order to be counted,
must designate the office sought and position number, if the manner in
which the write-in is done does not make the office or position clear.
(3) No person may file as a write-in candidate where:
(a) At a general election, the person attempting to file either
filed as a write-in candidate for the same office at the preceding
primary or the person's name appeared on the ballot for the same office
at the preceding primary;
(b) The person attempting to file as a write-in candidate has
already filed a valid write-in declaration for that primary or
election;
(c) The name of the person attempting to file already appears on
the ballot as a candidate for another office, unless the other office
is precinct committee officer or a temporary elected position, such as
charter review board member or freeholder;
(d) The office filed for is committee precinct officer.
(4) A person wishing to file as a write-in candidate for the
general election may have his or her name printed on the general
election ballot if:
(a) A primary for the office was not held; and
(b) The candidate has filed a declaration of candidacy, paid the
filing fee required under this section, and filed a petition that
contains the signatures of registered voters of the district for the
office being sought with the officer designated in RCW 29A.24.070 no
later than fourteen days after the date of the primary election. The
petition must contain signatures from at least one percent of the total
number of votes cast for the office in the previous general election
for that office. If the handwriting of the signature on the petition
is not the same as the handwriting of the signature on the registration
file, the signature may not be counted.
(5) The declaration of candidacy shall be similar to that required
by RCW 29A.24.031. No write-in candidate filing under this section may
be included in any voter's pamphlet produced under chapter 29A.32 RCW
unless that candidate qualifies to have his or her name printed on the
general election ballot. The legislative authority of any jurisdiction
producing a local voter's pamphlet under chapter 29A.32 RCW may
provide, by ordinance, for the inclusion of write-in candidates in such
pamphlets.

--- END ---