BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
restitution first act.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.18.016 and 2009 c 417 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Revenue collected under this section is not subject to division
under RCW 36.18.025 or 27.24.070.
(2)(a) For the filing of a petition for modification of a decree of
dissolution or paternity, within the same case as the original action,
and any party filing a counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim
in any such action, a fee of thirty-six dollars must be paid.
(b) The party filing the first or initial petition for dissolution,
legal separation, or declaration concerning the validity of marriage
shall pay, at the time and in addition to the filing fee required under
RCW 36.18.020, a fee of thirty dollars. The clerk of the superior
court shall transmit monthly twenty-four dollars of the thirty dollar
fee collected under this subsection to the state treasury for deposit
in the domestic violence prevention account. The remaining six dollars
shall be retained by the county for the purpose of supporting
community-based services within the county for victims of domestic
violence, except for five percent of the six dollars, which may be
retained by the court for administrative purposes.
(3)(a) The party making a demand for a jury of six in a civil
action shall pay, at the time, a fee of one hundred twenty-five
dollars; if the demand is for a jury of twelve, a fee of two hundred
fifty dollars. If, after the party demands a jury of six and pays the
required fee, any other party to the action requests a jury of twelve,
an additional one hundred twenty-five dollar fee will be required of
the party demanding the increased number of jurors.
(b) Upon conviction in criminal cases a jury demand charge of one
hundred twenty-five dollars for a jury of six, or two hundred fifty
dollars for a jury of twelve may be imposed as costs under RCW
10.46.190.
(4) For preparing a certified copy of an instrument on file or of
record in the clerk's office, for the first page or portion of the
first page, a fee of five dollars, and for each additional page or
portion of a page, a fee of one dollar must be charged. For
authenticating or exemplifying an instrument, a fee of two dollars for
each additional seal affixed must be charged. For preparing a copy of
an instrument on file or of record in the clerk's office without a
seal, a fee of fifty cents per page must be charged. When copying a
document without a seal or file that is in an electronic format, a fee
of twenty-five cents per page must be charged. For copies made on a
compact disc, an additional fee of twenty dollars for each compact disc
must be charged.
(5) For executing a certificate, with or without a seal, a fee of
two dollars must be charged.
(6) For a garnishee defendant named in an affidavit for garnishment
and for a writ of attachment, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.
(7) For filing a supplemental proceeding, a fee of twenty dollars
must be charged.
(8) For approving a bond, including justification on the bond, in
other than civil actions and probate proceedings, a fee of two dollars
must be charged.
(9) For the issuance of a certificate of qualification and a
certified copy of letters of administration, letters testamentary, or
letters of guardianship, there must be a fee of five dollars.
(10) For the preparation of a passport application, the clerk may
collect an execution fee as authorized by the federal government.
(11) For clerk's services such as performing historical searches,
compiling statistical reports, and conducting exceptional record
searches, the clerk may collect a fee not to exceed thirty dollars per
hour.
(12) For processing ex parte orders, the clerk may collect a fee of
thirty dollars.
(13) For duplicated recordings of court's proceedings there must be
a fee of ten dollars for each audio tape and twenty-five dollars for
each video tape or other electronic storage medium.
(14) For registration of land titles, Torrens Act, under RCW
65.12.780, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.
(15) For the issuance of extension of judgment under RCW 6.17.020
and chapter 9.94A RCW, a fee of two hundred dollars must be charged.
When the extension of judgment is at the request of the clerk, the two
hundred dollar charge may be imposed as court costs under RCW
10.46.190.
(16) A facilitator surcharge of up to twenty dollars must be
charged as authorized under RCW 26.12.240.
(17) For filing a water rights ((statement)) adjudication claim
under RCW 90.03.180, a fee of twenty-five dollars must be charged.
(18) For filing a claim of frivolous lien under RCW 60.04.081, a
fee of thirty-five dollars must be charged.
(19) For preparation of a change of venue, a fee of twenty dollars
must be charged by the originating court in addition to the per page
charges in subsection (4) of this section.
(20) A service fee of five dollars for the first page and one
dollar for each additional page must be charged for receiving faxed
documents, pursuant to Washington state rules of court, general rule
17.
(21) For preparation of clerk's papers under RAP 9.7, a fee of
fifty cents per page must be charged.
(22) For copies and reports produced at the local level as
permitted by RCW 2.68.020 and supreme court policy, a variable fee must
be charged.
(23) Investment service charge and earnings under RCW 36.48.090
must be charged.
(24) Costs for nonstatutory services rendered by clerk by authority
of local ordinance or policy must be charged.
(25) For filing a request for mandatory arbitration, a filing fee
may be assessed against the party filing a statement of arbitrability
not to exceed two hundred twenty dollars as established by authority of
local ordinance. This charge shall be used solely to offset the cost
of the mandatory arbitration program.
(26) For filing a request for trial de novo of an arbitration
award, a fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars as established by
authority of local ordinance must be charged.
(27) A public agency may not charge a fee to a law enforcement
agency, for preparation, copying, or mailing of certified copies of the
judgment and sentence, information, affidavit of probable cause, and/or
the notice of requirement to register, of a sex offender convicted in
a Washington court, when such records are necessary for risk
assessment, preparation of a case for failure to register, or
maintenance of a sex offender's registration file.
(28) For the filing of a will or codicil under the provisions of
chapter 11.12 RCW, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.
(29) For the collection of unpaid legal financial obligations, the
clerk may impose an annual fee of up to one hundred dollars, pursuant
to RCW 9.94A.780: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that the one hundred dollar fee,
if imposed, is a monetary obligation subject to the priority of
distribution set forth in RCW 9.94A.760(1).
(30) A surcharge of up to twenty dollars may be charged in
dissolution and legal separation actions as authorized by RCW
26.12.260.
The revenue to counties from the fees established in this section
shall be deemed to be complete reimbursement from the state for the
state's share of benefits paid to the superior court judges of the
state prior to July 24, 2005, and no claim shall lie against the state
for such benefits.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.780 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 10 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Whenever a punishment imposed under this chapter requires
supervision services to be provided, the offender shall pay to the
department of corrections the supervision intake fee, prescribed under
subsection (2) of this section, which shall be considered as payment or
part payment of the cost of establishing supervision to the offender.
The department may exempt or defer a person from the payment of all or
any part of the intake fee based upon any of the following factors:
(a) The offender has diligently attempted but has been unable to
obtain employment that provides the offender sufficient income to make
such a payment.
(b) The offender is a student in a school, college, university, or
a course of vocational or technical training designed to fit the
student for gainful employment.
(c) The offender has an employment handicap, as determined by an
examination acceptable to or ordered by the department.
(d) The offender's age prevents him or her from obtaining
employment.
(e) The offender is responsible for the support of dependents and
the payment of the intake fee constitutes an undue hardship on the
offender.
(f) Other extenuating circumstances as determined by the
department.
(2) The department of corrections shall adopt a rule prescribing
the amount of the assessment. The supervision intake fee shall be
imposed after the determination of eligibility for supervision has been
completed. For offenders whose crime was committed on or after October
1, 2011, the intake fee prescribed shall be not less than four hundred
dollars or more than six hundred dollars, and shall be assessed for
each judgment and sentence imposed by the superior court in which
supervision by the department is required.
(3) For offenders whose offense date was before October 1, 2011,
the monthly rate shall be converted to a one-time fee. The amount due
shall be based upon the most recent monthly fee amount by the months of
supervision left to serve, but in no case shall exceed six hundred
dollars.
(4) Nothing in chapter 40, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. shall affect
the amount or dates payments are due for any prior balances owed by an
offender for the cost of supervision.
(5) All amounts required to be paid under this section shall be
collected by the department of corrections and deposited by the
department in the dedicated fund established pursuant to RCW 72.11.040.
(6) This section shall not apply to probation services provided
under an interstate compact pursuant to chapter 9.95 RCW or to
probation services provided for persons placed on probation prior to
June 10, 1982.
(7) If a county clerk assumes responsibility for collection of
unpaid legal financial obligations under RCW 9.94A.760, or under any
agreement with the department under that section, whether before or
after the completion of any period of community custody, the clerk may
impose a monthly or annual assessment for the cost of collections:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that the monthly or annual assessment for the cost
of collections, if imposed, is a monetary obligation subject to the
priority of distribution set forth in RCW 9.94A.760(1). The amount of
the assessment shall not exceed the actual cost of collections. The
county clerk may exempt or defer payment of all or part of the
assessment based upon any of the factors listed in subsection (1) of
this section. The offender shall pay the assessment under this
subsection to the county clerk who shall apply it to the cost of
collecting legal financial obligations under RCW 9.94A.760.

Sec. 4 RCW 10.82.090 and 2011 c 106 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, financial
obligations imposed in a judgment shall bear interest from the date of
the judgment until payment, at the rate applicable to civil judgments
for the restitution portion of the judgment only; all other legal
financial obligations aside from restitution shall bear no interest.
All nonrestitution interest retained by the court shall be split
twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the state
general fund, twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in
the judicial information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020,
twenty-five percent to the county current expense fund, and twenty-five
percent to the county current expense fund to fund local courts.
(2) The court ((may, on motion by the offender)) shall, following
the offender's release from total confinement, ((reduce or)) waive the
interest on legal financial obligations levied as a result of a
criminal conviction as follows:
(a) The court shall waive all interest on the portions of the legal
financial obligations that are not restitution that accrued during the
term of total confinement for the conviction giving rise to the
financial obligations, ((provided the offender shows that the interest
creates a hardship for the offender or his or her immediate family)),
and for the ninety-day period following the term of total confinement;
(b) The court may reduce interest on the restitution portion of the
legal financial obligations only if the principal has been paid in
full;
(c) The court may otherwise reduce or waive the interest on the
portions of the legal financial obligations that are not restitution if
the offender shows that he or she has personally made a good faith
effort to pay and that the interest accrual is causing a significant
hardship. For purposes of this section, "good faith effort" means that
the offender has either (i) paid the principal amount in full; or (ii)
made at least fifteen monthly payments within an eighteen-month period,
excluding any payments mandatorily deducted by the department of
corrections;
(d) For purposes of (((a) through)) (b) and (c) of this subsection,
the court may reduce or waive interest on legal financial obligations
only as an incentive for the offender to meet his or her legal
financial obligations. The court may grant the motion, establish a
payment schedule, and retain jurisdiction over the offender for
purposes of reviewing and revising the reduction or waiver of interest.
(3) This section applies to persons convicted as adults or
adjudicated in juvenile court.

Sec. 5 RCW 10.01.160 and 2010 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court may require a defendant to pay costs, but none of the
costs discussed in this section may be imposed if the defendant is
indigent, as defined in RCW 10.101.010, or the payment of costs would
pose an undue hardship to the defendant or his or her family. In
determining the amount and method of payment of costs, the court shall
take account of the financial resources of the defendant and the nature
of the burden that payment of costs will impose. Costs may be imposed
only upon a convicted defendant, except for costs imposed upon a
defendant's entry into a deferred prosecution program, costs imposed
upon a defendant for pretrial supervision, or costs imposed upon a
defendant for preparing and serving a warrant for failure to appear.
(2) Costs shall be limited to expenses specially incurred by the
state in prosecuting the defendant or in administering the deferred
prosecution program under chapter 10.05 RCW or pretrial supervision.
They cannot include expenses inherent in providing a constitutionally
guaranteed jury trial or expenditures in connection with the
maintenance and operation of government agencies that must be made by
the public irrespective of specific violations of law. Expenses
incurred for serving of warrants for failure to appear and jury fees
under RCW 10.46.190 may be included in costs the court may require a
defendant to pay. Costs for administering a deferred prosecution may
not exceed two hundred fifty dollars. Costs for administering a
pretrial supervision may not exceed one hundred fifty dollars. Costs
for preparing and serving a warrant for failure to appear may not
exceed one hundred dollars. Costs of incarceration imposed on a
defendant convicted of a misdemeanor or a gross misdemeanor may not
exceed the actual cost of incarceration. In no case may the court
require the offender to pay more than one hundred dollars per day for
the cost of incarceration. Payment of other court-ordered financial
obligations, including all legal financial obligations and costs of
supervision take precedence over the payment of the cost of
incarceration ordered by the court. All funds received from defendants
for the cost of incarceration in the county or city jail must be
remitted for criminal justice purposes to the county or city that is
responsible for the defendant's jail costs. Costs imposed constitute
a judgment against a defendant and survive a dismissal of the
underlying action against the defendant. However, if the defendant is
acquitted on the underlying action, the costs for preparing and serving
a warrant for failure to appear do not survive the acquittal, and the
judgment that such costs would otherwise constitute shall be vacated.
(3) ((The court shall not order a defendant to pay costs unless the
defendant is or will be able to pay them. In determining the amount
and method of payment of costs, the court shall take account of the
financial resources of the defendant and the nature of the burden that
payment of costs will impose.
(4))) A defendant who has been ordered to pay costs ((and who is
not in contumacious default in the payment thereof)) may at any time
petition the sentencing court for remission of the payment of costs or
of any unpaid portion thereof. A formal written petition is not
necessary; the court may act pursuant to this section upon request of
the defendant or on the court's own initiative. If it appears to the
satisfaction of the court that payment of the amount due will impose
manifest hardship on the defendant or the defendant's immediate family,
either because the defendant is indigent or for other reasons, the
court may remit all or part of the amount due in costs, or modify the
method of payment under RCW 10.01.170.
(((5))) (4) Except for direct costs relating to evaluating and
reporting to the court, prosecutor, or defense counsel regarding a
defendant's competency to stand trial as provided in RCW 10.77.060,
this section shall not apply to costs related to medical or mental
health treatment or services a defendant receives while in custody of
the secretary of the department of social and health services or other
governmental units. This section shall not prevent the secretary of
the department of social and health services or other governmental
units from imposing liability and seeking reimbursement from a
defendant committed to an appropriate facility as provided in RCW
10.77.084 while criminal proceedings are stayed. This section shall
also not prevent governmental units from imposing liability on
defendants for costs related to providing medical or mental health
treatment while the defendant is in the governmental unit's custody.
Medical or mental health treatment and services a defendant receives at
a state hospital or other facility are not a cost of prosecution and
shall be recoverable under RCW 10.77.250 and 70.48.130, chapter 43.20B
RCW, and any other applicable statute.

Sec. 6 RCW 7.68.035 and 2011 c 336 s 246 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When any person is found guilty in any superior court of
having committed a crime, except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, there shall be imposed by the court upon such convicted person
a penalty assessment. The assessment shall be in addition to any other
penalty or fine imposed by law and shall be five hundred dollars for
each case or cause of action that includes one or more convictions of
a felony or gross misdemeanor and two hundred fifty dollars for any
case or cause of action that includes convictions of only one or more
misdemeanors. The court may waive the assessment, if the court finds
that the defendant is indigent, as defined in RCW 10.101.010, or the
payment of the assessment would pose an undue hardship to the defendant
or his or her family.
(b) When any juvenile is adjudicated of any offense in any juvenile
offense disposition under Title 13 RCW, except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, there shall be imposed upon the
juvenile offender a penalty assessment. The assessment shall be in
addition to any other penalty or fine imposed by law and shall be one
hundred dollars for each case or cause of action that includes one or
more adjudications for a felony or gross misdemeanor and seventy-five
dollars for each case or cause of action that includes adjudications of
only one or more misdemeanors. The court may waive the assessment, if
the court finds that the defendant is indigent, as defined in RCW
10.101.010, or the payment of the assessment would pose an undue
hardship to the defendant or his or her family.
(2) The assessment imposed by subsection (1) of this section shall
not apply to motor vehicle crimes defined in Title 46 RCW except those
defined in the following sections: RCW 46.61.520, 46.61.522,
46.61.024, 46.52.090, 46.70.140, 46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.52.101,
46.20.410, 46.52.020, 46.10.495, 46.09.480, 46.61.5249, 46.61.525,
46.61.685, 46.61.530, 46.61.500, 46.61.015, 46.52.010, 46.44.180,
46.10.490(2), and 46.09.470(2).
(3) When any person accused of having committed a crime posts bail
in superior court pursuant to the provisions of chapter 10.19 RCW and
such bail is forfeited, there shall be deducted from the proceeds of
such forfeited bail a penalty assessment, in addition to any other
penalty or fine imposed by law, equal to the assessment which would be
applicable under subsection (1) of this section if the person had been
convicted of the crime. The court may waive the assessment, if the
court finds that the defendant is indigent, as defined in RCW
10.101.010, or the payment of the assessment would pose an undue
hardship to the defendant or his or her family.
(4) Such penalty assessments shall be paid by the clerk of the
superior court to the county treasurer who shall monthly transmit the
money as provided in RCW 10.82.070. Each county shall deposit fifty
percent of the money it receives per case or cause of action under
subsection (1) of this section and retains under RCW 10.82.070, not
less than one and seventy-five one-hundredths percent of the remaining
money it retains under RCW 10.82.070 and the money it retains under
chapter 3.62 RCW, and all money it receives under subsection (7) of
this section into a fund maintained exclusively for the support of
comprehensive programs to encourage and facilitate testimony by the
victims of crimes and witnesses to crimes. A program shall be
considered "comprehensive" only after approval of the department upon
application by the county prosecuting attorney. The department shall
approve as comprehensive only programs which:
(a) Provide comprehensive services to victims and witnesses of all
types of crime with particular emphasis on serious crimes against
persons and property. It is the intent of the legislature to make
funds available only to programs which do not restrict services to
victims or witnesses of a particular type or types of crime and that
such funds supplement, not supplant, existing local funding levels;
(b) Are administered by the county prosecuting attorney either
directly through the prosecuting attorney's office or by contract
between the county and agencies providing services to victims of crime;
(c) Make a reasonable effort to inform the known victim or his or
her surviving dependents of the existence of this chapter and the
procedure for making application for benefits;
(d) Assist victims in the restitution and adjudication process; and
(e) Assist victims of violent crimes in the preparation and
presentation of their claims to the department of labor and industries
under this chapter.
Before a program in any county west of the Cascade mountains is
submitted to the department for approval, it shall be submitted for
review and comment to each city within the county with a population of
more than one hundred fifty thousand. The department will consider if
the county's proposed comprehensive plan meets the needs of crime
victims in cases adjudicated in municipal, district or superior courts
and of crime victims located within the city and county.
(5) Upon submission to the department of a letter of intent to
adopt a comprehensive program, the prosecuting attorney shall retain
the money deposited by the county under subsection (4) of this section
until such time as the county prosecuting attorney has obtained
approval of a program from the department. Approval of the
comprehensive plan by the department must be obtained within one year
of the date of the letter of intent to adopt a comprehensive program.
The county prosecuting attorney shall not make any expenditures from
the money deposited under subsection (4) of this section until approval
of a comprehensive plan by the department. If a county prosecuting
attorney has failed to obtain approval of a program from the department
under subsection (4) of this section or failed to obtain approval of a
comprehensive program within one year after submission of a letter of
intent under this section, the county treasurer shall monthly transmit
one hundred percent of the money deposited by the county under
subsection (4) of this section to the state treasurer for deposit in
the state general fund.
(6) County prosecuting attorneys are responsible to make every
reasonable effort to insure that the penalty assessments of this
chapter are imposed and collected.
(7) Every city and town shall transmit monthly one and seventy-five
one-hundredths percent of all money, other than money received for
parking infractions, retained under RCW 3.50.100 and 35.20.220 to the
county treasurer for deposit as provided in subsection (4) of this
section.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.43.7541 and 2011 c 125 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every sentence imposed for a crime specified in RCW 43.43.754 must
include a fee of one hundred dollars, except that the court may waive
the fee if the offender is indigent, as defined in RCW 10.101.010, the
payment of the fee would pose an undue hardship to the defendant or his
or her family, or the state has already collected the offender's DNA.
The fee is a court-ordered legal financial obligation as defined in RCW
9.94A.030 and other applicable law. For a sentence imposed under
chapter 9.94A RCW, the fee is payable by the offender after payment of
all other legal financial obligations included in the sentence has been
completed. For all other sentences, the fee is payable by the offender
in the same manner as other assessments imposed. The clerk of the
court shall transmit eighty percent of the fee collected to the state
treasurer for deposit in the state DNA database account created under
RCW 43.43.7532, and shall transmit twenty percent of the fee collected
to the agency responsible for collection of a biological sample from
the offender as required under RCW 43.43.754.

Sec. 8 RCW 36.18.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Revenue collected under this section is subject to division
with the state under RCW 36.18.025 and with the county or regional law
library fund under RCW 27.24.070, except as provided in subsection (5)
of this section.
(2) Clerks of superior courts shall collect the following fees for
their official services:
(a) In addition to any other fee required by law, the party filing
the first or initial document in any civil action, including, but not
limited to an action for restitution, adoption, or change of name, and
any party filing a counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim in
any such civil action, shall pay, at the time the document is filed, a
fee of two hundred dollars except, in an unlawful detainer action under
chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW for which the plaintiff shall pay a case
initiating filing fee of forty-five dollars, or in proceedings filed
under RCW 28A.225.030 alleging a violation of the compulsory attendance
laws where the petitioner shall not pay a filing fee. The forty-five
dollar filing fee under this subsection for an unlawful detainer action
shall not include an order to show cause or any other order or judgment
except a default order or default judgment in an unlawful detainer
action.
(b) Any party, except a defendant in a criminal case, filing the
first or initial document on an appeal from a court of limited
jurisdiction or any party on any civil appeal, shall pay, when the
document is filed, a fee of two hundred dollars.
(c) For filing of a petition for judicial review as required under
RCW 34.05.514 a filing fee of two hundred dollars.
(d) For filing of a petition for unlawful harassment under RCW
10.14.040 a filing fee of fifty-three dollars.
(e) For filing the notice of debt due for the compensation of a
crime victim under RCW 7.68.120(2)(a) a fee of two hundred dollars.
(f) In probate proceedings, the party instituting such proceedings,
shall pay at the time of filing the first document therein, a fee of
two hundred dollars.
(g) For filing any petition to contest a will admitted to probate
or a petition to admit a will which has been rejected, or a petition
objecting to a written agreement or memorandum as provided in RCW
11.96A.220, there shall be paid a fee of two hundred dollars.
(h) Upon conviction or plea of guilty, upon failure to prosecute an
appeal from a court of limited jurisdiction as provided by law, or upon
affirmance of a conviction by a court of limited jurisdiction, a
defendant in a criminal case shall be liable for a fee of two hundred
dollars, except the court may waive the fee if the court finds that the
defendant is indigent as defined in RCW 10.101.010 or the payment of
the fee would pose an undue hardship to the defendant or his or her
family.
(i) With the exception of demands for jury hereafter made and
garnishments hereafter issued, civil actions and probate proceedings
filed prior to midnight, July 1, 1972, shall be completed and governed
by the fee schedule in effect as of January 1, 1972. However, no fee
shall be assessed if an order of dismissal on the clerk's record be
filed as provided by rule of the supreme court.
(3) No fee shall be collected when a petition for relinquishment of
parental rights is filed pursuant to RCW 26.33.080 or for forms and
instructional brochures provided under RCW 26.50.030.
(4) No fee shall be collected when an abstract of judgment is filed
by the county clerk of another county for the purposes of collection of
legal financial obligations.
(5)(a) Until July 1, 2017, in addition to the fees required to be
collected under this section, clerks of the superior courts must
collect surcharges as provided in this subsection (5) of which seventy-five percent must be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the
judicial stabilization trust account and twenty-five percent must be
retained by the county.
(b) On filing fees required to be collected under subsection (2)(b)
of this section, a surcharge of thirty dollars must be collected.
(c) On all filing fees required to be collected under this section,
except for fees required under subsection (2)(b), (d), and (h) of this
section, a surcharge of forty dollars must be collected.

Sec. 9 RCW 9.94A.760 and 2011 c 106 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a person is convicted in superior court, the court may
order the payment of a legal financial obligation as part of the
sentence. When ordering payment of legal financial obligations, the
court shall consider the defendant's ability to pay and the impact that
legal financial obligations may have on the defendant's ability to
satisfy any restitution obligation and successfully reenter.
(a) The court must on either the judgment and sentence or on a
subsequent order to pay, designate the total amount of a legal
financial obligation and segregate this amount among the separate
assessments made for restitution, costs, fines, and other assessments
required by law.
(b) On the same order, the court is also to set a sum that the
offender is required to pay on a monthly basis towards satisfying the
legal financial obligation. If the court fails to set the offender
monthly payment amount, the department shall set the amount if the
department has active supervision of the offender, otherwise the county
clerk shall set the amount.
(c) In setting the monthly payment amount, the court, department,
or county clerk must consider the defendant's income, living expenses,
earning capacity, outstanding debts and liabilities, the availability
and convertibility of any personal or real property owned by the
defendant, and any other circumstances that would impair the
defendant's ability to pay monetary obligations. The court,
department, and county clerk may not consider funds received by the
defendant from needs-based public assistance programs as available for
payment of nonrestitution legal financial obligations.
(d) Upon receipt of an offender's monthly payment, restitution
shall be paid prior to any payments of other monetary obligations.
After restitution is satisfied in all cases involving the offender in
the jurisdiction, the county clerk shall distribute the payment
proportionally among all other fines, costs, and assessments imposed,
unless otherwise ordered by the court.
(2) If the court determines that the offender, at the time of
sentencing, has the means to pay for the cost of incarceration, the
court may require the offender to pay for the cost of incarceration at
a rate of fifty dollars per day of incarceration, if incarcerated in a
prison, or the court may require the offender to pay the actual cost of
incarceration per day of incarceration, if incarcerated in a county
jail. In no case may the court require the offender to pay more than
one hundred dollars per day for the cost of incarceration. A defendant
who is indigent, as defined by RCW 10.101.010, is presumed to lack the
means to pay for the cost of incarceration. Payment of other court-ordered financial obligations, including all legal financial
obligations and costs of supervision shall take precedence over the
payment of the cost of incarceration ordered by the court. All funds
recovered from offenders for the cost of incarceration in the county
jail shall be remitted to the county and the costs of incarceration in
a prison shall be remitted to the department.
(3) The court may add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent
order to pay a statement that a notice of payroll deduction is to be
issued immediately. If the court chooses not to order the immediate
issuance of a notice of payroll deduction at sentencing, the court
shall add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay a
statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued or other
income-withholding action may be taken, without further notice to the
offender if a monthly court-ordered legal financial obligation payment
is not paid when due, and an amount equal to or greater than the amount
payable for one month is owed.
If a judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay does not
include the statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued
or other income-withholding action may be taken if a monthly legal
financial obligation payment is past due, the department or the county
clerk may serve a notice on the offender stating such requirements and
authorizations. Service shall be by personal service or any form of
mail requiring a return receipt.
(4) Independent of the department or the county clerk, the party or
entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed shall have the
authority to use any other remedies available to the party or entity to
collect the legal financial obligation. These remedies include
enforcement in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action by the
party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed.
Restitution collected through civil enforcement must be paid through
the registry of the court and must be distributed proportionately
according to each victim's loss when there is more than one victim.
The judgment and sentence shall identify the party or entity to whom
restitution is owed so that the state, party, or entity may enforce the
judgment. If restitution is ordered pursuant to RCW 9.94A.750(6) or
9.94A.753(6) to a victim of rape of a child or a victim's child born
from the rape, the Washington state child support registry shall be
identified as the party to whom payments must be made. Restitution
obligations arising from the rape of a child in the first, second, or
third degree that result in the pregnancy of the victim may be enforced
for the time periods provided under RCW 9.94A.750(6) and 9.94A.753(6).
All other legal financial obligations for an offense committed prior to
July 1, 2000, may be enforced at any time during the ten-year period
following the offender's release from total confinement or within ten
years of entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period ends
later. Prior to the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the
superior court may extend the criminal judgment an additional ten years
for payment of legal financial obligations including crime victims'
assessments. All other legal financial obligations for an offense
committed on or after July 1, 2000, may be enforced at any time the
offender remains under the court's jurisdiction. For an offense
committed on or after July 1, 2000, the court shall retain jurisdiction
over the offender, for purposes of the offender's compliance with
payment of the legal financial obligations, until the obligation is
completely satisfied, regardless of the statutory maximum for the
crime. The department may only supervise the offender's compliance
with payment of the legal financial obligations during any period in
which the department is authorized to supervise the offender in the
community under RCW 9.94A.728, 9.94A.501, or in which the offender is
confined in a state correctional institution or a correctional facility
pursuant to a transfer agreement with the department, and the
department shall supervise the offender's compliance during any such
period. The department is not responsible for supervision of the
offender during any subsequent period of time the offender remains
under the court's jurisdiction. The county clerk is authorized to
collect unpaid legal financial obligations at any time the offender
remains under the jurisdiction of the court for purposes of his or her
legal financial obligations.
(5) In order to assist the court in setting a monthly sum that the
offender must pay during the period of supervision, the offender is
required to report to the department for purposes of preparing a
recommendation to the court. When reporting, the offender is required,
under oath, to respond truthfully and honestly to all questions
concerning present, past, and future earning capabilities and the
location and nature of all property or financial assets. The offender
is further required to bring all documents requested by the department.
(6) After completing the investigation, the department shall make
a report to the court on the amount of the monthly payment that the
offender should be required to make towards a satisfied legal financial
obligation.
(7)(a) During the period of supervision, the department may make a
recommendation to the court that the offender's monthly payment
schedule be modified so as to reflect a change in financial
circumstances. If the department sets the monthly payment amount, the
department may modify the monthly payment amount without the matter
being returned to the court. During the period of supervision, the
department may require the offender to report to the department for the
purposes of reviewing the appropriateness of the collection schedule
for the legal financial obligation. During this reporting, the
offender is required under oath to respond truthfully and honestly to
all questions concerning earning capabilities and the location and
nature of all property or financial assets. The offender shall bring
all documents requested by the department in order to prepare the
collection schedule.
(b) Subsequent to any period of supervision, or if the department
is not authorized to supervise the offender in the community, the
county clerk may make a recommendation to the court that the offender's
monthly payment schedule be modified so as to reflect a change in
financial circumstances. If the county clerk sets the monthly payment
amount, or if the department set the monthly payment amount and the
department has subsequently turned the collection of the legal
financial obligation over to the county clerk, the clerk may modify the
monthly payment amount without the matter being returned to the court.
During the period of repayment, the county clerk may require the
offender to report to the clerk for the purpose of reviewing the
appropriateness of the collection schedule for the legal financial
obligation. During this reporting, the offender is required under oath
to respond truthfully and honestly to all questions concerning earning
capabilities and the location and nature of all property or financial
assets. The offender shall bring all documents requested by the county
clerk in order to prepare the collection schedule.
(8) After the judgment and sentence or payment order is entered,
the department is authorized, for any period of supervision, to collect
the legal financial obligation from the offender. Subsequent to any
period of supervision or, if the department is not authorized to
supervise the offender in the community, the county clerk is authorized
to collect unpaid legal financial obligations from the offender. Any
amount collected by the department shall be remitted daily to the
county clerk for the purpose of disbursements. The department and the
county clerks are authorized, but not required, to accept credit cards
as payment for a legal financial obligation, and any costs incurred
related to accepting credit card payments shall be the responsibility
of the offender.
(9) The department or any obligee of the legal financial obligation
may seek a mandatory wage assignment for the purposes of obtaining
satisfaction for the legal financial obligation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.7701. Any party obtaining a wage assignment shall notify the
county clerk. The county clerks shall notify the department, or the
administrative office of the courts, whichever is providing the monthly
billing for the offender.
(10) The requirement that the offender pay a monthly sum towards a
legal financial obligation constitutes a condition or requirement of a
sentence and the offender is subject to the penalties for noncompliance
as provided in RCW 9.94B.040, 9.94A.737, or 9.94A.740.
(11) At any time after sentencing, the offender may petition the
court for a full or partial waiver of any nonrestitution legal
financial obligations. The court may grant the petition for a waiver
of nonrestitution legal financial obligations if the court finds that
the offender is indigent, as defined by RCW 10.101.010, that payment of
nonrestitution legal financial obligations would cause undue hardship
to the offender or his or her dependents, or that waiver of
nonrestitution legal financial obligations will assist the offender in
completing payment of restitution.
(12) At any time after sentencing, the offender may petition the
court to convert any nonrestitution legal financial obligations to
community service at a nonprofit organization or governmental agency.
The court may grant the petition to convert nonrestitution legal
financial obligations to community service if the court finds that the
defendant is indigent, as defined by RCW 10.101.010, or that payment of
legal financial obligations would cause undue hardship to the defendant
or his or her dependents.
(13)(a) The administrative office of the courts shall mail
individualized periodic billings to the address known by the office for
each offender with an unsatisfied legal financial obligation.
(b) The billing shall direct payments, other than outstanding cost
of supervision assessments under RCW 9.94A.780, parole assessments
under RCW 72.04A.120, and cost of probation assessments under RCW
9.95.214, to the county clerk, and cost of supervision, parole, or
probation assessments to the department.
(c) The county clerk shall provide the administrative office of the
courts with notice of payments by such offenders no less frequently
than weekly.
(d) The county clerks, the administrative office of the courts, and
the department shall maintain agreements to implement this subsection.
(((12))) (14) The department shall arrange for the collection of
unpaid legal financial obligations during any period of supervision in
the community through the county clerk. The department shall either
collect unpaid legal financial obligations or arrange for collections
through another entity if the clerk does not assume responsibility or
is unable to continue to assume responsibility for collection pursuant
to subsection (4) of this section. The costs for collection services
shall be paid by the offender.
(((13))) (15) The county clerk may access the records of the
employment security department for the purposes of verifying employment
or income, seeking any assignment of wages, or performing other duties
necessary to the collection of an offender's legal financial
obligations.
(((14))) (16) Nothing in this chapter makes the department, the
state, the counties, or any state or county employees, agents, or other
persons acting on their behalf liable under any circumstances for the
payment of these legal financial obligations or for the acts of any
offender who is no longer, or was not, subject to supervision by the
department for a term of community custody, and who remains under the
jurisdiction of the court for payment of legal financial obligations.

Sec. 10 RCW 9.94B.040 and 2002 c 175 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an offender violates any condition or requirement of a
sentence, the court may modify its order of judgment and sentence and
impose further punishment in accordance with this section.
(2) In cases where conditions from a second or later sentence of
community supervision begin prior to the term of the second or later
sentence, the court shall treat a violation of such conditions as a
violation of the sentence of community supervision currently being
served.
(3) If an offender fails to comply with any of the requirements or
conditions of a sentence the following provisions apply:
(a)(i) Following the violation, if the offender and the department
make a stipulated agreement, the department may impose sanctions such
as work release, home detention with electronic monitoring, work crew,
community restitution, inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew,
educational or counseling sessions, supervision enhanced through
electronic monitoring, jail time, or other sanctions available in the
community.
(ii) Within seventy-two hours of signing the stipulated agreement,
the department shall submit a report to the court and the prosecuting
attorney outlining the violation or violations, and sanctions imposed.
Within fifteen days of receipt of the report, if the court is not
satisfied with the sanctions, the court may schedule a hearing and may
modify the department's sanctions. If this occurs, the offender may
withdraw from the stipulated agreement.
(iii) If the offender fails to comply with the sanction
administratively imposed by the department, the court may take action
regarding the original noncompliance. Offender failure to comply with
the sanction administratively imposed by the department may be
considered an additional violation.
(b) In the absence of a stipulated agreement, or where the court is
not satisfied with the department's sanctions as provided in (a) of
this subsection, the court, upon the motion of the state, or upon its
own motion, shall require the offender to show cause why the offender
should not be punished for the noncompliance. The court may issue a
summons or a warrant of arrest for the offender's appearance;
(c) The state has the burden of showing noncompliance by a
preponderance of the evidence.
(d) If the court finds that the violation has occurred, it may
order the offender to be confined for a period not to exceed sixty days
for each violation, and may (i) convert a term of partial confinement
to total confinement, (ii) convert community restitution obligation to
total or partial confinement, (iii) convert monetary obligations,
except restitution ((and the crime victim penalty assessment)), to
community restitution hours at the rate of the state minimum wage as
established in RCW 49.46.020 for each hour of community restitution,
((or)) (iv) on the motion of the defendant, convert nonrestitution
legal financial obligations to a reasonable number of community service
hours to be performed at a nonprofit organization or governmental
agency; or (v) order one or more of the penalties authorized in (a)(i)
of this subsection. Any time served in confinement awaiting a hearing
on noncompliance shall be credited against any confinement order by the
court;
(((d))) (e) A defendant who lacks the present ability to pay has
not willfully failed to comply with payment of legal financial
obligations. In determining ability to pay, the court shall inquire
into (i) the defendant's present income and living expenses; (ii) the
defendant's outstanding debts and liabilities; (iii) the availability
and convertibility, without undue hardship to the defendant or the
defendant's dependents, of any personal or real property owned by the
defendant; (iv) the defendant's reasonable efforts to acquire the
resources to pay monetary obligations; and (v) any other circumstances
that would impair the defendant's ability to pay monetary obligations.
A defendant who is indigent, as defined by RCW 10.101.010, is presumed
to lack present ability to pay. If the court finds that the violation
was not willful, the court ((may)) shall consider whether to waive
nonrestitution legal financial obligations or modify its previous order
regarding payment of legal financial obligations ((and regarding)) or
community restitution obligations; and
(((e))) (f) If the violation involves a failure to undergo or
comply with mental status evaluation and/or outpatient mental health
treatment, the community corrections officer shall consult with the
treatment provider or proposed treatment provider. Enforcement of
orders concerning outpatient mental health treatment must reflect the
availability of treatment and must pursue the least restrictive means
of promoting participation in treatment. If the offender's failure to
receive care essential for health and safety presents a risk of serious
physical harm or probable harmful consequences, the civil detention and
commitment procedures of chapter 71.05 RCW shall be considered in
preference to incarceration in a local or state correctional facility.
(4) The community corrections officer may obtain information from
the offender's mental health treatment provider on the offender's
status with respect to evaluation, application for services,
registration for services, and compliance with the supervision plan,
without the offender's consent((, as described under RCW 71.05.630)).
(5) An offender under community placement or community supervision
who is civilly detained under chapter 71.05 RCW, and subsequently
discharged or conditionally released to the community, shall be under
the supervision of the department of corrections for the duration of
his or her period of community placement or community supervision.
During any period of inpatient mental health treatment that falls
within the period of community placement or community supervision, the
inpatient treatment provider and the supervising community corrections
officer shall notify each other about the offender's discharge,
release, and legal status, and shall share other relevant information.
(6) Nothing in this section prohibits the filing of escape charges
if appropriate.

Sec. 11 RCW 10.01.180 and 2010 c 8 s 1006 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A defendant sentenced to pay a fine or costs who willfully
defaults in the payment thereof or of any installment is in contempt of
court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW. The court may issue a warrant
of arrest for his or her appearance.
(2) When a fine or assessment of costs is imposed on a corporation
or unincorporated association, it is the duty of the person authorized
to make disbursement from the assets of the corporation or association
to pay the fine or costs from those assets, and his or her failure to
do so may be held to be contempt.
(3) A defendant's failure to pay is not willful if he or she lacks
the present ability to pay. In determining ability to pay, the court
shall inquire into (a) the defendant's income and living expenses; (b)
the defendant's outstanding debts and liabilities; (c) the availability
and convertibility, without undue hardship to the defendant or the
defendant's dependents, of any personal or real property owned by the
defendant; (d) the defendant's reasonable efforts to acquire additional
resources to pay monetary obligations; and (e) any other circumstances
that would impair the defendant's ability to pay monetary obligations.
A defendant who is indigent, as defined by RCW 10.101.010, is presumed
to lack the present ability to pay.
(4) If a term of imprisonment for contempt for nonpayment of a fine
or costs is ordered, the term of imprisonment shall be set forth in the
commitment order, and shall not exceed one day for each twenty-five
dollars of the fine or costs, thirty days if the fine or assessment of
costs was imposed upon conviction of a violation or misdemeanor, or one
year in any other case, whichever is the shorter period. A person
committed for nonpayment of a fine or costs shall be given credit
toward payment for each day of imprisonment at the rate specified in
the commitment order.
(((4))) (5) If it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the
default in the payment of a fine or costs is not contempt, the court
may enter an order allowing the defendant additional time for payment,
reducing the amount thereof or of each installment, converting the fine
or cost to a reasonable number of hours of community service at the
request of the defendant, or revoking the fine or costs or the unpaid
portion thereof in whole or in part.
(((5))) (6) A default in the payment of a fine or costs or any
installment thereof may be collected by any means authorized by law for
the enforcement of a judgment. The levy of execution for the
collection of a fine or costs shall not discharge a defendant committed
to imprisonment for contempt until the amount of the fine or costs has
actually been collected.

Sec. 12 RCW 36.23.110 and 2003 c 379 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington association of county officials, in consultation
with county clerks, shall determine a funding formula for allocation of
moneys to counties for purposes of collecting legal financial
obligations, and report this formula to the legislature and the
administrative office of the courts by September 1, 2003. The
Washington association of county officials shall report on the amounts
of legal financial obligations collected by the county clerks and the
costs to the county and municipalities in collecting legal financial
obligations to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later
than ((December)) June 1, ((2004)) 2015, and annually thereafter.

--- END ---