BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that:
(a) The uninterrupted and dedicated service of employees of
counties, municipal corporations, and political subdivisions of the
state is vital to the welfare and public safety of the state of
Washington; and
(b) There is a public policy in the state to promote cooperative
efforts between employees and employers by establishing orderly
procedures through which collective bargaining disputes are
expeditiously resolved using a process that encourages mutual respect,
integrity, reasonableness, and a willingness on the part of the parties
to address and resolve their points of concern.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to support and encourage
dedicated and uninterrupted public service and promote the use of
effective and adequate alternative means of settling collective
bargaining disputes.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.56.123 and 1993 c 398 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After the termination date of a collective bargaining
agreement, all of the terms and conditions specified in the collective
bargaining agreement shall remain in effect until the effective date of
a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from the termination
date stated in the agreement. Thereafter, the employer may not
unilaterally implement ((according to law)) changes in the terms and
conditions of employment subsequent to an impasse being reached in
bargaining.
(2) This section does not apply to provisions of a collective
bargaining agreement which both parties agree to exclude from the
provisions of subsection (1) of this section and to provisions within
the collective bargaining agreement with separate and specific
termination dates.
(3) This section shall not apply to the following:
(a) Bargaining units covered by RCW 41.56.430 et seq. for fact-finding and interest arbitration;
(b) Collective bargaining agreements authorized by chapter 53.18
RCW; or
(c) Collective bargaining agreements authorized by chapter 54.04
RCW.
(4) This section shall not apply to collective bargaining
agreements in effect or being bargained on July 23, 1989.

--- END ---