BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In order to maintain a safe and efficient
Washington state ferry system, the legislature recognizes the
importance of a rigorous investigation process in response to accidents
and incidents in the ferry system. The legislature recognizes further
the importance of a process that is structured, uniform, and
accountable to the people of Washington. The legislature also
recognizes the public trust developed through the credible, fair, and
thorough investigations conducted by the national transportation safety
board and the United States navy's judge advocate general corps. To
these ends, the legislature intends to establish and codify an
investigation process that is clear and fair to both the public and
ferry employees, recognizes the special maritime conditions in which
the ferry system operates, is useful to accident investigators, and is
responsive to public concerns.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The department must develop a proposal of comprehensive
accident and incident investigation procedures to submit to the
governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by
November 1, 2014. The proposal must be accompanied by a summary of
public comments authorized under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) During the development of the procedures, the department must
consult with ferry system unions, the United States coast guard,
comparable ferry systems, and independent outside experts on incident
and accident investigation best practices. The department must also
review processes for accident investigations by the national
transportation safety board and other industry sources to adopt
applicable processes.
(c) The proposal must contain:
(i) The definitions of an "incident" and an "accident" and the
types of investigations required for these events;
(ii) The process for employees to report accidents and incidents;
(iii) An identification of the proper convening authority to (A)
initiate an investigation of an accident or incident, (B) determine the
scope of the investigation, and (C) appoint an investigating officer;
(iv) The process for appointing an investigating officer and a
description of the authorities and responsibilities of the
investigating officer. The investigating officer must:
(A) Have the appropriate knowledge, training, and experience
required to conduct a comprehensive investigation;
(B) Not have been involved in the incident or accident or have
acted in any role that could have contributed to the accident or
incident so as to avoid any real or potential appearance of a conflict
of interest;
(C) Have full access to all facilities and equipment involved in
the accident or incident under investigation, as well as any persons,
records, and relevant organizations that may have information about or
may have contributed to the incident or accident under investigation;
(D) Be provided with appropriate outside technical expertise; and
(E) Be provided with staff and legal counsel as may be appropriate
to the type of investigation;
(v) A process of working with employees in accordance with
collective bargaining agreements;
(vi) The manner in which the United States coast guard is kept
informed of, interacts with, and, if necessary, reviews the
investigation;
(vii) The process within the department for review, approval, and
implementation of any recommendations by the investigator;
(viii) The process for keeping the public and the media informed of
the investigation and its outcomes without reaching conclusions before
the investigation has been completed; and
(ix) A method for the investigator to deliver a final report on the
accident or incident, summarizing all relevant information together
with the investigator's explanation of the accident or incident and
recommendations to avoid a future accident or incident. The department
must publish these final reports and make them available on its web
site for the benefit of the public at large.
(2) Prior to submitting the proposal required under subsection (1)
of this section, the department must conduct public meetings with the
ferry advisory committees established under RCW 47.60.310. During
these meetings, the department must provide the public with the draft
proposal and allow for public comment.
(3)(a) Upon approval by the transportation committees of the
legislature, the department must publish a manual on accident and
incident investigations, containing the rules to be followed by the
department in conducting an investigation. The department must make
the manual available on its web site for the benefit of the public at
large.
(b) The department must republish the manual described in (a) of
this subsection every odd-numbered year, incorporating any necessary
changes, additions, or deletions.
(4) The department must submit to the transportation committees of
the legislature by August 31, 2014, a comprehensive summary of all
incidents and accidents that have occurred in the ferry system since
January 1, 2008. The summary must include a synopsis of the
investigating activities, the results of the investigation, the cost of
repairs and corrective measures, and the impact on ferry service.
Thereafter, the department must submit the summary annually on January
15th covering the prior calendar year.

--- END ---