BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A ferries advisory board must be created to provide guidance
regarding the operation of the Washington state ferry system. The
advisory board must be composed of one voting member from each county
in the state in which there is a terminus of the state ferry system.
The county council of each such county must appoint a representative to
the advisory board. The advisory board may also include a nonvoting
member who is a representative of any Canadian regional district in
which there is a terminus of the state ferry system who must be
appointed, if at all, by the board of directors of such regional
district.
(b) The governor must appoint a person to serve as a voting member
and as chair of the advisory board.
(c) The advisory board may take action only if a quorum is present
and the action is approved by a majority of the voting members who are
present. A quorum is deemed present throughout any meeting of the
advisory board if a majority of the voting members appointed to the
advisory board are present.
(d) Members of the advisory board must serve without compensation,
except advisory board members may be reimbursed for travel expenses
incurred in carrying out the duties of the advisory board in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(2) At the first meeting of the ferries advisory board, the voting
members must draw lots to determine the length of their initial terms.
In drawing lots, three members must serve a one-year term, three
members must serve a two-year term, and three members must serve a
three-year term. After a voting member's initial term, the voting
member must serve a three-year term and may be reappointed to the
advisory board by the appropriate authority listed in subsection (1) of
this section.
(3)(a) The ferries advisory board must serve in an advisory
capacity to the commission on matters related to the fare-setting
process. The advisory board must also advise the secretary of
transportation on matters related to the management of the ferry
system, including system efficiencies and the relationship between
labor and management.
(b) In completing the duties listed in (a) of this subsection, the
advisory board must consult with the ferry advisory committees created
in RCW 47.60.310.
(4) The department must provide necessary support to the ferries
advisory board, including relevant documents requested by the advisory
board, a location in which the advisory board may hold meetings, and
administrative support.
(5) The ferries advisory board must hold its first meeting by
December 1, 2014. Thereafter, meetings must be held quarterly, and
members of the public must be given an opportunity to provide input at
the beginning of each meeting. At least one meeting a year must be
held in a community outside of King county that is served by a
Washington state ferry vessel.

--- END ---