BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.60.005 and 2008 c 124 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adaptive management" means a systematic process for
continually improving management policies and practices by learning
from the outcomes of operational programs.
(2) "Capital plan" means the state ferry system plan developed by
the department as described in RCW 47.06.050(2), reviewed by the
commission, and reported to the transportation committees of the
legislature by the commission.
(3) "Capital project" has the same meaning as used in budget
instructions developed by the office of financial management.
(4) "Commission" means the transportation commission created in RCW
47.01.051.
(5) "Improvement project" has the same meaning as in the budget
instructions developed by the office of financial management. If the
budget instructions do not define improvement project, then it has the
same meaning as "program project" in the budget instructions. If a
project meets both the improvement project and preservation project
definitions in this section it must be defined as an improvement
project. New vessel acquisitions must be defined as improvement
projects.
(6) "Life-cycle cost model" means that portion of a capital asset
inventory system which, among other things, is used to estimate future
preservation needs.
(7) "Maintenance cost" has the same meaning as used in budget
instructions developed by the office of financial management.
(8) "Preservation project" has the same meaning as used in budget
instructions developed by the office of financial management.
(9) "Route" means all ferry sailings from one location to another,
such as the Seattle to Bainbridge route or the Port Townsend to
Keystone route.
(10) "Sailing" means an individual ferry sailing for a specific
route, such as the 5:00 p.m. sailing from Seattle to Bremerton.
(11) "Travel shed" means one or more ferry routes with distinct
characteristics as determined by the department.
(12) "Best life-cycle value" means the consideration of the total
cost to the state to purchase, operate, maintain, and dispose of a
specific vessel.
(13) "Fixed price contract" means a contract that requires the
contractor to deliver a specified project for a set price. Change
orders on fixed price contracts are allowable but should be used on a
very limited basis.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.60.010 and 2008 c 122 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized to acquire by lease, charter,
contract, purchase, condemnation, or construction, and partly by any or
all of such means, and to thereafter operate, improve, and extend, a
system of ferries on and crossing Puget Sound and any of its tributary
waters and connections thereof, and connecting with the public streets
and highways in the state. However, any new vessel planning,
construction, purchase, analysis, or design work must be consistent
with RCW 47.60.810. The system of ferries shall include such boats,
vessels, wharves, docks, approaches, landings, franchises, licenses,
and appurtenances as shall be determined by the department to be
necessary or desirable for efficient operation of the ferry system and
best serve the public. Subject to RCW 47.56.820, the department may in
like manner acquire by purchase, condemnation, or construction and
include in the ferry system such toll bridges, approaches, and
connecting roadways as may be deemed by the department advantageous in
channeling traffic to points served by the ferry system. In addition
to the powers of acquisition granted by this section, the department is
empowered to enter into any contracts, agreements, or leases with any
person, firm, or corporation and to thereby provide, on such terms and
conditions as it shall determine, for the operation of any ferry or
ferries or system thereof, whether acquired by the department or not.
The authority of the department to sell and lease back any state
ferry, for federal tax purposes only, as authorized by 26 U.S.C., Sec.
168(f)(8) is confirmed. Legal title and all incidents of legal title
to any ferry sold and leased back (except for the federal tax benefits
attributable to the ownership thereof) shall remain in the state of
Washington.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.60.810 and 2001 c 226 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department ((may purchase new auto ferries through)) shall
use ((of)) a modified request for proposals process when purchasing new
auto ferries pursuant to a contract advertised for bid after the
effective date of this section whereby the prevailing shipbuilder and
the department engage in a design and build partnership for the design
and construction of the auto ferries. The process consists of the
three phases described in subsection (((2))) (3) of this section.
(2) Unless the use of a direct owner's representative is
specifically authorized by the office of financial management,
throughout the three phases described in subsection (3) of this
section, the department shall employ an independent owners
representative to serve as a third-party intermediary between the
department and the proposers. The independent owners representative
shall:
(a) Serve as the department's primary advocate and communicator
with the proposers;
(b) Perform project quality oversight;
(c) Manage any change order requests; and
(d) Ensure that the contract is adhered to and the department's
best interests are considered in all decisions.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout RCW
47.60.812 through 47.60.822.
(a) "Phase one" means the evaluation and selection of proposers to
participate in development of technical proposals in phase two.
(b) "Phase two" means the preparation of technical proposals by the
selected proposers in consultation with the department.
(c) "Phase three" means the submittal and evaluation of bids, the
award of the contract to the successful proposer, and the design and
construction of the auto ferries.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.60.814 and 2001 c 226 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Subject to legislative appropriation for the procurement of
vessels, after the effective date of this section, the department shall
issue a request for proposals to interested parties that must include,
at least, the following:
(1) Solicitation of a proposal to participate in a design and build
partnership with the department to design and construct the auto
ferries;
(2) Instructions on the prequalification process and procedures;
(3) A description of the modified request for proposals process.
Under this process, the department may modify any component of the
request for proposals, including the outline specifications, by
addendum at any time before the submittal of bids in phase three;
(4) A description of the design and build partnership process to be
used for procurement of the vessels;
(5) Outline specifications that provide the requirements for the
vessels including, but not limited to, items such as length, beam,
displacement, speed, propulsion requirements, capacities for autos and
passengers, passenger space characteristics, and crew size. The
department will produce notional line drawings depicting hull geometry
that will interface with Washington state ferries terminal facilities.
Notional lines may be modified in phase two, subject to approval by the
department;
(6) Instructions for the development of technical proposals in
phase two, and information regarding confidentiality of technical
proposals;
(7) The vessel delivery schedule, identification of the port on
Puget Sound where delivery must take place, and the location where
acceptance trials must be held;
(8) The estimated price range for the contract;
(9) Notification that the contract will be a fixed price contract
that delivers the best life-cycle value;
(10) The form and amount of the required bid deposit and contract
security;
(((10))) (11) A copy of the contract that will be signed by the
successful proposer;
(((11))) (12) The date by which proposals in phase one must be
received by the department in order to be considered;
(((12))) (13) A description of information to be submitted in the
proposals in phase one concerning each proposer's qualifications,
capabilities, and experience;
(((13))) (14) A statement of the maximum number of proposers that
may be selected in phase one for development of technical proposals in
phase two;
(((14))) (15) Criteria that will be used for the phase one
selection of proposers to participate in the phase two development of
technical proposals;
(((15))) (16) A description of the process that will be used for
the phase three submittal and evaluation of bids, award of the
contract, and postaward administrative activities;
(((16))) (17) A requirement that the contractor comply with all
applicable laws, rules, and regulations including but not limited to
those pertaining to the environment, worker health and safety, and
prevailing wages;
(((17))) (18) Except as provided in section 6 of this act, a
requirement that the vessels be constructed within the boundaries of
the state of Washington except that equipment furnished by the state
and components, products, and systems that are standard manufactured
items are not subject to the in-state requirement under this
subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, "constructed" means
the fabrication, by the joining together by welding or fastening of all
steel parts from which the total vessel is constructed, including, but
not limited to, all shell frames, longitudinals, bulkheads, webs,
piping runs, wire ways, and ducting. "Constructed" also means the
installation of all components and systems, including, but not limited
to, equipment and machinery, castings, electrical, electronics, deck
covering, lining, paint, and joiner work required by the contract.
"Constructed" also means the interconnection of all equipment,
machinery, and services, such as piping, wiring, and ducting; ((and
(18))) (19) A requirement that vessel design specifications and
drawings must be complete and be approved by the United States coast
guard, in accordance with federal regulatory requirements, before
vessel construction begins;
(20) A requirement that all designs, construction, and operational
maintenance of a vessel comply with all relevant standards promulgated
by the American bureau of shipping; and
(21) A requirement that all warranty work on the vessel must be
performed within the boundaries of the state of Washington, insofar as
practical.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must maintain a minimum of two vessels in the ferry
fleet that comply with the international convention for the safety of
life at sea.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
If all responses to the initial request for proposals under RCW
47.60.814 are greater than five percent above the department's
engineer's estimate for the project, the department after consulting
with the office of financial management and finding that it is in the
state's financial interests to do so, may reject all proposals and
issue a subsequent request for proposals that is not subject to RCW
47.60.814(18).

Sec. 7 RCW 47.60.820 and 2001 c 226 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Phase three consists of the submittal and evaluation of bids and
the award of the contract to the successful proposer for the final
design and construction of the auto ferries, as follows:
(1) The department shall request bids for detailed design and
construction of the vessels after completion of the review of technical
proposals in phase two. The department will review detailed design
drawings in phase three for conformity with the technical proposals
submitted in phase two. In no case may the department's review replace
the builder's responsibility to deliver a product meeting the phase two
technical proposal. The department may only consider bids from
selected proposers that have qualified to bid by submitting technical
proposals that have been approved by the department.
(2) Each qualified proposer must submit its total bid price for all
vessels, including certification that the bid is based upon its
approved technical proposal and the request for proposals.
(3) Bids constitute an offer and remain open for ninety days from
the date of the bid opening. A deposit in cash, certified check,
cashier's check, or surety bond in an amount specified in the request
for proposals must accompany each bid and no bid may be considered
unless the deposit is enclosed.
(4) The department shall evaluate the submitted bids. Upon
completing the bid evaluation, the department may select the responsive
and responsible proposer that offers the lowest total fixed price bid
((price)) on a best life-cycle value basis for all vessels.
(5) The department may waive informalities in the proposal and bid
process, accept a bid from the lowest responsive and responsible
proposer, reject any or all bids, republish, and revise or cancel the
request for proposals to serve the best interests of the department.
(6) The department may:
(a) Award the contract to the proposer that has been selected as
the responsive and responsible proposer that has submitted the lowest
total fixed price bid ((price)) on a best life-cycle value basis;
(b) If a contract cannot be signed with the apparent successful
proposer, award the contract to the next lowest responsive and
responsible proposer; or
(c) If necessary, repeat this procedure with each responsive and
responsible proposer in order of rank until the list of those proposers
has been exhausted.
(7) If the department awards a contract to a proposer under this
section, and the proposer fails to enter into the contract and furnish
satisfactory contract security as required by chapter 39.08 RCW within
twenty days from the date of award, its deposit is forfeited to the
state and will be deposited by the state treasurer to the credit of the
Puget Sound capital construction account. Upon the execution of a
ferry design and construction contract all proposal deposits will be
returned.
(8) The department may provide an honorarium to reimburse each
unsuccessful phase three proposer for a portion of its technical
proposal preparation costs at a preset, fixed amount to be specified in
the request for proposals. If the department rejects all bids, the
department may provide the honoraria to all phase three proposers that
submitted bids.
(9) To accommodate change orders on a fixed price contract, the
department shall request that the legislative appropriation for any
auto ferry construction project include up to, but no more than, a five
percent price contingency. This contingency must be identified in the
funding request to the legislature. The office of financial management
must approve any expenditure for a change order that exceeds two
hundred fifty thousand dollars. After completion of the project, the
department must provide to the contractor half of any remaining amount
of the contingency identified in this subsection if the project is
completed under the original budget and by the original date of
delivery.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.56.030 and 2008 c 122 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as permitted under chapter 47.29 or 47.46 RCW:
(a) Unless otherwise delegated, and subject to RCW 47.56.820, the
department of transportation shall have full charge of the planning,
analysis, and construction of all toll bridges and other toll
facilities including the Washington state ferries, and the operation
and maintenance thereof.
(b) The transportation commission shall determine and establish the
tolls and charges thereon.
(c) Unless otherwise delegated, and subject to RCW 47.56.820, the
department shall have full charge of planning, analysis, and design of
all toll facilities. The department may conduct the planning,
analysis, and design of toll facilities as necessary to support the
legislature's consideration of toll authorization.
(d) The department shall utilize and administer toll collection
systems that are simple, unified, and interoperable. To the extent
practicable, the department shall avoid the use of toll booths. The
department shall set the statewide standards and protocols for all toll
facilities within the state, including those authorized by local
authorities.
(e) Except as provided in this section, the department shall
proceed with the construction of such toll bridges and other facilities
and the approaches thereto by contract in the manner of state highway
construction immediately upon there being made available funds for such
work and shall prosecute such work to completion as rapidly as
practicable. The department is authorized to negotiate contracts for
any amount without bid under (e)(i) and (ii) of this subsection:
(i) Emergency contracts, in order to make repairs to ferries or
ferry terminal facilities or removal of such facilities whenever
continued use of ferries or ferry terminal facilities constitutes a
real or immediate danger to the traveling public or precludes prudent
use of such ferries or facilities; and
(ii) Single source contracts for vessel dry dockings, when there is
clearly and legitimately only one available bidder to conduct dry dock-related work for a specific class or classes of vessels. The contracts
may be entered into for a single vessel dry docking or for multiple
vessel dry dockings for a period not to exceed two years.
(f) Any new vessel planning, construction, purchase, analysis, or
design work must be consistent with RCW 47.60.810.
(2) The department shall proceed with the procurement of materials,
supplies, services, and equipment needed for the support, maintenance,
and use of a ferry, ferry terminal, or other facility operated by
Washington state ferries, in accordance with chapter 43.19 RCW except
as follows:
(a) When the secretary of the department of transportation
determines in writing that the use of invitation for bid is either not
practicable or not advantageous to the state and it may be necessary to
make competitive evaluations, including technical or performance
evaluations among acceptable proposals to complete the contract award,
a contract may be entered into by use of a competitive sealed proposals
method, and a formal request for proposals solicitation. Such formal
request for proposals solicitation shall include a functional
description of the needs and requirements of the state and the
significant factors.
(b) When purchases are made through a formal request for proposals
solicitation the contract shall be awarded to the responsible proposer
whose competitive sealed proposal is determined in writing to be the
most advantageous to the state taking into consideration price and
other evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals. No
significant factors may be used in evaluating a proposal that are not
specified in the request for proposals. Factors that may be considered
in evaluating proposals include but are not limited to: Price;
maintainability; reliability; commonality; performance levels; life
cycle cost if applicable under this section; cost of transportation or
delivery; delivery schedule offered; installation cost; cost of spare
parts; availability of parts and service offered; and the following:
(i) The ability, capacity, and skill of the proposer to perform the
contract or provide the service required;
(ii) The character, integrity, reputation, judgment, experience,
and efficiency of the proposer;
(iii) Whether the proposer can perform the contract within the time
specified;
(iv) The quality of performance of previous contracts or services;
(v) The previous and existing compliance by the proposer with laws
relating to the contract or services;
(vi) Objective, measurable criteria defined in the request for
proposal. These criteria may include but are not limited to items such
as discounts, delivery costs, maintenance services costs, installation
costs, and transportation costs; and
(vii) Such other information as may be secured having a bearing on
the decision to award the contract.
(c) When purchases are made through a request for proposal process,
proposals received shall be evaluated based on the evaluation factors
set forth in the request for proposal. When issuing a request for
proposal for the procurement of propulsion equipment or systems that
include an engine, the request for proposal must specify the use of a
life cycle cost analysis that includes an evaluation of fuel
efficiency. When a life cycle cost analysis is used, the life cycle
cost of a proposal shall be given at least the same relative importance
as the initial price element specified in the request of proposal
documents. The department may reject any and all proposals received.
If the proposals are not rejected, the award shall be made to the
proposer whose proposal is most advantageous to the department,
considering price and the other evaluation factors set forth in the
request for proposal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RCW 47.56.780 (New ferry vessel construction
for service on routes that require a vessel that carries no more than
one hundred motor vehicles -- How constructed -- Warranty work) and 2008 c
4 s 2 are each repealed.

--- END ---