BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Psychiatric boarding occurs when there is no
room for a patient requiring mental health treatment to receive
services in an appropriate care setting. Psychiatric boarding can
occur for hours or days in emergency departments while patients wait
for inpatient treatment in a community hospital or a residential
evaluation treatment facility. Patients requiring long-term treatment
may be boarded at a community hospital or residential evaluation
treatment facility while waiting for a bed at eastern or western state
hospital. It is widely recognized that the practice of psychiatric
boarding is detrimental to patients and results in failure to deliver
necessary treatment in a timely fashion. In recognition of this
problem, emerging standards from the joint commission specify patients
should not be detained in emergency departments for longer than four
hours. Currently, Washington state officials and other policy
stakeholders do not have accurate information about the practice of
psychiatric boarding within the state because data is not consistently
collected. In order to better understand the problem of psychiatric
boarding and take appropriate action, the legislature requires accurate
information. It is the intent of the legislature to create a process
for reporting that provides the data necessary for legislative decision
making.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A report must be made to the department:
(a) By a designated mental health professional when an individual
is detained pursuant to RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153, and remains in an
emergency department or other care setting that does not provide
certified evaluation and treatment facility services for more than four
hours after the detention order is issued or the individual is taken
into emergency custody; and
(b) By a regional support network, or other entity contracted with
the department to facilitate placement of patients, when an order for
ninety or one hundred eighty days of additional treatment is issued
pursuant to RCW 71.05.320, and an individual remains in a community
hospital or a residential evaluation treatment facility bed for greater
than twenty-four hours after the order is issued and prior to transfer
to eastern or western state hospital.
(2) The report required under subsection (1) of this section must
contain at a minimum:
(a) The date of the detention;
(b) The identity of the regional support network to which the
detained individual was assigned;
(c) The age of the individual detained;
(d) Reason for the individual's detention;
(e) Reason the individual was boarded;
(f) Location of boarding; and
(g) The amount of time the individual boarded.
(3) The department shall create a standardized reporting form for
the report required under subsection (1) of this section and may
require additional reporting elements as it determines are necessary or
desirable.
(4) The department shall create an annual report to be displayed on
its web site that accurately displays:
(a) The number of detained individuals boarded pursuant to
subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section for the year in each regional
support network;
(b) The average amount of time individuals were boarded;
(c) The most frequent reasons individuals were boarded; and
(d) The most common location individuals were boarded.
(5) The report in subsection (4) of this section may not display
protected health information as that term is used in the health
insurance portability and accountability act of 1996, nor information
contained in mental health treatment records as that term is used in
chapter 70.02 RCW or elsewhere in state law, and must otherwise be
compliant with state and federal privacy laws.

--- END ---