BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "fish habitat enhancement
project" means a project designed according to the most recent
standards approved by the department of fish and wildlife to accomplish
one or more of the following tasks:
(a) Elimination of human-made fish passage barriers, including
culvert repair and replacement;
(b) Restoration of an eroded or unstable stream bank employing the
principle of bioengineering, including limited use of rock as a
stabilization only at the toe of the bank, and with primary emphasis on
using native vegetation to control the erosive forces of flowing water;
or
(c) Placement of woody debris or other instream structures that
benefit naturally reproducing fish stocks.
(2) The department of transportation must provide notice of each
fish habitat enhancement project to the department of fish and
wildlife, which must provide notice to every appropriate tribe.
(3) A local government may not require permits, require mitigation,
or charge fees for a fish habitat enhancement project that meets the
definition in subsection (1) of this section and that is constructed
pursuant to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "fish habitat enhancement
project" means a project designed according to the most recent
standards approved by the department of fish and wildlife to accomplish
one or more of the following tasks:
(a) Elimination of human-made fish passage barriers, including
culvert repair and replacement;
(b) Restoration of an eroded or unstable stream bank employing the
principle of bioengineering, including limited use of rock as a
stabilization only at the toe of the bank, and with primary emphasis on
using native vegetation to control the erosive forces of flowing water;
or
(c) Placement of woody debris or other instream structures that
benefit naturally reproducing fish stocks.
(2) A fish habitat enhancement project that meets the definition in
subsection (1) of this section is expected to result in beneficial
impacts to the environment. Decisions pertaining to a fish habitat
enhancement project that meets the definition in subsection (1) of this
section are not subject to the requirements in RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c).
(3) A local government or state agency may not require mitigation
for a fish habitat enhancement project that meets the definition in
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "fish habitat enhancement
project" means a project designed according to the most recent
standards approved by the department of fish and wildlife to accomplish
one or more of the following tasks:
(a) Elimination of human-made fish passage barriers, including
culvert repair and replacement;
(b) Restoration of an eroded or unstable stream bank employing the
principle of bioengineering, including limited use of rock as a
stabilization only at the toe of the bank, and with primary emphasis on
using native vegetation to control the erosive forces of flowing water;
or
(c) Placement of woody debris or other instream structures that
benefit naturally reproducing fish stocks.
(2) A fish habitat enhancement project conducted by or for the
Washington state department of transportation that complies with
applicable federal environmental review requirements or protection
requirements, or both, does not require a permit under this chapter.
(3) A local government or state agency may not require mitigation
for a fish habitat enhancement project that meets the definition in
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "fish habitat enhancement
project" means a project designed according to the most recent
standards approved by the department of fish and wildlife to accomplish
one or more of the following tasks:
(a) Elimination of human-made fish passage barriers, including
culvert repair and replacement;
(b) Restoration of an eroded or unstable stream bank employing the
principle of bioengineering, including limited use of rock as a
stabilization only at the toe of the bank, and with primary emphasis on
using native vegetation to control the erosive forces of flowing water;
or
(c) Placement of woody debris or other instream structures that
benefit naturally reproducing fish stocks.
(2) Guidelines adopted by the department of ecology and master
programs developed or amended by local governments in accordance with
RCW 90.58.080 do not require modification of or limit a fish habitat
enhancement project conducted by or for the Washington state department
of transportation that complies with applicable federal environmental
review requirements or protection requirements, or both.
(3) A local government or state agency may not require mitigation
for a fish habitat enhancement project that meets the definition in
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A city or town is not liable for adverse impacts resulting from a
fish habitat enhancement project that meets the criteria of section 1
of this act and has been conducted by or for the department of
transportation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A code city is not liable for adverse impacts resulting from a fish
habitat enhancement project that meets the criteria of section 1 of
this act and has been conducted by or for the department of
transportation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW
to read as follows:
A county is not liable for adverse impacts resulting from a fish
habitat enhancement project that meets the criteria of section 1 of
this act and has been conducted by or for the department of
transportation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---