BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature categorizes this tax
preference as one intended to provide tax relief for certain businesses
or individuals, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(e).
(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to
provide tax relief to the monthly newspaper publishing industry. It is
the legislature's intent to allow certain smaller publishers serving
localized populations in Washington state to benefit from the
preferential business and occupation rate that the legislature
established for larger newspaper industry businesses.
(3) If a review finds that the actual fiscal cost of this tax
preference has not exceeded the estimated cost provided in the final
fiscal note for the legislation by more than ten percent in any fiscal
year for fiscal years 2015 through 2019, then the legislature intends
to extend the expiration date of the tax preference.
(4) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in
subsection (3) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review
committee will use data provided by the department of revenue regarding
taxpayer savings from claiming the preferential business and occupation
tax rate under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
printing a monthly newspaper, publishing a monthly newspaper, or both,
the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.35 percent through June 30, 2015,
and 0.2904 percent thereafter.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Monthly newspaper" means a publication issued regularly at
stated intervals of not more than once a month and printed on newsprint
in tabloid or broadsheet format folded loosely together without
stapling, glue, or any other binding of any kind, including any
supplement of a printed newspaper, with fewer than twenty-five thousand
copies printed each month.
(b) "Supplement" means a printed publication, including a magazine
or advertising section, that is:
(i) Labeled and identified as part of the printed newspaper; and
(ii) Circulated or distributed:
(A) As an insert or attachment to the printed newspaper; or
(B) Separate and apart from the printed newspaper so long as the
distribution is within the general circulation area of the newspaper.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2020.

--- END ---