BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.50.101 and 2013 c 276 s 2 and 2013 c 116 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, definitions of terms
shall be as indicated where used in this chapter:
(a) "Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by
injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the
body of a patient or research subject by:
(1) a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the
practitioner's authorized agent); or
(2) the patient or research subject at the direction and in the
presence of the practitioner.
(b) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at
the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does
not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or
employee of the carrier or warehouseperson.
(c) (("Board" means the state board of pharmacy.)) "Commission"
means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.
(d) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate
precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or
state laws, or federal or board rules.
(e)(1) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical
structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure
of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:
(i) that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on
the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant,
depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of
a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or
(ii) with respect to a particular individual, that the individual
represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or
hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially
similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule
I or II.
(2) The term does not include:
(i) a controlled substance;
(ii) a substance for which there is an approved new drug
application;
(iii) a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect
for investigational use by a particular person under Section 505 of the
federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, to the extent
conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption; or
(iv) any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption
before an exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.
(f) "Deliver" or "delivery," means the actual or constructive
transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not
there is an agency relationship.
(g) "Department" means the department of health.
(h) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order
for a controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order,
the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging
necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.
(i) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.
(j) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or
dispensing a controlled substance.
(k) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.
(l) "Drug" means (1) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in
the official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the
official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any
supplement to them; (2) controlled substances intended for use in the
diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in
individuals or animals; (3) controlled substances (other than food)
intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of
individuals or animals; and (4) controlled substances intended for use
as a component of any article specified in (1), (2), or (3) of this
subsection. The term does not include devices or their components,
parts, or accessories.
(m) "Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement
administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its
successor agency.
(n) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means
the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug
of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a
prescription or refill authorization verbally transmitted by telephone
nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.
(o) "Immediate precursor" means a substance:
(1) that the ((state board of pharmacy)) pharmacy quality assurance
commission has found to be and by rule designates as being the
principal compound commonly used, or produced primarily for use, in the
manufacture of a controlled substance;
(2) that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be
used in the manufacture of a controlled substance; and
(3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit
the manufacture of the controlled substance.
(p) "Industrial hemp" means the plant of the genus Cannabis and any
part of such plant, whether growing or not, with a tetrahydrocannabinol
(THC) concentration that does not exceed three-tenths percent.
(q) "Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in subsection (((y)))
(z)(5) of this section, RCW 69.50.204(a) (12) and (34), and
69.50.206(b)(4), the term includes any geometrical isomer; in RCW
69.50.204(a) (8) and (42), and 69.50.210(c) the term includes any
positional isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(a)(35), 69.50.204(c), and
69.50.208(a) the term includes any positional or geometric isomer.
(((q))) (r) "Lot" means a definite quantity of marijuana, useable
marijuana, or marijuana-infused product identified by a lot number,
every portion or package of which is uniform within recognized
tolerances for the factors that appear in the labeling.
(((r))) (s) "Lot number" shall identify the licensee by business or
trade name and Washington state unified business identifier number, and
the date of harvest or processing for each lot of marijuana, useable
marijuana, or marijuana-infused product.
(((s))) (t) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation,
propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled
substance, either directly or indirectly or by extraction from
substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical
synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis,
and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling
or relabeling of its container. The term does not include the
preparation, compounding, packaging, repackaging, labeling, or
relabeling of a controlled substance:
(1) by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's
administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of
the practitioner's professional practice; or
(2) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent
under the practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an
incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(((t))) (u) "Marijuana" or "marihuana" means all parts of the plant
Cannabis, whether growing or not((, with a THC concentration greater
than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis)); the seeds thereof; the resin
extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture,
salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or
resin. The term does not include industrial hemp, the mature stalks of
the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the
seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,
mixture, or preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin
extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of
the plant which is incapable of germination.
(((u))) (v) "Marijuana processor" means a person licensed by the
state liquor control board to process marijuana into useable marijuana
and marijuana-infused products, package and label useable marijuana and
marijuana-infused products for sale in retail outlets, and sell useable
marijuana and marijuana-infused products at wholesale to marijuana
retailers.
(((v))) (w) "Marijuana producer" means a person licensed by the
state liquor control board to produce and sell marijuana at wholesale
to marijuana processors and other marijuana producers.
(((w))) (x) "Marijuana-infused products" means products that
contain marijuana or marijuana extracts and are intended for human use.
The term "marijuana-infused products" does not include useable
marijuana.
(((x))) (y) "Marijuana retailer" means a person licensed by the
state liquor control board to sell useable marijuana and marijuana-infused products in a retail outlet.
(((y))) (z) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether
produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of
vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or
by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:
(1) Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium
derivative, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers,
whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
possible within the specific chemical designation. The term does not
include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.
(2) Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate,
including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers,
esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers, esters,
ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.
(3) Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.
(4) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves
from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their
salts have been removed.
(5) Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.
(6) Cocaine base.
(7) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer
thereof.
(8) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity
of any substance referred to in subparagraphs (1) through (7).
(((z))) (aa) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being
capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or
addiction-sustaining liability. The term includes opium, substances
derived from opium (opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The
term does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled
under RCW 69.50.201, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). The term includes
the racemic and levorotatory forms of dextromethorphan.
(((aa))) (bb) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver
somniferum L., except its seeds.
(((bb))) (cc) "Person" means individual, corporation, business
trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture,
government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or
commercial entity.
(((cc))) (dd) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of
the opium poppy, after mowing.
(((dd))) (ee) "Practitioner" means:
(1) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW; a physician assistant
under chapter 18.71A RCW; an osteopathic physician and surgeon under
chapter 18.57 RCW; an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter
18.57A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.57A.020 subject to any
limitations in RCW 18.57A.040; an optometrist licensed under chapter
18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010
subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010; a dentist under chapter
18.32 RCW; a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW;
a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW; a registered nurse, advanced
registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under
chapter 18.79 RCW; a naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW
who is licensed under RCW 18.36A.030 subject to any limitations in RCW
18.36A.040; a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific
investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise
permitted insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to
distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a
controlled substance in the course of their professional practice or
research in this state.
(2) A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered,
or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with
respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of
professional practice or research in this state.
(3) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a
physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a
dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and
surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed
physician assistant or a licensed osteopathic physician assistant
specifically approved to prescribe controlled substances by his or her
state's medical quality assurance commission or equivalent and his or
her supervising physician, an advanced registered nurse practitioner
licensed to prescribe controlled substances, or a veterinarian licensed
to practice veterinary medicine in any state of the United States.
(((ee))) (ff) "Prescription" means an order for controlled
substances issued by a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in
the state of Washington to prescribe controlled substances within the
scope of his or her professional practice for a legitimate medical
purpose.
(((ff))) (gg) "Production" includes the manufacturing, planting,
cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.
(((gg))) (hh) "Retail outlet" means a location licensed by the
state liquor control board for the retail sale of useable marijuana and
marijuana-infused products.
(((hh))) (ii) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee.
(((ii))) (jj) "State," unless the context otherwise requires, means
a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the
Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession
subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.
(((jj))) (kk) "THC concentration" means percent total THC, which is
the combined percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol ((content per dry
weight of)) and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in any part of the plant
Cannabis, ((or per volume or weight of marijuana product, or the
combined percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and
tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in any part of the plant Cannabis))
regardless of moisture content.
(((kk))) (ll) "Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully
possesses a controlled substance for the individual's own use or for
the use of a member of the individual's household or for administering
to an animal owned by the individual or by a member of the individual's
household.
(((ll))) (mm) "Useable marijuana" means dried marijuana flowers.
The term "useable marijuana" does not include marijuana-infused
products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---