BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the public is
entitled to complete disclosure regarding the influence of money in
politics. Therefore, the legislature intends to increase disclosure by
requiring electronic filing by lobbyists and lobbyists' employers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.17A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All agencies required to report under RCW 42.17A.635 must file
all reports required by this chapter electronically over the internet
as provided by the commission under RCW 42.17A.055.
(2) No later than January 1, 2015, all lobbyists and lobbyists'
employers required to file reports under RCW 42.17A.600, 42.17A.615,
42.17A.625, or 42.17A.630 must file all reports required by this
chapter electronically over the internet as provided by the commission
under RCW 42.17A.055.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.17A.615 and 2010 c 204 s 804 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any lobbyist registered under RCW 42.17A.600 and any person who
lobbies shall file with the commission monthly reports of his or her
lobbying activities. The reports shall be made in the form and manner
prescribed by the commission and must be signed by the lobbyist. The
monthly report shall be filed within fifteen days after the last day of
the calendar month covered by the report.
(2) The monthly report shall contain:
(a) The totals of all expenditures for lobbying activities made or
incurred by the lobbyist or on behalf of the lobbyist by the lobbyist's
employer during the period covered by the report. Expenditure totals
for lobbying activities shall be segregated according to financial
category, including compensation; food and refreshments; living
accommodations; advertising; travel; contributions; and other expenses
or services. Each individual expenditure of more than twenty-five
dollars for entertainment shall be ((identified by date, place, amount,
and the names of all persons taking part in the entertainment, along
with the dollar amount attributable to each person, including the
lobbyist's portion)) reported as follows:
(i) For legislative-related events in which all legislators are
invited, the date, place, total cost of the event;
(ii) For events in which ten or fewer individuals are invited,
excluding lobbyists, the date, place, and amount attributable to each
individual;
(iii) For events in which more than ten persons are invited,
excluding lobbyists, the date, place, and amount attributable to each
individual. It is permissible to average the cost for each attendee;
however, if a legislator attends such an event, he or she may request
that the actual cost of food or refreshment consumed by the legislator
be reported.
(b) In the case of a lobbyist employed by more than one employer,
the proportionate amount of expenditures in each category incurred on
behalf of each of the lobbyist's employers.
(c) An itemized listing of each contribution of money or of
tangible or intangible personal property, whether contributed by the
lobbyist personally or delivered or transmitted by the lobbyist, to any
candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or
any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition,
or for or on behalf of any candidate, elected official, or officer or
employee of any agency, or any political committee supporting or
opposing any ballot proposition. All contributions made to, or for the
benefit of, any candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of
any agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any
ballot proposition shall be identified by date, amount, and the name of
the candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency,
or any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot
proposition receiving, or to be benefited by each such contribution.
(d) The subject matter of proposed legislation or other legislative
activity or rule making under chapter 34.05 RCW, the state
administrative procedure act, and the state agency considering the
same, which the lobbyist has been engaged in supporting or opposing
during the reporting period, unless exempt under RCW 42.17A.610(2).
(e) A listing of each payment for an item specified in RCW
42.52.150(5) in excess of fifty dollars and each item specified in RCW
42.52.010(((10))) (9) (d) and (f) made to a state elected official,
state officer, or state employee. Each item shall be identified by
recipient, date, and approximate value of the item.
(f) The total expenditures paid or incurred during the reporting
period by the lobbyist for lobbying purposes, whether through or on
behalf of a lobbyist or otherwise, for (i) political advertising as
defined in RCW 42.17A.005; and (ii) public relations, telemarketing,
polling, or similar activities if the activities, directly or
indirectly, are intended, designed, or calculated to influence
legislation or the adoption or rejection of a rule, standard, or rate
by an agency under the administrative procedure act. The report shall
specify the amount, the person to whom the amount was paid, and a brief
description of the activity.
(3) Lobbyists are not required to report the following:
(a) Unreimbursed personal living and travel expenses not incurred
directly for lobbying;
(b) Any expenses incurred for his or her own living accommodations;
(c) Any expenses incurred for his or her own travel to and from
hearings of the legislature;
(d) Any expenses incurred for telephone, and any office expenses,
including rent and salaries and wages paid for staff and secretarial
assistance.
(4) The commission may adopt rules to vary the content of lobbyist
reports to address specific circumstances, consistent with this
section. Lobbyist reports are subject to audit by the commission.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.17A.710 and 2010 c 204 s 903 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The statement of financial affairs required by RCW 42.17A.700
shall disclose the following information for the reporting individual
and each member of his or her immediate family:
(a) Occupation, name of employer, and business address;
(b) Each bank account, savings account, and insurance policy in
which a direct financial interest was held that exceeds twenty thousand
dollars at any time during the reporting period; each other item of
intangible personal property in which a direct financial interest was
held that exceeds two thousand dollars during the reporting period; the
name, address, and nature of the entity; and the nature and highest
value of each direct financial interest during the reporting period;
(c) The name and address of each creditor to whom the value of two
thousand dollars or more was owed; the original amount of each debt to
each creditor; the amount of each debt owed to each creditor as of the
date of filing; the terms of repayment of each debt; and the security
given, if any, for each such debt. Debts arising from a "retail
installment transaction" as defined in chapter 63.14 RCW (retail
installment sales act) need not be reported;
(d) Every public or private office, directorship, and position held
as trustee;
(e) All persons for whom any legislation, rule, rate, or standard
has been prepared, promoted, or opposed for current or deferred
compensation. For the purposes of this subsection, "compensation" does
not include payments made to the person reporting by the governmental
entity for which the person serves as an elected official or state
executive officer or professional staff member for his or her service
in office; the description of such actual or proposed legislation,
rules, rates, or standards; and the amount of current or deferred
compensation paid or promised to be paid;
(f) The name and address of each governmental entity, corporation,
partnership, joint venture, sole proprietorship, association, union, or
other business or commercial entity from whom compensation has been
received in any form of a total value of two thousand dollars or more;
the value of the compensation; and the consideration given or performed
in exchange for the compensation;
(g) The name of any corporation, partnership, joint venture,
association, union, or other entity in which is held any office,
directorship, or any general partnership interest, or an ownership
interest of ten percent or more; the name or title of that office,
directorship, or partnership; the nature of ownership interest; and:
(i) With respect to a governmental unit in which the official seeks or
holds any office or position, if the entity has received compensation
in any form during the preceding twelve months from the governmental
unit, the value of the compensation and the consideration given or
performed in exchange for the compensation; and (ii) the name of each
governmental unit, corporation, partnership, joint venture, sole
proprietorship, association, union, or other business or commercial
entity from which the entity has received compensation in any form in
the amount of ten thousand dollars or more during the preceding twelve
months and the consideration given or performed in exchange for the
compensation. As used in (g)(ii) of this subsection, "compensation"
does not include payment for water and other utility services at rates
approved by the Washington state utilities and transportation
commission or the legislative authority of the public entity providing
the service. With respect to any bank or commercial lending
institution in which is held any office, directorship, partnership
interest, or ownership interest, it shall only be necessary to report
either the name, address, and occupation of every director and officer
of the bank or commercial lending institution and the average monthly
balance of each account held during the preceding twelve months by the
bank or commercial lending institution from the governmental entity for
which the individual is an official or candidate or professional staff
member, or all interest paid by a borrower on loans from and all
interest paid to a depositor by the bank or commercial lending
institution if the interest exceeds two thousand four hundred dollars;
(h) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as
prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of
Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds ten thousand
dollars in which any direct financial interest was acquired during the
preceding calendar year, and a statement of the amount and nature of
the financial interest and of the consideration given in exchange for
that interest;
(i) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as
prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of
Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds ten thousand
dollars in which any direct financial interest was divested during the
preceding calendar year, and a statement of the amount and nature of
the consideration received in exchange for that interest, and the name
and address of the person furnishing the consideration;
(j) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as
prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of
Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds ten thousand
dollars in which a direct financial interest was held. If a
description of the property has been included in a report previously
filed, the property may be listed, for purposes of this subsection
(1)(j), by reference to the previously filed report;
(k) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as
prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of
Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds twenty thousand
dollars, in which a corporation, partnership, firm, enterprise, or
other entity had a direct financial interest, in which corporation,
partnership, firm, or enterprise a ten percent or greater ownership
interest was held;
(l) A list of each occasion, specifying date, donor, and amount, at
which food and beverage in excess of fifty dollars was accepted under
RCW 42.52.150(5), except that food and beverage does not need to be
reported if required to be reported under RCW 42.17A.615(2);
(m) A list of each occasion, specifying date, donor, and amount, at
which items specified in RCW 42.52.010(((10))) (9) (d) and (f) were
accepted; and
(n) Such other information as the commission may deem necessary in
order to properly carry out the purposes and policies of this chapter,
as the commission shall prescribe by rule.
(2) Where an amount is required to be reported under subsection
(1)(a) through (m) of this section, it shall be sufficient to comply
with the requirement to report whether the amount is less than four
thousand dollars, at least four thousand dollars but less than twenty
thousand dollars, at least twenty thousand dollars but less than forty
thousand dollars, at least forty thousand dollars but less than one
hundred thousand dollars, or one hundred thousand dollars or more. An
amount of stock may be reported by number of shares instead of by
market value. No provision of this subsection may be interpreted to
prevent any person from filing more information or more detailed
information than required.
(3) Items of value given to an official's or employee's spouse,
domestic partner, or family member are attributable to the official or
employee, except the item is not attributable if an independent
business, family, or social relationship exists between the donor and
the spouse, domestic partner, or family member.

--- END ---