BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This section is the tax preference
performance statement for the sales and use tax exemption provided in
RCW 82.08.986 and 82.12.986. This performance statement is only
intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference.
It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or
be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.
(1) The legislature categorizes this sales and use tax exemption as
one intended to improve industry competitiveness, as indicated in RCW
82.32.808(2)(b).
(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to
improve industry competitiveness. It is the legislature's intent to
provide a sales and use tax exemption on eligible server equipment and
power infrastructure installed in eligible computer data centers,
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing
eligible server equipment, and on construction, installation, repair,
alteration, or improvement of eligible power infrastructures in order
to increase investment in data center construction in rural Washington
counties, thereby adding real and personal property to state and local
property tax rolls, thereby increasing the state and rural county tax
base.
(3) If a review finds that rural county property tax base is
increased as a result of the construction of computer data centers
eligible for the sales and use tax exemption in RCW 82.08.986 and
82.12.986, then the legislature intends to extend the expiration date
of the tax preference.
(4) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in
subsection (3) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review
committee may refer to data available from the department of revenue
regarding rural county property tax assessments.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.986 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 302 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) An exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 is provided
for sales to qualifying businesses and to qualifying tenants of
eligible server equipment to be installed, without intervening use, in
an eligible computer data center, and to charges made for labor and
services rendered in respect to installing eligible server equipment.
The exemption also applies to sales to qualifying businesses and to
qualifying tenants of eligible power infrastructure, including labor
and services rendered in respect to constructing, installing,
repairing, altering, or improving eligible power infrastructure.
(2)(a) In order to claim the exemption under this section, a
qualifying business or a qualifying tenant must submit an application
to the department for an exemption certificate. The application must
include the information necessary, as required by the department, to
determine that a business or tenant qualifies for the exemption under
this section. The department must issue exemption certificates to
qualifying businesses and qualifying tenants. The department may
assign a unique identification number to each exemption certificate
issued under this section.
(b) A qualifying business or a qualifying tenant claiming the
exemption under this section must present the seller with an exemption
certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.
(3)(a) Within six years of the date that the department issued an
exemption certificate under this section to a qualifying business or a
qualifying tenant with respect to an eligible computer data center, the
qualifying business or qualifying tenant must establish that net
employment at the eligible computer data center has increased by a
minimum of:
(i) Thirty-five family wage employment positions; or
(ii) Three family wage employment positions for each twenty
thousand square feet of space or less that is newly dedicated to
housing working servers at the eligible computer data center. For
qualifying tenants, the number of family wage employment positions that
must be increased under this subsection (3)(a)(ii) is based only on the
space occupied by the qualifying tenant in the eligible computer data
center.
(b) In calculating the net increase in family wage employment
positions:
(i) The owner of an eligible computer data center, in addition to
its own net increase in family wage employment positions, may include:
(A) The net increase in family wage employment positions employed
by qualifying tenants; and
(B) The net increase in family wage employment positions described
in (c)(ii)(B) of this subsection (3).
(ii)(A) Qualifying tenants, in addition to their own net increase
in family wage employment positions, may include:
(I) A portion of the net increase in family wage employment
positions employed by the owner; and
(II) A portion of the net increase in family wage employment
positions described in (c)(ii)(B) of this subsection (3).
(B) The portion of the net increase in family wage employment
positions to be counted under this subsection (3)(b)(ii) by each
qualifying tenant must be in proportion to the amount of space in the
eligible computer data center occupied by the qualifying tenant
compared to the total amount of space in the eligible computer data
center occupied by all qualifying tenants.
(c)(i) For purposes of this subsection, family wage employment
positions are new permanent employment positions requiring forty hours
of weekly work, or their equivalent, on a full-time basis at the
eligible computer data center and receiving a wage equivalent to or
greater than one hundred fifty percent of the per capita personal
income of the county in which the qualified project is located. An
employment position may not be counted as a family wage employment
position unless the employment position is entitled to health insurance
coverage provided by the employer of the employment position. For
purposes of this subsection (3)(c), "new permanent employment position"
means an employment position that did not exist or that had not
previously been filled as of the date that the department issued an
exemption certificate to the owner or qualifying tenant of an eligible
computer data center, as the case may be.
(ii)(A) Family wage employment positions include positions filled
by employees of the owner of the eligible computer data center and by
employees of qualifying tenants.
(B) Family wage employment positions also include individuals
performing work at an eligible computer data center as an independent
contractor hired by the owner of the eligible computer data center or
as an employee of an independent contractor hired by the owner of the
eligible computer data center, if the work is necessary for the
operation of the computer data center, such as security and building
maintenance, and provided that all of the requirements in (c)(i) of
this subsection (3) are met.
(d) All previously exempted sales and use taxes are immediately due
and payable for a qualifying business or qualifying tenant that does
not meet the requirements of this subsection.
(4) A qualifying business or a qualifying tenant claiming an
exemption under this section or RCW 82.12.986 must complete an annual
report with the department as required under RCW 82.32.534.
(5)(a) The exemption provided in this section does not apply to:
(i) Any person who has received the benefit of the deferral program
under chapter 82.60 RCW on: (A) The construction, renovation, or
expansion of a structure or structures used as a computer data center;
or (B) machinery or equipment used in a computer data center; and
(ii) Any person affiliated with a person within the scope of (a)(i)
of this subsection (5).
(b) If a person claims an exemption under this section and
subsequently receives the benefit of the deferral program under chapter
82.60 RCW on either the construction, renovation, or expansion of a
structure or structures used as a computer data center or machinery or
equipment used in a computer data center, the person must repay the
amount of taxes exempted under this section. Interest as provided in
chapter 82.32 RCW applies to amounts due under this section until paid
in full.
(6) ((For purposes of this section the following definitions
apply)) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise((:)).
(a) "Affiliated" means that one person has a direct or indirect
ownership interest of at least twenty percent in another person.
(b) Effective for computer data centers for which commencement of
construction occurs on or after July 1, 2014, "building" means a fully
enclosed structure that includes the following components:
(i) A centralized heating, ventilation, and air conditioning
system; and
(ii) Permanent restroom and break room facilities for employees.
(c)(i) "Computer data center" means a facility comprised of one or
more buildings, which may be comprised of multiple businesses,
constructed or refurbished specifically, and used primarily, to house
working servers, where the facility has the following characteristics:
(A) Uninterruptible power supplies, generator backup power, or both;
(B) sophisticated fire suppression and prevention systems; and (C)
enhanced physical security, such as: Restricted access to the facility
to selected personnel; permanent security guards; video camera
surveillance; an electronic system requiring passcodes, keycards, or
biometric scans, such as hand scans and retinal or fingerprint
recognition; or similar security features.
(ii) For a computer data center comprised of multiple buildings,
each separate building constructed or refurbished specifically, and
used primarily, to house working servers is considered a computer data
center if it has all of the characteristics listed in (((b))) (c)(i)(A)
through (C) of this subsection (6).
(iii) A facility comprised of one building or more than one
building must have a combined square footage of at least one hundred
thousand square feet.
(((c))) (d) "Electronic data storage and data management services"
include, but are not limited to: Providing data storage and backup
services, providing computer processing power, hosting enterprise
software applications, and hosting web sites. The term also includes
providing services such as e-mail, web browsing and searching, media
applications, and other online services, regardless of whether a charge
is made for such services.
(((d))) (e)(i) "Eligible computer data center" means a computer
data center:
(A) Located in a rural county as defined in RCW 82.14.370;
(B) Having at least twenty thousand square feet dedicated to
housing working servers, where the server space has not previously been
dedicated to housing working servers; and
(C) For which the commencement of construction occurs:
(I) After March 31, 2010, and before July 1, 2011; ((or))
(II) After March 31, 2012, and before July 1, ((2015)) 2014; or
(III) After June 30, 2014, and before July 1, 2025.
(ii) For purposes of this section, "commencement of construction"
means the date that a building permit is issued under the building code
adopted under RCW 19.27.031 for construction of the computer data
center. The construction of a computer data center includes the
expansion, renovation, or other improvements made to existing
facilities, including leased or rented space. "Commencement of
construction" does not include soil testing, site clearing and grading,
site preparation, or any other related activities that are initiated
before the issuance of a building permit for the construction of the
foundation of a computer data center.
(iii) With respect to facilities in existence on April 1, 2010,
that are expanded, renovated, or otherwise improved after March 31,
2010, or facilities in existence on April 1, 2012, that are expanded,
renovated, or otherwise improved after March 31, 2012, an eligible
computer data center includes only the portion of the computer data
center meeting the requirements in (((d))) (e)(i)(B) of this subsection
(6).
(((e))) (f) "Eligible power infrastructure" means all fixtures and
equipment owned by a qualifying business or qualifying tenant and
necessary for the transformation, distribution, or management of
electricity that is required to operate eligible server equipment
within an eligible computer data center. The term includes generators;
wiring; cogeneration equipment; and associated fixtures and equipment,
such as electrical switches, batteries, and distribution, testing, and
monitoring equipment. The term does not include substations.
(((f))) (g) "Eligible server equipment" means:
(i) For a qualifying business whose computer data center qualifies
as an eligible computer data center under (((d))) (e)(i)(C)(I) of this
subsection (6), the original server equipment installed in an eligible
computer data center on or after April 1, 2010, and replacement server
equipment. For purposes of this subsection (6)(((f))) (g)(i),
"replacement server equipment" means server equipment that:
(A) Replaces existing server equipment, if the sale or use of the
server equipment to be replaced qualified for an exemption under this
section or RCW 82.12.986; and
(B) Is installed and put into regular use before April 1, ((2018))
2020.
(ii) For a qualifying business whose computer data center qualifies
as an eligible computer data center under (((d))) (e)(i)(C)(II) of this
subsection (6), "eligible server equipment" means the original server
equipment installed in an eligible computer data center on or after
April 1, 2012, and replacement server equipment. For purposes of this
subsection (6)(((f))) (g)(ii), "replacement server equipment" means
server equipment that:
(A) Replaces existing server equipment, if the sale or use of the
server equipment to be replaced qualified for an exemption under this
section or RCW 82.12.986; and
(B) Is installed and put into regular use before April 1, 2020.
(iii) For a qualifying business whose computer data center
qualifies as an eligible computer data center under (e)(i)(C)(III) of
this subsection (6), "eligible server equipment" means the original
server equipment installed in an eligible computer data center on or
after July 1, 2014, and replacement server equipment. For purposes of
this subsection (6)(g)(iii), "replacement server equipment" means
server equipment that:
(A) Replaces existing server equipment, if the sale or use of the
server equipment to be replaced qualified for an exemption under this
section or RCW 82.12.986; and
(B) Is installed and put into regular use before April 1, 2025.
(iv) For a qualifying tenant who leases space within an eligible
computer data center, "eligible server equipment" means the original
server equipment installed within the space it leases from an eligible
computer data center on or after April 1, 2010, and replacement server
equipment. For purposes of this subsection (6)(((f))) (g)(iii),
"replacement server equipment" means server equipment that:
(A) Replaces existing server equipment, if the sale or use of the
server equipment to be replaced qualified for an exemption under this
section or RCW 82.12.986; and
(B) Is installed and put into regular use before April 1, ((2020))
2025.
(((g))) (h) "Qualifying business" means a business entity that
exists for the primary purpose of engaging in commercial activity for
profit and that is the owner of an eligible computer data center. The
term does not include the state or federal government or any of their
departments, agencies, and institutions; tribal governments; political
subdivisions of this state; or any municipal, quasi-municipal, public,
or other corporation created by the state or federal government, tribal
government, municipality, or political subdivision of the state.
(((h))) (i) "Qualifying tenant" means a business entity that exists
for the primary purpose of engaging in commercial activity for profit
and that leases space from a qualifying business within an eligible
computer data center. The term does not include the state or federal
government or any of their departments, agencies, and institutions;
tribal governments; political subdivisions of this state; or any
municipal, quasi-municipal, public, or other corporation created by the
state or federal government, tribal government, municipality, or
political subdivision of the state. The term also does not include a
lessee of space in an eligible computer data center under (((d)))
(e)(i)(C)(I) of this subsection (6), if the lessee and lessor are
affiliated and:
(i) That space will be used by the lessee to house server equipment
that replaces server equipment previously installed and operated in
that eligible computer data center by the lessor or another person
affiliated with the lessee; or
(ii) Prior to May 2, 2012, the primary use of the server equipment
installed in that eligible computer data center was to provide
electronic data storage and data management services for the business
purposes of either the lessor, persons affiliated with the lessor, or
both.
(((i))) (j) "Server equipment" means the computer hardware located
in an eligible computer data center and used exclusively to provide
electronic data storage and data management services for internal use
by the owner or lessee of the computer data center, for clients of the
owner or lessee of the computer data center, or both. "Server
equipment" also includes computer software necessary to operate the
computer hardware. "Server equipment" does not include personal
computers, the racks upon which the server equipment is installed, and
computer peripherals such as keyboards, monitors, printers, and mice.
(7) This section expires April 1, ((2020)) 2025.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.986 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 304 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) An exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 is provided
for the use by qualifying businesses or qualifying tenants of eligible
server equipment to be installed, without intervening use, in an
eligible computer data center, and to the use of labor and services
rendered in respect to installing such server equipment. The exemption
also applies to the use by a qualifying business or qualifying tenant
of eligible power infrastructure, including labor and services rendered
in respect to installing, repairing, altering, or improving such
infrastructure.
(2) A qualifying business or a qualifying tenant is not eligible
for the exemption under this section unless the department issued an
exemption certificate to the qualifying business or a qualifying tenant
for the exemption provided in RCW 82.08.986.
(3)(a) The exemption provided in this section does not apply to:
(i) Any person who has received the benefit of the deferral program
under chapter 82.60 RCW on: (A) The construction, renovation, or
expansion of a structure or structures used as a computer data center;
or (B) machinery or equipment used in a computer data center; and
(ii) Any person affiliated with a person within the scope of (a)(i)
of this subsection (3).
(b) If a person has received the benefit of the exemption under
this section and subsequently receives the benefit of the deferral
program under chapter 82.60 RCW on either the construction, renovation,
or expansion of a structure or structures used as a computer data
center or machinery or equipment used in a computer data center, the
person must repay the amount of taxes exempted under this section.
Interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW applies to amounts due under
this subsection (3)(b) until paid in full. A person is not required to
repay taxes under this subsection with respect to property and services
for which the person is required to repay taxes under RCW 82.08.986(5).
(4) The definitions and requirements in RCW 82.08.986 apply to this
section.
(5) This section expires April 1, ((2020)) 2025.

--- END ---