BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The repair or replacement of a city, town, or county bridge
deemed structurally deficient is exempt from compliance with this
chapter as long as the action occurs within the existing right-of-way
in a manner that meets current engineering standards or state
environmental standards for highway construction and does not result in
additional lanes for automobiles.
(2) For purposes of this section, "structurally deficient" means a
bridge that is classified as in poor condition under the state bridge
condition rating system and is reported by the state to the national
bridge inventory as having a deck, superstructure, or substructure
rating of four or below. Structurally deficient bridges are
characterized by deteriorated conditions of significant bridge elements
and potentially reduced load-carrying capacity. Bridges deemed
structurally deficient typically require significant maintenance and
repair to remain in service, and require major rehabilitation or
replacement to address the underlying deficiency.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.28.170 and 2006 c 334 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the department finds that as a consequence of
accident, natural disaster, or other emergency, an existing state
highway is in jeopardy or is rendered impassible in one or both
directions and the department further finds that prompt reconstruction,
repair, or other work is needed to preserve or restore the highway for
public travel, the department may obtain at least three written bids
for the work without publishing a call for bids, and the secretary of
transportation may award a contract forthwith to the lowest responsible
bidder.
The department shall notify any association or organization of
contractors filing a request to regularly receive notification.
Notification to an association or organization of contractors shall
include: (a) The location of the work to be done; (b) the general
anticipated nature of the work to be done; and (c) the date determined
by the department as reasonable in view of the nature of the work and
emergent nature of the problem after which the department will not
receive bids.
(2) Whenever the department finds it necessary to protect a highway
facility from imminent damage or to perform emergency work to reopen a
highway facility, the department may contract for such work on a
negotiated basis not to exceed force account rates for a period not to
exceed thirty working days.
(3) The secretary shall review any contract exceeding seven hundred
thousand dollars awarded under subsection (1) or (2) of this section
with the office of financial management within thirty days of the
contract award.
(4) Any person, firm, or corporation awarded a contract for work
must be prequalified pursuant to RCW 47.28.070 and may be required to
furnish a bid deposit or performance bond.
(5) A city, town, or county may use the contracting process
available to the department under subsection (1) of this section for
the repair or replacement of a bridge deemed structurally deficient, as
defined in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The repair or replacement of a city, town, or county bridge deemed
structurally deficient, as defined in section 1 of this act, may use
the contracting process available under RCW 47.28.170.

--- END ---