BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must issue, and design, an Americans with
disabilities act parking sticker for placement on a wheeled all-terrain
vehicle, authorizing access to recreation areas that are difficult to
access by persons with disabilities, to an applicant that meets the
following requirements:
(a) The applicant's disability must be determined by a person
listed under RCW 46.19.010(2) and recorded on a certification document
designed and administered by the department, establishing that the
applicant meets one of the following criteria:
(i) Loss of one or both legs or feet;
(ii) Inability to walk more than two hundred feet without having to
stop and rest;
(iii) Inability to walk due to severe disability where a person
cannot walk without the use of or assistance from a brace, crutches,
walker, cane, prosthetic device, wheel chair, other assistive device,
or another person;
(iv) Lung disease from which the person's expiratory volume for one
second is less than one liter when measured by spirometry or from which
the person's arterial oxygen is less than 60 mm/hg of room air at rest;
(v) Severely limited in ability to walk due to arthritic,
neurological, or orthopedic condition;
(vi) Uses portable oxygen;
(vii) Cardiovascular disease from which the person's functional
limitations are classified as class III or IV under standards adopted
by the American heart association;
(viii) Cardiovascular disease from which a marked limitation of
physical activity causes fatigue, palpitation, dyspnea, or anginal
pain; or
(ix) Other disease or disorder including, but not limited to,
severe arthritis or neurological orthopedic impairment that creates a
severe mobility limitation; and
(b) The wheeled all-terrain vehicle meets all registration
requirements under this chapter.
(2)(a) The Americans with disabilities act parking sticker must be
placed on the rear of the wheeled all-terrain vehicle.
(b) The Americans with disabilities act parking sticker must be
renewed every three years at the time of annual registration renewal
for the wheeled all-terrain vehicle. If the person's disability is
temporary, the sticker expires on the date submitted for recovery by
the physician as listed on the certification document.
(c) The department may by rule establish a fee to cover the cost of
designing, producing, and administering the Americans with disabilities
act parking sticker.
(3) A person must carry either a Washington state driver's license
or identicard when operating a wheeled all-terrain vehicle with an
Americans with disabilities act parking sticker.
(4) The privileges granted under this section may extend to one
companion of the operator of a wheeled all-terrain vehicle with an
Americans with disabilities act parking sticker serving as operator or
passenger of the vehicle if the vehicle is designed for passenger use.
(5) The submittal of fraudulent physician certification documents
submitted to the department to obtain an Americans with disabilities
act parking sticker is a gross misdemeanor.
(6) The department may adopt rules to implement and administer this
section.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.19.030 and 2010 c 161 s 704 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall design special license plates for persons
with disabilities, parking placards, and year tabs displaying the
international symbol of access.
(2) Special license plates for persons with disabilities must be
displayed on the motor vehicle as standard issue license plates as
described in RCW 46.16A.200.
(3) Parking placards must be displayed when the motor vehicle is
parked by suspending it from the rearview mirror. In the absence of a
rearview mirror, the parking placard must be displayed on the
dashboard.
(4) Special year tabs for persons with disabilities must be
displayed on license plates as defined by the department.
(5)(a) Persons who have been issued special license plates for
persons with disabilities, parking placards, or special license plates
with a special year tab for persons with disabilities may park in
places reserved for persons with physical disabilities.
(b) Persons who possess an Americans with disabilities act parking
sticker as issued under section 1 of this act on his or her wheeled
all-terrain vehicle may park the wheeled all-terrain vehicle in places
reserved for persons with physical disabilities.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.63.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 21 are each
amended to read as follows:
Failure to perform any act required or the performance of any act
prohibited by this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating to traffic
including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is
designated as a traffic infraction and may not be classified as a
criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the following
provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative
regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:
(1) Section 1 of this act relating to the submittal of fraudulent
physician certification documents to obtain an Americans with
disabilities act parking sticker;
(2) RCW 46.09.457(1)(b)(i) relating to a false statement regarding
the inspection of and installation of equipment on wheeled all-terrain
vehicles;
(((2))) (3) RCW 46.09.470(2) relating to the operation of a
nonhighway vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
a controlled substance;
(((3))) (4) RCW 46.09.480 relating to operation of nonhighway
vehicles;
(((4))) (5) RCW 46.10.490(2) relating to the operation of a
snowmobile while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
narcotics or habit-forming drugs or in a manner endangering the person
of another;
(((5))) (6) RCW 46.10.495 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;
(((6))) (7) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of title,
registration certificates, and markings indicating that a vehicle has
been destroyed or declared a total loss;
(((7))) (8) RCW 46.16A.030 and 46.16A.050(3) relating to the
nonpayment of taxes and fees by failure to register a vehicle and
falsifying residency when registering a motor vehicle;
(((8))) (9) RCW 46.16A.520 relating to permitting unauthorized
persons to drive;
(((9))) (10) RCW 46.16A.320 relating to vehicle trip permits;
(((10))) (11) RCW 46.19.050 relating to knowingly providing false
information in conjunction with an application for a special placard or
license plate for disabled persons' parking;
(((11))) (12) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid
driver's license;
(((12))) (13) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding
a driver's license or instruction permit;
(((13))) (14) RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession
and use of a driver's license;
(((14))) (15) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or
revoked license or status;
(((15))) (16) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor
vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;
(((16))) (17) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of
restrictions of an occupational driver's license, temporary restricted
driver's license, or ignition interlock driver's license;
(((17))) (18) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor
vehicle without an ignition interlock device in violation of a license
notation that the device is required;
(((18))) (19) RCW 46.20.750 relating to circumventing an ignition
interlock device;
(((19))) (20) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's
licenses;
(((20))) (21) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial
responsibility;
(((21))) (22) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of
financial responsibility;
(((22))) (23) RCW 46.35.030 relating to recording device
information;
(((23))) (24) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of
sunscreening material;
(((24))) (25) RCW 46.37.650 relating to the sale, resale,
distribution, or installation of a previously deployed air bag;
(((25))) (26) RCW 46.37.671 through 46.37.675 relating to signal
preemption devices;
(((26))) (27) RCW 46.37.685 relating to switching or flipping
license plates, utilizing technology to flip or change the appearance
of a license plate, selling a license plate flipping device or
technology used to change the appearance of a license plate, or
falsifying a vehicle registration;
(((27))) (28) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home
pilot vehicles;
(((28))) (29) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of
dangerous articles;
(((29))) (30) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an
unattended car or other property;
(((30))) (31) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to
or death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(((31))) (32) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairers,
storage persons, and appraisers;
(((32))) (33) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the
driving record to be furnished to an insurance company, an employer,
and an alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;
(((33))) (34) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities
of a registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;
(((34))) (35) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow
truck operators;
(((35))) (36) RCW 46.55.300 relating to vehicle immobilization;
(((36))) (37) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police
officers, flaggers, or firefighters;
(((37))) (38) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information
to or cooperate with an officer;
(((38))) (39) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give
identification to an officer;
(((39))) (40) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude
pursuing police vehicles;
(((40))) (41) RCW 46.61.212(4) relating to reckless endangerment of
emergency zone workers;
(((41))) (42) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;
(((42))) (43) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(((43))) (44) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;
(((44))) (45) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor
vehicle;
(((45))) (46) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;
(((46))) (47) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent
driving;
(((47))) (48) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of
roadway workers;
(((48))) (49) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on
highways;
(((49))) (50) RCW 46.61.655(7) (a) and (b) relating to failure to
secure a load;
(((50))) (51) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an
unattended vehicle with the motor running;
(((51))) (52) RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle
fuel;
(((52))) (53) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or
attempt to cancel a traffic citation;
(((53))) (54) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding,
abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(((54))) (55) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic
offenders;
(((55))) (56) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to
obtain a refund;
(((56))) (57) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle
business practices, except where that chapter provides for the
assessment of monetary penalties of a civil nature;
(((57))) (58) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of
passengers in for hire vehicles;
(((58))) (59) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier
insurance;
(((59))) (60) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine
without a vehicle certificate;
(((60))) (61) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a
limousine carrier;
(((61))) (62) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;
(((62))) (63) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training
schools;
(((63))) (64) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a
cab card, letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued
under chapter 46.87 RCW;
(((64))) (65) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an
unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---