BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.12.630 and 2013 c 306 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other authority which it may have, the
department of licensing may furnish lists of registered and legal
owners of motor vehicles only for the purposes specified in this
section. The department may only furnish lists to:
(((1)))(a) The manufacturers of motor vehicles, or their authorized
agents((, to be used)):
(i) To enable those manufacturers to carry out the provisions of
((the national traffic and motor vehicle safety act of 1966 (15 U.S.C.
Sec. 1382-1418))) Titles I and IV of the anti car theft act of 1992,
the automobile information disclosure act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1231 et
seq.), the clean air act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7401 et seq.), and 49 U.S.C.
Secs. 30101-30183, 30501-30505, and 32101-33118, respecting safety-related defects in motor vehicles, including amendments or additions
thereto((, respecting safety-related defects in motor vehicles)); or
(ii) ((During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, in)) For research
activities, and in producing statistical reports, as long as the
personal information is not published, redisclosed, or used to contact
individuals; ((or))
(b) During fiscal year 2014, an entity that is an authorized agent
of a motor vehicle manufacturer, for purposes of using lists of
registered and legal owner information to conduct research activities
and produce statistical reports, as long as the entity does not allow
personal information received under this section to be published,
redisclosed, or used to contact individuals. The department must
charge an amount sufficient to cover the full cost of providing the
data requested under this subsection (1)(b). Full cost of providing
the data includes the information technology, administrative, and
contract oversight costs;
(((2))) (c) Any governmental agency of the United States or Canada,
or political subdivisions thereof, to be used by it or by its
authorized commercial agents or contractors only in connection with the
enforcement of motor vehicle or traffic laws by, or programs related to
traffic safety of, that government agency. Only such parts of the list
as are required for completion of the work required of the agent or
contractor shall be provided to such agent or contractor;
(((3))) (d) A commercial parking company requiring the names and
addresses of registered owners to notify them of outstanding parking
violations. Subject to the disclosure agreement provisions of RCW
46.12.635 and the requirements of Executive Order 97-01, the department
may provide only the parts of the list that are required for completion
of the work required of the company;
(((4))) (e) An authorized agent or contractor of the department, to
be used only in connection with providing motor vehicle excise tax,
licensing, title, and registration information to motor vehicle
dealers;
(((5))) (f) Any business regularly making loans to other persons to
finance the purchase of motor vehicles, to be used to assist the person
requesting the list to determine ownership of specific vehicles for the
purpose of determining whether or not to provide such financing; or
(((6))) (g) A company or its agents operating a toll facility under
chapter 47.46 RCW or other applicable authority requiring the names,
addresses, and vehicle information of motor vehicle registered owners
to identify toll violators.
(2) By January 1, 2015, the department must develop a method to
identify the personal information released to manufacturers of motor
vehicles, or their authorized agents, under subsection (1)(a) of this
section, by recipient of the information and date released, and the
department must use that method to actively track, monitor, and
investigate the use of personal information under this section.
(3) Where both a mailing address and residence address are recorded
on the vehicle record and are different, only the mailing address will
be disclosed. Both addresses will be disclosed in response to requests
for disclosure from courts, law enforcement agencies, or government
entities with enforcement, investigative, or taxing authority and only
for use in the normal course of conducting their business.
(4) If a list of registered and legal owners of motor vehicles is
used for any purpose other than that authorized in this section, the
manufacturer, governmental agency, commercial parking company,
authorized agent, contractor, financial institution, toll facility
operator, or their authorized agents or contractors responsible for the
unauthorized disclosure or use will be denied further access to such
information by the department of licensing.

--- END ---