BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
When the state or a municipality contracting for construction of
any kind hires or is signatory to a contractor who is party to a
project labor agreement, the contracting entity must ensure that any
existing work jurisdiction of a union on the property is respected and
preserved.

--- END ---