BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.405 and 2000 c 210 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Consistent with the legislative findings in RCW 28A.300.390, the
legislature shall establish the Kip Tokuda memorial Washington civil
liberties public education program. The program provides grants for
the purpose of establishing a legacy of remembrance as part of a
continuing process of recovery from the World War II exclusion and
detention of individuals of Japanese ancestry. The program is created
to do one or both of the following:
(1) Educate the public regarding the history and the lessons of the
World War II exclusion, removal, and detention of persons of Japanese
ancestry through the development, coordination, and distribution of new
educational materials and the development of curriculum materials to
complement and augment resources currently available on this subject
matter; and
(2) Develop videos, plays, presentations, speaker bureaus, and
exhibitions for presentation to elementary schools, secondary schools,
community colleges, and to other interested parties.

--- END ---