BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature makes the following
findings:
(1) By 2030, nearly twenty percent or one out of every five people
in our state will be age sixty-five or older and by 2060 the population
of people who are age eighty-five or older in our state will more than
triple. This will affect every area of state government;
(2) There is a need for increased focus and planning to support the
growing number of seniors and people with disabilities in Washington
state. Planning is necessary across a broad range of policy areas
including health, long-term services and supports, housing,
transportation, financial security, and protections for vulnerable
adults;
(3) To address the growing demand for long-term services and
supports, Washington state must do more to leverage private resources,
support families so they can take care of their loved ones without
having to resort to medicaid and help people plan for potential future
costs;
(4) In the past few decades, a number of initiatives have been
undertaken to reform Washington's system of supports for seniors to
emphasize home and community-based options. These efforts have saved
millions of dollars by preventing expensive institutional placements;
and
(5) Washington must begin planning for the future long-term
services and supports needs of its residents by taking steps to grow
its workforce, resources, and quality long-term services and supports,
and identify alternative long-term care financing options to help
families and reduce the rate of growth in medicaid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of social and health
services shall contract for an independent feasibility study and
actuarial modeling of public and private options for leveraging private
resources to help individuals prepare for long-term services and
support needs. The study should model at least three options: (a) A
public long-term care insurance benefit funded through payroll
deduction that would provide a time-limited long-term care insurance
benefit; (b) a set of regulatory changes that would encourage the
development and growth of new products on the insurance market that
combine features of life insurance, long-term care insurance,
annuities, and medicaid life settlements; and (c) public-private
options to facilitate a new marketplace for long-term care insurance
policies, such as through the Washington health plan finder, for
private long-term care insurance policies that would provide a time
limited benefit, an age defined individual mandate for purchasing these
policies, and subsidies to ensure affordability for lower income
individuals.
(2) The report must include an evaluation of each option based on:
(a) The expected costs and benefits for participants; (b) the total
anticipated number of participants; (c) the projected savings to the
state medicaid program; and (d) legal and financial risks to the state.
The joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability shall
provide oversight and direction for this analysis and will convene
interested stakeholders to provide input on the study design. The
department of social and health services shall provide a report on its
findings and recommendations to the relevant policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature by January 15, 2015.

--- END ---