BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) In the course of their daily lives, people are exposed to and
ingest thousands of chemicals currently added to foods and food
packaging. Many of these chemicals have not been specifically
reviewed, tested, and approved by the United States food and drug
administration;
(b) While the state of Washington regulates the exposure rate of
many toxic, carcinogenic, or otherwise harmful chemicals that are also
present in food additives and food packaging, people may be exposed to
these same chemicals by direct ingestion of food additives and via food
packaging at significantly higher rates than through environmental
exposure alone;
(c) Recent scientific studies have detected bisphenol A (BPA),
listed as a chemical of high concern to children by the state
department of health, in the vast majority of American children and
adults. Washington has barred BPA from food and beverage containers
designed for use by young children;
(d) Many phthalates are hormone-disrupting chemicals that can cause
a variety of negative health impacts. The United States national
toxicology program concluded that five commonly used phthalates are
reproductive or developmental toxicants and, in 2008, congress directed
the consumer product safety commission to ban or provisionally ban the
use of six phthalates in children's toys. Washington has also found it
prudent to prohibit phthalates from being included in children's toys.
In addition, in 2002 the United States food and drug administration
issued a safety alert recommending that health care providers limit the
exposure of newborn males to the phthalate DEHP in medical procedures;
and
(e) Exposure to BPA, phthalates, and other chemicals that have not
been tested for ingestion exposure risks pose a public health threat
similar to, or even greater than, the risks posed by exposures to those
chemicals from environmental sources.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to reduce the
ingestion of phthalates, BPA, and other chemicals by children and
adults, and to provide appropriate information about the presence of
potentially harmful toxicants in food, food packaging, and food
containers

Sec. 2 RCW 70.280.010 and 2010 c 140 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Metal can" means a single walled container that is
manufactured from metal substrate designed to hold or pack food or
beverages and sealed by can ends manufactured from metal substrate.
The metal substrate for the can and the can ends must be equal to or
thinner than 0.0149 inch.
(3) "Sports bottle" means a resealable, reusable container, sixty-four ounces or less in size, that is designed or intended primarily to
be filled with a liquid or beverage for consumption from the container,
and is sold or distributed at retail without containing any liquid or
beverage.
(4) "Youth" means a person twelve years of age or younger.
(5) "Reusable food or beverage container" means a receptacle for
storing food or beverages, including but not limited to spill-proof
cups, sports bottles, and thermoses. The term does not include food or
beverage containers intended for disposal after initial usage.
(6) "Food packaging" means a container or wrapper intended for food
contact used to store food and foodstuffs for sale.
(7) "Canned food" means food sterilized by heat in a closed,
durable container such as tin and aluminum cans, flexible aluminum
foil, and thermoplastic containers including squeeze tubes.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.280.020 and 2010 c 140 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2011, no manufacturer, wholesaler, or
retailer may manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute
for sale, or distribute for use in this state, any bottle, cup, or
other container, except a metal can, that contains bisphenol A if that
container is designed or intended to be filled with any liquid, food,
or beverage primarily for consumption from that container by children
three years of age or younger and is sold or distributed at retail
without containing any liquid, food, or beverage.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2012, no manufacturer, wholesaler, or
retailer may manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute
for sale, or distribute for use in this state, sports bottles that
contain bisphenol A.
(3) No manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer may manufacture,
knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for
use in this state, any bottle, cup, or reusable food and beverage
container that contains phthalates individually or in combination at
more than 0.10 percent by weight or one thousand parts per million or
bisphenol A.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.280 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No person or entity may manufacture, sell, or distribute in
commerce in this state any food intended for or marketed to youth that
contains or is stored in food packaging that contains phthalates
individually or in combination at more than 0.10 percent by weight or
one thousand parts per million or bisphenol A.
(2) Manufacturers may not replace bisphenol A or phthalates with
the chemicals listed in subsection (3) of this section in order to
comply with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section or RCW
70.280.020.
(3) The department shall compile a list of prohibited alternatives
to bisphenol A or phthalates composed of the following chemicals:
(a)(i) Chemicals rated by the United States environmental
protection agency as carcinogenic to humans, likely to be carcinogenic
to humans, or suggestive evidence of carcinogenic potential as of
January 1, 2014, under the 2005 guidelines for carcinogen risk
assessment published pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 7412(o)(7).
(ii) Chemicals rated by the United States environmental protection
agency as a human carcinogen, probable human carcinogen, or possible
human carcinogen under the 1986 guidelines for carcinogen risk
assessment published in the federal register on September 24, 1986 (51
C.F.R. Sec. 33992).
(b) Reproductive toxicants that the United States environmental
protection agency has identified as of January 1, 2014, as causing
birth defects, reproductive harm, or developmental harm under the
guidelines for reproductive toxicity risk assessment published in the
federal register on October 31, 1996, (61 C.F.R. Sec. 56274) or the
guidelines for developmental toxicity risk assessment published in the
federal register on December 5, 1991, (56 C.F.R. Sec. 63798).
(c) A chemical identified by the European commission on the
environment as of January 1, 2014, as a category 1 substance for which
there is at least one study providing evidence of endocrine disruption
in an intact organism in the report dated June 21, 2000, entitled
"towards the establishment of a priority list of substances for further
evaluation of their role in endocrine disruption: Preparation of a
candidate list of substances as a basis for priority setting."
(d) A chemical identified by the department as a high priority
chemical of high concern for children as required under RCW 70.240.030.
(e) A chemical identified by the department for inclusion on the
list pursuant to section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.280 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All food packaging that contains bisphenol A must display a
label on the front of the package stating "This package contains
bisphenol A (a chemical that may harm fetal development) which can
leach into the food."
(2) All food packaging that contains phthalates individually or in
combination at more than 0.10 percent by weight or one thousand parts
per million must display a label on the front of the package stating
"This package contains phthalates (a type of chemical that may harm
fetal development) that can leach into the food."
(3) All food packaging containing the following chemicals must be
labeled on the packaging or at the point of display for retail sale
with a notice that the food packaging contains a chemical that, if
ingested at levels that may be present in the food, is a potential or
known human carcinogen, reproductive toxin, mutagen, or hazardous
substance that:
(a) As of January 1, 2014, the United States environmental
protection agency has identified under 42 U.S.C. chapter 103, the 2005
guidelines for carcinogen risk assessment published pursuant to 42
U.S.C. Sec. 7412(o)(7), the guidelines for reproductive toxicity risk
assessment published in the federal register on October 31, 1996, (61
C.F.R. Sec. 56274), or the guidelines for developmental toxicity risk
assessment published in the federal register on December 5, 1991, (56
C.F.R. Sec. 63798) as a human carcinogen, reproductive toxicant,
mutagen, or hazardous substance if ingested at levels that may be
present in the food;
(b) As of January 1, 2014, the state has identified as a high
priority chemical pursuant to chapter 70.240 RCW;
(c) As of January 1, 2014, the state of California has identified
as known to cause cancer or reproductive toxicity in the list developed
pursuant to section 25249.5 through 25249.13 of the California health
and safety code; or
(d) Is a chemical identified by the department upon consideration
of a petition pursuant to section 7(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 70.280 RCW
to read as follows:
All food containing the following chemicals must be labeled on the
packaging or at the point of display for retail sale with a notice that
the food contains a potential or known human carcinogen, reproductive
toxin, mutagen, or hazardous substance:
(1) A food additive that has not been tested and shown to be safe
for human consumption by the United States food and drug administration
pursuant to 21 U.S.C. chapter 9 as of January 1, 2014;
(2) A chemical that:
(a) As of January 1, 2014, the United States environmental
protection agency has identified under 42 U.S.C. chapter 103, the 2005
guidelines for carcinogen risk assessment published pursuant to 42
U.S.C. Sec. 7412(o)(7), the guidelines for reproductive toxicity risk
assessment published in the federal register on October 31, 1996, (61
C.F.R. Sec. 56274), or the guidelines for developmental toxicity risk
assessment published in the federal register on December 5, 1991, (56
C.F.R. Sec. 63798) as a human carcinogen, reproductive toxicant,
mutagen, or hazardous substance if ingested at levels that may be
present in the food;
(b) As of January 1, 2014, the state has identified as a high
priority chemical pursuant to chapter 70.240 RCW; or
(c) As of January 1, 2014, the state of California has identified
as known to cause cancer or reproductive toxicity in the list developed
pursuant to section 25249.5 through 25249.13 of the California health
and safety code; or
(3) A chemical identified by the department upon consideration of
a petition pursuant to section 7(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 70.280 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A person may submit a petition for consideration by the
department to add a chemical to the list of prohibited bisphenol A or
phthalate replacements in section 4(3) of this act based on scientific
evidence demonstrating harm or potential for harm from those chemicals.
The petition must provide the following information:
(i) Chemical abstracts service registry number;
(ii) Chemical prime name;
(iii) Whether the chemical is a hazardous substance as defined in
chapter 70.105 RCW; and
(iv) Credible peer-reviewed scientific information documenting the
potential carcinogenic, developmental, or reproductive harm posed by
the chemical; or, for a hazardous substance as defined in chapter
70.105 RCW, data indicating whether ingestion of food packaged in
packaging containing the substance will, under ordinary consumption,
result in exposures at concentrations exceeding clean-up action levels
established by the department pursuant to chapter 70.105D RCW or
maximum concentration limits established pursuant to the federal safe
drinking water act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 300f et seq.
(b) Upon review of a petition, if the department determines in
consultation with the department of health that a chemical has the
potential to cause reproductive harm, developmental harm, birth
defects, or is a possible or probable human carcinogen, and the risk of
excess lifetime cancer when ingested at levels likely to occur from
ordinary consumption over a person's lifetime, including childhood,
would be greater than one in one million, the department must add the
chemical to the list compiled pursuant to section 4(3) of this act of
prohibited replacements for bisphenol A and phthalates.
(c) The department must remove a chemical from the list of
prohibited food and food packaging contents created under section 4 of
this act if the chemical is used as a food additive and the United
States food and drug administration specifically finds that the
chemical has been tested and shown to be safe for human consumption
pursuant to 21 U.S.C. chapter 9 as of January 1, 2014. However, the
department may still require food or food packaging containing the
chemical to be labeled in accordance with sections 5 and 6 of this act.
(2)(a) A person may submit a petition for consideration by the
department to require labeling of any food additive pursuant to section
6 of this act or food packaging pursuant to section 5 of this act that
would be projected in the normal course of consumption of the food to
result in exposures to a carcinogen or hazardous substance at
concentrations above maximum concentration limits pursuant to the
federal safe drinking water act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 300f et seq.; or,
clean-up action levels established by the department pursuant to
chapter 70.105D RCW. The petition must provide the following
information:
(i) Chemical abstracts service registry number;
(ii) Chemical prime name;
(iii) Whether the chemical is a hazardous substance as defined in
chapter 70.105 RCW; and
(iv) Credible peer-reviewed scientific information documenting the
potential carcinogenic, developmental, or reproductive harm posed by
the chemical; or, for a hazardous substance as defined in chapter
70.105 RCW, data indicating whether ingestion of food packaged in
packaging containing the substance will, under ordinary consumption,
result in exposures at concentrations exceeding clean-up action levels
established by the department pursuant to chapter 70.105D RCW or
maximum concentration limits established pursuant to the federal safe
drinking water act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 300f et seq.
(b) Upon review of a petition, if the department determines in
consultation with the department of health that a chemical has the
potential to cause reproductive harm, developmental harm, birth
defects, or is a possible or probable human carcinogen, and the risk of
excess lifetime cancer when ingested at levels likely to occur from
ordinary consumption over a person's lifetime, including in children,
would be greater than one in one million, the department must require
labeling pursuant to section 5 or 6 of this act, and add the chemical
to the list compiled pursuant to section 4(3) of this act of prohibited
replacements for bisphenol A and phthalates.
(3) The department shall review petitions in accordance with RCW
34.05.330.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 70.280 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may adopt rules as necessary for the purpose of
implementing, administering, and enforcing this chapter. The
department may amend the rules from time to time to maintain
consistency with the lists of chemicals that: (1) The state of
California identifies as known to cause cancer or reproductive
toxicity; (2) the United States environmental protection agency
identifies as a human carcinogen, reproductive toxicant, mutagen, or
hazardous substance; or (3) the European commission identifies as a
category one endocrine disruptor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 4 through 7 of this act take effect
January 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---