BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.525.162 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 513 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Funds appropriated to the superintendent of public instruction
from the common school construction fund shall be allotted by the
superintendent of public instruction in accordance with this chapter.
(2) No allotment shall be made to a school district until such
district has provided local funds equal to or greater than the
difference between the total approved project cost and the amount of
state funding assistance to the district for financing the project
computed pursuant to RCW 28A.525.166, with the following exceptions:
(a) The superintendent of public instruction may waive the local
requirement for state funding assistance for districts which have
provided funds for school building construction purposes through the
authorization of bonds or through the authorization of excess tax
levies or both in an amount equivalent to two and one-half percent of
the value of its taxable property, as defined in RCW 39.36.015.
(b) No such local funds shall be required as a condition to the
allotment of funds from the state for the purpose of making major or
minor structural changes to existing school facilities in order to
bring such facilities into compliance with the barrier free access
requirements of section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of 1973
(29 U.S.C. Sec. 706) and rules implementing the act.
(3) For the purpose of computing the state funding assistance
percentage under RCW 28A.525.166 when a school district is granted
authority to enter into contracts, adjusted valuation per pupil shall
be calculated using headcount student enrollments from the most recent
October enrollment reports submitted by districts to the superintendent
of public instruction, adjusted as follows:
(a) In the case of projects for which local bonds were approved
after May 11, 1989:
(i) For districts which have been designated as serving high school
districts under RCW 28A.540.110, students residing in the nonhigh
district so designating shall be excluded from the enrollment count if
the student is enrolled in any grade level not offered by the nonhigh
district;
(ii) The enrollment of nonhigh school districts shall be increased
by the number of students residing within the district who are enrolled
in a serving high school district so designated by the nonhigh school
district under RCW 28A.540.110, including only students who are
enrolled in grade levels not offered by the nonhigh school district;
and
(iii) The number of preschool students with disabilities included
in the enrollment count shall be multiplied by one-half;
(b) In the case of construction or modernization of high school
facilities in districts serving students from nonhigh school districts,
the adjusted valuation per pupil shall be computed using the combined
adjusted valuations and enrollments of each district, each weighted by
the percentage of the district's resident high school students served
by the high school district;
(c) The number of kindergarten students included in the enrollment
count shall be counted as one headcount student; and
(d) The number of students residing outside the school district who
are enrolled in alternative learning experience courses under RCW
28A.232.010 shall be excluded from the total.
(4) In lieu of the exclusion in subsection (3)(d) of this section,
a district may submit an alternative calculation for excluding students
enrolled in alternative learning experience courses. The alternative
calculation must show the student headcount use of district classroom
facilities on a regular basis for a regular duration by out-of-district
alternative learning experience students subtracted by the headcount of
in-district alternative learning experience students not using district
classroom facilities on a regular basis for a reasonable duration. The
alternative calculation must be submitted in a form approved by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction must develop rules to define
"regular basis" and "reasonable duration."
(5) The superintendent of public instruction, considering policy
recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel,
shall prescribe such rules as are necessary to equate insofar as
possible the efforts made by school districts to provide capital funds
by the means aforesaid.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "preschool students with
disabilities" means children of preschool age who have developmental
disabilities who are entitled to services under RCW 28A.155.010 through
28A.155.100 and are not included in the kindergarten enrollment count
of the district.
(7)(a) School districts with student headcount enrollments of more
than forty-eight thousand, or with one or more geographic areas in
which enrollment growth in the prior five years, projected in the next
seven years, or a combination thereof, has resulted in, or will result
in, growth in enrollment which will exceed the student capacity of more
than four schools by greater than ten percent, may be divided by
geographic areas within the school district when calculating eligible
space for state funding assistance. School districts shall not have
more than four geographic areas.
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
create rules for the implementation of (a) of this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.525.166 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 514 are each
amended to read as follows:
Allocations to school districts of state funds provided by RCW
28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180 shall be made by the superintendent of
public instruction and the amount of state funding assistance to a
school district in financing a school plant project shall be determined
in the following manner:
(1) The boards of directors of the districts shall determine the
total cost of the proposed project, which cost may include the cost of
acquiring and preparing the site, the cost of constructing the building
or of acquiring a building and preparing the same for school use, the
cost of necessary equipment, taxes chargeable to the project, necessary
architects' fees, and a reasonable amount for contingencies and for
other necessary incidental expenses: PROVIDED, That the total cost of
the project shall be subject to review and approval by the
superintendent.
(2) The state funding assistance percentage for a school district
shall be computed by the following formula:
The ratio of the school district's adjusted valuation per pupil
divided by the ratio of the total state adjusted valuation per pupil
shall be subtracted from three, and then the result of the foregoing
shall be divided by three plus (the ratio of the school district's
adjusted valuation per pupil divided by the ratio of the total state
adjusted valuation per pupil).

District adjusted Total state

3-valuation ÷ adjusted valuation

Computed per pupil per pupil State

State
- % Funding

Ratio District adjusted Total state Assistance

3+valuation ÷ adjusted valuation

per pupil per pupil

PROVIDED, That in the event the state funding assistance percentage to
any school district based on the above formula is less than ((twenty))
thirty percent and such school district is otherwise eligible for state
funding assistance under RCW 28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180, the
superintendent may establish for such district a state funding
assistance percentage not in excess of ((twenty)) thirty percent of the
approved cost of the project, if the superintendent finds that such
additional assistance is necessary to provide minimum facilities for
housing the pupils of the district.
(3) In addition to the computed state funding assistance percentage
developed in subsection (2) of this section, a school district shall be
entitled to additional percentage points determined by the average
percentage of growth for the past three years. One percent shall be
added to the computed state funding assistance percentage for each
percent of growth, with a maximum of twenty percent.
(4) In computing the state funding assistance percentage in
subsection (2) of this section and adjusting the percentage under
subsection (3) of this section, students residing outside the school
district who are enrolled in alternative learning experience courses
under RCW 28A.232.010 shall be excluded from the count of total pupils.
In lieu of the exclusion in this subsection, a district may submit an
alternative calculation for excluding students enrolled in alternative
learning experience courses. The alternative calculation must show the
student headcount use of district classroom facilities on a regular
basis for a reasonable duration by out-of-district alternative learning
experience students subtracted by the headcount of in-district
alternative learning experience students not using district classroom
facilities on a regular basis for a reasonable duration. The
alternative calculation must be submitted in a form approved by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction must develop rules to define
"regular basis" and "reasonable duration."
(5) The approved cost of the project determined in the manner
prescribed in this section multiplied by the state funding assistance
percentage derived as provided for in this section shall be the amount
of state funding assistance to the district for the financing of the
project: PROVIDED, That need therefor has been established to the
satisfaction of the superintendent: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That additional
state funding assistance may be allowed if it is found by the
superintendent, considering policy recommendations from the school
facilities citizen advisory panel that such assistance is necessary in
order to meet (a) a school housing emergency resulting from the
destruction of a school building by fire, the condemnation of a school
building by properly constituted authorities, a sudden excessive and
clearly foreseeable future increase in school population, ((or)) other
conditions similarly emergent in nature, or a combination of increases
in student enrollment in the prior five-year period and projected
enrollments over the next seven years which has resulted in, or will
result in, four or more schools in the geographic area or entire
district exceeding capacity; or (b) a special school housing burden
resulting from projects of statewide significance or imposed by virtue
of the admission of nonresident students into educational programs
established, maintained and operated in conformity with the
requirements of law; or (c) a deficiency in the capital funds of the
district resulting from financing, subsequent to April 1, 1969, and
without benefit of the state funding assistance provided by prior state
assistance programs, the construction of a needed school building
project or projects approved in conformity with the requirements of
such programs, after having first applied for and been denied state
funding assistance because of the inadequacy of state funds available
for the purpose, or (d) a condition created by the fact that an
excessive number of students live in state owned housing, or (e) a need
for the construction of a school building to provide for improved
school district organization or racial balance, or (f) conditions
similar to those defined under (a), (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this
subsection, creating a like emergency.
(6) The omnibus appropriations act shall identify the state
construction cost allowance for school districts. The minimum
construction cost allowance shall be calculated based on a three-year
rolling average of actual new public K-12 school construction and
renovation costs per square foot, when the purpose of the renovations
are to increase capacity due to significant increases in enrollment
which have resulted in the schools in a geographic subarea of a
district exceeding capacity, or to meet class size reduction and full-day kindergarten goals established by the legislature pursuant to
chapter 236, Laws of 2010 (Substitute House Bill No. 2776) and as
ordered by the supreme court of Washington in McCleary v. State, No.
84362-7 (Wash. Jan. 9, 2014).
(7) The minimum state student space allocations shall be provided
as follows:
(a) One hundred ten square feet for students in kindergarten
through grade six;
(b) One hundred twenty-four square feet for students in grades
seven through eight;
(c) One hundred forty square feet for students in grades nine
through twelve; and
(d) One hundred forty-seven square feet for students with
disabilities in any grade.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The overcrowded schools and class size
reduction fund is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the fund
may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the fund may
only be used for grants to provide needed construction assistance to
support statewide implementation of full-day kindergarten and early
elementary class size reduction in districts, or a geographic portion
of a district pursuant to RCW 28A.525.162, where a combination of
increases in student enrollment in the prior five-year period and
projected enrollments over the next seven years which has resulted in,
or will result in, four or more schools in the geographic area or
entire district exceeding capacity of the school buildings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---