BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may enter into agreements with the Oregon state
department of transportation and the British Columbia ministry of
transportation and infrastructure to:
(a) Develop a plan to document the shared vision, goals, and
objectives for passenger rail service within the Cascade rail corridor;
(b) Develop a plan to achieve performance goals, manage fleet
assets, share costs, prioritize investments, and resolve interagency
disputes;
(c) Propose funding options to the respective legislative bodies to
support the operation of passenger trains within the Cascade rail
corridor;
(d) Develop a stakeholder outreach program;
(e) Oversee operations and marketing of daily passenger rail
service in the Cascade rail corridor;
(f) Seek federal funding opportunities;
(g) Implement efficiency improvements for passenger rail service in
the Cascade rail corridor; and
(h) Manage costs and identify opportunities for cost reduction and
develop priorities that will generate the best value for Washington
state.
(2) The department may enter into agreements with the Oregon state
department of transportation to coordinate state rail plans. The
department must report to the transportation committees of the
legislature regarding:
(a) The status of agreements with the Oregon state department of
transportation and the British Columbia ministry of transportation and
infrastructure regarding the Cascade rail corridor;
(b) The performance of passenger rail service in the Cascade rail
corridor; and
(c) The status of accomplishing the goals set out in subsection
(1)(a) through (f) of this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "Cascade rail corridor" means
the rail lines that lie west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range
and may support passenger rail service.

--- END ---