BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that
Washingtonians are early adopters of technology and have come to rely
on services provided by mobile application-based personal
transportation services. The legislature further finds that a
piecemeal approach to regulating such services could result in a
patchwork of conflicting standards, stifle innovation, and reduce
consumer choice. Finally, the legislature finds that the safety of the
users of such services must be made a priority. Therefore, the
legislature intends to study the market for personal transportation
services, including those that rely on use of a mobile application,
with an aim to adopt a statewide regulatory framework during the 2015
legislative session.
(2) The joint transportation committee must convene a work group to
study the use of personal transportation services, including for-hire
vehicles, taxicabs, limousines, and mobile application-based personal
transportation services. The committee must work with the department
of licensing, the office of the insurance commissioner, and the
employment security department to determine how those agencies
currently regulate personal transportation services and how they may
play a role in any future regulatory framework. The committee must
also work with stakeholders representing (a) owners, operators, and
users of personal transportation services, (b) mobile application
technology developers, and (c) local authorities.
(3) The committee must study the industry of providing
transportation for compensation, including the following:
(a) Insurance coverage and policy requirements to own and operate
a vehicle providing transportation for compensation;
(b) Safety regulations, including those related to vehicles or
drivers, that apply to vehicles used to provide transportation for
compensation;
(c) The impact of the regulation of such services by local
governments, including cities, counties, and port districts; and
(d) Barriers faced by taxicab operators, including local caps on
licenses, lease and meter rates, and enforcement of rules regarding
other transportation services.
(4) The committee must also provide recommendations regarding
legislative changes that would benefit the public by encouraging
additional transportation options, increased transparency, enhanced
safety, and options for statewide regulatory frameworks.
(5) By December 31, 2014, the committee must provide a report to
the transportation committees of the legislature summarizing the study
and recommendations required by this section.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2015.

--- END ---