BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.160 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1003 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) On or before the twenty-fifth day of each month, all taxes
collected under RCW 82.08.150 during the preceding month must be
remitted to the state department of revenue, to be deposited with the
state treasurer. Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4)
of this section, upon receipt of such moneys the state treasurer must
credit sixty-five percent of the sums collected and remitted under RCW
82.08.150 (1) and (2) and one hundred percent of the sums collected and
remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (3) and (4) to the state general fund and
thirty-five percent of the sums collected and remitted under RCW
82.08.150 (1) and (2) to a fund which is hereby created to be known as
the "liquor excise tax fund."
(2) During the 2012 fiscal year, 66.19 percent of the sums
collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) must be
deposited in the state general fund and the remainder collected and
remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) must be deposited in the
liquor excise tax fund.
(3) During fiscal year 2013, all funds collected under RCW
82.08.150 (1), (2), (3), and (4) must be deposited into the state
general fund.
(4) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, ((eighty two)) seventy-seven and one-half percent of the sums collected and remitted under RCW
82.08.150 (1) and (2) must be deposited in the state general fund and
the remainder collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2)
must be deposited in the liquor excise tax fund. The legislature
intends for the amendments in section 1, chapter . . ., Laws of 2014
(this act) to be curative, clarifying, and remedial and to apply
retroactively to July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---