BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This section is the tax preference
performance statement for the tax preference contained in this act.
This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent
evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a
private right of action by any party or be used to determine
eligibility for preferential tax treatment.
(1) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended
to improve industry competitiveness and create or retain jobs, as
indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2) (b) and (c).
(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to
foster the growth of start-ups and job creating businesses in the area
of professional information technology services. It is the
legislature's intent to provide a preferential business and occupation
tax rate for professional information technology services in counties
that include a federal naval base in order to reduce the operating
costs for professional information technology service businesses in
these areas, thereby increasing the ability of these businesses to
expand operations in Washington, diversifying the tax base and the job
opportunities in these areas, improving the competitiveness of the
professional information technology industry, and increasing the number
of jobs in the professional information technology industry in
Washington.
(3) If a review by the joint legislative audit and review committee
finds that the number of jobs in the professional information
technology service industry in counties that include a federal naval
installation has increased by fifteen percent compared to the number of
jobs in the industry at the time of enactment of this act, or if the
committee finds that the number of professional information technology
service businesses in counties that include a federal naval base has
increased by fifteen percent compared to the number of those businesses
at the time of enactment, then the legislature intends to extend the
expiration date of the tax preference.
(4) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in
subsection (3) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review
committee may refer to:
(a) The annual survey a taxpayer reporting under the tax preference
in this act must file with the department of revenue per RCW 82.32.585;
(b) Occupational data compiled by the federal bureau of labor
statistics; and
(c) Employment data available from the employment security
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the provision
of information technology services where such service is apportioned,
as provided under RCW 82.04.462(3)(b), to a county in which a naval
base is located; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect
to such activities is equal to the gross income of such business
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Information technology services" means: (i) Writing,
modifying, testing, and supporting software to meet the needs of a
particular customer; (ii) planning and designing computer systems that
integrate computer hardware, software, and communication technologies;
(iii) on-site management and operation of clients' computer systems
and/or data processing facilities; and (iv) other professional and
technical computer-related advice and services.
(b) "Naval base" means a base, camp, post, station, yard, center,
or other area under the jurisdiction of the secretary of defense that
is used for naval operations.
(3) A person claiming to be subject to the preferential tax rate
provided in this section must file an annual survey as provided in RCW
82.32.585.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2024.

--- END ---