BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes the
importance of ensuring the collection of taxes on the production,
processing, and sale of recreational marijuana. The legislature
further recognizes that a system must be created by the liquor control
board to establish the most efficient and secure mechanism for the
collection and tracking of such taxes for both state and industry that:
(a) Provides an efficient single collection point for recreational
marijuana taxes that ensures all revenue is collected in the most
appropriate and effective manner possible;
(b) Provides ease of administration and regulation; and
(c) Requires the liquor control board to select and implement the
most secure, convenient, and effective taxing and tracking system as
quickly as possible.
(2) The legislature further finds that the state would benefit from
having the taxing and tracking system created under this act be
operational prior to the date that the first sale of recreational
marijuana occurs in this state; and therefore, declares that such
system should be developed and implemented as soon as possible to
ensure efficient and effective tax collection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---