BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.48 RCW
to read as follows:
Subject to the applicable conditions set forth in RCW 74.48.060 the
department shall:
(1) Require that health care service contractors participating in
the Washington medicaid integration partnership or the medicare
integration project, or both, as described in section 201(3) (a) and
(b), chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess., compensate nursing facility
medicaid rates, at a minimum, as follows:
(a) It is the intent of the legislature that savings under the
integration project be achieved through shifts in utilization, and
reducing rehospitalization rates and not through reduced reimbursement
rates to providers;
(b) Health care service contractors shall pay nursing facilities
providing postacute skilled and rehabilitation care or long-term and
chronic care rates that reflect the different levels of services and
intensity required to provide these services;
(c) For the purposes of determining the appropriate rate for the
type of care identified in (b) of this subsection, the health care
service contractor shall pay no less than the recognized rates under
medicare and medicaid for these service types. Health care service
contractors shall not combine medicare and medicaid rates in order to
establish a single rate for dual eligible beneficiaries requiring
skilled nursing services.
(2) Ensure that nursing facilities receive the full benefit of all
disbursements made pursuant to RCW 74.48.020(4) (a), (b), (c), and (f),
including pass-throughs, rate add-ons, and rate enhancements. Health
care service contractors participating in the Washington medicaid
integration partnership and the medicare integration project, as
described in section 201(3) (a) and (b), chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd
sp. sess., contracting with nursing facilities shall pay all
disbursements made pursuant to RCW 74.48.020(4) (a), (b), (c), and (f),
to nursing facilities.
(3) Require managed care organizations or health care service
contractors participating in the Washington medicaid integration
partnership and the medicare integration project, as described in
section 201(3) (a) and (b), chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess., to
demonstrate compliance with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Health care service contractors participating in the Washington
medicaid integration partnership or the medicare integration project,
or both, as described in section 201(3) (a) and (b), chapter 4, Laws of
2013 2nd sp. sess., shall compensate nursing facility medicaid rates,
at a minimum, as follows:
(a) It is the intent of the legislature that savings under the
integration project be achieved through shifts in utilization, and
reducing rehospitalization rates and not through reduced reimbursement
rates to providers;
(b) Health care service contractors shall pay nursing facilities
providing postacute skilled and rehabilitation care or long-term and
chronic care rates that reflect the different levels of services and
intensity required to provide these services;
(c) For the purposes of determining the appropriate rate for the
type of care identified in (b) of this subsection, the health care
service contractor shall pay no less than the recognized rates under
medicare and medicaid for these service types. Health care service
contractors shall not combine medicare and medicaid rates in order to
establish a single rate for dual eligible beneficiaries requiring
skilled nursing services;
(d) The cost of allowable services and ancillary charges not
included in the nursing facility rates established in this chapter, or
paid through another mechanism as identified by the published state
medicaid fee schedule, medicaid state plan, or other source may not be
included in the rates paid to the nursing facility; and
(e) Service rate add-ons may be paid to nursing facilities for
services or populations not compensated for under this chapter.
(2) Health care service contractors participating in the Washington
medicaid integration partnership and the medicare integration project,
as described in section 201(3) (a) and (b), chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd
sp. sess., shall contract with all willing medicaid certified nursing
facilities. Nursing facilities contracted under this section may not
be terminated unless the nursing facility is terminated from the
medicare or medicaid program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Health care service contractors participating in the Washington
medicaid integration partnership or the medicare integration project,
or both, as described in section 201(3) (a) and (b), chapter 4, Laws of
2013 2nd sp. sess., shall compensate assisted living, adult residential
care, and enhanced adult residential care provider medicaid rates, at
a minimum, as follows:
(a) Assisted living, adult residential care, and enhanced adult
residential care providers' medicaid rates must be paid at rates equal
to or greater than those rates established according to RCW 74.39A.030;
(b) The cost of allowable services and ancillary charges not
included in the rates established according to this chapter, or paid
through another mechanism as identified by the published state medicaid
fee schedule, medicaid state plan, or other source may not be included
in the rates described in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Service rate add-ons may be paid to assisted living, adult
residential care, and enhanced adult residential care providers for
services or populations not compensated for under the rates established
according to this chapter.
(2) Health care service contractors participating in the Washington
medicaid integration partnership or the medicare integration project,
or both, as described in section 201(3) (a) and (b), chapter 4, Laws of
2013 2nd sp. sess., shall contract with all willing assisted living,
adult residential care, and enhanced adult residential care providers
contracted to provide medicaid services. Providers contracted under
this section may not be terminated unless the provider is terminated
from the medicaid program.

--- END ---