BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The office of financial management shall
review employee classification practices and policies for exempt and
civil service positions at the state universities, regional
universities, and the state college, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, and
identify inequities that result in employees performing similar work
and assigned to significantly different classifications and pay scales
at different institutions of higher education. The review shall not
include policies and practices for classification of faculty.
The office of financial management shall report its findings to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December
1, 2014.

--- END ---