BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.60.030 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 17 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Upon satisfaction of the conditions in RCW 74.60.150(1), and
so long as the conditions in RCW 74.60.150(2) have not occurred, an
assessment is imposed as set forth in this subsection, effective ((July
1, 2013. The authority shall calculate the amount due annually and
shall issue assessments quarterly for one-fourth)) October 1, 2013.
Initial assessment notices must be sent to each hospital not earlier
than thirty days after satisfaction of the conditions in RCW
74.60.150(1). Payment is due not sooner than thirty days thereafter.
Except for the initial assessment, notices must be sent on or about
thirty days prior to the end of each quarter and payment is due thirty
days thereafter.
(b) Effective October 1, 2013, and except as provided in RCW
74.60.050:
(i) For fiscal year 2014, an annual assessment for amounts
determined as described in (b)(ii) through (iv) of this subsection is
imposed for the time period of October 1, 2013, through June 30, 2014.
The initial assessment notice must cover amounts due from October 1,
2013, through either: (A) The end of the calendar quarter prior to the
satisfaction of the conditions in RCW 74.60.150(1) if federal approval
is received more than forty-five days prior to the end of a quarter; or
(B) the end of the calendar quarter after the satisfaction of the
conditions in RCW 74.60.150(1) if federal approval is received within
forty-five days of the end of a quarter. For subsequent assessments
during fiscal year 2014, the authority shall calculate the amount due
annually and shall issue assessments for the appropriate proportion of
the annual amount due from each hospital((. Initial assessment notices
must be sent to each hospital not earlier than thirty days after
satisfaction of the conditions in RCW 74.60.150(1) and must include all
amounts due from and after July 1, 2013. Payment is due not sooner
than thirty days thereafter. Subsequent notices must be sent on or
about thirty days prior to the end of each subsequent quarter and
payment is due thirty days thereafter.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2013, and except as provided in RCW
74.60.050:
(i)));
(ii) After the assessments described in (b)(i) of this subsection,
each prospective payment system hospital, except psychiatric and
rehabilitation hospitals, shall pay a quarterly assessment. Each
quarterly assessment shall be one quarter of three hundred forty-four
dollars for each annual nonmedicare hospital inpatient day, up to a
maximum of fifty-four thousand days per year. For each nonmedicare
hospital inpatient day in excess of fifty-four thousand days, each
prospective payment system hospital shall pay an assessment of one
quarter of seven dollars for each such day;
(((ii))) (iii) After the assessments described in (b)(i) of this
subsection, each critical access hospital shall pay a quarterly
assessment of one quarter of ten dollars for each annual nonmedicare
hospital inpatient day;
(((iii))) (iv) After the assessments described in (b)(i) of this
subsection, each psychiatric hospital shall pay a quarterly assessment
of one quarter of sixty-seven dollars for each annual nonmedicare
hospital inpatient day; and
(((iv))) (v) After the assessments described in (b)(i) of this
subsection, each rehabilitation hospital shall pay a quarterly
assessment of one quarter of sixty-seven dollars for each annual
nonmedicare hospital inpatient day.
(2) The authority shall determine each hospital's annual
nonmedicare hospital inpatient days by summing the total reported
nonmedicare hospital inpatient days for each hospital that is not
exempt from the assessment under RCW 74.60.040, taken from the
hospital's 2552 cost report data file or successor data file available
through the centers for medicare and medicaid services, as of a date to
be determined by the authority. For state fiscal year 2014, the
authority shall use cost report data for hospitals' fiscal years ending
in 2010. For subsequent years, the hospitals' next succeeding fiscal
year cost report data must be used.
(a) With the exception of a prospective payment system hospital
commencing operations after January 1, 2009, for any hospital without
a cost report for the relevant fiscal year, the authority shall work
with the affected hospital to identify appropriate supplemental
information that may be used to determine annual nonmedicare hospital
inpatient days.
(b) A prospective payment system hospital commencing operations
after January 1, 2009, must be assessed in accordance with this section
after becoming an eligible new prospective payment system hospital as
defined in RCW 74.60.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.60.120 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 17 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in state fiscal year 2014, commencing thirty days
after satisfaction of the applicable conditions in RCW 74.60.150(1),
and for the period of state fiscal years 2014 through 2019, the
authority shall make supplemental payments directly to Washington
hospitals, separately for inpatient and outpatient fee-for-service
medicaid services, as follows:
(a) For inpatient fee-for-service payments for prospective payment
hospitals other than psychiatric or rehabilitation hospitals, twenty-nine million two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars per state fiscal
year in fiscal years 2014 and 2015, and then amounts reduced in equal
increments per fiscal year until the supplemental payment amount is
zero by July 1, 2019, from the fund, plus federal matching funds;
(b) For outpatient fee-for-service payments for prospective payment
hospitals other than psychiatric or rehabilitation hospitals, thirty
million dollars per state fiscal year in fiscal years 2014 and 2015,
and then amounts reduced in equal increments per fiscal year until the
supplemental payment amount is zero by July 1, 2019, from the fund,
plus federal matching funds;
(c) For inpatient fee-for-service payments for psychiatric
hospitals, six hundred twenty-five thousand dollars per state fiscal
year in fiscal years 2014 and 2015, and then amounts reduced in equal
increments per fiscal year until the supplemental payment amount is
zero by July 1, 2019, from the fund, plus federal matching funds;
(d) For inpatient fee-for-service payments for rehabilitation
hospitals, one hundred fifty thousand dollars per state fiscal year in
fiscal years 2014 and 2015, and then amounts reduced in equal
increments per fiscal year until the supplemental payment amount is
zero by July 1, 2019, from the fund, plus federal matching funds;
(e) For inpatient fee-for-service payments for border hospitals,
two hundred fifty thousand dollars per state fiscal year in fiscal
years 2014 and 2015, and then amounts reduced in equal increments per
fiscal year until the supplemental payment amount is zero by July 1,
2019, from the fund, plus federal matching funds; and
(f) For outpatient fee-for-service payments for border hospitals,
two hundred fifty thousand dollars per state fiscal year in fiscal
years 2014 and 2015, and then amounts reduced in equal increments per
fiscal year until the supplemental payment amount is zero by July 1,
2019, from the fund, plus federal matching funds.
(2) If the amount of inpatient or outpatient payments under
subsection (1) of this section, when combined with federal matching
funds, exceeds the upper payment limit, payments to each category of
hospital must be reduced proportionately to a level where the total
payment amount is consistent with the upper payment limit. Funds under
this chapter unable to be paid to hospitals under this section because
of the upper payment limit must be paid to managed care organizations
under RCW 74.60.130, subject to the limitations in this chapter.
(3) The amount of such fee-for-service inpatient payments to
individual hospitals within each of the categories identified in
subsection (1)(a), (c), (d), and (e) of this section must be determined
by:
(a) Applying the medicaid fee-for-service rates in effect on July
1, 2009, without regard to the increases required by chapter 30, Laws
of 2010 1st sp. sess. to each hospital's inpatient fee-for-services
claims and medicaid managed care encounter data for the base year;
(b) Applying the medicaid fee-for-service rates in effect on July
1, 2009, without regard to the increases required by chapter 30, Laws
of 2010 1st sp. sess. to all hospitals' inpatient fee-for-services
claims and medicaid managed care encounter data for the base year; and
(c) Using the amounts calculated under (a) and (b) of this
subsection to determine an individual hospital's percentage of the
total amount to be distributed to each category of hospital.
(4) The amount of such fee-for-service outpatient payments to
individual hospitals within each of the categories identified in
subsection (1)(b) and (f) of this section must be determined by:
(a) Applying the medicaid fee-for-service rates in effect on July
1, 2009, without regard to the increases required by chapter 30, Laws
of 2010 1st sp. sess. to each hospital's outpatient fee-for-services
claims and medicaid managed care encounter data for the base year;
(b) Applying the medicaid fee-for-service rates in effect on July
1, 2009, without regard to the increases required by chapter 30, Laws
of 2010 1st sp. sess. to all hospitals' outpatient fee-for-services
claims and medicaid managed care encounter data for the base year; and
(c) Using the amounts calculated under (a) and (b) of this
subsection to determine an individual hospital's percentage of the
total amount to be distributed to each category of hospital.
(5) Thirty days before the initial payments and sixty days before
the first payment in each subsequent fiscal year, the authority shall
provide each hospital and the Washington state hospital association
with an explanation of how the amounts due to each hospital under this
section were calculated.
(6) Payments must be made in quarterly installments on or about the
last day of every quarter((, except that)). The initial payment must
be made within thirty days after satisfaction of the conditions in RCW
74.60.150(1) and must include all amounts due from July 1, 2013, to
((the date of the initial payment)) either: (a) The end of the
calendar quarter prior to when the conditions in RCW 70.60.150(1) are
satisfied if approval is received more than forty-five days prior to
the end of a quarter; or (b) the end of the calendar quarter after the
satisfaction of the conditions in RCW 74.60.150(1) if approval is
received within forty-five days of the end of a quarter.
(7) A prospective payment system hospital commencing operations
after January 1, 2009, is eligible to receive payments in accordance
with this section after becoming an eligible new prospective payment
system hospital as defined in RCW 74.60.010.
(8) Payments under this section are supplemental to all other
payments and do not reduce any other payments to hospitals.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.60.130 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 17 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) For state fiscal year 2014, commencing within thirty days after
satisfaction of the conditions in RCW 74.60.150(1) and subsection (6)
of this section, and for the period of state fiscal years 2014 through
2019, the authority shall increase capitation payments to managed care
organizations by an amount at least equal to the amount available from
the fund after deducting disbursements authorized by RCW 74.60.020(4)
(c) through (f) and payments required by RCW 74.60.080 through
74.60.120. The capitation payment under this subsection must be no
less than one hundred fifty-three million one hundred thirty-one
thousand six hundred dollars per state fiscal year in fiscal years 2014
and 2015, and then the increased capitation payment amounts are reduced
in equal increments per fiscal year until the increased capitation
payment amount is zero by July 1, 2019, plus the maximum available
amount of federal matching funds. The initial payment following
satisfaction of the conditions in RCW 74.60.150(1) must include all
amounts due from July 1, 2013, to the end of the calendar month during
which the conditions in RCW 74.60.150(1) are satisfied. Subsequent
payments shall be made ((quarterly)) monthly.
(2) In fiscal years 2015, 2016, and 2017, the authority shall use
any additional federal matching funds for the increased managed care
capitation payments under subsection (1) of this section available from
medicaid expansion under the federal patient protection and affordable
care act to substitute for assessment funds which otherwise would have
been used to pay managed care plans under this section.
(3) Payments to individual managed care organizations shall be
determined by the authority based on each organization's or network's
enrollment relative to the anticipated total enrollment in each program
for the fiscal year in question, the anticipated utilization of
hospital services by an organization's or network's medicaid enrollees,
and such other factors as are reasonable and appropriate to ensure that
purposes of this chapter are met.
(4) If the federal government determines that total payments to
managed care organizations under this section exceed what is permitted
under applicable medicaid laws and regulations, payments must be
reduced to levels that meet such requirements, and the balance
remaining must be applied as provided in RCW 74.60.050. Further, in
the event a managed care organization is legally obligated to repay
amounts distributed to hospitals under this section to the state or
federal government, a managed care organization may recoup the amount
it is obligated to repay under the medicaid program from individual
hospitals by not more than the amount of overpayment each hospital
received from that managed care organization.
(5) Payments under this section do not reduce the amounts that
otherwise would be paid to managed care organizations: PROVIDED, That
such payments are consistent with actuarial soundness certification and
enrollment.
(6) Before making such payments, the authority shall require
medicaid managed care organizations to comply with the following
requirements:
(a) All payments to managed care organizations under this chapter
must be expended for hospital services provided by Washington
hospitals, which for purposes of this section includes psychiatric and
rehabilitation hospitals, in a manner consistent with the purposes and
provisions of this chapter, and must be equal to all increased
capitation payments under this section received by the organization or
network, consistent with actuarial certification and enrollment, less
an allowance for any estimated premium taxes the organization is
required to pay under Title 48 RCW associated with the payments under
this chapter;
(b) ((Before the end of the quarter in which funds are paid to
them,)) Managed care organizations shall expend the increased
capitation payments under this section in a manner consistent with the
purposes of this chapter, with the initial expenditures to hospitals to
be made within thirty days of receipt of payment from the authority.
Subsequent expenditures by the managed care plans are to be made before
the end of the quarter in which funds are received from the authority;
(c) Providing that any delegation or attempted delegation of an
organization's or network's obligations under agreements with the
authority do not relieve the organization or network of its obligations
under this section and related contract provisions.
(7) No hospital or managed care organizations may use the payments
under this section to gain advantage in negotiations.
(8) No hospital has a claim or cause of action against a managed
care organization for monetary compensation based on the amount of
payments under subsection (6) of this section.
(9) If funds cannot be used to pay for services in accordance with
this chapter the managed care organization or network must return the
funds to the authority which shall return them to the hospital safety
net assessment fund.

--- END ---