BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.60.005 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 17 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The purpose of this chapter is to provide for a safety net
assessment on certain Washington hospitals, which will be used solely
to augment funding from all other sources and thereby support
additional payments to hospitals for medicaid services as specified in
this chapter.
(2) The legislature finds that federal health care reform will
result in an expansion of medicaid enrollment in this state and an
increase in federal financial participation. ((As a result, the
hospital safety net assessment and hospital safety net assessment fund
created in this chapter will begin phasing down over a four-year period
beginning in fiscal year 2016 as federal medicaid expansion is fully
implemented. The state will end its reliance on the assessment and the
fund by the end of fiscal year 2019.))
(3) In adopting this chapter, it is the intent of the legislature:
(a) To impose a hospital safety net assessment to be used solely
for the purposes specified in this chapter;
(b) To generate approximately four hundred forty-six million three
hundred thirty-eight thousand dollars per state fiscal year ((in fiscal
years 2014 and 2015, and then phasing down in equal increments to zero
by the end of fiscal year 2019,)) in new state and federal funds by
disbursing all of that amount to pay for medicaid hospital services and
grants to certified public expenditure hospitals, except costs of
administration as specified in this chapter, in the form of additional
payments to hospitals and managed care plans, which may not be a
substitute for payments from other sources;
(c) To generate one hundred ninety-nine million eight hundred
thousand dollars ((in the 2013-2015)) per biennium((, phasing down to
zero by the end of the 2017-2019 biennium,)) in new funds to be used in
lieu of state general fund payments for medicaid hospital services;
(d) That the total amount assessed not exceed the amount needed, in
combination with all other available funds, to support the payments
authorized by this chapter; and
(e) To condition the assessment on receiving federal approval for
receipt of additional federal financial participation and on
continuation of other funding sufficient to maintain aggregate payment
levels to hospitals for inpatient and outpatient services covered by
medicaid, including fee-for-service and managed care, at least at the
levels the state paid for those services on July 1, 2009, as adjusted
for current enrollment and utilization, but without regard to payment
increases resulting from chapter 30, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.60.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 17 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A dedicated fund is hereby established within the state
treasury to be known as the hospital safety net assessment fund. The
purpose and use of the fund shall be to receive and disburse funds,
together with accrued interest, in accordance with this chapter.
Moneys in the fund, including interest earned, shall not be used or
disbursed for any purposes other than those specified in this chapter.
Any amounts expended from the fund that are later recouped by the
authority on audit or otherwise shall be returned to the fund. (((a)))
Any unexpended balance in the fund at the end of a fiscal biennium
shall carry over into the following biennium and shall be applied to
reduce the amount of the assessment under RCW 74.60.050(1)(c).
(((b) Any amounts remaining in the fund after July 1, 2019, shall
be refunded to hospitals, pro rata according to the amount paid by the
hospital since July 1, 2013, subject to the limitations of federal
law.))
(2) All assessments, interest, and penalties collected by the
authority under RCW 74.60.030 and 74.60.050 shall be deposited into the
fund.
(3) Disbursements from the fund are conditioned upon appropriation
and the continued availability of other funds sufficient to maintain
aggregate payment levels to hospitals for inpatient and outpatient
services covered by medicaid, including fee-for-service and managed
care, at least at the levels the state paid for those services on July
1, 2009, as adjusted for current enrollment and utilization, but
without regard to payment increases resulting from chapter 30, Laws of
2010 1st sp. sess.
(4) Disbursements from the fund may be made only:
(a) To make payments to hospitals and managed care plans as
specified in this chapter;
(b) To refund erroneous or excessive payments made by hospitals
pursuant to this chapter;
(c) For one million dollars per biennium for payment of
administrative expenses incurred by the authority in performing the
activities authorized by this chapter;
(d) For one hundred ninety-nine million eight hundred thousand
dollars ((in the 2013-2015)) per biennium((, phasing down to zero by
the end of the 2017-2019 biennium)) to be used in lieu of state general
fund payments for medicaid hospital services, provided that if the full
amount of the payments required under RCW 74.60.120 and 74.60.130
cannot be distributed in a given fiscal year, this amount must be
reduced proportionately;
(e) To repay the federal government for any excess payments made to
hospitals from the fund if the assessments or payment increases set
forth in this chapter are deemed out of compliance with federal
statutes and regulations in a final determination by a court of
competent jurisdiction with all appeals exhausted. In such a case, the
authority may require hospitals receiving excess payments to refund the
payments in question to the fund. The state in turn shall return funds
to the federal government in the same proportion as the original
financing. If a hospital is unable to refund payments, the state shall
develop either a payment plan, or deduct moneys from future medicaid
payments, or both;
(f) Beginning in state fiscal year 2015, to pay an amount
sufficient, when combined with the maximum available amount of federal
funds necessary to provide a one percent increase in medicaid hospital
inpatient rates to hospitals eligible for quality improvement
incentives under RCW 74.09.611.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.60.050 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 17 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The authority, in cooperation with the office of financial
management, shall develop rules for determining the amount to be
assessed to individual hospitals, notifying individual hospitals of the
assessed amount, and collecting the amounts due. Such rule making
shall specifically include provision for:
(a) Transmittal of notices of assessment by the authority to each
hospital informing the hospital of its nonmedicare hospital inpatient
days and the assessment amount due and payable;
(b) Interest on delinquent assessments at the rate specified in RCW
82.32.050; and
(c) Adjustment of the assessment amounts in accordance with
subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(2) For state fiscal year 2015, the assessment amounts established
under RCW 74.60.030 must be adjusted as follows:
(a) If sufficient other funds, including federal funds, are
available to make the payments required under this chapter and fund the
state portion of the quality incentive payments under RCW 74.09.611 and
74.60.020(4)(f) without utilizing the full assessment under RCW
74.60.030, the authority shall reduce the amount of the assessment to
the minimum levels necessary to support those payments;
(b) If the total amount of inpatient or outpatient supplemental
payments under RCW 74.60.120 is in excess of the upper payment limit
and the entire excess amount cannot be disbursed by additional payments
to managed care organizations under RCW 74.60.130, the authority shall
proportionately reduce future assessments on prospective payment
hospitals to the level necessary to generate additional payments to
hospitals that are consistent with the upper payment limit plus the
maximum permissible amount of additional payments to managed care
organizations under RCW 74.60.130;
(c) If the amount of payments to managed care organizations under
RCW 74.60.130 cannot be distributed because of failure to meet federal
actuarial soundness or utilization requirements or other federal
requirements, the authority shall apply the amount that cannot be
distributed to reduce future assessments to the level necessary to
generate additional payments to managed care organizations that are
consistent with federal actuarial soundness or utilization requirements
or other federal requirements;
(d) If required in order to obtain federal matching funds, the
maximum number of nonmedicare inpatient days at the higher rate
provided under RCW 74.60.030(1)(b)(((i))) (ii) may be adjusted in order
to comply with federal requirements;
(e) If the number of nonmedicare inpatient days applied to the
rates provided in RCW 74.60.030 will not produce sufficient funds to
support the payments required under this chapter and the state portion
of the quality incentive payments under RCW 74.09.611 and
74.60.020(4)(f), the assessment rates provided in RCW 74.60.030 may be
increased proportionately by category of hospital to amounts no greater
than necessary in order to produce the required level of funds needed
to make the payments specified in this chapter and the state portion of
the quality incentive payments under RCW 74.09.611 and 74.60.020(4)(f);
and
(f) Any actual or estimated surplus remaining in the fund at the
end of the fiscal year must be applied to reduce the assessment amount
for the subsequent fiscal year.
(3) For each fiscal year after June 30, 2015, the assessment
amounts established under RCW 74.60.030 must be adjusted as follows:
(a) ((In order to support the payments required in this chapter,
the assessment amounts must be reduced in approximately equal yearly
increments each fiscal year by category of hospital until the
assessment amount is zero by July 1, 2019;
(b))) If sufficient other funds, including federal funds, are
available to make the payments required under this chapter and fund the
state portion of the quality incentive payments under RCW 74.09.611 and
74.60.020(4)(f) without utilizing the full assessment under RCW
74.60.030, the authority shall reduce the amount of the assessment to
the minimum levels necessary to support those payments;
(((c))) (b) If in any fiscal year the total amount of inpatient or
outpatient supplemental payments under RCW 74.60.120 is in excess of
the upper payment limit and the entire excess amount cannot be
disbursed by additional payments to managed care organizations under
RCW 74.60.130, the authority shall proportionately reduce future
assessments on prospective payment hospitals to the level necessary to
generate additional payments to hospitals that are consistent with the
upper payment limit plus the maximum permissible amount of additional
payments to managed care organizations under RCW 74.60.130;
(((d))) (c) If the amount of payments to managed care organizations
under RCW 74.60.130 cannot be distributed because of failure to meet
federal actuarial soundness or utilization requirements or other
federal requirements, the authority shall apply the amount that cannot
be distributed to reduce future assessments to the level necessary to
generate additional payments to managed care organizations that are
consistent with federal actuarial soundness or utilization requirements
or other federal requirements;
(((e))) (d) If required in order to obtain federal matching funds,
the maximum number of nonmedicare inpatient days at the higher rate
provided under RCW 74.60.030(1)(b)(((i))) (ii) may be adjusted in order
to comply with federal requirements;
(((f))) (e) If the number of nonmedicare inpatient days applied to
the rates provided in RCW 74.60.030 will not produce sufficient funds
to support the payments required under this chapter and the state
portion of the quality incentive payments under RCW 74.09.611 and
74.60.020(4)(f), the assessment rates provided in RCW 74.60.030 may be
increased proportionately by category of hospital to amounts no greater
than necessary in order to produce the required level of funds needed
to make the payments specified in this chapter and the state portion of
the quality incentive payments under RCW 74.09.611 and 74.60.020(4)(f);
and
(((g))) (f) Any actual or estimated surplus remaining in the fund
at the end of the fiscal year must be applied to reduce the assessment
amount for the subsequent fiscal year.
(4)(a) Any adjustment to the assessment amounts pursuant to this
section, and the data supporting such adjustment, including, but not
limited to, relevant data listed in (b) of this subsection, must be
submitted to the Washington state hospital association for review and
comment at least sixty calendar days prior to implementation of such
adjusted assessment amounts. Any review and comment provided by the
Washington state hospital association does not limit the ability of the
Washington state hospital association or its members to challenge an
adjustment or other action by the authority that is not made in
accordance with this chapter.
(b) The authority shall provide the following data to the
Washington state hospital association sixty days before implementing
any revised assessment levels, detailed by fiscal year, beginning with
fiscal year 2011 and extending to the most recent fiscal year, except
in connection with the initial assessment under this chapter:
(i) The fund balance;
(ii) The amount of assessment paid by each hospital;
(iii) The state share, federal share, and total annual medicaid
fee-for-service payments for inpatient hospital services made to each
hospital under RCW 74.60.120, and the data used to calculate the
payments to individual hospitals under that section;
(iv) The state share, federal share, and total annual medicaid fee-for-service payments for outpatient hospital services made to each
hospital under RCW 74.60.120, and the data used to calculate annual
payments to individual hospitals under that section;
(v) The annual state share, federal share, and total payments made
to each hospital under each of the following programs: Grants to
certified public expenditure hospitals under RCW 74.60.090, for
critical access hospital payments under RCW 74.60.100; and
disproportionate share programs under RCW 74.60.110;
(vi) The data used to calculate annual payments to individual
hospitals under (b)(v) of this subsection; and
(vii) The amount of payments made to managed care plans under RCW
74.60.130, including the amount representing additional premium tax,
and the data used to calculate those payments.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.60.090 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 17 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) In each fiscal year commencing upon satisfaction of the
applicable conditions in RCW 74.60.150(1), funds must be disbursed from
the fund and the authority shall make grants to certified public
expenditure hospitals, which shall not be considered payments for
hospital services, as follows:
(a) University of Washington medical center: Three million three
hundred thousand dollars per state fiscal year ((in fiscal years 2014
and 2015, and then reduced in approximately equal increments per fiscal
year until the grant amount is zero by July 1, 2019));
(b) Harborview medical center: Seven million six hundred thousand
dollars per state fiscal year ((in fiscal years 2014 and 2015, and then
reduced in approximately equal increments per fiscal year until the
grant amount is zero by July 1, 2019));
(c) All other certified public expenditure hospitals: Four million
seven hundred thousand dollars per state fiscal year ((in fiscal years
2014 and 2015, and then reduced in approximately equal increments per
fiscal year until the grant amount is zero by July 1, 2019)). The
amount of payments to individual hospitals under this subsection must
be determined using a methodology that provides each hospital with a
proportional allocation of the group's total amount of medicaid and
state children's health insurance program payments determined from
claims and encounter data using the same general methodology set forth
in RCW 74.60.120 (3) and (4).
(2) Payments must be made quarterly, taking the total disbursement
amount and dividing by four to calculate the quarterly amount. The
initial payment, which must include all amounts due from and after July
1, 2013, to the date of the initial payment, must be made within thirty
days after satisfaction of the conditions in RCW 74.60.150(1). The
authority shall provide a quarterly report of such payments to the
Washington state hospital association.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.60.120 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 17 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in state fiscal year 2014, commencing thirty days
after satisfaction of the applicable conditions in RCW 74.60.150(1)((,
and for the period of state fiscal years 2014 through 2019,)) the
authority shall make supplemental payments directly to Washington
hospitals, separately for inpatient and outpatient fee-for-service
medicaid services, as follows:
(a) For inpatient fee-for-service payments for prospective payment
hospitals other than psychiatric or rehabilitation hospitals, twenty-nine million two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars per state fiscal
year ((in fiscal years 2014 and 2015, and then amounts reduced in equal
increments per fiscal year until the supplemental payment amount is
zero by July 1, 2019,)) from the fund, plus federal matching funds;
(b) For outpatient fee-for-service payments for prospective payment
hospitals other than psychiatric or rehabilitation hospitals, thirty
million dollars per state fiscal year ((in fiscal years 2014 and 2015,
and then amounts reduced in equal increments per fiscal year until the
supplemental payment amount is zero by July 1, 2019,)) from the fund,
plus federal matching funds;
(c) For inpatient fee-for-service payments for psychiatric
hospitals, six hundred twenty-five thousand dollars per state fiscal
year ((in fiscal years 2014 and 2015, and then amounts reduced in equal
increments per fiscal year until the supplemental payment amount is
zero by July 1, 2019,)) from the fund, plus federal matching funds;
(d) For inpatient fee-for-service payments for rehabilitation
hospitals, one hundred fifty thousand dollars per state fiscal year
((in fiscal years 2014 and 2015, and then amounts reduced in equal
increments per fiscal year until the supplemental payment amount is
zero by July 1, 2019,)) from the fund, plus federal matching funds;
(e) For inpatient fee-for-service payments for border hospitals,
two hundred fifty thousand dollars per state fiscal year ((in fiscal
years 2014 and 2015, and then amounts reduced in equal increments per
fiscal year until the supplemental payment amount is zero by July 1,
2019,)) from the fund, plus federal matching funds; and
(f) For outpatient fee-for-service payments for border hospitals,
two hundred fifty thousand dollars per state fiscal year ((in fiscal
years 2014 and 2015, and then amounts reduced in equal increments per
fiscal year until the supplemental payment amount is zero by July 1,
2019,)) from the fund, plus federal matching funds.
(2) If the amount of inpatient or outpatient payments under
subsection (1) of this section, when combined with federal matching
funds, exceeds the upper payment limit, payments to each category of
hospital must be reduced proportionately to a level where the total
payment amount is consistent with the upper payment limit. Funds under
this chapter unable to be paid to hospitals under this section because
of the upper payment limit must be paid to managed care organizations
under RCW 74.60.130, subject to the limitations in this chapter.
(3) The amount of such fee-for-service inpatient payments to
individual hospitals within each of the categories identified in
subsection (1)(a), (c), (d), and (e) of this section must be determined
by:
(a) Applying the medicaid fee-for-service rates in effect on July
1, 2009, without regard to the increases required by chapter 30, Laws
of 2010 1st sp. sess. to each hospital's inpatient fee-for-services
claims and medicaid managed care encounter data for the base year;
(b) Applying the medicaid fee-for-service rates in effect on July
1, 2009, without regard to the increases required by chapter 30, Laws
of 2010 1st sp. sess. to all hospitals' inpatient fee-for-services
claims and medicaid managed care encounter data for the base year; and
(c) Using the amounts calculated under (a) and (b) of this
subsection to determine an individual hospital's percentage of the
total amount to be distributed to each category of hospital.
(4) The amount of such fee-for-service outpatient payments to
individual hospitals within each of the categories identified in
subsection (1)(b) and (f) of this section must be determined by:
(a) Applying the medicaid fee-for-service rates in effect on July
1, 2009, without regard to the increases required by chapter 30, Laws
of 2010 1st sp. sess. to each hospital's outpatient fee-for-services
claims and medicaid managed care encounter data for the base year;
(b) Applying the medicaid fee-for-service rates in effect on July
1, 2009, without regard to the increases required by chapter 30, Laws
of 2010 1st sp. sess. to all hospitals' outpatient fee-for-services
claims and medicaid managed care encounter data for the base year; and
(c) Using the amounts calculated under (a) and (b) of this
subsection to determine an individual hospital's percentage of the
total amount to be distributed to each category of hospital.
(5) Thirty days before the initial payments and sixty days before
the first payment in each subsequent fiscal year, the authority shall
provide each hospital and the Washington state hospital association
with an explanation of how the amounts due to each hospital under this
section were calculated.
(6) Payments must be made in quarterly installments on or about the
last day of every quarter, except that the initial payment must be made
within thirty days after satisfaction of the conditions in RCW
74.60.150(1) and must include all amounts due from July 1, 2013, to the
date of the initial payment.
(7) A prospective payment system hospital commencing operations
after January 1, 2009, is eligible to receive payments in accordance
with this section after becoming an eligible new prospective payment
system hospital as defined in RCW 74.60.010.
(8) Payments under this section are supplemental to all other
payments and do not reduce any other payments to hospitals.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.60.130 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 17 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) For state fiscal year 2014, commencing within thirty days after
satisfaction of the conditions in RCW 74.60.150(1) and subsection (6)
of this section((, and for the period of state fiscal years 2014
through 2019,)) the authority shall increase capitation payments to
managed care organizations by an amount at least equal to the amount
available from the fund after deducting disbursements authorized by RCW
74.60.020(4) (c) through (f) and payments required by RCW 74.60.080
through 74.60.120. The capitation payment under this subsection must
be no less than one hundred fifty-three million one hundred thirty-one
thousand six hundred dollars per state fiscal year ((in fiscal years
2014 and 2015, and then the increased capitation payment amounts are
reduced in equal increments per fiscal year until the increased
capitation payment amount is zero by July 1, 2019,)) plus the maximum
available amount of federal matching funds. The initial payment
following satisfaction of the conditions in RCW 74.60.150(1) must
include all amounts due from July 1, 2013. Subsequent payments shall
be made quarterly.
(2) In fiscal years 2015, 2016, and 2017, the authority shall use
any additional federal matching funds for the increased managed care
capitation payments under subsection (1) of this section available from
medicaid expansion under the federal patient protection and affordable
care act to substitute for assessment funds which otherwise would have
been used to pay managed care plans under this section.
(3) Payments to individual managed care organizations shall be
determined by the authority based on each organization's or network's
enrollment relative to the anticipated total enrollment in each program
for the fiscal year in question, the anticipated utilization of
hospital services by an organization's or network's medicaid enrollees,
and such other factors as are reasonable and appropriate to ensure that
purposes of this chapter are met.
(4) If the federal government determines that total payments to
managed care organizations under this section exceed what is permitted
under applicable medicaid laws and regulations, payments must be
reduced to levels that meet such requirements, and the balance
remaining must be applied as provided in RCW 74.60.050. Further, in
the event a managed care organization is legally obligated to repay
amounts distributed to hospitals under this section to the state or
federal government, a managed care organization may recoup the amount
it is obligated to repay under the medicaid program from individual
hospitals by not more than the amount of overpayment each hospital
received from that managed care organization.
(5) Payments under this section do not reduce the amounts that
otherwise would be paid to managed care organizations: PROVIDED, That
such payments are consistent with actuarial soundness certification and
enrollment.
(6) Before making such payments, the authority shall require
medicaid managed care organizations to comply with the following
requirements:
(a) All payments to managed care organizations under this chapter
must be expended for hospital services provided by Washington
hospitals, which for purposes of this section includes psychiatric and
rehabilitation hospitals, in a manner consistent with the purposes and
provisions of this chapter, and must be equal to all increased
capitation payments under this section received by the organization or
network, consistent with actuarial certification and enrollment, less
an allowance for any estimated premium taxes the organization is
required to pay under Title 48 RCW associated with the payments under
this chapter;
(b) Before the end of the quarter in which funds are paid to them,
managed care organizations shall expend the increased capitation
payments under this section in a manner consistent with the purposes of
this chapter;
(c) Providing that any delegation or attempted delegation of an
organization's or network's obligations under agreements with the
authority do not relieve the organization or network of its obligations
under this section and related contract provisions.
(7) No hospital or managed care organizations may use the payments
under this section to gain advantage in negotiations.
(8) No hospital has a claim or cause of action against a managed
care organization for monetary compensation based on the amount of
payments under subsection (6) of this section.
(9) If funds cannot be used to pay for services in accordance with
this chapter the managed care organization or network must return the
funds to the authority which shall return them to the hospital safety
net assessment fund.

--- END ---