BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.220 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In order for students to have the opportunity to develop the
basic education knowledge and skills under RCW 28A.150.210, school
districts must provide instruction of sufficient quantity and quality
and give students the opportunity to complete graduation requirements
that are intended to prepare them for postsecondary education, gainful
employment, and citizenship. The program established under this
section shall be the minimum instructional program of basic education
offered by school districts.
(2) Each school district shall make available to students the
following minimum instructional offering each school year:
(a) For students enrolled in grades one through twelve, at least a
district-wide annual average of one thousand hours, which shall be
increased beginning in the 2015-16 school year to at least one thousand
eighty instructional hours for students enrolled in ((each of)) grades
((seven)) nine through twelve and at least one thousand instructional
hours for students in ((each of)) grades one through ((six according to
an implementation schedule adopted by the legislature, but not before
the 2014-15 school year)) eight, all of which may be calculated by a
school district using a district-wide annual average of instructional
hours over grades one through twelve; and
(b) For students enrolled in kindergarten, at least four hundred
fifty instructional hours, which shall be increased to at least one
thousand instructional hours according to the implementation schedule
under RCW 28A.150.315.
(3) The instructional program of basic education provided by each
school district shall include:
(a) Instruction in the essential academic learning requirements
under RCW 28A.655.070;
(b) Instruction that provides students the opportunity to complete
twenty-four credits for high school graduation, ((subject to a phased-in implementation of the twenty-four credits as established by the
legislature)) beginning with the graduating class of 2019. Course
distribution requirements may be established by the state board of
education under RCW 28A.230.090;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages;
(d) Supplemental instruction and services for underachieving
students through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005
through 28A.165.065;
(e) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled
students and exited students whose primary language is other than
English through the transitional bilingual instruction program under
RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080;
(f) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense
as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with
disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020; and
(g) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010
through 28A.185.030.
(4) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require
individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours
per day or to take any particular courses.
(5)(a) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade
basic educational program shall be accessible to all students who are
five years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than
twenty-one years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred
eighty school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by
a school district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or
equivalent, in kindergarten, to be increased to a minimum of one
hundred eighty school days per school year according to the
implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315. ((However,))
(b) Schools administering the Washington kindergarten inventory of
developing skills may use up to three school days at the beginning of
the school year to meet with parents and families as required in the
parent involvement component of the inventory. ((In addition,
effective May 1, 1979))
(c) In the case of students who are graduating from high school, a
school district may schedule the last five school days of the one
hundred ((and)) eighty day school year for noninstructional purposes
((in the case of students who are graduating from high school,))
including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early
release from school upon the request of a student((, and)). All such
students may be claimed as a full-time equivalent student to the extent
they could otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260. Any hours scheduled by a school district
for noninstructional purposes during the last five school days for such
students shall count toward the instructional hours requirement in
subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes a school district from
enriching the instructional program of basic education, such as
offering additional instruction or providing additional services,
programs, or activities that the school district determines to be
appropriate for the education of the school district's students.
(7) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental
program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of
state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school
districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic
education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as
follows:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a
basic education instructional allocation for each common school
district.
(2) The distribution formula under this section shall be for
allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under chapter
28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and
regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use
basic education instructional funds to implement a particular
instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires
school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student
ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay
for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this
section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning
period.
(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been
adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a
school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic
education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing
and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support
instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high,
middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section.
The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not
constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or
structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical
schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of
a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students
using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours
of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the
intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted
from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average
full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the
district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school
to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further
adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small
schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are
defined as follows:
(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;
(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight;
and
(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
six.
(4)(a)(i) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical
school shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom
teachers needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one
teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following
general education average class size of full-time equivalent students
per teacher:

General education
average
class size
Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23
Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(ii) The minimum class size allocation for each prototypical high
school shall also provide for enhanced funding for class size reduction
for two laboratory science classes within grades nine through twelve
per full-time equivalent high school student multiplied by a laboratory
science course factor of 0.0833, based on the number of full-time
equivalent classroom teachers needed to provide instruction over the
minimum required annual instructional hours in RCW 28A.150.220, and
providing at least one teacher planning period per school day:

Laboratory science
average class size
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 19.98

(b) ((During the 2011-2013 biennium and beginning with schools with
the highest percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price
meals in the prior)) Beginning with allocations for the 2015-16 school
year, the general education average class size for grades K-3 shall be
reduced in equal annual increments from the allocation levels in (a) of
this subsection, and the general education average class size for
grades K-3 in high poverty schools where more than fifty percent of the
students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior
school year shall be reduced in equal annual increments from the 2014-15 school year allocation levels, until the average class size funded
under this subsection (4) in all prototypical elementary schools is no
more than 17.0 full-time equivalent students per teacher ((beginning))
in the 2017-18 school year and thereafter.
(c) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high
school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom teachers
based on the following number of full-time equivalent students per
teacher in career and technical education:

Career and technical
education average
class size
Approved career and technical education offered at
the middle school and high school level . . . . . . . . . . . . 26.57
Skill center programs meeting the standards established
by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction . . . . . . . . . . . . 22.76

(d) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum
specify:
(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than
fifty percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price
meals, which may be in addition to the class size specified for grades
K-3 under (b) of this subsection; and
(ii) A specialty average class size for ((laboratory science,))
advanced placement((,)) and international baccalaureate courses.
(5)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition
to classroom teachers:

Elementary
School Middle
School High
School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level
administrators . . . . . . . . . . . .
1.253
1.353
1.880

Teacher librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology,
and media to support school library media programs . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.663
0.519
0.523

Health and social services:

School nurses . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.076 0.060 0.096

Social workers . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.042 0.006 0.015

Psychologists . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.017 0.002 0.007

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach and graduation
advising . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.493
((1.116))
1.216
((1.909))
2.539

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional
services provided by classified employees . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.936
0.700
0.652

Office support and other noninstructional aides . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.012 2.325 3.269

Custodians . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.657 1.942 2.965

Classified staff providing student and staff safety . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.079 0.092 0.141

((Parent involvement)) Family engagement coordinators . . . . . . . . . . . . ((0.00))
0.083 0.00 0.00

(b) Beginning with the 2015-16 school year, the minimum allocations
under this subsection (5) for family engagement coordinators in
prototypical elementary schools and for guidance counselors in
prototypical middle schools and high schools shall each be increased in
equal annual increments from the allocation levels provided in the
2014-15 school year until allocations of 0.50 family engagement
coordinators in prototypical elementary schools, 1.616 guidance
counselors in prototypical middle schools, and 2.939 guidance
counselors in prototypical high schools are provided in the 2017-18
school year and thereafter.
(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to
provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as
follows:

Staff per 1,000
K-12 students
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.628
Facilities, maintenance, and grounds . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.813
Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.332

(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district
to support certificated and classified staffing of central
administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under
subsections (4)(a) and (b) and (5) of this section and (a) of this
subsection.
(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to
school districts for career and technical education and skill center
administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified
in the omnibus appropriations act.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, the
minimum allocation for each school district shall include allocations
per annual average full-time equivalent student for the following
materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted for inflation
from the 2008-09 school year:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $54.43
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $147.90
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $58.44
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $124.07
Instructional professional development for certified and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $9.04
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $73.27
Security and central office . . . . . . . . . . . . $50.76

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium, the minimum allocation for
maintenance, supplies, and operating costs shall be increased as
specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The following
allocations, adjusted for inflation from the 2007-08 school year, are
provided in the 2015-16 school year, after which the allocations shall
be adjusted annually for inflation as specified in the omnibus
appropriations act:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $113.80
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $309.21
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $122.17
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $259.39
Instructional professional development for certificated and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $18.89
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $153.18
Security and central office administration . . . . . . . . . . . . $106.12

(c) In addition to the amounts provided in (a) and (b) of this
subsection, beginning in the 2014-15 school year, the omnibus
appropriations act shall provide the following minimum allocation for
each annual average full-time equivalent student in grades nine through
twelve for the following materials, supplies, and operating costs, to
be adjusted annually for inflation:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades 9-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $36.35
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $39.02
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $82.84
Instructional professional development for certificated and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $6.04

(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this
section, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based
on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:
(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students
in grades seven through twelve;
(b) ((Laboratory science courses for students in grades nine
through twelve;
(c))) Preparatory career and technical education courses for
students in grades nine through twelve offered in a high school; and
(((d))) (c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for
students in grades eleven and twelve offered through a skill center.
(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this
section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs
and services:
(a) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
underachieving students through the learning assistance program under
RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the
district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for
free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum
allocation for each level of prototypical school for the program shall
provide ((for each level of prototypical school)) resources to provide,
on a statewide average, ((1.5156)) 2.3975 hours per week in extra
instruction with a class size of fifteen learning assistance program
students per teacher.
(b) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students
whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be
based on the following:
(i)(A) The head count number of students in each school who are
eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction
program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum
allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide
resources to provide, on a statewide average, 4.7780 hours per week in
extra instruction with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction
program students per teacher. ((Notwithstanding other provisions of
this subsection (10), the actual per-student allocation may be scaled
to provide a larger allocation for students needing more intensive
intervention and a commensurate reduced allocation for students needing
less intensive intervention, as detailed in the omnibus appropriations
act.)) Beginning with the 2015-16 school year, the minimum allocation
for students in grades seven and eight shall be increased in equal
annual increments until an allocation of 6.0 hours per week is provided
in the 2017-18 school year and thereafter. Also beginning with the
2015-16 school year, the minimum allocation for students in grades nine
through twelve shall be increased in equal annual increments until an
allocation of 8.0 hours per week is provided in the 2017-18 school year
and thereafter.
(B) The head count number of students in each school who have
exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within the
previous two years based on their performance on the English
proficiency assessment approved by the superintendent of public
instruction under RCW 28A.180.090. Beginning with the 2013-14 school
year, the minimum allocation under this subsection (10)(b)(i)(B) for
each level of prototypical school shall provide resources to provide,
on a statewide average, 3.0 hours per week in extra instruction with
fifteen exited transitional bilingual instruction program students per
teacher, based on students who exited within the previous school year.
Beginning with the 2014-15 school year and thereafter, the minimum
allocation shall be based on students who exited within the previous
two school years.
(ii) School districts may not receive allocations under both
(b)(i)(A) and (B) of this subsection for the same student in a single
school year.
(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for
highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030,
allocations shall be based on two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school district's full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs
shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590
hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen highly capable program
students per teacher.
(11) The allocations under subsections (4)(a) and (b), (5), (6),
and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW
28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental
instructional resources for students with disabilities.
(12)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high
schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this
section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are
eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such
students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the
omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and
reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.
(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4),
(7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter
28A.700 RCW.
(13)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds
shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.
(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect.
(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each
month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall
be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional
hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the
present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review
of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the
common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.315 and 2012 c 51 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2007-08 school year, funding for voluntary
all-day kindergarten programs ((shall)) must be phased-in beginning
with schools with the highest poverty levels, defined as those schools
with the highest percentages of students qualifying for free and
reduced-price lunch support in the prior school year. ((During the
2011-2013 biennium, funding shall continue to be phased-in each year))
Beginning with the 2015-16 school year, funds shall be allocated to
increase the proportion of full-time equivalent kindergarten students
in state-funded all-day kindergarten programs in equal annual
increments until full statewide implementation of all-day kindergarten
is achieved in the 2017-18 school year and thereafter. Once a school
receives funding for the all-day kindergarten program, that school
shall remain eligible for funding in subsequent school years regardless
of changes in the school's percentage of students eligible for free and
reduced-price lunches as long as other program requirements are
fulfilled. Additionally, schools receiving all-day kindergarten
program support shall agree to the following conditions:
(a) Provide at least a one thousand-hour instructional program;
(b) Provide a curriculum that offers a rich, varied set of
experiences that assist students in:
(i) Developing initial skills in the academic areas of reading,
mathematics, and writing;
(ii) Developing a variety of communication skills;
(iii) Providing experiences in science, social studies, arts,
health and physical education, and a world language other than English;
(iv) Acquiring large and small motor skills;
(v) Acquiring social and emotional skills including successful
participation in learning activities as an individual and as part of a
group; and
(vi) Learning through hands-on experiences;
(c) Establish learning environments that are developmentally
appropriate and promote creativity;
(d) Demonstrate strong connections and communication with early
learning community providers; and
(e) Participate in kindergarten program readiness activities with
early learning providers and parents.
(2)(a) It is the intent of the legislature that administration of
the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills as required
in this subsection (2) and RCW 28A.655.080 replace administration of
other assessments being required by school districts or that other
assessments only be administered if they seek to obtain information not
covered by the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills.
(b) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section and to the extent funds are available, beginning with the 2011-12 school year on a voluntary basis, schools must identify the skills,
knowledge, and characteristics of kindergarten students at the
beginning of the school year in order to support social-emotional,
physical, and cognitive growth and development of individual children;
support early learning provider and parent involvement; and inform
instruction. Kindergarten teachers shall administer the Washington
kindergarten inventory of developing skills, as directed by the
superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the
department of early learning and in collaboration with the
nongovernmental private-public partnership designated in RCW
43.215.070, and report the results to the superintendent. The
superintendent shall share the results with the director of the
department of early learning.
(c) School districts shall provide an opportunity for parents and
guardians to excuse their children from participation in the Washington
kindergarten inventory of developing skills.
(3) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the
superintendent of public instruction shall designate one or more school
districts to serve as resources and examples of best practices in
designing and operating a high-quality all-day kindergarten program.
Designated school districts shall serve as lighthouse programs and
provide technical assistance to other school districts in the initial
stages of implementing an all-day kindergarten program. Examples of
topics addressed by the technical assistance include strategic
planning, developing the instructional program and curriculum, working
with early learning providers to identify students and communicate with
parents, and developing kindergarten program readiness activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Minimum salary allocations for state-funded classified and
certificated administrative staff positions allocated under RCW
28A.150.260 shall be calculated as provided in this section.
(2)(a) Beginning with the 2015-16 school year, the minimum standard
salary allocation for classified staff shall be increased in equal
annual increments until an allocation equal to the market rate salary
for classified staff, adjusted by inflation from the 2010-11 school
year, is provided in the 2017-18 school year and thereafter.
(b) Beginning with the 2015-16 school year, the minimum standard
salary allocation for certificated administrative staff shall be
increased in equal annual increments until an allocation equal to the
market rate salary for certificated administrative staff, adjusted by
inflation from the 2010-11 school year, is provided in the 2017-18
school year and thereafter.
(3) School districts whose grandfathered salary allocation exceeds
the standard salary allocation in any year shall receive the greater of
their grandfathered salary allocation or the standard salary allocation
as provided under this section.
(4) The salary allocations calculated under this section are
minimum allocations, which include salary increases provided under RCW
28A.400.205. The salaries calculated under this section are for
allocation purposes only.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Grandfathered salary allocation" means a state salary
allocation rate for classified or certificated administrative staff
provided to a school district that exceeds the standard salary
allocation.
(b) "Inflation" means the change in the consumer price index--Seattle for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of
labor.
(c) "Market rate salary for classified staff" means the 2010 state
average predicted salary for comparable occupations to classified
staff, identified through a wage analysis submitted in April 2012 to
the compensation technical working group convened under chapter 548,
Laws of 2009, weighted by the distribution of school staff among the
occupational groupings considered in the analysis.
(d) "Market rate salary for certificated administrative staff"
means the 2010 state average prevailing salary for managerial
occupations comparable to school district administrators, identified
through a wage analysis submitted in April 2012 to the compensation
technical working group convened under chapter 548, Laws of 2009.
(e) "Standard salary allocation" means the state salary allocation
rate for classified or certificated administrative staff provided to
the majority of school districts.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.160.192 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((The superintendent of public instruction shall phase-in the
implementation of)) The distribution formula under this chapter for
allocating state funds to school districts for the transportation of
students to and from school((. The phase-in shall begin no later than
the 2011-2013 biennium and be fully implemented by the 2013-2015
biennium.
(a) The formula)) must:
(a) Be developed and revised on an ongoing basis using the major
cost factors in student transportation, including basic and special
student loads, school district land area, average distance to school,
roadway miles, and number of locations served. Factors must include
all those site characteristics that are statistically significant after
analysis of the data required by the revised reporting process.
(b) ((The formula must)) Allocate funds to school districts based
on the average predicted costs of transporting students to and from
school, using a regression analysis. Only factors that are
statistically significant shall be used in the regression analysis.
Employee compensation costs included in the allowable transportation
expenditures used for the purpose of establishing each ((school
district's independent)) variable in the regression analysis shall be
limited to the base salary or hourly wage rates, fringe benefit rates,
and ((applicable health care)) the insurance benefit allocation
rate((s)) provided in the omnibus appropriations act.
(2) ((During the phase-in period,)) Funding provided to school
districts for student transportation operations shall be distributed on
the following basis:
(a) Annually, each school district shall receive the lesser of the
((previous school year's pupil transportation operations allocation))
expected cost as predicted by the regression analysis under subsection
(1)(b) of this section, or the total of allowable pupil transportation
expenditures identified on the previous school year's final expenditure
report to the state plus district indirect expenses using the federal
restricted indirect rate as calculated in the district annual financial
report;
(b) Annually, the amount identified in (a) of this subsection shall
be adjusted for any budgeted ((increases)) changes provided in the
omnibus appropriations act for salaries ((or)), fringe benefits, and
the insurance benefit allocation rate; and
(c) ((Annually, any funds appropriated by the legislature in excess
of the maintenance level funding amount for student transportation
shall be distributed among school districts on a prorated basis using
the difference between the amount identified in (a) adjusted by (b) of
this subsection and the amount determined under the formula in RCW
28A.160.180; and
(d))) Allocations provided to recognize the cost of depreciation to
districts contracting with private carriers for student transportation
shall be deducted from the allowable transportation expenditures in (a)
of this subsection.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2011 c 203 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except as
provided in RCW 28A.230.122 and except those equivalencies established
by local high schools or school districts under RCW 28A.230.097. The
purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that a student is ready
for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and
citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high
school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board
of education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements
for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and
technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to
a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized.
The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in
these programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of
academic achievement, complete the program and earn the program's
certificate or credential, and complete other state and local
graduation requirements.
(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high
school graduation requirements to the education committees of the
legislature for review and to the quality education council established
under RCW 28A.290.010. The legislature shall have the opportunity to
act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted
through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a
fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis
prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the
legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted
legislation.
(d) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement the
career and college ready graduation requirement proposal adopted under
board resolution on November 10, 2010, and revised on January 9, 2014,
to take effect beginning with the graduating class of 2019, which
includes authorization for a school district to waive up to two credits
on an individual student basis in accordance with the rules established
by the state board of education.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A joint task force on local education
financing reform is established with the following members:
(a) Four members from the house of representatives, two from each
major caucus, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(b) Four members from the senate, two from each major caucus,
appointed by the majority leader and minority leader of the major
caucuses of the senate;
(c) The governor or the governor's designee; and
(d) The superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee.
(2) Appointments to the task force shall be completed within thirty
days of the effective date of this section.
(3) The task force shall be cochaired by one member of the house of
representatives and one member of the senate, selected by the members
of the task force.
(4) The task force shall:
(a) Review the work of the levy and local effort assistance
technical working group created in accordance with chapter 548, Laws of
2009, and amended by chapter 236, Laws of 2010, and other relevant
studies and information;
(b) Review the use of local levies by school districts, including
the level of funding and how the funding is used by school districts;
(c) Review issues related to various aspects of the local levy
process, including school district levy authority, the determination of
the levy base, the different levy lids, levy equalization, school
choice to use excess levies rather than regular levies, and other voter
approval strategies available to school districts;
(d) Review issues related to the small school factor in state
funding formulas;
(e) Review the work of the compensation technical working group
created in accordance with chapter 548, Laws of 2009, and amended by
chapter 236, Laws of 2010, and other relevant studies and information
as they relate to salary grandfathering and regional compensation
differences in state funding formulas;
(f) Review issues related to grandfathered base salary allocations
for certificated instructional staff in state funding formulas;
(g) Review options for addressing regional labor market differences
in state funding formulas; and
(h) Recommend approaches in a report to the governor and the
legislature to address a system for state and local funds that are
distributed in a manner that provides all children with the opportunity
to meet the state's academic standards and become prepared for
postsecondary careers and education, and that provides compensation
allocations that are adequate to hire and retain competent teachers.
(5) Findings and recommendations from the task force shall be
reported to fiscal committees of the legislature by December 20, 2014.
(6) Staff and logistical support for the task force must be
provided by the house of representatives office of program research and
senate committee services, with assistance as necessary from the office
of financial management and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. The first meeting of the task force shall be convened by
the house of representatives office of program research and senate
committee services within forty-five days of the effective date of this
section.
(7) Members of the task force shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 44.04.120.
(8) This section expires June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 2 through 5 of this act take effect
September 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 7 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---