BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.28.080 and 2013 c 47 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person who sells or gives, or permits to be sold or
given, to any person under the age of eighteen years any ((cigar,
cigarette, cigarette paper or wrapper, tobacco in any form, or a
vapor)) tobacco product is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) It ((shall be no)) is not a defense to a prosecution for a
violation of this section that the person acted, or was believed by the
defendant to act, as agent or representative of another.
(3)(a) For the purposes of this section, (("vapor product" means a
noncombustible tobacco-derived product containing nicotine that employs
a mechanical heating element, battery, or circuit, regardless of shape
or size, that can be used to heat a liquid nicotine solution contained
in cartridges. Vapor product does not include any product that is
regulated by the United States food and drug administration under
chapter V of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act)) "tobacco
product" means:
(i) Any product containing, made, or derived from tobacco or
nicotine that is intended for human consumption, whether chewed,
smoked, absorbed, dissolved, inhaled, snorted, sniffed, or ingested by
any other means; and
(ii) Any electronic device that can be used to deliver nicotine or
other substances to the person inhaling from the device, including, but
not limited to, an electronic cigarette, cigar, pipe, or hookah.
(b) Notwithstanding any provisions of (a)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection to the contrary, "tobacco product" includes any component,
part, or accessory of a tobacco product whether or not it is sold
separately.
(c) Except for electronic cigarettes, "tobacco product" does not
include any product that has been approved by the United States food
and drug administration for tobacco cessation or other therapeutic
purposes where such product is marketed and sold solely for such an
approved purpose. At such time electronic cigarettes are approved by
the United States food and drug administration for smoking cessation or
other therapeutic purposes, "tobacco product" does not include an
electronic cigarette that has been prescribed by a licensed physician
and purchased at a pharmacy.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.155.010 and 2009 c 278 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions ((set forth)) in this section and RCW 82.24.010
((shall)) apply ((to)) throughout this chapter((. In addition, for the
purposes of this chapter,)) unless ((otherwise required by)) the
context((:)) clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the Washington state liquor control board.
(2) "Internet" means any computer network, telephonic network, or
other electronic network.
(3) "Minor" refers to an individual who is less than eighteen years
old.
(4) "Sample" means a tobacco product distributed to members of the
general public at no cost or at nominal cost for product promotion
purposes.
(5) "Sampling" means the distribution of samples to members of the
public.
(6)(a) "Tobacco product" means ((a product that contains tobacco
and is intended for human use, including any product defined in RCW
82.24.010(2) or 82.26.010(1), except that for the purposes of RCW
70.155.140 only, "tobacco product" does not include cigars defined in
RCW 82.26.010 as to which one thousand units weigh more than three
pounds)) :
(i) Any product containing, made, or derived from tobacco or
nicotine that is intended for human consumption, whether chewed,
smoked, absorbed, dissolved, inhaled, snorted, sniffed, or ingested by
any other means, including, but not limited to, any product defined in
RCW 82.24.010(2) or 82.26.010(21)(a); and
(ii) Any electronic device that can be used to deliver nicotine or
other substances to the person inhaling from the device, including, but
not limited to, an electronic cigarette, cigar, pipe, or hookah.
(b) Notwithstanding any provisions of (a)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection to the contrary, "tobacco product" includes any component,
part, or accessory of a tobacco product whether or not it is sold
separately.
(c) Except for electronic cigarettes, "tobacco product" does not
include any product that has been approved by the United States food
and drug administration for tobacco cessation or other therapeutic
purposes where such product is marketed and sold solely for such an
approved purpose.
(d) At such time electronic cigarettes are approved by the United
States food and drug administration for smoking cessation or other
therapeutic purposes, "tobacco product" does not include an electronic
cigarette that has been prescribed by a licensed physician and
purchased at a pharmacy.
(e) Except for the purposes of RCW 70.155.140 only, "tobacco
product" does not include cigars defined in RCW 82.26.010 as to which
one thousand units weigh more than three pounds.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.26.010 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 22 s 4 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Actual price" means the total amount of consideration for
which tobacco products are sold, valued in money, whether received in
money or otherwise, including any charges by the seller necessary to
complete the sale such as charges for delivery, freight,
transportation, or handling.
(2) "Affiliated" means related in any way by virtue of any form or
amount of common ownership, control, operation, or management.
(3) "Board" means the liquor control board.
(4) "Business" means any trade, occupation, activity, or enterprise
engaged in for the purpose of selling or distributing tobacco products
in this state.
(5) "Cigar" means a roll for smoking that is of any size or shape
and that is made wholly or in part of tobacco, irrespective of whether
the tobacco is pure or flavored, adulterated or mixed with any other
ingredient, if the roll has a wrapper made wholly or in greater part of
tobacco. "Cigar" does not include a cigarette.
(6) "Cigarette" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.24.010.
(7) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(8) "Distributor" means (a) any person engaged in the business of
selling tobacco products in this state who brings, or causes to be
brought, into this state from without the state any tobacco products
for sale, (b) any person who makes, manufactures, fabricates, or stores
tobacco products in this state for sale in this state, (c) any person
engaged in the business of selling tobacco products without this state
who ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this state, to
be sold by those retailers, (d) any person engaged in the business of
selling tobacco products in this state who handles for sale any tobacco
products that are within this state but upon which tax has not been
imposed.
(9) "Indian country" means the same as defined in chapter 82.24
RCW.
(10) "Little cigar" means a cigar that has a cellulose acetate
integrated filter.
(11) "Manufacturer" means a person who manufactures and sells
tobacco products.
(12) "Manufacturer's representative" means a person hired by a
manufacturer to sell or distribute the manufacturer's tobacco products,
and includes employees and independent contractors.
(13) "Moist snuff" means tobacco that is finely cut, ground, or
powdered; is not for smoking; and is intended to be placed in the oral,
but not the nasal, cavity.
(14) "Person" means any individual, receiver, administrator,
executor, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm,
copartnership, joint venture, club, company, joint stock company,
business trust, municipal corporation, the state and its departments
and institutions, political subdivision of the state of Washington,
corporation, limited liability company, association, society, any group
of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual, cooperative,
fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise. The term excludes any person
immune from state taxation, including the United States or its
instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes and enrolled
tribal members, conducting business within Indian country.
(15) "Place of business" means any place where tobacco products are
sold or where tobacco products are manufactured, stored, or kept for
the purpose of sale, including any vessel, vehicle, airplane, train, or
vending machine.
(16) "Retail outlet" means each place of business from which
tobacco products are sold to consumers.
(17) "Retailer" means any person engaged in the business of selling
tobacco products to ultimate consumers.
(18)(a) "Sale" means any transfer, exchange, or barter, in any
manner or by any means whatsoever, for a consideration, and includes
and means all sales made by any person.
(b) The term "sale" includes a gift by a person engaged in the
business of selling tobacco products, for advertising, promoting, or as
a means of evading the provisions of this chapter.
(19)(a) "Taxable sales price" means:
(i) In the case of a taxpayer that is not affiliated with the
manufacturer, distributor, or other person from whom the taxpayer
purchased tobacco products, the actual price for which the taxpayer
purchased the tobacco products;
(ii) In the case of a taxpayer that purchases tobacco products from
an affiliated manufacturer, affiliated distributor, or other affiliated
person, and that sells those tobacco products to unaffiliated
distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate consumers, the actual
price for which that taxpayer sells those tobacco products to
unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate
consumers;
(iii) In the case of a taxpayer that sells tobacco products only to
affiliated distributors or affiliated retailers, the price, determined
as nearly as possible according to the actual price, that other
distributors sell similar tobacco products of like quality and
character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or
ultimate consumers;
(iv) In the case of a taxpayer that is a manufacturer selling
tobacco products directly to ultimate consumers, the actual price for
which the taxpayer sells those tobacco products to ultimate consumers;
(v) In the case of a taxpayer that has acquired tobacco products
under a sale as defined in subsection (18)(b) of this section, the
price, determined as nearly as possible according to the actual price,
that the taxpayer or other distributors sell the same tobacco products
or similar tobacco products of like quality and character to
unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate
consumers; or
(vi) In any case where (a)(i) through (v) of this subsection do not
apply, the price, determined as nearly as possible according to the
actual price, that the taxpayer or other distributors sell the same
tobacco products or similar tobacco products of like quality and
character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or
ultimate consumers.
(b) For purposes of (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection only,
"person" includes both persons as defined in subsection (14) of this
section and any person immune from state taxation, including the United
States or its instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes
and enrolled tribal members, conducting business within Indian country.
(c) The department may adopt rules regarding the determination of
taxable sales price under this subsection.
(20) "Taxpayer" means a person liable for the tax imposed by this
chapter.
(21) "Tobacco products" means:
(a) Any product, regardless of form, other than cigarettes, that
contains tobacco and is intended for human consumption or placement in
the oral or nasal cavity or absorption into the human body by any other
means, including: Cigars, cheroots, stogies, periques, granulated,
plug cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed, and other smoking tobacco, snuff,
snuff flour, cavendish, plug and twist tobacco, fine-cut and other
chewing tobaccos, shorts, refuse scraps, clippings, cuttings and
sweepings of tobacco, and other kinds and forms of tobacco, prepared in
such manner as to be suitable for chewing or smoking in a pipe or
otherwise, or both for chewing and smoking((, and any other product,
regardless of form, that contains tobacco and is intended for human
consumption or placement in the oral or nasal cavity or absorption into
the human body by any other means, but does not include cigarettes as
defined in RCW 82.24.010.)); and
(b) A tobacco substitute.
(22) "Tobacco substitute" means any product containing nicotine,
but not containing tobacco, that is intended for human consumption,
whether chewed, smoked, absorbed, dissolved, inhaled, snorted, sniffed,
or ingested by any other means.
(23) Except for electronic cigarettes, "tobacco substitute" does
not include any product that has been approved by the United States
food and drug administration for tobacco cessation or other medical
purposes. At such time electronic cigarettes are approved by the
United States food and drug administration for smoking cessation or
other therapeutic purposes, "tobacco substitute" does not include an
electronic cigarette that has been prescribed by a licensed physician
and purchased at a pharmacy.
(24) "Unaffiliated distributor" means a distributor that is not
affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from
whom the distributor has purchased tobacco products.
(((23))) (25) "Unaffiliated retailer" means a retailer that is not
affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from
whom the retailer has purchased tobacco products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.26 RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of the tax imposed under RCW 82.26.020, no deduction
from the taxable sales price is allowed for the value of nontobacco
products that are sold together with tobacco products for one
nonitemized price:
(1) To the taxpayer, and the taxable sales price is required to be
determined in accordance with RCW 82.26.010(19)(a)(i); or
(2) By the taxpayer, and the taxable sales price is required to be
determined in accordance with RCW 82.26.010(19)(a)(ii), (iii), (iv),
(v), or (vi).

Sec. 5 RCW 82.26.190 and 2009 c 154 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No person may engage in or conduct business as a distributor
or retailer in this state after September 30, 2005, without a valid
license issued under this chapter, except as otherwise provided by law.
Any person who sells tobacco products to persons other than ultimate
consumers or who meets the definition of distributor under RCW
82.26.010(((3))) (8)(d) must obtain a distributor's license under this
chapter. Any person who sells tobacco products to ultimate consumers
must obtain a retailer's license under this chapter.
(b) A violation of this subsection (1) is punishable as a class C
felony according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2)(a) No person engaged in or conducting business as a distributor
or retailer in this state may:
(i) Refuse to allow the department or the board, on demand, to make
a full inspection of any place of business where any of the tobacco
products taxed under this chapter are sold, stored, or handled, or
otherwise hinder or prevent such inspection;
(ii) Make, use, or present or exhibit to the department or the
board any invoice for any of the tobacco products taxed under this
chapter that bears an untrue date or falsely states the nature or
quantity of the goods invoiced; or
(iii) Fail to produce on demand of the department or the board all
invoices of all the tobacco products taxed under this chapter within
five years prior to such demand unless the person can show by
satisfactory proof that the nonproduction of the invoices was due to
causes beyond the person's control.
(b) No person, other than a licensed distributor or retailer, may
transport tobacco products for sale in this state for which the taxes
imposed under this chapter have not been paid unless:
(i) Notice of the transportation has been given as required under
RCW 82.26.140;
(ii) The person transporting the tobacco products actually
possesses invoices or delivery tickets showing the true name and
address of the consignor or seller, the true name and address of the
consignee or purchaser, and the quantity and brands of tobacco products
being transported; and
(iii) The tobacco products are consigned to or purchased by a
person in this state who is licensed under this chapter.
(c) A violation of this subsection (2) is a gross misdemeanor.
(3) Any person licensed under this chapter as a distributor, and
any person licensed under this chapter as a retailer, ((shall)) may not
operate in any other capacity unless the additional appropriate license
is first secured, except as otherwise provided by law. A violation of
this subsection (3) is a misdemeanor.
(4) The penalties provided in this section are in addition to any
other penalties provided by law for violating the provisions of this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.26.020 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 22 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected a tax upon the sale, handling, or
distribution of all tobacco products in this state at the following
rate:
(a) For cigars except little cigars, ninety-five percent of the
taxable sales price of cigars, not to exceed sixty-five cents per
cigar;
(b) For all tobacco products except those covered under separate
provisions of this subsection, ninety-five percent of the taxable sales
price;
(c) For moist snuff, as established in this subsection (1)(c) and
computed on the net weight listed by the manufacturer:
(i) On each single unit consumer-sized can or package whose net
weight is one and two-tenths ounces or less, a rate per single unit
that is equal to the greater of 2.526 dollars or eighty-three and one-
half percent of the cigarette tax under chapter 82.24 RCW multiplied by
twenty; or
(ii) On each single unit consumer-sized can or package whose net
weight is more than one and two-tenths ounces, a proportionate tax at
the rate established in (c)(i) of this subsection (1) on each ounce or
fractional part of an ounce; ((and))
(d) For tobacco substitutes, seventy-five percent of the taxable
sales price; and
(e) For little cigars, an amount per cigar equal to the cigarette
tax under chapter 82.24 RCW.
(2) Taxes under this section must be imposed at the time the
distributor (a) brings, or causes to be brought, into this state from
without the state tobacco products for sale, (b) makes, manufactures,
fabricates, or stores tobacco products in this state for sale in this
state, (c) ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this
state, to be sold by those retailers, or (d) handles for sale any
tobacco products that are within this state but upon which tax has not
been imposed.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the moneys
collected under this section must be deposited into the state general
fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Sections 3 and 4 of this act apply only
with respect to tax liability incurred under chapter 82.26 RCW on and
after the effective date of this section, for the sale, handling, or
distribution of tobacco products, including preexisting inventories of
tobacco substitutes.
(2) Preexisting inventories of tobacco substitutes are subject to
the tax imposed in RCW 82.26.020. All retailers and other distributors
must report the tax due under RCW 82.26.020 on preexisting inventories
of tobacco substitutes on the taxpayer's excise tax return for a
reporting period that includes tax liability accruing on and after July
1, 2014, consistent with the taxpayer's regular tax reporting
frequency.
(3) A retailer required to comply with subsection (2) of this
section is not required to obtain a distributor's license as otherwise
required under chapter 82.26 RCW as long as the retailer (a) does not
sell tobacco products other than to ultimate consumers, and (b) does
not meet the definition of distributor in RCW 82.26.010(8)(d) other
than with respect to the sale of that retailer's preexisting inventory
of tobacco substitutes.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) The definitions in RCW 82.26.010 apply; and
(b) "Preexisting inventory" means an inventory of tobacco
substitutes located in this state as of the moment that section 4 of
this act takes effect and held by a distributor for sale, handling, or
distribution in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.26 RCW
to read as follows:
Taxes collected under this chapter on the sale, handling, or
distribution of tobacco substitutes must be deposited in the education
legacy trust account. The department must establish a separate
reporting code for taxes collected under this chapter with respect to
such products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 3 through 8 of this act take effect
July 1, 2014.

--- END ---