BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
Narrowing the Extracted Fuel Tax Exemption to Provide Funding for the
Education Legacy Trust Account
Sec. 101 RCW 82.12.0263 and 1980 c 37 s 62 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) do not apply in respect to
the use of biomass fuel by the extractor or manufacturer thereof when
used directly in the operation of the particular extractive operation
or manufacturing plant which produced or manufactured the same. For
purposes of this section, "biomass fuel" means wood waste and other
wood residuals, including forest derived biomass, but does not include
firewood or wood pellets. "Biomass fuel" also includes partially
organic by-products of pulp, paper, and wood manufacturing processes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The value of the article used with respect to refinery fuel gas
under this chapter is the most recent monthly United States natural gas
wellhead price, as published by the federal energy information
administration.
(2) Taxes collected under this chapter on the use of refinery fuel
gas must be deposited in the education legacy trust account. The
department must establish a separate reporting code for taxes collected
under this chapter on the use of refinery fuel gas.
(3) This section applies to the use of refinery fuel gas occurring
on or after June 1, 2014.

PART II
Eliminating the Sales and Use Tax Exemption for Bottled Water
Sec. 201 RCW 82.08.0293 and 2011 c 2 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of food
and food ingredients. "Food and food ingredients" means substances,
whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or dehydrated
form, that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed
for their taste or nutritional value. "Food and food ingredients" does
not include:
(a) "Alcoholic beverages," which means beverages that are suitable
for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of
alcohol by volume; and
(b) "Tobacco," which means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe
tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco.
(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in
subsection (1) of this section does not apply to prepared food, soft
drinks, bottled water, or dietary supplements. ((For purposes of this
subsection, the following definitions apply:)) The definitions in this
subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(a) "Bottled water" means water that is placed in a safety sealed
container or package for human consumption. Bottled water is calorie
free and does not contain sweeteners or other additives except that it
may contain: (i) Antimicrobial agents; (ii) fluoride; (iii)
carbonation; (iv) vitamins, minerals, and electrolytes; (v) oxygen;
(vi) preservatives; and (vii) only those flavors, extracts, or essences
derived from a spice or fruit. "Bottled water" includes water that is
delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with
the water.
(b) "Dietary supplement" means any product, other than tobacco,
intended to supplement the diet that:
(i) Contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients:
(A) A vitamin;
(B) A mineral;
(C) An herb or other botanical;
(D) An amino acid;
(E) A dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by
increasing the total dietary intake; or
(F) A concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination
of any ingredient described in this subsection;
(ii) Is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel,
gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for ingestion in such form,
is not represented as conventional food and is not represented for use
as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and
(iii) Is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement,
identifiable by the "supplement facts" box found on the label as
required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Sec. 101.36, as amended or renumbered as
of January 1, 2003.
(((b))) (c)(i) "Prepared food" means:
(A) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;
(B) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller,
including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or
straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to
transport the food; or
(C) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller
for sale as a single item, except:
(I) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the
seller; or
(II) Raw eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw
animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the
federal food and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of The
Food Code, published by the food and drug administration, as amended or
renumbered as of January 1, 2003, so as to prevent foodborne illness.
(ii) "Prepared food" does not include the following food or food
ingredients, if the food or food ingredients are sold without eating
utensils provided by the seller:
(A) Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American
industry classification system (NAICS) classification is manufacturing
in sector 311, except subsector 3118 (bakeries), as provided in the
"North American industry classification system -- United States, 2002";
(B) Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single
item; or
(C) Bakery items. The term "bakery items" includes bread, rolls,
buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, Danish, cakes,
tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, or tortillas.
(((c))) (d) "Soft drinks" means nonalcoholic beverages that contain
natural or artificial sweeteners. Soft drinks do not include beverages
that contain: Milk or milk products; soy, rice, or similar milk
substitutes; or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice
by volume.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section
applies to food and food ingredients that are furnished, prepared, or
served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6);
(b) That are provided to senior citizens, individuals with
disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization
organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; or
(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or
older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor
or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both
spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic
partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at
least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two
years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income
senior housing facility" means a facility:
(i) That meets the definition of a qualified low-income housing
project under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 of the federal internal revenue code,
as existing on August 1, 2009;
(ii) That has been partially funded under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1485; and
(iii) For which the lessor or operator has at any time been
entitled to claim a federal income tax credit under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42
of the federal internal revenue code.
(4)(a) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the retail
sale of food and food ingredients is subject to sales tax under RCW
82.08.020 if the food and food ingredients are sold through a vending
machine. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the selling
price of food and food ingredients sold through a vending machine for
purposes of RCW 82.08.020 is fifty-seven percent of the gross receipts.
(b) For soft drinks and hot prepared food and food ingredients,
other than food and food ingredients which are heated after they have
been dispensed from the vending machine, the selling price is the total
gross receipts of such sales divided by the sum of one plus the sales
tax rate expressed as a decimal.
(c) For tax collected under this subsection (4), the requirements
that the tax be collected from the buyer and that the amount of tax be
stated as a separate item are waived.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.12.0293 and 2011 c 2 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of food and food ingredients for human consumption. "Food and food
ingredients" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.
(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in
subsection (1) of this section does not apply to prepared food, soft
drinks, bottled water, or dietary supplements. "Prepared food," "soft
drinks," "bottled water," and "dietary supplements" have the same
meanings as in RCW 82.08.0293.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section
applies to food and food ingredients which are furnished, prepared, or
served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6);
(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, individuals with
disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization
organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; or
(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or
older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor
or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both
spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic
partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at
least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two
years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income
senior housing facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions in this section, the tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of bottled water dispensed or to
be dispensed to patients, pursuant to a prescription for use in the
cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease or other medical
condition.
(2) For purposes of this section, "prescription" means an order,
formula, or recipe issued in any form of oral, written, electronic, or
other means of transmission by a duly licensed practitioner authorized
by the laws of this state to prescribe.
(3) Except for sales of bottled water delivered to the buyer in a
reusable container that is not sold with the water, sellers must
collect tax on sales subject to this exemption. Any buyer that has
paid at least twenty-five dollars in state and local sales taxes on
purchases of bottled water subject to this exemption may apply for a
refund of the taxes directly from the department in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The department must deny any refund
application if the amount of the refund requested is less than twenty-
five dollars. No refund may be made for taxes paid more than four
years after the end of the calendar year in which the tax was paid to
the seller.
(4) The provisions of RCW 82.32.060 apply to refunds authorized
under this section.
(5) With respect to sales of bottled water delivered to the buyer
in a reusable container that is not sold with the water, buyers
claiming the exemption provided in this section must provide the seller
with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of bottled water dispensed or to be dispensed to patients, pursuant
to a prescription for use in the cure, mitigation, treatment, or
prevention of disease or medical condition.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "prescription" has the same
meaning as provided in section 203 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to the conditions in this section, the tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of bottled water to persons whose
primary source of drinking water is unsafe.
(b) For purposes of this subsection and section 206 of this act, a
person's primary source of drinking water is unsafe if:
(i) The public water system providing the drinking water has issued
a public notification that the drinking water may pose a health risk,
and the notification is still in effect on the date that the bottled
water was purchased;
(ii) Test results on the person's drinking water, which are no more
than twelve months old, from a laboratory certified to perform drinking
water testing show that the person's drinking water does not meet safe
drinking water standards applicable to public water systems; or
(iii) The person otherwise establishes, to the department's
satisfaction, that the person's drinking water does not meet safe
drinking water standards applicable to public water systems.
(2) Except for sales of bottled water delivered to the buyer in a
reusable container that is not sold with the water, sellers must
collect tax on sales subject to this exemption. Any buyer that has
paid at least twenty-five dollars in state and local sales taxes on
purchases of bottled water subject to this exemption may apply for a
refund of the taxes directly from the department in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The department must deny any refund
application if the amount of the refund requested is less than
twenty-five dollars. No refund may be made for taxes paid more than
four years after the end of the calendar year in which the tax was paid
to the seller.
(3) The provisions of RCW 82.32.060 apply to refunds authorized
under this section.
(4)(a) With respect to sales of bottled water delivered to the
buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with the water, buyers
claiming the exemption provided in this section must provide the seller
with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files.
(b) The department may waive the requirement for an exemption
certificate in the event of disaster or similar circumstance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of bottled water by persons whose primary source of drinking water is
unsafe as provided in section 205 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By the last workday of the second and fourth calendar quarters,
the state treasurer must transfer the amount specified in subsection
(2) of this section from the general fund to the education legacy trust
account. The first transfer under this subsection (1) must occur by
December 31, 2014.
(2) By December 15th and by June 15th of each year, the department
must estimate the increase in state general fund revenues from the
changes made under sections 201 through 206, chapter . . ., Laws of
2014 (sections 201 through 206 of this act) for the current and prior
calendar quarters and notify the state treasurer of the increase.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 A new section is added to chapter 43.135
RCW to read as follows:
RCW 43.135.034(4) does not apply to the transfers under section 207
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 A new section is added to chapter 39.42
RCW to read as follows:
The purpose of eliminating the sales and use tax exemption for
bottled water in sections 201 and 202 of this act is to support
education-related expenditures from the education legacy trust account.
For this reason, general state revenues transferred to the education
legacy trust account under section 207 of this act are excluded from
the calculation of general state revenues for purposes of Article VIII,
section 1 of the state Constitution and RCW 39.42.130 and 39.42.140.

PART III
Repealing the Preferential B&O Tax Rate for Sellers of Prescription
Drugs
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 RCW 82.04.272 (Tax on warehousing and
reselling prescription drugs) and 2013 c 19 s 127, 2003 c 168 s 401, &
1998 c 343 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Section 301 of this act applies to taxes due for reporting
periods beginning on or after the effective date of section 301 of this
act.
(2) Seventy-one and one-half percent of the taxes collected under
this chapter on the warehousing and reselling of prescription drugs for
human use pursuant to a prescription must be deposited in the education
legacy trust account and the remainder to the state general fund. The
department must establish a separate reporting line and code for taxes
collected under this chapter with respect to such activities.

PART IV
Repealing the Nonresident Sales and Use Tax Exemption
Sec. 401 RCW 82.08.0273 and 2011 c 7 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions and limitations in this section, an
exemption from the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((does not apply to)) in
the form of a remittance from the department is provided for sales to
nonresidents of this state of tangible personal property, digital
goods, and digital codes((, when)). The exemption only applies if:
(a) The property is for use outside this state;
(b) The purchaser is a bona fide resident of a province or
territory of Canada or a state, territory, or possession of the United
States, other than the state of Washington; and
(i) Such state, possession, territory, or province does not impose,
or have imposed on its behalf, a generally applicable retail sales tax,
use tax, value added tax, gross receipts tax on retailing activities,
or similar generally applicable tax, of three percent or more; or
(ii) If imposing a tax described in (b)(i) of this subsection,
provides an exemption for sales to Washington residents by reason of
their residence; and
(c) The purchaser agrees, when requested, to grant the department
of revenue access to such records and other forms of verification at
((his or her)) the purchaser's place of residence to assure that such
purchases are not first used substantially in the state of Washington.
(2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, if
parts or other tangible personal property are installed by the seller
during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving motor
vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a separate charge
for the tangible personal property, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
does not apply to the separately stated charge to a nonresident
purchaser for the tangible personal property but only if the separately
stated charge does not exceed either the seller's current publicly
stated retail price for the tangible personal property or, if no
publicly stated retail price is available, the seller's cost for the
tangible personal property. However, the exemption provided by this
section does not apply if tangible personal property is installed by
the seller during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving motor vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a
single nonitemized charge for providing the tangible personal property
and service. All of the ((requirements)) provisions in subsections (1)
and (3) through (((6))) (7) of this section apply to this subsection.
(3)(a) Any person claiming exemption from retail sales tax under
the provisions of this section must ((display proof of his or her
current nonresident status as provided in this section)) pay the state
and local sales tax to the seller at the time of purchase and then
request a remittance from the department in accordance with this
subsection and subsection (4) of this section. A request for
remittance must include proof of the person's status as a nonresident
at the time of the purchase for which a remittance is requested. The
request for a remittance must also include any additional information
and documentation as required by the department, which may include a
description of the item purchased for which a remittance is requested,
the sales price of the item, the amount of state and local sales tax
paid on the item, the date of the purchase, the name of the seller and
the physical address where the sale took place, and copies of sales
receipts showing the qualified purchases.
(b) Acceptable proof of a nonresident person's status includes one
piece of identification such as a valid driver's license from the
jurisdiction in which the out-of-state residency is claimed or a valid
identification card which has a photograph of the holder and is issued
by the out-of-state jurisdiction. Identification under this subsection
(3)(b) must show the holder's residential address and have as one of
its legal purposes the establishment of residency in that out-of-state
jurisdiction.
(c) In lieu of furnishing proof of a person's nonresident status
under (b) of this subsection (3), a person claiming exemption from
retail sales tax under the provisions of this section may provide the
seller with an exemption certificate in compliance with subsection
(4)(b) of this section.
(4)(a) ((Nothing in this section requires the vendor to make tax
exempt retail sales to nonresidents. A vendor may choose to make sales
to nonresidents, collect the sales tax, and remit the amount of sales
tax collected to the state as otherwise provided by law. If the vendor
chooses to make a sale to a nonresident without collecting the sales
tax, the vendor must examine the purchaser's proof of nonresidence,
determine whether the proof is acceptable under subsection (3)(b) of
this section, and maintain records for each nontaxable sale which shall
show the type of proof accepted, including any identification numbers
where appropriate, and the expiration date, if any.
(b) In lieu of using the method provided in (a) of this subsection
to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller may accept from
the purchaser a properly completed uniform exemption certificate
approved by the streamlined sales and use tax agreement governing board
or any other exemption certificate as may be authorized by the
department and properly completed by the purchaser. A nonresident
purchaser who uses an exemption certificate authorized in this
subsection (4)(b) must include the purchaser's driver's license number
or other state-issued identification number and the state of issuance.
(c) In lieu of using the methods provided in (a) and (b) of this
subsection to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller may
capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the streamlined
sales and use tax agreement.
(5)(a) Any person making fraudulent statements, which includes the
offer of fraudulent identification or fraudulently procured
identification to a vendor, in order to purchase goods without paying
retail sales tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.
(b) Any person making tax exempt purchases under this section by
displaying proof of identification not his or her own, or counterfeit
identification, with intent to violate the provisions of this section,
is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable for the tax and
subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the
tax due on such purchases.
(6)(a) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the tax and
who fails to maintain records of sales to nonresidents as provided in
this section is personally liable for the amount of tax due.
(b) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the retail sales
tax under this section and who has actual knowledge that the
purchaser's proof of identification establishing out-of-state residency
is fraudulent is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable
for the tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one
thousand dollars or the tax due on such sales. In addition, both the
purchaser and the vendor are liable for any penalties and interest
assessable under chapter 82.32 RCW.)) (i) Beginning January 1, 2015,
through December 31, 2015, a person may request a remittance from the
department for state and local sales taxes paid by the person on
qualified retail purchases made in Washington between June 1, 2014, and
December 31, 2014.
(ii) Beginning January 1, 2016, a person may request a remittance
from the department during any calendar year for state and local sales
taxes paid by the person on qualified retail purchases made in
Washington during the immediately preceding calendar year only. No
application may be made with respect to purchases made before the
immediately preceding calendar year.
(b) The remittance request, including proof of nonresident status
and any other documentation and information required by the department,
must be made using an electronic application process as prescribed by
the department. Only one remittance request may be made by a person
per calendar year.
(c) The total amount of a remittance request must be at least
twenty-five dollars. The department must deny any request for a
remittance that is less than twenty-five dollars.
(d) The department will examine the applicant's proof of
nonresident status and any other documentation and information as
required in the application to determine whether the applicant is
entitled to a remittance under this section.
(5)(a) Any person making fraudulent statements to the department,
which includes the offer of fraudulent or fraudulently procured
identification or fraudulent sales receipts, in order to receive a
remittance of retail sales tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72
RCW.
(b) Any person requesting a remittance of sales tax from the
department by providing proof of identification or sales receipts not
the person's own, or counterfeit identification or sales receipts, with
intent to violate the provisions of this section, is guilty of a
misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable for the tax and subject to a
penalty equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the tax due on
such purchases.
(6) The exemption provided by this section is for both state and
local sales taxes. For purposes of this section, "local sales tax"
means a sales tax imposed by a local government under the authority of
chapter 82.14 RCW, RCW 81.104.170, or other provision of law, and which
is imposed on the same taxable event as the state sales tax imposed in
this chapter.
(7) A nonresident who receives a refund of sales tax from the
seller for any reason with respect to a purchase made in this state is
not entitled to a remittance for the tax paid on the purchase. A
person who receives both a remittance under this section and a refund
from the seller with respect to the same purchase must immediately
repay the remittance to the department. Interest as provided in
chapter 82.32 RCW applies to amounts due under this section from the
date that the department made the remittance until the amount due under
this subsection is paid to the department. A person who receives a
remittance with respect to a purchase for which the person had, at the
time the person submitted the application for a remittance, already
received a refund of sales tax from the seller is also liable for the
evasion penalty in RCW 82.32.090(7) and is ineligible to receive any
further remittances from the department under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By the last workday of the second and fourth calendar quarters,
the state treasurer must transfer the amount specified in subsection
(2) of this section from the general fund to the education legacy trust
account. The first transfer under this subsection (1) must occur by
December 31, 2014.
(2) By December 15th and by June 15th of each year, the department
must estimate the increase in state general fund revenues from the
changes made under section 401, chapter . . ., Laws of 2014 (section
401 of this act) for the current and prior calendar quarters and notify
the state treasurer of the increase.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 A new section is added to chapter 43.135
RCW to read as follows:
RCW 43.135.034(4) does not apply to the transfers under section 402
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 A new section is added to chapter 39.42
RCW to read as follows:
The purpose of narrowing the nonresident sales and use tax
exemption in section 401, chapter . . ., Laws of 2014 (section 401 of
this act) is to support education-related expenditures from the
education legacy trust account. For this reason, general state
revenues transferred to the education legacy trust account under
section 402 of this act are excluded from the calculation of general
state revenues for purposes of Article VIII, section 1 of the state
Constitution and RCW 39.42.130 and 39.42.140.

PART V
Miscellaneous Provisions
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2014.

--- END ---