BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature finds that school
districts are strapped for the physical space to meet education funding
reforms as provided in chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 2261) and chapter 236, Laws of 2010 (Substitute House
Bill No. 2776), as interpreted in McCleary v. State, related to all-day
kindergarten and K-3 class size reduction. The legislature further
finds that a program of near-term state grants without a local match
requirement will assist school districts to provide these new programs
by the scheduled full implementation date of the 2017-18 school year.
The legislature further finds that school districts will need
flexibility in determining the most appropriate construction method to
accommodate the additional classroom space, including permanent
construction, modular construction, or portables. The legislature
further finds that the use of lottery revenues for common schools is
consistent with the construction objectives of chapter 3, Laws of 2001
(Initiative Measure No. 728). Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature to authorize seven hundred million dollars in lottery
revenue bonds for grants to school districts to support the physical
capacity required for statewide implementation of all-day kindergarten
and K-3 class size reduction beginning with the 2015-2017 fiscal
biennium.

PART II
BOND AUTHORIZATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 LOTTERY REVENUE BONDS AUTHORIZED. (1) For
the purpose of providing needed construction assistance to support
all-day kindergarten and K-3 class size reduction, the state finance
committee is authorized to issue a total of seven hundred seven million
dollars of lottery revenue bonds, or as much thereof as may be
required, payable from the Washington opportunity pathways account
revenues under RCW 28B.76.526, which consist of net lottery revenues
deposited in the lottery account created in RCW 67.70.230, and net
shared game lottery revenues deposited in the shared game lottery
account in RCW 67.70.044, as such revenues are defined in section 202
of this act, to finance these projects and all costs incidental
thereto.
(2) Bonds authorized in this section may be sold at such price as
the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds authorized in
this section may be offered for sale without prior legislative
appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.
(3) The state finance committee may determine and include in any
resolution authorizing the issuance of any bonds authorized by this
section and sections 202 through 207 of this act such terms,
provisions, covenants, and conditions as it may deem appropriate in
order to assist with the marketing and sale of the bonds, confer rights
upon the owners of bonds, and safeguard rights of the owners of bonds,
including, among other things:
(a) Provisions that the bonds shall be payable solely from and
secured solely by the Washington opportunity pathways account revenues
under RCW 28B.76.526, as such revenues are defined in section 202 of
this act;
(b) The conditions that must be satisfied prior to the issuance of
any additional bonds that are to be payable from and secured by the
Washington opportunity pathways account revenues, as such revenues are
defined in section 202 of this act, on equal basis with previously
issued and outstanding bonds payable from the net lottery revenues and
net shared game lottery revenues;
(c) Provisions regarding debt service reserves and credit
enhancement; and
(d) Whether bonds may be issued as tax-exempt bonds or must be
issued as taxable bonds under the applicable provisions of the federal
internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 WASHINGTON OPPORTUNITY PATHWAYS
ACCOUNT/LOTTERY REVENUES PLEDGED TO BONDS. (1) Each bond issued under
the authority of this section and sections 201 and 203 through 207 of
this act shall distinctly state that payment or redemption of the bond
and payment of the interest and any premium thereon is payable solely
from and secured solely by a pledge of the Washington opportunity
pathways account revenues under RCW 28B.76.526, which consist of net
lottery revenues received in the lottery account established in RCW
67.70.230 and net shared game lottery revenues received in the shared
game lottery account in RCW 67.70.044 and is not a general obligation
of the state to which the full faith and credit of the state is
pledged. The legislature covenants to appropriate the Washington
opportunity pathways account revenues pledged to the payment of the
bonds issued under this section and sections 201 and 203 through 207 of
this act. The legislature further agrees for the benefit of the owners
of outstanding bonds issued by the state under this section and
sections 201 and 203 through 207 of this act to continue in effect and
not to impair the operation of the state lottery as authorized in
chapter 67.70 RCW for the payment and security of the bonds. The state
finance committee shall include this pledge and agreement of the state
to owners of any bonds issued under this section and sections 201 and
203 through 207 of this act. The owner of any bond or the trustee for
the owner of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate
proceeding require the transfer and payment of pledged revenues as
directed in this section.
(2) For purposes of this section and sections 201 and 203 through
209 of this act:
(a) "Washington opportunity pathways account revenues" means all
revenues of the Washington opportunity pathways account in RCW
28B.76.526 including, but not limited to, net lottery revenues and net
shared game lottery revenues;
(b) "Net lottery revenues" means all revenues deposited in the
lottery account, excluding revenues used to make the following
distributions under RCW 67.70.240: Payment of prizes under RCW
67.70.240(1)(a) other than unclaimed prizes under RCW 67.70.190;
deposits made by the lottery commission in the reserve account and
lottery administrative account under RCW 67.70.240(1)(b); amounts
obligated under RCW 67.70.240(1)(d); amounts used for the purchase and
promotion of games and services under RCW 67.70.240(1)(e); and payments
to agents under RCW 67.70.240(1)(f); and
(c) "Net shared game lottery revenues" means all moneys deposited
in the shared game lottery account in RCW 67.70.044 excluding direct
expenses of the shared game.

Sec. 203 RCW 67.70.230 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 941 are each
amended to read as follows:
NET LOTTERY REVENUES PLEDGED TO BONDS. There is hereby created and
established a separate account, to be known as the state lottery
account. Such account shall be managed, maintained, and controlled by
the commission and shall consist of all revenues received from the sale
of lottery tickets or shares, and all other moneys credited or
transferred thereto from any other fund or source pursuant to law. The
account shall be a separate account outside the state treasury. No
appropriation is required to permit expenditures and payment of
obligations from the account. ((During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer from the state lottery account to the
education legacy trust account such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance of the account.)) As set forth in section 202 of this act, net
lottery revenues are pledged to principal and interest payments on
bonds issued under section 201 of this act, including any required
reserves as provided in the bond proceedings, and must be transferred
for this purpose by the state treasurer into the Washington opportunity
pathways account in RCW 28B.76.526.

Sec. 204 RCW 67.70.044 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 940 are each
amended to read as follows:
NET SHARED GAME LOTTERY REVENUES PLEDGED TO BONDS. (1) Pursuant to
RCW 67.70.040(1)(a), the commission may enter into the multistate
agreement establishing a shared game lottery known as "The Big Game,"
that was entered into by party state lotteries in August 1996 and
subsequently amended and a shared game lottery known as "Powerball."
(2) The shared game lottery account is created as a separate
account outside the state treasury. The account is managed,
maintained, and controlled by the commission and consists of all
revenues received from the sale of shared game lottery tickets or
shares, and all other moneys credited or transferred to it from any
other fund or source under law. The account is allotted according to
chapter 43.88 RCW. ((During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the shared game lottery account to the
education legacy trust account such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance of the account.))
(3) As set forth in section 202 of this act, net shared game
lottery revenues deposited in the shared game lottery account are
pledged to principal and interest payments on bonds issued under
section 201 of this act, including any required reserves as provided in
the bond proceedings, and must be transferred for this purpose by the
state treasurer into the Washington opportunity pathways account in RCW
28B.76.526.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 BOND PROCEEDS DEPOSITED INTO EDUCATION
CONSTRUCTION REVENUE BOND PROCEEDS ACCOUNT. The proceeds from the sale
of bonds authorized in section 201 of this act shall be deposited in
the education construction revenue bond proceeds account hereby created
in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation and only for the purposes stated in section 201 of this
act, for the payment of bond anticipation notes or other interim
financing, if any, capitalizing interest on the bonds, and payment of
expenses incurred in the sale and issuance of the bonds, including
underwriter compensation. The state treasurer may establish
subaccounts in the account for the purpose of segregating bond
proceeds, including separate subaccounts for segregating proceeds of
tax-exempt bonds and taxable bonds.

Sec. 206 RCW 28B.76.526 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 27 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
WASHINGTON OPPORTUNITY PATHWAYS ACCOUNT; PRIORITY PLEDGE OF
REVENUES TO BONDS. (1) The Washington opportunity pathways account is
created in the state treasury. Deposits to the account must include
net lottery revenues as defined in section 202 of this act that are
required to be deposited in the account pursuant to RCW 67.70.230, net
shared game lottery revenues as defined in section 202 of this act that
are required to be deposited in the account pursuant to RCW 67.70.044,
and any other amounts directed by the legislature to be transferred to
or deposited in the account.
(2) As set forth in sections 202, 208, and 209 of this act, net
lottery revenues and net shared game lottery revenues deposited in the
account are pledged to principal and interest payments on bonds issued
under section 201 of this act, including any required reserves as
provided in the bond proceedings. This pledge of Washington
opportunity pathways account revenues to pay and secure bonds issued
under section 201 of this act takes priority over the use of Washington
opportunity pathways account revenues to make any other expenditures
from the account for any other purpose. Before any other expenditures
may be made from the account, moneys in the account must have been
expended or set aside on or before the applicable payment date for debt
service requirements and debt service reserve requirements of the bonds
issued under section 201 of this act in the amounts certified from time
to time by the state finance committee pursuant to section 207 of this
act. The state finance committee in the bond proceedings may provide
for the establishment of a special subaccount in the account to serve
as a debt service reserve fund for bonds issued under section 201 of
this act.
(3) After applicable debt service requirements and debt service
reserve requirements for bonds issued under section 201 of this act
have been satisfied or provided for pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, other expenditures from the account may be used only for
programs in chapter 28B.12 RCW (state work-study), chapter 28B.50 RCW
(opportunity grant), RCW 28B.76.660 (Washington scholars award), RCW
28B.76.670 (Washington award for vocational excellence), chapter 28B.92
RCW (state need grant program), chapter 28B.101 RCW (educational
opportunity grant), chapter 28B.105 RCW (GET ready for math and science
scholarship), chapter 28B.117 RCW (passport to college promise),
chapter 28B.118 RCW (college bound scholarship), chapter 28B.119 RCW
(Washington promise scholarship), chapter 43.215 RCW (early childhood
education and assistance program), and RCW 43.330.280 (recruitment of
entrepreneurial researchers, innovation partnership zones and research
teams).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 RETIREMENT OF BONDS. (1) The nondebt-limit bond retirement account shall be used for the payment of
principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in section 201 of
this act.
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount required for
principal and interest payments on the bonds and the amounts, if any,
required for the funding or replenishment of any debt service reserve
fund for the bonds in accordance with the bond proceedings.
(3) On each date on which any principal and interest payment is due
on bonds or on which any amount is required for the funding or
replenishment of any debt service reserve fund for bonds issued for the
purposes of section 201 of this act, the state treasurer shall withdraw
from the Washington opportunity pathways account an amount equal to the
amount certified by the state finance committee to be due or required
on such date.

Sec. 208 RCW 67.70.240 and 2013 c 136 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
DISTRIBUTION OF LOTTERY REVENUES. (1) The moneys in the state
lottery account may be used only:
(a) For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning lottery
tickets or shares;
(b) For purposes of making deposits into the reserve account
created by RCW 67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative account
created by RCW 67.70.260;
(c) ((For purposes of making deposits into the Washington
opportunity pathways account created in RCW 28B.76.526. Moneys in the
state lottery account deposited in the Washington opportunity pathways
account are included in "general state revenues" under RCW 39.42.070;))
For deposits in the Washington opportunity pathways account for
purposes of debt service payments and any required reserve on bonds
issued under section 201 of this act and for other authorized purposes
of the account after such payments are made;
(d) For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account,
created in RCW 43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW
43.99N.070, six million dollars must be distributed under this
subsection during the calendar year 1998. During subsequent years,
such distribution must equal the prior year's distributions increased
by four percent. No distribution may be made under this subsection
after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of the
bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this
subsection must cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than
December 31, 2020;
(e) For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services; and
(f) For the payment of agent compensation.
(2) The office of financial management shall require the allotment
of all expenses paid from the account and shall report to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives any changes
in the allotments.

Sec. 209 RCW 67.70.340 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 10 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
DISTRIBUTION OF SHARED GAME REVENUES. (1) ((The legislature
recognizes that creating a shared game lottery could result in less
revenue being raised by the existing state lottery ticket sales. The
legislature further recognizes that the fund most impacted by this
potential event is the Washington opportunity pathways account.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to use some of the
proceeds from the shared game lottery to make up the difference that
the potential state lottery revenue loss would have on the Washington
opportunity pathways account. The legislature further intends to use
some of the proceeds from the shared game lottery to fund programs and
services related to problem and pathological gambling.
(2) The Washington opportunity pathways account is expected to
receive one hundred two million dollars annually from state lottery
games other than the shared game lottery. For fiscal year 2011 and
thereafter, if the amount of lottery revenues earmarked for the
Washington opportunity pathways account is less than one hundred two
million dollars, the commission, after making the transfer required
under subsection (3) of this section, must transfer sufficient moneys
from revenues derived from the shared game lottery into the Washington
opportunity pathways account to bring the total revenue up to one
hundred two million dollars.
(3))) If at any time the amount available to be transferred from
the state lottery account in RCW 67.70.240 to the Washington
opportunity pathways account pursuant to section 207 of this act is
insufficient to satisfy the amount certified under RCW 28B.76.526, then
before the commission may make any transfers under this section the
treasurer must transfer net shared game lottery revenues from the
shared game lottery account to the Washington opportunity pathways
account.
(a) The commission shall transfer, from revenue derived from the
shared game lottery, to the problem gambling account created in RCW
43.20A.892, an amount equal to the percentage specified in (b) of this
subsection of net receipts. For purposes of this subsection, "net
receipts" means the difference between (i) revenue received from the
sale of lottery tickets or shares and revenue received from the sale of
shared game lottery tickets or shares; and (ii) the sum of payments
made to winners.
(b) In fiscal year 2006, the percentage to be transferred to the
problem gambling account is one-tenth of one percent. In fiscal year
2007 and subsequent fiscal years, the percentage to be transferred to
the problem gambling account is thirteen one-hundredths of one percent.
(((4))) (2) The commission shall transfer the remaining net
revenues, if any, derived from the shared game lottery "Powerball"
authorized in RCW 67.70.044(1) after the transfers pursuant to this
section into the state general fund for support for the program of
basic education under RCW 28A.150.200.
(((5))) (3) The remaining net revenues, if any, in the shared game
lottery account after the transfers pursuant to this section shall be
deposited into the Washington opportunity pathways account.

Sec. 210 RCW 67.70.040 and 2006 c 290 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
LOTTERY COMMISSION DUTIES. The commission shall have the power,
and it shall be its duty:
(1) To adopt rules governing the establishment and operation of a
state lottery as it deems necessary and desirable in order that such a
lottery be initiated at the earliest feasible and practicable time, and
in order that such lottery produce the maximum amount of net revenues
for the state consonant with the dignity of the state and the general
welfare of the people. Such rules shall include, but shall not be
limited to, the following:
(a) The type of lottery to be conducted which may include the
selling of tickets or shares, but such tickets or shares may not be
sold over the internet. The use of electronic or mechanical devices or
video terminals which allow for individual play against such devices or
terminals shall be prohibited. An affirmative vote of sixty percent of
both houses of the legislature is required before offering any game
allowing or requiring a player to become eligible for a prize or to
otherwise play any portion of the game by interacting with any device
or terminal involving digital, video, or other electronic
representations of any game of chance, including scratch tickets, pull-tabs, bingo, poker or other cards, dice, roulette, keno, or slot
machines. Approval of the legislature shall be required before
entering any agreement with other state lotteries to conduct shared
games;
(b) The price, or prices, of tickets or shares in the lottery;
(c) The numbers and sizes of the prizes on the winning tickets or
shares;
(d) The manner of selecting the winning tickets or shares, except
as limited by (a) of this subsection;
(e) The manner and time of payment of prizes to the holder of
winning tickets or shares which, at the director's option, may be paid
in lump sum amounts or installments over a period of years;
(f) The frequency of the drawings or selections of winning tickets
or shares. Approval of the legislature is required before conducting
any online game in which the drawing or selection of winning tickets
occurs more frequently than once every twenty-four hours;
(g) Without limit as to number, the type or types of locations at
which tickets or shares may be sold;
(h) The method to be used in selling tickets or shares, except as
limited by (a) of this subsection;
(i) The licensing of agents to sell or distribute tickets or
shares, except that a person under the age of eighteen shall not be
licensed as an agent;
(j) The manner and amount of compensation, if any, to be paid
licensed sales agents necessary to provide for the adequate
availability of tickets or shares to prospective buyers and for the
convenience of the public;
(k) The apportionment of the total revenues accruing from the sale
of lottery tickets or shares and from all other sources among: (i) The
payment of prizes to the holders of winning tickets or shares, which
shall not be less than forty-five percent of the gross annual revenue
from such lottery, (ii) transfers to the lottery administrative account
created by RCW 67.70.260, ((and)) (iii) ((transfer to the state's
general fund. Transfers to the state general fund shall be made in
compliance with RCW 43.01.050)) transfers of net lottery revenues and
net shared game lottery revenues to the Washington opportunity pathways
account as required by sections 202 through 204, 206, and 207 of this
act, and (iv) transfers established in RCW 67.70.240 and 67.70.340;
(l) Such other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and
economical operation and administration of the lottery and for the
convenience of the purchasers of tickets or shares and the holders of
winning tickets or shares.
(2) To ensure that in each place authorized to sell lottery tickets
or shares, on the back of the ticket or share, and in any advertising
or promotion there shall be conspicuously displayed an estimate of the
probability of purchasing a winning ticket.
(3) To amend, repeal, or supplement any such rules from time to
time as it deems necessary or desirable.
(4) To advise and make recommendations to the director for the
operation and administration of the lottery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 ANALYSIS OF FINANCING STRUCTURE. (1) The
state finance committee and the office of financial management must
conduct an objective analysis of the most effective financing structure
for the lottery revenue bonds authorized in section 201 of this act.
(2) In conducting the objective analysis, the state finance
committee and the office of financial management must review data,
information, and analysis from multiple sources, including consultation
with a minimum of five firms with expertise in helping state and local
governments organize and manage a wide variety of financing structures,
including revenue bonds.
(3) The objective analysis must consider and rate options designed
to:
(a) Maximize the amount of bond proceeds available to address all-day kindergarten and K-3 class size reduction facility needs;
(b) Leverage lottery revenues in a manner that would cause the
bonds to be rated at the highest investment grade possible;
(c) Achieve the lowest cost of issuance; and
(d) Strengthen the issuance and its marketability to investors by
considering terms of borrowing such as maturity, debt service reserves,
coverage ratios, legal covenants, and other credit enhancements.
(4) The state finance committee and the office of financial
management shall provide a report to the legislature by December 1,
2014, that includes the options considered and recommendations on the
preferred financing structure for the lottery revenue bonds.

PART III
GRANT PROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--GRANT PROGRAM PREPARATION. (1) The legislature intends to provide
funding in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium for grants to school districts
to address the physical capacity required for statewide implementation
of all-day kindergarten and K-3 class size reduction.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
establish a plan for grant allocations that considers the following
criteria: Public schools must demonstrate the existence of unhoused K-3 students based on a ninety square feet student space allocation per
enrolled student in a public school.
(3)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may
award grants to school districts for the following types of projects:
(i) Projects to modernize existing building space; (ii) projects to
build permanent instructional space; (iii) the purchase and
installation of modular facilities; and (iv) the purchase and
installation of portable facilities.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Modular facility" means a factory-built structure, whether a
total building or a room, which is either wholly manufactured or is in
substantial part manufactured at an off-site location to be wholly or
partially assembled on-site. Modular facility does not include mobile
homes or manufactured homes as defined in RCW 46.04.302; and
(ii) "Portable facility" means a prefabricated structure consisting
of one or more rooms with direct exterior egress from the classroom or
classrooms. The structure is transportable in one or more sections and
is designed to be used as an educational space with or without a
permanent foundation. The structure is capable of being demounted and
relocated to other locations as needs arise.
(4) One hundred percent of the project costs are eligible for
grants under this section.
(5) Grants must be awarded solely for instructional space used by
K-3 students.
(6) Subject to the approval of the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, grant awards to a school district under this
section for a project at an identified public school may be reallocated
for use at another public school, including reopening an existing
school building within the district if the school can demonstrate it is
unable to build permanent space, or install a modular or portable
facility at the identified school.
(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop rules to implement the grant program authorized under this
section.
(8) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2014, describing: Estimated need for
additional classrooms to address all-day kindergarten and K-3 class
size reduction by school; implementation timelines; and proposed rules.

PART IV
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 CODIFICATION. Sections 201, 202, 205, and
207 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 EFFECTIVE DATE. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---