BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.47.110 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 84 are each
amended to read as follows:
The health care authority may make payments to ((participating))
managed health care systems, as defined in RCW 74.09.522 or in this
chapter, on behalf of any ((enrollee)) person who is a recipient of
medical care under chapter 74.09 RCW, ((at)) up to the maximum rate
allowable for federal matching purposes under Title XIX of the social
security act. Any enrollee on whose behalf the health care authority
makes such payments may continue as an enrollee, making premium
payments based on the enrollee's own income as determined under the
sliding scale, after eligibility for coverage under chapter 74.09 RCW
has ended, as long as the enrollee remains eligible under this chapter.
Nothing in this section affects the right of any person eligible for
coverage under chapter 74.09 RCW to receive the services offered to
other persons under that chapter but not included in the schedule of
basic health care services covered by the plan. The director shall
seek to determine which enrollees or prospective enrollees may be
eligible for medical care under chapter 74.09 RCW and may require these
individuals to complete the eligibility determination process under
chapter 74.09 RCW prior to enrollment or continued participation in the
plan. The director shall adopt procedures to facilitate the transition
of plan enrollees and payments on their behalf between the plan and the
programs established under chapter 74.09 RCW.

--- END ---