BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Article IX of the state Constitution
confers that the paramount duty of the state is to make ample provision
for the education of children within the state. In 2012, the
Washington supreme court ruled in McCleary v. the State of Washington
that the state has not met its constitutionally enshrined paramount
duty to fully fund basic education.
(2) In recognition of the benefits of positioning the state as a
leader in climate policy, the 2008 legislature adopted limits for
greenhouse gas emissions in Washington for the years 2020, 2035, and
2050. Recent analyses by the department of ecology and independent
consultants of projected future greenhouse gas emissions indicate that
without the adoption of new policies to cap greenhouse gas emissions or
create an incentive for reduced emissions the state will be very
unlikely to achieve its greenhouse gas emissions limits in 2020, 2035,
and 2050.
(3) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to place a price
on carbon in order to help the state meet its greenhouse gas emissions
limits and to generate the billions of dollars in revenue that will be
needed to help the state comply with the constitutional requirement to
amply fund basic education, the Washington supreme court decision in
McCleary v. the State of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Coal" means bituminous coal, subbituminous coal, lignite, and
coke.
(2) "Fossil fuel" means coal, natural gas, crude oil, and petroleum
products.
(3) "First taxable event" means:
(a) The first possession of natural gas acquired by a gas
distribution business;
(b) The first possession of natural gas acquired by a person
subject to the tax under RCW 82.12.022 with respect to such natural
gas;
(c) The first possession of coal acquired by a person using the
coal for the generation of electricity, heat, or steam within the state
of Washington;
(d) The first possession of a petroleum product subject to tax
under chapter 82.21 RCW;
(e) The purchase or import from outside of Washington by a light
and power business of electricity generated by the use of fossil fuels;
and
(f) The use of fossil fuels by a facility in Washington that
results in carbon dioxide emissions in conjunction with the process of
distilling, fractionating, refining, or processing of crude oil or
petroleum products.
(4) "Gas distribution business" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 82.16.010.
(5) "Light and power business" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 82.16.010.
(6) "Petroleum product" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.21.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as provided in section 4 of this
act, there is levied and imposed, at the time of the first taxable
event and upon the first taxable person within this state, a fossil
fuel carbon pollution tax upon the carbon content of fossil fuels
extracted, manufactured, or introduced into this state equal to:
(a) Beginning July 1, 2015, until July 1, 2017, ten dollars per
metric ton of carbon dioxide; and
(b) Beginning July 1, 2017, and thereafter, twenty dollars per
metric ton of carbon dioxide.
(2) The department must calculate the carbon content of fossil
fuels, in consultation with the department of ecology, by using
relevant methods based on those established by the United States
department of energy or the United States environmental protection
agency. The department must develop and make available worksheets and
guidance documents necessary to calculate the carbon content of fossil
fuels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The following fossil fuels are exempt
from the fossil fuel carbon pollution tax imposed under this chapter:
(a) Fossil fuels used for air or marine travel between Washington
and a jurisdiction outside the geographic borders of Washington;
(b) Fossil fuels purchased in Washington for export for use outside
of Washington; and
(c) Fossil fuels brought into this state by means of the fuel
supply tank of a motor vehicle, vessel, locomotive, or aircraft.
(2)(a) The fossil fuel carbon pollution tax rates provided in
section 3 of this act must be reduced for any fossil fuel extraction,
manufacturing, or introduction when the taxable person can demonstrate
to the department's satisfaction that the environmental effects of the
extraction, manufacturing, or introduction have been offset through
participation by the taxable person in a carbon sequestration program
or activity.
(b) Any reductions to the fossil fuel carbon pollution tax rates
due under this section may not be considered a credit and may not be
transferred, traded, or banked.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 All taxes collected under the fossil fuel
carbon pollution tax imposed under this chapter must be deposited in
the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The fossil fuel carbon pollution tax
imposed under this chapter is to be collected in addition to all other
taxes imposed on fossil fuels.
(2) To the extent practical, the department must integrate the
administration and collection of the fossil fuel carbon pollution taxes
imposed under this chapter with the administration and collection of
other taxes imposed on the taxpayer. The administrative provisions of
chapter 82.32 RCW apply to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department must adopt and maintain rules
to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

--- END ---