BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.070 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 26 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
The comprehensive plan of a county or city that is required or
chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall consist of a map or maps,
and descriptive text covering objectives, principles, and standards
used to develop the comprehensive plan. The plan shall be an
internally consistent document and all elements shall be consistent
with the future land use map. A comprehensive plan shall be adopted
and amended with public participation as provided in RCW 36.70A.140.
Each comprehensive plan shall include a plan, scheme, or design for
each of the following:
(1) A land use element designating the proposed general
distribution and general location and extent of the uses of land, where
appropriate, for agriculture, timber production, housing, commerce,
industry, recreation, open spaces, general aviation airports, public
utilities, public facilities, and other land uses. The land use
element shall include population densities, building intensities, and
estimates of future population growth. The land use element shall
provide for protection of the quality and quantity of groundwater used
for public water supplies. Wherever possible, the land use element
should consider utilizing urban planning approaches that promote
physical activity. Where applicable, the land use element shall review
drainage, flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby
jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate
or cleanse those discharges that pollute waters of the state, including
Puget Sound or waters entering Puget Sound.
(2) A housing element ensuring the vitality and character of
established residential neighborhoods that: (a) Includes an inventory
and analysis of existing and projected housing needs that identifies
the number of housing units necessary to manage projected growth; (b)
includes a statement of goals, policies, objectives, and mandatory
provisions for the preservation, improvement, and development of
housing, including single-family residences; (c) identifies sufficient
land for housing, including, but not limited to, government-assisted
housing, housing for low-income families, manufactured housing,
multifamily housing, and group homes and foster care facilities; and
(d) makes adequate provisions for existing and projected needs of all
economic segments of the community.
(3) A capital facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An
inventory of existing capital facilities owned by public entities,
showing the locations and capacities of the capital facilities; (b) a
forecast of the future needs for such capital facilities; (c) the
proposed locations and capacities of expanded or new capital
facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such capital
facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies
sources of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to
reassess the land use element if probable funding falls short of
meeting existing needs and to ensure that the land use element, capital
facilities plan element, and financing plan within the capital
facilities plan element are coordinated and consistent. Park and
recreation facilities shall be included in the capital facilities plan
element.
(4) A utilities element consisting of the general location,
proposed location, and capacity of all existing and proposed utilities,
including, but not limited to, electrical lines, telecommunication
lines, and natural gas lines.
(5) Rural element. Counties shall include a rural element
including lands that are not designated for urban growth, agriculture,
forest, or mineral resources. The following provisions shall apply to
the rural element:
(a) Growth management act goals and local circumstances. Because
circumstances vary from county to county, in establishing patterns of
rural densities and uses, a county may consider local circumstances,
but shall develop a written record explaining how the rural element
harmonizes the planning goals in RCW 36.70A.020 and meets the
requirements of this chapter.
(b) Rural development. The rural element shall permit rural
development, forestry, and agriculture in rural areas. The rural
element shall provide for a variety of rural densities, uses, essential
public facilities, and rural governmental services needed to serve the
permitted densities and uses. To achieve a variety of rural densities
and uses, counties may provide for clustering, density transfer, design
guidelines, conservation easements, and other innovative techniques
that will accommodate appropriate rural densities and uses that are not
characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with rural
character.
(c) Measures governing rural development. The rural element shall
include measures that apply to rural development and protect the rural
character of the area, as established by the county, by:
(i) Containing or otherwise controlling rural development;
(ii) Assuring visual compatibility of rural development with the
surrounding rural area;
(iii) Reducing the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land
into sprawling, low-density development in the rural area;
(iv) Protecting critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and
surface water and groundwater resources; and
(v) Protecting against conflicts with the use of agricultural,
forest, and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.
(d) Limited areas of more intensive rural development. Subject to
the requirements of this subsection and except as otherwise
specifically provided in this subsection (5)(d), the rural element may
allow for limited areas of more intensive rural development, including
necessary public facilities and public services to serve the limited
area as follows:
(i) Rural development consisting of the infill, development, or
redevelopment of existing commercial, industrial, residential, or
mixed-use areas, whether characterized as shoreline development,
villages, hamlets, rural activity centers, or crossroads developments.
(A) A commercial, industrial, residential, shoreline, or mixed-use
area shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of this
subsection, but shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and
(iii) of this subsection.
(B) Any development or redevelopment other than an industrial area
or an industrial use within a mixed-use area or an industrial area
under this subsection (5)(d)(i) must be principally designed to serve
the existing and projected rural population.
(C) Any development or redevelopment in terms of building size,
scale, use, or intensity shall be consistent with the character of the
existing areas. Development and redevelopment may include changes in
use from vacant land or a previously existing use so long as the new
use conforms to the requirements of this subsection (5);
(ii) The intensification of development on lots containing, or new
development of, small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including
commercial facilities to serve those recreational or tourist uses, that
rely on a rural location and setting, but that do not include new
residential development. A small-scale recreation or tourist use is
not required to be principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population. Public services and public facilities
shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or tourist
use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density
sprawl;
(iii) The intensification of development on lots containing
isolated nonresidential uses or new development of isolated cottage
industries and isolated small-scale businesses that are not principally
designed to serve the existing and projected rural population and
nonresidential uses, but do provide job opportunities for rural
residents. Rural counties may allow the expansion of small-scale
businesses as long as those small-scale businesses conform with the
rural character of the area as defined by the local government
according to RCW 36.70A.030(15). Rural counties may also allow new
small-scale businesses to utilize a site previously occupied by an
existing business as long as the new small-scale business conforms to
the rural character of the area as defined by the local government
according to RCW 36.70A.030(15). Public services and public facilities
shall be limited to those necessary to serve the isolated
nonresidential use and shall be provided in a manner that does not
permit low-density sprawl;
(iv) A county shall adopt measures to minimize and contain the
existing areas or uses of more intensive rural development, as
appropriate, authorized under this subsection. Lands included in such
existing areas or uses shall not extend beyond the logical outer
boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing a new pattern of
low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary
delineated predominately by the built environment, but that may also
include undeveloped lands if limited as provided in this subsection.
The county shall establish the logical outer boundary of an area of
more intensive rural development. In establishing the logical outer
boundary, the county shall address (A) the need to preserve the
character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities, (B)
physical boundaries, such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and
land forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular
boundaries, and (D) the ability to provide public facilities and public
services in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;
(v) For purposes of (d) of this subsection, an existing area or
existing use is one that was in existence:
(A) On July 1, 1990, in a county that was initially required to
plan under all of the provisions of this chapter;
(B) On the date the county adopted a resolution under RCW
36.70A.040(2), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions
of this chapter under RCW 36.70A.040(2); or
(C) On the date the office of financial management certifies the
county's population as provided in RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that
is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter pursuant to RCW
36.70A.040(5).
(e) Exception. This subsection shall not be interpreted to permit
in the rural area a major industrial development or a master planned
resort unless otherwise specifically permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and
36.70A.365.
(6) A transportation element that implements, and is consistent
with, the land use element.
(a) The transportation element shall include the following
subelements:
(i) Land use assumptions used in estimating travel;
(ii) Estimated traffic impacts to state-owned transportation
facilities resulting from land use assumptions to assist the department
of transportation in monitoring the performance of state facilities, to
plan improvements for the facilities, and to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned transportation facilities;
(iii) Facilities and services needs, including:
(A) An inventory of air, water, and ground transportation
facilities and services, including transit alignments and general
aviation airport facilities, to define existing capital facilities and
travel levels as a basis for future planning. This inventory must
include state-owned transportation facilities within the city or
county's jurisdictional boundaries;
(B) Level of service standards for all locally owned arterials and
transit routes to serve as a gauge to judge performance of the system.
These standards should be regionally coordinated and must consider all
transportation modes, as applicable, in meeting regional transportation
demands. In adopting level of service standards required under this
subsection (6)(a)(iii)(B), jurisdictions must also consider adopting
multimodal level of service standards;
(C) For state-owned transportation facilities, level of service
standards for highways, as prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW,
to gauge the performance of the system. The purposes of reflecting
level of service standards for state highways in the local
comprehensive plan are to monitor the performance of the system, to
evaluate improvement strategies, and to facilitate coordination between
the county's or city's six-year street, road, or transit program and
the office of financial management's ten-year investment program((.
The concurrency requirements of (b) of this subsection do not apply to
transportation facilities and services of statewide significance except
for counties consisting of islands whose only connection to the
mainland are state highways or ferry routes. In these island counties,
state highways and ferry route capacity must be a factor in meeting the
concurrency requirements in (b) of this subsection));
(D) Specific actions and requirements for bringing into compliance
locally owned transportation facilities or services that are below an
established level of service standard;
(E) Forecasts of ((traffic)) travel demand for at least ten years
based on the adopted land use plan to provide information on the
location, timing, and capacity needs of future growth;
(F) Identification of state and local system needs to meet current
and future demands. Identified needs on state-owned transportation
facilities must be consistent with the statewide multimodal
transportation plan required under chapter 47.06 RCW;
(iv) Finance, including:
(A) An analysis of funding capability to judge needs against
probable funding resources;
(B) A multiyear financing plan based on the needs identified in the
comprehensive plan, the appropriate parts of which shall serve as the
basis for the six-year street, road, or transit program required by RCW
35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795
for public transportation systems. The multiyear financing plan should
be coordinated with the ten-year investment program developed by the
office of financial management as required by RCW 47.05.030;
(C) If probable funding falls short of meeting identified needs, a
discussion of how additional funding will be raised, or how land use
assumptions will be reassessed to ensure that level of service
standards will be met;
(v) Intergovernmental coordination efforts, including an assessment
of the impacts of the transportation plan and land use assumptions on
the transportation systems of adjacent jurisdictions;
(vi) Demand-management strategies;
(vii) Pedestrian and bicycle component to include collaborative
efforts to identify and designate planned improvements for pedestrian
and bicycle facilities and corridors that address and encourage
enhanced community access ((and promote)), connections between land
uses and transportation modes, and the promotion of healthy lifestyles.
(b)(i) After adoption of the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions
required to plan or who choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, local
jurisdictions must adopt and enforce ordinances which prohibit
development approval if the development causes the level of service on
a locally owned transportation facility to decline below the standards
adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan, unless
transportation improvements or strategies to accommodate the impacts of
development are made concurrent with the development. These strategies
must consider multimodal improvements or strategies, examples of which
may include increased public transportation service, ride sharing
programs, demand management, and other transportation systems
management strategies.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (6), "concurrent with the
development" means that improvements or strategies are in place at the
time of development, or that a financial commitment is in place to
complete the improvements or strategies within six years.
(iii) The concurrency requirements of this subsection (6)(b) do not
apply to transportation facilities and services of statewide
significance except for counties consisting of islands whose only
connections to the mainland are state highways or ferry routes. In
these island counties, state highway and ferry route capacity must be
a factor in meeting the concurrency requirements of this subsection
(6)(b).
(c) The transportation element described in this subsection (6),
the six-year plans required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121
for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems, and
the ten-year investment program required by RCW 47.05.030 for the
state, must be consistent.
(7) An economic development element establishing local goals,
policies, objectives, and provisions for economic growth and vitality
and a high quality of life. The element shall include: (a) A summary
of the local economy such as population, employment, payroll, sectors,
businesses, sales, and other information as appropriate; (b) a summary
of the strengths and weaknesses of the local economy defined as the
commercial and industrial sectors and supporting factors such as land
use, transportation, utilities, education, workforce, housing, and
natural/cultural resources; and (c) an identification of policies,
programs, and projects to foster economic growth and development and to
address future needs. A city that has chosen to be a residential
community is exempt from the economic development element requirement
of this subsection.
(8) A park and recreation element that implements, and is
consistent with, the capital facilities plan element as it relates to
park and recreation facilities. The element shall include: (a)
Estimates of park and recreation demand for at least a ten-year period;
(b) an evaluation of facilities and service needs; and (c) an
evaluation of intergovernmental coordination opportunities to provide
regional approaches for meeting park and recreational demand.
(9) It is the intent that new or amended elements required after
January 1, 2002, be adopted concurrent with the scheduled update
provided in RCW 36.70A.130. Requirements to incorporate any such new
or amended elements shall be null and void until funds sufficient to
cover applicable local government costs are appropriated and
distributed by the state at least two years before local government
must update comprehensive plans as required in RCW 36.70A.130.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.100 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 10 are each
amended to read as follows:
The comprehensive plan of each county or city ((that is)) adopted
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040 shall be:
(1) Coordinated with, and consistent with, the comprehensive plans
adopted pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040 of other counties or cities with
which the county or city has, in part, common borders or related
regional issues; and
(2) Consistent with the regional transportation plan required under
RCW 47.80.030 for the region within which the county or city is
located.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.108 and 2005 c 328 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The transportation element required by RCW 36.70A.070 may
include, in addition to improvements or strategies to accommodate the
impacts of development authorized under RCW 36.70A.070(6)(b),
multimodal transportation improvements or strategies that are made
concurrent with the development. These transportation improvements or
strategies may include, but are not limited to, measures implementing
or evaluating:
(a) Multiple modes of transportation with peak and nonpeak hour
capacity performance standards for locally owned transportation
facilities; ((and))
(b) Modal performance standards meeting the peak and nonpeak hour
capacity performance standards; and
(c) Transit-oriented development or other compact development
strategies. For purposes of this subsection (1)(c), the following
definitions apply:
(i) "Compact development" means an area designated for mixed-use,
higher density development patterns that encourage walking, bicycling,
and plans for a multimodal network that may include transit services
and facilities; and
(ii) "Transit-oriented development" means a type of compact
development that provides compact, walkable communities with densities
that support transit service and have convenient access to transit
systems with frequent peak travel period service.
(2) Nothing in this section or RCW 36.70A.070(6)(b) shall be
construed as prohibiting a county or city planning under RCW 36.70A.040
from exercising existing authority to develop multimodal improvements
or strategies to satisfy the concurrency requirements of this chapter.
(3) Nothing in this section is intended to affect or otherwise
modify the authority of jurisdictions planning under RCW 36.70A.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Comprehensive plans must encourage development along transit
lines and at major transit stations at levels that support transit-oriented communities. These plans must also: (a) Encourage walking,
bicycling, and reduced vehicle trips; (b) include design standards for
streets, sidewalks, and buildings that encourage safe walking and
bicycling; (c) provide for a no net loss of affordable housing, and an
adequate supply of housing that is affordable to low-income households;
and (d) promote mixed-use and mixed-income developments.
(2) For purposes of this section, "major transit station" means any
of the following within an urban growth area:
(a) Stations on a high capacity transportation system approved by
the voters and funded or expanded under chapter 81.104 RCW. For
purposes of this subsection (2), streetcars or streetcar systems are
not considered high capacity transportation systems;
(b) Stops on rail or fixed guideway systems, including transitways;
(c) Stations on bus rapid transit routes that operate on exclusive
rights-of-way for sixty-five percent or more of a route. For purposes
of this subsection (2)(c), "exclusive rights-of-way" means a roadway or
guideway that exclusively serves bus, rail transit, or both, and is not
normally accessible by privately owned or commercial vehicles; and
(d) Stations on a light rail line that is fewer than two miles in
length.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.80.030 and 2005 c 328 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each regional transportation planning organization shall
develop in cooperation with the department of transportation, providers
of public transportation and high capacity transportation, ports, and
local governments within the region, adopt, and periodically update a
regional transportation plan that:
(a) Is based on a least cost planning methodology that identifies
the most cost-effective facilities, services, and programs;
(b) Identifies existing or planned transportation facilities,
services, and programs, including but not limited to major roadways
including state highways and regional arterials, transit and
nonmotorized services and facilities, multimodal and intermodal
facilities, marine ports and airports, railroads, and noncapital
programs including transportation demand management that should
function as an integrated regional transportation system, giving
emphasis to those facilities, services, and programs that exhibit one
or more of the following characteristics:
(i) Crosses member county lines;
(ii) Is or will be used by a significant number of people who live
or work outside the county in which the facility, service, or project
is located;
(iii) Significant impacts are expected to be felt in more than one
county;
(iv) Potentially adverse impacts of the facility, service, program,
or project can be better avoided or mitigated through adherence to
regional policies;
(v) Transportation needs addressed by a project have been
identified by the regional transportation planning process and the
remedy is deemed to have regional significance; and
(vi) Provides for system continuity;
(c) Establishes level of service standards for state highways and
state ferry routes, with the exception of transportation facilities of
statewide significance as defined in RCW 47.06.140. These regionally
established level of service standards for state highways and state
ferries shall be developed jointly with the department of
transportation, to encourage consistency across jurisdictions. In
establishing level of service standards for state highways and state
ferries, consideration shall be given for the necessary balance between
providing for the free interjurisdictional movement of people and goods
and the needs of local commuters using state facilities;
(d) Includes a financial plan demonstrating how the regional
transportation plan can be implemented, indicating resources from
public and private sources that are reasonably expected to be made
available to carry out the plan, and recommending any innovative
financing techniques to finance needed facilities, services, and
programs;
(e) Assesses regional development patterns, capital investment and
other measures necessary to:
(i) Ensure the preservation of the existing regional transportation
system, including requirements for operational improvements,
resurfacing, restoration, and rehabilitation of existing and future
major roadways, as well as operations, maintenance, modernization, and
rehabilitation of existing and future transit, railroad systems and
corridors, and nonmotorized facilities; and
(ii) Make the most efficient use of existing transportation
facilities to relieve vehicular congestion and maximize the mobility of
people and goods;
(f) Sets forth a proposed regional transportation approach,
including capital investments, service improvements, programs, and
transportation demand management measures to guide the development of
the integrated, multimodal regional transportation system. For
regional growth centers, the approach must address transportation
concurrency strategies required under RCW 36.70A.070 and include a
measurement of vehicle level of service for off-peak periods and total
multimodal capacity for peak periods; and
(g) Where appropriate, sets forth the relationship of high capacity
transportation providers and other public transit providers with regard
to responsibility for, and the coordination between, services and
facilities.
(2) Regional transportation planning organizations encompassing at
least one county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 with two hundred forty-five thousand or more residents must adopt a regional transportation
plan for those counties that implements the goals to reduce annual per
capita vehicle miles traveled adopted under RCW 47.01.440.
(3) The organization shall review the regional transportation plan
biennially for currency and forward the adopted plan along with
documentation of the biennial review to the state department of
transportation.
(((3))) (4) All transportation projects, programs, and
transportation demand management measures within the region that have
an impact upon regional facilities or services must be consistent with
the plan and with the adopted regional growth and transportation
strategies.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.70A.210 and 2009 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that counties are regional
governments within their boundaries, and cities are primary providers
of urban governmental services within urban growth areas. For the
purposes of this section, a "countywide planning policy" is a written
policy statement or statements used solely for establishing a
countywide framework from which county and city comprehensive plans are
developed and adopted pursuant to this chapter. This framework shall
ensure that city and county comprehensive plans are consistent as
required in RCW 36.70A.100. Nothing in this section shall be construed
to alter the land-use powers of cities.
(2) The legislative authority of a county that plans under RCW
36.70A.040 shall adopt a countywide planning policy in cooperation with
the cities located in whole or in part within the county as follows:
(a) No later than sixty calendar days from July 16, 1991, the
legislative authority of each county that as of June 1, 1991, was
required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall convene a meeting
with representatives of each city located within the county for the
purpose of establishing a collaborative process that will provide a
framework for the adoption of a countywide planning policy. In other
counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, this
meeting shall be convened no later than sixty days after the date the
county adopts its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management.
(b) The process and framework for adoption of a countywide planning
policy specified in (a) of this subsection shall determine the manner
in which the county and the cities agree to all procedures and
provisions including but not limited to desired planning policies,
deadlines, ratification of final agreements and demonstration thereof,
and financing, if any, of all activities associated therewith.
(c) If a county fails for any reason to convene a meeting with
representatives of cities as required in (a) of this subsection, the
governor may immediately impose any appropriate sanction or sanctions
on the county from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340.
(d) If there is no agreement by October 1, 1991, in a county that
was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991,
or if there is no agreement within one hundred twenty days of the date
the county adopted its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management in any other county that is required or
chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, the governor shall first inquire
of the jurisdictions as to the reason or reasons for failure to reach
an agreement. If the governor deems it appropriate, the governor may
immediately request the assistance of the department ((of community,
trade, and economic development)) to mediate any disputes that preclude
agreement. If mediation is unsuccessful in resolving all disputes that
will lead to agreement, the governor may impose appropriate sanctions
from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340 on the county, city, or
cities for failure to reach an agreement as provided in this section.
The governor shall specify the reason or reasons for the imposition of
any sanction.
(e) No later than July 1, 1992, the legislative authority of each
county that was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of
June 1, 1991, or no later than fourteen months after the date the
county adopted its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management the county legislative authority of any
other county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040,
shall adopt a countywide planning policy according to the process
provided under this section and that is consistent with the agreement
pursuant to (b) of this subsection, and after holding a public hearing
or hearings on the proposed countywide planning policy.
(3) Except as provided otherwise under this subsection, a
countywide planning policy shall, at a minimum, address the following:
(a) Policies to implement RCW 36.70A.110;
(b) Policies for promotion of contiguous and orderly development
and provision of urban services to such development;
(c) Policies for siting public capital facilities of a countywide
or statewide nature, including transportation facilities of statewide
significance as defined in RCW 47.06.140;
(d) Policies for countywide transportation facilities and
strategies;
(e) Policies that consider the need for affordable housing, such as
housing for all economic segments of the population and parameters for
its distribution;
(f) Policies for joint county and city planning within urban growth
areas;
(g) Policies for countywide economic development and employment,
which must include consideration of the future development of
commercial and industrial facilities; ((and))
(h) Policies for reducing greenhouse gas emissions that, at a
minimum, support and achieve: (i) State emission reduction
requirements adopted under RCW 70.235.020; (ii) per capita vehicle
miles traveled reductions in accordance with RCW 47.01.440; and (iii)
applicable federal emission reduction requirements. This subsection
(3)(h) applies only to counties with two hundred thousand or more
residents and the cities within those counties; and
(i) An analysis of the fiscal impact.
(4) Federal agencies and Indian tribes may participate in and
cooperate with the countywide planning policy adoption process.
Adopted countywide planning policies shall be adhered to by state
agencies.
(5) Failure to adopt a countywide planning policy that meets the
requirements of this section may result in the imposition of a sanction
or sanctions on a county or city within the county, as specified in RCW
36.70A.340. In imposing a sanction or sanctions, the governor shall
specify the reasons for failure to adopt a countywide planning policy
in order that any imposed sanction or sanctions are fairly and
equitably related to the failure to adopt a countywide planning policy.
(6) Cities and the governor may appeal an adopted countywide
planning policy to the growth management hearings board within sixty
days of the adoption of the countywide planning policy.
(7) Multicounty planning policies shall be adopted by two or more
counties, each with a population of four hundred fifty thousand or
more, with contiguous urban areas and may be adopted by other counties,
according to the process established under this section or other
processes agreed to among the counties and cities within the affected
counties throughout the multicounty region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
Traffic impacts of a proposed development are not subject to the
requirements of RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c) if the proposed development is
within a growth and transportation efficiency center designated under
RCW 70.94.528.

--- END ---