BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

The
department, the Washington state patrol, and the department of fish and
wildlife shall jointly create, design, and issue a special salmon license plate
that may be used in lieu of regular or personalized license plates for motor
vehicles required to display two motor vehicle license plates, excluding
vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions
established by the department. The special plates will observe the importance
of salmonid to Washington state and help fund the restoration of salmon and
steelhead species listed under the federal Endangered Species Act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 75.46 RCW to read as follows:

The
salmon species enrichment license fees account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from salmon species enrichment license fees, less the
administration and collection costs incurred by the department under RCW
46.16.313 (6) and (7) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be used only for the preservation, protection, perpetuation, education, and
enhancement of salmon species.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 75.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
On an annual basis, the department of fish and wildlife shall solicit, from the
public and private sector, proposed salmon preservation, protection, perpetuation,
education, and enhancement projects and prioritize projects it recommends for
funding from the salmon species enrichment license fees account by giving
preference to projects that:

(a)
Provide a greater benefit to salmon recovery;

(b)
Will be implemented in a more critical area;

(c)
Are the most cost-effective;

(d)
Have the greatest matched or in-kind funding; and

(e)
Will be implemented by a sponsor with a successful record of implementation.

(2)
In selecting such projects, the department shall attempt to assure a
geographical balance in assigning priorities to projects.

(3)
On an annual basis, the department shall report to the legislature on its
selection process and the projects recommended for funding. The legislature,
in its sole discretion, shall select and make appropriations for salmon
preservation, protection, perpetuation, education, and enhancement projects
from the salmon species enrichment license fees account.

(4)
The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.16.313 and 1997 c 291 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department may establish a fee for each type of special license plates
issued under RCW 46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by
section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in an amount calculated to offset the
cost of production of the special license plates and the administration of this
program. Until December 31, 1997, the fee shall not exceed thirty-five
dollars, but effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 1998, the department may adjust the fee to no more than forty
dollars. This fee is in addition to all other fees required to register and
license the vehicle for which the plates have been requested. All such
additional special license plate fees collected by the department shall be
deposited in the state treasury and credited to the motor vehicle fund.

(2)
((Until December 31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon application, registration, and renewal registration of a motor
vehicle, the holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of
each fee collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate
production, shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(3)
Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 1998,)) In
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and registration
of a motor vehicle, the holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay an
initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to
exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds
shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(((4)
Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 1999,)) (3)
In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a
motor vehicle registration, the holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay
a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted
to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(((5)))
(4) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a special
baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection expenses
incurred by it. The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production,
shall be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
state general fund.

(((6)
Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 1999,)) (5)
In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a
motor vehicle registration, the holder of a special baseball stadium license
plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount
not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds
shall be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
state general fund.

(6)
Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 2000,
in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a salmon license plate shall pay
an initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to
exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The department shall
remit the remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the salmon species enrichment license fees account.

(7)
Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 2000, in
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a salmon license plate shall pay a fee of
thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The department shall remit the remaining
proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying
detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the salmon
species enrichment license fees account.

Sec.
5. RCW
46.16.233 and 1997 c 291 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
for those license plates issued under RCW 46.16.305(1) before January 1, 1987,
under RCW 46.16.305(3), under section 1 of this act, and to commercial
vehicles with a gross weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds, effective
with vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 2001, all vehicle
license plates must be issued on a standard background, as designated by the
department. Additionally, to ensure maximum legibility and reflectivity, the
department shall periodically provide for the replacement of license plates.
Frequency of replacement shall be established in accordance with empirical
studies documenting the longevity of the reflective materials used to make
license plates.

Sec.
6. RCW
46.16.290 and 1997 c 291 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In any case of a valid sale or transfer of the ownership of any
vehicle, the right to the certificates properly transferable therewith, except
as provided in RCW 46.16.280, and to the vehicle license plates passes to the
purchaser or transferee. It is unlawful for the holder of such certificates,
except as provided in RCW 46.16.280, or vehicle license plates to fail,
neglect, or refuse to endorse the certificates and deliver the vehicle license
plates to the purchaser or transferee. If the sale or transfer is of a vehicle
licensed by the state or any county, city, town, school district, or other
political subdivision entitled to exemption as provided by law, or, if the
vehicle is licensed with personalized plates, amateur radio operator plates,
medal of honor plates, disabled person plates, disabled veteran plates,
prisoner of war plates, salmon plates, or other special license plates
issued under RCW 46.16.301 as it existed before amendment by section 5, chapter
291, Laws of 1997, the vehicle license plates therefor shall be retained and
may be displayed upon a vehicle obtained in replacement of the vehicle so sold
or transferred.

---
END ---