BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall maintain a toll-free telephone hot line to assist the public
in the reporting of fish and wildlife poaching and wildlife sightings that pose
a threat to humans or domesticated animals. The department shall report the
results of its investigative findings back to each person who provides a
poaching or dangerous wildlife report, if requested to do so by the person
making the report.

The department shall conduct a public information program in order
to inform the public about the existence and purpose of the toll-free telephone
hot line.

---
END ---