BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.92.060 and 1995 c 317 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in this chapter applies to:

(1)
Commissioned veterinarians in the United States military services or
veterinarians employed by Washington state and federal agencies while
performing official duties;

(2)
A person practicing veterinary medicine upon his or her own animal;

(3)
A person advising with respect to or performing the castrating and dehorning of
cattle, castrating and docking of sheep, castrating of swine, caponizing of
poultry, pregnancy testing of animals, or artificial insemination of
animals;

(4)(a)
A person who is a regularly enrolled student in a veterinary school or training
course approved under RCW 18.92.015 and performing duties or actions assigned
by his or her instructors or working under the direct supervision of a licensed
veterinarian during a school vacation period or (b) a person performing
assigned duties under the supervision of a veterinarian within the established
framework of an internship program recognized by the board;

(5)
A veterinarian regularly licensed in another state consulting with a licensed veterinarian
in this state;

(6)
An animal technician or veterinary medication clerk acting under the
supervision and control of a licensed veterinarian. The practice of an animal
technician or veterinary medication clerk is limited to the performance of services
which are authorized by the board;

(7)
An owner being assisted in practice by his or her employees when employed in
the conduct of the owner's business;

(8)
An owner being assisted in practice by some other person gratuitously;

(9)
The implanting in their own animals of any electronic device for identifying
animals by established humane societies and animal control organizations that
provide appropriate training, as determined by the veterinary board of
governors, and/or direct or indirect supervision by a licensed veterinarian;

(10) The implanting of any electronic device by a public fish and
wildlife agency for the identification of fish or wildlife.

---
END ---