BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
89.08.030 and 1987 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is hereby established to serve as an agency of the state and to perform the
functions conferred upon it by law, the state conservation commission, which
shall succeed to all powers, duties, and property of the state soil and
water conservation committee.

The
commission shall consist of ten members, five of whom are ex officio. Two
members shall be appointed by the governor, one of whom shall be a landowner or
operator of a farm. At least two of the three elected members shall be
landowners or operators of a farm and shall be elected as herein provided. The
appointed members shall serve for a term of four years.

The
three elected members shall be elected for three-year terms, one shall be
elected each year by the district supervisors at their annual state-wide
meeting. One of the members shall reside in eastern Washington, one in central
Washington and one in western Washington, the specific boundaries to be
determined by district supervisors. At the first such election, the term of
the member from western Washington shall be one year, central Washington two
years, and eastern Washington three years, and successors shall be
elected for three years.

Unexpired
term vacancies in the office of appointed commission members shall be filled by
appointment by the governor in the same manner as full-term appointments.
Unexpired terms of elected commission members shall be filled by the regional
vice president of the Washington association of conservation districts who is
serving that part of the state where the vacancy occurs, such term to continue
only until district supervisors can fill the unexpired term by electing the
commission member.

The
director of the department of ecology, the director of the department of
agriculture, the commissioner of public lands, ((the president of the
Washington association of conservation districts,)) and the dean of the
college of agriculture at Washington State University shall be ex officio nonvoting
members of the commission. The president of the Washington association of
conservation districts shall be an ex officio voting member of the commission.
An ex officio member of the commission shall hold office so long as he or she
retains the office by virtue of which he or she is a member of the commission.
Ex officio members may delegate their authority.

The commission may invite appropriate officers of cooperating
organizations, state, and federal agencies to serve as advisers to the
conservation commission.

---
END ---