BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
76.09.060 and 1997 c 290 s 3 and 1997 c 173 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
following shall apply to those forest practices administered and enforced by
the department and for which the board shall promulgate regulations as provided
in this chapter:

(1)
The department shall prescribe the form and contents of the notification and
application. The forest practices rules shall specify by whom and under what
conditions the notification and application shall be signed or otherwise
certified as acceptable. The application or notification shall be delivered in
person to the department, sent by first class mail to the department or
electronically filed in a form defined by the department. The form for
electronic filing shall be readily convertible to a paper copy, which shall be
available to the public pursuant to chapter 42.17 RCW. The information
required may include, but is not limited to:

(a)
Name and address of the forest landowner, timber owner, and operator;

(b)
Description of the proposed forest practice or practices to be conducted;

(c)
Legal description and tax parcel identification numbers of the land on which
the forest practices are to be conducted;

(d)
Planimetric and topographic maps showing location and size of all lakes and
streams and other public waters in and immediately adjacent to the operating
area and showing all existing and proposed roads and major tractor roads;

(e)
Description of the silvicultural, harvesting, or other forest practice methods
to be used, including the type of equipment to be used and materials to be
applied;

(f)
Proposed plan for reforestation and for any revegetation necessary to reduce
erosion potential from roadsides and yarding roads, as required by the forest
practices rules;

(g)
Soil, geological, and hydrological data with respect to forest practices;

(h)
The expected dates of commencement and completion of all forest practices
specified in the application;

(i)
Provisions for continuing maintenance of roads and other construction or other
measures necessary to afford protection to public resources;

(j)
An affirmation that the statements contained in the notification or application
are true; and

(k)
All necessary application or notification fees.

(2)
Long range plans may be submitted to the department for review and
consultation.

(3)
The application for a forest practice or the notification of a Class II forest
practice is subject to the three-year reforestation requirement.

(a)
If the application states that any such land will be or is intended to be so
converted:

(i)
The reforestation requirements of this chapter and of the forest practices
rules shall not apply if the land is in fact so converted unless applicable
alternatives or limitations are provided in forest practices rules issued under
RCW 76.09.070 as now or hereafter amended;

(ii)
Completion of such forest practice operations shall be deemed conversion of the
lands to another use for purposes of chapters 84.33 and 84.34 RCW unless the
conversion is to a use permitted under a current use tax agreement permitted
under chapter 84.34 RCW;

(iii)
The forest practices described in the application are subject to applicable
county, city, town, and regional governmental authority permitted under RCW
76.09.240 as now or hereafter amended as well as the forest practices rules.

(b)
Except as provided elsewhere in this section, if the application or
notification does not state that any land covered by the application or notification
will be or is intended to be so converted:

(i)
For six years after the date of the application the county, city, town, and
regional governmental entities shall deny any or all applications for permits
or approvals, including building permits and subdivision approvals, relating to
nonforestry uses of land subject to the application;

(A)
The department shall submit to the local governmental entity a copy of the
statement of a forest landowner's intention not to convert which shall
represent a recognition by the landowner that the six-year moratorium shall be
imposed and shall preclude the landowner's ability to obtain development
permits while the moratorium is in place. This statement shall be filed by the
local governmental entity with the county recording officer, who shall record
the documents as provided in chapter 65.04 RCW, except that lands designated as
forest lands of long-term commercial significance under chapter 36.70A RCW
shall not be recorded due to the low likelihood of conversion. Not recording
the statement of a forest landowner's conversion intention shall not be
construed to mean the moratorium is not in effect.

(B)
The department shall collect the recording fee and reimburse the local
governmental entity for the cost of recording the application.

(C)
When harvesting takes place without an application, the local governmental
entity shall impose the six-year moratorium provided in (b)(i) of this
subsection from the date the unpermitted harvesting was discovered by the
department or the local governmental entity.

(D)
The local governmental entity shall develop a process for lifting the six-year
moratorium, which shall include public notification, and procedures for appeals
and public hearings.

(E)
The local governmental entity may develop an administrative process for lifting
or waiving the six-year moratorium for the purposes of constructing a
single-family residence or outbuildings, or both, on a legal lot and building
site. Lifting or waiving of the six-year moratorium is subject to compliance
with all local ordinances.

(F)
The six-year moratorium shall not be imposed on a forest practices application
that contains a conversion option harvest plan approved by the local
governmental entity unless the forest practice was not in compliance with the
approved forest practice permit. Where not in compliance with the conversion
option harvest plan, the six-year moratorium shall be imposed from the date the
application was approved by the department or the local governmental entity;

(ii)
Failure to comply with the reforestation requirements contained in any final
order or decision shall constitute a removal of designation under the
provisions of RCW 84.33.140, and a change of use under the provisions of RCW
84.34.080, and, if applicable, shall subject such lands to the payments and/or
penalties resulting from such removals or changes; and

(iii)
Conversion to a use other than commercial forest product operations within six
years after approval of the forest practices without the consent of the county,
city, or town shall constitute a violation of each of the county, municipal
city, town, and regional authorities to which the forest practice operations
would have been subject if the application had so stated.

(c)
The application or notification shall be signed by the forest landowner and
accompanied by a statement signed by the forest landowner indicating his or her
intent with respect to conversion and acknowledging that he or she is familiar
with the effects of this subsection.

(4)
Whenever an approved application authorizes a forest practice which, because of
soil condition, proximity to a water course or other unusual factor, has a
potential for causing material damage to a public resource, as determined by
the department, the applicant shall, when requested on the approved
application, notify the department two days before the commencement of actual
operations.

(5)
Before the operator commences any forest practice in a manner or to an extent
significantly different from that described in a previously approved
application or notification, there shall be submitted to the department a new
application or notification form in the manner set forth in this section.

(6)
Except as provided in RCW 76.09.350(4), the notification to or the approval
given by the department to an application to conduct a forest practice shall be
effective for a term of two years from the date of approval or notification and
shall not be renewed unless a new application is filed and approved or a new
notification has been filed. At the option of the applicant, an application or
notification may be submitted to cover a single forest practice or a number of
forest practices within reasonable geographic or political boundaries as
specified by the department. An application or notification that covers more
than one forest practice may have an effective term of more than two years.
The board shall adopt rules that establish standards and procedures for
approving an application or notification that has an effective term of more
than two years. Such rules shall include extended time periods for application
or notification approval or disapproval. On an approved application with a
term of more than two years, the applicant shall inform the department before
commencing operations.

(7)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no prior application or
notification shall be required for any emergency forest practice necessitated
by fire, flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other emergency as defined by the
board, but the operator shall submit an application or notification, whichever
is applicable, to the department within forty-eight hours after commencement of
such practice or as required by local regulations.

(8) The legislative authority of any county that is located east
of the crest of the Cascade mountains may, after a public hearing, exempt that
county from the six-year moratorium provided in subsection (3)(b)(i) of this
section.

---
END ---