BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.391 and 1998 c 209 s 4 and 1998 c 207 s 9 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Any person licensed under this chapter who is convicted of an offense relating
to motor vehicles for which suspension or revocation of the driver's license is
mandatory, other than vehicular homicide or vehicular assault, or who has had
his or her license suspended under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a), may submit
to the department an application for an occupational driver's license. The
department, upon receipt of the prescribed fee and upon determining that the
petitioner is engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential that
the petitioner operate a motor vehicle, may issue an occupational driver's
license and may set definite restrictions as provided in RCW 46.20.394. No person
may petition for, and the department shall not issue, an occupational driver's
license that is effective during the first thirty days of any suspension or
revocation imposed for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or pursuant to
RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a). A person aggrieved by the decision of the
department on the application for an occupational driver's license may request
a hearing as provided by rule of the department.

(2)
An applicant for an occupational driver's license is eligible to receive such
license only if:

(a)
Within one year immediately preceding the date of the offense that gave rise to
the present conviction, the applicant has not committed any offense relating to
motor vehicles for which suspension or revocation of a driver's license is
mandatory; and

(b)
Within seven years immediately preceding the date of the offense that gave rise
to the present conviction or incident, the applicant has not committed any of
the following offenses: (i) Driving or being in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor; (ii) vehicular
homicide under RCW 46.61.520; or (iii) vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522;
and

(c)
The applicant meets at least one of the following qualifying
circumstances: (i) Is engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it
essential that he or she operate a motor vehicle or (ii) is undergoing
substance abuse treatment and/or is participating in meetings of a twelve-step
group such as alcoholics anonymous; and

(d)
The applicant files satisfactory proof of financial responsibility pursuant to
chapter 46.29 RCW.

(3)
The director shall cancel an occupational driver's license upon receipt of
notice that the holder thereof has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle
in violation of its restrictions, or of an offense that pursuant to chapter
46.20 RCW would warrant suspension or revocation of a regular driver's
license. The cancellation is effective as of the date of the conviction, and
continues with the same force and effect as any suspension or revocation under
this title.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.20.394 and 1983 c 165 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

In issuing an occupational driver's license under RCW 46.20.391,
the department shall describe the ((type of occupation permitted)) qualifying
circumstances and shall set forth in detail the specific hours of the day
during which the person may drive to and from his ((place of work)) or
her home, which may not exceed twelve hours in any one day; the days of the
week during which the license may be used; and the general routes over which
the person may travel. These restrictions shall be prepared in written form by
the department, which document shall be carried in the vehicle at all times and
presented to a law enforcement officer under the same terms as the occupational
driver's license. Any violation of the restrictions constitutes a violation of
RCW 46.20.342 and subjects the person to all procedures and penalties therefor.

---
END ---