BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.148.020 and 1998 c 245 s 114 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The pollution liability insurance program trust account is established in the custody
of the state treasurer. All funds appropriated for this chapter and all
premiums collected for reinsurance shall be deposited in the account.
Expenditures from the account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of
this chapter including payment of costs of administering the pollution
liability insurance and underground storage tank community assistance
programs. ((The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW.)) Expenditures for payment of ((the costs of administering
the program)) administrative and operating costs of the agency are
subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW and may be made
only after appropriation by statute. No appropriation is required for other
expenditures from the account.

(2)
Each calendar quarter, the director shall report to the insurance commissioner
the loss and surplus reserves required for the calendar quarter. The director
shall notify the department of revenue of this amount by the fifteenth day of
each calendar quarter.

(3)
Each calendar quarter the director shall determine the amount of reserves
necessary to fund commitments made to provide financial assistance under RCW
70.148.130 to the extent that the financial assistance reserves do not
jeopardize the operations and liabilities of the pollution liability insurance
program. The director shall notify the department of revenue of this amount by
the fifteenth day of each calendar quarter. The director may immediately
establish an initial financial assistance reserve of five million dollars from
available revenues. The director may not expend more than fifteen million
dollars for the financial assistance program.

(4) This section expires June 1, 2001.

---
END ---