BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that care of children is the primary responsibility of
parents. How that care is provided and by whom is of paramount importance to
parents whose employment needs make it impossible for them to provide care to
their own children during their work hours.

The
legislature also recognizes that making high-quality child-care services more
affordable throughout the state can benefit employers and families and that
many employers would be able to improve their work force and competitiveness by
expanding the pool of available workers. The legislature intends to facilitate
this through providing tax credits for employer-sponsored child-care facilities
and services, with a target of small and medium-sized businesses.

The
legislature further finds that an increase in affordable high-quality child
care presents an opportunity for ensuring healthier and safer environments for
children and increases in children's educational growth opportunities.

Couples
who choose to have one parent stay home and provide care to their children and
forgo receiving two incomes should not experience tax penalties. The
legislature finds that any public policy that transfers income in the forms of
benefits or tax credits to parents who choose employer-sponsored care for their
children must be considered carefully for its implications on the work force as
well as on the well-being of families.

This
act is intended to modify the state's tax and child-care policies by allowing a
credit against the tax liability of an employer who voluntarily participates in
expansion of workplace child care and provide incentives to the private sector
to:

(1)
Promote growth of employment opportunities;

(2)
Assist employees in obtaining affordable high-quality child care;

(3)
Increase opportunities for children to obtain early education and social
skills; and

(4)
Reduce public assistance caseloads.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
tax credit is authorized equal to twenty-five percent of the amounts expended
for: (a) Constructing, repairing, or improving new or existing buildings or
other structures used as an on-site child care facility for employees within
the state; (b) operating expenditures made in providing child care in an
on-site facility for employees within the state; (c) purchasing of child-care
services within the state for employees from other child care providers; and
(d) payments made on behalf of an employee under a dependent care assistance
program pursuant to the internal revenue code, 26 U.S.C. Sec. 129, to the
extent the amounts are used to provide child care services within the state for
a dependent of the employee.

(2)
This section shall not apply to expenditures that are reimbursed by the
employee or any third party.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
(1)(a) The credit under section 2 of this act may be applied to taxes under
chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW. A person may not receive a credit for the same
expenditures under both chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW. The credit shall be
taken against taxes due for the same calendar year in which the amounts were
paid. The credit must be claimed by the due date of the last tax return for
the calendar year in which the payment is made.

(b)
The annual credit claimed by any person under this section shall not exceed the
lesser of the tax otherwise due under this chapter during the same calendar
year or two hundred thousand dollars.

(c)
No portion of an application for credit under this section may be carried back
or carried forward to a different calendar year.

(2)
The taxpayer shall repay all taxes not paid because of the credit granted under
section 2(1)(a) of this act plus applicable interest under RCW 82.32.050, but
not penalties, computed from the time the taxes would have been paid until the
date of payment if the taxpayer changes the use of the child care facility less
than ten years after the facility is built. This subsection does not apply if:
(a) The business ceases operation; (b) the business no longer has employees who
wish to utilize the child care facility; or (c) the child care facility is
replaced with a child care facility of equal or greater capacity for which no
credit was taken under section 2(1)(a) of this act.

(3)
A credit is only allowed under this section for operating expenditures
attributable to, or other amounts expended for, employees whose total
compensation paid by the employer, figured on a full-time equivalent basis, is less
than three times the amount listed in the federal register, each year, for the
poverty guideline for a family of three living within the forty-eight
contiguous states of the United States.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Two
or more entities that pay tax under chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW may jointly
receive the credit available under section 2 of this act under the following
circumstances:

(1)
An on-site facility is jointly owned or operated by the entities or the
contract for provision of child care services is jointly executed by the
entities with the same provider of child care;

(2)
The conditions in section 3(1) of this act shall apply to the construction and
operation or purchase of child care services;

(3)
The percentage of the credit for construction of an on-site facility available
to each entity shall be equal to the percentage of ownership interest each
entity has in the facility;

(4)
The percentage of the annual credit available to each entity for operating an
on-site facility, or for the provision of child care services, shall be equal
to the percentage of the operating or provision expenditures made by each
entity; and

(5)
The entities share common areas of real property including but not limited to
walls, hallways, and parking or occupy the same parcel of land for property tax
purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
department in cooperation with the child care coordinating committee shall
report to the governor and legislature by December 1 of each year the number of
employers who receive the credits provided under sections 2 through 4 of this
act and the number of employees for whom the credit has been given, including
the amount of the credits granted.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
credits allowed under section 2 of this act are available only if the child
care meets all the state and local requirements regarding the provision of
child care, including licensing and operating the child care facility.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
department shall adopt rules to administer this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act takes effect January 1, 2000.

---
END ---