BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 70.96A RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall provide the educational materials created under RCW
70.96A.050(5) regarding the involuntary commitment of persons incapacitated by
chemical dependency to all public and private agencies, organizations, and
individuals that are certified or licensed by the department, or that receive
state funds, to perform chemical dependency treatment services.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.96A.050 and 1989 c 270 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall:

(1)
Develop, encourage, and foster state-wide, regional, and local plans and
programs for the prevention of alcoholism and other drug addiction, treatment
of alcoholics and other drug addicts and their families, persons incapacitated
by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons in
cooperation with public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals
and provide technical assistance and consultation services for these purposes;

(2)
Coordinate the efforts and enlist the assistance of all public and private
agencies, organizations, and individuals interested in prevention of alcoholism
and drug addiction, and treatment of alcoholics and other drug addicts and
their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals,
and intoxicated persons;

(3)
Cooperate with public and private agencies in establishing and conducting
programs to provide treatment for alcoholics and other drug addicts and their
families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and
intoxicated persons who are clients of the correctional system;

(4)
Cooperate with the superintendent of public instruction, state board of
education, schools, police departments, courts, and other public and private
agencies, organizations and individuals in establishing programs for the
prevention of alcoholism and other drug addiction, treatment of alcoholics or
other drug addicts and their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol and
other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons, and preparing curriculum
materials thereon for use at all levels of school education;

(5)
Prepare, publish, evaluate, and disseminate educational materials
dealing with the nature and effects of alcohol and other psychoactive chemicals
and the consequences of their use. The educational materials shall include
a pamphlet explaining the process, procedures, and standards for the
involuntary commitment of persons incapacitated by chemical dependency;

(6)
Develop and implement, as an integral part of treatment programs, an
educational program for use in the treatment of alcoholics or other drug
addicts, persons incapacitated by alcohol and other psychoactive chemicals, and
intoxicated persons, which program shall include the dissemination of
information concerning the nature and effects of alcohol and other psychoactive
chemicals, the consequences of their use, the principles of recovery, and HIV
and AIDS;

(7)
Organize and foster training programs for persons engaged in treatment of
alcoholics or other drug addicts, persons incapacitated by alcohol and other
psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons;

(8)
Sponsor and encourage research into the causes and nature of alcoholism and
other drug addiction, treatment of alcoholics and other drug addicts, persons
incapacitated by alcohol and other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated
persons, and serve as a clearing house for information relating to alcoholism
or other drug addiction;

(9)
Specify uniform methods for keeping statistical information by public and
private agencies, organizations, and individuals, and collect and make
available relevant statistical information, including number of persons
treated, frequency of admission and readmission, and frequency and duration of
treatment;

(10)
Advise the governor in the preparation of a comprehensive plan for treatment of
alcoholics and other drug addicts, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other
psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons for inclusion in the state's
comprehensive health plan;

(11)
Review all state health, welfare, and treatment plans to be submitted for
federal funding under federal legislation, and advise the governor on
provisions to be included relating to alcoholism and other drug addiction,
persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and
intoxicated persons;

(12)
Assist in the development of, and cooperate with, programs for alcohol and
other psychoactive chemical education and treatment for employees of state and
local governments and businesses and industries in the state;

(13)
Use the support and assistance of interested persons in the community to
encourage alcoholics and other drug addicts voluntarily to undergo treatment;

(14)
Cooperate with public and private agencies in establishing and conducting
programs designed to deal with the problem of persons operating motor vehicles
while intoxicated;

(15)
Encourage general hospitals and other appropriate health facilities to admit
without discrimination alcoholics and other drug addicts, persons incapacitated
by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons and to
provide them with adequate and appropriate treatment;

(16)
Encourage all health and disability insurance programs to include alcoholism
and other drug addiction as a covered illness; and

(17) Organize and sponsor a state-wide program to help court
personnel, including judges, better understand the disease of alcoholism and
other drug addiction and the uses of chemical dependency treatment programs.

---
END ---