BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in this section, a person shall not store or keep a loaded
firearm on premises under his or her control if he or she knows or reasonably
should know that a minor is likely to gain access to the firearm without: (a)
The lawful permission of the minor's parent or the person having charge of the
minor; or (b) the supervision required by law.

(2)
This section does not apply if:

(a)
The firearm was stored or left in a securely locked box or container;

(b)
The firearm is kept in a location that a reasonable person would have believed
to be secure;

(c)
The firearm is secured with a trigger lock; or

(d)
The minor obtains the firearm as a result of an unlawful entry by any person.

(3)(a)
It is a misdemeanor if a person violates subsection (1) of this section and, as
a result thereof, a minor gains access to a firearm and possesses or exhibits
it, without the supervision required by law:

(i)
In a public place; or

(ii)
In a reckless or criminally negligent manner.

(b)
It is a class C felony if a person violates subsection (1) of this section and,
as a result thereof, a minor gains access to a firearm and uses it to inflict
injury or death upon himself or herself, or any other person.

(4) As used in this section, "minor" means a person under
the age of sixteen.

---
END ---