BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.60.020 and 1995 c 347 s 602 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Center" means the permit assistance center established in the ((commission
[department])) department by RCW 90.60.030.

(2)
"Coordinating permit agency" means the permit agency that has the
greatest overall jurisdiction over a project.

(3)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(4)
"Participating permit agency" means a permit agency, other than the
coordinating permit agency, that is responsible for the issuance of a permit
for a project.

(5)
"Parties" collectively means the coordinating permit agency,
permit agency, and participating permit agency.

(6)
"Permit" means any license, certificate, registration, permit, or
other form of authorization required by a permit agency to engage in a
particular activity.

(((6)))
(7) "Permit agency" means:

(a)
The department of ecology, an air pollution control authority, the department
of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, and the department
of health; and

(b)
Any other state or federal agency or county, city, or town that participates at
the request of the permit applicant and upon the agency's agreement to be
subject to this chapter.

(((7)))
(8) "Project" means an activity, the conduct of which requires
permits from one or more permit agencies.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.60.030 and 1997 c 429 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

The
permit assistance center is established within the department. The center
shall:

(1)
Publish and keep current one or more handbooks containing lists and
explanations of all permit laws. To the extent possible, the handbook shall
include relevant federal and tribal laws. A state agency or local government
shall provide a reasonable number of copies of application forms, statutes,
ordinances, rules, handbooks, and other informational material requested by the
center and shall otherwise fully cooperate with the center. The center shall
seek the cooperation of relevant federal agencies and tribal governments;

(2)
Establish, and make known, a point of contact for distribution of the handbook
and advice to the public as to its interpretation in any given case;

(3)
Work closely and cooperatively with the business license center in providing
efficient and nonduplicative service to the public;

(4)
Seek the assignment of employees from the permit agencies ((listed under RCW
90.60.020(6)(a))) as defined in this chapter to serve on a rotating
basis in staffing the center;

(5)
Collect and disseminate information to public and private entities on federal,
state, local, and tribal government programs that rely on private professional
expertise to assist governmental agencies in project permit review; and

(6)
Provide ((an annual)) a periodic report to the legislature ((on
potential conflicts and perceived inconsistencies among existing statutes))
that:

(a)
Provides policy and operational recommendations for streamlining and
coordinating environmental permitting in Washington; and

(b) Summarizes the results of the center's efforts to measure
center performance and outcomes over time. ((The first report shall be
submitted to the appropriate standing committees of the house of
representatives and senate by December 1, 1996.))

Sec. 3. RCW
90.60.100 and 1995 c 347 s 610 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The coordinating permit agency may enter into a written agreement with the
applicant to recover from the applicant the reasonable costs incurred by the
coordinating permit agency in carrying out the requirements of this chapter.

(2)
The coordinating permit agency may recover only the costs of performing those
coordinated permit services and shall be negotiated with the permit applicant
((in)) following the meeting required pursuant to RCW 90.60.070.
The billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost accounting and may
include a billing cycle that provides for progress payments.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
43.131.387 and 1995 c 347 s 617; and

(2) RCW
43.131.388 and 1995 c 347 s 618.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Section 4 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect June 30, 1999.

---
END ---