BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.96A.400 and 1995 c 321 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state of Washington declares that there is no fundamental right to opiate substitution
treatment. The state of Washington further declares that while ((methadone
and other like pharmacological)) opiate substitution drugs((,))
used in the treatment of opiate dependency are addictive substances, that they
nevertheless have several legal, important, and justified uses and that one of
their appropriate and legal uses is, in conjunction with other required
therapeutic procedures, in the treatment of persons addicted to or habituated
to opioids.

Because
((methadone and other like pharmacological)) opiate substitution
drugs, used in the treatment of opiate dependency are addictive and are listed
as a schedule II controlled substance in chapter 69.50 RCW, the state of
Washington ((and authorizing counties on behalf of their citizens have))
has the legal obligation and right to regulate the use of opiate
substitution treatment. The state of Washington declares its authority to
control and regulate carefully, in ((cooperation)) consultation
with ((the authorizing)) counties and cities, all clinical uses
of ((methadone and other pharmacological)) opiate substitution
drugs used in the treatment of opiate addiction.

Further,
the state declares that the primary goal of opiate substitution treatment is
total abstinence from chemical dependency for the individuals who participate
in the treatment program. The state recognizes that a small percentage of
persons who participate in opiate ((substitute [substitution])) substitution
treatment programs require treatment for an extended period of time. Opiate
substitution treatment programs shall provide a comprehensive transition
program to eliminate chemical dependency((;)), including opiate
and opiate substitute addiction of program participants.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.96A.410 and 1995 c 321 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((A county legislative authority may prohibit opiate substitution treatment
in that county. The department shall not certify an opiate substitution
treatment program in a county where the county legislative authority has
prohibited opiate substitution treatment. If a county legislative authority
authorizes opiate substitution treatment programs, it shall limit by ordinance
the number of opiate substitution treatment programs operating in that county
by limiting the number of licenses granted in that county. If a county has
authorized opiate substitution treatment programs in that county, it shall only
license opiate substitution treatment programs that comply with the
department's operating and treatment standards under this section and RCW
70.96A.420. A county that authorizes opiate substitution treatment may operate
the programs directly or through a local health department or health district
or it may authorize certified opiate substitution treatment programs that the
county licenses to provide the services within the county. Counties shall
monitor opiate substitution treatment programs for compliance with the
department's operating and treatment regulations under this section and RCW
70.96A.420.

(2)
A county that authorizes opiate substitution treatment programs shall develop
and enact by ordinance licensing standards, consistent with this chapter and
the operating and treatment standards adopted under this chapter, that govern
the application for, issuance of, renewal of, and revocation of the licenses.
Certified programs existing before May 18, 1987, applying for renewal of
licensure in subsequent years, that maintain certification and meet all other
requirements for licensure, shall be given preference.

(3)
In certifying programs, the department shall not discriminate against an opiate
substitution treatment program on the basis of its corporate structure. In
licensing programs, the county shall not discriminate against an opiate
substitution treatment program on the basis of its corporate structure.

(4))) For
purposes of this section and section 3 of this act, "area" means the
county in which an applicant proposes to locate a certified program and
counties adjacent, or near to, the county in which the program is proposed to
be located.

When
making a decision on an application for certification of a program, the
department shall:

(a)
Consult with the county legislative authorities in the area in which an
applicant proposes to locate a program and the city legislative authority in
any city in which an applicant proposes to locate a program;

(b)
Certify only programs that will be sited in accordance with the appropriate
county or city land use ordinances;

(c)
Not discriminate in its certification decision on the basis of the corporate
structure of the applicant;

(d)
Consider the size of the population in need of treatment in the area in which
the program would be located and certify only applicants whose programs meet
the necessary treatment needs of that population;

(e)
Consider the availability of other certified programs near the area in which
the applicant proposes to locate the program;

(f)
Consider the transportation systems that would provide service to the program
and whether the systems will provide reasonable opportunities to access the
program for persons in need of treatment;

(g)
Consider whether the applicant has, or has demonstrated in the past, the
capability to provide the appropriate services to assist the persons who
utilize the program in meeting goals established by the legislature, including
abstinence from opiates and opiate substitutes, obtaining mental health
treatment, improving economic independence, and reducing adverse consequences
associated with illegal use of controlled substances. The department shall
prioritize certification to applicants who have demonstrated such capability;

(h)
Hold at least one public hearing in the county in which the facility is
proposed to be located and one hearing in the area in which the facility is
proposed to be located. The hearing shall be held at a time and location that
are most likely to permit the largest number of interested persons to attend
and present testimony. The department shall notify all appropriate media
outlets of the time, date, and location of the hearing at least three weeks in
advance of the hearing.

(2)
A program applying for certification from the department and a program applying
for a contract from a state agency that has been denied the certification or
contract shall be provided with a written notice specifying the rationale and
reasons for the denial. ((A program applying for a license or a contract
from a county that has been denied the license or contract shall be provided
with a written notice specifying the rationale and reasons for the denial.

(5)
A license is effective for one calendar year from the date of issuance. The
license shall be renewed in accordance with the provisions of this section for
initial approval; the goals for treatment programs under RCW 70.96A.400; the
standards set forth in RCW 70.96A.420; and the rules adopted by the secretary.

(6))) (3)
For the purpose of this chapter, opiate substitution treatment means:

(a)
Dispensing an opiate substitution drug approved by the federal drug
administration for the treatment of opiate addiction; and

(b)
Providing a comprehensive range of medical and rehabilitative services.

(4)
The department may expand the number of certified programs at an annual rate
not to exceed ten percent, subject to appropriations. The department shall
propose in its biennial budget request specific funding necessary to expand the
number of certified programs in areas certified as needing additional treatment
capacity, but not to exceed the maximum annual growth rate.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The department may operate a pilot program to determine the benefits and costs
to the public by authorizing dispensing of opiate substitutes under this
section. The pilot program shall be limited to not more than ten physicians
around the state and shall be subject to the conditions established in this
section.

(2)
The department shall establish by rule, and in consultation with the Washington
institute for public policy, information to be provided by physicians who
participate in the pilot project for purposes of the evaluation requirement
established in section 6 of this act.

(3)
A physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW may operate a certified
program at the physician's usual place of business. Physician-operated
certified programs are not subject to the siting requirements of section 2 of
this act if the physician operates the program within his or her existing
medical practice and his or her existing medical practice serves patients with
a variety of medical conditions. Opiate substitution services cannot be the
physician's exclusive practice.

(4)
The department shall not certify any physician to dispense opiate substitutes
unless the department determines:

(a)
There is a need for an appropriate physician-based dispensing program;

(b)
The physician is adequately trained to diagnose the need for opiate
substitutes; and

(c)
There are adequate safeguards in place to assure (i) regular and ongoing
testing of patients to verify there is no unlawful use of controlled
substances; and (ii) opiate substitutes dispensed by a certified physician are
taken only by the patient to whom the substitute is dispensed.

(5)
In determining whether there is a need for a physician-based dispensing
program, the department shall:

(a)
Consider the size of the population in the area who would be appropriately
served by physician dispensing of opiate substitutes and certify only the
number of applicants necessary to meet the treatment needs of that community;

(b)
Consult with the county legislative authorities in the area in which the
certified physician will conduct business;

(c)
Consult with the city legislative authority in any city in which an applicant
will conduct business;

(d)
Certify only physicians who will dispense opiate substitutes in facilities
sited in accordance with appropriate county or city land use ordinances; and

(e)
Consult with any other individual or entity the secretary deems necessary.

(6)
In determining the adequacy of training, the department shall:

(a)
Give strong consideration to certification and educational standards developed
by appropriate professional associations;

(b)
Determine whether the physician is willing and able to work in consultation
with certified opiate substitution programs to assure that patients served by
the physician are appropriate for physician-based services rather than by a
certified program established under RCW 70.96A.410; and

(c)
Determine whether the physician is capable of recognizing and referring
patients to appropriate mental health treatment services and agrees to do so.

(7)
This section expires June 1, 2002.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.96A.420 and 1998 c 245 s 135 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department, in consultation with opiate substitution treatment service
providers and counties ((authorizing opiate substitution treatment programs))
and cities, shall establish state-wide treatment standards for certified
opiate substitution treatment programs. The department ((and counties that
authorize opiate substitution treatment programs)) shall enforce these
treatment standards. The treatment standards shall include, but not be limited
to, reasonable provisions for all appropriate and necessary medical procedures,
counseling requirements, urinalysis, and other suitable tests as needed to
ensure compliance with this chapter. ((A opiate substitution treatment
program shall not have a caseload in excess of three hundred fifty persons.))

(2)
The department, in consultation with opiate substitution treatment programs and
counties ((authorizing opiate substitution treatment programs)), shall
establish state-wide operating standards for certified opiate
substitution treatment programs. The department ((and counties that authorize
opiate substitution treatment programs)) shall enforce these operating
standards. The operating standards shall include, but not be limited to,
reasonable provisions necessary to enable the department and ((authorizing))
counties to monitor certified and licensed opiate substitution treatment
programs for compliance with this chapter and the treatment standards
authorized by this chapter and to minimize the impact of the opiate
substitution treatment programs upon the business and residential neighborhoods
in which the program is located.

(3)
The department shall establish criteria for evaluating the compliance of opiate
substitution treatment programs with the goals and standards established under
this chapter. As a condition of certification, opiate substitution programs
shall submit an annual report to the department and county legislative
authority, including data as specified by the department necessary for outcome
analysis. The department shall analyze and evaluate the data submitted by each
treatment program and take corrective action where necessary to ensure
compliance with the goals and standards enumerated under this chapter.

(4)
Before January 1st of each year, the secretary shall submit a report to the
legislature and governor. The report shall include the number of persons
enrolled in each treatment program during the period covered by the report, the
number of persons who leave each treatment program voluntarily and
involuntarily, and an outcome analysis of each treatment program. For purposes
of this subsection, "outcome analysis" shall include but not be
limited to: The number of people who, as a result of participation in the
program, are able to abstain from opiates; reduction in use of opiates; reduction
in criminal conduct; achievement of economic independence; and reduction in
utilization of health care. The report shall include information on an annual
and cumulative basis beginning on the effective date of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The governor and the department of social and health services shall seek all
necessary exemptions and waivers from and amendments to federal statutes,
rules, and regulations to secure the federal changes to permit physicians to
dispense opiate substitutes at their usual place of business in accordance with
RCW 70.96A.410 at the earliest possible date.

(2)
This section expires June 30, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
The Washington institute for public policy shall evaluate the pilot project
established in section 3 of this act. The evaluation shall determine:

(a)
Whether dispensing of opiate substitutes by physicians causes an increase in
the use of the substitutes by persons other than the clients of physicians;

(b)
The impact of physician dispensing on the achievement of legislative goals
established as set forth in RCW 70.96A.410(1)(g);

(c)
The impact of participation by a physician in the pilot project on the
remainder of the physician's professional practice;

(d)
Whether there are conditions or restrictions which impede the achievement of
legislative goals through physician dispensing of opiate substitutes and, if
so, how those conditions or restrictions can be addressed.

(2) The evaluation shall be presented to the legislature and the
department of social and health services not later than June 1, 2001.

---
END ---