BE IT
ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Recreational license dealers are private businesses that provide the service of
license sales in every part of the state. The dealers who sell recreational
fishing and hunting licenses for the department of fish and wildlife perform a
valuable public service function for those members of the public who purchase
licenses as well as a revenue generating function for the department. The
modernized fishing and hunting license format will require additional
investments by license dealers in employee training, computerized equipment,
and public education.

Sec.
2. RCW
77.32.050 and 1998 c 191 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

All recreational licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by
this chapter and raffle tickets authorized under chapter 77.12 RCW shall be
issued under the authority of the commission. The commission shall adopt rules
for the issuance of recreational licenses, permits, tags, stamps, and raffle
tickets, and for the collection, payment, and handling of license fees, terms
and conditions to govern dealers, and dealers' fees. Fees retained by dealers
shall be uniform throughout the state and shall be at least two dollars for
each license issued.

---
END ---