BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
58.17.020 and 1995 c 32 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless the context or subject matter clearly requires
otherwise, the words or phrases defined in this section shall have the
indicated meanings.

(1)
"Subdivision" is the division or redivision of land into five or more
lots, tracts, parcels, sites or divisions for the purpose of sale, lease, or
transfer of ownership, except as provided in subsection (6) of this section. "Subdivision"
also includes the redivision of land by the filing of a final plat within five
years of a short subdivision as provided in RCW 58.17.060.

(2)
"Plat" is a map or representation of a subdivision, showing thereon
the division of a tract or parcel of land into lots, blocks, streets and alleys
or other divisions and dedications.

(3)
"Dedication" is the deliberate appropriation of land by an owner for
any general and public uses, reserving to himself no other rights than such as
are compatible with the full exercise and enjoyment of the public uses to which
the property has been devoted. The intention to dedicate shall be evidenced by
the owner by the presentment for filing of a final plat or short plat showing
the dedication thereon; and, the acceptance by the public shall be evidenced by
the approval of such plat for filing by the appropriate governmental unit.

A
dedication of an area of less than two acres for use as a public park may
include a designation of a name for the park, in honor of a deceased individual
of good character.

(4)
"Preliminary plat" is a neat and approximate drawing of a proposed
subdivision showing the general layout of streets and alleys, lots, blocks, and
other elements of a subdivision consistent with the requirements of this
chapter. The preliminary plat shall be the basis for the approval or
disapproval of the general layout of a subdivision.

(5)
"Final plat" is the final drawing of the subdivision and dedication
prepared for filing for record with the county auditor and containing all
elements and requirements set forth in this chapter and in local regulations
adopted under this chapter.

(6)
"Short subdivision" is the division or redivision of land into four
or fewer lots, tracts, parcels, sites or divisions for the purpose of sale,
lease, or transfer of ownership: PROVIDED, That the legislative authority of
any city or town may by local ordinance increase the number of lots, tracts, or
parcels to be regulated as short subdivisions to a maximum of nine.

(7)
"Binding site plan" means a drawing to a scale specified by local
ordinance which: (a) Identifies and shows the areas and locations of all
streets, roads, improvements, utilities, open spaces, and any other matters
specified by local regulations; (b) contains inscriptions or attachments
setting forth such appropriate limitations and conditions for the use of the
land as are established by the local government body having authority to
approve the site plan; and (c) contains provisions making any development be in
conformity with the site plan.

(8)
"Short plat" is the map or representation of a short subdivision.

(9)
"Lot" is a fractional part of divided lands having fixed boundaries,
being of sufficient area and dimension to meet minimum zoning requirements for
width and area. The term shall include tracts or parcels.

(10)
"Block" is a group of lots, tracts, or parcels within well defined
and fixed boundaries.

(11)
"County treasurer" shall be as defined in chapter 36.29 RCW or the
office or person assigned such duties under a county charter.

(12)
"County auditor" shall be as defined in chapter 36.22 RCW or the
office or person assigned such duties under a county charter.

(13)
"County road engineer" shall be as defined in chapter 36.40 RCW or
the office or person assigned such duties under a county charter.

(14)
"Planning commission" means that body as defined in chapters 36.70,
35.63, or 35A.63 RCW as designated by the legislative body to perform a
planning function or that body assigned such duties and responsibilities under
a city or county charter.

(15)
"County commissioner" shall be as defined in chapter 36.32 RCW or the
body assigned such duties under a county charter.

Sec.
2. RCW
58.17.060 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative body of a city, town, or county shall adopt regulations and
procedures, and appoint administrative personnel for the summary approval of
short plats and short subdivisions or alteration or vacation thereof. When an
alteration or vacation involves a public dedication, the alteration or vacation
shall be processed as provided in RCW 58.17.212 or 58.17.215. Such regulations
shall be adopted by ordinance and shall provide that a short plat and short
subdivision may be approved only if written findings that are appropriate, as
provided in RCW 58.17.110, are made by the administrative personnel, and may
contain wholly different requirements than those governing the approval of
preliminary and final plats of subdivisions and may require surveys and
monumentations and shall require filing of a short plat, or alteration or
vacation thereof, for record in the office of the county auditor: PROVIDED,
That such regulations must contain a requirement that land in short
subdivisions may not be further divided in any manner within a period of five
years without the filing of a final plat, which may contain a fewer number
of parcels than is provided in RCW 58.17.020, except that when the short
plat contains fewer than four parcels, nothing in this section shall prevent
the owner who filed the short plat from filing an alteration within the
five-year period to create up to a total of four lots within the original short
plat boundaries: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such regulations are not required to
contain a penalty clause as provided in RCW 36.32.120 and may provide for
wholly injunctive relief.

An
ordinance requiring a survey shall require that the survey be completed and
filed with the application for approval of the short subdivision.

(2) Cities, towns, and counties shall include in their short plat
regulations and procedures pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
provisions for considering sidewalks and other planning features that assure
safe walking conditions for students who walk to and from school.

---
END ---