BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.04.030 and 1997 c 3 s 102 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

"Assessed
value of property" shall be held and construed to mean the aggregate
valuation of the property subject to taxation by any taxing district as ((determined
under RCW 84.40.0305, reduced by the value of any applicable exemptions under
RCW 84.36.381 or other law, and)) placed on the last completed and balanced
tax rolls of the county preceding the date of any tax levy.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.40.020 and 1997 c 239 s 2 and 1997 c 3 s 103 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

All
real property in this state subject to taxation shall be listed and assessed
every year, with reference to its ((appraised and assessed)) value((s))
on the first day of January of the year in which it is assessed. Such listing
and all supporting documents and records shall be open to public inspection
during the regular office hours of the assessor's office: PROVIDED, That
confidential income data is hereby exempted from public inspection as noted in
RCW 42.17.260 and 42.17.310. All personal property in this state subject to
taxation shall be listed and assessed every year, with reference to its value
and ownership on the first day of January of the year in which it is assessed:
PROVIDED, That if the stock of goods, wares, merchandise or material, whether
in a raw or finished state or in process of manufacture, owned or held by any
taxpayer on January 1 of any year does not fairly represent the average stock
carried by such taxpayer, such stock shall be listed and assessed upon the
basis of the monthly average of stock owned or held by such taxpayer during the
preceding calendar year or during such portion thereof as the taxpayer was
engaged in business.

Sec.
3. RCW
84.40.030 and 1998 c 320 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

All
((personal)) property shall be valued at one hundred percent of its true
and fair value in money and assessed on the same basis unless specifically
provided otherwise by law.

((All
real property shall be appraised at one hundred percent of its true and fair
value in money and assessed as provided in RCW 84.40.0305 unless specifically
provided otherwise by law.))

Taxable
leasehold estates shall be valued at such price as they would bring at a fair,
voluntary sale for cash without any deductions for any indebtedness owed
including rentals to be paid.

The
true and fair value of real property for taxation purposes (including property
upon which there is a coal or other mine, or stone or other quarry) shall be
based upon the following criteria:

(1)
Any sales of the property being appraised or similar properties with respect to
sales made within the past five years. The appraisal shall be consistent with
the comprehensive land use plan, development regulations under chapter 36.70A
RCW, zoning, and any other governmental policies or practices in effect at the
time of appraisal that affect the use of property, as well as physical and
environmental influences. An assessment may not be determined by a method that
assumes a land usage not permitted, for that property being appraised, under
existing zoning or land use planning ordinances or statutes. The appraisal
shall also take into account: (a) In the use of sales by real estate contract
as similar sales, the extent, if any, to which the stated selling price has
been increased by reason of the down payment, interest rate, or other financing
terms; and (b) the extent to which the sale of a similar property actually
represents the general effective market demand for property of such type, in
the geographical area in which such property is located. Sales involving deed
releases or similar seller-developer financing arrangements shall not be used as
sales of similar property.

(2)
In addition to sales as defined in subsection (1) of this section,
consideration may be given to cost, cost less depreciation, reconstruction cost
less depreciation, or capitalization of income that would be derived from prudent
use of the property. In the case of property of a complex nature, or being
used under terms of a franchise from a public agency, or operating as a public
utility, or property not having a record of sale within five years and not
having a significant number of sales of similar property in the general area,
the provisions of this subsection shall be the dominant factors in valuation.
When provisions of this subsection are relied upon for establishing values the
property owner shall be advised upon request of the factors used in arriving at
such value.

(3)
In valuing any tract or parcel of real property, the ((true and fair))
value of the land, exclusive of structures thereon shall be determined; also
the ((true and fair)) value of structures thereon, but the ((appraised))
valuation shall not exceed the ((true and fair)) value of the total
property as it exists. In valuing agricultural land, growing crops shall be
excluded.

Sec.
4. RCW
84.40.040 and 1997 c 3 s 106 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

The
assessor shall begin the preliminary work for each assessment not later than
the first day of December of each year in all counties in the state. The
assessor shall also complete the duties of listing and placing valuations on
all property by May 31st of each year, except that the listing and valuation of
construction and mobile homes under RCW 36.21.080 and 36.21.090 shall be
completed by August 31st of each year, and in the following manner, to wit:

The
assessor shall actually determine as nearly as practicable the true and fair
value of each tract or lot of land listed for taxation and of each improvement
located thereon and shall enter ((as the appraised value)) one hundred
percent of the ((true and fair)) value of such land and of the total ((true
and fair)) value of such improvements, together with the total of such one
hundred percent valuations, opposite each description of property on the
assessment list and tax roll.

((The
assessor shall determine the assessed value, under RCW 84.40.0305, for each
tract or lot of land listed for taxation, including improvements located
thereon, and shall also enter this value opposite each description of property
on the assessment list and tax roll.))

The
assessor shall make an alphabetical list of the names of all persons in the
county liable to assessment of personal property, and require each person to
make a correct list and statement of such property according to the standard
form prescribed by the department of revenue, which statement and list shall
include, if required by the form, the year of acquisition and total original
cost of personal property in each category of the prescribed form, and shall be
signed and verified under penalty of perjury by the person listing the
property: PROVIDED, That the assessor may list and value improvements on
publicly owned land in the same manner as real property is listed and valued,
including conformance with the revaluation program required under chapter 84.41
RCW. Such list and statement shall be filed on or before the last day of
April. The assessor shall on or before the 1st day of January of each year
mail a notice to all such persons at their last known address that such
statement and list is required, such notice to be accompanied by the form on
which the statement or list is to be made: PROVIDED, That the notice mailed by
the assessor to each taxpayer each year shall, if practicable, include the
statement and list of personal property of the taxpayer for the preceding
year. Upon receipt of such statement and list the assessor shall thereupon
determine the true and fair value of the property included in such statement
and enter one hundred percent of the same on the assessment roll opposite the
name of the party assessed; and in making such entry in the assessment list,
the assessor shall give the name and post office address of the party listing
the property, and if the party resides in a city the assessor shall give the
street and number or other brief description of the party's residence or place
of business. The assessor may, after giving written notice of the action to
the person to be assessed, add to the assessment list any taxable property
which should be included in such list.

Sec.
5. RCW
84.40.045 and 1997 c 3 s 107 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

The
assessor shall give notice of any change in the ((assessed)) true and
fair value of real property for the tract or lot of land and any
improvements thereon no later than thirty days after appraisal: PROVIDED, That
no such notice shall be mailed during the period from January 15 to February 15
of each year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no notice need be sent with respect to
changes in valuation of forest land made pursuant to chapter 84.33 RCW.

The
notice shall contain a statement of both the prior and the new ((appraised
and assessed)) true and fair value((s)) and the ratio of
the assessed value to the true and fair value on which the assessment of the
property is based, stating separately land and improvement ((appraised))
values, and a brief statement of the procedure for appeal to the board of
equalization and the time, date, and place of the meetings of the board.

The
notice shall be mailed by the assessor to the taxpayer.

If
any taxpayer, as shown by the tax rolls, holds solely a security interest in
the real property which is the subject of the notice, pursuant to a mortgage, contract
of sale, or deed of trust, such taxpayer shall, upon written request of the
assessor, supply, within thirty days of receipt of such request, to the
assessor the name and address of the person making payments pursuant to the
mortgage, contract of sale, or deed of trust, and thereafter such person shall
also receive a copy of the notice provided for in this section. Willful
failure to comply with such request within the time limitation provided for
herein shall make such taxpayer subject to a maximum civil penalty of five
thousand dollars. The penalties provided for herein shall be recoverable in an
action by the county prosecutor, and when recovered shall be deposited in the
county current expense fund. The assessor shall make the request provided for
by this section during the month of January.

Sec.
6. RCW
84.41.041 and 1997 c 3 s 108 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

Each
county assessor shall cause taxable real property to be physically inspected
and valued at least once every six years in accordance with RCW 84.41.030, and
in accordance with a plan filed with and approved by the department of
revenue. Such revaluation plan shall provide that a reasonable portion of all
taxable real property within a county shall be revalued and these
newly-determined values placed on the assessment rolls each year. The
department may approve a plan that provides that all property in the county be
revalued every two years. If the revaluation plan provides for physical
inspection at least once each four years, during the intervals between each
physical inspection of real property, the ((appraised)) valuation of
such property may be adjusted to its current true and fair value, such
adjustments to be based upon appropriate statistical data. If the revaluation
plan provides for physical inspection less frequently than once each four
years, during the intervals between each physical inspection of real property,
the ((appraised)) valuation of such property shall be adjusted to its
current true and fair value, such adjustments to be made once each year and to
be based upon appropriate statistical data. ((If the appraised valuation is
changed, the assessed value shall be recalculated under RCW 84.40.0305.))

The
assessor may require property owners to submit pertinent data respecting
taxable property in their control including data respecting any sale or
purchase of said property within the past five years, the cost and
characteristics of any improvement on the property and other facts necessary
for appraisal of the property.

Sec.
7. RCW
84.48.010 and 1997 c 3 s 109 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

Prior
to July 15th, the county legislative authority shall form a board for the
equalization of the assessment of the property of the county. The members of
said board shall receive a per diem amount as set by the county legislative
authority for each day of actual attendance of the meeting of the board of equalization
to be paid out of the current expense fund of the county: PROVIDED, That when
the county legislative authority constitute the board they shall only receive
their compensation as members of the county legislative authority. The board
of equalization shall meet in open session for this purpose annually on the
15th day of July and, having each taken an oath fairly and impartially to
perform their duties as members of such board, they shall examine and compare
the returns of the assessment of the property of the county and proceed to
equalize the same, so that ((the appraised value of)) each tract or lot
of real property and each article or class of personal property shall be
entered on the assessment list at its true and fair value, according to the measure
of value used by the county assessor in such assessment year, ((and so that
the assessed value of each tract or lot of real property is entered on the
assessment list at its correct amount)) which is presumed to be correct
under RCW 84.40.0301, and subject to the following rules:

First.
They shall raise the ((appraised)) valuation of each tract or lot or
item of real property which is returned below its true and fair value to such
price or sum as to be the true and fair value thereof, ((and raise the
assessed valuation of each tract or lot or item of real property which is
returned below its correct amount to the correct amount)) after at least
five days' notice shall have been given in writing to the owner or agent.

Second.
They shall reduce the ((appraised)) valuation of each tract or lot or
item which is returned above its true and fair value to such price or sum as to
be the true and fair value thereof ((and reduce the assessed valuation of
each tract or lot or item of real property which is returned above its correct
amount to the correct amount)).

Third.
They shall raise the valuation of each class of personal property which is
returned below its true and fair value to such price or sum as to be the true
and fair value thereof, and they shall raise the aggregate value of the
personal property of each individual whenever the aggregate value is less than
the true valuation of the taxable personal property possessed by such
individual, to such sum or amount as to be the true value thereof, after at
least five days' notice shall have been given in writing to the owner or agent
thereof.

Fourth.
They shall reduce the valuation of each class of personal property enumerated
on the detail and assessment list of the current year, which is returned above
its true and fair value, to such price or sum as to be the true and fair value
thereof; and they shall reduce the aggregate valuation of the personal property
of such individual who has been assessed at too large a sum to such sum or
amount as was the true and fair value of the personal property.

Fifth.
The board may review all claims for either real or personal property tax
exemption as determined by the county assessor, and shall consider any taxpayer
appeals from the decision of the assessor thereon to determine (1) if the
taxpayer is entitled to an exemption, and (2) if so, the amount thereof.

The
clerk of the board shall keep an accurate journal or record of the proceedings
and orders of said board showing the facts and evidence upon which their action
is based, and the said record shall be published the same as other proceedings
of county legislative authority, and shall make a true record of the changes of
the descriptions and ((appraised)) assessed values ordered by the
county board of equalization. The assessor shall ((recalculate assessed
values and)) correct the real and personal assessment rolls in accordance
with the changes made by the said county board of equalization, and the
assessor shall make duplicate abstracts of such corrected values, one copy of
which shall be retained in the office, and one copy forwarded to the department
of revenue on or before the eighteenth day of August next following the meeting
of the county board of equalization.

The
county board of equalization shall meet on the 15th day of July and may
continue in session and adjourn from time to time during a period not to exceed
four weeks, but shall remain in session not less than three days: PROVIDED,
That the county board of equalization with the approval of the county
legislative authority may convene at any time when petitions filed exceed
twenty-five, or ten percent of the number of appeals filed in the preceding
year, whichever is greater.

No
taxes, except special taxes, shall be extended upon the tax rolls until the
property valuations are equalized by the department of revenue for the purpose
of raising the state revenue.

County
legislative authorities as such shall at no time have any authority to change
the valuation of the property of any person or to release or commute in whole
or in part the taxes due on the property of any person.

Sec.
8. RCW
84.48.065 and 1997 c 3 s 110 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
The county assessor or treasurer may cancel or correct assessments on the
assessment or tax rolls which are erroneous due to manifest errors in
description, double assessments, clerical errors in extending the rolls, ((clerical
errors in calculating the assessed value under RCW 84.40.0305,)) and such
manifest errors in the listing of the property which do not involve a
revaluation of property, except in the case that a taxpayer produces proof that
an authorized land use authority has made a definitive change in the property's
land use designation. In such a case, correction of the assessment or tax
rolls may be made notwithstanding the fact that the action involves a
revaluation of property. Manifest errors that do not involve a revaluation of
property include the assessment of property exempted by law from taxation or
the failure to deduct the exemption allowed by law to the head of a family.
When the county assessor cancels or corrects an assessment, the assessor shall
send a notice to the taxpayer in accordance with RCW 84.40.045, advising the
taxpayer that the action has been taken and notifying the taxpayer of the right
to appeal the cancellation or correction to the county board of equalization,
in accordance with RCW 84.40.038. When the county assessor or treasurer
cancels or corrects an assessment, a record of such action shall be prepared,
setting forth therein the facts relating to the error. The record shall also
set forth by legal description all property belonging exclusively to the state,
any county, or any municipal corporation whose property is exempt from
taxation, upon which there remains, according to the tax roll, any unpaid
taxes. No manifest error cancellation or correction, including a cancellation
or correction made due to a definitive change of land use designation, shall be
made for any period more than three years preceding the year in which the error
is discovered.

(2)(a)
In the case of a definitive change of land use designation, an assessor shall
make corrections that involve a revaluation of property to the assessment roll
when:

(i)
The assessor and taxpayer have signed an agreement as to the true and fair
value of the taxpayer's property setting forth in the agreement the valuation
information upon which the agreement is based; and

(ii)
The assessment roll has previously been certified in accordance with RCW
84.40.320.

(b)
In all other cases, an assessor shall make corrections that involve a
revaluation of property to the assessment roll when:

(i)
The assessor and taxpayer have signed an agreement as to the true and fair
value of the taxpayer's property setting forth in the agreement the valuation
information upon which the agreement is based; and

(ii)
The following conditions are met:

(A)
The assessment roll has previously been certified in accordance with RCW
84.40.320;

(B)
The taxpayer has timely filed a petition with the county board of equalization
pursuant to RCW 84.40.038 for the current assessment year;

(C)
The county board of equalization has not yet held a hearing on the merits of
the taxpayer's petition.

(3)
The assessor shall issue a supplementary roll or rolls including such
cancellations and corrections, and the assessment and levy shall have the same
force and effect as if made in the first instance, and the county treasurer
shall proceed to collect the taxes due on the rolls as modified.

Sec.
9. RCW
84.48.075 and 1997 c 3 s 111 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
The department of revenue shall annually, prior to the first Monday in
September, determine and submit to each assessor a preliminary indicated ratio
for each county: PROVIDED, That the department shall establish rules and
regulations pertinent to the determination of the indicated ratio, the
indicated real property ratio and the indicated personal property ratio:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That these rules and regulations may provide that data, as is
necessary for said determination, which is available from the county assessor
of any county and which has been audited as to its validity by the department,
shall be utilized by the department in determining the indicated ratio.

(2)
To such extent as is reasonable, the department may define use classes of
property for the purposes of determination of the indicated ratio. Such use
classes may be defined with respect to property use and may include
agricultural, open space, timber and forest lands.

(3)
The department shall review each county's preliminary ratio with the assessor,
a landowner, or an owner of an intercounty public utility or private car
company of that county, if requested by the assessor, a landowner, or an owner
of an intercounty public utility or private car company of that county,
respectively, between the first and third Mondays of September. Prior to
equalization of assessments pursuant to RCW 84.48.080 and after the third Monday
of September, the department shall certify to each county assessor the real and
personal property ratio for that county.

(4)
The department of revenue shall also examine procedures used by the assessor to
assess real and personal property in the county, including calculations, use of
prescribed value schedules, and efforts to locate all taxable property in the
county. If any examination by the department discloses other than market value
is being listed ((as appraised value)) on the county assessment rolls of
the county by the assessor and, after due notification by the department, is
not corrected, the department of revenue shall, in accordance with rules
adopted by the department, adjust the ratio of that type of property, which
adjustment shall be used for determining the county's indicated ratio.

Sec.
10. RCW
84.48.080 and 1997 c 3 s 112 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
Annually during the months of September and October, the department of revenue
shall examine and compare the returns of the assessment of the property in the
several counties of the state, and the assessment of the property of railroad
and other companies assessed by the department, and proceed to equalize the
same, so that each county in the state shall pay its due and just proportion of
the taxes for state purposes for such assessment year, according to the ratio
the ((assessed)) valuation of the property in each county bears to the
((correct)) total ((assessed)) valuation of all property in the
state.

First.
The department shall classify all property, real and personal, and shall raise
and lower the ((assessed)) valuation of any class of property in any
county to a value that shall be equal, so far as possible, to the ((correct
assessed)) true and fair value of such class as of January 1st of
the current year((, after determining the correct appraised value, and any
adjustment applicable under RCW 84.40.0305 for the property,)) for the
purpose of ascertaining the just amount of tax due from each county for state
purposes. In equalizing personal property as of January 1st of the current
year, the department shall use the assessment level of the preceding year.
Such classification may be on the basis of types of property, geographical
areas, or both. For purposes of this section, for each county that has not
provided the department with an assessment return by December 1st, the
department shall proceed, using facts and information and in a manner it deems
appropriate, to estimate the value of each class of property in the county.

Second.
The department shall keep a full record of its proceedings and the same shall
be published annually by the department.

(2)
The department shall levy the state taxes authorized by law. The amount levied
in any one year for general state purposes shall not exceed the lawful dollar
rate on the dollar of the assessed value of the property of the entire state ((as
equalized under this section)), which assessed value shall be one
hundred percent of the true and fair value of the property in money. The
department shall apportion the amount of tax for state purposes levied by the
department, among the several counties, in proportion to the ((assessed))
valuation of the taxable property of the county for the year as equalized by
the department: PROVIDED, That for purposes of this apportionment, the
department shall recompute the previous year's levy and the apportionment
thereof to correct for changes and errors in taxable values reported to the
department after October 1 of the preceding year and shall adjust the
apportioned amount of the current year's state levy for each county by the
difference between the apportioned amounts established by the original and
revised levy computations for the previous year. For purposes of this section,
changes in taxable values mean a final adjustment made by a county board of
equalization, the state board of tax appeals, or a court of competent
jurisdiction and shall include additions of omitted property, other additions
or deletions from the assessment or tax rolls, any assessment return provided
by a county to the department subsequent to December 1st, or a change in the
indicated ratio of a county. Errors in taxable values mean errors corrected by
a final reviewing body.

In
addition to computing a levy under this subsection that is reduced under RCW
84.55.012, the department shall compute a hypothetical levy without regard to
the reduction under RCW 84.55.012. This hypothetical levy shall also be
apportioned among the several counties in proportion to the valuation of the
taxable property of the county for the year, as equalized by the department, in
the same manner as the actual levy and shall be used by the county assessors
for the purpose of recomputing and establishing a consolidated levy under RCW
84.52.010.

(3)
The department shall have authority to adopt rules and regulations to enforce
obedience to its orders in all matters in relation to the returns of county
assessments, the equalization of values, and the apportionment of the state
levy by the department.

(4)
After the completion of the duties prescribed in this section, the director of
the department shall certify the record of the proceedings of the department
under this section, the tax levies made for state purposes and the
apportionment thereof among the counties, and the certification shall be
available for public inspection.

Sec.
11. RCW
84.12.270 and 1997 c 3 s 113 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

The
department of revenue shall annually make an assessment of the operating
property of all companies; and between the fifteenth day of March and the first
day of July of each of said years shall prepare an assessment roll upon which
it shall enter and assess the ((assessed)) true and fair
value of all the operating property of each of such companies as of the first
day of January of the year in which the assessment is made. For the purpose of
determining the ((assessed)) true and fair value of such property
the department of revenue may inspect the property belonging to said companies
and may take into consideration any information or knowledge obtained by it
from such examination and inspection of such property, or of the books, records
and accounts of such companies, the statements filed as required by this
chapter, the reports, statements or returns of such companies filed in the
office of any board, office or commission of this state or any county thereof,
the earnings and earning power of such companies, the franchises owned or used
by such companies, the assessed valuation of any and all property of such
companies, whether operating or nonoperating property, and whether situated
within or outside the state, and any other facts, evidence or information that
may be obtainable bearing upon the value of the operating property: PROVIDED,
That in no event shall any statement or report required from any company by
this chapter be conclusive upon the department of revenue in determining the
amount, character and ((assessed)) true and fair value of the
operating property of such company.

Sec.
12. RCW
84.12.280 and 1998 c 335 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
In making the assessment of the operating property of any railroad or logging
railroad company and in the apportionment of the values and the taxation
thereof, all land occupied and claimed exclusively as the right-of-way for
railroads, with all the tracks and substructures and superstructures which
support the same, together with all side tracks, second tracks, turn-outs,
station houses, depots, round houses, machine shops, or other buildings
belonging to the company, used in the operation thereof, without separating the
same into land and improvements, shall be assessed as real property. And the
rolling stock and other movable property belonging to any railroad or logging
railroad company shall be considered as personal property and taxed as such:
PROVIDED, That all of the operating property of street railway companies shall
be assessed and taxed as personal property.

(((2)))
All of the operating property of airplane companies, telegraph companies, pipe
line companies, and all of the operating property other than lands and
buildings of electric light and power companies, telephone companies, and gas
companies shall be assessed and taxed as personal property.

(((3)
Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the limit provided
under RCW 84.40.0305 shall be applied in the assessment of property under this
section to the same extent as that limit is generally applied to property not
assessed under this chapter.))

Sec.
13. RCW
84.12.310 and 1997 c 3 s 115 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

For
the purpose of determining the system value of the operating property of any
such company, the department of revenue shall deduct from the ((assessed))
true and fair value of the total assets of such company, the ((assessed))
actual cash value of all nonoperating property owned by such company.
For such purpose the department of revenue may require of the assessors of the
various counties within this state a detailed list of such company's properties
assessed by them, together with the assessable or assessed value thereof:
PROVIDED, That such assessed or assessable value shall be advisory only and not
conclusive on the department of revenue as to the value thereof.

Sec.
14. RCW
84.12.330 and 1998 c 335 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
the assessment roll shall be placed after the name of each company a general
description of the operating property of the company, which shall be considered
sufficient if described in the language of RCW 84.12.200(12), as applied to the
company, following which shall be entered the ((assessed)) true and
fair value of the operating property as determined by the department of
revenue. No assessment shall be invalidated by reason of a mistake in the name
of the company assessed, or the omission of the name of the owner or by the
entry as owner of a name other than that of the true owner. When the department
of revenue shall have prepared the assessment roll and entered thereon the ((assessed))
true and fair value of the operating property of the company, as herein
required, it shall notify the company by mail of the valuation determined by it
and entered upon the roll.

Sec.
15. RCW
84.12.350 and 1997 c 3 s 117 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

Upon
determination by the department of revenue of the ((assessed)) true
and fair value of the property appearing on such rolls it shall apportion
such value to the respective counties entitled thereto, as hereinafter
provided, and shall determine the equalized assessed valuation of such property
in each such county and in the several taxing districts therein, by applying to
such actual apportioned value the same ratio as the ratio of assessed to ((the
correct assessed)) actual value of the general property in such
county: PROVIDED, That, whenever the amount of the true and correct ((assessed))
value of the operating property of any company otherwise apportionable to any
county or other taxing district shall be less than two hundred fifty dollars,
such amount need not be apportioned to such county or taxing district but may
be added to the amount apportioned to an adjacent county or taxing district.

Sec.
16. RCW
84.12.360 and 1998 c 335 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
true and fair value of the operating property assessed to a company, as
fixed and determined by the department of revenue, shall be apportioned by the
department of revenue to the respective counties and to the taxing districts
thereof wherein such property is located in the following manner:

(1)
Property of all railroad companies other than street railroad companies,
telegraph companies and pipe line companies‑-upon the basis of that
proportion of the value of the total operating property within the state which
the mileage of track, as classified by the department of revenue (in case of
railroads), mileage of wire (in the case of telegraph companies), and mileage
of pipe line (in the case of pipe line companies) within each county or taxing
district bears to the total mileage thereof within the state, at the end of the
calendar year last past. For the purpose of such apportionment the department
may classify railroad track.

(2)
Property of street railroad companies, telephone companies, electric light and
power companies, and gas companies‑-upon the basis of relative value of
the operating property within each county and taxing district to the value of
the total operating property within the state to be determined by such factors
as the department of revenue shall deem proper.

(3)
Planes or other aircraft of airplane companies‑-upon the basis of such
factor or factors of allocation, to be determined by the department of revenue,
as will secure a substantially fair and equitable division between counties and
other taxing districts.

All
other property of airplane companies‑-upon the basis set forth in
subsection (2) of this section.

The
basis of apportionment with reference to all public utility companies above
prescribed shall not be deemed exclusive and the department of revenue in
apportioning values of such companies may also take into consideration such other
information, facts, circumstances, or allocation factors as will enable it to
make a substantially just and correct valuation of the operating property of
such companies within the state and within each county thereof.

Sec.
17. RCW
84.16.040 and 1997 c 3 s 119 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

The
department of revenue shall annually make an assessment of the operating
property of each private car company; and between the first day of May and the
first day of July of each of said years shall prepare an assessment roll upon
which it shall enter and assess the ((assessed)) true and fair
value of all the operating property of each of such companies as of the first
day of January of the year in which the assessment is made. For the purpose of
determining the ((assessed)) true and fair value of such property
the department of revenue may take into consideration any information or
knowledge obtained by it from an examination and inspection of such property,
or of the books, records and accounts of such companies, the statements filed
as required by this chapter, the reports, statements or returns of such
companies filed in the office of any board, office or commission of this state
or any county thereof, the earnings and earning power of such companies, the
franchises owned or used by such companies, the assessed valuation of any and
all property of such companies, whether operating property or nonoperating
property, and whether situated within or without the state, and any other
facts, evidences or information that may be obtainable bearing upon the value
of the operating property: PROVIDED, That in no event shall any statement or
report required from any company by this chapter be conclusive upon the
department of revenue in determining the amount, character and ((assessed))
true and fair value of the operating property of such company.

Sec.
18. RCW
84.16.050 and 1997 c 3 s 120 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

The
department of revenue may, in determining the ((assessed)) true and
fair value of the operating property to be placed on the assessment roll
value the entire property as a unit. If the company owns, leases, operates or
uses property partly within and partly without the state, the department of
revenue may determine the value of the operating property within this state by
the proportion that the value of such property bears to the value of the entire
operating property of the company, both within and without this state. In
determining the operating property which is located within this state the
department of revenue may consider and base such determination on the
proportion which the number of car miles of the various classes of cars made in
this state bears to the total number of car miles made by the same cars within
and without this state, or to the total number of car miles made by all cars of
the various classes within and without this state. If the value of the
operating property of the company cannot be fairly determined in such manner
the department of revenue may use any other reasonable and fair method to
determine the value of the operating property of the company within this state.

Sec.
19. RCW
84.16.090 and 1997 c 3 s 121 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

Upon
the assessment roll shall be placed after the name of each company a general
description of the operating property of the company, which shall be considered
sufficient if described in the language of RCW 84.16.010(3) or otherwise,
following which shall be entered the ((assessed)) true and fair
value of the operating property as determined by the department of revenue. No
assessment shall be invalid by a mistake in the name of the company assessed,
by omission of the name of the owner or by the entry of a name other than that
of the true owner. When the department of revenue shall have prepared the
assessment roll and entered thereon the ((assessed)) true and fair
value of the operating property of the company, as required, it shall notify
the company by mail of the valuation determined by it and entered upon the
roll; and thereupon such ((assessed)) valuation shall become the ((assessed))
true and fair value of the operating property of the company, subject to
revision or correction by the department of revenue as hereinafter provided;
and shall be the valuation upon which, after equalization by the department of
revenue as hereinafter provided, the taxes of such company shall be based and
computed.

Sec.
20. RCW
84.16.110 and 1997 c 3 s 122 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

Upon
determination by the department of revenue of the true and ((correct
assessed)) fair value of the property appearing on such rolls the
department shall apportion such value to the respective counties entitled
thereto as hereinafter provided, and shall determine the equalized or assessed
valuation of such property in such counties by applying to such actual
apportioned value the same ratio as the ratio of assessed to ((the correct
assessed)) actual value of the general property of the respective
counties: PROVIDED, That, whenever the amount of the true and correct ((assessed))
value of the operating property of any company otherwise apportionable to any
county shall be less than two hundred fifty dollars, such amount need not be
apportioned to such county but may be added to the amount apportioned to an
adjacent county.

Sec.
21. RCW
84.16.120 and 1997 c 3 s 123 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

The
((assessed)) true and fair value of the property of each company
as fixed and determined by the department of revenue as herein provided shall
be apportioned to the respective counties in the following manner:

(1)
If all the operating property of the company is situated entirely within a
county and none of such property is located within, extends into, or through or
is operated into or through any other county, the entire value thereof shall be
apportioned to the county within which such property is situated, located, and
operated.

(2)
If the operating property of any company is situated or located within, extends
into or is operated into or through more than one county, the value thereof
shall be apportioned to the respective counties into or through which its cars
are operated in the proportion that the length of main line track of the
respective railroads moving such cars in such counties bears to the total
length of main line track of such respective railroads in this state.

(3)
If the property of any company is of such character that it will not be
reasonable, feasible or fair to apportion the value as hereinabove provided,
the value thereof shall be apportioned between the respective counties into or
through which such property extends or is operated or in which the same is
located in such manner as may be reasonable, feasible and fair.

Sec.
22. RCW
84.36.041 and 1998 c 311 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All real and personal property used by a nonprofit home for the aging that is
reasonably necessary for the purposes of the home is exempt from taxation if
the benefit of the exemption inures to the home and:

(a)
At least fifty percent of the occupied dwelling units in the home are occupied
by eligible residents; or

(b)
The home is subsidized under a federal department of housing and urban
development program. The department of revenue shall provide by rule a
definition of homes eligible for exemption under this subsection (b),
consistent with the purposes of this section.

(2)
All real and personal property used by a nonprofit home for the aging that is
reasonably necessary for the purposes of the home is exempt from taxation if
the benefit of the exemption inures to the home and the construction,
rehabilitation, acquisition, or refinancing of the home is financed under a
program using bonds exempt from federal income tax if at least seventy-five
percent of the total amount financed uses the tax exempt bonds and the financing
program requires the home to reserve a percentage of all dwelling units so
financed for low-income residents. The initial term of the exemption under
this subsection shall equal the term of the tax exempt bond used in connection
with the financing program, or the term of the requirement to reserve dwelling
units for low-income residents, whichever is shorter. If the financing program
involves less than the entire home, only those dwelling units included in the
financing program are eligible for total exemption. The department of revenue
shall provide by rule the requirements for monitoring compliance with the
provisions of this subsection and the requirements for exemption including:

(a)
The number or percentage of dwelling units required to be occupied by
low-income residents, and a definition of low income;

(b)
The type and character of the dwelling units, whether independent units or
otherwise; and

(c)
Any particular requirements for continuing care retirement communities.

(3)
A home for the aging is eligible for a partial exemption on the real property
and a total exemption for the home's personal property if the home does not
meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section because fewer than
fifty percent of the occupied dwelling units are occupied by eligible
residents, as follows:

(a)
A partial exemption shall be allowed for each dwelling unit in a home occupied
by a resident requiring assistance with activities of daily living.

(b)
A partial exemption shall be allowed for each dwelling unit in a home occupied
by an eligible resident.

(c)
A partial exemption shall be allowed for an area jointly used by a home for the
aging and by a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation currently
exempt from property taxation under one of the other provisions of this
chapter. The shared area must be reasonably necessary for the purposes of the
nonprofit organization, association, or corporation exempt from property
taxation under one of the other provisions of this chapter, such as kitchen,
dining, and laundry areas.

(d)
The amount of exemption shall be calculated by multiplying the assessed value
of the property reasonably necessary for the purposes of the home, less the
assessed value of any area exempt under (c) of this subsection, by a fraction.
The numerator of the fraction is the number of dwelling units occupied by
eligible residents and by residents requiring assistance with activities of
daily living. The denominator of the fraction is the total number of occupied
dwelling units as of January 1st of the year for which exemption is claimed.

(4)
To be exempt under this section, the property must be used exclusively for the
purposes for which the exemption is granted, except as provided in RCW
84.36.805.

(5)
A home for the aging is exempt from taxation only if the organization operating
the home is exempt from income tax under section 501(c) of the federal internal
revenue code as existing on January 1, 1989, or such subsequent date as the
director may provide by rule consistent with the purposes of this section.

(6)
In order for the home to be eligible for exemption under subsections (1)(a) and
(((2))) (3)(b) of this section, each eligible resident of a home
for the aging shall submit an income verification form to the county assessor
by July 1st of the assessment year in which the application for exemption is
made. The income verification form shall be prescribed and furnished by the
department of revenue. An eligible resident who has filed a form for a previous
year need not file a new form until there is a change in status affecting the
person's eligibility.

(7)
In determining the ((assessed)) true and fair value of a home for
the aging for purposes of the partial exemption provided by subsection (3) of this
section, the assessor shall apply the computation method provided by RCW
84.34.060 and shall consider only the use to which such property is applied
during the years for which such partial exemptions are available and shall not
consider potential uses of such property.

(8)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Eligible resident" means a person who:

(i)
Occupied the dwelling unit as a principal place of residence as of January 1st
of the year for which the exemption is claimed. Confinement of the person to a
hospital or nursing home does not disqualify the claim of exemption if the
dwelling unit is temporarily unoccupied or if the dwelling unit is occupied by
a spouse, a person financially dependent on the claimant for support, or both;
and

(ii)
Is sixty-one years of age or older on December 31st of the year in which the
exemption claim is filed, or is, at the time of filing, retired from regular
gainful employment by reason of physical disability. Any surviving spouse of a
person who was receiving an exemption at the time of the person's death shall
qualify if the surviving spouse is fifty-seven years of age or older and
otherwise meets the requirements of this subsection; and

(iii)
Has a combined disposable income of no more than the greater of twenty-two
thousand dollars or eighty percent of the median income adjusted for family
size as most recently determined by the federal department of housing and urban
development for the county in which the person resides. For the purposes of
determining eligibility under this section, a "cotenant" means a
person who resides with an eligible resident and who shares personal financial
resources with the eligible resident.

(b)
"Combined disposable income" means the disposable income of the
person submitting the income verification form, plus the disposable income of
his or her spouse, and the disposable income of each cotenant occupying the
dwelling unit for the preceding calendar year, less amounts paid by the person
submitting the income verification form or his or her spouse or cotenant during
the previous year for the treatment or care of either person received in the
dwelling unit or in a nursing home. If the person submitting the income
verification form was retired for two months or more of the preceding year, the
combined disposable income of such person shall be calculated by multiplying
the average monthly combined disposable income of such person during the months
such person was retired by twelve. If the income of the person submitting the
income verification form is reduced for two or more months of the preceding
year by reason of the death of the person's spouse, the combined disposable
income of such person shall be calculated by multiplying the average monthly
combined disposable income of such person after the death of the spouse by
twelve.

(c)
"Disposable income" means adjusted gross income as defined in the
federal internal revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989, or such
subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent with the purpose
of this section, plus all of the following items to the extent they are not
included in or have been deducted from adjusted gross income:

(i)
Capital gains, other than ((nonrecognized gain on the sale of a principal
residence under section 1034 of the federal internal revenue code, or))
gain excluded from income under section 121 of the federal internal revenue
code to the extent it is reinvested in a new principal residence;

(ii)
Amounts deducted for loss;

(iii)
Amounts deducted for depreciation;

(iv)
Pension and annuity receipts;

(v)
Military pay and benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(vi)
Veterans benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(vii)
Federal social security act and railroad retirement benefits;

(viii)
Dividend receipts; and

(ix)
Interest received on state and municipal bonds.

(d)
"Resident requiring assistance with activities of daily living" means
a person who requires significant assistance with the activities of daily
living and who would be at risk of nursing home placement without this
assistance.

(e)
"Home for the aging" means a residential housing facility that (i)
provides a housing arrangement chosen voluntarily by the resident, the
resident's guardian or conservator, or another responsible person; (ii) has
only residents who are at least sixty-one years of age or who have needs for
care generally compatible with persons who are at least sixty-one years of age;
and (iii) provides varying levels of care and supervision, as agreed to at the
time of admission or as determined necessary at subsequent times of
reappraisal.

(9)
A for-profit home for the aging that converts to nonprofit status after June
11, 1992, and would otherwise be eligible for tax exemption under this section
may not receive the tax exemption until five years have elapsed since the
conversion. The exemption shall then be ratably granted over the next five
years.

Sec.
23. RCW
84.52.063 and 1997 c 3 s 125 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

A
rural library district may impose a regular property tax levy in an amount
equal to that which would be produced by a levy of fifty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value multiplied by an ((equalized)) assessed
valuation equal to one hundred percent of the true and fair value of the
taxable property in the rural library district, as determined by the
department of revenue's indicated county ratio: PROVIDED, That when any county
assessor shall find that the aggregate rate of levy on any property will exceed
the limitation set forth in RCW 84.52.043 and 84.52.050, as now or hereafter
amended, before recomputing and establishing a consolidated levy in the manner
set forth in RCW 84.52.010, the assessor shall first reduce the levy of any
rural library district, by such amount as may be necessary, but the levy of any
rural library district shall not be reduced to less than fifty cents per
thousand dollars against the value of the taxable property, as determined by
the county, prior to any further adjustments pursuant to RCW 84.52.010. For
purposes of this section "regular property tax levy" shall mean a
levy subject to the limitations provided for in Article VII, section 2 of the
state Constitution and/or by statute.

Sec.
24. RCW
84.70.010 and 1997 c 3 s 126 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
If, on or before December 31 in any calendar year, any real or personal
property placed upon the assessment roll of that year is destroyed in whole or
in part, or is in an area that has been declared a disaster area by the
governor and has been reduced in value by more than twenty percent as a result
of a natural disaster, the ((assessed)) true and fair value of
such property shall be reduced for that year by an amount determined as
follows:

(a)
First take the ((assessed)) true and fair value of such taxable
property before destruction or reduction in value and deduct therefrom the true
and fair value of the remaining property after destruction or reduction in
value.

(b)
Then divide any amount remaining by the number of days in the year and multiply
the quotient by the number of days remaining in the calendar year after the
date of the destruction or reduction in value of the property.

(2)
No reduction in the ((assessed)) true and fair value shall be
made more than three years after the date of destruction or reduction in value.

(3)
The assessor shall make such reduction on his or her own motion; however, the
taxpayer may make application for reduction on forms prepared by the department
and provided by the assessor. The assessor shall notify the taxpayer of the
amount of reduction.

(4)
If destroyed property is replaced prior to the valuation dates contained in RCW
36.21.080 and 36.21.090, the total taxable value for that year shall not exceed
the value as of the appropriate valuation date in RCW 36.21.080 or 36.21.090,
whichever is appropriate.

(5)
The taxpayer may appeal the amount of reduction to the county board of
equalization within thirty days of notification or July 1st of the year of
reduction, whichever is later. The board shall reconvene, if necessary, to
hear the appeal.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
84.04.018 and 1997 c 3 s 101 (Referendum Bill No. 47); and

(2) RCW
84.40.0305 and 1997 c 3 s 105 (Referendum Bill No. 47).

---
END ---