BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.52.420 and 1994 c 154 s 212 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
After the filing of any complaint, except as provided in RCW 42.52.450, the
staff of the appropriate ethics board shall investigate the complaint. The
investigation shall be limited to the ((alleged facts)) allegations
contained in the complaint.

(2)
The results of the investigation shall be reduced to writing and the staff
shall either make a determination ((shall be made)) that the
complaint should be dismissed pursuant to section 2 of this act, or recommend
to the board that there is or that there is not reasonable cause to believe
that a violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it has been or is being
committed.

((A
copy of the written)) (3) The board's determination on reasonable
cause shall be provided to the complainant and to the person named in such
complaint.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Based on the investigation conducted under RCW 42.52.420, and subject to rules
issued by each board, the staff of the appropriate ethics board may issue an
order of dismissal based on any of the following findings:

(a)
Any violation that may have occurred is not within the jurisdiction of the
board;

(b)
The complaint is obviously unfounded or frivolous; or

(c)
Any violation that may have occurred does not constitute a material violation
because it was inadvertent and minor, or has been cured, and, after
consideration of all of the circumstances, further proceedings would not serve
the purposes of this chapter.

(2)
Written notice of the determination under subsection (1) of this section shall
be provided to the complainant, respondent, and the board.

(3)
In the event that a complaint is dismissed under this section, the complainant
may request that the board review the action. Following review, the board
shall:

(a)
Affirm the staff dismissal;

(b)
Direct the staff to conduct further investigation; or

(c)
Issue a determination that there is reasonable cause to believe that a
violation has been or is being committed.

(4)
The board's decision under subsection (3) of this section shall be reduced to
writing and provided to the complainant and the respondent.

Sec.
3. RCW
42.52.180 and 1995 c 397 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No state officer or state employee may use or authorize the use of facilities
of an agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of assisting a campaign
for election of a person to an office, for the purpose of assisting the
appointment of a person to a vacancy in an elective office, or for the
promotion of or opposition to a ballot proposition or an initiative to the
legislature. Knowing acquiescence by a person with authority to direct,
control, or influence the actions of the state officer or state employee using
public resources in violation of this section constitutes a violation of this
section. Facilities of an agency include, but are not limited to, use of
stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of state employees of the
agency during working hours, vehicles, office space, publications of the
agency, and clientele lists of persons served by the agency.

(2)
This section shall not apply to the following activities:

(a)
Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected legislative
body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote upon a motion,
proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot
proposition or an initiative to the legislature as long as (i) required
notice of the meeting includes the title and number of the ballot proposition,
and (ii) members of the legislative body or members of the public are afforded
an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an opposing view;

(b)
A statement by an elected official in support of or in opposition to any ballot
proposition or an initiative to the legislature at an open press
conference or in response to a specific inquiry. For the purposes of this
subsection, it is not a violation of this section for an elected official to
respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot proposition or an initiative to the
legislature, to make incidental remarks concerning a ballot proposition or
an initiative to the legislature in an official communication, or otherwise
comment on a ballot proposition or an initiative to the legislature
without an actual, measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards
shall adopt by rule a definition of measurable expenditure;

(c)
Activities that are part of the normal and regular conduct of the office or
agency; and

(d)
De minimis use of public facilities by state-wide elected officials and
legislators incidental to the preparation or delivery of permissible
communications, including written and verbal communications initiated by them
of their views on ballot propositions or initiatives to the legislature
that foreseeably may affect a matter that falls within their constitutional or
statutory responsibilities.

(3)
As to state officers and employees, this section operates to the exclusion of
RCW 42.17.130 and 42.17.190.

Sec.
4. RCW
42.17.130 and 1979 ex.s. c 265 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

No
elective official nor any employee of his or her office nor any person
appointed to or employed by any public office or agency may use or authorize
the use of any of the facilities of a public office or agency, directly or
indirectly, for the purpose of assisting a campaign for election of any person
to any office, for the purpose of assisting the appointment of a person to a
vacancy in an elective office, or for the promotion of or opposition to any
ballot proposition. Facilities of public office or agency include, but are not
limited to, use of stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of
employees of the office or agency during working hours, vehicles, office space,
publications of the office or agency, and clientele lists of persons served by
the office or agency: PROVIDED, That the foregoing provisions of this section
shall not apply to the following activities:

(1)
Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected legislative
body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote upon a motion,
proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot
proposition so long as (a) any required notice of the meeting includes the
title and number of the ballot proposition, and (b) members of the legislative
body or members of the public are afforded an approximately equal opportunity
for the expression of an opposing view;

(2)
A statement by an elected official in support of or in opposition to any ballot
proposition at an open press conference or in response to a specific inquiry;

(3)
Activities which are part of the normal and regular conduct of the office or
agency.

Sec.
5. RCW
42.17.190 and 1995 c 397 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The house of representatives and the senate shall report annually: The total
budget; the portion of the total attributed to staff; and the number of
full-time and part-time staff positions by assignment, with dollar figures as
well as number of positions.

(2)
Unless authorized by subsection (3) of this section or otherwise expressly
authorized by law, no public funds may be used directly or indirectly for
lobbying: PROVIDED, This does not prevent officers or employees of an agency
from communicating with a member of the legislature on the request of that
member; or communicating to the legislature, through the proper official
channels, requests for legislative action or appropriations which are deemed
necessary for the efficient conduct of the public business or actually made in
the proper performance of their official duties: PROVIDED FURTHER, That this
subsection does not apply to the legislative branch.

(3)
Any agency, not otherwise expressly authorized by law, may expend public funds
for lobbying, but such lobbying activity shall be limited to (a) providing
information or communicating on matters pertaining to official agency business
to any elected official or officer or employee of any agency or (b) advocating
the official position or interests of the agency to any elected official or
officer or employee of any agency: PROVIDED, That public funds may not be
expended as a direct or indirect gift or campaign contribution to any elected
official or officer or employee of any agency. For the purposes of this
subsection, the term "gift" means a voluntary transfer of any thing
of value without consideration of equal or greater value, but does not include
informational material transferred for the sole purpose of informing the
recipient about matters pertaining to official agency business. This section
does not permit the printing of a state publication which has been otherwise
prohibited by law.

(4)
No elective official or any employee of his or her office or any person
appointed to or employed by any public office or agency may use or authorize
the use of any of the facilities of a public office or agency, directly or
indirectly, in any effort to support or oppose an initiative to the
legislature. Chapter 42.52 RCW governs actions relating to activities of
state officers and state employees as defined in RCW 42.52.010 with respect to
initiatives to the legislature. "Facilities of a public office or
agency" has the same meaning as in RCW 42.17.130 and 42.52.180. The
provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the following activities:

(a)
Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected legislative
body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote upon a motion,
proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support or oppose an
initiative to the legislature so long as (i) any required notice of the meeting
includes the title and number of the initiative to the legislature, and (ii)
members of the legislative body or members of the public are afforded an
approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an opposing view;

(b)
A statement by an elected official in support of or in opposition to any
initiative to the legislature at an open press conference or in response to a
specific inquiry;

(c)
Activities which are part of the normal and regular conduct of the office or
agency;

(d)
Activities conducted regarding an initiative to the legislature that would be
permitted under RCW 42.17.130 and 42.52.180 if conducted regarding other ballot
measures.

(5)
Each state agency, county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation,
or special purpose district which expends public funds for lobbying shall file
with the commission, except as exempted by (d) of this subsection, quarterly
statements providing the following information for the quarter just completed:

(a)
The name of the agency filing the statement;

(b)
The name, title, and job description and salary of each elected official,
officer, or employee who lobbied, a general description of the nature of the
lobbying, and the proportionate amount of time spent on the lobbying;

(c)
A listing of expenditures incurred by the agency for lobbying including but not
limited to travel, consultant or other special contractual services, and
brochures and other publications, the principal purpose of which is to
influence legislation;

(d)
For purposes of this subsection the term "lobbying" does not include:

(i)
Requests for appropriations by a state agency to the office of financial
management pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW nor requests by the office of
financial management to the legislature for appropriations other than its own
agency budget requests;

(ii)
Recommendations or reports to the legislature in response to a legislative
request expressly requesting or directing a specific study, recommendation, or
report by an agency on a particular subject;

(iii)
Official reports including recommendations submitted to the legislature on an
annual or biennial basis by a state agency as required by law;

(iv)
Requests, recommendations, or other communication between or within state agencies
or between or within local agencies;

(v)
Any other lobbying to the extent that it includes:

(A)
Telephone conversations or preparation of written correspondence;

(B)
In-person lobbying on behalf of an agency of no more than four days or parts
thereof during any three-month period by officers or employees of that agency
and in-person lobbying by any elected official of such agency on behalf of such
agency or in connection with the powers, duties, or compensation of such
official: PROVIDED, That the total expenditures of nonpublic funds made in
connection with such lobbying for or on behalf of any one or more members of
the legislature or state elected officials or public officers or employees of
the state of Washington do not exceed fifteen dollars for any three-month
period: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the exemption under this subsection is in
addition to the exemption provided in (A) of this subsection;

(C)
Preparation or adoption of policy positions.

The
statements shall be in the form and the manner prescribed by the commission and
shall be filed within one month after the end of the quarter covered by the
report.

(6)
In lieu of reporting under subsection (5) of this section any county, city,
town, municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation, or special purpose
district may determine and so notify the public disclosure commission, that
elected officials, officers, or employees who on behalf of any such local
agency engage in lobbying reportable under subsection (5) of this section shall
register and report such reportable lobbying in the same manner as a lobbyist
who is required to register and report under RCW 42.17.150 and 42.17.170. Each
such local agency shall report as a lobbyist employer pursuant to RCW
42.17.180.

(7)
The provisions of this section do not relieve any elected official or officer
or employee of an agency from complying with other provisions of this chapter,
if such elected official, officer, or employee is not otherwise exempted.

(8)
The purpose of this section is to require each state agency and certain local
agencies to report the identities of those persons who lobby on behalf of the
agency for compensation, together with certain separately identifiable and
measurable expenditures of an agency's funds for that purpose. This section
shall be reasonably construed to accomplish that purpose and not to require any
agency to report any of its general overhead cost or any other costs which
relate only indirectly or incidentally to lobbying or which are equally
attributable to or inseparable from nonlobbying activities of the agency.

The
public disclosure commission may adopt rules clarifying and implementing this
legislative interpretation and policy.

Sec.
6. RCW
42.52.120 and 1997 c 318 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No state officer or state employee may receive any thing of economic value
under any contract or grant outside of his or her official duties. The
prohibition in this subsection does not apply where the state officer or state
employee has complied with RCW 42.52.030(2) or each of the following conditions
are met:

(a)
The contract or grant is bona fide and actually performed;

(b)
The performance or administration of the contract or grant is not within the
course of the officer's or employee's official duties, or is not under the
officer's or employee's official supervision;

(c)
The performance of the contract or grant is not prohibited by RCW 42.52.040 or
by applicable laws or rules governing outside employment for the officer or
employee;

(d)
The contract or grant is neither performed for nor compensated by any person
from whom such officer or employee would be prohibited by RCW 42.52.150(4) from
receiving a gift;

(e)
The contract or grant is not one expressly created or authorized by the officer
or employee in his or her official capacity;

(f)
The contract or grant would not require unauthorized disclosure of confidential
information.

(2)
In addition to satisfying the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, a
state officer or state employee may have a beneficial interest in a grant or
contract or a series of substantially identical contracts or grants with a
state agency only if:

(a)
The contract or grant is awarded or issued as a result of an open and
competitive bidding process in which more than one bid or grant application was
received; or

(b)
The contract or grant is awarded or issued as a result of an open and
competitive bidding or selection process in which the officer's or employee's
bid or proposal was the only bid or proposal received and the officer or
employee has been advised by the appropriate ethics board, before execution of
the contract or grant, that the contract or grant would not be in conflict with
the proper discharge of the officer's or employee's official duties; or

(c)
The process for awarding the contract or issuing the grant is not open and
competitive, but the officer or employee has been advised by the appropriate
ethics board that the contract or grant would not be in conflict with the
proper discharge of the officer's or employee's official duties.

(3)
A state officer or state employee awarded a contract or issued a grant in
compliance with subsection (2) of this section shall file the contract or grant
with the appropriate ethics board within thirty days after the date of
execution; however, if proprietary formulae, designs, drawings, or research are
included in the contract or grant, the proprietary formulae, designs, drawings,
or research may be deleted from the contract or grant filed with the
appropriate ethics board.

(4)
This section does not prevent a state officer or state employee from receiving
compensation contributed from the treasury of the United States, another state,
county, or municipality if the compensation is received pursuant to
arrangements entered into between such state, county, municipality, or the
United States and the officer's or employee's agency. This section does not
prohibit a state officer or state employee from serving or performing any
duties ((under an employment contract with a)) as an officer or
employee of more than one governmental entity. Such compensation or
employment is subject to the restrictions in RCW 42.52.020.

(5)
As used in this section, "officer" and "employee" do not
include officers and employees who, in accordance with the terms of their
employment or appointment, are serving without compensation from the state of
Washington or are receiving from the state only reimbursement of expenses
incurred or a predetermined allowance for such expenses.

Sec.
7. RCW
42.52.010 and 1998 c 7 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Agency" means any state board, commission, bureau, committee,
department, institution, division, or tribunal in the legislative, executive,
or judicial branch of state government. "Agency" includes all
elective offices, the state legislature, those institutions of higher education
created and supported by the state government, and those courts that are parts
of state government.

(2)
"Head of agency" means the chief executive officer of an agency. In
the case of an agency headed by a commission, board, committee, or other body
consisting of more than one natural person, agency head means the person or
board authorized to appoint agency employees and regulate their conduct.

(3)
"Assist" means to act, or offer or agree to act, in such a way as to
help, aid, advise, furnish information to, or otherwise provide assistance to
another person, believing that the action is of help, aid, advice, or
assistance to the person and with intent so to assist such person.

(4)
"Ballot proposition" means any proposition as defined by RCW
42.17.020 and includes initiatives to the legislature. For the purposes of RCW
42.52.180, an initiative to the legislature shall not be considered a ballot
proposition during the time beginning ten days before the regular legislative
session and ending on the last day of the session, or the day when the
legislature takes final action on the initiative, whichever is first.

(5)
"Beneficial interest" has the meaning ascribed to it under the
Washington case law. However, an ownership interest in a mutual fund or
similar investment pooling fund in which the owner has no management powers
does not constitute a beneficial interest in the entities in which the fund or
pool invests.

(((5)))
(6) "Compensation" means anything of economic value, however
designated, that is paid, loaned, granted, or transferred, or to be paid,
loaned, granted, or transferred for, or in consideration of, personal services
to any person.

(((6)))
(7) "Confidential information" means (a) specific information,
rather than generalized knowledge, that is not available to the general public
on request or (b) information made confidential by law.

(((7)))
(8) "Contract" or "grant" means an agreement between
two or more persons that creates an obligation to do or not to do a particular
thing. "Contract" or "grant" includes, but is not limited
to, an employment contract, a lease, a license, a purchase agreement, or a
sales agreement.

(((8)))
(9) "Ethics boards" means the commission on judicial conduct,
the legislative ethics board, and the executive ethics board.

(((9)))
(10) "Family" has the same meaning as "immediate
family" in RCW 42.17.020.

(((10)))
(11) "Gift" means anything of economic value for which no
consideration is given. "Gift" does not include:

(a)
Items from family members or friends where it is clear beyond a reasonable
doubt that the gift was not made as part of any design to gain or maintain
influence in the agency of which the recipient is an officer or employee;

(b)
Items related to the outside business of the recipient that are customary and
not related to the recipient's performance of official duties;

(c)
Items exchanged among officials and employees or a social event hosted or
sponsored by a state officer or state employee for coworkers;

(d)
Payments by a governmental or nongovernmental entity of reasonable expenses
incurred in connection with a speech, presentation, appearance, or trade
mission made in an official capacity. As used in this subsection,
"reasonable expenses" are limited to travel, lodging, and subsistence
expenses incurred the day before through the day after the event;

(e)
Items a state officer or state employee is authorized by law to accept;

(f)
Payment of enrollment and course fees and reasonable travel expenses attributable
to attending seminars and educational programs sponsored by a bona fide
governmental or nonprofit professional, educational, trade, or charitable
association or institution. As used in this subsection, "reasonable
expenses" are limited to travel, lodging, and subsistence expenses
incurred the day before through the day after the event;

(g)
Items returned by the recipient to the donor within thirty days of receipt or
donated to a charitable organization within thirty days of receipt;

(h)
Campaign contributions reported under chapter 42.17 RCW;

(i)
Discounts available to an individual as a member of an employee group,
occupation, or similar broad-based group; and

(j)
Awards, prizes, scholarships, or other items provided in recognition of academic
or scientific achievement.

(((11)))
(12) "Honorarium" means money or thing of value offered to a
state officer or state employee for a speech, appearance, article, or similar
item or activity in connection with the state officer's or state employee's official
role.

(((12)))
(13) "Official duty" means those duties within the specific
scope of employment of the state officer or state employee as defined by the
officer's or employee's agency or by statute or the state Constitution.

(((13)))
(14) "Participate" means to participate in state action or a
proceeding personally and substantially as a state officer or state employee,
through approval, disapproval, decision, recommendation, the rendering of
advice, investigation, or otherwise but does not include preparation,
consideration, or enactment of legislation or the performance of legislative
duties.

(((14)))
(15) "Person" means any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, firm, institution, or other entity, whether or not operated for
profit.

(((15)))
(16) "Regulatory agency" means any state board, commission,
department, or officer, except those in the legislative or judicial branches,
authorized by law to conduct adjudicative proceedings, issue permits or
licenses, or to control or affect interests of identified persons.

(((16)))
(17) "Responsibility" in connection with a transaction
involving the state, means the direct administrative or operating authority,
whether intermediate or final, and either exercisable alone or through subordinates,
effectively to approve, disapprove, or otherwise direct state action in respect
of such transaction.

(((17)))
(18) "State action" means any action on the part of an agency,
including, but not limited to:

(a)
A decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order; and

(b)
A grant, payment, award, license, contract, transaction, sanction, or approval,
or the denial thereof, or failure to act with respect to a decision,
determination, finding, ruling, or order.

(((18)))
(19) "State officer" means every person holding a position of
public trust in or under an executive, legislative, or judicial office of the
state. "State officer" includes judges of the superior court, judges
of the court of appeals, justices of the supreme court, members of the legislature
together with the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of
representatives, holders of elective offices in the executive branch of state
government, chief executive officers of state agencies, members of boards,
commissions, or committees with authority over one or more state agencies or
institutions, and employees of the state who are engaged in supervisory,
policy-making, or policy-enforcing work. For the purposes of this chapter,
"state officer" also includes any person exercising or undertaking to
exercise the powers or functions of a state officer.

(((19)))
(20) "State employee" means an individual who is employed by
an agency in any branch of state government. For purposes of this chapter,
employees of the superior courts are not state officers or state employees.

(((20)))
(21) "Thing of economic value," in addition to its ordinary
meaning, includes:

(a)
A loan, property interest, interest in a contract or other chose in action, and
employment or another arrangement involving a right to compensation;

(b)
An option, irrespective of the conditions to the exercise of the option; and

(c)
A promise or undertaking for the present or future delivery or procurement.

(((21)))
(22)(a) "Transaction involving the state" means a proceeding,
application, submission, request for a ruling or other determination, contract,
claim, case, or other similar matter that the state officer, state employee, or
former state officer or state employee in question believes, or has reason to
believe:

(i)
Is, or will be, the subject of state action; or

(ii)
Is one to which the state is or will be a party; or

(iii)
Is one in which the state has a direct and substantial proprietary interest.

(b) "Transaction involving the state" does not include
the following: Preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation,
including appropriation of moneys in a budget, or the performance of
legislative duties by an officer or employee; or a claim, case, lawsuit, or
similar matter if the officer or employee did not participate in the underlying
transaction involving the state that is the basis for the claim, case, or
lawsuit.

---
END ---