BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
It is the purpose of the individual fishery quota system to award to individual
fishers shares for salmon harvest numbers based on the previous record of
fishing in the fishery. If an individual fisher does not receive an initial
quota or share allocation or does not receive shares by transfer in the future,
that fisher will not be able to participate in the salmon fishery. The quota
share is a permit that awards a fisher the privilege to fish in the common
property of the state. The quota shares will determine each fisher's
individual quota, which is the amount of salmon that the fisher is entitled to
catch each year. The fisher may catch the quota at any time during the
appropriate season but may not exceed imposed limits in any given area. With
this act, the legislature intends to decrease pressure to fish in rough weather
and to improve safety in the fisheries.

(2)
The fish and wildlife commission shall design an individual fisheries quota
program based upon a federal program outlined in the federal register, volume
50, page 59375, published on November 9, 1993. The commission shall ensure
that the program includes ownership restrictions to prevent quota shares for
the fishery being held by too few fishers, and vessel restrictions to prevent
too few fishers from catching all the fish.

(3)
The commission shall ensure that the quota share system is based upon qualified
filings that would represent a percentage of the harvest for certain seasons
and regulatory areas. The commission shall, after a public hearing, set
poundage or individual fish quotas for each year. The commission shall ensure
that the quotas are based upon each management area, allowing variance from
year to year in accord with the harvest guidelines established by the federal
department of fish and wildlife.

(4)
The commission shall ensure that qualifying areas are grouped as follows: (a)
San Juan/Point Roberts areas 7 and 7a; (b) areas 10, 11, and 12 (Hood Canal);
(c) areas 8 (Everett) and 9.

(5)
The commission shall issue quotas to permit owners each year beginning in the year
2000.

(6)
The commission shall ensure that share requirements apply to Washington state
gill net and purse seine permits and are upon individuals not vessels.

(7)
The commission, in conjunction with the department, shall set historical
harvest levels for gill net and purse seine uses based on the last five years
for each grouped area. The commission shall develop methods to make the
program functional after conducting public hearings with interested parties
prior to the adoption of formal rules.

(8)
The commission shall ensure that permits are issued not to vessels but to
individuals and shall require that the individual permit holder be aboard the
vessel when the vessel is fishing.

(9)
Following the initial issue of shares by the department, the commission shall
provide that gill net and purse seine shares are interchangeable between vessel
owners in the same fishery. The commission shall consider vessel restrictions
and limitations on individual control of shares.

(10) The commission shall report back to the legislature on the
proposed program and rules by December 1, 1999.

---
END ---