BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
16.08.080 and 1989 c 26 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A city or county animal control authority that seeks to declare a dog within
its jurisdiction, as defined in subsection (7) of this section, to be dangerous
must serve notice upon the dog owner in person or by regular and certified
mail, return receipt requested.

(2)
The notice must state: The statutory basis for the proposed action; the
reasons the authority considers the animal dangerous; a statement that the dog
is subject to registration and controls required by this chapter, including a
recitation of the controls in subsection (6) of this section; and an
explanation of the owner's rights and of the proper procedure for appealing a
decision finding the dog dangerous.

(3)
The authority must make a final determination regarding the dog within thirty
days of the date of delivering or mailing the notice. Before the final
determination, the owner may request a meeting with the authority and at that
meeting present reasons the dog should not be declared dangerous. If the owner
requests a meeting, the authority must schedule one within the twenty-day
period following the date of delivering or mailing the notice. The authority
must issue its final determination in a written order including: Citation of
the statutory basis for the action; a brief statement of the facts supporting
the final determination; and the signature of the person who made the
determination. The authority must deliver the order to the owner in person or
mail the order to the owner by regular and certified mail, return receipt
requested.

(4)
If the local jurisdiction has provided for an administrative appeal of the
final determination, the owner must follow the appeal procedure set forth by
that jurisdiction. If the local jurisdiction has not provided for an
administrative appeal, the owner may appeal a municipal authority's final
determination that the dog is dangerous to the municipal court, and may appeal
a county animal control authority's or county sheriff's final determination
that the dog is dangerous to the district court. The owner must make such
appeal within twenty days of receiving the final determination. While the
appeal is pending, the authority may order that the dog be confined or
controlled in compliance with RCW 16.08.090. The owner may pay all costs of
confinement and control.

(5)
It is unlawful for an owner to have a dangerous dog in the state without a
certificate of registration issued under this section. This section and RCW
16.08.090 and 16.08.100 shall not apply to police dogs as defined in RCW
4.24.410.

(((2)))
(6) The animal control authority of the city or county in which an owner
has a dangerous dog ((shall)) may issue a certificate of
registration to the owner of such animal if the owner presents to the animal
control unit sufficient evidence of:

(a)
A proper enclosure to confine a dangerous dog and the posting of the premises
with a clearly visible warning sign that there is a dangerous dog on the
property. In addition, the owner shall conspicuously display a sign with a
warning symbol that informs children of the presence of a dangerous dog;

(b)
A surety bond issued by a surety insurer qualified under chapter 48.28 RCW in a
form acceptable to the animal control authority in the sum of at least fifty
thousand dollars, payable to any person injured by the vicious dog; or

(c)
A policy of liability insurance, such as homeowner's insurance, issued by an
insurer qualified under Title 48 RCW in the amount of at least fifty thousand
dollars, insuring the owner for any personal injuries inflicted by the
dangerous dog. Nothing in this section limits a local authority in placing
additional restrictions upon owners of dangerous dogs. This section does not
require a local authority to allow a dangerous dog within its jurisdiction.

(((3)))
(7)(a) If an owner has the dangerous dog in an incorporated area that is
serviced by both a city and a county animal control authority, the owner shall
obtain a certificate of registration from the city authority;

(b)
If an owner has the dangerous dog in an incorporated or unincorporated area served
only by a county animal control authority, the owner shall obtain a certificate
of registration from the county authority;

(c)
If an owner has the dangerous dog in an incorporated or unincorporated area
that is not served by an animal control authority, the owner shall obtain a
certificate of registration from the office of the local sheriff.

(((4))) (8) Cities and counties may charge an annual
fee, in addition to regular dog licensing fees, to register dangerous dogs.

---
END ---