BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW under the subchapter heading
"Plan 1" to read as follows:

A
member may make the irrevocable election under this section no later than six
months after attaining thirty years of service. The election shall become
effective at the beginning of the calendar month following department receipt
of employee notification.

(1)
The sum of future member contributions plus seven and one-half percent interest
shall be paid to the member at retirement without a reduction in the member's
monthly retirement benefit as determined under RCW 41.32.498. The level of
interest credited to member contributions is not provided as a matter of
contractual right and may be changed by the legislature.

(2)
Upon retirement, the member's benefit shall be calculated using only the
earnable compensation credited prior to the effective date of the member's
election. Calculation of the member's average earnable compensation shall
include eligible cash-outs of annual leave based on the member's salary and
leave accumulations at the time of retirement, except that the amount of a
member's average earnable compensation cannot be higher than if the member had
not taken advantage of the election offered under this section.

(3)
Members who have already earned thirty years of service credit prior to the
effective date of this act may participate in the election by notifying the
department in writing of their intention by December 31, 1999.

The
department shall continue to collect employer contributions as required in RCW
41.45.060.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW under the subchapter heading
"Plan 1" to read as follows:

A
member may make the irrevocable election under this section no later than six
months after attaining thirty years of service. The election shall become
effective at the beginning of the calendar month following department receipt
of employee notification.

(1)
The sum of future member contributions plus seven and one-half percent interest
shall be paid to the member at retirement without a reduction in the member's
monthly retirement benefit as determined under RCW 41.40.185. The level of
interest credited to member contributions is not provided as a matter of contractual
right and may be changed by the legislature.

(2)
Upon retirement, the member's benefit shall be calculated using only the
earnable compensation credited prior to the effective date of the member's
election. Calculation of the member's average final compensation shall include
eligible cash-outs of sick and annual leave based on the member's salary and
leave accumulations at the time of retirement, except that the amount of a
member's average final compensation cannot be higher than if the member had not
taken advantage of the election offered under this section.

(3)
Members who have already earned thirty years of service credit prior to the
effective date of this act may participate in the election by notifying the
department in writing of their intention by December 31, 1999.

The department shall continue to collect employer contributions as
required in RCW 41.45.060.

---
END ---