BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.40.150 and 1997 c 254 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Should any member die, or
should the individual separate or be separated from service without leave of
absence before attaining age sixty years, or should the individual become a
beneficiary, except a beneficiary of an optional retirement allowance as provided
by RCW 41.40.188, the individual shall thereupon cease to be a member except;

(1) As provided in RCW
41.40.170.

(2) An employee not
previously retired who reenters service shall upon completion of six months of
continuous service and upon the restoration, in one lump sum or in annual
installments, of all withdrawn contributions: (a) With interest as computed by
the director, which restoration must be completed within a total period of five
years of membership service following the member's first resumption of
employment or (b) paying the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2), be
returned to the status, either as an original member or new member which the
member held at time of separation.

(3)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, a member who separates or has separated
after having completed at least five years of service shall remain a member
during the period of absence from service for the exclusive purpose of
receiving a retirement allowance to begin at attainment of age sixty-five, however,
such a member may on written notice to the director elect to receive a reduced
retirement allowance on or after age sixty which allowance shall be the
actuarial equivalent of the sum necessary to pay regular retirement benefits as
of age sixty-five: PROVIDED, That if such member should withdraw all or part
of the member's accumulated contributions except those additional contributions
made pursuant to RCW 41.40.330(2), the individual shall thereupon cease to be a
member and this section shall not apply.

(b) A member who:

(i) Separates from
service under this subsection on or after January 1, 1999; and

(ii) Attains the age
of fifty with at least twenty years of service prior to separation; and

(iii) Is not retired
as of the effective date of this act shall remain a member during the period of
absence from service for the exclusive purpose of receiving a retirement
allowance to begin at attainment of age sixty.

If such a member
should withdraw all or part of the member's accumulated contributions except
those additional contributions made pursuant to RCW 41.40.330(2), the
individual shall thereupon cease to be a member and this section shall not
apply.

(4) The recipient of a
retirement allowance elected to office or appointed to office directly by the
governor, and who shall apply for and be accepted in membership as provided in
RCW 41.40.023(3) shall be considered to have terminated his or her retirement
status and shall become a member of the retirement system with the status of
membership the member held as of the date of retirement. Retirement benefits
shall be suspended from the date of return to membership until the date when
the member again retires and the member shall make contributions and receive
membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again retire if
eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180: PROVIDED, That where any such right
to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has rendered six
uninterrupted months of service the type of retirement allowance the member had
at the time of the member's previous retirement shall be reinstated, but no
additional service credit shall be allowed: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That if such
a recipient of a retirement allowance does not elect to apply for reentry into
membership as provided in RCW 41.40.023(3), the member shall be considered to
remain in a retirement status and the individual's retirement benefits shall
continue without interruption.

(5) Any
member who leaves the employment of an employer and enters the employ of a
public agency or agencies of the state of Washington, other than those within
the jurisdiction of this retirement system, and who establishes membership in a
retirement system or a pension fund operated by such agency or agencies and who
shall continue membership therein until attaining age sixty, shall remain a
member for the exclusive purpose of receiving a retirement allowance without
the limitation found in RCW 41.40.180(1) to begin on attainment of age
sixty-five; however, such a member may on written notice to the director elect
to receive a reduced retirement allowance on or after age sixty which allowance
shall be the actuarial equivalent of the sum necessary to pay regular
retirement benefits commencing at age sixty-five: PROVIDED, That if such
member should withdraw all or part of the member's accumulated contributions
except those additional contributions made pursuant to RCW 41.40.330(2), the
individual shall thereupon cease to be a member and this section shall not
apply.

---
END ---