BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
3.62.060 and 1992 c 62 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Clerks
of the district courts shall collect the following fees for their official
services:

(1)(a)
In any civil action commenced before or transferred to a district court, the
plaintiff shall, at the time of such commencement or transfer, pay to such
court a filing fee of thirty-one dollars plus any surcharge authorized by RCW
7.75.035.

(b)
The clerks of the district courts shall collect an additional filing fee of
nine dollars upon the commencement or transfer of a civil action for which a
filing fee is collected under (a) of this subsection.

(c)
No party shall be compelled to pay to the court any other fees or charges up to
and including the rendition of judgment in the action other than those listed.

(2)
For issuing a writ of garnishment or other writ a fee of six dollars.

(3)
For filing a supplemental proceeding a fee of twelve dollars.

(4)
For demanding a jury in a civil case a fee of fifty dollars to be paid by the
person demanding a jury.

(5)
For preparing a transcript of a judgment a fee of six dollars.

(6)
For certifying any document on file or of record in the clerk's office a fee of
five dollars.

(7)
For preparing the record of a case for appeal to superior court a fee of forty
dollars including any costs of tape duplication as governed by the rules of
appeal for courts of limited jurisdiction (RALJ).

(8)
For duplication of part or all of the electronic tape or tapes of a proceeding
ten dollars per tape.

The
fees or charges imposed under this section shall be allowed as court costs
whenever a judgment for costs is awarded.

Sec.
2. RCW
3.62.090 and 1997 c 331 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There shall be assessed and collected in addition to any fines, forfeitures, or
penalties assessed, other than for parking infractions, by all courts organized
under Title 3 or 35 RCW a public safety and education assessment equal to ((sixty))
seventy percent of such fines, forfeitures, or penalties, which shall be
remitted as provided in chapters 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, and 35.20 RCW. The
assessment required by this section shall not be suspended or waived by the court.

(2)
There shall be assessed and collected in addition to any fines, forfeitures, or
penalties assessed, other than for parking infractions and for fines levied
under RCW 46.61.5055, and in addition to the public safety and education
assessment required under subsection (1) of this section, by all courts
organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, an additional public safety and education
assessment equal to fifty percent of the public safety and education assessment
required under subsection (1) of this section, which shall be remitted to the
state treasurer and deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250. The additional
assessment required by this subsection shall not be suspended or waived by the
court.

(3)
This section does not apply to the fee imposed under RCW 43.63.110(6).

Sec.
3. RCW
36.18.020 and 1996 c 211 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Revenue collected under this section is subject to division with the state
public safety and education account under RCW 36.18.025 and with the county or
regional law library fund under RCW 27.24.070.

(2)
Clerks of superior courts shall collect the following fees for their official
services:

(a)
The party filing the first or initial paper in any civil action, including, but
not limited to an action for restitution, adoption, or change of name, shall
pay, at the time the paper is filed, a fee of one hundred ten dollars except,
in an unlawful detainer action under chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW for which the
plaintiff shall pay a case initiating filing fee of thirty dollars, or in
proceedings filed under RCW 28A.225.030 alleging a violation of the compulsory
attendance laws where the petitioner shall not pay a filing fee. The thirty
dollar filing fee under this subsection for an unlawful detainer action shall
not include an order to show cause or any other order or judgment except a
default order or default judgment in an unlawful detainer action.

(b)
Any party, except a defendant in a criminal case, filing the first or initial
paper on an appeal from a court of limited jurisdiction or any party on any
civil appeal, shall pay, when the paper is filed, a fee of one hundred ten
dollars.

(c)
For filing of a petition for judicial review as required under RCW 34.05.514 a
filing fee of one hundred ten dollars.

(d)
For filing of a petition for unlawful harassment under RCW 10.14.040 a filing
fee of one hundred ten dollars.

(e)
For filing the notice of debt due for the compensation of a crime victim under
RCW 7.68.120(2)(a) a fee of one hundred ten dollars.

(f)
In probate proceedings, the party instituting such proceedings, shall pay at
the time of filing the first paper therein, a fee of one hundred ten dollars.

(g)
For filing any petition to contest a will admitted to probate or a petition to
admit a will which has been rejected, or a petition objecting to a written
agreement or memorandum as provided in RCW 11.96.170, there shall be paid a fee
of one hundred ten dollars.

(h)
Upon conviction or plea of guilty, upon failure to prosecute an appeal from a
court of limited jurisdiction as provided by law, or upon affirmance of a
conviction by a court of limited jurisdiction, a defendant in a criminal case
shall be liable for a fee of one hundred ten dollars.

(i)
With the exception of demands for jury hereafter made and garnishments
hereafter issued, civil actions and probate proceedings filed prior to
midnight, July 1, 1972, shall be completed and governed by the fee schedule in
effect as of January 1, 1972: PROVIDED, That no fee shall be assessed if an
order of dismissal on the clerk's record be filed as provided by rule of the
supreme court.

(3)
The clerk shall collect an additional filing fee of thirty dollars upon the
provision of any service for which a filing fee is collected under subsection
(2) of this section.

(4)
No fee shall be collected when a petition for relinquishment of parental rights
is filed pursuant to RCW 26.33.080 or for forms and instructional brochures provided
under RCW 26.50.030.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.63.110 and 1997 c 331 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a
monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and fifty dollars for each
offense unless authorized by this chapter or title.

(2)
The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of monetary penalties for
designated traffic infractions. This rule shall also specify the conditions under
which local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines and penalties for
traffic infractions. The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court
to adjust this schedule every two years for inflation.

(3)
There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a
notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction relates to parking as
defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution or failure to pay a
monetary penalty imposed pursuant to this chapter. A local legislative body
may set a monetary penalty not to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty set by
the local legislative body.

(4)
Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are civil in nature
and penalties which may be assessed for violations of chapter 46.44 RCW
relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles are not subject to the
limitation on the amount of monetary penalties which may be imposed pursuant to
this chapter.

(5)
Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this chapter it is
immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at that time the court
may, in its discretion, grant an extension of the period in which the penalty
may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on or before the time established for
payment the court shall notify the department of the failure to pay the
penalty, and the department shall suspend the person's driver's license or
driving privilege until the penalty has been paid and the penalty provided in
subsection (3) of this section has been paid.

(6)
In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section and not subject
to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have
committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a fee of five dollars per
infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be reduced or waived.
Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in
the emergency medical services and trauma care system trust account under RCW
70.168.040.

(7)
In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section and not subject
to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have
committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a fee of five dollars per
infraction. Revenue from this fee shall be remitted as provided in chapters
3.46, 3.50, 3.62, and 35.20 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act shall be known and cited as the court funding and improvement act of 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---