BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
2.08.065 and 1996 c 208 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be in the county of Grant, ((two)) three judges of the
superior court; in the county of Okanogan, ((one)) two judges
of the superior court; in the county of Mason, two judges of the superior
court; in the county of Thurston, eight judges of the superior court; in the
counties of Pacific and Wahkiakum jointly, one judge of the superior court; in
the counties of Ferry, Pend Oreille, and Stevens jointly, two judges of the
superior court; and in the counties of San Juan and Island jointly, two judges
of the superior court.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The additional judicial position for Grant county created by section 1 of this
act is effective only if Grant county through its duly constituted legislative
authority documents its approval of the additional position and its agreement
that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the
expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by state law or the
state Constitution.

(2) The additional judicial position for Okanogan county created by
section 1 of this act is effective only if Okanogan county through its duly
constituted legislative authority documents its approval of the additional
position and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without
reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial position
as provided by state law or the state Constitution.

---
END ---