BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW to read as follows:

The
contractor registration account is created in the state treasury. All receipts
from registration, penalties, and other sources under this chapter must be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes
of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.22 RCW to read as follows:

The
factory assembled structures account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from inspections, insignias, permits, plan reviews, and other sources
under this chapter must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be
used only for the purposes of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 70.87 RCW to read as follows:

The
elevator inspection account is created in the state treasury. All receipts
from inspections, permits, plan reviews, penalties, and other sources under
this chapter must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only
for the purposes of this chapter.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.84.092 and 1997 c 218 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the contractor
registration account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the
county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing building
construction account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the
deferred compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the Eastern Washington
University capital projects account, the education construction fund, the
emergency reserve fund, the elevator inspection account, the factory
assembled structures account, the federal forest revolving account, the
health services account, the public health services account, the health system
capacity account, the personal health services account, the highway
infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the
judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the
judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account,
the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the municipal
criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system
plan I account, the public employees' retirement system plan II account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust
fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement
system plan I account, the teachers' retirement system plan II account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension principal account, the
volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension administrative account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan I retirement account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan II retirement account,
the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University
building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University
capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent
common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university
permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
All earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the
department of licensing services account, the economic development account, the
essential rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway
bond retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the
highway safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
5. RCW
43.84.092 and 1998 c 341 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash
management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall
occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the contractor
registration account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the
county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing building
construction account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the
deferred compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the Eastern Washington
University capital projects account, the education construction fund, the
emergency reserve fund, the elevator inspection account, the factory
assembled structures account, the federal forest revolving account, the
health services account, the public health services account, the health system
capacity account, the personal health services account, the highway
infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges'
retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the
judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account,
the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the municipal
criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system
plan I account, the public employees' retirement system plan II account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance
account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment
board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement system
plan I account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan II and plan III
account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
principal account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
administrative account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan I retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system
plan II retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system
combined plan II and III account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund,
and the Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal
school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to
their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the
department of licensing services account, the economic development account, the
essential rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway
bond retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the
highway safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Section 4 of this act expires September 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7.
Section 5 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---