BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.79.010 and 1951 c 32 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is hereby created within this state a board of boiler rules, which shall
hereafter be referred to as the board, consisting of five members who shall be
appointed to the board by the governor, one for a term of one year, one for a
term of two years, one for a term of three years, and two for a term of four
years. At the expiration of their respective terms of office, they, or their
successors identifiable with the same interests respectively as hereinafter
provided, shall be appointed for terms of four years each. The governor may at
any time remove any member of the board for inefficiency or neglect of duty in
office. Upon the death or incapacity of any member the governor shall fill the
vacancy for the remainder of the vacated term with a representative of the same
interests with which his or her predecessor was identified. Of these
five appointed members, one shall be representative of owners and users of
boilers and unfired pressure vessels within the state, one shall be
representative of the boiler or unfired pressure vessel manufacturers within
the state, one shall be a representative of a boiler insurance company licensed
to do business within the state, one shall be a mechanical engineer on the
faculty of a recognized engineering college or a graduate mechanical engineer
having equivalent experience, and one shall be representative of the boilermakers
((or practical steam)), stationary operating engineers, or
pressure vessel operators. The board shall elect one of its members to
serve as ((chairman)) chair and, at the call of the ((chairman))
chair, the board shall meet at least four times each year at the state
capitol or other place designated by the board.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.79.030 and 1972 ex.s. c 86 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board shall formulate definitions((,)) and rules((, and
regulations)) for the safe and proper construction, installation, repair,
use, and operation of boilers and for the safe and proper construction,
installation, and repair of unfired pressure vessels in this state. The
definitions((,)) and rules((, and regulations)) so
formulated shall be based upon, and, at all times, follow the ((generally))
nationally or internationally accepted ((nationwide)) engineering
standards, formulae, and practices established and pertaining to boiler and
unfired pressure vessel construction and safety, and the board may by
resolution adopt ((an)) existing published codifications thereof,
((known as "The Boiler Construction Code of the American Society of
Mechanical Engineers", with the amendments and interpretations thereto
made and approved by the council of the society, and may likewise adopt the
amendments and interpretations subsequently made and published by the same
authority;)) and when so adopted the same shall be deemed incorporated
into, and to constitute a part or the whole of the definitions((,)) and
rules((, and regulations)) of the board. Amendments and interpretations
to the code ((so adopted)) shall be ((adopted)) enforceable
immediately upon being ((promulgated)) adopted, to the end that
the definitions((,)) and rules((, and regulations)) shall
at all times follow ((the generally)) nationally or internationally
accepted ((nationwide)) engineering standards((: PROVIDED,)).
However, ((That)) all rules ((and regulations promulgated))
adopted by the board((, including any or all of the boiler
construction code of the American society of mechanical engineers with
amendments and interpretations thereof,)) shall be adopted in compliance
with the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as now or hereafter
amended. ((All boilers and unfired pressure vessels subject to the
jurisdiction of the board, which have been constructed or installed in
accordance with the code of the American society of mechanical engineers shall
be prima facie evidence of compliance with those provisions of this chapter and
the rules of the board.))

Sec.
3. RCW
70.79.080 and 1996 c 72 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter shall not apply to the following boilers, unfired pressure vessels and
domestic hot water tanks:

(1)
Boilers and unfired pressure vessels under federal regulation or operated by
any railroad subject to the provisions of the interstate commerce act;

(2)
Unfired pressure vessels meeting the requirements of the interstate commerce
commission for shipment of liquids or gases under pressure;

(3)
Air tanks located on vehicles operating under the rules of other state
authorities and used for carrying passengers, or freight;

(4)
Air tanks installed on the right of way of railroads and used directly in the
operation of trains;

(5)
Unfired pressure vessels having a volume of five cubic feet or less when not
located in places of public assembly;

(6)
Unfired pressure vessels designed for a pressure not exceeding fifteen pounds
per square inch gauge when not located in place of public assembly;

(7)
Tanks used in connection with heating water for domestic and/or residential
purposes;

(8)
Boilers and unfired pressure vessels in cities having ordinances which are
enforced and which have requirements equal to or higher than those provided for
under this chapter, covering the installation, operation, maintenance and
inspection of boilers and unfired pressure vessels;

(9)
Tanks containing water with no air cushion and no direct source of energy that
operate at ((ambient)) a temperature of one hundred thirty
degrees Fahrenheit or less;

(10)
Electric boilers:

(a)
Having a tank volume of not more than one and one-half cubic feet;

(b)
Having a maximum allowable working pressure of eighty pounds per square inch or
less, with a pressure relief system to prevent excess pressure; and

(c)
If constructed after June 10, 1994, constructed to American society of
mechanical engineers code, or approved or otherwise certified by a nationally
recognized or recognized foreign testing laboratory or construction code,
including but not limited to Underwriters Laboratories, Edison Testing
Laboratory, or Instituto Superiore Per La Prevenzione E La Sicurezza Del
Lavoro;

(11)
Electrical switchgear and control apparatus that have no external source of
energy to maintain pressure and are located in restricted access areas under
the control of an electric utility;

(12) Regardless of location, unfired pressure vessels and hot
water heaters less than one and one-half cubic feet (11.25 gallons) in volume
with a safety valve setting of one hundred fifty pounds per square inch gauge
(psig) or less, or less than six inches in diameter and less than five cubic feet
(37.5 gallons) in volume with a safety valve set at any pressure, or less than
fifteen psig containing substances other than steam, lethal substances, or
liquids with low flash points.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.79.090 and 1988 c 254 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following boilers and unfired pressure vessels shall be exempt from the
requirements of RCW 70.79.220 and 70.79.240 through 70.79.330:

(1)
Boilers or unfired pressure vessels located on farms and used solely for
agricultural purposes;

(2)
Unfired pressure vessels that are part of fertilizer applicator rigs designed
and used exclusively for fertilization in the conduct of agricultural
operations;

(3)
Steam boilers used exclusively for heating purposes carrying a pressure of not
more than fifteen pounds per square inch gauge and which are located in private
residences or in apartment houses of less than six families;

(4)
Hot water heating boilers carrying a pressure of not more than thirty pounds
per square inch and which are located in private residences or in apartment
houses of less than six families;

(5)
Approved pressure vessels (hot water heaters listed by a nationally recognized
testing agency), with approved safety devices including a pressure relief valve,
with a nominal water containing capacity of one hundred twenty gallons or less
having a heat input of two hundred thousand b.t.u.'s per hour or less, used for
hot water supply at pressure of one hundred sixty pounds per square inch or
less, and at temperatures of two hundred ten degrees Fahrenheit or
less: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That such pressure vessels are not installed in
schools, child care centers, public and private hospitals, nursing and boarding
homes, churches, public buildings owned or leased and maintained by the state
or any political subdivision thereof, and assembly halls;

(6)
Unfired pressure vessels containing only water under pressure for domestic
supply purposes, including those containing air, the compression of which
serves only as a cushion or airlift pumping systems, when located in private
residences or in apartment houses of less than six families;

(7)
Unfired pressure vessels containing liquified petroleum gases.

Sec.
5. RCW
70.79.130 and 1951 c 32 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to the deputy boiler inspectors authorized by RCW 70.79.120, the chief
inspector shall, upon the request of any company authorized to insure against
loss from explosion of boilers and unfired pressure vessels in this state, or
upon the request of any company operating boilers and unfired pressure
vessels in this state, issue to any inspectors of said company commissions as
special inspectors, provided that each such inspector before receiving his or
her commission shall satisfactorily pass the examination provided for in
RCW 70.79.170, or, in lieu of such examination, shall hold a certificate of
competency as an inspector of boilers and unfired pressure vessels for a state
that has a standard of examination substantially equal to that of this state or
a certificate as an inspector of boilers and unfired pressure vessels
from the national board of boiler and pressure vessel inspectors. A commission
as a special inspector for a company operating boilers and unfired
pressure vessels in this state shall be issued only if, in addition to meeting
the requirements stated herein, the inspector is continuously employed by the
company for the purpose of making inspections of boilers and unfired
pressure vessels used, or to be used, by such company.

Sec.
6. RCW
70.79.140 and 1951 c 32 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Special
inspectors shall receive no salary from, nor shall any of their expenses be
paid by the state, and the continuance of a special inspector's commission
shall be conditioned upon his or her continuing in the employ of a
boiler insurance company duly authorized as aforesaid or upon continuing in the
employ of a company operating boilers and unfired pressure vessels in
this state and upon his or her maintenance of the standards imposed by
this chapter.

Sec.
7. RCW
70.79.150 and 1951 c 32 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Special
inspectors shall inspect all boilers and unfired pressure vessels insured or ((all
unfired pressure vessels)) operated by their respective companies and, when
so inspected, the owners and users of such insured boilers and unfired pressure
vessels shall be exempt from the payment to the state of the inspection fees as
provided for in RCW 70.79.330.

Sec.
8. RCW
70.79.160 and 1951 c 32 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
company employing special inspectors shall, within thirty days following
each internal boiler or unfired pressure vessel inspection made by such
inspectors, file a report of such inspection with the chief inspector upon
appropriate forms ((as promulgated by the American society of mechanical
engineers)). Reports of external inspections shall not be required except
when such inspections disclose that the boiler or unfired pressure vessel is in
dangerous condition.

Sec.
9. RCW
70.79.280 and 1951 c 32 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

All
boilers and all unfired pressure vessels to be installed in this state after
the ((twelve months)) twelve-month period from the date upon
which the rules ((and regulations)) of the board shall become effective
shall be inspected during construction as required by the applicable rules ((and
regulations)) of the board by an inspector authorized to inspect boilers and
unfired pressure vessels in this state, or, if constructed outside of the
state, by an inspector holding a certificate from the national board of boiler
and pressure vessel inspectors, or a certificate of competency as an inspector
of boilers and unfired pressure vessels for a state that has a standard
of examination substantially equal to that of this state as provided in RCW
70.79.170.

Sec.
10. RCW
70.79.310 and 1951 c 32 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

The chief inspector, or his or her authorized
representative, may at any time suspend an inspection certificate when, in his or
her opinion, the boiler or unfired pressure vessel for which it was
issued((,)) cannot be operated without menace to the public safety, or
when the boiler or unfired pressure vessel is found not to comply with the
rules ((and regulations)) herein provided. A special inspector shall
have corresponding powers with respect to inspection certificates for boilers
or unfired pressure vessels insured or ((unfired pressure vessels))
operated by the company employing him or her. Such suspension of an
inspection certificate shall continue in effect until such boiler or unfired
pressure vessel shall have been made to conform to the rules ((and
regulations)) of the board, and until said inspection certificate shall
have been reinstated.

---
END ---