BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 35.63 RCW to read as follows:

No
city or town may enact or maintain an ordinance, development regulation, or
zoning regulation or an official control, policy, or administrative practice
that effectively prohibits the development of a mobile home park within an area
zoned for single-family residential structures. As used in this section,
"mobile home park" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 35A.63 RCW to read as follows:

No
code city may enact or maintain an ordinance, development regulation, or zoning
regulation or an official control, policy, or administrative practice that
effectively prohibits the development of a mobile home park within an area
zoned for single-family residential structures. As used in this section,
"mobile home park" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW to read as follows:

No
county may enact or maintain an ordinance, development regulation, or zoning
regulation or an official control, policy, or administrative practice that
effectively prohibits the development of a mobile home park within an area
zoned for single-family residential structures. As used in this section,
"mobile home park" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

No county or city that plans or elects to plan under this chapter
may enact or maintain an ordinance, development regulation, or zoning
regulation or an official control, policy, or administrative practice that
effectively prohibits the development of a mobile home park within an area
zoned for single-family residential structures. As used in this section,
"mobile home park" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030.

---
END ---