BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.44 RCW to read as follows:

Motor homes shall be exempt from excise taxes imposed in RCW
82.44.020(1), but shall pay an annual excise tax in the amount of one and
one-tenth percent of the value of such motor home.

---
END ---