BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.31.207 and 1992 c 228 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The Hanford sublease rent account is hereby created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation and only for the
following purposes:

(a)
To promote the existence of the lease between the state of Washington and the
federal government executed September 10, 1964, covering one thousand acres of
land lying within the Hanford reservation near Richland, Washington;

(b)
To promote development of the leased land and nuclear-related industry in the
Tri-Cities area, in accordance with the terms of the lease; and

(c)
To execute any new sublease agreements that meet the terms of the lease.

(2)
Sources for this account shall include:

(a)
Any rent payments from subleases of the site; and

(b)
Other funding from federal, state, and local agencies.

(3)
Nothing in this section shall affect any agreements or contracts related to
sublease rental payments in effect as of June 11, 1992.

(4) This section expires on June 30, ((1999)) 2009.

---
END ---