BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.94.100 and 1991 c 199 s 704 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governing body of each authority shall be known as the board of directors.

(2)
In the case of an authority comprised of one county the board shall be
comprised of two appointees of the city selection committee, at least one of
whom shall represent the city having the most population in the county, and two
representatives to be designated by the board of county commissioners. In the
case of an authority comprised of two, three, four, or five counties, the board
shall be comprised of one appointee from each county, who shall represent the
city having the most population in such county, to be designated by the mayor
and city council of such city, and one representative from each county to be
designated by the board of county commissioners of each county making up the
authority. In the case of an authority comprised of six or more counties, the
board shall be comprised of one representative from each county to be
designated by the board of county commissioners of each county making up the
authority, and three appointees, one each from the three largest cities within
the local authority's jurisdiction to be appointed by the mayor and city
council of such city.

(3)
In the case of an authority comprised of one county, that has a population
over three hundred fifty thousand and that is located east of the crest of the
Cascades, the board shall be comprised of one appointee of the city selection
committee, one appointee who shall be appointed by the legislative authority of
and represent the city having the most population in the county, and two
representatives to be designated by the county legislative authority.

(4)
If the board of an authority otherwise would consist of an even number, the
members selected as above provided shall agree upon and elect an additional
member who shall be either a member of the ((governing body)) legislative
authority of one of the towns, cities, or counties comprising the
authority, or a private citizen residing in the authority.

(((4)))
(5) The terms of office of board members shall be four years.

(((5))) (6) Wherever a member of a board has a
potential conflict of interest in an action before the board, the member shall
declare to the board the nature of the potential conflict prior to
participating in the action review. The board shall, if the potential conflict
of interest, in the judgment of a majority of the board, may prevent the member
from a fair and objective review of the case, remove the member from
participation in the action.

---
END ---