BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. This
chapter shall be known and may be cited as the intractable pain treatment act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Intractable pain" means pain a person feels despite reasonable
efforts to eliminate or alleviate the source of the pain. The source may be
known or not known.

(2)
"Reasonable efforts" means efforts to find the source of pain and
include appropriate referrals by the attending physician.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Health professionals authorized in this state to prescribe controlled
substances may treat intractable pain with controlled substances included in
Schedules II through V as identified in this title. This section does not
address treatment of conditions other than intractable pain with controlled
substances included in Schedules II through V.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The licensing
entity for health professionals authorized in this state to prescribe
controlled substances may not take action against the health professional's
license, if the health professional follows the accepted standard of care for
treatment of intractable pain with controlled substances included in Schedules
II through V and the licensed health professional obtains informed consent.

Standard
of care and informed consent are further described in chapter 7.70 RCW. Under
RCW 18.130.340 the secretary of health shall coordinate and assist the
regulatory boards and commissions of the health professions with prescriptive
authority in the development of uniform guidelines for addressing treatment of
intractable pain with controlled substances included in Schedules II through
V. The guidelines may be revised as necessary.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
department of health is authorized to adopt rules to implement this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Prescription of controlled substances included in Schedules II through V for
intractable pain by a health professional authorized in this state to prescribe
controlled substances is not a criminal offense.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
department of labor and industries shall develop guidelines for treatment of
intractable pain and informed consent that are consistent with the department
of health's guidelines. The department of labor and industries is authorized
to make rules to implement this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Licensed health professionals who do not have authority to prescribe, but do
have authority to administer or otherwise perform tasks inherent to the patient
taking the prescription, are authorized to administer or perform their tasks in
cases where controlled substances included in Schedules II through V are
prescribed for intractable pain. Licensing actions and criminal sanctions
cannot be pursued because controlled substances included in Schedules II
through V are used for intractable pain, as long as the health professional
follows the accepted standard of care and obtains informed consent for
treatment of intractable pain.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11.
Sections 1 through 10 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 69 RCW.

---
END ---