BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a new small business for the
first thirty-six months of operation.

(2)
As used in this section, "new small business" means a business with
five or fewer full-time employees that obtained or was required to obtain a
registration certificate under RCW 82.32.030 for the first time during the
twelve months immediately preceding the date in which an exemption is claimed
under this section but does not include:

(a)
A business that has been restructured, reorganized, or transferred to a new
owner, unless the majority of the activities to be conducted after
restructuring, reorganization, or transferral are significantly different from
the activities previously conducted;

(b)
A new branch location or other facility; or

(c)
A business that is substantially similar to a business currently operated, or
operated within the past ten years, by the same principals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act takes effect August 1, 1999.

---
END ---