BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.36.120 and 1992 c 145 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person eighteen years of age or older, or a person under eighteen years of
age if the person is a parent of the child, is guilty of the crime of
assault of a child in the first degree if the child is under the age of
thirteen and the person:

(a)
Commits the crime of assault in the first degree, as defined in RCW 9A.36.011,
against the child; or

(b)
Intentionally assaults the child and either:

(i)
Recklessly inflicts great bodily harm; or

(ii)
Causes substantial bodily harm, and the person has previously engaged in a
pattern or practice either of (A) assaulting the child which has resulted in
bodily harm that is greater than transient physical pain or minor temporary
marks, or (B) causing the child physical pain or agony that is equivalent to
that produced by torture.

(2)
Assault of a child in the first degree is a class A felony.

Sec.
2. RCW
9A.36.130 and 1992 c 145 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person eighteen years of age or older, or a person under eighteen years of
age if the person is a parent of the child, is guilty of the crime of
assault of a child in the second degree if the child is under the age of
thirteen and the person:

(a)
Commits the crime of assault in the second degree, as defined in RCW 9A.36.021,
against a child; or

(b)
Intentionally assaults the child and causes bodily harm that is greater than
transient physical pain or minor temporary marks, and the person has previously
engaged in a pattern or practice either of (i) assaulting the child which has
resulted in bodily harm that is greater than transient pain or minor temporary
marks, or (ii) causing the child physical pain or agony that is equivalent to
that produced by torture.

(2)
Assault of a child in the second degree is a class B felony.

Sec.
3. RCW
9A.36.140 and 1992 c 145 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person eighteen years of age or older, or a person under eighteen years of
age if the person is a parent of the child, is guilty of the crime of
assault of a child in the third degree if the child is under the age of
thirteen and the person commits the crime of assault in the third degree as
defined in RCW 9A.36.031(1)(d) or (f) against the child.

(2)
Assault of a child in the third degree is a class C felony.

Sec.
4. RCW
13.40.0357 and 1998 c 290 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

juvenile juvenile
disposition

disposition category
for attempt,

offense bailjump,
conspiracy,

category description (rcw citation) or
solicitation

........................................

Arson and Malicious Mischief

A Arson 1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson 2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious
Mischief 3 (<$50 is

E class) (9A.48.090) E

E Tampering with
Fire Alarm

Apparatus (9.40.100) E

A Possession of
Incendiary Device

(9.40.120) B+

Assault and
Other Crimes

Involving
Physical Harm

A Assault 1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault 2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault 3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault 4 (9A.36.041) E

A Assault of a Child 1 (9A.36.120) B+

B+ Assault of a Child 2 (9A.36.130) C+

C+ Assault of a Child 3 (9A.36.140) D+

B+ Drive-By
Shooting

(9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless
Endangerment

(9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting
Suicide Attempt

(9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion (9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary and Trespass

B+ Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential
Burglary

(9A.52.025) C

B Burglary 2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools
(Possession of)

(9A.52.060) E

D Criminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal Trespass
2 (9A.52.080) E

C Vehicle
Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption
of Alcohol

(66.44.270) E

C Illegally
Obtaining Legend Drug

(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery,
Possession of Legend

Drug with
Intent to Sell

(69.41.030) D+

E Possession of
Legend Drug

(69.41.030) E

B+ Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act
- Narcotic,

Methamphetamine,
or Flunitrazepam

Sale (69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii)) B+

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act
- Nonnarcotic Sale

(69.50.401(a)(1)(iii)) C

E Possession of
Marihuana <40 grams

(69.50.401(e)) E

C Fraudulently
Obtaining Controlled

Substance (69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of
Controlled Substance

for Profit (69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act
- Narcotic,

Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam

Counterfeit
Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1) (i) or (ii)) B

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Nonnarcotic

Counterfeit
Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1) (iii), (iv), (v)) C

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Possession of a

Controlled
Substance

(69.50.401(d)) C

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Possession of a

Controlled
Substance

(69.50.401(c)) C

Firearms and Weapons

B Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of
Stolen Firearm

(9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded
Pistol Without

Permit (9.41.050) E

C Possession of
Firearms by Minor (<18)

(9.41.040(1)(b)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of
Dangerous Weapon

(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating
Another Person by use

of Weapon (9.41.270) E

Homicide

A+ Murder 1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder 2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap 1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful
Imprisonment

(9A.40.040) D+

Obstructing
Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a
Law Enforcement

Officer (9A.76.020) E

E Resisting Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing
Contraband 1

(9A.76.140) C

C Introducing
Contraband 2

(9A.76.150) D

E Introducing
Contraband 3

(9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a
Public Servant

(9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a
Witness

(9A.72.110) C+

Public
Disturbance

C+ Riot with Weapon (9A.84.010) D+

D+ Riot Without
Weapon

(9A.84.010) E

E Failure to
Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape 1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape 2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape 3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest 1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest 2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent
Exposure

(Victim <14) (9A.88.010) E

E Indecent Exposure

(Victim 14 or over) (9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting Prostitution 1

(9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting
Prostitution 2

(9A.88.080) D+

E O & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Theft, Robbery,
Extortion, and Forgery

B Theft 1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft 2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft 3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft of Livestock (9A.56.080) C

C Forgery (9A.60.020) D

A Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery 2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion 1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion 2 (9A.56.130) D+

B Possession of
Stolen Property 1

(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of
Stolen Property 2

(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of
Stolen Property 3

(9A.56.170) E

C Taking Motor
Vehicle Without

Owner's Permission (9A.56.070) D

Motor Vehicle
Related Crimes

E Driving Without
a License

(46.20.005) E

C Hit and Run -
Injury

(46.52.020(4)) D

D Hit and
Run-Attended

(46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and
Run-Unattended

(46.52.010) E

C Vehicular Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to
Elude Pursuing

Police Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While
Under the Influence

(46.61.502 and 46.61.504) E

Other

B Bomb Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape 11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape 21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape 3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene,
Harassing, Etc.,

Phone Calls (9.61.230) E

A Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Class A Felony B+

B Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Class B Felony C

C Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Class C Felony D

D Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Gross Misdemeanor E

E Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Misdemeanor E

V Violation of
Order of Restitution,

Community
Supervision, or

Confinement (13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are
classed as C offenses and the standard range is established as follows:

1st
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks confinement

2nd
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement

3rd
and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks
confinement

2If the
court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order, it may impose a
penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDS

This schedule must be used for juvenile offenders.
The court may select sentencing option A, B, or C.

OPTION A

JUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID

STANDARD RANGE

A+ 180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS|WEEKS

EXCEPT | | |

30-40 | | |

WEEKS FOR | | |

15-17 | | |

YEAR OLDS | | |

Current B+ 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

Offense WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL | |52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) |15-36 WEEKS |WEEKS

C+ LS |

|15-36 WEEKS

C LS |15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions: |

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Service

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4 or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE:
References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement.

(1)
The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category. The current
offense category is determined by the offense of adjudication.

(2)
The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included
in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count
as one point. Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor
adjudication shall count as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded
down.

(3)
The standard range disposition for each offense is determined by the
intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications and the row
defined by the current offense category.

(4)
RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense.

(5)
A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of
E. However, a disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.

OR

OPTION
B

CHEMICAL
DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If
the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local
sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+
offense, the court may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(5) and
13.40.165.

OR

OPTION
C

MANIFEST
INJUSTICE

If the court determines that
a disposition under option A or B would effectuate a manifest injustice, the
court shall impose a disposition outside the standard range under RCW
13.40.160(2).

---
END ---