BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.44.010 and 1990 c 42 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this chapter, unless (([the])) the context
otherwise requires:

(1)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(2)
"Motor vehicle" means all motor vehicles, trailers, and
semitrailers used, or of the type designed primarily to be used, upon the
public streets and highways, for the convenience or pleasure of the owner, or
for the conveyance, for hire or otherwise, of persons or property, including
fixed loads and facilities for human habitation; but shall not include (a)
vehicles carrying exempt licenses, (b) dock and warehouse tractors and their
cars or trailers, lumber carriers of the type known as spiders, and all other
automotive equipment not designed primarily for use upon public streets((,))
or highways, (c) motor vehicles or their trailers used entirely upon private
property, (d) mobile homes and travel trailers as defined in RCW 82.50.010, ((or))
(e) motor vehicles owned by nonresident military personnel of the armed forces
of the United States stationed in the state of Washington provided personnel
were also nonresident at the time of their entry into military service, or
(f) electric vehicles or hybrid vehicles.

(3)
"Truck-type power or trailing unit" means any vehicle that is subject
to the fees under RCW 46.16.070 except vehicles with an unladen weight of six
thousand pounds or less, RCW 46.16.079, ((46.16.080,)) 46.16.085, or
46.16.090.

(4)
"Electric vehicle" means a vehicle powered by an electric motor
supplied by an on-board battery, flywheel storage unit, or super-capacitor electrical
storage unit.

(5)
"Hybrid vehicle" means a vehicle that can run as an electric vehicle
or as a fuel-burning, engine-driven vehicle. There are two subclasses:

(a)
A series hybrid always runs as an electric vehicle. Some or all of the
electric power is supplied by an on-board generator using an engine-driven
generator, a fuel cell generator, or a thermophotovoltaic generator.

(b) A parallel hybrid can run as a pure electric vehicle for
distances up to twenty-five miles or as an engine-driven vehicle for distances
over twenty-five miles.

---
END ---