BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. Each
year high schools in the state of Washington graduate a significant number of
students who made major contributions to their schools and communities. The
purpose of the Washington service scholars program is to recognize and honor
the accomplishments and contributions of these students, to encourage students
to continue to volunteer in their schools and communities, to encourage and
facilitate privately funded scholarship awards, to provide an opportunity for
higher education for these students, and to affirm the importance of community
service to the future of this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:

The
Washington service scholars program is created. The program shall:

(1)
Provide annually for the selection of a minimum of three seniors in each
legislative district in the state graduating from high schools who have
distinguished themselves in outstanding service in their schools or
communities;

(2)
Increase the public awareness of the importance of community service in
Washington state of public and private high school seniors through appropriate
recognition ceremonies and events at both the local and state level;

(3)
Provide a listing of all Washington service scholars to all Washington state
public and private colleges and universities to facilitate communication about
academic programs and about scholarships;

(4)
Create a state-level method for using private funds for scholarship awards to
high school seniors with outstanding service in their schools and communities;

(5)
Provide, on written request and with the permission of the student, a list of
the Washington service scholars to private scholarship selection committees to
notify the scholars about any available scholarships; and

(6)
Permit grants under section 7 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:

The
higher education coordinating board shall administer the Washington service
scholars program. The program shall be developed cooperatively with the
Washington association of secondary school principals, a voluntary professional
association of secondary school principals, and with organizations promoting
school and community service.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:

The
higher education coordinating board shall create a planning committee to
develop the criteria for selecting students for the Washington service scholars
program. These criteria shall emphasize school and community service including
but not limited to volunteer work for community organizations, service in
schools, involvement in service-oriented school organizations, individual
efforts to help others and improve the local community, and activities
connected with service programs in the school district. The criteria shall
require students to have spent a minimum of one year involved in community or
school service. The planning committee shall include members from state and
private entities having an interest in and responsibility for education and community
service including but not limited to the superintendent of public instruction,
the council of presidents, the state board for community and technical
colleges, and representatives of volunteer organizations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:

Each
year, on or before March 1st, the Washington association of secondary school
principals shall submit to the higher education coordinating board the names of
graduating senior high school students who have been identified and recommended
by their high school principals as performing outstanding school or community
service under the criteria established under section 4 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:

The
Washington service scholars shall be selected each year from among the
identified students. The higher education coordinating board shall notify the
selected students, their high school principals, the legislators of their
respective districts, the governor, and the superintendent of public
instruction when the final selections have been made.

The
board, in cooperation with the governor's office, shall prepare appropriate
certificates to be presented to the Washington service scholars award
recipients. An awards ceremony at an appropriate time and place shall be
planned by the board in cooperation with the Washington association of
secondary school principals and with the approval of the governor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Recipients of the Washington service scholars award under sections 2 through 6
of this act who choose to attend an independent college or university in this
state, as defined in subsection (4) of this section, and recipients of the
award who choose to attend a public college or university in the state may
receive grants under this section if moneys are available. The higher
education coordinating board shall distribute grants to eligible students under
this section from moneys appropriated for this purpose. The individual grants
shall not exceed, on a yearly basis, one thousand dollars. Grants to
recipients attending independent institutions shall be contingent upon the
institution matching on at least a dollar-for-dollar basis, either with actual
money or by a waiver of fees, the amount of the grant received by the student
from the state. The higher education coordinating board shall establish
procedures, by rule, to disburse the awards as direct grants to the students.

(2)
To qualify for the grant, recipients shall enter the in-state college or
university within three years of high school graduation. Grants shall be
awarded only during the first year of study at the college or university.

(3)
No grant may be awarded to any student who is pursuing a degree in theology.

(4)
As used in this section, "independent college or university" means a
private, nonprofit educational institution, the main campus of which is
permanently situated in the state, open to residents of the state, providing
programs of education beyond the high school level leading at least to the
baccalaureate degree, and accredited by the northwest association of schools
and colleges as of June 30, 1999, and other institutions as may be developed
that are approved by the higher education coordinating board as meeting
equivalent standards as those institutions accredited under this section.

(5)
As used in this section, "public college or university" means an
institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. The
sum of seventy-three thousand five hundred dollars, or as much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from
the general fund to the higher education coordinating board to provide service
scholarships of not more than five hundred dollars to three students in each
legislative district.

---
END ---