BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to restructure and fully fund the state's system
of financial aid, however, funding levels for the state's system of financial
aid are subject to available funds. The restructured financial aid system
shall be known as college promise.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The higher education coordinating board shall restructure the state's financial
aid programs into a comprehensive and coordinated system of assistance known as
college promise. College promise shall expand and modify three existing
programs for needy students: The state need grant program under RCW 28B.10.790
through 28B.10.824; the state work-study program under chapter 28B.12 RCW; and
the educational opportunity grant program under chapter 28B.101 RCW. In
addition, college promise may include a demonstration project to assist needy
students whose parents did not complete a degree or certificate from an
institution of higher education. College promise shall be implemented beginning
in the 2000-01 academic year.

(2)
By January 1, 2000, the higher education coordinating board, in consultation
with the house of representatives and senate higher education and fiscal
committees, and the institutions of higher education, shall develop a detailed
implementation plan for college promise. In preparing the plan, the board
shall follow the goals and priorities set forth in sections 3 and 4 of this
act. The plan shall include, but not be limited to:

(a)
Specific program eligibility measures and application procedures for the new
populations of state financial aid recipients identified in section 3 of this
act;

(b)
Specific need analysis criteria and asset protection allowances;

(c)
Estimates of how many state residents, both those who are currently enrolled in
a college or university, and those not currently enrolled, would be eligible
and would apply for aid under the expanded eligibility criteria identified in
section 3 of this act. The estimates, developed in consultation with the office
of financial management, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, and other agencies as appropriate, shall take into account state
economic and demographic factors and other appropriate information;

(d)
Estimates of where the new aid applicants identified under (c) of this
subsection would choose to enroll by type of institution and level of program;
and

(e)
Estimates of the costs for each state financial aid program, including the
state need grant program under RCW 28B.10.790 through 28B.10.824; the state
work-study program under chapter 28B.12 RCW; and the educational opportunity
grant program under chapter 28B.101 RCW to accommodate any new aid applicants
estimated under (c) of this subsection, as offset by nonstate sources of aid. Separate
cost estimates shall be made for each of the new aid populations identified
under section 3 of this act.

(3)
It is the intent of the legislature that the cost estimates completed under
subsection (2) of this section shall be the basis for recommending funding
levels for state financial aid programs for the 2000-01 academic year and each
biennium thereafter.

(4)
The methodologies used to estimate costs under subsection (2) of this section
shall be used for the annual cost estimates required under section 5 of this
act.

(5)
The plan completed under subsection (2) of this section shall be deemed
approved on June 30, 2000, unless legislation is enacted to alter the policies
set forth in the plan. The board shall also propose to the legislature any changes
to the laws governing state financial aid programs that it deems necessary to
accomplish the purposes of college promise.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. In
restructuring the state's financial aid programs, the higher education coordinating
board shall follow these goals:

(1)
For all need-based financial aid programs under RCW 28B.10.790 through
28B.10.824 and chapters 28B.12 and 28B.101 RCW:

(a)
Through a mix of federal, state, and other resources:

(i)
Limit the debt of an undergraduate student to no more than one-half of a
student's cost of attendance; and

(ii)
Provide more self-help opportunities than grant aid to middle-income students,
and approximately equal amounts of self-help opportunities and grant aid to
low-income and lower middle-income students. Self-help opportunities include
work-study and loans;

(b)
In determining eligibility for state financial aid programs, shelter home
equity on a family's principal place of residence, and shelter a reasonable
portion of savings and farm or business net worth, each insofar as is
permissible under state and federal law;

(c)
Consistent with federal law, simplify the financial aid application process;

(d)
Strive to preserve a range of educational options for needy students, including
choice of institutions and programs;

(e)
Recognize otherwise unfunded equipment and assistance needed to reasonably
accommodate students with disabilities; and

(f)
Deliver clear and timely information to current and future postsecondary
students about the costs of attending college and available financial aid.

(2)
For the state need grant program under RCW 28B.10.790 through 28B.10.824: As
funds are available, expand the program to include new populations of resident
students in the following priority order, ensuring that undergraduate students
with the most demonstrated financial need receive full grants before less needy
students receive any grant:

(a)
Low-income undergraduates;

(b)
Lower middle-income undergraduates;

(c)
Middle-income undergraduates; and

(d)
Resident graduate and professional students, following the income priorities
established for undergraduate students.

(3)
For the state work-study program under chapter 28B.12 RCW: Increase employment
opportunities including off-campus job opportunities with off-campus community
service employers.

(4)
For students whose parents did not complete a higher education degree or
certificate: Determine the feasibility of providing grants to needy first
generation scholars.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. In
implementing the goals for expanding financial aid to needy undergraduate
students, the board shall be guided by the following matrix. The matrix
defines income levels, and for each level, the funding priority, and the
assistance mix goal. Income levels shall be adjusted annually for family size
and changes in the state's median income. It is the intent of the legislature
these goals not impair the ability of financial aid officers to adjust aid
packages to meet the needs of students. However, it is the further intent of
the legislature that financial aid officers, insofar as possible attempt to
implement these goals.

Goals for Funding Needy Undergraduate Students

Classification: Low-income Lower middle-income Middle-income

Family

Income: 0-$20,864 $20,865-$31,296 $31,297-$52,160

(1991 dollars,

family
of four)

Percentage Fifty percent Fifty-one to Seventy-six

of State seventy-five to one hundred

Median percent twenty-five

Income:
percent

Priority for

Receiving

Grants: First
Second Third

Assistance
One-half One-half Up to one-third

Mix
goal: grants grants grants

One-half One-half Two-thirds or more

work
study work study work study

and
loans and loans and loans

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. By
September 30th of each even-numbered year, the higher education coordinating
board shall adopt an estimate of the amount of funding, annualized for each
fiscal year, that will be needed during the ensuing biennium to fully fund each
of the state's student financial aid programs including but not limited to:
RCW 28B.10.210 through 28B.10.220, 28B.10.790 through 28B.10.824, chapters
28B.12, 28B.101, and 28B.102 RCW, and, if funded, the first generation scholars
demonstration project. The board shall report its findings to the governor,
and the house of representatives and senate fiscal and higher education
committees.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

In
administering the state student financial aid program, also known as the state
need grant program, under RCW 28B.10.790 through 28B.10.824, the higher
education coordinating board shall proceed substantially as follows unless it
determines that a modification is required in order to conform with federal law
or to improve the administration of the program, consistent with the purposes
of this chapter. The higher education coordinating board shall:

(1)
Define and assist additional populations of needy students as funding becomes
available, in the priorities described in section 3 of this act, and using
income level classification definitions as described in section 4 of this act;

(2)
In calculating eligibility for aid, where not otherwise inconsistent with
federal or state law, shelter home equity on a family's principal place of
residence and shelter a reasonable amount of savings and a reasonable portion
of farm or business net worth, in order to equitably evaluate family ability to
pay; and

(3)
To the extent feasible, adjust the student budget of a needy student with
disabilities to reflect otherwise unfunded equipment or assistance needed to
reasonably accommodate the student in a postsecondary education or training
program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
With the exception of institutions of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.10.016, any institution of postsecondary education that enrolls students
receiving state-funded financial aid shall:

(a)
For Washington residents, match the total amount of the state financial aid
grant funds received by all enrolled students at that institution from the
state need grant and equal opportunity grant programs, with an equal amount of
institutionally raised grant funds from nongovernmental sources; and

(b)
Enter into new or honor existing transfer agreements with institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

(2)
The higher education coordinating board shall adopt rules to implement these
requirements. The rules shall ensure that all institutional matching grant
funds go to students who are needy as defined in RCW 28B.10.802(3) and who are
residents of the state of Washington. As used in this subsection,
"residents of the state of Washington" means that the students would
be eligible to pay resident tuition rates under RCW 28B.15.011 through
28B.15.013 if they were enrolled at a state institution of higher education as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
higher education coordinating board may design a demonstration project to
assist needy first generation college students to obtain either a community or
technical college degree or certificate, or a baccalaureate degree. Through
the project, a needy student, as defined in RCW 28B.10.802(3), who attends a
Washington institution of higher education that is accredited by an accrediting
association recognized by the board by rule, and whose parents did not complete
a degree or certificate from an institution of higher education, may receive a
grant of up to fifteen hundred dollars per year, not to exceed the student's
documented need. The grant may be renewable each year, if the student makes
satisfactory academic progress. Grants awarded to any one student shall not
exceed a cumulative total of nine thousand dollars for an individual pursuing a
baccalaureate degree or five thousand dollars for a student pursuing a
community or technical college degree or certificate. Before seeking funding
for the program, the board shall submit to the governor and the legislature a
plan for implementing the project. The plan shall include a provision for
verification of student eligibility to participate in the demonstration
project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 1 through 5, 7, and 8 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title
28B RCW.

---
END ---