BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.121.010 and 1979 ex.s. c 110 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that:

(1)
The milling of uranium and thorium creates potential hazards to the health of
the citizens of the state of Washington in that potentially hazardous
radioactive isotopes, decay products of uranium and thorium, naturally
occurring in relatively dispersed geologic formations, are brought to one
location on the surface and pulverized in the process of mining and milling
uranium and thorium.

(2)
These radioactive isotopes, in addition to creating a field of gamma radiation
in the vicinity of the tailings area, also exude potentially hazardous
radioactive gas and particulates into the atmosphere from the tailings areas,
and contaminate the milling facilities, thereby creating hazards which will be
present for many generations.

(3)
The potential hazards to the public health also exist when uranium or
thorium tailings are transported within or through the state. Each county
affected by the transportation of these tailings must be able to plan for, and
respond to, the hazards associated with such transportation.

(4)
The public health and welfare of the citizens demands that the state assure
that the public health be protected by requiring that: (a) Prior to the
termination of any radioactive materials license, all milling facilities and
associated tailings piles will be decommissioned in such a manner as to bring
the potential public health hazard to a minimum; and (b) such environmental
radiation monitoring as is necessary to verify the status of decommissioned
facilities will be conducted.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 70.121 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
When tailings or waste classified as 11e(2) radioactive waste, under the
federal atomic energy act of 1954, is transported into or through a county, the
county may assess impact fees to cover the cost reasonably necessary for the
county to prepare for and respond to the movement of such waste.

(2)
The impact fees assessed under this section may be imposed by the affected
counties on the entity or entities responsible for transporting the waste only
after the county legislative authority conducts a public hearing regarding:

(a)
The potential transportation and safety impacts resulting from the movement of
waste through the county, including the need to plan and prepare for possible
degradation of county roads, and potential accidents and spills; and

(b) The extent to which the state plan for authorizing the
transportation of such waste addresses the impacts on the affected county.

---
END ---