BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT
AGENCIES--CAPITAL

Sec.
101. 1997
c 457 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND RECREATION‑-CAPITAL
PROJECTS

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 3,500,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The entire appropriation is for the repaving of roadways in the following state
parks in the 1997-99 biennium:

(a)
Moran state park, $1,800,000;

(b)
Cama Beach state park, $300,000;

(c)
Riverside state park, $640,000;

(d)
Steamboat Rock state park, $225,000;

(e)
Damon Point state park, $485,000; and

(f)
Deception Pass state park, $50,000.

(2)
((This is a one time appropriation with the repaving efforts to be completed
in the parks by June 30, 1999.)) The repaving contracts will be awarded by
competitive bid using department of transportation standards. Progress reports
will be prepared and presented to the legislative transportation committees in
January 1999. Upon completion of the contracts for the parks listed in
subsection (1)(a), (c), (d), and (f) of this section, unspent moneys from those
contracts may be used for design of paving projects on the agency's 1999-01
biennium pavement project list.

(3) If any of the parks listed in subsection (1) of this section
are closed during the 1997-99 biennium, the amount provided for the park under
subsection (1)(a) through (f) of this section shall lapse and return to the
motor vehicle fund.

(End
of part)

PART
II

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES

Sec.
201. 1997
c 457 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Urban Arterial Trust

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 57,159,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Transportation Improvement

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 122,014,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-City Hardship Assistance

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 2,649,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Small City Account‑-

State
Appropriation.................... ... $ ((7,921,000))

9,921,000

Central
Puget Sound Public Transportation

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 27,360,000

Public
Transportation Systems Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 3,928,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((221,031,000))

223,031,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The
transportation improvement account‑-state appropriation includes
$40,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.26.500.
However, the transportation improvement board may authorize the use of current
revenues available in lieu of bond proceeds.

Sec.
202. 1998 c
348 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL‑-FIELD OPERATIONS
BUREAU

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Patrol Highway

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((163,789,000))

166,035,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Patrol Highway

Account‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ ((4,374,000))

4,688,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Patrol Highway

Account‑-Local
Appropriation............... $ 170,000

Transportation
Fund‑‑State Appropriation........ $...................................... 4,522,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((172,855,000))

175,415,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The Washington state patrol is authorized to use the federal community oriented
policing program (COPS) for 54 troopers with 18 COPS troopers to begin in July
1998 and 36 COPS troopers to begin in January 1999.

(2)
$4,463,000 of the transportation fund--state appropriation and $3,737,000 of
the motor vehicle fund--state patrol highway account--state appropriation are
provided for an equalization salary adjustment of three percent on July 1,
1997, and six percent on July 1, 1998, for commissioned officers (entry level
trooper through captain), commercial vehicle enforcement officers, and
communication officers of the Washington state patrol. The salary adjustments
are intended to bring the existing salary levels into the fiftieth percentile
of other Washington state law enforcement compensation plans. This is in
addition to the salary increase contained in the omnibus appropriation bill or
bills. The total of the two increases, in the transportation budget and
omnibus appropriation bill or bills, may not exceed twelve percent.

(3)
The Washington state patrol will develop a vehicle replacement plan for the
next six years. The plan will include an analysis of the current 100,000 miles
replacement policy and agency assignment policy. Projected future budget
requirements will include forecasts of vehicle replacement costs, vehicle
equipment costs, and estimated surplus vehicle values when sold at auction.

(4)
The Washington state patrol vessel and terminal security (VATS) program will be
funded by the state patrol highway fund beginning July 1, 1997, and into future
biennia.

(5)
A personnel data base will be maintained of the 801 commissioned traffic law
enforcement officers, with a reconciliation at all times to the patrol
allocation model and a vehicle assignment and replacement plan.

(6)
$150,000 of the state patrol highway account appropriation is to fund the
Washington state patrol's portion of the drug recognition expert training
program previously funded by the traffic safety commission.

(7)
The Washington state patrol with legislative transportation committee staff
will perform an interim study of the Washington state patrol's commercial
vehicle enforcement program with a report to be presented to the legislature
and office of financial management in January 1998 with a developed business
plan and program recommendations which includes, but is not limited to, weigh
in motion technologies.

(8)(a)
The Washington state patrol, in consultation with the Washington traffic safety
commission, shall conduct an analysis of the most effective safety devices for
preventing accidents while delivery trucks are operating in reverse gear. The
analysis shall focus on trucks equipped with cube-style, walk-in cargo boxes,
up to eighteen feet long, that are most commonly used in the commercial
delivery of goods and services.

(b)
The state patrol shall incorporate research and analysis currently being
conducted by the national highway traffic safety administration.

(c)
Upon completion of the analysis, the state patrol shall forward its
recommendations to the legislative transportation committee and office of
financial management.

(9)
$381,000 of the transportation fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
the following traditional general fund purposes: The governor's air travel,
the license fraud program, and the special services unit. This transportation
fund‑-state appropriation is not a permanent funding source for these
purposes.

(10)
$461,000 of the state patrol highway account appropriation is provided solely
for monitoring and stopping fuel tax evasion. The Washington state patrol will
report on December 1, 1998, to the legislative transportation committee on the
activities and revenue collected associated with fuel tax evasion.

(11)
$289,000 of the state patrol highway account appropriation is provided solely
for vehicle license fraud investigation. A report will be presented each
session to the legislature on the activities and revenue collected by the
vehicle license fraud unit.

(12)
$268,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state patrol highway account is
provided solely to cover the employer's share of medicare premiums for
commissioned officers hired prior to 1986. If a referendum of these officers
does not receive majority support this appropriation shall not be expended by
the state patrol.

(13)
$105,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state patrol highway account‑-state
appropriation and $314,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state patrol
highway account‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for laptop personal
computers, peripheral equipment, and necessary software for existing community
oriented policing program (COPS) troopers.

(14)
$2,300,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state patrol highway account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely to purchase 100 equipped pursuit vehicles. If
the transportation fund‑-state appropriation reduction described in
section 203(9) of this act does not take place, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse. If the state patrol does not purchase the vehicles prior
to June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
203. 1998
c 348 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL‑-SUPPORT
SERVICES BUREAU

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Patrol Highway

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 52,926,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Patrol Highway

Account‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 104,000

Transportation
Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((2,513,000))

214,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((55,543,000))

53,244,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$1,017,000 for the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for year 2000 conversions of transportation automated systems.
For purposes of this subsection, transportation automated systems does not
include WASIS and WACIS.

(2)
$50,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for a feasibility study to assess the effect of mobile
computers on trooper productivity by type of service and measurement of the
productivity gains achieved through reduction in administrative time and
paperwork processing. The agency shall submit a copy of the proposed study
workplan to the office of financial management, the department of information
services, and the legislative transportation committee no later than October 1,
1997. A final report shall be submitted to the legislative transportation
committee, the office of financial management, and the department of
information services no later than January 31, 1998. This project is subject
to the provisions of section 502 of this act.

(3)
$50,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for a review of the feasibility of improving the patrol's
computer-aided dispatch system to permit tracking of trooper availability and
response time to calls for service. The agency shall submit a copy of the
proposed study workplan to the office of financial management, the department
of information services, and the legislative transportation committee no later
than October 1, 1997. A final report shall be submitted to the legislative
transportation committee, the office of financial management, and the
department of information services no later than January 31, 1998. This
project is subject to the provisions of section 502 of this act.

(4)
These appropriations maintain current level funding for the Washington state
patrol service center and have no budget savings included for a consolidation
of service centers based on the study conducted by the technology management
group. During the 1997 interim, the costs for current level will be reviewed
by the office of financial management and department of information services
with a formal data center recommendation, that has been approved by the
information services board, to the legislature in January 1998. Current level
funding will be split between fiscal year 1998 and fiscal year 1999 with
consideration of funding adjustments based on the review and the formal policy
and budget recommendations.

(5)
$2,513,000 of the transportation fund‑-state appropriation is for the
following traditional general fund purposes: The executive protection unit,
revolving fund charges, budget and fiscal services, computer services,
personnel, human resources, administrative services, and property management. This
appropriation is not a permanent funding source for these purposes.

(6)
$22,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state patrol highway account
appropriation is provided solely to cover the employer's share of medicare
premiums for commissioned officers hired prior to 1986. If a referendum of
these officers does not receive majority support this appropriation shall not
be expended by the state patrol.

(7)
The 1998 Washington state patrol interim working group shall review the data
center, electronic services division, communications division, and strategic
planning and shall provide recommendations on increasing the effectiveness and
efficiencies of the programs under review and audit.

(8)
$1,580,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the transition of the Washington state patrol mainframe
data processing functions to the Washington state department of information
services data center in Olympia, Washington. The Washington state patrol and
the department of information services shall work cooperatively to ensure the
transition to the department of information services is completed successfully.

(9)
The transportation fund‑-state appropriation is reduced by $2,299,000 to
correct a double appropriation.

Sec.
204. 1998
c 348 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING‑-VEHICLE SERVICES

General
Fund‑-Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account‑-

State
Appropriation...... ................. $ 26,000

General
Fund‑-Wildlife Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 549,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ ((49,630,000))

49,615,000

Department
of Licensing Services Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 2,944,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION ................. $ ((53,149,000))

53,134,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$600,000 of the licensing service account‑-state appropriation is
provided for replacement of printers for county auditors and subagents.

(2)
The department of licensing, in cooperation with the fuel tax advisory
committee, shall prepare and submit a report to the legislative transportation
committee containing recommendations for special fuel and motor vehicle fuel
recordkeeping and reporting requirements, including but not limited to
recommendations regarding the form and manner in which records and tax reports
must be maintained and made available to the department; which persons engaged
in the business of selling, purchasing, distributing, storing, transporting, or
delivering fuel should be required to submit periodic reports regarding the
disposition of such fuel; and the feasibility of implementing an automated fuel
tracking system. The report is due no later than October 31, 1997.

(3)
The department of licensing, in cooperation with representatives of local
governments and the department of revenue shall analyze the collection of the
local option fuel tax under RCW 82.80.010. Based on that analysis the
department of licensing shall offer recommendations regarding the appropriate
government entity to collect the local option fuel tax and the best method to
accomplish that collection. The department of licensing shall report its
findings and recommendations to the legislative transportation committee and
the office of financial management by December 1, 1998.

(4)
The department of licensing, in conjunction with the interagency commission on outdoor
recreation, the department of transportation, and other affected entities,
shall conduct a study and make recommendations regarding:

(a)
Whether the study required by RCW 43.99.030 to determine what portion of the
motor vehicle fuel tax collected is tax on marine fuel is an effective and
efficient mechanism for determining what portion of fuel tax revenues should be
refunded to the marine fuel tax refund account;

(b)
Other possible methodologies for determining the appropriate amount of tax
revenue to refund from the motor vehicle fund to the marine tax refund account;
and

(c)
Whether the tax on fuel used by illegally nonregistered boats should be
refunded to the marine tax refund account.

The
department of licensing shall make a report of its findings and recommendations
to the legislative transportation committee and the office of financial
management by December 1, 1998.

(5)
$382,000 of the motor vehicle fund--state appropriation is provided solely to
implement Substitute House Bill No. 2659. If Substitute House Bill No. 2659 is
not enacted by June 30, 1998, this amount shall lapse.

Sec.
205. 1998
c 348 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING‑-DRIVER SERVICES

Highway
Safety Fund‑-Motorcycle Safety Education

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 1,411,000

Highway
Safety Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((61,087,000))

59,869,000

Transportation
Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... 4,985,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((64,112,000))

66,265,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$225,000 of the highway safety account-‑state appropriation is provided
solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2442 or Senate Bill No. 6190. If
neither bill is enacted by June 30, 1998, this amount shall lapse.

(2)
$480,000 of the highway safety account-‑state appropriation is provided
solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6165. If Senate Bill No. 6165 is not
enacted by June 30, 1998, this amount shall lapse.

(((6)))
(3) $1,000,000 of the highway safety account-‑state appropriation
is provided solely to implement 1998 legislation that changes statutes relating
to driving under the influence. If legislation changing the DUI statutes is
not enacted by June 30, 1998, this amount shall lapse.

Sec.
206. 1997
c 457 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY
MANAGEMENT AND FACILITIES‑-PROGRAM D‑-OPERATING

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ ((24,703,000))

24,436,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Federal Appropriation...... $ 400,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Transportation Capital

Facilities
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((24,338,000))

24,330,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((49,441,000))

49,166,000

Sec.
207. 1998
c 348 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Economic Development Account‑-

State
Appropriation...... ................. $ 2,434,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ ((163,275,000))

123,575,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Federal Appropriation...... $ 155,485,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 40,000,000

Special
Category C Account‑-State Appropriation $ ((73,271,000))

65,471,000

Transportation
Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((230,546,000))

225,546,000

Puyallup
Tribal Settlement Account‑-State

Appropriation............................. $ 5,000,000

Puyallup
Tribal Settlement Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation............................. $ 200,000

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,401,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((671,612,000))

619,112,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided for the location, design, right of
way acquisition, or construction of state highway projects designated as
improvements under RCW 47.05.030. The appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations and specified amounts are
provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The special category C account‑-state appropriation of (($73,271,000))
$65,471,000 includes $26,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.812 through 47.10.817 ((and includes $12,000,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by House Bill No. 1012)). The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation. ((If House Bill No. 1012 is not enacted by June
30, 1998, $7,800,000 of the special category C account‑-state
appropriation shall lapse.))

(2)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation includes $2,685,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.819(1) for match on
federal demonstration projects. The transportation commission may authorize
the use of current revenues available to the department of transportation in
lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(3)
The department shall report annually to the legislative transportation
committee on the status of the projects funded by the special category C
appropriations contained in this section. The report shall be submitted by
January 1 of each year.

(4)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation in this section includes
$600,000 solely for a rest area and information facility in the Nisqually
gateway area to Mt. Rainier, provided that at least forty percent of the total
project costs are provided from federal, local, or private sources. The
contributions from the nonstate sources may be in the form of in-kind
contributions including, but not limited to, donations of property and
services.

(5)
The appropriations in this section contain $118,247,000 reappropriation from
the 1995-97 biennium.

(6)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation in this section includes
$250,000 to establish a wetland mitigation pilot project. This appropriation
may only be expended if the department of transportation establishes a
technical committee to better implement the department's strategic plan. The
technical committee shall include, but is not limited to, cities, counties,
environmental groups, business groups, tribes, the Puget Sound action team, and
the state departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, and community, trade, and
economic development, and appropriate federal agencies. The committee shall
assist the department in implementing its wetland strategic plan, including working
to eliminate barriers to improved wetland and watershed management. To this
end, the technical committee shall: (a) Work to facilitate sharing of agency
environmental data, including evaluation of off-site and out-of-kind mitigation
options; (b) develop agreed-upon guidance that will enable the preservation of
wetlands that are under imminent threat from development for use as an
acceptable mitigation option; (c) develop strategies that will facilitate the
implementation of mitigation banking, including developing mechanisms for
valuing and transferring credits; (d) provide input in the development of
wetland functions assessment protocols related to transportation projects; (e)
develop incentives for interagency participation in joint mitigation projects
within watersheds; and (f) explore options for funding environmental mitigation
strategies. The department shall prepare an annual report to the legislative
transportation committee and legislative natural resources committees on
recommendations developed by the technical committee.

(7)
The department shall report January 1st and July 1st of each year, to the
legislative transportation committee and the office of financial management of
the timing and the scope of work being performed for the regional transit
authority. This report shall provide a description of all department
activities related to the regional transit authority including investments in
state‑owned infrastructure.

(8)
The translake study funded in this section shall include recommendations to
address methods for mitigating traffic noise in the study area.

(9)
Funding for the SR 509 project extending south and east from south 188th street
in King county is contingent on the development of a proposal linking the
project to other freight corridors and a funding plan with participation from
partners of the state that are agreed to by the legislative transportation
committee and the governor.

(10)
The motor vehicle account‑-federal appropriation in this section is
transferrable to the transportation account to ensure efficient funds
management and program delivery.

(11)
$2,000,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for transfer to the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account‑-state.

(((14)))
(12) $13,000,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation
and $12,000,000 of the transportation fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for preliminary engineering and purchase of right of way for
highway construction.

(((15)
$35,000,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation is conditioned
upon voter approval of a referendum on a state-wide ballot that provides
funding for transportation purposes. If the voters approve such a referendum,
$35,000,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation is put in
reserve solely to be used for the purposes of preliminary engineering and
purchase of right of way for highway construction. These moneys may only be
expended upon approval of both the legislative transportation committee and the
office of financial management.))

(13)
The department may advertise and award certain specified projects prior to June
30, 1999. This authority extends to the 11 projects listed in the
transportation executive information system document titled "1999 Supplemental
Budget C
WSDOT Commission Spring Start Projects" dated February 1, 1999, 10:16 a.m.

Sec.
208. 1998
c 348 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS‑-PROGRAM K

Transportation
Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((1,280,000))

1,255,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 16,235,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION........................ $ ((17,515,000))

17,490,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation includes $16,235,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.834 for all forms of
cash contributions, or the payment of other costs incident to the location,
development, design, right of way, and construction of only the SR 16 corridor
improvements and park and ride projects selected under the public-private
transportation initiative program authorized under chapter 47.46 RCW; and
support costs of the public-private transportation initiatives program.

(2)
The appropriations in this section contain $16,235,000 reappropriated from the
1995-97 biennium.

Sec.
209. 1998
c 348 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE‑-PROGRAM M

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ ((239,200,000))

237,013,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Federal Appropriation...... $ 465,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation $ 3,335,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((243,000,000))

240,813,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
If portions of the appropriations in this section are required to fund
maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by federal
emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides, supplemental
appropriations will be requested to restore state funding for ongoing
maintenance activities.

(2)
The department shall deliver the highway maintenance program according to the
plans for each major maintenance group to the extent practical. However, snow
and ice expenditures are highly variable depending on actual weather conditions
encountered. If extraordinary winter needs result in increased winter
maintenance expenditures, the department shall, after prior consultation with
the transportation commission, the office of financial management, and the
legislative transportation committee adopt one or both of the following courses
of action: (a) Reduce planned maintenance activities in other groups to offset
the necessary increases for snow and ice control; or (b) continue delivery as
planned within other major maintenance groups and request a supplemental
appropriation in the following legislative session to fund the additional snow
and ice control expenditures.

(3)
The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any federal moneys received
for emergency snow and ice removal and shall place an equal amount of the motor
vehicle fund--state into unallotted status. This exchange shall not affect the
amount of funding available for snow and ice removal.

(4)
Funding appropriated for local storm water charges assessed under RCW
90.03.525, which is allocated for, but not paid to, a local storm water utility
because the utility did not meet the conditions provided under RCW 90.03.525,
may be transferred by the department to program Z of the department to be
distributed as grants under the storm water grant program.

Sec.
210. 1998
c 348 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PRESERVATION‑-PROGRAM P

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State............. Appropriation $ ((288,720,000))

285,220,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Federal Appropriation...... $ 274,259,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation $ 2,400,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION.................... ... $ ((568,379,000))

561,879,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation includes $6,800,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.761 and 47.10.762 for
emergency purposes. However, the transportation commission may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(2)
The appropriations in this section contain $27,552,000 reappropriated from the
1995-97 biennium.

(3)
If the Oregon state legislature enacts a public/private partnership program and
the Washington state transportation commission, in consultation with the
legislative transportation committee, negotiates and enters into an agreement
between Washington and Oregon to place the Lewis and Clark bridge into Oregon's
public/private partnership program, up to $3,000,000 of the motor vehicle
fund--state appropriation may be used as Washington's contribution toward the
design of the project pursuant to the agreement between Washington and Oregon.
Any additional contributions shall be subject to Washington state legislative appropriations
and approvals. The department shall provide a status report on this project to
the legislative transportation committee by June 30, 1998.

(((6)))
(4) $630,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation is
provided for slope stabilization along state route 166 in the Ross Point
vicinity. This amount is intended to fund preliminary engineering, right of
way acquisition, and to begin construction.

Sec.
211. 1998
c 348 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRAFFIC
OPERATIONS‑-PROGRAM Q

State
Patrol Highway Account--State

Appropriation.............................. $ 153,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ ((30,412,000))

29,982,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund--Federal Appropriation...... $ 1,000,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund--Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 275,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((31,840,000))

31,410,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amount is provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The department, in cooperation with the Washington state patrol and the tow
truck industry, shall develop and submit to the legislative transportation
committee by October 31, 1997, a recommendation for implementing new tow truck
services during peak hours on the Puget Sound freeway system.

(2)
The department, in cooperation with the Washington state patrol, the department
of licensing, the state of Oregon, and the United States department of
transportation, shall install and operate the commercial vehicle information
systems and network (CVISN) at a selected pilot site. If the state department
of transportation receives additional federal funding for this project that is
eligible to supplant state funding, the appropriation in this section shall be
reduced by the amount of the state funds supplanted.

Sec.
212. 1998
c 348 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT‑-PROGRAM S

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Capital

Construction
Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 777,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ ((70,032,000))

72,485,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Ferry Operations

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 1,093,000

Transportation
Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... 1,158,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((73,060,000))

75,513,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)(a)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation includes $14,300,000 provided
solely for programming activities and other efforts needed to bring the
department's information systems, and devices with computers built into them,
into compliance with the year 2000 requirements of the department of
information services. The department is directed to expend the moneys
internally reallocated for this purpose before spending from this
appropriation. The department is directed to provide quarterly reports on this
effort to the legislative transportation committee and the office of financial
management beginning October 1, 1997.

(b)
Up to $2,900,000 of the amount provided in (a) of this subsection may be
expended for testing and required modifications to electronic devices and other
equipment and specialized software that are essential for department operations
to ensure they are year 2000 compliant. Before expending any of this amount
for these purposes, the department shall consult with the legislative
transportation committee and the office of financial management.

(2)
The legislative transportation committee shall review and analyze freight
mobility issues affecting eastern and southeastern Washington as recommended by
the freight mobility advisory committee and report back to the legislature by
November 1, 1997. $500,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state
appropriation is provided for this review and analysis. The funding
conditioned in this subsection shall be from revenues provided for
interjurisdictional studies.

(3)
In order to increase visibility for decision making, the department shall
review its budgeting and accounting methods for management information
systems. The review shall include, but not be limited to, the cost-benefit
analysis of existing processes and evaluation of less complex alternatives such
as direct appropriations. The results of the review shall be reported to the
legislative transportation committee and the office of financial management by
July 1, 1998.

Sec.
213. 1997
c 457 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND
RESEARCH‑-PROGRAM T

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ ((16,098,000))

15,884,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Federal Appropriation...... $ 10,466,000

Transportation
Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((1,384,000))

1,379,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((27,948,000))

27,729,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: Up to
$2,400,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
regional transportation planning organizations, with allocations for
participating counties maintained at the 1995-1997 biennium levels for those
counties not having metropolitan planning organizations within their
boundaries.

Sec.
214. 1998
c 348 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES‑-PROGRAM U

(1)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL TORT CLAIMS SUPPORT

((Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation...... $ 2,515,000))

Transportation
Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... 3,715,000

(2)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 840,000

(3)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND
SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED MAIL SERVICES

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 3,391,000

(4)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ ((2,240,000))

2,140,000

(5)
FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 12,535,000

(6)
FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Ferry Operations

Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $ 2,928,000

(7)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 536,000

(8)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION STATE PARKING
SERVICES

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 90,000

(9)
FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS
SURCHARGE

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 735,000

(10)
FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 355,000

Sec.
215. 1998
c 348 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM
W

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Capital

Construction
Account‑-State Appropriation... $ ((209,886,000))

192,886,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Capital

Construction
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 30,165,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Capital

Construction
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 765,000

Transportation
Fund‑-Passenger Ferry Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 640,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION............. $ ((241,456,000))

224,456,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided for improving the Washington state
ferry system, including, but not limited to, vessel acquisition, vessel
construction, major and minor vessel improvements, and terminal construction
and improvements. The appropriations in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for that activity:

(1)
The appropriations in this section are provided to carry out only the projects
(version ((3)) 2) adjusted by the legislature for the 1997-99
budget. The department shall reconcile the 1995-97 capital expenditures within
ninety days of the end of the biennium and submit a final report to the
legislative transportation committee and office of financial management.

(2)
The Puget Sound capital construction account‑-state appropriation
includes $100,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.60.800 for vessel and terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements,
and long lead time materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries,
including construction of new jumbo ferry vessels in accordance with the
requirements of RCW 47.60.770 through 47.60.778. However, the department of
transportation may use current revenues available to the Puget Sound capital
construction account in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.

(3)
The department of transportation shall provide to the legislative
transportation committee and office of financial management a quarterly
financial report concerning the status of the capital program authorized in
this section.

(4)
Washington state ferries is authorized to reimburse up to $3,000,000 from the
Puget Sound capital construction account‑-state appropriation or Puget
Sound capital construction account--federal appropriation to the city of
Bremerton and the port of Bremerton for Washington state ferries' financial
participation in the development of a Bremerton multimodal transportation
terminal, port of Bremerton passenger-only terminal expansion, and ferry
vehicular connections to downtown traffic circulation improvements. The
reimbursement shall specifically support the construction of the following
components: Appropriate passenger-only ferry terminal linkages to accommodate
bow-loading catamaran type vessels and the needed transit connections; and the
Washington state ferries' component of the Bremerton multimodal transportation
terminal as part of the downtown Bremerton redevelopment project, including
appropriate access to the new downtown traffic circulation road network.

(5)
The Puget Sound capital construction account‑-state appropriation
includes funding for capital improvements on vessels to meet United States
Coast Guard Subchapter W regulation revisions impacting SOLAS (safety of life
at sea) requirements for ferry operations on the Anacortes to Sidney, B.C.
ferry route.

(6)
The Puget Sound capital construction account‑-state appropriation, the
Puget Sound capital construction account--federal appropriation, and the
passenger ferry account‑-state appropriation include funding for the
construction of one new passenger-only vessel and the department's exercise of
the option to build a second passenger-only vessel. In accordance with
chapter 166, Laws of 1998, Washington state ferries shall accelerate activities
to ensure the acquisition of four additional passenger-only vessels and the
construction of related terminal facilities, including maintenance facilities
for the Southworth and Kingston to Seattle passenger-only ferry routes.

(7)
The Puget Sound capital construction account‑-state appropriation
includes funding for the exploration and acquisition of a design for constructing
a millennium class ferry vessel.

(8)
The Puget Sound capital construction account‑-state appropriation
includes $90,000 for the purchase of defibrillators. At least one
defibrillator shall be placed on each vessel in the ferry fleet.

(9)
The appropriations in this section contain $46,962,000 reappropriated from the
1995-97 biennium.

Sec.
216. 1998
c 348 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-MARINE‑-PROGRAM X

Marine
Operating Fund‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((270,522,000))

270,473,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The appropriation is based on the budgeted expenditure of (($28,696,000))
$27,473,000 for vessel operating fuel in the 1997-99 biennium. If the
actual cost of fuel is less than this budgeted amount, the excess amount may
not be expended. If the actual cost exceeds this amount, the department shall
request a supplemental appropriation.

(2)
The appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry employees. The
expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees during the 1997-99 biennium
may not exceed (($179,095,000)) $180,318,000 plus a dollar
amount, as prescribed by the office of financial management, that is equal to
any insurance benefit increase granted general government employees in excess
of $313.95 a month annualized per eligible marine employee multiplied by the
number of eligible marine employees for the respective fiscal year, a dollar
amount as prescribed by the office of financial management for costs associated
with pension amortization charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by the office
of financial management for salary increases during the 1997-99 biennium. For
the purposes of this section, the expenditures for compensation paid to ferry
employees shall be limited to salaries and wages and employee benefits as
defined in the office of financial management's policies, regulations, and
procedures named under objects of expenditure "A" and "B"
(7.2.6.2).

The
prescribed salary and insurance benefit increase or decrease dollar amount that
shall be allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in
addition to the appropriation contained in this section and may be used to
increase or decrease compensation costs, effective July 1, 1997, and
thereafter, as established in the 1997-99 general fund operating budget.

(3)
The department of transportation shall provide to the legislative
transportation committee and office of financial management a quarterly
financial report concerning the status of the operating program authorized in
this section.

(4)
The appropriation in this section includes up to $1,566,000 for additional
operating expenses required to comply with United States Coast Guard Subchapter
W regulation revisions for vessels operating on the Anacortes to Sidney, B.C.
ferry route. The department shall explore methods to minimize the cost of
meeting United States Coast Guard requirements and shall report the results to
the legislative transportation committee and office of financial management by
September 1, 1997.

(5)
The department shall request a reduction of the costs associated with the use
of the terminal leased from the Port of Anacortes and costs associated with use
of the Sidney, British Columbia terminal.

(6)
Agreements between Washington state ferries and concessionaires for automatic
teller machines on ferry terminals or vessels shall provide for and include
banks and credit unions that primarily serve the west side of Puget Sound.

(7)
In the event federal funding is provided for one or more passenger-only ferry
vessels for the purpose of transporting United States naval personnel, the
department of transportation is authorized to acquire and construct such
vessels in accordance with the authority provided in RCW 47.56.030, and the
department shall establish a temporary advisory committee comprised of
representatives of the Washington state ferries, transportation commission,
legislative transportation committee, office of financial management, and the
United States Navy to analyze and make recommendations on, at a minimum, vessel
performance criteria, docking, vessel deployment, and operating issues.

(8)
The appropriation provides funding for House Bill No. 2165 (paying interest on
retroactive raises for ferry workers).

(9)
The commission is authorized to increase Washington state ferry tariffs in
excess of the fiscal growth factor, established under chapter 43.135 RCW, in
fiscal year 1998 and fiscal year 1999.

(10)
Funding for Anacortes to Sidney advertising is contingent upon partners meeting
their commitment. In no event may the state share exceed fifty percent of the
cash contribution toward the project.

(11)
$1,370,000 of this appropriation is provided solely for the Hiyu operation for
Southworth/Vashon 5 days per week for 16 hours per day. Prior to placing the
Hiyu in permanent service on a route between Vashon and Southworth, the
Washington state ferries shall conduct a study of the impact of additional
service on Vashon and Southworth and report back to the legislative
transportation committee by May 15, 1998.

(12)
$446,000 of this appropriation is provided solely to provide an additional crew
member on Jumbo Mark 2 ferries as required by emergency evacuation regulations
adopted by the United States Coast Guard. If the Coast Guard requirement can
be met without the hiring of additional staff, the portion of this
appropriation provided to meet that requirement shall not be expended.

Sec.
217. 1998
c 348 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PUBLIC
TRANSPORTATION AND RAIL‑-PROGRAM Y

Essential
Rail Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 256,000

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((13,225,000))

13,185,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,290,000

Transportation
Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((55,029,000))

46,858,000

Transportation
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation..... $ 3,947,000

Transportation
Fund‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 105,000

Central
Puget Sound Public Transportation

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((4,250,000))

250,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((83,102,000))

70,891,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
Up to $46,180,000 of the transportation fund‑-state appropriation is
provided for intercity rail passenger service including up to $8,000,000 for
lease purchase of two advanced technology train sets with total purchase costs
not to exceed $20,000,000; up to $1,000,000 for one spare advanced technology
train power-car and other spare parts, subsidies for operating costs not to
exceed $12,000,000, to maintain service of two state contracted round trips
between Seattle and Portland and one state contracted round trip between
Seattle and Vancouver, British Columbia, and capital projects necessary to
provide Seattle-Vancouver, British Columbia, train operating times of under 4
hours.

(2)
Up to $3,000,000 of the transportation fund‑-state appropriation is
provided for the rural mobility program administered by the department of
transportation. Priority for grants provided from this account shall be given
to projects and programs that can be accomplished in the 1997-99 biennium.

(3)
Up to $600,000 of the high capacity transportation account‑-state
appropriation is provided for rail freight coordination, technical assistance,
and planning.

(4)
The department shall provide biannual reports to the legislative transportation
committee and office of financial management regarding the department's rail
freight program. The department shall also notify the committee for project
expenditures from all fund sources prior to making those expenditures. The
department shall examine the ownership of grain cars and the potential for
divestiture of those cars and other similar assets and report those findings to
the committee prior to the 1998 legislative session.

(5)
Up to $750,000 of the transportation fund‑-state appropriation and up to
$250,000 of the central Puget Sound public transportation account‑-state
appropriation are provided to fund activities relating to coordinating special
needs transportation among state and local providers. These activities may
include demonstration projects, assessments of resources available versus
needs, and identification of barriers to coordinating special needs
transportation. The department will consult with the superintendent of public
instruction, the secretary of the department of social and health services,
the office of financial management, the fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and senate, special needs consumers, and specialized
transportation providers in meeting the goals of this subsection.

(6)
The appropriations in this section contain $4,599,000 reappropriated from the
1995-97 biennium.

(7)
The high capacity transportation account--state appropriation includes $75,000
for the department to develop a strategy and to identify how the agency would
expend additional moneys to enhance the commute trip reduction program. The
report would include recommendations for grant programs for employers and
jurisdictions to reduce SOV usage and to provide transit incentives to meet
future commute trip reduction requirements. The report is due to the
legislative transportation committee by January 1, 1998.

(8)
In addition to the appropriations contained in this section, the office of
financial management shall release the $2,000,000 transportation fund--state
funds appropriated for the intercity rail passenger program in the 1995-97
biennium but held in reserve pursuant to section 502, chapter 165, Laws of
1996.

(9)
Up to $150,000 of the transportation fund--state appropriation is provided for
the management and control of the transportation corridor known as the
Milwaukee Road corridor owned by the state between Ellensburg and Lind, and to
take actions necessary to allow the department to be in a position, with
further legislative authorization, to begin to negotiate a franchise with a
rail carrier to establish and maintain a rail line over portions of the
corridor by July 1, 1999.

(((11)))
(10) $4,000,000 of the high capacity transportation account‑-state
appropriation for passenger rail infrastructure improvement is provided solely
for rail improvements to add rail passenger service north of Seattle. These
funds are conditioned on match of at least equal amounts from both Burlington
Northern Sante Fe and Amtrak for rail line improvements and upon Amtrak
purchasing an additional train set for operation in the corridor. These funds
shall not be expended until authorized by the legislative transportation
committee and the office of financial management; and the participation of
international partners in service provided in the corridor shall be considered
in such a decision.

Sec.
218. 1998
c 348 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State............. Appropriation $ ((9,802,000))

9,862,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Federal Appropriation...... $ 33,726,000

High
Capacity Transportation Account--

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((650,000))

450,000

Transportation
Account--State Appropriation.... $ 1,175,000

Highway
Infrastructure Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 234,000

Highway
Infrastructure Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((45,353,000))

46,947,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation includes $1,785,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.819(1). The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation.

(2)
As a condition of receiving the full state subsidy in support of the Puget
Island ferry, Wahkiakum county must, by December 31, 1997, increase ferry fares
for passengers and vehicles by at least ten percent. If the fares are not
increased to meet this requirement, the department, in determining the state
subsidy after December 31, 1997, shall reduce the operating deficit by the
amount that would have been generated if the ten percent fare increase had been
implemented.

(3)
The appropriations in this section contain $1,750,000 reappropriated from the
1995-97 biennium.

(4)
Up to $500,000 of the high capacity transportation account--state appropriation
is provided for implementation of the recommendations of the freight mobility
advisory committee, and any legislation enacted resulting from those
recommendations.

(5)
$175,000 of the transportation fund--state appropriation is provided solely to
fund the freight mobility strategic investment board. If Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2180 is not enacted by June 30, 1998, this amount shall lapse.

(6)
The transportation account‑-state appropriation includes $600,000 to
establish alternatives for flood management and flood hazard reduction projects
in the Chehalis Basin. A technical committee comprised of the department of
transportation, department of ecology, the United States army corps of
engineers, federal emergency management administration, United States
geological survey, affected counties and tribes, and other entities with
critical knowledge related to flood hazard reduction projects in the Chehalis
Basin shall be formed. Funds shall be distributed to counties within the
Chehalis Basin by the department of transportation for projects that further
understanding of the causes of flooding and options for flood hazard
reduction. Alternatives shall be consistent with fish and habitat recovery
efforts. Projects funded shall be coordinated with the technical committee.
The department of transportation shall present a report to the legislative
transportation committee and other appropriate legislative committees regarding
findings and/or progress made by funded projects by December 1, 1998.

(((8)))
(7) $750,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for a median barrier upon the Spokane street viaduct. Use of
this funding is contingent upon a commitment of funding from other partners for
the remainder of the project cost.

(((9)))
(8) Up to $150,000 of the high capacity transportation account‑-state
appropriation is provided for the installation of active railroad crossing
warning devices at the Sunnyside beach park entrance in Steilacoom.

(((10))) (9) $400,000 of the transportation fund‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for a study by the legislative transportation
committee, in cooperation with the port of Benton, developing a strategic
corridor feasibility and master site plan for the port of Benton. If the port
of Benton does not provide at least $200,000 to fund the plan development, the
transportation fund‑-state appropriation referenced in this subsection
shall lapse and this subsection shall be null and void.

(End of part)

Part
III

TRANSPORTATION
AGENCIES CAPITAL FACILITIES

Sec.
301. 1997
c 457 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)‑-CAPITAL

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Transportation Capital

Facilities
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((21,696,000))

21,261,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The department of transportation shall provide to the legislative transportation
committee prior notice and the latest project information at least two weeks in
advance of the bid process for transportation capital facilities projects going
to bid in the 1997-99 biennium.

(2)
Construction of the Mount Rainier storage facility shall not commence until the
department has secured an operational lease that would allow the placement of
the facility on United States forest service lands near the entrance to the
Mather memorial parkway.

(3) The appropriation in this section contains $7,719,000
reappropriated from the 1995-97 biennium.

(End of part)

PART
IV

TRANSFERS
AND DISTRIBUTIONS

Sec.
401. 1998
c 348 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Capital

Construction
Account Appropriation......... $ 500,000

Motor Vehicle
Fund Appropriation............... $ 130,000

Transportation
Improvement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 200,000

Special
Category C Account Appropriation........ $ 190,000

Transportation
Capital Facilities Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,000

Urban
Arterial Account Appropriation........... $ 5,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION............. $ ((1,995,000))

1,026,000

Sec.
402. 1998
c 348 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

(1)
R V Account‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Motor Vehicle Fund‑-State... $........................................... 1,176,000

(2)
Motor Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Transportation Capital

Facilities
Account‑-State.................. $ 42,569,000

(3)
Small City Account‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Transportation Improvement

Account‑-State............................. $ 7,500,000

(4)
Motor Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Highway Infrastructure

Account‑-State............................. $ 234,000

(End of part)

PART
V

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 501. A
new section is added to 1997 c 457 (uncodified) to read as follows:

INFORMATION
SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies shall comply with
the following requirements regarding information systems projects when
specifically directed to do so by this act.

(1)
Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology shall be made
in the context of its information technology portfolio. "Information
technology portfolio" means a strategic management approach in which the
relationships between agency missions and information technology investments
can be seen and understood, such that: Technology efforts are linked to agency
objectives and business plans; the impact of new investments on existing
infrastructure and business functions are assessed and understood before
implementation; and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative state-wide infrastructure.

(2)
Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in making decisions
on matters related to the following:

(a)
System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;

(b)
Setting goals and objectives for using information technology in meeting
legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;

(c)
Assessment of overall information processing performance, resources, and
capabilities;

(d)
Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for the operation of
any new systems developed using external resources; and

(e)
Progress toward enabling electronic access to public information.

(3)
The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information technology
projects at the direction of the information services board and in accordance
with published department of information services policies and guidelines. At
a minimum, such studies shall include a statement of: (a) The purpose or
impetus for change; (b) the business value to the agency, including an
examination and evaluation of benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a
comprehensive risk assessment based on the proposed project's impact on both
citizens and state operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing
nothing; (d) the impact on agency and state-wide information infrastructure;
and (e) the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.

(4)
The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for each project. The
plan or plans shall address all factors critical to successful completion of
each project. The plan(s) shall include, but is not limited to, the following
elements: A description of the problem or opportunity that the information
technology project is intended to address; a statement of project objectives
and assumptions; a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to
be accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for the
phased approach shall be such that the business case justification for a
project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or adds measurable
value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business functions within each
development cycle.

(5)
The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for information technology
projects. Consistent with the direction of the information services board and
the published policies and guidelines of the department of information
services, the quality assurance plan shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of the project and successful integration with the agency
and state information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality
assurance plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The quality
assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements for each phase of
a project.

(6)
A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan shall be provided to the department of information services, the
office of financial management, and legislative fiscal committees. The plans
and studies shall demonstrate a sound business case that justifies the
investment of taxpayer funds on any new project, an assessment of the impact of
the proposed system on the existing information technology infrastructure, the
disciplined use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging
of private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval of the
relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality assurance plan
by the department of information services and the office of financial
management.

(7)
Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and legislative
fiscal committees at intervals specified in the project's quality assurance
plan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 502. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1)
1997 c 457 s 502; and

(2)
1997 c 457 s 515.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 503. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING

DRIVER SERVICES................................................ 10

VEHICLE SERVICES................................................ 8

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

CHARGES FROM OTHER
AGENCIES--PROGRAM U......................... 19

HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE--PROGRAM
M................................. 14

HIGHWAY MANAGEMENT AND
FACILITIES--PROGRAM D--OPERATING........ 10

IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I........................................ 11

LOCAL PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z...................................... 27

MARINE--PROGRAM X.............................................. 22

PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P........................................ 15

PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)......... 30

PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION AND
RAIL--PROGRAM Y...................... 24

TRAFFIC OPERATIONS--PROGRAM Q.................................. 16

TRANSPORTATION ECONOMIC
PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K................ 14

TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT--PROGRAM S............... 17

TRANSPORTATION PLANNING,
DATA, AND RESEARCH--PROGRAM T......... 19

WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM W............... 20

INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS................................... 32

STATE TREASURER

BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST................................... 31

TRANSFERS...................................................... 31

TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT
BOARD................................ 3

WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION

CAPITAL PROJECTS................................................ 1

WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU......................................... 3

SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU......................................... 6

--- END ---