BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall provide in any contract with an agency liquor vendor for the
operation of an agency store that the contract is assignable or transferable to
the agency liquor vendor's spouse or adult child upon the death, or disability
due to physical or mental infirmity, of the agency liquor vendor if the
following conditions are met:

(a)
The spouse or adult child agrees to all terms of the contract and meets minimum
qualifications as stated in board rule.

(b)
The spouse or adult child has not been convicted of a felony or a violation of
Washington state liquor laws, and is not in violation of any other cause for termination
as stated in the contract.

(c)
With regard to an adult child of an agency liquor vendor, the adult child must
show that the agency store has been a source of income for the adult child
within the preceding twelve months.

(2) Upon assignment or transfer of the contract to the spouse or
adult child, the spouse or adult child has the same right to automatic renewal
of the contract upon expiration as granted to the agency liquor vendor in the
contract.

---
END ---