BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW to read as follows:

Upon petition by a member of the legislature, any instance where a
state agency has a legislatively mandated requirement to report to the
legislature or legislative committees regarding a specific matter by a date
certain is subject to selective review by the joint administrative rules review
committee. If the committee finds by a majority vote of its membership that
the agency either failed to report to the legislature by the specified time or
failed to provide a report that was sufficiently responsive to the legislation
requiring the report, the committee may request of the governor and the head of
the reporting agency, to give a written response within five working days of
the date of the request, as to the reasons why the requirement has not been met
and the date certain by which the requirement will be met.

---
END ---