BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
Washington state institute for public policy shall conduct a study of the
formal and informal administrative procedures used by the department of health
in its most recent approval of the closure and reclamation of an 11e(2)
low-level uranium mill site located in a county, east of the crest of the
Cascade mountains, with a population of less than forty thousand. The goals of
the study are to recommend improvements to the agency's procedures and ensure
that, when the state or federal government reviews the closure and reclamation
of any uranium mines, public funds are not placed at risk due to inadequate
licensing and bonding procedures.

The
study shall include: A review of applicable federal and state laws and agency
rules, policies, and procedures related to the closure and reclamation of
uranium mill and mine sites; the process for establishing the amount of the
closure and reclamation bonds for such sites; an examination of the relevant
public notification and review process; and recommendations for improving the
procedures and protecting public funds when the state or federal government
reviews future closure and reclamation plans for uranium mill and mine sites.

The study shall be completed and delivered to the governor and the legislature
by September 1, 2000.

---
END ---