BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that the control of cougar populations is necessary to insure
public safety, and the most suitable means for cougar population control is by
authorizing public hunting with dogs.

Sec.
2. RCW
77.16.360 and 1997 c 1 s 1 (Initiative Measure No. 655) are each amended to
read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 77.12.240 and ((77.12.265)) 77.36.030
or other provisions of law, it is unlawful to take, hunt, or attract black bear
with the aid of bait.

(a)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the killing of black
bear with the aid of bait by employees or agents of county, state, or federal
agencies while acting in their official capacities for the purpose of
protecting livestock, domestic animals, private property, or the public safety.

(b)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent the establishment and
operation of feeding stations for black bear in order to prevent damage to
commercial timberland.

(c)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the director from
issuing a permit or memorandum of understanding to a public agency, university,
or scientific or educational institution for the use of bait to attract black
bear for scientific purposes.

(d)
As used in this subsection, "bait" means a substance placed, exposed,
deposited, distributed, scattered, or otherwise used for the purpose of
attracting black bears to an area where one or more persons hunt or intend to
hunt them.

(2)
Notwithstanding RCW 77.12.240 or any other provisions of law, it is unlawful to
hunt or pursue black bear, ((cougar,)) bobcat, or lynx with the aid of a
dog or dogs.

(a)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the killing of black
bear, cougar, bobcat, or lynx with the aid of a dog or dogs by employees or
agents of county, state, or federal agencies while acting in their official
capacities for the purpose of protecting livestock, domestic animals, private
property, or the public safety. A dog or dogs may be used by the owner or
tenant of real property consistent with ((a permit issued and conditioned by
the director under RCW 77.12.265)) RCW 77.36.030.

(b)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the director from
issuing a permit or memorandum of understanding to a public agency, university,
or scientific or educational institution for the use of a dog or dogs for the
pursuit of black bear, cougar, bobcat, or lynx for scientific purposes.

(3)
A person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor. In addition to appropriate criminal penalties, the director
shall revoke the hunting license of a person who violates subsection (1) or (2)
of this section and a hunting license shall not be issued for a period of five
years following the revocation. Following a subsequent violation of subsection
(1) or (2) of this section by the same person, a hunting license shall not be
issued to the person at any time.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The fish and wildlife commission shall authorize public
recreational hunting with dogs for cougar population control and to control
cougar migration for prevention of the movement of cougar into areas of the
state with high-human population density whenever the hunting season is
declared open for cougar.

---
END ---