BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that low-income parents who are attempting to enhance their
work skills through education, while at the same time complying with the work
activity requirements of chapter 74.08A RCW, should be encouraged to pursue
their academic goals. The legislature further finds that persons who are going
to school at the same time as they are engaging in work activities need
assistance in overcoming barriers to further education, one of which is access
to affordable child care.

It
is the intent of the legislature to support these low-income working parents by
providing them with child care benefits while they are enrolled in a state
technical or community college.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Persons who are meeting the work activity requirements stipulated in P.L.
104-193 and this chapter are eligible to receive child care benefits while they
are enrolled in a state community or technical college and meeting the
requirements towards completing their program or degree.

(2)
The department may, to the extent funds are available, provide payments under
subsection (1) of this section beginning not later than July 1, 1999.

(3) The department may adopt rules to determine eligibility for
child care benefits under subsection (1) of this section.

---
END ---