BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.94A.390 and 1997 c 52 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the sentencing court finds that an exceptional sentence outside the standard
range should be imposed in accordance with RCW 9.94A.120(2), the sentence is
subject to review only as provided for in RCW 9.94A.210(4).

The
following are illustrative factors which the court may consider in the exercise
of its discretion to impose an exceptional sentence. The following are
illustrative only and are not intended to be exclusive reasons for exceptional
sentences.

(1)
Mitigating Circumstances

(a)
To a significant degree, the victim was an initiator, willing participant,
aggressor, or provoker of the incident.

(b)
Before detection, the defendant compensated, or made a good faith effort to
compensate, the victim of the criminal conduct for any damage or injury
sustained.

(c)
The defendant committed the crime under duress, coercion, threat, or compulsion
insufficient to constitute a complete defense but which significantly affected
his or her conduct.

(d)
The defendant, with no apparent predisposition to do so, was induced by others
to participate in the crime.

(e)
The defendant's capacity to appreciate the wrongfulness of his or her conduct
or to conform his or her conduct to the requirements of the law, was
significantly impaired (voluntary use of drugs or alcohol is excluded).

(f)
The offense was principally accomplished by another person and the defendant
manifested extreme caution or sincere concern for the safety or well-being of
the victim.

(g)
The operation of the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.400 results in a
presumptive sentence that is clearly excessive in light of the purpose of this
chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

(h)
The defendant or the defendant's children suffered a continuing pattern of
physical or sexual abuse by the victim of the offense and the offense is a
response to that abuse.

(2)
Aggravating Circumstances

(a)
The defendant's conduct during the commission of the current offense manifested
deliberate cruelty to the victim.

(b)
The defendant knew or should have known that the victim of the current offense
was particularly vulnerable or incapable of resistance due to extreme youth,
advanced age, disability, or ill health.

(c)
The current offense was a violent offense, and the defendant knew that the
victim of the current offense was pregnant.

(d)
The current offense was a major economic offense or series of offenses, so
identified by a consideration of any of the following factors:

(i)
The current offense involved multiple victims or multiple incidents per victim;

(ii)
The current offense involved attempted or actual monetary loss substantially
greater than typical for the offense;

(iii)
The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication or planning or
occurred over a lengthy period of time; or

(iv)
The defendant used his or her position of trust, confidence, or fiduciary
responsibility to facilitate the commission of the current offense.

(e)
The current offense was a major violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances
Act, chapter 69.50 RCW (VUCSA), related to trafficking in controlled
substances, which was more onerous than the typical offense of its statutory
definition: The presence of ANY of the following may identify a current
offense as a major VUCSA:

(i)
The current offense involved at least three separate transactions in which
controlled substances were sold, transferred, or possessed with intent to do
so;

(ii)
The current offense involved an attempted or actual sale or transfer of
controlled substances in quantities substantially larger than for personal use;

(iii)
The current offense involved the manufacture of controlled substances for use
by other parties;

(iv)
The circumstances of the current offense reveal the offender to have occupied a
high position in the drug distribution hierarchy;

(v)
The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication or planning or
occurred over a lengthy period of time or involved a broad geographic area of
disbursement; or

(vi)
The offender used his or her position or status to facilitate the commission of
the current offense, including positions of trust, confidence or fiduciary
responsibility (e.g., pharmacist, physician, or other medical professional).

(f)
The current offense included a finding of sexual motivation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.127.

(g)
The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of sexual abuse of the same victim
under the age of eighteen years manifested by multiple incidents over a
prolonged period of time.

(h)
The current offense involved domestic violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020 and
one or more of the following was present:

(i)
The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of psychological, physical, or
sexual abuse of the victim manifested by multiple incidents over a prolonged
period of time;

(ii)
The offense occurred within sight or sound of the victim's or the offender's
minor children under the age of eighteen years; or

(iii)
The offender's conduct during the commission of the current offense manifested
deliberate cruelty or intimidation of the victim.

(i)
The operation of the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.400 results in a
presumptive sentence that is clearly too lenient in light of the purpose of
this chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

(j)
The defendant's prior unscored misdemeanor or prior unscored foreign criminal
history results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly too lenient in light
of the purpose of this chapter as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

(k)
The offense resulted in the pregnancy of a child victim of rape.

(l)
The current offense involved delivery of a controlled substance to a woman when
the deliverer knew that the woman was pregnant.

Sec.
2. RCW
13.40.150 and 1998 c 86 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In disposition hearings all relevant and material evidence, including oral and
written reports, may be received by the court and may be relied upon to the
extent of its probative value, even though such evidence may not be admissible
in a hearing on the information. The youth or the youth's counsel and the
prosecuting attorney shall be afforded an opportunity to examine and controvert
written reports so received and to cross-examine individuals making reports
when such individuals are reasonably available, but sources of confidential
information need not be disclosed. The prosecutor and counsel for the juvenile
may submit recommendations for disposition.

(2)
For purposes of disposition:

(a)
Violations which are current offenses count as misdemeanors;

(b)
Violations may not count as part of the offender's criminal history;

(c)
In no event may a disposition for a violation include confinement.

(3)
Before entering a dispositional order as to a respondent found to have
committed an offense, the court shall hold a disposition hearing, at which the
court shall:

(a)
Consider the facts supporting the allegations of criminal conduct by the
respondent;

(b)
Consider information and arguments offered by parties and their counsel;

(c)
Consider any predisposition reports;

(d)
Consult with the respondent's parent, guardian, or custodian on the
appropriateness of dispositional options under consideration and afford the
respondent and the respondent's parent, guardian, or custodian an opportunity
to speak in the respondent's behalf;

(e)
Allow the victim or a representative of the victim and an investigative law
enforcement officer to speak;

(f)
Determine the amount of restitution owing to the victim, if any, or set a
hearing for a later date not to exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of
the disposition hearing to determine the amount, except that the court may
continue the hearing beyond the one hundred eighty days for good cause;

(g)
Determine the respondent's offender score;

(h)
Consider whether or not any of the following mitigating factors exist:

(i)
The respondent's conduct neither caused nor threatened serious bodily injury or
the respondent did not contemplate that his or her conduct would cause or
threaten serious bodily injury;

(ii)
The respondent acted under strong and immediate provocation;

(iii)
The respondent was suffering from a mental or physical condition that
significantly reduced his or her culpability for the offense though failing to
establish a defense;

(iv)
Prior to his or her detection, the respondent compensated or made a good faith
attempt to compensate the victim for the injury or loss sustained; and

(v)
There has been at least one year between the respondent's current offense and
any prior criminal offense;

(i)
Consider whether or not any of the following aggravating factors exist:

(i)
In the commission of the offense, or in flight therefrom, the respondent
inflicted or attempted to inflict serious bodily injury to another;

(ii)
The offense was committed in an especially heinous, cruel, or depraved manner;

(iii)
The victim or victims were particularly vulnerable;

(iv)
The respondent has a recent criminal history or has failed to comply with
conditions of a recent dispositional order or diversion agreement;

(v)
The current offense included a finding of sexual motivation pursuant to RCW
13.40.135;

(vi)
The respondent was the leader of a criminal enterprise involving several
persons;

(vii)
There are other complaints which have resulted in diversion or a finding or
plea of guilty but which are not included as criminal history; ((and))

(viii)
The current offense involved delivery of a controlled substance to a woman
when the deliverer knew that the woman was pregnant; and

(ix)
The standard range disposition is clearly too lenient considering the
seriousness of the juvenile's prior adjudications.

(4)
The following factors may not be considered in determining the punishment to be
imposed:

(a)
The sex of the respondent;

(b)
The race or color of the respondent or the respondent's family;

(c)
The creed or religion of the respondent or the respondent's family;

(d)
The economic or social class of the respondent or the respondent's family; and

(e)
Factors indicating that the respondent may be or is a dependent child within
the meaning of this chapter.

(5)
A court may not commit a juvenile to a state institution solely because of the
lack of facilities, including treatment facilities, existing in the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---