BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.121.030 and 1979 ex.s. c 110 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington state department of health or any other state agency may not issue
any permits or grant permission to transport mill tailings classified as 11e(2)
waste under the federal atomic energy act of 1954 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 2011 et
seq.).

(1)
Any person who proposes to operate a uranium or thorium mill within the state
of Washington after January 1, 1980, shall obtain a license from the department
to mill thorium and uranium. The period of the license shall be determined by
the secretary and shall be initially valid for not more than two years and
renewable thereafter for periods of not more than five years. No license may
be granted unless:

(a)
The owner or operator of the mill submits to the department a plan for
reclamation and disposal of tailings and for decommissioning the site that
conforms to the criteria and standards then in effect for the protection of the
public safety and health; and

(b)
The owner of the mill agrees to transfer or revert to the appropriate state or
federal agency upon termination of the license all lands, buildings, and
grounds, and any interests therein, necessary to fulfill the purposes of this
chapter except where the lands are held in trust for or are owned by any Indian
tribe.

(2)
Any person operating a uranium or thorium mill on January 1, 1980, shall, at
the time of application for renewal of his license to mill thorium or uranium,
comply with the following conditions for continued operation of the mill:

(a)
The owner or operator of the mill shall submit to the department a plan for
reclamation and disposal of tailings and for decommissioning the site that
conforms to the criteria and standards then in effect for the protection of the
public safety and health; and

(b)
The owner of the mill shall agree to transfer or revert to the appropriate
state or federal agency upon termination of the license all lands, buildings,
and grounds, and any interests therein, necessary to fulfill the purposes of
this chapter except where the lands are held in trust for or are owned by any
Indian tribe.

(3)
The department shall, after public notice and opportunity for written comment,
hold a public hearing to consider the adequacy of the proposed plan to protect
the safety and health of the public required by subsections (1) and (2) of this
section. The proceedings shall be recorded and transcribed. The public
hearing shall provide the opportunity for cross-examination by both the
department and the person proposing the plan required under this section. The
department shall make a written determination as to the licensing of the mill
which is based upon the findings included in the determination and upon the
evidence presented during the public comment period. The determination is
subject to judicial review. If a declaration of nonsignificance is issued for
a license renewal application under rules adopted under chapter 43.21C RCW, the
public hearing is not required.

(4)
The department shall set a schedule of license and amendment fees predicated on
the cost of reviewing the license application and of monitoring for compliance
with the conditions of the license. A permit for construction of a uranium or
thorium mill may be granted by the secretary prior to licensing.

(5)
The department shall not approve a license or the renewal of a license for a
uranium or thorium mine, mill, or tailings facility, if the license is based on
a reclamation, closure, or decommissioning that involves the receipt, storage,
permanent impoundment, or disposal of mill tailings classified as 11e(2) waste
under the federal atomic energy act of 1954 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 2011 et seq.),
except where the radioactive materials proposed for receipt, storage, permanent
impoundment, or disposal, is produced at a mine associated with, and under the
same operator or ownership as, the licensed site or proposed licensed site.

---
END ---