BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
79.01.096 and 1982 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Not
more than one hundred and sixty acres of any land granted to the state by the
United States shall be offered for sale in one parcel and no university lands
shall be offered for sale except by legislative directive or with the consent
of the board of regents of the University of Washington.

Beginning
January 1, 1998, not more than six thousand four hundred acres of any land granted
to the state by the United States may be offered for sale, transfer, trade, or
exchange in one parcel except by explicit legislative directive.

Any
land granted to the state by the United States may be sold or leased for any
lawful purpose in such minimum acreage as may be fixed by the department of
natural resources.

Except
as otherwise provided in RCW 79.01.770, upon the application of a school
district or any institution of higher education for the purchase or lease of
lands granted to the state by the United States, the department of natural
resources may offer such land for sale or lease to such school district or
institution of higher education in such acreage as it may determine,
consideration being given upon application of a school district to school site
criteria established by the state board of education: PROVIDED, That in the
event the department thereafter proposes to offer such land for sale or lease
at public auction such school district or institution of higher education shall
have a preference right for six months from notice of such proposal to purchase
or lease such land at the appraised value determined by the board of natural
resources.

State lands shall not be leased for a longer period than ten
years: PROVIDED, That such lands may be leased for the purpose of prospecting
for, developing and producing oil, gas and other hydrocarbon substances or for
the mining of coal subject to the provisions of chapter 79.14 RCW and RCW
79.01.692. Such lands may be leased for agricultural purposes for any period
not to exceed twenty-five years except that such leases which authorize tree
fruit and grape production may be for any period up to fifty-five years. Such
lands may be leased for public school, college or university purposes for any
period not exceeding seventy-five years. Such lands may be leased for
commercial, industrial, business, or recreational purposes for any period not
exceeding fifty-five years. Such lands may be leased for residential purposes
for any period not to exceed ninety-nine years. If during the term of the
lease of any state lands for agricultural, grazing, commercial, residential,
business, or recreational purposes, in the opinion of the department it is in
the best interest of the state so to do, the department may, on the application
of the lessee and in agreement with the lessee, alter and amend the terms and
conditions of such lease. The sum total of the original lease term and any
extension thereof shall not exceed the limits provided herein.

---
END ---