BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
4.24.200 and 1969 ex.s. c 24 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
purpose of RCW 4.24.200 and 4.24.210 is to encourage owners or others in lawful
possession and control of land and water areas or channels to make them
available to the public for recreational purposes by limiting their liability,
and the liability of private owners of land adjacent to public trails,
toward persons entering thereon and toward persons who may be injured or
otherwise damaged by the acts or omissions of persons entering thereon.

Sec.
2. RCW
4.24.210 and 1997 c 26 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, any public or
private landowners or others in lawful possession and control of any lands
whether designated resource, rural, or urban, or water areas or channels and
lands adjacent to such areas or channels, who allow members of the public to
use them for the purposes of outdoor recreation, which term includes, but is not
limited to, the cutting, gathering, and removing of firewood by private persons
for their personal use without purchasing the firewood from the landowner,
hunting, fishing, camping, picnicking, swimming, hiking, bicycling,
skateboarding or other nonmotorized wheel-based activities, hanggliding,
paragliding, the riding of horses or other animals, clam digging, pleasure
driving of off-road vehicles, snowmobiles, and other vehicles, boating, nature
study, winter or water sports, viewing or enjoying historical, archaeological,
scenic, or scientific sites, without charging a fee of any kind therefor, shall
not be liable for unintentional injuries to such users. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (3) of this section, private owners of land adjacent to public
trails shall not be liable for unintentional injuries to users of such public
trails.

(2)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, any public or
private landowner or others in lawful possession and control of any lands
whether rural or urban, or water areas or channels and lands adjacent to such
areas or channels, who offer or allow such land to be used for purposes of a
fish or wildlife cooperative project, or allow access to such land for cleanup
of litter or other solid waste, shall not be liable for unintentional injuries
to any volunteer group or to any other users.

(3)
Any public or private landowner, or others in lawful possession and control of
the land, may charge an administrative fee of up to twenty-five dollars for the
cutting, gathering, and removing of firewood from the land. Nothing in this
section shall prevent the liability of such a landowner or others in lawful
possession and control for injuries sustained to users by reason of a known
dangerous artificial latent condition for which warning signs have not been
conspicuously posted. Nothing in RCW 4.24.200 and 4.24.210 limits or expands
in any way the doctrine of attractive nuisance. Usage by members of the
public, volunteer groups, or other users is permissive and does not support any
claim of adverse possession.

(4) For purposes of this section, a license or permit issued for
state-wide use under authority of chapter 43.51 RCW, Title 75, or Title 77 RCW
is not a fee.

---
END ---