BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the continued survival of marine bottomfish species in
Puget Sound and adjacent waters requires that preserves be established for
their protection within different geographical and ecological zones and that
fishing and harvesting of marine bottomfish and other fish be prohibited within
the preserves.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 75.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The fish and wildlife commission shall establish marine bottomfish preserves
that encompass at least twenty percent of the rocky reef habitat throughout
Puget Sound, the Straits of Juan de Fuca, Admiralty Inlet, the San Juan
Islands, and the Straits of Georgia. The purpose of establishing marine
bottomfish preserves is to protect marine bottomfish species from overfishing,
and to allow a safe haven for spawning, growth, and maturation of marine
bottomfish, and to establish focal points where recolonization of marine
bottomfish may occur into ecosystems that are currently depleted of marine
bottomfish.

The
commission shall select preserve locations that are rich in habitat features
that are required by depleted marine bottomfish species or are needed by
bottomfish species that need to be enhanced. In establishing marine bottomfish
preserves the commission shall identify areas that are appropriate for
protection of lingcod, rockfish species, cabezon, greenling, and other species
of bottomfish.

The
commission may allow recreational diving in selected marine bottomfish
preserves, provided that spearfishing and collecting of marine bottomfish and
other fish shall not be allowed in any marine bottomfish preserve, and that the
recreational diving activities will not decrease or diminish achieving the
primary purpose of protection of marine bottomfish.

The
commission shall not authorize any recreational or commercial fishing or
harvesting of marine bottomfish and other fish within marine bottomfish
preserves and may close the preserves to the harvest of other marine organisms.

The
commission shall conduct public hearings within the affected area of proposed
marine bottomfish preserves and seek public input before establishing marine
bottomfish preserves.

The
commission shall closely involve treaty Indian tribes in the process of
selecting and approving marine bottomfish preserves. Prior to establishment of
marine bottomfish preserves the commission shall obtain agreement from the
treaty Indian tribes who are affected by proposed marine bottomfish preserves
that they will not harvest bottomfish from the preserves.

(2) The commission shall report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by January 1, 2000, and every other year subsequently, on the
progress and needs of the marine bottomfish preserve program.

---
END ---