BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall hold a public hearing before issuing certification under
the authority of section 401 of the federal water pollution control act
amendments of 1972, 22 U.S.C. Sec. 1341, if requested by a petition with twenty
or more signatures.

(2) A certification by the department provided under the authority
of section 401 of the federal water pollution control act amendments of 1972,
22 U.S.C. Sec. 1341, shall be revoked by the department in the event that the
licensing or permitting federal agency denies the license or permit. Such
revocation may be subject to reinstatement by the department in the event that
the license or permit is later issued by the federal agency or the application
proceedings are remanded to the federal agency following appeal. However, if
in the intervening period the proposed activity has been modified or new water
quality information has been identified, the department shall not issue the
certification unless compliance with all applicable state water quality
requirements in light of the additional information or changes in the proposed
activity has been demonstrated.

---
END ---