BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A new
section is added to chapter 70.95K RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Each facility in the state that deactivates biomedical waste under a solid
waste permit shall develop a hazard analysis and critical control points plan.
The scope of the plan shall cover the worker health and safety and health risks
to the community surrounding the plant. The plan shall be a systematic
approach to the identification, evaluation, and control of safety hazards and
include:

(a)
Conducting a hazard analysis;

(b)
Determining the critical control points;

(c)
Establishing critical limits;

(d)
Establishing monitoring procedures;

(e)
Establishing corrective actions;

(f)
Establishing verification procedures; and

(g)
Establishing recordkeeping and documentation procedures.

(2)
The plan shall identify the corrective action that will be taken when there is
a deviation from the critical limits for each identified step contained in the
plan.

(3)
The plan shall be submitted to the local health jurisdiction. The local health
jurisdiction shall consult with the state department of health, the department
of ecology, and the department of labor and industries. The review shall be
completed within one hundred twenty days of submission and shall include
recommendations for changes with an explanation of the reasons for the
recommended change.

(4)
Local health jurisdictions shall monitor the operation of the facilities to
assure the plants are operated in accordance with the plan.

(5) If
public health or worker safety issues develop with regard to the operation of
the facility, including a significant change in the source of waste, a change
in the critical control points or the emergence of a disease of concern, any of
the public agencies enumerated in subsection (3) of this section or the plant
operator may propose revision of the plan. The involved public agencies shall
review the proposed revisions and may recommend additional corrective actions
and changes to critical limits or other elements of the plan to provide
improved protection to public health or worker safety.

(6)
Local health jurisdictions, with assistance from the department of health,
shall establish verification procedures as a condition of the permit or when an
incident occurs that threatens the public or reviewed worker health.

(7)
Initial plans shall be prepared within two years of the effective date of this
section. The plant operator shall review and update the hazard analysis and
critical control points plan every two years. Such revisions shall be
conducted in accordance with the procedure established in subsection (3) of
this section.

(8) A
plant established after the effective date of this section shall develop a
hazard analysis and critical control points plan before commencing operation.
Such plan shall be submitted in accordance with the procedure established in subsection
(3) of this section.

(9)
This section does not affect nor replace other authorities or responsibilities
of state or local agencies under other laws.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.95K.010 and 1994 c 165 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Biomedical waste" means, and is limited to, the following types of
waste:

(a)
"Animal waste" is waste animal carcasses, body parts, and bedding of
animals that are known to be infected with, or that have been inoculated with,
human pathogenic microorganisms infectious to humans.

(b)
"Biosafety level 4 disease waste" is waste contaminated with blood,
excretions, exudates, or secretions from humans or animals who are isolated to
protect others from highly communicable infectious diseases that are identified
as pathogenic organisms assigned to biosafety level 4 by the centers for
disease control, national institute of health, biosafety in microbiological and
biomedical laboratories, current edition.

(c)
"Cultures and stocks" are wastes infectious to humans and includes
specimen cultures, cultures and stocks of etiologic agents, wastes from
production of biologicals and serums, discarded live and attenuated vaccines,
and laboratory waste that has come into contact with cultures and stocks of
etiologic agents or blood specimens. Such waste includes but is not limited to
culture dishes, blood specimen tubes, and devices used to transfer, inoculate,
and mix cultures.

(d)
"Human blood and blood products" is discarded waste human blood and
blood components, and materials containing free-flowing blood and blood
products.

(e)
"Pathological waste" is waste human source biopsy materials, tissues,
and anatomical parts that emanate from surgery, obstetrical procedures, and
autopsy. "Pathological waste" does not include teeth, human corpses,
remains, and anatomical parts that are intended for interment or cremation.

(f)
"Sharps waste" is all hypodermic needles, syringes with needles
attached, IV tubing with needles attached, scalpel blades, and lancets that
have been removed from the original sterile package.

(2)
"Local government" means city, town, or county.

(3)
"Local health department" means the city, county, city-county, or
district public health department.

(4)
"Person" means an individual, firm, corporation, association,
partnership, consortium, joint venture, commercial entity, state government
agency, or local government.

(5)
"Treatment" means incineration, sterilization, or other method,
technique, or process that changes the character or composition of a biomedical
waste so as to minimize the risk of transmitting an infectious disease.

(6)
"Residential sharps waste" has the same meaning as "sharps
waste" in subsection (1) of this section except that the sharps waste is
generated and prepared for disposal at a residence, apartment, dwelling, or
other noncommercial habitat.

(7)
"Sharps waste container" means a leak-proof, rigid,
puncture-resistant red container that is taped closed or tightly lidded to
prevent the loss of the residential sharps waste.

(8)
"Mail programs" means those programs that provide sharps users with a
multiple barrier protection kit for the placement of a sharps container and
subsequent mailing of the wastes to an approved disposal facility.

(9)
"Pharmacy return programs" means those programs where sharps
containers are returned by the user to designated return sites located at a
pharmacy to be transported by a biomedical or solid waste collection company
approved by the utilities and transportation commission.

(10)
"Drop-off programs" means those program sites designated by the solid
waste planning jurisdiction where sharps users may dispose of their sharps
containers.

(11)
"Source separation" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.95.030.

(12)
"Unprotected sharps" means residential sharps waste that are not
disposed of in a sharps waste container.

(13)
"Plan," which is a hazard analysis and critical control points plan,
means a systematic approach to the identification, evaluation, and control of
safety and health and safety hazards when associated with biomedical waste
deactivation at facilities under a solid waste permit.

(14)
"Hazard analysis" means the process of collecting and evaluating
information on hazards associated with biomedical waste deactivation at
facilities under a solid waste permit to decide which hazards are significant
and must be addressed in the plan.

(15)
"Critical control point" means a step at which control can be applied
and is essential to prevent or eliminate a safety or health hazard associated
with biomedical waste deactivation at facilities under a solid waste permit, or
to reduce it to an acceptable level.

(16)
"Control point" means any step at which biological, chemical, or
physical factors can be controlled.

(17)
"Corrective action" means procedures followed when a deviation occurs
when associated with biomedical waste deactivation at facilities under a solid
waste permit.

(18)
"Critical limit" means a maximum or minimum value to which a biological,
chemical, or physical parameter must be controlled at a critical control point
to prevent, eliminate, or reduce to an acceptable level the occurrence of a
safety or health hazard associated with biomedical waste deactivation at
facilities under a solid waste permit.

(19)
"Monitor" means to conduct a planned sequence of observations or
measurements associated with biomedical waste deactivation at facilities under
a solid waste permit to assess whether a critical control point is under
control and to produce an accurate record for future use in verification.

(20)
"Step" means a point, procedure, operation, or stage in the system
associated with biomedical waste deactivation at facilities under a solid waste
permit, from the point of biomedical waste acceptance, to final deactivation
and disposal.

(21)
"Verification" means those activities, other than monitoring, that
determine the validity of the plan and that the system is operating according
to the plan, when associated with biomedical waste deactivation at facilities
under a solid waste permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---