BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.95K.020 and 1992 c 14 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((At
the request of an applicant,)) The department of health, in
consultation with the department of ecology and local health departments((,
may)) shall evaluate the environmental and public health impacts of
biomedical waste treatment technologies. The evaluation shall be consistent
with the guidelines established by the state and territorial association on
alternative treatment technologies. The department shall make available
the results of any evaluation to local health departments.

(2)
All direct costs associated with the evaluation shall be paid by the applicant
to the department of health or to a state or local entity designated by the
department of health.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, "applicant" means any person
representing a biomedical waste treatment technology that seeks ((an
evaluation)) approval to operate a plant by the local health
jurisdiction under subsection (1) of this section.

(4)
The department of health may adopt rules to implement this section.

---
END ---