BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that laboratory-generated cultures and stocks are the most
dangerous portion of the biomedical waste stream. It is the purpose of this
act to require the microbial inactivation of cultures and stocks.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.95K.010 and 1994 c 165 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Biomedical waste" means, and is limited to, the following types of
waste:

(a)
"Animal waste" is waste animal carcasses, body parts, and bedding of
animals that are known to be infected with, or that have been inoculated with,
human pathogenic microorganisms infectious to humans.

(b)
(("Biosafety level 4 disease waste" is waste contaminated with
blood, excretions, exudates, or secretions from humans or animals who are
isolated to protect others from highly communicable infectious diseases that
are identified as pathogenic organisms assigned to biosafety level 4 by the
centers for disease control, national institutes of health, biosafety in
microbiological and biomedical laboratories, current edition.

(c)))
"Cultures and stocks" are laboratory wastes infectious to
humans ((and includes specimen cultures, cultures and stocks of etiologic
agents, wastes from production of biologicals and serums, discarded live and
attenuated vaccines, and laboratory waste that has come into contact with
cultures and stocks of etiologic agents or blood specimens. Such waste
includes but is not limited to culture dishes, blood specimen tubes, and
devices used to transfer, inoculate, and mix cultures)) requiring
biosafety level 3 or biosafety level 4 practices.

(((d)))
(c) "Human blood and blood products" is discarded waste human
blood and blood components, and materials containing free-flowing blood and
blood products.

(((e)))
(d) "Pathological waste" is waste human source biopsy
materials, tissues, and anatomical parts that emanate from surgery, obstetrical
procedures, and autopsy. "Pathological waste" does not include
teeth, human corpses, remains, and anatomical parts that are intended for
interment or cremation.

(((f)))
(e) "Sharps waste" is all hypodermic needles, syringes with
needles attached, IV tubing with needles attached, scalpel blades, and lancets
that have been removed from the original sterile package.

(2)
"Biosafety level 3 practices" means practices identified in the
centers for disease control and prevention publication, "Biosafety in
Microbial and Biomedical Laboratories," third edition, May 1993, as
necessary to handle indigenous or exotic agents properly, which agents may be
aerosol-transmitted and may cause serious and potentially lethal infection.

(3)
"Biosafety level 4 practices" means practices identified in the
centers for disease control and prevention publication, "Biosafety in
Microbial and Biomedical Laboratories," third edition, May 1993, as
necessary to handle dangerous and exotic agents properly, which agents pose a
high risk of life-threatening disease, may be aerosol-transmitted, and for
which there is no available vaccine or therapy.

(4)
"Drop-off programs" means those program sites designated by the solid
waste planning jurisdiction where sharps users may dispose of their sharps
containers.

(5)
"Local government" means city, town, or county.

(((3)
"Local health department" means the city, county, city-county, or
district public health department.

(4))) (6)
"Local health jurisdiction" means the county, city-county or
multicounty public health department or district.

(7)
"Mail programs" means those programs that provide sharps users with a
multiple barrier protection kit for the placement of a sharps container and
subsequent mailing of the wastes to an approved disposal facility.

(8)
"Person" means an individual, firm, corporation, association,
partnership, consortium, joint venture, commercial entity, state government
agency, or local government.

(((5)
"Treatment" means incineration, sterilization, or other method,
technique, or process that changes the character or composition of a biomedical
waste so as to minimize the risk of transmitting an infectious disease.

(6))) (9)
"Pharmacy return programs" means those programs where sharps
containers are returned by the user to designated return sites located at a
pharmacy to be transported by a biomedical or solid waste collection company
approved by the utilities and transportation commission.

(10)
"Residential sharps waste" has the same meaning as "sharps
waste" in subsection (1) of this section except that the sharps waste is
generated and prepared for disposal at a residence, apartment, dwelling, or
other noncommercial habitat.

(((7)))
(11) "Sharps waste container" means a leak-proof, rigid,
puncture-resistant ((red)) container that is taped closed or tightly
lidded to prevent the loss of the residential sharps waste.

(((8)
"Mail programs" means those programs that provide sharps users with a
multiple barrier protection kit for the placement of a sharps container and
subsequent mailing of the wastes to an approved disposal facility.

(9)
"Pharmacy return programs" means those programs where sharps
containers are returned by the user to designated return sites located at a
pharmacy to be transported by a biomedical or solid waste collection company
approved by the utilities and transportation commission.

(10)
"Drop-off programs" means those program sites designated by the solid
waste planning jurisdiction where sharps users may dispose of their sharps
containers.

(11))) (12)
"Source separation" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.95.030.

(13)
"Treatment" means incineration, sterilization, or other method,
technique, or process that changes the character or composition of a biomedical
waste so as to minimize the risk of transmitting an infectious disease.

(((12)))
(14) "Unprotected sharps" means residential sharps waste that
are not disposed of in a sharps waste container.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 70.95K RCW to read as follows:

Generators
of cultures and stocks shall treat those cultures and stocks before final
disposal in either of the following ways: (1) The generators may treat the
cultures and stocks before transport from the facility; or (2) segregate the
cultures and stocks from other biomedical waste and transport them to a
treatment facility. Cultures and stocks shall not be subject to any process
that creates the potential for the generation or release of airborne pathogens
from the waste before treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Section 3 of this act takes effect January 1, 2001.

---
END ---