BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The University of Washington graduate school of public affairs shall conduct a
study of the relative risks posed by different methods of treatment and
disposal of biomedical waste. In the course of designing and conducting the
study, the University of Washington shall consult with the department of
ecology, the department of health, and the state solid waste advisory
committee. The study shall consider the risk associated with exposure to
infectious organisms, to workers who are involved in the handling, treatment,
and disposal of biomedical waste, and to the surrounding communities for the
following biomedical waste treatment technology categories or disposal methods:

(a)
Autoclaving;

(b)
Incineration;

(c)
Electrothermal deactivation systems;

(d)
Microwaving;

(e)
Chemical deactivation; and

(f)
Disposal of untreated medical waste in approved solid waste landfills.

(2)
The study shall estimate the quantity of biomedical waste that is generated in
the state, is transported into the state from other states and other countries,
and shall characterize whether the biomedical waste is treated before disposal.

(3)
The study shall examine the conclusions from related studies, including the
1993 study conducted by the United States environmental protection agency and
the 1997 study conducted by the national institute for occupational safety and
health.

(4)
The University of Washington shall report its findings to the department of
ecology, the department of health, and the state solid waste advisory committee
and shall submit a final report of its findings to appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 70.95K RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Each facility that accepts and treats biomedical waste from another party for
renumerative benefit and operates biomedical waste under a solid waste permit
shall develop a hazard analysis and critical control points plan. The scope of
the plan shall cover worker health and safety and any health risks to the
community surrounding the facility. The plan shall be a systematic approach to
the identification, evaluation, and control of safety hazards and include:

(a)
Conducting a hazard analysis;

(b)
Determining the critical control points;

(c)
Establishing critical limits;

(d)
Establishing monitoring procedures;

(e)
Establishing corrective actions;

(f)
Establishing verification procedures; and

(g)
Establishing recordkeeping and documentation procedures.

(2)
The plan shall identify the corrective action that will be taken when there is
a deviation from the critical limits for each identified step contained in the
plan.

(3)
The plan shall be submitted to the local health jurisdiction. The local health
jurisdiction shall review the plan in consultation with the state department of
health, the department of ecology, and the department of labor and industries
and shall approve the plan or recommend changes to the plan. The review shall
be completed within one hundred twenty days of submission and shall include an
explanation of the reasons for any recommended changes.

(4)
Local health jurisdictions shall monitor the operation of the facilities to
assure the plants are operated in accordance with the plan.

(5)
If public health or worker safety issues develop with regard to the operation
of a facility, including a significant change in the source of waste, a change
in the critical control points or the emergence of a disease of concern, any of
the public agencies enumerated in subsection (3) of this section or the plant
operator may propose revision of the plan to the local health jurisdiction.
The local health jurisdiction, in consultation with the involved public
agencies, shall review the proposed revisions and may recommend additional
corrective actions and changes to critical limits or other elements of the plan
to provide improved protection to public health or worker safety.

(6)
Local health jurisdictions, with assistance from the department of health,
shall establish verification procedures as a condition of the permit and as
necessary to protect the public or worker health and safety.

(7)
Initial plans shall be prepared within two years of the effective date of this
section. The plant operator shall review and update the hazard analysis and
critical control points plan every two years. Such revisions shall be
conducted in accordance with the procedure established in subsection (3) of this
section.

(8)
A plant established after the effective date of this section shall develop a
hazard analysis and critical control points plan before commencing operation.
Such plan shall be submitted in accordance with the procedure established in
subsection (3) of this section.

(9)
This section does not affect nor replace other authorities or responsibilities
of state or local agencies under other laws.

Sec.
3. RCW
70.95K.010 and 1994 c 165 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Biomedical waste" means, and is limited to, the following types of
waste:

(a)
"Animal waste" is waste animal carcasses, body parts, and bedding of
animals that are known to be infected with, or that have been inoculated with,
human pathogenic microorganisms infectious to humans.

(b)
"Biosafety level 4 disease waste" is waste contaminated with blood,
excretions, exudates, or secretions from humans or animals who are isolated to
protect others from highly communicable infectious diseases that are identified
as pathogenic organisms assigned to biosafety level 4 by the centers for
disease control, national institute of health, biosafety in microbiological and
biomedical laboratories, current edition.

(c)
"Cultures and stocks" are wastes infectious to humans and includes
specimen cultures, cultures and stocks of etiologic agents, wastes from
production of biologicals and serums, discarded live and attenuated vaccines,
and laboratory waste that has come into contact with cultures and stocks of
etiologic agents or blood specimens. Such waste includes but is not limited to
culture dishes, blood specimen tubes, and devices used to transfer, inoculate,
and mix cultures.

(d)
"Human blood and blood products" is discarded waste human blood and
blood components, and materials containing free-flowing blood and blood
products.

(e)
"Pathological waste" is waste human source biopsy materials, tissues,
and anatomical parts that emanate from surgery, obstetrical procedures, and
autopsy. "Pathological waste" does not include teeth, human corpses,
remains, and anatomical parts that are intended for interment or cremation.

(f)
"Sharps waste" is all hypodermic needles, syringes with needles
attached, IV tubing with needles attached, scalpel blades, and lancets that
have been removed from the original sterile package.

(2)
"Control point" means any step at which biological, chemical, or
physical factors can be controlled.

(3)
"Corrective action" means procedures followed when a deviation occurs
when associated with biomedical waste deactivation at facilities under a solid
waste permit.

(4)
"Critical control point" means a step at which control can be applied
and is essential to prevent or eliminate a safety or health hazard associated
with biomedical waste deactivation at facilities under a solid waste permit, or
to reduce it to an acceptable level.

(5)
"Critical limit" means a maximum or minimum value to which a
biological, chemical, or physical parameter must be controlled at a critical
control point to prevent, eliminate, or reduce to an acceptable level the
occurrence of a safety or health hazard associated with biomedical waste
deactivation at facilities under a solid waste permit.

(6)
"Drop-off programs" means those program sites designated by the solid
waste planning jurisdiction where sharps users may dispose of their sharps
containers.

(7)
"Hazard analysis" means the process of collecting and evaluating
information on hazards associated with biomedical waste deactivation at
facilities under a solid waste permit to decide which hazards are significant
and must be addressed in the plan.

(8)
"Local government" means city, town, or county.

(((3)
"Local health department" means the city, county, city-county, or
district public health department.

(4))) (9)
"Local health jurisdiction" means the county, city-county or
multicounty public health department or district.

(10)
"Mail programs" means those programs that provide sharps users with a
multiple barrier protection kit for the placement of a sharps container and
subsequent mailing of the wastes to an approved disposal facility.

(11)
"Monitor" means to conduct a planned sequence of observations or
measurements associated with biomedical waste deactivation at facilities under
a solid waste permit to assess whether a critical control point is under
control and to produce an accurate record for future use in verification.

(12)
"Person" means an individual, firm, corporation, association,
partnership, consortium, joint venture, commercial entity, state government
agency, or local government.

(((5)
"Treatment" means incineration, sterilization, or other method,
technique, or process that changes the character or composition of a biomedical
waste so as to minimize the risk of transmitting an infectious disease.

(6))) (13)
"Pharmacy return programs" means those programs where sharps containers
are returned by the user to designated return sites located at a pharmacy to be
transported by a biomedical or solid waste collection company approved by the
utilities and transportation commission.

(14)
"Plan," which is a hazard analysis and critical control points plan,
means a systematic approach to the identification, evaluation, and control of
safety and health and safety hazards when associated with biomedical waste
deactivation at facilities under a solid waste permit.

(15)
"Residential sharps waste" has the same meaning as "sharps
waste" in subsection (1) of this section except that the sharps waste is
generated and prepared for disposal at a residence, apartment, dwelling, or
other noncommercial habitat.

(((7)))
(16) "Sharps waste container" means a leak-proof, rigid,
puncture-resistant red container that is taped closed or tightly lidded to
prevent the loss of the residential sharps waste.

(((8)
"Mail programs" means those programs that provide sharps users with a
multiple barrier protection kit for the placement of a sharps container and
subsequent mailing of the wastes to an approved disposal facility.

(9)
"Pharmacy return programs" means those programs where sharps
containers are returned by the user to designated return sites located at a
pharmacy to be transported by a biomedical or solid waste collection company
approved by the utilities and transportation commission.

(10)
"Drop-off programs" means those program sites designated by the solid
waste planning jurisdiction where sharps users may dispose of their sharps
containers.

(11))) (17)
"Source separation" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.95.030.

(((12)))
(18) "Step" means a point, procedure, operation, or stage in the
system associated with biomedical waste deactivation at facilities under a
solid waste permit, from the point of biomedical waste acceptance, to final
deactivation and disposal.

(19)
"Treatment" means incineration, sterilization, or other method,
technique, or process that changes the character or composition of a biomedical
waste so as to minimize the risk of transmitting an infectious disease.

(20)
"Unprotected sharps" means residential sharps waste that are not
disposed of in a sharps waste container.

(21)
"Verification" means those activities, other than monitoring, that
determine the validity of the plan and that the system is operating according
to the plan, when associated with biomedical waste deactivation at facilities
under a solid waste permit.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.95K.020 and 1992 c 14 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((At the request of an applicant,)) The department of health, in
consultation with the department of ecology and local health departments((,
may)) shall evaluate the environmental and public health impacts of
biomedical waste treatment technologies. The agencies shall consider the
guidelines established by the state and territorial association on the
alternative treatment technologies in their evaluation. The department
shall make available the results of any evaluation to local health ((departments))
jurisdictions.

(2)
All direct costs associated with the evaluation shall be paid by the applicant
to the department of health or to a state or local entity designated by the
department of health.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, "applicant" means any person
representing a biomedical waste treatment technology that seeks ((an
evaluation)) approval to operate a plant by the local health
jurisdiction under subsection (1) of this section before initially
operating a plant employing that treatment technology or before seeking a
significant change or upgrade in that treatment technology.

(4)
The department of health may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If
specific funding for the purposes of sections 2 and 3 of this act, referencing
this act by bill or chapter and section numbers, is not provided by June 30,
1999, in the omnibus appropriations act, sections 2 and 3 of this act are null
and void.

---
END ---