BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.190.010 and 1996 c 132 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Administrative costs" means the costs associated with ((procurement;
payroll processing; personnel functions; management; maintenance and operation
of space and property; data processing and computer services;))
accounting((;)), budgeting((;)), and auditing((;
indirect costs; and organizational planning, consultation, coordination, and
training)).

(2)
"Assessment" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.70.010.

(3)
"At-risk" children are children who engage in or are victims of
at-risk behaviors.

(4)
"At-risk behaviors" means violent delinquent acts, teen substance
abuse, teen pregnancy and male parentage, teen suicide attempts, dropping out
of school, child abuse or neglect, and domestic violence.

(5)
"Community public health and safety networks" or "networks"
means the organizations authorized under RCW 70.190.060.

(6)
"Comprehensive plan" means a two-year plan that examines available
resources and unmet needs for a county or multicounty area, barriers that limit
the effective use of resources, and a plan to address these issues that is
broadly supported by local residents.

(7)
"Participating state agencies" means the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, the department of social and health services, the
department of health, the employment security department, the department of
community, trade, and economic development, and such other departments as may
be specifically designated by the governor.

(8)
"Family policy council" or "council" means the
superintendent of public instruction, the secretary of social and health
services, the secretary of health, the commissioner of the employment security
department, and the director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development or their designees, one legislator from each caucus of the
senate and house of representatives, and one representative of the governor.

(9)
"Fiduciary interest" means (a) the right to compensation from a
health, educational, social service, or justice system organization that
receives public funds, or (b) budgetary or policy-making authority for an
organization listed in (a) of this subsection. A person who acts solely in an
advisory capacity and receives no compensation from a health, educational,
social service, or justice system organization, and who has no budgetary or
policy-making authority is deemed to have no fiduciary interest in the
organization.

(10)
"Outcome" or "outcome based" means defined and measurable
outcomes used to evaluate progress in reducing the rate of at-risk children and
youth through reducing risk factors and increasing protective factors.

(11)
"Matching funds" means an amount no less than twenty-five percent of
the amount budgeted for a network. The network's matching funds may be in-kind
goods and services. Funding sources allowable for match include appropriate
federal or local levy funds, private charitable funding, and other charitable
giving. Basic education funds shall not be used as a match. State general
funds shall not be used as a match for violence reduction and drug enforcement
account funds created under RCW 69.50.520.

(12)
"Policy development" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
43.70.010.

(13)
"Protective factors" means those factors determined by the department
of health to be empirically associated with behaviors that contribute to
socially acceptable and healthy nonviolent behaviors. Protective factors
include promulgation, identification, and acceptance of community norms
regarding appropriate behaviors in the area of delinquency, early sexual
activity, alcohol and substance abuse, educational opportunities, employment
opportunities, and absence of crime.

(14)
"Risk factors" means those factors determined by the department of
health to be empirically associated with at-risk behaviors that contribute to
violence.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.190.090 and 1996 c 132 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A
network ((that has its membership finalized under RCW 70.190.060(4)))
shall, upon application to the council, be eligible to receive planning grants
and technical assistance from the council. Planning grants may be funded
through available federal funds for family preservation services. After
receiving the planning grant the network has up to one year to submit the
long-term comprehensive plan.

(2)
The council shall enter into biennial contracts with networks as part of the
grant process. The contracts shall be consistent with available resources, and
shall be distributed in accordance with the distribution formula developed
pursuant to RCW 43.41.195, subject to the applicable matching fund requirement.

(3) No
later than February 1 of each odd-numbered year following the initial contract
between the council and a network, the council shall request from the network
its plan for the upcoming biennial contract period.

(4)
The council shall notify the networks of their allocation of available
resources at least sixty days prior to the start of a new biennial contract
period.

(5)
The networks shall, by contract, distribute funds (a) appropriated for plan
implementation by the legislature, and (b) obtained from nonstate or federal
sources. In distributing funds, the networks shall ensure that administrative
costs are held to a maximum of ten percent, or twenty thousand dollars per
biennium, whichever is greater.

(6) A
network shall not provide services or operate programs.

(7)
A network shall file a report with the council by May 1 of each year that
includes but is not limited to the following information: Detailed
expenditures, programs under way, progress on contracted services and programs,
and successes and problems in achieving the outcomes required by RCW
70.190.130(1)(h) related to reducing the rate of state-funded out-of-home
placements and the other three at-risk behaviors covered by the comprehensive
plan and approved by the council.

---
END ---