BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A new
section is added to chapter 36.82 RCW to read as follows:

Any
funds deposited in the county road fund from road levies may be expended for up
to fifty percent of the county commissioner salaries as a proper county road
purpose.

---
END ---