BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A new
section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In
addition to the requirements under RCW 84.55.0101, a rural county library
district, intercounty rural library district, island library district, and
rural partial-county library district may provide for a limit factor of one
hundred six percent or less only if the legislative authorities of a majority
of the counties in which the district is located approve the limit factor by
ordinance or resolution with the following vote:

(a) In
counties with legislative authorities of four members or less, two-thirds of
the members must approve the ordinance or resolution; and

(b) In
counties with legislative authorities of more than four members, a majority
plus one vote must approve the ordinance or resolution.

(2)
The new limit factor shall be effective for taxes collected in the following
year only.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act
applies to taxes levied for collection in 2000 and thereafter.

---
END ---