BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Before initiating or applying any control measures to implement a total maximum
daily load analysis developed under the federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec.
1313(d)(1)(D), the department shall convene a committee to advise the
department on the implementation program. The advisory committee shall include
residents and landowners from the watershed and county in which the total
maximum daily load analysis was developed and shall include, but is not limited
to, representatives of landowners, tribes, local government, and other members
of the public. The department may substitute for the advisory committee
another group established to address water-related issues in the watershed in
which the total maximum daily load was developed. Such an advisory group could
include, but is not limited to, a watershed planning group established under
chapter 90.82 RCW. After the department has designated and convened an
advisory committee, the department shall seek the input of residents and
landowners from the watershed and county in which the total maximum daily load
analysis was developed by holding a public meeting.

(2) Periodically, the department shall review and seek public input
on the implementation of a total maximum daily load, consistent with the
department's watershed approach to water quality management.

---
END ---