BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70B RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A rural county may conduct a collaborative procedure for land use and
environmental review and permitting of rural economic development projects. A
rural county may:

(a)
Adopt one economic development project per year as a community economic
revitalization project or industrial project of state-wide significance;

(b)
Request funding in addition to other project funding for coordination and
facilitation;

(c)
Appoint or retain a project coordinator and a local permit facilitator;

(d)
Use the collaborative procedure with the project applicant and the relevant
state permitting agencies, as an alternative to the consolidated permit review
process in this chapter; and

(e)
Invite federal agencies and tribes to participate in the collaborative
procedure.

(2)
The collaborative procedure in this section shall be a modified form of the
local consolidated permit review process adopted under this chapter and consist
of:

(a)
One or more preapplication conferences that:

(i)
Include the applicant, the project coordinator, the local permit facilitator,
and the permit assistance center acting as state permit facilitator;

(ii)
Discuss options for project design and for land use, environmental review, and
permitting;

(iii)
Identify potential permitting agencies, permits, schedules, and costs; and

(iv)
Identify a potential project team that includes representatives of the
applicant and relevant local and state permitting agencies;

(b)
A determination of completeness under this chapter of the project application
provided by the county to the applicant within thirty-five days, or fourteen
days after receipt of requested supplementation that includes both a
determination of completeness issued by the county, according to its local
consolidated permit review process under this chapter, and determinations of
completeness issued by the state permitting agencies;

(c)
Coordination of permitting and integration of processes that:

(i)
Is achieved by negotiation among the applicant and the various permitting
agencies;

(ii)
Results in an integrated schedule keyed to the longest notice and public
hearing requirement;

(iii)
Includes negotiations for cost recovery arrangements for permitting agencies;
and

(iv)
Uses an integrated record of decision;

(d)
An integrated review that includes:

(i)
Issuance of threshold determination under chapter 43.21C RCW;

(ii)
Public notice that describes the project, the permits, the applicable
regulations, and any preliminary determinations; lists and gives the location
of documents and studies; describes public comment, hearing, and appeal
processes; and sets out the schedule; and

(iii)
An integrated public hearing held in the county;

(e)
Coordination of local appeals under this chapter and state appeals under
chapter 90.60 RCW;

(f)
An integrated decision;

(g)
Consolidated judicial review under the land use petition act, chapter 36.70C
RCW; and

(h)
An optional development agreement under this chapter.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.70B.020 and 1995 c 347 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Closed record appeal" means an administrative appeal on the record
to a local government body or officer, including the legislative body,
following an open record hearing on a project permit application when the
appeal is on the record with no or limited new evidence or information allowed
to be submitted and only appeal argument allowed.

(2)
"Local government" means a county, city, or town.

(3)
"Open record hearing" means a hearing, conducted by a single hearing
body or officer authorized by the local government to conduct such hearings,
that creates the local government's record through testimony and submission of
evidence and information, under procedures prescribed by the local government
by ordinance or resolution. An open record hearing may be held prior to a
local government's decision on a project permit to be known as an "open
record predecision hearing." An open record hearing may be held on an
appeal, to be known as an "open record appeal hearing," if no open
record predecision hearing has been held on the project permit.

(4)
"Project permit" or "project permit application" means any
land use or environmental permit or license required from a local government
for a project action, including but not limited to building permits,
subdivisions, binding site plans, planned unit developments, conditional uses,
shoreline substantial development permits, site plan review, permits or
approvals required by critical area ordinances, site-specific rezones
authorized by a comprehensive plan or subarea plan, but excluding the adoption
or amendment of a comprehensive plan, subarea plan, or development regulations except
as otherwise specifically included in this subsection.

(5)
"Public meeting" means an informal meeting, hearing, workshop, or
other public gathering of people to obtain comments from the public or other
agencies on a proposed project permit prior to the local government’s
decision. A public meeting may include, but is not limited to, a design review
or architectural control board meeting, a special review district or community
council meeting, or a scoping meeting on a draft environmental impact statement.
A public meeting does not include an open record hearing. The proceedings at a
public meeting may be recorded and a report or recommendation may be included
in the local government’s project permit application file.

(6)
"Rural county" means a county with a population density of fewer than
one hundred persons per square mile, as determined by the office of financial
management.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 90.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
State permitting agencies shall participate in the collaborative procedure in
section 1 of this act, including the integrated public hearing, and use the
integrated record of decision.

(b)
State permitting agencies shall adopt a consolidated single state appeal
procedure, and use the integrated record of decision.

(c)
State permitting agencies may recover costs of the collaborative procedure from
applicants.

(d)
Reviews of state permit decisions under this chapter shall be consolidated with
judicial reviews of land use decisions under chapter 36.70C RCW.

(2)
The center may coordinate development of memoranda between state and federal
agencies.

Sec.
4. RCW
90.60.030 and 1997 c 429 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

The
permit assistance center is established within the department. The center
shall:

(1)
Publish and keep current one or more handbooks containing lists and
explanations of all permit laws. To the extent possible, the handbook shall
include relevant federal and tribal laws. A state agency or local government
shall provide a reasonable number of copies of application forms, statutes,
ordinances, rules, handbooks, and other informational material requested by the
center and shall otherwise fully cooperate with the center. The center shall
seek the cooperation of relevant federal agencies and tribal governments;

(2)
Establish, and make known, a point of contact for distribution of the handbook
and advice to the public as to its interpretation in any given case;

(3)
Work closely and cooperatively with the business license center in providing
efficient and nonduplicative service to the public;

(4)
Seek the assignment of employees from the permit agencies listed under RCW
90.60.020(6)(a) to serve on a rotating basis in staffing the center;

(5)
Collect and disseminate information to public and private entities on federal,
state, local, and tribal government programs that rely on private professional
expertise to assist governmental agencies in project permit review; ((and))

(6)
Participate in the collaborative procedure under section 1 of this act as
the state permit facilitator; and

(7)
Provide an annual report to the legislature on potential conflicts and
perceived inconsistencies among existing statutes. The first report shall be
submitted to the appropriate standing committees of the house of
representatives and senate by December 1, 1996.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70C RCW to read as follows:

Reviews of land use decisions under this chapter shall be
consolidated with judicial reviews of state permit decisions under chapter
90.60 RCW.

Sec.
6. RCW
43.21C.033 and 1995 c 347 s 422 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the responsible official
shall make a threshold determination on a completed application within ninety
days after the application and supporting documentation are complete. The
applicant may request an additional thirty days for the threshold
determination. The governmental entity responsible for making the threshold
determination shall by rule, resolution, or ordinance adopt standards,
consistent with rules adopted by the department to implement this chapter, for
determining when an application and supporting documentation are complete.

(2)
This section shall not apply to a city, town, or county that:

(a)
By ordinance adopted prior to April 1, 1992, has adopted procedures to
integrate permit and land use decisions with the requirements of this chapter;
((or))

(b)
Is planning under RCW 36.70A.040 and is subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70B.090;
or

(c)
Is operating under the collaborative procedure in section 1 of this act.

Sec.
7. RCW
43.21C.034 and 1993 c 23 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Lead agencies are authorized to use in whole or in part existing environmental
documents for new project or nonproject actions, if the documents adequately
address environmental considerations set forth in RCW 43.21C.030. The prior
proposal or action and the new proposal or action need not be identical, but
must have similar elements that provide a basis for comparing their
environmental consequences such as timing, types of impacts, alternatives, or
geography. The lead agency shall independently review the content of the
existing documents and determine that the information and analysis to be used
is relevant and adequate. If necessary, the lead agency may require additional
documentation to ensure that all environmental impacts have been adequately addressed.

(2)
Lead agencies may use an integrated record of decision developed under section
1 of this act.

Sec.
8. RCW
43.157.010 and 1997 c 369 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For purposes of this chapter and RCW 28A.525.166, 28B.80.330, 28C.18.080,
43.21A.350, 47.06.030, and 90.58.100 and (([an])) an industrial
project of state-wide significance is a border crossing project that involves
both private and public investments carried out in conjunction with adjacent
states or provinces or a private industrial development with private capital
investment in manufacturing or research and development. To qualify as an
industrial project of state-wide significance, the project must be completed
after January 1, 1997, and have:

(a)
In counties with a population of less than or equal to twenty thousand, a capital
investment of twenty million dollars;

(b)
In counties with a population of greater than twenty thousand but no more than
fifty thousand, a capital investment of fifty million dollars;

(c)
In counties with a population of greater than fifty thousand but no more than
one hundred thousand, a capital investment of one hundred million dollars;

(d)
In counties with a population of greater than one hundred thousand but no more
than two hundred thousand, a capital investment of two hundred million dollars;

(e)
In counties with a population of greater than two hundred thousand but no more
than four hundred thousand, a capital investment of four hundred million
dollars;

(f)
In counties with a population of greater than four hundred thousand but no more
than one million, a capital investment of six hundred million dollars;

(g)
In counties with a population of greater than one million, a capital investment
of one billion dollars; or

(h)
Been designated by the director of community, trade, and economic development
as an industrial project of state-wide significance either: (i) Because the
county in which the project is to be located is a distressed county and the
economic circumstances of the county merit the additional assistance such
designation will bring; ((or)) (ii) because the impact on a region due
to the size and complexity of the project merits such designation; or (iii)
because it is a rural county as defined in RCW 36.70B.020.

(2)
The term manufacturing shall have the meaning assigned it in RCW 82.61.010.

(3)
The term research and development shall have the meaning assigned it in RCW
82.61.010.

Sec.
9. RCW
43.160.060 and 1996 c 51 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board is authorized to make direct loans to political subdivisions of the state
for the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions in financing the cost
of public facilities, including development of land and improvements for public
facilities, as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, expansion,
or improvement of the facilities. Grants may be authorized for permit
coordination under chapters 36.70B and 90.60 RCW and for facilitation costs of
collaborative procedure products under section 1 of this act. A grant may
also be authorized for purposes designated in this chapter, but only when, and
to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given the limited
resources of the political subdivision and the finding by the board that unique
circumstances exist. The board shall not obligate more than twenty percent of
its biennial appropriation as grants.

Application
for funds shall be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. In
making grants or loans the board shall conform to the following requirements:

(1)
The board shall not provide financial assistance:

(a)
For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote a retail
shopping development or expansion.

(b)
For any project that evidence exists would result in a development or expansion
that would displace existing jobs in any other community in the state.

(c)
For the acquisition of real property, including buildings and other fixtures
which are a part of real property.

(2)
The board shall only provide financial assistance:

(a)
For those projects which would result in specific private developments or
expansions (i) in manufacturing, production, food processing, assembly,
warehousing, and industrial distribution; (ii) for processing recyclable
materials or for facilities that support recycling, including processes not
currently provided in the state, including but not limited to, de-inking
facilities, mixed waste paper, plastics, yard waste, and problem-waste
processing; (iii) for manufacturing facilities that rely significantly on
recyclable materials, including but not limited to waste tires and mixed waste
paper; (iv) which support the relocation of businesses from nondistressed urban
areas to distressed rural areas; or (v) which substantially support the trading
of goods or services outside of the state's borders.

(b)
For projects which it finds will improve the opportunities for the successful
maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial plants or
will otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic
opportunities.

(c)
When the application includes convincing evidence that a specific private
development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the public
facility improvement is made.

(3)
The board shall prioritize each proposed project according to the relative
benefits provided to the community by the jobs the project would create, not
just the total number of jobs it would create after the project is completed
and according to the unemployment rate in the area in which the jobs would be
located. As long as there is more demand for financial assistance than there
are funds available, the board is instructed to fund projects in order of their
priority.

(4)
A responsible official of the political subdivision shall be present during
board deliberations and provide information that the board requests.

Before
any financial assistance application is approved, the political subdivision
seeking the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic
revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is available to it
at costs reasonably similar to financing available from the community economic
revitalization board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
43.131.387 and 1995 c 347 s 617; and

(2) RCW
43.131.388 and 1995 c 347 s 618.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11.
Section 10 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---