BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to establish a more effective method of water
resource management in the state of Washington. This process is to be
administered in a manner consistent with current state laws and rules
concerning water rights and watershed planning, and provide flexibility to
adjust when changes occur to those laws and rules.

Further,
the legislature intends that this more effective method of water resource
management result in a reduction of the backlog of water right applications,
enhance the ability of the department of ecology to process new water right
applications, and facilitate the transfer and productive use of water rights on
a willing seller and willing buyer basis.

It
is further the intent of the legislature that those basins that are over
appropriated be identified and that instream flows be established where
necessary using the best available science. Where over appropriation has
occurred, water conservation programs during critical flow periods are to be
established that honor the principle of first in time first in right, while
facilitating a maximum level of voluntary cooperation from all water users to
meet stream flow needs.

Therefore,
the legislature declares that in order to meet this intent, it is necessary to
create a system of locally based water rights regulators, focus on water
conservation, actively work to ensure proper water allocation procedures are
followed, and rely on a market driven water transfer process.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.03.330 and 1987 c 109 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
a showing satisfactory to the department that any appropriation has been
perfected in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, it shall be the
duty of the department to issue to the applicant a certificate stating such
facts in a form to be prescribed by him or her, and such certificate
shall thereupon be recorded with the department. Any original water right
certificate issued, as provided by this chapter, shall be recorded with the
department and thereafter, at the expense of the party receiving the same, be
by the department transmitted to the county auditor of the county or counties
where the distributing system or any part thereof is located, and be recorded
in the office of such county auditor, and thereafter be transmitted to the
owner thereof.

Any
certificate or permit issued under the provisions of this chapter shall include
a notice clearly stating that such water rights are subject to seasonal water
availability.

Sec.
3. RCW
90.44.090 and 1987 c 109 s 112 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
person, firm, or corporation claiming a vested right to withdraw public
ground waters of the state by virtue of prior beneficial use of such water
shall, within three years after June 6, 1945, be entitled to receive from the
department a certificate of ground water right to that effect: PROVIDED, That
the issuance by the department of any such certificate of vested right shall be
contingent on a declaration by the claimant in a form prescribed by the
department, which declaration shall set forth: (1) The beneficial use
for which such withdrawal has been made; (2) the date or approximate date of
the earliest beneficial use of the water so withdrawn, and the continuity of
such beneficial use; (3) the amount of water claimed; (4) if the beneficial use
has been for irrigation, the description of the land to which such water has
been applied and the name of the owner thereof; and (5) so far as it may be
available, descriptive information concerning each well or other works for the
withdrawal of public ground water, as required of original permittees under the
provisions of RCW 90.44.080: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That in case of failure to
comply with the provisions of this section within the three years allotted, the
claimant may apply to the department for a reasonable extension of time, which
shall not exceed two additional years and which shall be granted only upon a
showing of good cause for such failure.

Each
such declaration shall be certified, either on the basis of the personal
knowledge of the declarant or on the basis of information and belief. With
respect to each such declaration there shall be publication, and findings in
the same manner as provided in RCW 90.44.060 in the case of an original
application to appropriate water. If the department's findings sustain the
declaration, the department shall approve said declaration, which then shall be
recorded at length with the department and may also be recorded in the office
of the county auditor of the county within which the claimed withdrawal and
beneficial use of public ground water have been made. When duly approved and
recorded as herein provided, each such declaration or copies thereof shall have
the same force and effect as an original permit granted under the provisions of
RCW 90.44.060, with a priority as of the date of the earliest beneficial use of
the water.

Declarations
heretofore filed with the department in substantial compliance with the
provisions of this section shall have the same force and effect as if filed
after June 6, 1945.

The
same fees shall be collected by the department in the case of applications for
the issuance of certificates of vested rights, as are required to be collected
in the case of application for permits for withdrawal of ground waters and for
the issuance of certificates of ground water withdrawal rights under this
chapter.

Any
certificate or permit issued under the provisions of this chapter shall include
a notice clearly stating that such water rights are subject to seasonal water
availability.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 90.82 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any county or group of counties within the state may seek to establish a local
water regulator to implement and administer a local watershed plan established
under this chapter. The local water regulators shall be funded through the
department. Counties seeking a local water regulator may individually or
collectively petition the department for up to one regulator per county. The
regulators may be assigned to a single WRIA or a multi-WRIA area.

(2)
Upon satisfactory showing of need for a local water regulator by a county or
counties, the department shall assign a local water regulator to the WRIA or
multi-WRIA region. The local water regulator shall be housed in the county
with the greatest amount of land in the WRIA or multi-WRIA region to be
administered by the local water regulator.

(3)
The local water regulator shall be responsible for implementation and
administration of any adopted local watershed management plan for the region to
which he or she is assigned. The regulator shall: Monitor water diversions
and withdrawals in the region; monitor stream flows; work with local
conservancy boards, the department, and other local jurisdictions to help
disseminate technical and legal information in an effort to facilitate water
transfers; encourage water users in implementing water conservation measures by
assisting them by providing information related to efficiency measures and
available incentives; and in periods of insufficient water flows, implement
conservation measures in accordance with section 7 of this act.

(4)
Any person aggrieved by an action of the local water regulator may bring an
action before the pollution control hearings board.

Additionally,
a person who is seeking relief from the pollution control hearings board may
petition an administrative law judge within the department for immediate relief
from the action of the local water regulator pending a decision by the
pollution control hearings board. The relief shall be determined within five
business days of the date of filing of such a petition. Immediate relief may
be granted on a showing of undue hardship or an error in fact in the action
taken by the local water regulator.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 90.82 RCW to read as follows:

Within
the department there is created a water coordinator. The water coordinator is
responsible for overseeing the local water regulators established in section 4
of this act. It is the duty of the water coordinator to monitor the actions of
the local water regulators and ensure that actions taken by the local water
regulators are consistent with state law. Additionally, the water coordinator
is responsible for assisting local water regulators in the performance of their
duties. Such assistance must include sharing all pertinent water
resource-related information with the local water regulators.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 90.14 RCW to read as follows:

All
claims filed under the provisions of chapter . . ., Laws of 1999
(this act) shall be deemed equivalent to a certificate under the provisions of
chapters 90.03 and 90.44 RCW. The date of priority of the claim shall be the
date of priority of the certificate under this section. This section does not
apply to claims involved in an ongoing water right adjudication, or claims that
have been invalidated through prior adjudication or relinquished through prior
agency action.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 43.27A RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall seek to encourage the voluntary transfer of water between
willing parties. The department must develop strategies to encourage and
facilitate the transfers and the adoption of conservation measures.

In
times of inadequate stream flows, the department shall seek to meet necessary
flows by encouraging voluntary conservation. If voluntary conservation is
insufficient, the department shall encourage voluntary sharing of water through
water transfers and water sharing. If this action still fails to provide
sufficient water, the department shall enforce mandatory water conservation
efforts based on the implementation recommendations of a watershed planning
process for the stream. If these measures still fail to provide sufficient
water to the stream, then the department shall enforce a temporary ceasing of
withdrawals or diversions based on the date of priority of the water rights.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
90.03.060 and 1987 c 109 s 69, 1967 c 80 s 1, 1947 c 123 s 2,
& 1917 c 117 s 9;

(2) RCW
90.03.070 and 1987 c 109 s 70, 1967 c 80 s 2, & 1917 c 117 s
10;

(3) RCW
90.03.090 and 1987 c 202 s 250 & 1917 c 117 s 12;

(4) RCW
90.03.100 and 1987 c 109 s 71 & 1917 c 117 s 13;

(5) RCW
90.08.040 and 1977 c 22 s 1 & 1925 ex.s. c 162 s 1;

(6) RCW
90.08.050 and 1977 c 22 s 2, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 180, 1947
c 123 s 1, & 1925 ex.s. c 162 s 2;

(7) RCW
90.08.060 and 1977 c 22 s 3 & 1925 ex.s. c 162 s 3; and

(8) RCW
90.08.070 and 1977 c 22 s 4 & 1925 ex.s. c 162 s 4.

---
END ---