BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.56.200 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.200 are each amended to read as
follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of robbery in the first degree if in the commission of a
robbery or of immediate flight therefrom, he or she:

(a)
Is armed with a deadly weapon; or

(b)
Displays what appears to be a firearm or other deadly weapon; or

(c)
By conduct or speech, implies, announces, or otherwise causes any person who
is present to reasonably believe that the person committing the robbery may
possess a firearm or other deadly weapon, whether or not such weapon is
actually possessed; or

(d)
Inflicts bodily injury.

(2) Robbery in the first degree is a class A felony.

---
END ---