BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds as follows:

(a)
The "corpus delicti" doctrine originated at a time when there were
few legal protections against coerced confessions. The modern existence of
such protections has eliminated the need for the doctrine. The doctrine has
been widely criticized by legal scholars and repudiated by the United States
supreme court.

(b)
The jury system itself provides strong protection against convictions based on
unreliable confessions. Juries are fully capable of evaluating the
circumstances surrounding an alleged confession and disregarding the confession
if it is unreliable.

(c)
The "corpus delicti" doctrine can produce severe injustice, by making
it impossible to convict persons whose guilt is clearly proven. This is
particularly true in cases involving crimes interrupted before the goal is
accomplished, for example attempted murder, and cases involving victims who
cannot describe the acts that have been perpetrated against them, for example
severely disabled victims.

(2)
Section 2 of this act is intended to adopt the federal corroboration
requirement as set out in Opper v. United States, 348 U.S. 84, 99 L. Ed.
101, 75 S. Ct. 158 (1954).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 10.58 RCW to read as follows:

In all criminal and juvenile offense proceedings where independent
proof of the corpus delicti is absent, a lawfully obtained confession or
admission of the defendant nevertheless shall be admitted into evidence if
there is substantial independent evidence that would tend to establish the
trustworthiness of the confession or admission.

---
END ---