BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
88.12.115 and 1993 c 244 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person may operate or permit the operation of a vessel on the waters of the
state without a personal flotation device on board for each person on the
vessel. Each personal flotation device shall be in serviceable condition, of
an appropriate size, and readily accessible.

(2)
Except as provided in RCW 88.12.015, a violation of subsection (1) of this
section is an infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW if the vessel is not carrying
passengers for hire.

(3)
A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a misdemeanor punishable under
RCW 9.92.030, if the vessel is carrying passengers for hire.

(4)
No person shall operate a vessel under nineteen feet in length on the waters of
this state with a child twelve years old and under, unless the child is wearing
a United States coast guard approved personal flotation device, of the
appropriate size, while the vessel is underway. For the purposes of this
section, a personal flotation device is not considered readily accessible for
children twelve years old and under unless the device is worn by the child
while the vessel is underway. The personal flotation device must be worn at
all times by a child twelve years old and under whenever the vessel is underway
and the child is on an open deck or open cockpit of the vessel. The following
circumstances are excepted:

(a)
While a child is below deck or in the cabin of a boat with an enclosed cabin;

(b)
While a child is on a United States coast guard inspected passenger-carrying
vessel operating on the navigable waters of the United States; or

(c)
While on board a vessel at a time and place where no person would reasonably
expect a danger of drowning to occur.

(5) Except as provided in RCW 88.12.015, a violation of
subsection (4) of this section is an infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW.
Enforcement of subsection (4) of this section by law enforcement officers may
be accomplished as a primary action, and need not be accompanied by the
suspected violation of some other offense.

---
END ---