BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.30.020 and 1985 c 366 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Public agency" means:

(a)
Any state board, commission, committee, department, educational institution, or
other state agency which is created by or pursuant to statute, other than
courts and the legislature;

(b)
Any county, city, school district, special purpose district, or other municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington;

(c)
Any subagency of a public agency which is created by or pursuant to statute,
ordinance, or other legislative act, including but not limited to planning
commissions, library or park boards, commissions, and agencies;

(d)
Any public corporation, commission, or authority created under chapter 35.21
RCW;

(e)
Any policy group whose membership includes representatives of publicly owned
utilities formed by or pursuant to the laws of this state when meeting together
as or on behalf of participants who have contracted for the output of
generating plants being planned or built by an operating agency.

(2)
"Governing body" means the multimember board, commission, committee,
council, or other policy or rule-making body of a public agency, or any
committee thereof when the committee acts on behalf of the governing body,
conducts hearings, or takes testimony or public comment.

(3)
"Action" means the transaction of the official business of a public
agency by a governing body including but not limited to receipt of public
testimony, deliberations, discussions, considerations, reviews, evaluations,
and final actions. "Final action" means a collective positive or
negative decision, or an actual vote by a majority of the members of a
governing body when sitting as a body or entity, upon a motion, proposal,
resolution, order, or ordinance.

(4)
"Meeting" means meetings at which action is taken.

Sec.
2. RCW
42.17.260 and 1997 c 409 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each agency, in accordance with published rules, shall make available for
public inspection and copying all public records, unless the record falls
within the specific exemptions of subsection (6) of this section, RCW
42.17.310, 42.17.315, or other statute which exempts or prohibits disclosure of
specific information or records. To the extent required to prevent an
unreasonable invasion of personal privacy interests protected by RCW 42.17.310
and 42.17.315, an agency shall delete identifying details in a manner
consistent with RCW 42.17.310 and 42.17.315 when it makes available or
publishes any public record; however, in each case, the justification for the
deletion shall be explained fully in writing.

(2)
For informational purposes, each agency shall publish and maintain a current
list containing every law, other than those listed in this chapter, that the
agency believes exempts or prohibits disclosure of specific information or
records of the agency. An agency's failure to list an exemption shall not
affect the efficacy of any exemption.

(3)
Each local agency shall maintain and make available for public inspection and
copying a current index providing identifying information as to the following
records issued, adopted, or promulgated after January 1, 1973:

(a)
Final opinions, including concurring and dissenting opinions, as well as
orders, made in the adjudication of cases;

(b)
Those statements of policy and interpretations of policy, statute, and the
Constitution which have been adopted by the agency;

(c)
Administrative staff manuals and instructions to staff that affect a member of
the public;

(d)
Planning policies and goals, and interim and final planning decisions;

(e)
Factual staff reports and studies, factual consultant's reports and studies,
scientific reports and studies, and any other factual information derived from
tests, studies, reports, or surveys, whether conducted by public employees or
others; and

(f)
Correspondence, and materials referred to therein, by and with the agency
relating to any regulatory, supervisory, or enforcement responsibilities of the
agency, whereby the agency determines, or opines upon, or is asked to determine
or opine upon, the rights of the state, the public, a subdivision of state
government, or of any private party.

(4)
A local agency need not maintain such an index, if to do so would be unduly
burdensome, but it shall in that event:

(a)
Issue and publish a formal order specifying the reasons why and the extent to
which compliance would unduly burden or interfere with agency operations; and

(b)
Make available for public inspection and copying all indexes maintained for
agency use.

(5)
Each state agency shall, by rule, establish and implement a system of indexing
for the identification and location of the following records:

(a)
All records issued before July 1, 1990, for which the agency has maintained an
index;

(b)
Final orders entered after June 30, 1990, that are issued in adjudicative
proceedings as defined in RCW 34.05.010 and that contain an analysis or
decision of substantial importance to the agency in carrying out its duties;

(c)
Declaratory orders entered after June 30, 1990, that are issued pursuant to RCW
34.05.240 and that contain an analysis or decision of substantial importance to
the agency in carrying out its duties;

(d)
Interpretive statements as defined in RCW 34.05.010 that were entered after
June 30, 1990; and

(e)
Policy statements as defined in RCW 34.05.010 that were entered after June 30,
1990.

Rules
establishing systems of indexing shall include, but not be limited to,
requirements for the form and content of the index, its location and
availability to the public, and the schedule for revising or updating the
index. State agencies that have maintained indexes for records issued before
July 1, 1990, shall continue to make such indexes available for public
inspection and copying. Information in such indexes may be incorporated into
indexes prepared pursuant to this subsection. State agencies may satisfy the
requirements of this subsection by making available to the public indexes
prepared by other parties but actually used by the agency in its operations. State
agencies shall make indexes available for public inspection and copying. State
agencies may charge a fee to cover the actual costs of providing individual
mailed copies of indexes.

(6)
A public record may be relied on, used, or cited as precedent by an agency
against a party other than an agency and it may be invoked by the agency for
any other purpose only if‑-

(a)
It has been indexed in an index available to the public; or

(b)
Parties affected have timely notice (actual or constructive) of the terms
thereof.

(7)
Each agency shall establish, maintain, and make available for public inspection
and copying a statement of the actual per page cost or other costs, if any,
that it charges for providing photocopies of public records and a statement of
the factors and manner used to determine the actual per page cost or other
costs, if any.

(a)
In determining the actual per page cost for providing photocopies of public
records, an agency may include all costs directly incident to copying such
public records including the actual cost of the paper and the per page cost for
use of agency copying equipment. In determining other actual costs for
providing photocopies of public records, an agency may include all costs
directly incident to shipping such public records, including the cost of
postage or delivery charges and the cost of any container or envelope used.

(b)
In determining the actual per page cost or other costs for providing copies of
public records, an agency may not include staff salaries, benefits, or other
general administrative or overhead charges, unless those costs are directly
related to the actual cost of copying the public records. Staff time to copy
and mail the requested public records may be included in an agency's costs.

(8)
An agency need not calculate the actual per page cost or other costs it charges
for providing photocopies of public records if to do so would be unduly
burdensome, but in that event: The agency may not charge in excess of fifteen
cents per page for photocopies of public records or for the use of agency
equipment to photocopy public records and the actual postage or delivery charge
and the cost of any container or envelope used to mail the public records to
the requestor.

(9)
This chapter shall not be construed as giving authority to any agency, the
office of the secretary of the senate, or the office of the chief clerk of the
house of representatives to give, sell or provide access to lists of
individuals requested for commercial purposes, and agencies, the office of the
secretary of the senate, and the office of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives shall not do so unless specifically authorized or directed by
law: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That lists of applicants for professional licenses and
of professional licensees shall be made available to those professional
associations or educational organizations recognized by their professional
licensing or examination board, upon payment of a reasonable charge therefor:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That such recognition may be refused only for a good cause
pursuant to a hearing under the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the
Administrative Procedure Act.

(10) As used in this section, "agency" includes any
public corporation, commission, or authority created under chapter 35.21 RCW.

---
END ---