BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.04.317 and 1997 c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter does not apply to amounts received by a motor vehicle manufacturer, as
defined in RCW 19.118.021, or by a financing subsidiary of such motor vehicle
manufacturer which subsidiary is at least fifty percent owned by the
manufacturer((,)); an independent motor vehicle leasing company not
otherwise doing business in the state; or motor vehicle dealers licensed by and
located in any other state from the sale of motor vehicles at wholesale
auctions to dealers licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW or dealers licensed by any
other state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---