BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A
task force to study the issue of the office of archaeology and historic
preservation is created.

(2)(a)
The task force shall develop a single recommendation for consideration by the
legislature and the governor on the issue of the location of the office of
archaeology and historic preservation within state government. The recommended
location shall maximize the office of archaeology and historic preservation's
stature, visibility, accessibility, and delivery of service state-wide in the
context of its critical role as an important link among downtown and
neighborhood revitalization efforts, the cultural tourism movement, rural
economic development initiatives, and the preservation of the structures and
sites that still remain as the legacy of Washington's rich and diverse
heritage.

(b)
The task force shall consider and include in its recommendation how best both
to realize the potential of the office of archaeology and historic preservation
to generate revenue from services it could provide in international, national,
state, local, and private venues and also how best to achieve adequate funding
from all funding sources to assure that the office of archaeology and historic
preservation can provide the best possible service to the citizens of the state.

(3)(a)
There shall be eleven members of the task force as follows: One member shall
be the state historic preservation officer or his or her designee; two members
shall be representatives of state agencies; two members shall be
representatives of local governments; there shall be one representative each
from the Washington state historical society, the eastern Washington state
historical society, the Washington trust for historic preservation, and Indian
tribes; and two members shall be representatives of the private sector who have
experience in preservation of historic buildings or archaeological sites or who
have particular interest in the issue of preservation of historic buildings and
archaeological sites.

(b)
The state historic preservation officer shall be the chair of the task force.

(c)
Staff support shall be provided from the department of community, trade, and
economic development.

(3)
The task force shall report to appropriate committees of the legislature and
the governor by January 1, 2000.

(4)
This section expires June 30, 2000.

---
END ---