BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature reaffirms that the public policy of this state is to ensure equal
opportunity and social justice for all of its citizens. The legislature finds
that women have unique challenges in achieving equality as a result of historic
patterns of discrimination. It is the purpose of this chapter to improve the
status and well-being of women by ensuring their full and equal participation in
government, business, and education and recognizing their contribution to the
home, family, community, the private sector, and the economy. The legislature
further finds that it is desirable to direct a continuing evaluation and study
of state laws and rules as they affect women; and further, to encourage the
education of the citizens of this state with regard to public policy as it
relates to the diverse pursuits of women, and to encourage the promotion of
equality, as well as equity and social justice. Therefore, the legislature
deems it necessary to create a commission to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The Washington state women's commission is established in the office of the
governor.

(2)
The commission shall consist of nine members appointed by the governor with the
advice and consent of the senate. Two members of the senate, one from each of
the two major political parties, appointed by the president of the senate, and
two members of the house of representatives, one from each of the two major
political parties, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives,
shall serve as advisory members. The governor shall consider nominations for
membership based upon maintaining a balanced and diverse distribution of
ethnic, geographic, sex, age, socioeconomic status, and occupational
representation, where practicable.

(3)
All women's commission members shall serve at the pleasure of the governor, but
in no case may any member serve more than three years without formal
reappointment by the governor. All legislative advisory members shall serve
for a two-year term, and the position of any legislative advisory member shall
be deemed vacated whenever such member ceases to be a member of the house from
which he or she was appointed. Of the persons initially appointed by the
governor to the women's commission, three shall be appointed to serve one year,
three to serve two years, and three to serve three years. Upon expiration of
such terms, subsequent appointments shall be for three years. Any vacancies
occurring in the membership of the commission shall be filled for the remainder
of the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointments.

(4)(a)
Nonlegislative members shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(b)
Legislative members shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.

(5)
A simple majority of the membership constitutes a quorum for the purpose of
conducting business.

(6)
The governor shall appoint an executive director of the commission.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
executive director shall appoint staff who shall be state employees under Title
41 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
commission shall adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this
chapter in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The commission shall examine and define issues pertaining to the rights and
needs of all women and make recommendations to the governor, the legislature,
and state agencies with respect to desirable changes in programs, laws, and
administrative practices. The primary functions of the commission are to
address health care issues relevant to women and the economic condition of
women in the state.

(2)
The commission shall further advise such state agencies on the development and
implementation of comprehensive and coordinated policies, plans, and programs
focusing on the special problems and needs of women.

(3)
The commission may gather data and disseminate information to the public in
order to implement the purposes of this chapter.

(4)
Each state department and agency shall provide appropriate and reasonable
assistance to the commission as needed in order that the commission may carry
out the purposes of this chapter

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. In
carrying out its duties, the commission may establish such relationships with
public and private institutions, local governments, private industry, community
organizations, and other segments of the general public as may be needed to
promote equal opportunity for women in government, education, economic
security, employment, and services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
commission may receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from private sources
as may be made from time to time in trust or otherwise for the use and benefit
of the purposes of the commission and to expend the same or any income
therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments, and the
purposes of this chapter. The executive director shall make a report of such
funds received from private sources to the office of financial management on a
current basis. Such funds received from private sources shall not be applied
to reduce or substitute for the commission's budget as appropriated by the
legislature, but, shall be applied and expended toward projects and functions
authorized by this chapter that were not funded by the legislature.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. The
Washington state women's commission terminates on June 30, 2005.

---
END ---