BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that the following factors demonstrate the need for
changes in the commercial vehicle enforcement program:

(1)
The presence of commercial motor vehicles on Washington roads and highways is
increasing substantially per year;

(2)
Appropriately trained commercial vehicle enforcement officers are essential to
ensuring the safety of the traveling public;

(3)
Implementation of the Commercial Vehicle Information Systems and Networks
program and weigh-in-motion technology will increase program effectiveness and
the need for new processes to be used in commercial vehicle enforcement; and

(4)
The Washington state economy is becoming increasingly dependent on the safe and
efficient transportation of freight on state highways.

The
legislature finds that enhanced responsibility and training for commercial
vehicle enforcement officers will contribute to the efficient and safe delivery
of freight in Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

The
commercial vehicle enforcement program must be fully staffed using the
commercial vehicle enforcement officer and commercial vehicle officer
positions, including captains and lieutenants in supervisory positions, and
staffing levels as enacted in the transportation budget.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

The
powers and duties of the commercial vehicle enforcement officers are to enforce
state and federal laws and regulations relating to motor transport carriers and
other related statutes and regulations as directed by law. Commercial vehicle
enforcement officers have the same traffic infraction enforcement authority as
commissioned Washington state patrol officers as it relates to situations
involving commercial vehicles. Traffic infraction enforcement authority does
not include pursuit of vehicles. The patrol shall provide the training
necessary to ensure the safety and success of the officers in these duties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

Commercial vehicle enforcement officers may provide medical
assistance and direct traffic in situations where the officers can be of
assistance. The patrol shall continue to provide training to commercial
vehicle enforcement officers in first aid and traffic control.

---
END ---