BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

It
is a traffic infraction for a driver of a motor vehicle intending to board a
Washington state ferry, to: (1) Block a residential driveway while waiting to
board the ferry; or (2) move in front of another vehicle in a queue already
waiting to board the ferry, without the authorization of a state ferry system
employee. Vehicles qualifying for preferential loading privileges under rules
adopted by the department of transportation are exempt from this subsection.
In addition to any other penalty imposed for a violation of this section, the
driver shall be directed to immediately move the motor vehicle to the end of
the queue of vehicles waiting to board the ferry.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall take steps to mitigate problems associated
with lengthy ferry queues, including the blockage of residential driveways, by
implementing appropriate mitigation procedures and any feasible infrastructural
changes to enforce section 1 of this act.

---
END ---