BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that it is in the best interests of its citizens to take
advantage of federal laws requiring that federal agencies take account of state
and local government policies regarding the management of land and water
resources when federal agencies are conducting activities directly or approving
other activities through the issuance of federal permits or licenses. The
legislature finds that one such federal law, the coastal zone management act of
1972, requires federal agencies to determine that their activities, or the
activities of others seeking federal permits or licenses, are consistent with
state coastal zone management programs approved under the provisions of that
act. The legislature further finds that while Washington state has such an
approved program, being the first state to obtain such status, in 1976, the
approved program does not contain many existing state and local government
policies and programs that, if included, would be the basis for exerting far
greater influence upon the permitting activities and direct undertakings of
federal agencies in areas within or affecting the state's expansive coastal
zone.

For
these reasons it is the intent of this act to direct a review of the state's
existing program and the submission of additional state and local government
policies to the national oceanic and atmospheric administration for inclusion
in such program, and to direct that maximum state efforts be directed toward
implementing the state's role in federal consistency determinations to ensure
that state and local policies influence federal agency actions affecting the
state's coastal zone.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:

The
department is designated as the principal state agency for administering the
provisions of the federal coastal zone management act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1451 et
seq.), as it exists on January 1, 1999, and is authorized to receive and
administer federal grants to implement the act. The department, in the
implementation of the network of state and local policies and programs
comprising the state coastal zone management program, shall enter into
agreements of administration with such other state agencies and local
governments as appropriate to fully and effectively implement all elements of
the state's federally approved coastal zone management program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The department of ecology shall review the state and local policies included in
the state's approved coastal zone program, and other state and local policies
not included in the program, which if included would further the purposes of
protecting the state's coastal zone and influencing federal actions affecting
the state's coastal zone as expressed in section 1 of this act. This review
shall be conducted in consultation with other state agencies and local
governments administering the policies and programs under review, and, at a
minimum, shall include the departments of natural resources, fish and wildlife,
and community, trade, and economic development, and the governing bodies of the
counties included within the state's coastal zone.

(2)
The review shall include, but not be limited to, the policies in the following
acts applicable to land and water uses within the state's coastal zone,
including the implementing programs of state agencies and local governments
acting under the authorities provided in such acts:

(a)
Shoreline management, chapter 90.58 RCW;

(b)
Financial responsibility for oil transported by vessels, chapter 88.40 RCW;

(c)
Vessel oil spill prevention and response, chapter 88.46 RCW;

(d)
Water pollution control, chapter 90.48 RCW;

(e)
Oil and hazardous substance spill prevention and response, chapter 90.56 RCW;

(f)
Ocean resources management, chapter 43.143 RCW;

(g)
Growth management, chapter 36.70A RCW;

(h)
Air pollution control, chapter 70.94 RCW;

(i)
Forest practices, chapter 76.09 RCW;

(j)
Surface mining, chapter 78.44 RCW;

(k)
Aquatic lands management, chapters 79.90, 79.91, 79.92, 79.93, 79.94, 79.95,
and 79.96 RCW;

(l)
Hydraulics projects approval, chapter 75.20 RCW; and

(m)
Water resources management, chapters 90.03, 90.44, and 90.54 RCW.

(3)
The department shall conclude its review no later than July 1, 2001. The
department shall expeditiously thereafter apply to the appropriate federal
agency to have those state and local policies included in the federally
approved state coastal management program that would strengthen the program
consistent with the purposes of this act. The application shall identify the
state agencies and local governments responsible for administering those
policies.

(4)
This section expires December 31, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall compile the elements of the federally approved state
coastal management program into a single document to facilitate administration
of the program by the various state agencies and local governments responsible
for individual elements, and to facilitate public review and participation in
federal consistency reviews and other coastal management program activities.

(2) The department shall provide public notice of applications for
state concurrence in federal consistency determinations, and provide a
meaningful opportunity for public review and comment upon such applications.

---
END ---