BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the practice of establishing exclusive catch and release
recreational fisheries on steelhead trout by the fish and wildlife commission
requires that the commission commit significant resources to assure that these
fisheries are not subject to abuse by unknowing or uncaring anglers, and that
the fish and wildlife commission adopt rules that maximize recreational opportunities
without harming the steelhead resource.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
commission shall not authorize steelhead catch and release seasons or areas in
cases where there is insufficient enforcement staffing to assure that there is
a low mortality rate for catch and release steelhead fisheries.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
commission shall assess the threat to the steelhead trout resource posed by
catch and release fisheries that occur on the spawning beds while spawning fish
are present. The commission shall adopt rules that minimize the adverse
effects of catch and release fisheries on spawning steelhead trout.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A
steelhead catch and release mortality study shall be conducted by the
department of fish and wildlife in order to assess the rates of steelhead
mortality during a catch and release fishery. At least one aspect of the study
shall assess the affects of warm stream conditions on the survival of released
steelhead.

---
END ---