BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the contamination of properties used for illegal drug
manufacturing poses a threat to public health. The toxic chemicals left behind
by the illegal drug manufacturing must be cleaned up to prevent harm to subsequent
occupants of the properties. It is the intent of the legislature that
properties are decontaminated in a manner that is efficient, prompt, and that
makes them safe to reoccupy.

Sec.
2. RCW
64.44.010 and 1990 c 213 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
words and phrases defined in this section shall have the following meanings
when used in this chapter unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

(1)
"Authorized contractor" means a person who decontaminates,
demolishes, or disposes of contaminated property as required by this chapter
who is: (a) Certified by the department as provided for in RCW 64.44.060, or
(b) until January 1, 1991, listed with the department as provided for in section
8, chapter 213, Laws of 1990.

(2)
"Contaminated" or "contamination" means polluted by
hazardous chemicals so that the property is unfit for human habitation or use
due to immediate or long-term hazards. Property that at one time was
contaminated but has been satisfactorily decontaminated according to procedures
established by the state board of health is not "contaminated."

(3)
"Hazardous chemicals" means the following substances used in the
manufacture of illegal drugs: (a) Hazardous substances as defined in RCW
70.105D.020, and (b) precursor substances as defined in RCW 69.43.010 which the
state board of health, in consultation with the state board of pharmacy, has
determined present an immediate or long-term health hazard to humans.

(4)
"Officer" means a local health officer authorized under chapters
70.05, 70.08, and 70.46 RCW.

(5)
"Order" means an administrative action signed by the officer
informing potential occupants that a property has been contaminated with
hazardous chemicals as a result of illegal drug manufacturing or storage
activities and the premise is unfit for use until it has been decontaminated.

(6)
"Property" means any property, site, structure, or part of a
structure which is involved in the unauthorized manufacture or storage of
hazardous chemicals. This includes but is not limited to single-family
residences, units of multiplexes, condominiums, apartment buildings, boats,
motor vehicles, trailers, manufactured housing, or any shop, booth, or garden.

(7)
"Warning" means a posted notification by the officer, conspicuously
placed at the site of an illegal drug manufacturing or storage site, informing
potential occupants that hazardous chemicals may exist or have been removed
from the premises and that entry is unsafe.

Sec.
3. RCW
64.44.020 and 1990 c 213 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
a law enforcement agency becomes aware that property has been contaminated by
hazardous chemicals, that agency shall report the contamination to the local
health officer. The local health officer shall cause a posting of a ((notice))
warning on the premises ((immediately upon being notified)) within
one working day of notification of the contamination and shall cause an
inspection to be done on the property within fourteen days after receiving the
notice of contamination. If a property owner believes that a tenant has
contaminated property that was being leased or rented, and the property is
vacated or abandoned, then the property owner shall contact the local health
officer about the possible contamination. Local health officers or boards may
charge property owners reasonable fees for inspections of suspected
contaminated property requested by property owners.

If
property is determined to be contaminated, then the local health officer shall
cause a posting of a notice on the premises. A local health officer may enter,
inspect, and survey at reasonable times any properties for which there are
reasonable grounds to believe that the property has become contaminated.

Local
health officers must report all cases of contaminated property to the state
department of health. The department may make the list of contaminated
properties available to health associations, landlord and realtor
organizations, prosecutors, and other interested groups. The department shall
promptly update the list of contaminated properties to remove those which have
been decontaminated according to provisions of this chapter.

The
local health officer may determine when the services of an authorized
contractor are necessary.

Sec.
4. RCW
64.44.030 and 1990 c 213 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

If
after the inspection of the property, the local health officer finds that it is
contaminated, then the property shall be found unfit for use. The local health
officer shall cause to be served an order prohibiting use either
personally or by certified mail, with return receipt requested, upon all
occupants and persons having any interest therein as shown upon the records of
the auditor's office of the county in which such property is located((, and)).
The local health officer shall also post the order prohibiting
use in a conspicuous place on the property((, an order prohibiting use)).
If the whereabouts of such persons is unknown and the same cannot be
ascertained by the local health officer in the exercise of reasonable
diligence, and the health officer makes an affidavit to that effect, then the
serving of the order upon such persons may be made either by personal service
or by mailing a copy of the order by certified mail, postage prepaid, return
receipt requested, to each person at the address appearing on the last
equalized tax assessment roll of the county where the property is located or at
the address known to the county assessor, and the order shall be posted
conspicuously at the residence. A copy of the order shall also be mailed,
addressed to each person or party having a recorded right, title, estate, lien,
or interest in the property. Such order shall contain a notice that a hearing
before the local health board or officer shall be held upon the request of a
person required to be notified of the order under this section. The request
for a hearing must be made within ten days of serving the order. The hearing
shall then be held within not less than twenty days nor more than thirty days
after the serving of the order. The officer shall prohibit use as long as the
property is found to be contaminated. A copy of the order shall also be filed
with the auditor of the county in which the property is located, and such
filing of the complaint or order shall have the same force and effect as other
lis pendens notices provided by law. In any hearing concerning whether property
is fit for use, the property owner has the burden of showing that the property
is decontaminated or fit for use. The owner or any person having an interest
in the property may file an appeal on any order issued by the local health
board or officer within thirty days from the date of service of the order with
the appeals commission established pursuant to RCW 35.80.030. All proceedings
before the appeals commission, including any subsequent appeals to superior
court, shall be governed by the procedures established in chapter 35.80 RCW.

Sec.
5. RCW
64.44.040 and 1990 c 213 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
city or county in which the contaminated property is located may take action to
condemn or demolish property or to require the property be vacated or the
contents removed from the property. The city or county ((must)) may
use an authorized contractor if property is demolished, decontaminated,
or removed under this section. No city or county may condemn or demolish
property pursuant to this section until all procedures granting the right of
notice and the opportunity to appeal in RCW 64.44.030 have been exhausted.

Sec.
6. RCW
64.44.050 and 1990 c 213 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

An
owner of contaminated property who desires to have the property decontaminated
((must)) shall use the services of an authorized contractor ((to
decontaminate the property)) unless determined otherwise by the health
officer. The contractor shall prepare and submit a written work plan for
decontamination to the local health officer. The local health officer may
charge a reasonable fee for review of the work plan. If the work plan is
approved and the decontamination is completed and the property is retested
according to the plan and properly documented, then the health officer shall
allow reuse of the property. A ((notice)) release for reuse document
shall be recorded in the real property records ((if applicable,))
indicating the property has been decontaminated in accordance with rules of the
state department of health.

Sec.
7. RCW
64.44.060 and 1997 c 58 s 878 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
After January 1, 1991, a contractor may not perform decontamination,
demolition, or disposal work unless issued a certificate by the state
department of health. The department shall establish performance standards for
contractors by rule in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative
procedure act. The department shall train and test, or may approve courses to
train and test, contractors and their employees on the essential elements in
assessing property used as an illegal drug manufacturing or storage site to
determine hazard reduction measures needed, techniques for adequately reducing
contaminants, use of personal protective equipment, methods for proper decontamination,
demolition, removal, and disposal of contaminated property, and relevant
federal and state regulations. Upon successful completion of the training, the
contractor or employee shall be certified.

(2)
The department may require the successful completion of annual refresher
courses provided or approved by the department for the continued certification
of the contractor or employee.

(3)
The department shall provide for reciprocal certification of any individual
trained to engage in decontamination, demolition, or disposal work in another
state when the prior training is shown to be substantially similar to the
training required by the department. The department may require such
individuals to take an examination or refresher course before certification.

(4)
The department may deny, suspend, or revoke a certificate for failure to comply
with the requirements of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant to this
chapter. A certificate may be denied, suspended, or revoked on any of the
following grounds:

(a)
Failing to perform decontamination, demolition, or disposal work under the
supervision of trained personnel;

(b)
Failing to file a work plan;

(c)
Failing to perform work pursuant to the work plan;

(d)
Failing to perform work that meets the requirements of the department;

(e)
The certificate was obtained by error, misrepresentation, or fraud; or

(f)
If the person has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department
of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a
support order or a residential or visitation order. If the person has
continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the
suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon
the department's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and
health services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

(5)
A contractor who violates any provision of this chapter may be assessed a fine
not to exceed five hundred dollars for each violation.

(6)
The department of health shall prescribe fees as provided for in RCW 43.70.250
for the issuance and renewal of certificates, the administration of
examinations, and for the review of training courses.

(7) The decontamination account is hereby established in the state
treasury. All fees collected under this chapter shall be deposited in this
account. Moneys in the account may only be spent after appropriation for costs
incurred by the department in the administration and enforcement of this
chapter.

---
END ---