BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.71.010 and 1996 c 138 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Action team" means the Puget Sound water quality action team.

(2)
"Chair" means the chair of the action team.

(3)
"Council" means the Puget Sound interagency advisory council
created in RCW 90.71.030.

(4)
"Puget Sound management plan" means the 1994 Puget Sound water
quality management plan as it exists June 30, 1996, and as subsequently amended
by the action team.

(5)
"Support staff" means the staff to the action team.

(6)
"Work plan" means the work plan and budget developed by the action
team.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.71.020 and 1998 c 246 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The Puget Sound action team is created. The action team shall consist of thirteen
members: ((The directors of the departments of ecology; agriculture;
natural resources; fish and wildlife; and community, trade, and economic
development; the secretaries of the departments of health and transportation;
the director of the parks and recreation commission; the director of the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation; the administrative officer of the
conservation commission designated in RCW 89.08.050;)) One person
representing cities, appointed by the governor; one person representing
counties, appointed by the governor; one person representing federally
recognized tribes, appointed by the governor; five members appointed by the
governor, representing business, the environmental community, agriculture, and
the shellfish industry; two members of the senate, selected by the president of
the senate, with one from each major caucus; two members of the house of
representatives, selected by the speaker of the house, with one member from
each major caucus; and the chair of the action team. ((The action team
shall also include the following ex officio nonvoting members: The regional
director of the United States environmental protection agency; the regional
administrator of the national marine fisheries service; and the regional
supervisor of the United States fish and wildlife service.)) The
representative of counties and the representative of cities shall be a current
or former elected city or county official. The legislative members shall be
nonvoting members of the team. The members appointed by the governor are
subject to senate confirmation. The members ((representing cities and
counties)) appointed by the governor shall each be compensated as
provided in RCW 43.03.250, and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Voting members shall serve
four-year terms. Of the initial members appointed to the team, three shall
serve for two years, three shall serve for three years, and three shall serve
for four years. Thereafter members shall be appointed to four-year terms.
Vacancies shall be filled by appointment in the same manner as the original
appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term of the position being
vacated.

(2)
The action team shall:

(a)
Prepare a Puget Sound work plan and budget for inclusion in the governor's
biennial budget;

(b)
Coordinate monitoring and research programs as provided in RCW 90.71.060;

(c)
Work under the direction of the action team chair as provided in RCW 90.71.040;

(d)
Coordinate permitting requirements as necessary to expedite permit issuance for
any local watershed plan developed pursuant to rules adopted under this
chapter;

(e)
Identify and resolve any policy or rule conflicts that may exist between one or
more agencies represented on the action team;

(f)
Periodically amend the Puget Sound management plan;

(g)
Enter into, amend, and terminate contracts with individuals, corporations, or
research institutions for the purposes of this chapter;

(h)
Receive such gifts, grants, and endowments, in trust or otherwise, for the use
and benefit of the purposes of the action team. The action team may expend the
same or any income therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or
endowments;

(i)
Promote extensive public participation, and otherwise seek to broadly
disseminate information concerning Puget Sound;

(j)
Receive and expend funding from other public agencies;

(k)
To reduce costs and improve efficiency, review by December 1, 1996, all
requirements for reports and documentation from state agencies and local
governments specified in the plan for the purpose of eliminating and
consolidating reporting requirements; and

(l)
Beginning in December 1998, and every two years thereafter, submit a report to
the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature that describes
and evaluates the successes and shortcomings of the current work plan relative
to the priority problems identified for each geographic area of Puget Sound.

(3)
By July 1, 1996, the action team shall begin developing its initial work plan,
which shall include the coordination of necessary support staff.

(4)
The action team shall incorporate, to the maximum extent possible, the
recommendations of the council regarding amendments to the Puget Sound
management plan and the work plan.

(5)
All proceedings of the action team are subject to the open public meetings act
under chapter 42.30 RCW.

Sec.
3. RCW
90.71.030 and 1996 c 138 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is established the Puget Sound interagency advisory council ((composed
of nine members. Seven members shall be appointed by the governor. In making
these appointments, the governor shall include representation from business,
the environmental community, agriculture, the shellfish industry, counties,
cities, and the tribes. One member shall be a member of the senate selected by
the president of the senate and one member shall be a member of the house of
representatives selected by the speaker of the house of representatives. The
legislative members shall be nonvoting members of the council. Appointments to
the council shall reflect geographical balance and the diversity of population
within the Puget Sound basin. Members shall serve four-year terms. Of the
initial members appointed to the council, two shall serve for two years, two
shall serve for three years, and two shall serve for four years. Thereafter
members shall be appointed to four-year terms. Vacancies shall be filled by
appointment in the same manner as the original appointment for the remainder of
the unexpired term of the position being vacated. Nonlegislative members shall
be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
Legislative members shall be reimbursed as provided in RCW 44.04.120)),
which shall consist of: The directors of the departments of ecology,
agriculture, natural resources, fish and wildlife, and community, trade, and
economic development; the secretaries of the departments of health and
transportation; the director of the parks and recreation commission; the
director of the interagency committee for outdoor recreation; the administrative
officer of the conservation commission designated in RCW 89.08.050; one
representative each of cities, counties, and tribes, appointed by the governor;
the president of the University of Washington, or the president's designee; and
the president of Washington State University, or the president's designee. The
chair shall also invite to participate as members the regional director of the
United States environmental protection agency; the regional administrator of
the national marine fisheries service; and the regional supervisor of the
United States fish and wildlife service.

(2)
The council shall:

(a)
Recommend to the action team projects and activities for inclusion in the
biennial work plan;

(b)
Recommend to the action team coordination of work plan activities with other
relevant activities, including but not limited to, agencies' activities other
than those funded through the plan, local plan initiatives, and governmental
and nongovernmental watershed restoration and protection activities; and

(c)
Recommend to the action team proposed amendments to the Puget Sound management
plan.

(3) The chair of the action team shall convene the council at least
four times per year and shall jointly convene the council and the action team
at least two times per year.

---
END ---