BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
48.43.005 and 1997 c 231 s 202 and 1997 c 55 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Unless
otherwise specifically provided, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Adjusted community rate" means the rating method used to establish
the premium for health plans adjusted to reflect actuarially demonstrated
differences in utilization or cost attributable to geographic region, age,
family size, and use of wellness activities.

(2)
"Basic health plan" means the plan described under chapter 70.47 RCW,
as revised from time to time.

(3)
"Basic health plan model plan" means a health plan as required in RCW
70.47.060(2)(d).

(4)
"Basic health plan services" means that schedule of covered health
services, including the description of how those benefits are to be
administered, that are required to be delivered to an enrollee under the basic
health plan, as revised from time to time.

(5)
"Certification" means a determination by a review organization that
an admission, extension of stay, or other health care service or procedure has
been reviewed and, based on the information provided, meets the clinical
requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness, level of care, or
effectiveness under the auspices of the applicable health benefit plan.

(6)
"Concurrent review" means utilization review conducted during a
patient's hospital stay or course of treatment.

(7)
"Covered person" or "enrollee" means a person covered by a
health plan including an enrollee, subscriber, policyholder, beneficiary of a
group plan, or individual covered by any other health plan.

(8)
"Dependent" means, at a minimum, the enrollee's legal spouse and
unmarried dependent children who qualify for coverage under the enrollee's
health benefit plan.

(9)
"Eligible employee" means an employee who works on a full-time basis
with a normal work week of thirty or more hours. The term includes a
self-employed individual, including a sole proprietor, a partner of a
partnership, and may include an independent contractor, if the self-employed
individual, sole proprietor, partner, or independent contractor is included as
an employee under a health benefit plan of a small employer, but does not work
less than thirty hours per week and derives at least seventy-five percent of
his or her income from a trade or business through which he or she has
attempted to earn taxable income and for which he or she has filed the
appropriate internal revenue service form. Persons covered under a health
benefit plan pursuant to the consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of
1986 shall not be considered eligible employees for purposes of minimum
participation requirements of chapter 265, Laws of 1995.

(10)
"Emergency medical condition" means the emergent and acute onset of a
symptom or symptoms, including severe pain, that would lead a prudent layperson
acting reasonably to believe that a health condition exists that requires
immediate medical attention, if failure to provide medical attention would
result in serious impairment to bodily functions or serious dysfunction of a
bodily organ or part, or would place the person's health in serious jeopardy.

(11)
"Emergency services" means otherwise covered health care services
medically necessary to evaluate and treat an emergency medical condition,
provided in a hospital emergency department.

(12)
"Enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing" means amounts paid to health
carriers directly providing services, health care providers, or health care
facilities by enrollees and may include copayments, coinsurance, or
deductibles.

(13)
"Genetic information" means information about genes, gene
products, or inherited characteristics.

(14)
"Genetic services" means health services to obtain, assess, and
interpret genetic information for diagnostic and therapeutic purposes and for
genetic education and counseling.

(15)
"Grievance" means a written complaint submitted by or on behalf of a
covered person regarding: (a) Denial of payment for medical services or
nonprovision of medical services included in the covered person's health
benefit plan, or (b) service delivery issues other than denial of payment for
medical services or nonprovision of medical services, including dissatisfaction
with medical care, waiting time for medical services, provider or staff
attitude or demeanor, or dissatisfaction with service provided by the health
carrier.

(((14)))
(16) "Health care facility" or "facility" means
hospices licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW, rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020,
psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, nursing homes licensed
under chapter 18.51 RCW, community mental health centers licensed under chapter
71.05 or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment centers licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW, ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or surgical facilities licensed
under chapter 70.41 RCW, drug and alcohol treatment facilities licensed under
chapter 70.96A RCW, and home health agencies licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW,
and includes such facilities if owned and operated by a political subdivision
or instrumentality of the state and such other facilities as required by
federal law and implementing regulations.

(((15)))
(17) "Health care provider" or "provider" means:

(a)
A person regulated under Title 18 or chapter 70.127 RCW, to practice health or
health-related services or otherwise practicing health care services in this
state consistent with state law; or

(b)
An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of this subsection, acting in
the course and scope of his or her employment.

(((16)))
(18) "Health care service" means that service offered or
provided by health care facilities and health care providers relating to the
prevention, cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.

(((17)))
(19) "Health carrier" or "carrier" means a
disability insurer regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care
service contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020.

(((18)))
(20) "Health plan" or "health benefit plan" means
any policy, contract, or agreement offered by a health carrier to provide,
arrange, reimburse, or pay for health care services except the following:

(a)
Long-term care insurance governed by chapter 48.84 RCW;

(b)
Medicare supplemental health insurance governed by chapter 48.66 RCW;

(c)
Limited health care services offered by limited health care service contractors
in accordance with RCW 48.44.035;

(d)
Disability income;

(e)
Coverage incidental to a property/casualty liability insurance policy such as
automobile personal injury protection coverage and homeowner guest medical;

(f)
Workers' compensation coverage;

(g)
Accident only coverage;

(h)
Specified disease and hospital confinement indemnity when marketed solely as a
supplement to a health plan;

(i)
Employer-sponsored self-funded health plans;

(j)
Dental only and vision only coverage; and

(k)
Plans deemed by the insurance commissioner to have a short-term limited purpose
or duration, or to be a student-only plan that is guaranteed renewable while
the covered person is enrolled as a regular full-time undergraduate or graduate
student at an accredited higher education institution, after a written request
for such classification by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the
insurance commissioner.

(((19)))
(21) "Material modification" means a change in the actuarial
value of the health plan as modified of more than five percent but less than
fifteen percent.

(((20)))
(22) "Open enrollment" means the annual sixty-two day period
during the months of July and August during which every health carrier offering
individual health plan coverage must accept onto individual coverage any state
resident within the carrier's service area regardless of health condition who
submits an application in accordance with RCW 48.43.035(1).

(((21)))
(23) "Preexisting condition" means any medical condition,
illness, or injury that existed any time prior to the effective date of
coverage.

(((22)))
(24) "Premium" means all sums charged, received, or deposited
by a health carrier as consideration for a health plan or the continuance of a
health plan. Any assessment or any "membership," "policy,"
"contract," "service," or similar fee or charge made by a
health carrier in consideration for a health plan is deemed part of the
premium. "Premium" shall not include amounts paid as enrollee
point-of-service cost-sharing.

(((23)))
(25) "Review organization" means a disability insurer
regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care service contractor as
defined in RCW 48.44.010, or health maintenance organization as defined in RCW
48.46.020, and entities affiliated with, under contract with, or acting on
behalf of a health carrier to perform a utilization review.

(((24)))
(26) "Small employer" means any person, firm, corporation,
partnership, association, political subdivision except school districts, or
self-employed individual that is actively engaged in business that, on at least
fifty percent of its working days during the preceding calendar quarter,
employed no more than fifty eligible employees, with a normal work week of
thirty or more hours, the majority of whom were employed within this state, and
is not formed primarily for purposes of buying health insurance and in which a
bona fide employer-employee relationship exists. In determining the number of
eligible employees, companies that are affiliated companies, or that are
eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of taxation by this state,
shall be considered an employer. Subsequent to the issuance of a health plan
to a small employer and for the purpose of determining eligibility, the size of
a small employer shall be determined annually. Except as otherwise
specifically provided, a small employer shall continue to be considered a small
employer until the plan anniversary following the date the small employer no
longer meets the requirements of this definition. The term "small
employer" includes a self-employed individual or sole proprietor. The
term "small employer" also includes a self-employed individual or sole
proprietor who derives at least seventy-five percent of his or her income from
a trade or business through which the individual or sole proprietor has
attempted to earn taxable income and for which he or she has filed the
appropriate internal revenue service form 1040, schedule C or F, for the
previous taxable year.

(((25)))
(27) "Utilization review" means the prospective, concurrent,
or retrospective assessment of the necessity and appropriateness of the
allocation of health care resources and services of a provider or facility,
given or proposed to be given to an enrollee or group of enrollees.

(((26)))
(28) "Wellness activity" means an explicit program of an
activity consistent with department of health guidelines, such as, smoking
cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse,
appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and motorcycle safety, blood
cholesterol reduction, and nutrition education for the purpose of improving
enrollee health status and reducing health service costs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A health carrier may not deny or cancel health plan coverage, or vary the
premiums, terms, or conditions for health plan coverage, for an individual or a
family member of an individual:

(a)
On the basis of genetic information; or

(b)
Because the individual or family member of an individual has requested or
received genetic services.

(2)(a)
A health carrier may not request or require an individual to whom the carrier
provides health plan coverage, or an individual who desires the carrier to
provide health plan coverage, to disclose to the carrier genetic information
about the individual or family member of the individual.

(b)
A health carrier may not disclose genetic information about an individual
without the prior written authorization of the individual or legal
representative of the individual. Authorization is required for each
disclosure and must include an identification of the person to whom the
disclosure is to be made.

(c)
A health carrier may disclose genetic information about an individual for use
in research projects that are approved by an institutional review board upon
receipt of a written consent form.

(d)
A health carrier may disclose information pertaining to the occurrence of a
disease in an individual for use by the health carrier, within its
organization, for the sole purpose of assembling a family history and alerting
other family members of the prevalence of a hereditary disease derived from
genetic information. The family history information may be disclosed to
another family member who is receiving disease prevention services.

(e)
This section does not prohibit or otherwise limit newborn screening activities
under chapter 70.83 RCW.

(3)
The insurance commissioner shall enforce the requirements established under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

(4)
A person may bring a civil action:

(a)
To enjoin any act or practice that violates subsection (1) or (2) of this
section;

(b)
To obtain other appropriate equitable relief: (i) To redress such violations;
or (ii) to enforce subsection (1) or (2) of this section; or

(c)
To obtain other legal relief, including monetary damages.

(5)
The insurance commissioner may adopt rules necessary or appropriate to carry
out this section.

(6) Nothing in this section requires a health plan to provide
benefits to a particular participant or beneficiary.

---
END ---