BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes the role of health care providers as the appropriate
authority to determine and establish the delivery of quality health care
services to mastectomy patients. It is the intent of the legislature to
recognize patient preference and the clinical sovereignty of providers as they
make determinations regarding the length of time individual patients may need
to remain in a health care facility after mastectomies. It is not the intent
of the legislature to diminish a carrier's ability to utilize managed care
strategies but to ensure the clinical judgment of the provider is not
undermined by restrictive carrier contracts or utilization review criteria that
fail to recognize individual needs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following definitions apply
throughout this section.

(a)
"Attending provider" means a provider who: Has clinical hospital
privileges consistent with RCW 70.43.020; is included in a provider network of
the carrier that is providing coverage; and is a physician licensed under
chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

(b)
"Health carrier" or "carrier" means disability insurers
regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care services contractors
regulated under chapter 48.44 RCW, health maintenance organizations regulated
under chapter 48.46 RCW, plans operating under the health care authority under
chapter 41.05 RCW, the state health insurance pool operating under chapter
48.41 RCW, and insuring entities regulated under this chapter.

(c)
"Mastectomy" means removal of all or part of the breast for medically
necessary reasons, as determined by a licensed physician or surgeon. Procedures
covered under this definition should include unilateral simple, bilateral
simple, unilateral extended simple, unilateral extended with unilateral simple,
bilateral extended simple, and unilateral radical, as well as lumpectomy.

(2)(a)
Every health carrier that provides coverage for mastectomies must permit the
attending provider, in consultation with the patient, to make decisions on
whether the surgery will be inpatient or outpatient, and if inpatient, the
length of inpatient stay, rather than making such decisions through contracts
or agreements between providers, hospitals, and insurers. These decisions must
be based on accepted medical practice.

(b)
Nothing in this section requires attending providers to authorize care they
believe to be medically unnecessary.

(3)
No carrier that provides coverage for mastectomies may deselect, terminate the
services of, require additional documentation from, require additional
utilization review of, reduce payments to, or otherwise provide financial
disincentives to any attending provider or health care facility solely as a
result of the attending provider or health care facility ordering care
consistent with the provisions of this section. Nothing in this section
prevents any insurer from reimbursing an attending provider or health care
facility on a capitated, case rate, or other financial incentive basis.

(4)
Every carrier that provides coverage for mastectomies must provide notice to
policyholders regarding the coverage required under this section. The notice
must be in writing and must be transmitted at the earliest of the next mailing
to the policyholder, the yearly summary of benefits sent to the policyholder,
or January 1 of the year following the effective date of this section.

(5)
This section does not establish a standard of medical care.

(6)
This section applies to coverage for mastectomies under a contract issued or
renewed by a health carrier after the effective date of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following definitions apply
throughout this section.

(a)
"Attending provider" means a provider who: Has clinical hospital
privileges consistent with RCW 70.43.020; is included in a provider network of
the carrier that is providing coverage; and is a physician licensed under
chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

(b)
"Mastectomy" means removal of all or part of the breast for medically
necessary reasons, as determined by a licensed physician or surgeon.
Procedures covered under this definition should include unilateral simple,
bilateral simple, unilateral extended simple, unilateral extended with
unilateral simple, bilateral extended simple, and unilateral radical, as well
as lumpectomy.

(2)(a)
Every state purchased health care plan that provides coverage for mastectomies
must permit the attending provider, in consultation with the patient, to make
decisions on whether the surgery will be inpatient or outpatient, and if
inpatient, the length of inpatient stay, rather than making such decisions
through contracts or agreements between providers, hospitals, and insurers.
These decisions must be based on accepted medical practice.

(b)
Nothing in this section requires attending providers to authorize care they
believe to be medically unnecessary.

(3)
No state purchased health care plan that provides coverage for mastectomies may
deselect, terminate the services of, require additional documentation from,
require additional utilization review of, reduce payments to, or otherwise
provide financial disincentives to any attending provider or health care
facility solely as a result of the attending provider or health care facility
ordering care consistent with the provisions of this section. Nothing in this
section prevents any insurer from reimbursing an attending provider or health
care facility on a capitated, case rate, or other financial incentive basis.

(4)
Every state purchased health care plan that provides coverage for mastectomies
must provide notice to policyholders regarding the coverage required under this
section. The notice must be in writing and must be transmitted at the earliest
of the next mailing to the policyholder, the yearly summary of benefits sent to
the policyholder, or January 1 of the year following the effective date of this
section.

(5)
This section does not establish a standard of medical care.

(6) This section applies to coverage for mastectomies under a
contract issued or renewed by a state purchased health care plan after the
effective date of this section.

---
END ---