BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding the thirty-day time limit in RCW 80.28.060, when the commission
elects to consider a water company's filing for a proposed change in rates or
charges at an open meeting in lieu of a hearing, and receives public comment at
the open meeting in opposition to the recommended changes, the commission shall
suspend the proposed changes for up to fourteen days from the date of the open
meeting for the limited purpose of:

(a)
Receiving additional written comments, which shall be due within seven days, in
response to commission staff recommendations or the company's testimony
presented at the open meeting; and

(b)
Considering public comment received at the open meeting and filed within seven
days after the open meeting, prior to taking final action on the proposed
changes.

(2)
The commission shall provide, upon request of a customer affected by a water
company's filing for a proposed change in rates or charges, a customer
information document that explains the following in a clear and concise manner:

(a)
The types of complaints about a water company's service over which the
commission does and does not have the authority to act;

(b)
The standards by which the commission must determine whether a water company is
entitled to a proposed change in its rates or charges;

(c)
The process and timelines in which the commission must act on a water company's
proposed change in its rates or charges, including: (i) The ways in which a
customer can effectively participate in the process prior to the commission
issuing its final order on the proposed changes; and (ii) the process by which
a customer can appeal a final order.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The utilities and transportation commission shall prepare the customer
information document by September 1, 1999, with the participation of the office
of the attorney general public counsel and the department of health.

(2) This section expires January 1, 2000.

---
END ---