BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.41.122 and 1995 c 282 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
RCW 70.41.120, a hospital accredited by the joint commission on the
accreditation of health care organizations or the American osteopathic
association is not subject to the annual inspection provided for in RCW
70.41.120 if:

(1)
The department determines that the applicable survey standards of the joint
commission on the accreditation of health care organizations or the American
osteopathic association are substantially equivalent to its own;

(2)
It has been inspected by the joint commission on the accreditation of health
care organizations or the American osteopathic association within the
previous twelve months; and

(3) The department receives directly from the joint commission on
the accreditation of health care organizations, the American osteopathic
association, or the hospital itself copies of the survey reports prepared
by the joint commission on the accreditation of health care organizations or
the American osteopathic association demonstrating that the hospital meets
applicable standards.

---
END ---