BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
34.05.518 and 1995 c 382 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A final decision of the public employment relations commission in an
adjudicative proceeding under this chapter is directly reviewable by the court
of appeals. Review shall be initiated by filing a notice of appeal with the
court of appeals, at the appellant's option, for the division containing (a)
Thurston county, (b) the county where the public employer is located, or (c)
the county where the appellant resides or has its principal place of business.

(2)
The final decision of ((an)) any other administrative agency in
an adjudicative proceeding under this chapter may be directly reviewed by the
court of appeals either (a) upon certification by the superior court pursuant
to subsection (3) of this section or (b) if the final decision is from
an environmental board as defined in subsection (((3))) (4) of
this section, upon acceptance by the court of appeals after a certificate of
appealability has been filed by the environmental board that rendered the final
decision.

(((2)))
(3) For direct review upon certification by the superior court, an
application for direct review must be filed with the superior court within
thirty days of the filing of the petition for review in superior court. The
superior court may certify a case for direct review only if the judicial review
is limited to the record of the agency proceeding and the court finds that:

(a)
Fundamental and urgent issues affecting the future administrative process or
the public interest are involved which require a prompt determination;

(b)
Delay in obtaining a final and prompt determination of such issues would be
detrimental to any party or the public interest;

(c)
An appeal to the court of appeals would be likely regardless of the
determination in superior court; and

(d)
The appellate court's determination in the proceeding would have significant
precedential value.

Procedures
for certification shall be established by court rule.

(((3)))
(4)(a) For the purposes of direct review of final decisions of
environmental boards, environmental boards include those boards identified in
RCW 43.21B.005 and growth management hearings boards as identified in RCW
36.70A.250.

(b)
An environmental board may issue a certificate of appealability if it finds
that delay in obtaining a final and prompt determination of the issues would be
detrimental to any party or the public interest and either:

(i)
Fundamental and urgent state-wide or regional issues are raised; or

(ii)
The proceeding is likely to have significant precedential value.

(((4)))
(5) The environmental board shall state in the certificate of
appealability which criteria it applied, explain how that criteria was met, and
file with the certificate a copy of the final decision.

(((5)))
(6) For an appellate court to accept direct review of a final decision
of an environmental board, it shall consider the same criteria outlined in
subsection (((3))) (4) of this section.

(((6)))
(7) The procedures for direct review of final decisions of environmental
boards include:

(a)
Within thirty days after filing the petition for review with the superior
court, a party may file an application for direct review with the superior
court and serve the appropriate environmental board and all parties of record.
The application shall request the environmental board to file a certificate of
appealability.

(b)
If an issue on review is the jurisdiction of the environmental board, the board
may file an application for direct review on that issue.

(c)
The environmental board shall have thirty days to grant or deny the request for
a certificate of appealability and its decision shall be filed with the
superior court and served on all parties of record.

(d)
If a certificate of appealability is issued, the parties shall have fifteen
days from the date of service to file a notice of discretionary review in the
superior court, and the notice shall include a copy of the certificate of
appealability and a copy of the final decision.

(e)
If the appellate court accepts review, the certificate of appealability shall
be transmitted to the court of appeals as part of the certified record.

(f)
If a certificate of appealability is denied, review shall be by the superior
court. The superior court's decision may be appealed to the court of appeals.

Sec.
2. RCW
34.05.514 and 1995 c 347 s 113 and 1995 c 292 s 9 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and RCW 34.05.518(1)
and 34.05.570(2), proceedings for review under this chapter shall be
instituted by paying the fee required under RCW 36.18.020 and filing a petition
in the superior court, at the petitioner's option, for (a) Thurston county, (b)
the county of the petitioner's residence or principal place of business, or (c)
in any county where the property owned by the petitioner and affected by the
contested decision is located.

(2) For proceedings involving institutions of higher education, the
petition shall be filed either in the county in which the principal office of
the institution involved is located or in the county of a branch campus if the
action involves such branch.

---
END ---