BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
2.06.050 and 1969 ex.s. c 221 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

A
judge of the court shall be((:

(1)
Admitted to the practice of law in the courts of this state not less than five
years prior to taking office.

(2))) a
resident for not less than one year at the time of appointment or initial
election in the district for which his or her position was created.

Sec.
2. RCW
3.34.060 and 1991 c 361 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

To
be eligible to file a declaration of candidacy for and to serve as a district
court judge, a person must((:

(1))) be
a registered voter of the district court district and electoral district, if
any((; and

(2)
Be either:

(a)
A lawyer admitted to practice law in the state of Washington; or

(b)
A person who has been elected and has served as a justice of the peace,
district judge, municipal judge, or police judge in Washington; or

(c) In those districts having a population of less than five
thousand persons, a person who has taken and passed the qualifying examination
for the office of district judge as shall be provided by rule of the supreme
court)).

---
END ---