BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.56.070 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.070 are each amended to read as
follows:

(1)
Every person who shall without the permission of the owner or person entitled
to the possession thereof intentionally take or drive away any automobile or
motor vehicle, whether propelled by steam, electricity, or internal combustion
engine, the property of another, shall be deemed guilty of a felony, and every
person voluntarily riding in or upon said automobile or motor vehicle with
knowledge of the fact that the same was unlawfully taken shall be equally
guilty with the person taking or driving said automobile or motor vehicle and
shall be deemed guilty of taking a motor vehicle without permission.

(2)
Taking a motor vehicle without permission is a class ((C)) B
felony.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.94A.320 and 1998 c 290 s 4, 1998 c 219 s 4, 1998 c 82 s 1, and 1998 c 78 s 1
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVAggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XIVMurder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

XIIIMurder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Malicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW
70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(a))

XIRape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

XKidnapping 1 (RCW
9A.40.020)

Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Over 18 and deliver heroin, a narcotic from Schedule
I or II, or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Manufacture of methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

IXAssault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW
70.74.270(2))

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV,
or V or a nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam, from Schedule I-V to someone under
18 and 3 years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW
9.68A.040)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 88.12.029)

VIIIArson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Promoting Prostitution 1
(RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Possession of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine with
intent to manufacture methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle
in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any
vessel in a reckless manner (RCW 88.12.029)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

VIIBurglary 1 (RCW
9A.52.020)

Vehicular Homicide, by
disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft,
by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 88.12.029)

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion)
(RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Sending, bringing into
state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Involving a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW
70.74.270(3))

VIBribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110,
9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(b))

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II (except heroin or cocaine) or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

VPersistent prison
misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Abandonment of dependent
person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Advancing money or property for extortionate
extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.040)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(b))

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Delivery of imitation controlled substance by person
eighteen or over to person under eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

IVResidential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW
9A.56.080)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW
9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW
72.66.060)

Hit and Run‑-Injury Accident (RCW
46.52.020(4))

Hit and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW
88.12.155(3))

Vehicular Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW 88.12.032)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except marijuana, amphetamine, methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW
9A.82.070)

Use of Proceeds of
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(2))

IIICriminal Gang
Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2
(RCW 9A.42.030)

Abandonment of dependent
person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Extortion 2 (RCW
9A.56.130)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW
72.65.070)

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(c))

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Delivery of a material in lieu of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to
distribute an imitation controlled substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Recklessly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(1))

Theft of livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

IIUnlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW
9A.56.070)

Class B Felony Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased
Property (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW
18.130.190(7))

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Possession of controlled substance that is either heroin
or narcotics from Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

ITheft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Class C Felony Theft of
Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Possession of Stolen
Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

((Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW
9A.56.070)))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW
46.61.024)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW
9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and
(3))

False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW
69.50.403)

Possess Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine
or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Sec.
3. RCW
9.94A.360 and 1998 c 211 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
offender score is measured on the horizontal axis of the sentencing grid. The
offender score rules are as follows:

The
offender score is the sum of points accrued under this section rounded down to
the nearest whole number.

(1)
A prior conviction is a conviction which exists before the date of sentencing
for the offense for which the offender score is being computed. Convictions
entered or sentenced on the same date as the conviction for which the offender
score is being computed shall be deemed "other current offenses"
within the meaning of RCW 9.94A.400.

(2)
Class A and sex prior felony convictions shall always be included in the
offender score. Class B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall
not be included in the offender score, if since the last date of release from
confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent
ten consecutive years in the community without committing any crime that
subsequently results in a conviction. Class C prior felony convictions other
than sex offenses shall not be included in the offender score if, since the
last date of release from confinement (including full-time residential
treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and
sentence, the offender had spent five consecutive years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
Serious traffic convictions shall not be included in the offender score if,
since the last date of release from confinement (including full-time
residential treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of
judgment and sentence, the offender spent five years in the community without
committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction. This
subsection applies to both adult and juvenile prior convictions.

(3)
Out-of-state convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the
comparable offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law.
Federal convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the
comparable offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. If
there is no clearly comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is
one that is usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the
offense shall be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a felony under
the relevant federal statute.

(4)
Score prior convictions for felony anticipatory offenses (attempts, criminal
solicitations, and criminal conspiracies) the same as if they were convictions
for completed offenses.

(5)(a)
In the case of multiple prior convictions, for the purpose of computing the
offender score, count all convictions separately, except:

(i)
Prior offenses which were found, under RCW 9.94A.400(1)(a), to encompass the
same criminal conduct, shall be counted as one offense, the offense that yields
the highest offender score. The current sentencing court shall determine with
respect to other prior adult offenses for which sentences were served
concurrently or prior juvenile offenses for which sentences were served
consecutively, whether those offenses shall be counted as one offense or as
separate offenses using the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in
RCW 9.94A.400(1)(a), and if the court finds that they shall be counted as one
offense, then the offense that yields the highest offender score shall be
used. The current sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses
were not the same criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate dates, or
in separate counties or jurisdictions, or in separate complaints, indictments,
or informations;

(ii)
In the case of multiple prior convictions for offenses committed before July 1,
1986, for the purpose of computing the offender score, count all adult
convictions served concurrently as one offense, and count all juvenile
convictions entered on the same date as one offense. Use the conviction for
the offense that yields the highest offender score.

(b)
As used in this subsection (5), "served concurrently" means that:
(i) The latter sentence was imposed with specific reference to the former; (ii)
the concurrent relationship of the sentences was judicially imposed; and (iii)
the concurrent timing of the sentences was not the result of a probation or
parole revocation on the former offense.

(6)
If the present conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses of criminal
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior conviction as if the
present conviction were for a completed offense.

(7)
If the present conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not covered by
subsection (11) or (12) of this section, count one point for each adult prior
felony conviction and one point for each juvenile prior violent felony
conviction and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.

(8)
If the present conviction is for a violent offense and not covered in
subsection (9), (10), (11), or (12) of this section, count two points for each
prior adult and juvenile violent felony conviction, one point for each prior
adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.

(9)
If the present conviction is for Murder 1 or 2, Assault 1, Assault of a Child
1, Kidnapping 1, Homicide by Abuse, or Rape 1, count three points for prior
adult and juvenile convictions for crimes in these categories, two points for
each prior adult and juvenile violent conviction (not already counted), one
point for each prior adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each
prior juvenile nonviolent felony conviction.

(10)
If the present conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior convictions as in
subsection (8) of this section; however count two points for each prior adult
Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction, and one point for each prior
juvenile Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.

(11)
If the present conviction is for a felony traffic offense count two points for
each adult or juvenile prior conviction for Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular
Assault; for each felony offense or serious traffic offense, count one point
for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction. This
subsection shall not apply when additional time is added to a sentence pursuant
to RCW 46.61.520(2).

(12)
If the present conviction is for a drug offense count three points for each
adult prior felony drug offense conviction and two points for each juvenile
drug offense. All other adult and juvenile felonies are scored as in
subsection (8) of this section if the current drug offense is violent, or as in
subsection (7) of this section if the current drug offense is nonviolent.

(13)
If the present conviction is for Willful Failure to Return from Furlough, RCW
72.66.060, Willful Failure to Return from Work Release, RCW 72.65.070, or
Escape from Community Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape
convictions in the offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one
point and juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.

(14)
If the present conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or Escape 2, RCW
9A.76.120, count adult prior convictions as one point and juvenile prior
convictions as 1/2 point.

(15)
If the present conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential burglary, count
priors as in subsection (7) of this section; however, count two points for each
adult and juvenile prior Burglary 1 conviction, two points for each adult prior
Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile
prior Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.

(16)
If the present conviction is for a sex offense, count priors as in subsections
(7) through (15) of this section; however count three points for each adult and
juvenile prior sex offense conviction.

(17)
If the present conviction is for taking a motor vehicle without permission,
count two points for each prior adult and juvenile conviction for this offense.

(18)
If the present conviction is for an offense committed while the offender was
under community placement, add one point.

Sec.
4. RCW
13.40.0357 and 1998 c 290 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

juvenile juvenile
disposition

disposition category
for attempt,

offense bailjump,
conspiracy,

category description (rcw citation) or
solicitation

........................................

Arson and Malicious Mischief

A Arson 1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson 2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious
Mischief 3 (<$50 is

E class) (9A.48.090) E

E Tampering with
Fire Alarm

Apparatus (9.40.100) E

A Possession of
Incendiary Device

(9.40.120) B+

Assault and
Other Crimes

Involving
Physical Harm

A Assault 1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault 2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault 3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault 4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By
Shooting

(9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless
Endangerment

(9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting
Suicide Attempt

(9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion (9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary and Trespass

B+ Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential
Burglary

(9A.52.025) C

B Burglary 2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools
(Possession of)

(9A.52.060) E

D Criminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal
Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Vehicle
Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption
of Alcohol

(66.44.270) E

C Illegally
Obtaining Legend Drug

(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery,
Possession of Legend

Drug with
Intent to Sell

(69.41.030) D+

E Possession of
Legend Drug

(69.41.030) E

B+ Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act
- Narcotic,

Methamphetamine,
or Flunitrazepam

Sale (69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii)) B+

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act
- Nonnarcotic Sale

(69.50.401(a)(1)(iii)) C

E Possession of
Marihuana <40 grams

(69.50.401(e)) E

C Fraudulently
Obtaining Controlled

Substance (69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of
Controlled Substance

for Profit (69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act
- Narcotic,

Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam

Counterfeit
Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1) (i) or (ii)) B

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Nonnarcotic

Counterfeit
Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1) (iii), (iv), (v)) C

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Possession of a

Controlled
Substance

(69.50.401(d)) C

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Possession of a

Controlled
Substance

(69.50.401(c)) C

Firearms and Weapons

B Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of
Stolen Firearm

(9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded
Pistol Without

Permit (9.41.050) E

C Possession of
Firearms by Minor (<18)

(9.41.040(1)(b)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of
Dangerous Weapon

(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating
Another Person by use

of Weapon (9.41.270) E

Homicide

A+ Murder 1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder 2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap 1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful
Imprisonment

(9A.40.040) D+

Obstructing
Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a
Law Enforcement

Officer (9A.76.020) E

E Resisting Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing
Contraband 1

(9A.76.140) C

C Introducing
Contraband 2

(9A.76.150) D

E Introducing
Contraband 3

(9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a
Public Servant

(9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a
Witness

(9A.72.110) C+

Public
Disturbance

C+ Riot with Weapon (9A.84.010) D+

D+ Riot Without
Weapon

(9A.84.010) E

E Failure to
Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape 1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape 2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape 3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest 1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest 2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent
Exposure

(Victim <14) (9A.88.010) E

E Indecent Exposure

(Victim 14 or over) (9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting Prostitution 1

(9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting
Prostitution 2

(9A.88.080) D+

E O & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Theft, Robbery,
Extortion, and Forgery

B Theft 1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft 2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft 3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft of Livestock (9A.56.080) C

C Forgery (9A.60.020) D

A Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery 2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion 1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion 2 (9A.56.130) D+

B Possession of
Stolen Property 1

(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of
Stolen Property 2

(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of
Stolen Property 3

(9A.56.170) E

((C))

B Taking
Motor Vehicle Without

Owner's
Permission (9A.56.070) ((D))

C

Motor Vehicle
Related Crimes

E Driving Without
a License

(46.20.005) E

C Hit and Run -
Injury

(46.52.020(4)) D

D Hit and
Run-Attended

(46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and
Run-Unattended

(46.52.010) E

C Vehicular Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to
Elude Pursuing

Police Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While
Under the Influence

(46.61.502 and 46.61.504) E

Other

B Bomb Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape 11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape 21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape 3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene,
Harassing, Etc.,

Phone Calls (9.61.230) E

A Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Class A Felony B+

B Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Class B Felony C

C Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Class C Felony D

D Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Gross Misdemeanor E

E Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Misdemeanor E

V Violation of
Order of Restitution,

Community
Supervision, or

Confinement (13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are
classed as C offenses and the standard range is established as follows:

1st
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks confinement

2nd
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement

3rd
and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks
confinement

2If the
court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order, it may impose a
penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDS

This schedule must be used for juvenile offenders.
The court may select sentencing option A, B, or C.

OPTION A

JUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID

STANDARD RANGE

A+ 180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS|WEEKS

EXCEPT | | |

30-40 | | |

WEEKS FOR | | |

15-17 | | |

YEAR OLDS | | |

Current B+ 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

Offense WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL | |52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) |15-36 WEEKS |WEEKS

C+ LS |

|15-36 WEEKS

C LS |15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions: |

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Service

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4 or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE:
References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement.

(1)
The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category. The current
offense category is determined by the offense of adjudication.

(2)
The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included
in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count
as one point. Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor
adjudication shall count as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded
down.

(3)
The standard range disposition for each offense is determined by the
intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications and the row
defined by the current offense category.

(4)
RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense.

(5)
A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of
E. However, a disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.

OR

OPTION
B

CHEMICAL
DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If
the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local
sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+
offense, the court may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(5) and
13.40.165.

OR

OPTION
C

MANIFEST
INJUSTICE

If the court determines that
a disposition under option A or B would effectuate a manifest injustice, the
court shall impose a disposition outside the standard range under RCW
13.40.160(2).

---
END ---