BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
bear and cougar populations in the state of Washington have dramatically
increased over the years. Human encounters with bear and cougar are becoming
more common, as are incidents of humans being stalked or attacked by cougars.
It is the intent of the legislature to provide a higher level of protection for
the citizens of the state of Washington from attacks by bears and cougars.
Controlling the population of these animals is the safest, most effective means
to increase public safety. Due to the elusive nature of these animals, the
legislature recognizes that the safest, most effective means of controlling the
population of cougars and black bears is to allow the hunting of black bears
with the aid of bait and dogs, and allow the hunting of cougars with the aid of
dogs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

It
is lawful to pursue or tree a black bear during established pursuit only
seasons, provided that any bear pursued or treed is not killed or injured.
Hunters participating in a pursuit only season for black bear must have a valid
hound stamp and hunting license. A bear tag is not required to pursue black
bear during the pursuit only season.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

It
is lawful to hunt black bear during established hunting seasons with either
bait or dogs, or both.

(1)
For the purposes of this section and section 4 of this act, bait shall:

(a)
Be defined as any substance placed with the intent of attracting bear;

(b)
Be limited to unprocessed plant and plant parts including fruit; inedible parts
of legally obtained food fish, game fish, and game animals; carcasses of
legally trapped furbearing animals with the hide removed; carcasses of
unclassified wildlife; and parts of domestic livestock carcasses. All other
forms of bait are illegal; and

(c)
Not contain paper, cardboard, plastic, glass, aluminum, tin, steel, styrofoam,
or other packaging materials.

(2)
Bait for black bear may not be placed in an area until five days prior to the
start of that area's established bear harvest season. Bait may not be placed
within fifty yards of any lake, pond, reservoir, stream, river, or spring.
Bait may not be placed within two hundred yards of a road open to vehicular
traffic or a publicly maintained trail. Bait may not be placed within one-half
mile of a publicly designated administrative site, campground, picnic area,
landfill, or dump site, or within one-quarter mile of any permanent residence
or seasonal dwelling. However, private landowners may bait on their own
property within one-quarter mile of their own residence or seasonal dwelling
when the baiting does not violate any of the distance requirements with
adjacent landowners as detailed in this subsection.

(3)
Bait containers must be contained within an excavated pit, or within a confine
constructed of materials located at the site. Containment structures include,
but are not restricted to, log cubbies, rock piles, and stumps. Containers may
also be used to hold bait. If a container is used to hold bait it must be
securely fastened.

(4)
Items used to contain or to fasten bait containment materials such as metal
drums, nails, screws, bolts, rope, reinforcing rod, or spikes shall be removed
from the area within forty-eight hours of the close of the bear harvest
season. Excavated pits shall be filled and the area returned to prebaiting
condition. Tree stands and materials used to construct and erect tree stands
shall be removed within forty-eight hours of the close of the bear harvest
season, except that tree stands may be left on private property with the
landowner's permission.

(5)
All hunters who hunt bear with bait shall affix their bear tag number at their
bear baiting sites in such a manner that it remains conspicuous and legible for
the duration of the bear season.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
department may restrict or prohibit the use of hounds and bait to hunt black
bear in areas set aside as grizzly bear recovery zones.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

It
is lawful to hunt cougar during established hunting seasons with a dog or
dogs. A valid hunting license is required to hunt or pursue cougar. A hound
permit is required for all hunters if a dog or dogs are used to hunt cougar.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. RCW
77.16.360 and 1997 c 1 s 1 (Initiative Measure No. 655) are each
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---