BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
Companies that generate carbon dioxide emissions or manufacture products that
emit carbon dioxide are purchasing carbon credits from landowners and from
other companies in order to provide carbon credits. Companies that are
purchasing carbon credits would benefit from a program to trade and to bank
carbon credits. Washington forests are one of the most effective resources
that can absorb carbon dioxide from the atmosphere. Forests, and other planted
lands and waters, provide "carbon storage." Washington contains the most
productive forests in the world and both public and private landowners could
benefit from a carbon storage trading and banking program. The state should
manage all lands and waters in a manner to allow marketing of those lands for
carbon storage credits without negatively affecting the long-term production of
public and private lands.

(2)
The department of community, trade, and economic development, as lead agency in
cooperation with the department of ecology, the department of agriculture, and
the department of natural resources, will evaluate other states' and nations'
attempts to establish carbon credit programs and will develop, by December 1,
2000, recommendations for the next regular session of the Washington state
legislature. The departments shall review methods and scientific programs that
are used to implement carbon storage programs. The departments will analyze
other programs in the state of Washington, including the conservation reserve
enhancement program, that could facilitate a carbon storage program and a
stable carbon storage market.

(3)
The department of natural resources and the department of community, trade, and
economic development will jointly review carbon storage programs and carbon
storage requirements world-wide and will prepare appropriate legislative
responses as recommendations to the next regular session of the legislature by
December 1, 2000.

(4)
An advisory group shall be appointed by the agencies listed in subsection (2)
of this section. The advisory group shall consist of one representative of the
timber industry, one representative of the agricultural community, one
representative of the industrial business community, one representative of
private landowners, and an expert on carbon sequestration from the University
of Washington. The advisory group shall be consulted by, and offer its advice
to, the agencies listed in subsection (2) of this section on all matters
addressed by this section. The agencies listed in subsection (2) of this
section shall consider and include the input of the advisory group in all of
their activities under this section.

(5) This section expires December 31, 2000.

---
END ---